BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2021, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2020" or "FY 2020" means the period beginning July 1, 2019, and ending June 30, 2020.

(b) "Fiscal year 2021" or "FY 2021" means the period beginning July 1, 2020, and ending June 30, 2021.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2021-2023 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2019, from the 2017-2019 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Division III Roof Replacement and Maintenance (30000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library-Archives Building (30000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

State Archives Minor Works Projects (30000042)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$573,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$62,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$199,760,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$199,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$8,020,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,937,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,532,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$18,469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,455,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for the Byrd Barr place, formerly known as Centerstone, building renovation project.

(2) $220,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for El Centro de la Raza boiler fan and master plan for rehabilitation. This amount is not subject to the match requirements, pursuant to RCW 43.63A.125.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. and section 6008 of this act.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,406,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$278,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$70,816,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$81,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$10,588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,655,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,363,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6005 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,665,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$73,139,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$7,513,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$98,317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,972,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,289,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (30000875)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,907,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6001 of this act and shall be expended for the projects listed. However, if upon review of applications the public works board determines that a project is ineligible for a loan, or if the entity responsible for construction of a listed project declines a loan, the department may transfer any excess funding to other public works projects as recommended and approved through the public works board, provided those projects meet eligibility criteria.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,103,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$77,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,818,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,934,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$16,752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006 of this act.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,472,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,065,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,934,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$45,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$629,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6007 of this act.

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,478,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,162,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

(2) The Interbay public development advisory committee shall provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations by November 15, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee.

(3) The Interbay public development advisory committee terminates June 30, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$91,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,799,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $5,000,000 is for the public works board's emergency loan program.

(2) Up to $14,000,000 is for the public works board's preconstruction loan program.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$84,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,876,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,376,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $109,050,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $40,950,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing.

(2) $30,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider.

(3)(a) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(b) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment to be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(c) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(i) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than fifteen years old;

(ii) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(iii) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(iv) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(v) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(4) $40,950,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(a) Bellwether Housing MadBoy. . . .$6,000,000

(b) Capitol Hill Housing Broadway. . . .$6,000,000

(c) Fusion Emergency Shelter. . . .$3,000,000

(d) Highland Village Housing Project. . . .$5,500,000

(e) Interfaith Works Shelter. . . .$3,000,000

(f) Pateros Gardens. . . .$1,400,000

(g) SCIDpda North Lot. . . .$9,000,000

(h) Tenny Creek Assisted Living. . . .$1,750,000

(i) THA Arlington Drive. . . .$800,000

(j) Wesley Homes. . . .$2,000,000

(k) Yakima County Veterans Project. . . .$2,500,000

(5) $69,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(a) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(b) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(c) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities; and

(d) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, persons with behavioral health needs, including substance use disorder, and seniors.

(6) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(7) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsections (2) and (5) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,950,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$109,050,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$630,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000037)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,311,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Board (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) During the 2019-2021 biennium, the public works board must prioritize water and sewer infrastructure projects.

(2) $1,422,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the port Hadlock wastewater facility project.

(3) $1,400,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Eatonville water treatment plant project.

(4) $1,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Ferndale wastewater treatment project. Additionally, the public works board must prioritize financing a loan of up to $4,000,000 for project.

(5) $1,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Wenatchi landing sewer extension – phase 1. Additionally, the public works board must prioritize financing a loan of up to $1,000,000 for the project.

(6) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Belfair sewer extension project. Additionally, the public works board must prioritize financing a loan of up to $9,000,000 for the project.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Seattle Theatre Group. . . .$310,000

Music Center of the Northwest. . . .$300,000

Seattle Symphony Orchestra. . . .$912,000

Broadway Center for the Performing Arts. . . .$586,000

Bainbridge Artisan Resource Network. . . .$1,057,000

Nordic Heritage Museum Foundation. . . .$2,000,000

Imagine Children's Museum. . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Opera. . . .$526,000

KidsQuest Children's Museum. . . .$816,000

Central Stage Theatre of County Kitsap. . . .$964,000

Roxy Bremerton Foundation. . . .$51,000

Port Angeles Waterfront Center. . . .$1,112,000

Rehabilitating Fort Worden's Historic Warehouses. . . .$712,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Boys and Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin Counties. . . .$1,088,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$737,000

Tulalip Tribes of Washington. . . .$425,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap Counties. . . .$1,200,000

YMCA of the Inland Northwest. . . .$10,000

Bainbridge Island Child Care Centers. . . .$90,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle-Camp Orkila. . . .$250,000

Plus Delta After School Studios, dba The Club. . . .$80,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle-Camp Colman. . . .$250,000

Boys and Girls Clubs of Snohomish County. . . .$400,000

Camp Korey. . . .$545,000

Woodland Community Swimming Pool Committee. . . .$805,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $12,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that: Advance clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Priority must be given to: (i) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and (ii) projects that have a partner that is a tribe or nonprofit organization that serves community eligible entities. Utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(d) $4,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing shore power electrification at terminal five for the northwest seaport alliance. In order to receive this grant, the northwest seaport alliance must demonstrate that they applied to the VW settlement for this project and were denied.

(6)(a) $8,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants will be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program. Clean energy organizations who compete for grants from the program may not participate in the design of the grant program. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(7)(a) $7,907,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by households with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(8) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington Maritime Innovation Center. The center must be used to support technology acceleration and incubation, and act as a focal point for maritime sustainability, including, but not limited to, supporting technology development for maritime decarbonization and electrification.

(9) $8,300,000 of the state taxable construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in grid-scale energy storage at the proposed grid-scale energy storage research, development, and testing facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. The state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as a match to the federal funding. The instruments will support collaborations with the University of Washington and the Washington State University.

(10) $593,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the port of Grays Harbor for an offshore ocean wave renewable energy demonstration project.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,793,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,207,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$202,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Mercy Housing Northwest. . . .$820,000

Northwest Indian College. . . .$232,000

Refugee Women's Alliance (ReWA). . . .$393,000

Coastal Community Action Program. . . .$3,741,000

West African Community Council. . . .$387,000

YWCA Pierce County. . . .$750,000

Work Opportunities. . . .$25,000

Whatcom Dispute Resolution Center. . . .$118,000

University Heights Center for the Community. . . .$271,000

Chief Seattle Club. . . .$1,700,000

HomeSight. . . .$3,000,000

Unity Care NW. . . .$3,000,000

Rainier Valley Food Bank. . . .$950,000

Peninsula Behavioral Health. . . .$200,000

Compass Health. . . .$3,500,000

Blue Mountain Action Council. . . .$750,000

Encompass Northwest. . . .$1,500,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Olympic Peninsula. . . .$575,000

Community Action Council of Lewis, Mason & Thurston

Counties. . . .$475,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$102,387,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the early learning facilities revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance pursuant to RCW 43.31.567.

(2) $5,100,000 of the early learning facilities revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Roosevelt Child Care Center. . . .$1,500,000

City of Monroe, Boys & Girls Club ECEAP Facility. . . .$1,000,000

Family Support Center Olympia. . . .$600,000

Centralia-Chehalis Early Learning Conversion Project. . . .$2,000,000

(3) $4,186,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects for school districts, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573, in the following amounts:

Toppenish School District. . . .$111,000

Manson School District. . . .$400,000

Kettle Falls School District. . . .$395,000

North Thurston School District. . . .$324,000

Ellensburg School District. . . .$800,000

Everett School District. . . .$800,000

Tukwila School District. . . .$196,000

Richland School District. . . .$800,000

Lake Quinault School District. . . .$360,000

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants and loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations.

(5) When prioritizing applications for projects, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, within the boundaries of a regional transit authority in a county that has received distributions or appropriations under RCW 43.79.520, the department must give priority to applications for which at least ten percent of the total project cost is supported by those distributions or appropriations.

(6) The department, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must identify buildings in the inventory and condition of schools database that are no longer suitable for K-12 instructional space, but that could be repurposed as early learning facilities and available to eligible organizations. The department must report its findings and the list of buildings identified in this section to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2020.

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$25,814,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—State
. . . .
$4,186,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Weatherization (40000048)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support via training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings; this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded in small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $7,500,000 is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request. Prior to awarding funds, the department shall submit to the office of financial management a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed and cost of energy saved. The report must include these metrics from other states.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$117,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000052)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department of commerce must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. Commerce may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project results in increased capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a fifteen-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $40,000,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) $6,000,000 is provided solely for at least four enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $12,000,000 is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $4,000,000 is provided solely for substance use disorder treatment facilities that provide crisis, triage, subacute, or acute services and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $2,000,000 is provided solely for one or more crisis diversion or stabilization facilities to add sixteen beds in the Spokane region that will address both urban and rural needs, consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al. and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(f) $4,000,000 is provided solely for evaluation and treatment facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(g) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(h) $4,000,000 is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(6) $1,000,000 is provided solely for deposit into the revolving fund established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1528 (recovery support services) for capital improvements. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $48,592,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

CHAS Spokane Behavioral Health. . . .$400,000

Chelan SUD Design. . . .$206,000

Columbia Valley Community Health Remodel. . . .$31,000

Colville SUD Facility. . . .$4,523,000

Community Health of Snohomish County Edmonds. . . .$1,000,000

DESC Health Clinic. . . .$6,000,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavioral Health. . . .$14,700,000

Lynnwood Sea Mar Behavioral Health Expansion. . . .$1,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$535,000

North Sound SUD Treatment Facility. . . .$1,500,000

Oak Harbor Tri-County Behavioral Health. . . .$1,000,000

Providence Regional Medical Center. . . .$4,700,000

Sedro-Woolley North Sound E&T. . . .$7,000,000

Spokane Crisis Stabilization. . . .$2,000,000

Virginia Mason Acute Stabilization. . . .$2,200,000

Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$488,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$309,000

YVFWC Children's Village. . . .$1,000,000

(8)(a) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a contract with MultiCare to provide a mixed-use psychiatric care facility in Auburn. The facility must include twelve to eighteen crisis stabilization beds, sixty commitment beds for short-term stays, and sixty long-term involuntary commitment beds for persons on a ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitment.

(b) The funding in this subsection is subject to the recipient maintaining and operating the beds for at least thirty years to serve (i) persons who are publicly funded and (ii) persons who are detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(9) $408,000 is provided solely for the department for the purpose of providing technical assistance to applicants.

(10) The department of commerce must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(11) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(12) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects in unserved areas of the state.

(13) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2020. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$115,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$360,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$475,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

4th Ave. Street Enhancement (White Center). . . .$670,000

Abigail Stuart House (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Arivva Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Arlington B&G Club Parking Safety (Arlington). . . .$530,000

Asotin Masonic Lodge (Asotin). . . .$62,000

Auburn Arts & Culture Center (Auburn). . . .$500,000

Audubon Center (Sequim). . . .$1,000,000

B&GC of Olympic Peninsula (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

B&GC of Thurston County (Lacey). . . .$98,000

Ballard Food Bank (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue HERO House (Bellevue). . . .$46,000

Benton Co. Museum Building Improvements (Prosser). . . .$103,000

Big Brothers Big Sisters Learning Lab (Olympia). . . .$56,000

Bowers Field Airport (Ellensburg). . . .$275,000

Boys & Girls Club of Thurston Co. Upgrades (Rochester). . . .$31,000

Browns Park (Spokane Valley). . . .$536,000

Camas Washougal Nature Play Area (Washougal). . . .$103,000

Campus Towers (Longview). . . .$228,000

Carlisle Lake Park Improvements (Onalaska). . . .$213,000

Centerville Fire Dept. (Centerville). . . .$216,000

Centerville Grange (Centerville). . . .$90,000

Centralia Fox Theater (Centralia). . . .$1,000,000

Chehalis River Bridge Ped Safety Lighting Ph2 (Aberdeen). . . .$323,000

Chief Kitsap Education and Community Resource Center

(Poulsbo). . . .$1,000,000

Chief Leschi Schools Safety & Security (Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Children's Center Design & Feasibility Study (Vancouver). . . .$400,000

Clymer Museum Remodel Ph2 (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Colfax Pantry Building (Colfax). . . .$247,000

Conconully Community Services Complex (Conconully). . . .$515,000

Concrete Sewage Lagoon (Concrete). . . .$255,000

Cosmopolis Elem. Energy & Safety (Cosmopolis). . . .$206,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$150,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$43,000

Dawson Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$258,000

Dayton Pump Station (Edmonds). . . .$515,000

Dock and Marine Terminal (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

E. Blaine Infrastructure (Blaine). . . .$500,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Office (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Enumclaw Aquatic Center (Enumclaw). . . .$258,000

Enumclaw Expo Center Roof (Enumclaw). . . .$250,000

Everett TOD Study (Everett). . . .$200,000

Everett YMCA (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Evergreen High School Health Center (Vancouver). . . .$388,000

Excelsior Integrated Care Ctr. Sports Court (Spokane). . . .$266,000

Excelsior Roof & Gym Repair (Spokane). . . .$263,000

Excelsior Vocational Education Space (Spokane). . . .$164,000

Family Education and Support Services (Tumwater). . . .$500,000

Fennel Creek Trailhead (Bonney Lake). . . .$258,000

Filipino Hall Renovation (Wapato). . . .$63,000

Fircrest Park Development (Shoreline). . . .$200,000

Fircrest Pool (Fircrest). . . .$1,000,000

FISH Food Bank (Ellensburg). . . .$772,000

Fishtrap Creek Habitat Improvement (Lynden). . . .$258,000

Food Lifeline (Seattle). . . .$1,004,000

Garfield Co. Hospital HVAC (Pomeroy). . . .$250,000

Gateway Center (Grays Harbor). . . .$500,000

George Community Hall Roof (George). . . .$201,000

George Davis Creek Fish Passage Project (Sammamish). . . .$515,000

Gig Harbor Food Bank (Gig Harbor). . . .$180,000

Goldendale Airport (Goldendale). . . .$550,000

Granite Falls Police Department (Granite Falls). . . .$412,000

Grays Harbor and Willapa Bay Sedimentation

(Grays Harbor). . . .$464,000

Greenwood Cemetery Restoration (Centralia). . . .$402,000

Greenwood Cemetery Safety Upgrades (Centralia). . . .$91,000

HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,000,000

Heritage Senior Housing (Chelan). . . .$52,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Revitalization (Chelan). . . .$52,000

Historical Society Energy Upgrades (Anderson Island). . . .$14,000

Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor). . . .$129,000

Horseshoe Lake ADA Upgrades (Woodland). . . .$82,000

Housing Needs Study (Statewide). . . .$200,000

Howe Farm Water Service (Port Orchard). . . .$52,000

Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$458,000

Imagine Children's Museum (Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Index Water System Design (Index). . . .$23,000

Intersection Improvements Juanita Dr (Kirkland). . . .$750,000

Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah). . . .$1,000,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial (Bainbridge Island). . . .$155,000

Japanese Gulch (Mukilteo). . . .$400,000

Key Peninsula Assisted Living (Gig Harbor). . . .$500,000

Ki-Be School Parking Lot Improvements (Benton City). . . .$268,000

Kittitas Valley Event Center (Ellensburg). . . .$206,000

Klickitat Co. Sheriff Office Training Bldg. (Goldendale). . . .$335,000

KNKX Radio Studio (Tacoma). . . .$824,000

Lake Chelan Water Supply (Wenatchee). . . .$464,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$1,000,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$250,000

Larson Gallery Renovation (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Leffler Park (Manson). . . .$515,000

Legacy Site Utility Infrastructure (Maple Valley). . . .$154,000

Lewis Co. CHS Pediatric Clinic (Centralia). . . .$84,000

Little Badger Mountain Trailhead (Richland). . . .$464,000

Lummi Hatchery Project (San Juan). . . .$1,000,000

Maple Valley Veterans Memorial (Maple Valley). . . .$102,000

Mary's Place (Burien). . . .$2,050,000

McCormick Woods Sewer Lift Station (Port Orchard). . . .$250,000

Melanie Dressel Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Missing & Murdered Indigenous Women Memorial (Toppenish). . . .$49,000

Monroe B&G Club ADA Improvements (Monroe). . . .$464,000

Mountlake Terrace Main Street (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$750,000

Mt. Adams School District Athletic Fields (Harrah). . . .$242,000

Mt. Peak Fire Lookout Tower (Enumclaw). . . .$381,000

Mt. Spokane SP Ski Lift (Mead). . . .$750,000

Mukilteo Promenade (Mukilteo). . . .$500,000

Museum Storage Building (Steilacoom). . . .$72,000

Naselle HS Music/Vocational Wing (Naselle). . . .$258,000

Naselle Primary Care Clinic (Naselle). . . .$216,000

Naselle SD Flooring (Naselle). . . .$237,000

NCRA Maint. Bldg, Parking Lot, Event Space (Castle Rock). . . .$283,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding (Port Hadlock). . . .$464,000

Oak Harbor Marina (Oak Harbor). . . .$400,000

Oakville SD Kitchen Renovation (Oakville). . . .$517,000

Oddfellows Ellensburg Bldg Restoration (Ellensburg). . . .$267,000

Orting Ped Evac Crossing (Orting). . . .$103,000

Orting Public Buildings (Orting). . . .$302,000

Othello Regional Water (Othello). . . .$425,000

Pacific Co. Fairgrounds Roof (Menlo). . . .$210,000

Packwood FEMA Floodplain Study (Packwood). . . .$637,000

Pasco Farmers Market & Park (Pasco). . . .$154,000

Pendergast Regional Park P2 (Bremerton). . . .$50,000

PenMet - Cushman Trail Enhancements (Gig Harbor). . . .$52,000

PenMet Community Rec Center (Gig Harbor). . . .$173,000

Pine Garden Apartment Roof (Shelton). . . .$46,000

Pioneer Park Fountain (Walla Walla). . . .$9,000

Pomeroy Booster Pumping Station (Pomeroy). . . .$96,000

Port of Everett (Everett). . . .$300,000

Port of Walla Walla Walla-Wallula Water System

(Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Willapa Harbor Dredging Support Boat (Tokeland). . . .$180,000

Prairie View Schoolhouse Community Center (Waverly). . . .$57,000

Puyallup Culvert Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$515,000

Puyallup Street Frontage Improvement (Puyallup). . . .$258,000

Puyallup VFW Kitchen Renovation (Puyallup). . . .$52,000

Quincy Hospital (Quincy). . . .$300,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Recreation Park Renovation (Chehalis). . . .$258,000

Rise Together White Center Project (King County). . . .$1,000,000

Rosalia Sewer Improvements (Rosalia). . . .$500,000

Roslyn Downtown Assoc. (Roslyn). . . .$480,000

Royal Park & Rec Ctr. (Royal City). . . .$250,000

Sargent Oyster House Maritime Museum (Allyn). . . .$218,000

Schmid Ballfields Ph3 (Washougal). . . .$584,000

Seaport Landing (Aberdeen). . . .$349,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$800,000

Seattle Goodwill (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Shelton Civic Center Parking Lot (Shelton). . . .$283,000

Skagit County Sheriff Radios (Skagit). . . .$750,000

Skamania Courthouse Plaza (Stevenson). . . .$150,000

SnoCo Fire 26 Communications (Index). . . .$27,000

Snohomish Carnegie Project (Snohomish). . . .$500,000

Snoqualmie Early Learning Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activities Center (North Bend). . . .$412,000

Spokane Guilds' School (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

SR 503 Ped/Bike Ph1&2 (Woodland). . . .$235,000

Step by Step (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Stevens Co Disaster Response Communications (Colville). . . .$500,000

Sumas Event Complex (Sumas). . . .$206,000

Sumas Playground and Water Park (Sumas). . . .$288,000

Sunset Career Development Center (Renton). . . .$1,000,000

SW WA Dance Center (Chehalis). . . .$62,000

Swede Hall Renovation (Rochester). . . .$196,000

SW WA Fairgrounds (Chehalis). . . .$103,000

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma). . . .$413,000

Tehaleh Slopes Bike Trail (Bonney Lake). . . .$309,000

Telford Helipad (Creston). . . .$52,000

Tenino City Hall Renovation (Tenino). . . .$515,000

The Morck Hotel (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Toledo Sewer & Water (Toledo). . . .$469,000

Tonasket Senior Citizen Ctr. (Tonasket). . . .$33,000

Twisp Civic Building & EOC (Twisp). . . .$1,288,000

United Way of Pierce County HVAC (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

University Place Arts (University Place). . . .$34,000

Vertical Evacuation (Ocean Shores). . . .$500,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$123,000

VOA Lynnwood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$1,000,000

W. Kelso Affordable Housing & Community Facility Study

(Kelso). . . .$258,000

Waitsburg Flood Mitigation (Waitsburg). . . .$206,000

Waitsburg Taggart Road Waterline (Waitsburg). . . .$250,000

Wapato Creek Restoration (Fife). . . .$258,000

Warren Ave Playfield (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Westport Dredge Material Use (Westport). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Coupeville (Oak Harbor). . . .$849,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Oak Harbor (Oak Harbor). . . .$743,000

Wilkeson Water Protection (Wilkeson). . . .$36,000

William Shore Memorial Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$840,000

Wisdom Ridge Business Park (Ridgefield). . . .$371,000

Yakima Co. Veterans Dental Facility (Yakima). . . .$469,000

Yakima Valley Fair Livestock Arena (Grandview). . . .$154,000

Yelm Water Tower (Yelm). . . .$303,000

YWCA Home at Last (Tacoma). . . .$1,500,000

YV-Tech Welding Equipment (Yakima). . . .$26,000

(8) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Oak Harbor to enhance the fiscal sustainability and revenue generation of the city-owned marina through feasibility work, planning, development, and acquisition.

(9) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract for a study regarding both available and needed affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans in Washington state. The study must include data to inform policies related to affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans and supplement the housing assessment conducted by the affordable housing advisory board created in chapter 43.185B RCW.

(10) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the city of Shoreline for planning, development, and construction of a public park on property they receive from the department of social and health services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$79,486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 1498 (broadband service). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$105,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (40000124)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section may be used for the renovation or construction directly associated with behavioral rehabilitation services settings. The funding provided in this section is limited to projects at facilities that are not state-owned, that add capacity to address unmet need, and are maintained as behavioral rehabilitation services capacity available to the state for at least a five-year period.

(2) The department shall consult as needed with the department of children, youth, and families to ensure that, to the maximum extent possible, the use of funding provided in this section facilitates placements that will better accommodate permanency plans including, but not limited to, parent-child visitation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1064, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,295,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$88,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 6009 of this act. The community economic revitalization board may continue to make grants and loans until the end of the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
$3,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,569,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Library Capital Improvement Program (91001239)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,315,000 is provided solely for a local library capital improvement grant program for the following list of projects:

Birch Bay Vogt Community Library. . . .$2,000,000

La Conner Regional Library. . . .$720,000

Mount Vernon. . . .$1,000,000

Roslyn Library. . . .$780,000

Sedro-Woolley Library. . . .$1,000,000

Silverdale Library. . . .$2,000,000

Winthrop Library. . . .$2,000,000

Woodland Community Library. . . .$515,000

Yale Valley Community Library. . . .$300,000

(2) The department of commerce must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist libraries operated by governmental units as defined in RCW 27.12.010 in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities.

(3) The department of commerce must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria and review proposals. The committee must be composed of five members as provided in this subsection. The committee must include: (a) A representative from the department of commerce; (b) a representative from the department of archaeology and historic preservation; (c) the state librarian; (d) a representative from a library district; and (e) a representative from a municipal library.

(4) The department of commerce must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department of commerce must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in subsection (3) of this section, using objective criteria. The ranking of projects must prioritize library district facilities listed on a local, state, or federal register and those located in distressed or rural counties. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants propose to apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed fifty percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(5) The department of commerce must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature by October 1, 2020, for inclusion in the department of commerce's 2021-2023 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed two million dollars. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list must not exceed ten million dollars.

(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department of commerce must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 is provided solely for a rapid response manufactured housing community preservation pilot program for the purpose of preserving manufactured and mobile home communities. To implement the program, the department of commerce must contract directly with the northwest cooperative development center—resident owned communities through a rapid contracting process, allowing the contractor to work with residents of one or more mobile home parks to engage in one or more purchase and sale agreements, with the purpose of preserving the mobile home community as a nonprofit, or co-op run affordable housing project and benefitting people and households at or below eighty percent of the area median income. The department of commerce, in collaboration with the contractor, must submit a report to the legislature by June 30, 2021, reporting how the funds were distributed, how many mobile home parks were purchased, and the demographics of the residents.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Central District Community Preservation and Development Authority (91001280)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 is provided solely for the department of commerce to support the establishment of the central district community preservation and development authority in order to facilitate the transfer of the Seattle vocational institute property located at 2120 South Jackson Street, Seattle, Washington 98144 from the Seattle central college to the authority established in House Bill No. 1918 (community preservation auth.). The department must contract with an entity that is familiar with the project, the community, and the state agencies to organize the central district community preservation and development authority. If House Bill No. 1918 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Capacity Grants (91001306)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bethel Dental Clinic. . . .$500,000

Columbia County Dental. . . .$250,000

Skagit Valley College WDTEP. . . .$550,000

Vancouver Dental. . . .$175,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $1,000,000 of the reappropriation, not to exceed the amount remaining from the original appropriation, originally for the South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor, may be used for the pedestrian crossing project at Kirkland Avenue and Lake Street.

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,109,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,377,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State
. . . .
$40,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$30,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,399,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$107,169,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (92000611)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1015, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$86,034,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$87,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,222,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,260,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration & Elevator Repairs (30000548)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,550,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,778,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,883,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Transportation Building Preservation (30000777)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,691,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,347,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Systems Rehabilitation (30000791)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security & Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,508,000 is provided solely for the security improvements of distributed antenna system in the natural resource building, columbia, and department of transportation parking garages, duress alarms in the legislative and cherberg buildings, video management, and utility redundancy.

(2) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,625,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$710,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,335,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$415,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$207,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,246,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,537,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,167,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,704,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering & Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for the delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, and state agency facilities personnel to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

(4) The final buy clean Washington pilot report required in section 1030, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, must be provided by June 30, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,965,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$18,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$62,454,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$95,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Childcare Center (40000030)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for designing and constructing a new child care center at the IBM site on the capitol campus. The new child care center shall have a minimum of seventy-five to one hundred slots for children.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,023,000

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Roof Replacement - Cherberg and Insurance Buildings (40000032)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,299,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,798,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Preservation Cleaning (40000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,453,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2019-21 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000082)

Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$731,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$846,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$773,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,864,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,214,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Grounds Maintenance Building (40000091)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation must be used solely for a completed grounds maintenance building.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2019-21 Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (40000141)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,289,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus-Wide Electrical Service Panels - Arc Flash Study (40000151)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$740,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$260,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

SEEP: EVSE at State Facilities (40000161)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Conservatory Demolition (91000442)

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$579,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$71,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

GA Building Demolition (91000448)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Campus Utility Renewal Plan (92000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,820,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$28,881,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$427,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,978,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$37,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,666,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$499,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$11,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,071,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$51,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,385,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,395,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,814,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$22,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,413,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness Center (30000818)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,289,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,287,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,576,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Kent Readiness Center (30000917)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,150,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$380,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 is provided solely for a predesign.

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 Biennium (40000036)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,224,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,756,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2019-21 Biennium (40000037)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$21,630,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,259,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$23,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Soldiers Memorial Park (40000062)

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Kent Site (40000073)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Bremerton Site (40000077)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Field Maintenance Shop (FMS) Addition (40000095)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Joint Base Lewis-McChord (JBLM) 3106 Helicopter Port (40000100)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Air Support Operations Group (ASOG) Complex (40000163)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,622,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Mission Support Group/Logistics/Communications (MSG-Comm)Facility (40000167)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,114,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,284,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,398,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic Cemetery Grant Program (30000021)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Rehabilitation of Beverly Bridge (30000022)

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$429,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,146,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000023)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Columbia. . . .$122,000

Benton. . . .$34,000

Lewis. . . .$120,000

Klickitat. . . .$304,000

Clark. . . .$39,000

Jefferson. . . .$300,000

Spokane. . . .$400,000

Douglas. . . .$3,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,922,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Ebey's National Historic Reserve (40000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of archaeology and historic preservation must prioritize public facilities projects that provide the greatest public benefit by preserving properties that are historically significant and serve the greatest number of people.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program 2017-19 (92000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program 2017-19 (92000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1057, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,137,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$342,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$342,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$684,000

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Cooling System Replacement (30000019)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,283,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,283,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,566,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,566,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects (30000035)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,244,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,239,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,558,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Modernize Lab and Training Facility (30000043)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$45,223,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$7,980,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$53,203,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,203,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen & Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$387,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$178,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$855,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,425,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,464,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,889,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,156,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$329,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$508,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003241)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$912,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2016, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2027, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: New Security Fence (30003578)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,060,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Elevator Modernization (30003582)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,275,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Windows Security (30003585)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Emergency Electrical System: Upgrades (30003616)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 4, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$467,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$314,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Renovations for Treatment Recovery Center (40000029)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$123,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,580,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$168,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$965,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects installing fire alarms at the following locations: (a) Fircrest School; (b) Lakeland Village; (c) Western State Hospital; (d) Rainier School; and (e) Echo Glen. The projects listed in this section must be designed under one contract, and installed under one contract. The department must consult with the department of children, youth, and families to prioritize the projects.

(2) When the bid is received, the department must report to the appropriate legislative committees the overall bid for the projects.

(3) The department must report to the appropriate legislative committees any best practices on the process by December 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Forensic Hospital (91000067)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign for a new forensic hospital on the existing campus. The appropriation provided may be used for predesign and siting costs.

(2)(a) The predesign must consider between two hundred fifty and three hundred fifty forensic beds.

(b) In order to determine the needed capacity at the new forensic hospital, the department must take into consideration the projected forensic demand and statewide capacity. The capacity must account for the continued use of buildings 27, 28, and 29 for forensic patients and civil patients with complex behavioral needs and prior forensic involvement, as well as the capacity at eastern state hospital. To determine the necessary capacity for the new forensic hospital, the predesign must plan the space for forensic admissions and restoration purposes.

(3) The department must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$257,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$258,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Elevators (91000068)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Doors Replacement (40000392)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Eastlake & Westlake: Fire & Smoke Controls (40000404)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: Fire Stops (40000405)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Fire House: Electrical Upgrades (40000422)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Operated Community Civil 16-Bed Capacity (40000546)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for predesign, design, and construction for a new sixteen bed civil commitment facility.

(2) The department must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by December 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,900,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,969,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Forensic Ward (91000050)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Additional Forensic Ward (91000062)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital & CSTC Power Upgrade (91000070)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Pats E: Cottage Cooling Upgrades (91000071)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000074)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Operated Community Civil 16-Bed Capacity (91000075)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Flooring (91000076)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000077)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for predesign, design, and construction for a new forty-eight bed facility.

(2) The facility must be provided as follows: Sixteen of the beds are for a state-operated civil commitment program; sixteen of the beds are for a private provider for short-term detention beds; and sixteen of the beds are for a private provider for stepdown beds.

(3) The department must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by December 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,829,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$51,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$66,721,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$118,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Preservation (40000011)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (40000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$417,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$417,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$128,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$163,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to well-managed, publicly-owned group A water utilities for the repair and consolidation of group A and B water systems under the following conditions:

(1) A grant may be provided when a water system has been voluntarily transferred to a publicly owned water utility within the last three years. The grant may be used for repair and consolidation costs.

(2) The grant applicant must provide the department of health with an accounting of rehabilitation costs and the value of the system. The grant must be used primarily to cover project design and construction costs, and only in limited cases to cover the cost of system acquisitions, as determined by the department of health in evaluating grant applications.

(3) Grants must primarily be used to cover project construction costs that customers benefiting from the project cannot afford to repay through loans, as determined by the department of health and the publicly owned utility receiving the grant to complete the project.

(4) Applicants must provide a plan demonstrating that project completion will occur within three years of the grant contract execution.

(5) Each grant must be less than twenty-five percent of the total appropriation.

(6) The primary purpose of this appropriation is to fund water system repair and consolidation construction costs. However, the department may use up to $75,000 under this section for grants for feasibility review of water system repair and consolidation projects that would meet the objectives of this section and RCW 70.119A.190.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of health must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program 2017-19 (92000025)

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Washington Veterans Home: Bldg 6 & 7 Demo and Grounds Improvement (30000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,313,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,445,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Program (30000131)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,380,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Additional Internment Vaults and Roadway (30000215)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH Cemetery Road Realignment (91000012)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,505,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Statewide-RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

(2) The appropriation in this section constitutes the sole appropriation for a complete non-phased building to replace the current recreation building. It must only be used for the building replacement and the playing fields.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,057,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,890,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$54,110,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Pine Lodge Behavioral Rehabilitation Services (91000061)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Implementation of JRA Capacity (91000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign for Echo Glen, a predesign for Green Hill, and a comprehensive strategic capital master plan. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$830,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,718,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$170,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,685,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Replace Roofs (30000654)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$675,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,417,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000748)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$180,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Security Video System (30000800)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,738,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Bldg E Roof Replacement (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,022,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Security Video Camera Installation (30001066)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,085,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC ADA Compliance Retrofit (30001118)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MLCC: 128 Bed Minimum Camp (30001168)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2053, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

(2) These funds are reappropriated for the renovation of Maple Lane corrections center for use as a 128-bed minimum facility for women offenders. The renovation and subsequent use shall occur subject only to reasonable local permitting and mitigation requirements, and shall not be subject to any further siting or use process.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,780,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,900,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$661,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,341,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Reclaimed Water Line (40000058)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AHCC: Reclaimed Water (40000059)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Security Fence at MSC for New Medium Capacity (40000173)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: Sewer System HABU (Highest and Best Use) (40000185)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $800,000 is provided solely for the pumping of biosolids from the sewer lagoon.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000187)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$73,965,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$88,468,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: BAR Unit Door Conversions (91000431)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to implement the settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Inslee, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Case No. 18-5071, for the portions of the agreement that require modifications to existing booth-controlled cell door mechanisms in one treatment unit in the Washington State Penitentiary. If the settlement agreement is not fully executed and approved by the court before June 30, 2020, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,250,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply Facilities)—State
. . . .
$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Site Closure Account—State
. . . .
$8,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$594,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$2,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$89,424,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$69,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$381,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,721,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$3,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$71,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$324,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,710,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$432,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$19,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$43,712,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,041,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$52,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State
. . . .
$3,526,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,474,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,620,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3044, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State
. . . .
$1,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State
. . . .
$169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,431,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State
. . . .
$45,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$514,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,941,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$10,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,977,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$3,436,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,171,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,893,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$8,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$992,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$15,786,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,967,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$32,753,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,994,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,328,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$18,711,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$118,465,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$137,176,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$65,824,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$203,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$27,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,384,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,149,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$3,669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$7,917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$714,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$1,317,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,082,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,601,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,954,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$4,079,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,033,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,967,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,960,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$23,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000671)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000672)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$345,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000674)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$472,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,436,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,024,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,054,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$5,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000710)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$160,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$210,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000711)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,603,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$12,203,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,541,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$33,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey Headquarters Facility Preservation Projects (30000713)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Regional Office Improvements and Stormwater Treatment (30000741)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$510,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,886,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$2,099,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000763)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$11,400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$36,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,093,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Catastrophic Flood Relief (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,075,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$112,599,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000108)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$26,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000110)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution control state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal
. . . .
$56,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$148,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$204,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$816,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,020,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000111)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 ASARCO Cleanup (40000114)

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,650,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (40000115)

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$140,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$175,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000117)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000126)

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (40000127)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (40000128)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Floodplains by Design (40000129)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Clean Up Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (40000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,492,000 is provided solely for the Everett ASARCO cleanup to expedite the remediation of the residential properties, as well as conduct post-remediation monitoring and complete storm drain cleaning.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$12,767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,767,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations in this section are provided solely for competitive grants to local governments implementing projects that reduce the impacts of stormwater on Washington state's waters.

(2) $29,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants directed to areas of Puget Sound that will benefit southern resident killer whales.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$195,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015 Drought Authority (40000146)

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000147)

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Roof Replacement (40000148)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000149)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish and administer a program to provide grants to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010. The grants may only be used for:

(a) Integrated planning to fund studies and other activities necessary to facilitate the acquisition, remediation, and adaptive reuse of known or suspected contaminated real property for affordable housing development, including:

(i) The activities specified under RCW 70.105D.070(4)(e)(iv); and

(ii) Entry into development agreements pursuant to RCW 36.70B.170 through 36.70B.190 to accelerate the development of the contaminated real property into affordable housing; and

(b) Remediation of contaminated real property for affordable housing development.

(2) When prioritizing grants under this section, the department must consult with the department of commerce and consider at a minimum:

(a) The ability of the project to expedite the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(b) The extent to which the project leverages other public or private funding for the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(c) The suitability of the real property for affordable housing based on the threat posed by the contamination to human health;

(d) Whether the work to be funded under the grant is ready to proceed and be completed; and

(e) The distribution of grants throughout the state and among public and private entities.

(3) Any remediation of contaminated real property funded under this section must be performed:

(a) Under an agreed order or consent decree issued under chapter 70.105D RCW; and

(b) In accordance with the rules established under chapter 70.105D RCW.

(4) Prior to a grant recipient conveying any interest in the real property or entering into any leases, the real property must be restricted to affordable housing use for a period of no less than thirty years.

(a) The department may require a grant recipient to record an interest in the land in accordance with RCW 64.04.130 or use other means deemed by the department to be no less protective of the affordable housing use and interests of the department.

(b) Any grant recipient who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply with this subsection shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to any agreement or chapter 70.105D RCW for the repayment, with interest, of funds provided under this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000151)

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,200,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$21,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$180,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$201,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$128,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$159,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Zosel Dam Preservation (40000193)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,260,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for reimbursing the Lakewood water district for costs for the Ponders drinking water treatment system, including costs incurred prior to July 1, 2019.

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$9,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,637,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey HQ Facility Preservation Project—Minor Works (40000207)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Local Solid Waste Financial Assistance (LSWFA) (40000208)

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000209)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $23,757,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including project level environmental review, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, the office of Chehalis basin, and other parties.

(2) Up to $59,450,000 of the appropriation is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) The office of Chehalis basin board has discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1) and (2) of this section if needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation; however, $25,000,000 of the amounts in this section are provided solely for the final design, permitting, property acquisition, and construction of the Aberdeen Hoquiam north shore levee and related stormwater conveyance and pump station upgrades.

(4) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$83,207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$288,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$371,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Chemical Action Plan Implementation (40000210)

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$3,704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,440,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$17,156,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$22,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$254,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$276,596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,802,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,274,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Integrated Planning Grant: Port Townsend (91000338)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3026, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$13,558,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Water (91000347)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Port Angeles Stormwater (91000358)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 is provided solely for the port of Port Angeles for archaeological excavations, design, and engineering for a stormwater pollution control system on industrial lands adjacent to the Tse-whit-zen tribal burial site in Port Angeles. Archaeological excavations must be completed in accordance with a permit issued by the department of archaeology and historic preservation and in consultation with the Lower Elwha Klallam tribe.

Local Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

PFAS Pilot Project (91000359)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $400,000 is provided solely for the department of ecology to continue the characterization of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl (PFAS) chemicals in source areas that impact the Issaquah valley aquifer and to design a pilot study for potential cleanup technologies. This work must be done in coordination with the local municipality and fire and rescue agency. The pilot plan shall help inform the development of statewide regulations for this contaminant.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3028, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,266,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$45,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$1,559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$3,683,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Program 2019-21 (30000702)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$92,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2019-21 Leaking Tank Model Remedies Activity (30000703)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$764,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$12,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twin Harbors State Park: Renovation (30000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$229,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$13,954,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,091,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,295,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,963,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Casey - Lighthouse Historic Preservation (30000109)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$217,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Housing Areas Exterior Improvements (30000287)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$499,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,652,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,851,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$338,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$64,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,442,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$242,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the commission to relocate the campground.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$433,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock Entrance Road Realignment (30000647)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$151,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,050,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$551,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,793,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,437,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,062,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,165,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,190,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$726,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$350,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,493,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,061,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$387,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$237,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,269,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,086,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works Program (90000975)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$386,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,240,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$647,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure (30000978)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works—Program (30000979)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$845,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$112,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for the commission to provide site improvements, safety improvements, and parking stalls.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$220,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$236,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$467,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$533,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,006,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$214,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,013,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$466,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,673,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,226,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$53,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Code/Regulatory Compliance 2019-21 (40000013)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance 2019-21 (40000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electric Vehicle Charging Stations (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran - Major Park Renovation (40000020)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,026,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lyons Ferry Campground Reestablishment (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the commission to develop forty RV and tent campsites. The appropriation may be used for site development with the condition the campsites are provided.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment - Welcome Center and Entrance Improvements (40000034)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Historic Building Roof Replacements (40000040)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$973,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$973,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Deception Pass - Bowman Bay Pier Replacement (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,641,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Marine Facilities Rehabilitation (40000127)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,512,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Facility & Infrastructure Backlog Reduction 2019-21 (40000138)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,994,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Comfort Station Pilot Project (91000433)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3043, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$104,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,167,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$69,380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$886,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$41,114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$68,161,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$3,010,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,332,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$504,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$3,761,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$56,393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$67,350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$232,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,768,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$62,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$4,225,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,644,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$1,510,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$5,486,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$12,865,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,139,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,973,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$20,112,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$46,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,019,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$465,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,705,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,389,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$81,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$499,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,998,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$965,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,738,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$44,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,775,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017, and LEAP capital document No. 2018-6H, developed January 3, 2018.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$29,705,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$6,992,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$27,817,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$64,514,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,486,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$15,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,090,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$11,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$815,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-9H, developed March 5, 2018.

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$1,360,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,794,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$10,154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,903,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,685,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$762,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Trails Program (30000417)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$717,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000418)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$550,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Land and Water Conservation (30000419)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,765,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-1H, developed March 25, 2019.

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$36,000,000

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$36,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$80,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$320,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(2) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$300,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$375,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Facilities Program (40000005)

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$17,872,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$71,488,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$89,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000006)

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$11,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,644,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$67,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-2H, developed March 25, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,306,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$203,607,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document No. 2019-3H, developed March 25, 2019.

(2) The agency may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,752,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000013)

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,940,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Recreational Trails Program (40000014)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000015)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000016)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,839,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Brian Abbott Fish Passage Barrier Removal Board (91000566)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3086, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

(2) A maximum of $615,000 of unused funds in this appropriation may be used for replacement and repair of dock facilities available for public use at Van Riper marina, without requiring matching resources, and provided that a grant and lease term of 30 years is offered to the recipient from the state.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,559,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$1,337,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$15,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,885,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,465,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,065,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,810,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for continuing erosion control at North Cove, including beach restoration, erosion control, sediment abatement, soft berm, and dynamic revetment projects.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Natural Resource Investments (40000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to help landowners boost environmental stewardship and agricultural sustainability. The commission must consider funding needs for those districts involved with chinook salmon recovery that will have the most benefit for southern resident killer whales.

(2) Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission must, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The state conservation commission shall give preference to projects located in the sixteen fish critical basins, other water-short or drought impacted basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within the basins described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP PIP Loan Program (40000010)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match 2017-19 (91000009)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$631,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding 2017-19 (91000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,256,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Contract Funding (91000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (91000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6018 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,548,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,722,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3090, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3052, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3053, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,798,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,288,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,900,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for repair of the Wiley Slough dike.

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$863,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,680,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$13,943,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,421,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$158,364,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,086,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,148,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,427,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$457,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$401,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,825,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,555,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,031,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$646,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hazard Fuel Reductions, Forest Health and Ecosystem Improvement (30000665)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,220,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,589,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$281,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$70,616,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000756)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,955,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$625,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In constructing the project, the department must consider the firelight toilet technology.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$75,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,794,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,423,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,248,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,673,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$315,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,699,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

PSNERP Match (30000846)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$489,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,489,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,754,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,024,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,778,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$424,426,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$433,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and PA System (30000848)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$94,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Scatter Creek Wildlife Area Fire Damage (40000005)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$81,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 (40000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Programmatic 2019-21 (40000008)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snohomish County Wildlife Rehabilitation Facility (PAWS) (40000025)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,006,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$460,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3114, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,920,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (30000261)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$956,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000263)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,134,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000266)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (30000267)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$811,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,189,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (30000269)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3058, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, with the following exceptions:

(1) The department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties by June 30, 2020, rather than June 30, 2019.

(2) Land within the common school trust must be exchanged for land of equal value held for other trust beneficiaries of the property identified in subsection (1) of section 3058, chapter 298, Laws of 2018 by June 30, 2020, rather than June 30, 2019.

(3) The state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section by June 30, 2020, rather than June 30, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,939,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$61,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000290)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3129, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,889,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NE Region Storm Damage Road Repair (40000002)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$429,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Goldendale Fire Station Latrine and Shower Facility (40000014)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port Angeles Storm Water Repair (40000015)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,349,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,559,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Pasco Local Improvement District (40000019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Airway Heights Facility Replacement (40000025)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Husum Fire Station and Work Center Expansion and Renovation (40000028)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3287. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Purchase Replacement for Union Gap Fire Station (40000029)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$645,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3288. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2019-21 Minor Works Preservation (40000030)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3289. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sedro-Woolley Storm Water Repair (40000031)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$331,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,150,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3290. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (40000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forestland status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forestlands in counties with:

(i) A population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) Risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forestlands in the qualifying counties.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forestland, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3291. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3292. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of natural resources to transfer from trust status certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for state parks, fish and wildlife habitats, natural area preserves, natural resources conservation areas, department of natural resources community forest open spaces, or recreation purposes. The approved property for transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2019-4H, developed March 25, 2019.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. By September 30, 2019, the department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.

(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs, and may not exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.

(4) By June 30, 2021, land within the common school trust shall be exchanged for land of equal value held for other trust beneficiaries of the property identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Fee transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that perpetually restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.

(6) The department shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section.

(7) By June 30, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3293. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (40000037)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3294. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3295. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (40000039)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$58,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3296. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget Sound Corps (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3297. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sunshine Mine (40000042)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3298. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (40000043)

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$61,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3299. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (40000044)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3300. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2019-21 (40000045)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities 2019-21 (40000046)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

School Seismic Safety Assessments (40000047)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department, in consultation with the office of emergency management, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education, shall develop a prioritized seismic risk assessment that includes seismic safety surveys of public facilities that are subject to high seismic risk because of high earthquake hazard and soils that amplify that hazard.

(2) The survey must be a representative sample of public facilities located in high priority areas as determined in the 2017-19 survey of public school seismic safety assessments and tsunami inundation zones as published by the department. The survey must use the results of the 2017-19 survey's findings to prioritize school buildings based on geologic and engineering results.

(3) The seismic safety surveys must be conducted for the following types of public facilities in the following order:

(a) A portion of public school facilities that are routinely used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade and in school districts that have held successful bond elections within the previous three years;

(b) A portion of the remaining public school facilities that are routinely used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade;

(c) Fire stations located within a one-mile radius of a facility described in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(4) The department must coordinate and maximize survey efforts made under subsection (3)(a), (b), and (c) of this section whenever possible.

(5) The initial phase of the prioritized seismic needs assessment of the facilities specified in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) An on-site assessment, under the supervision of licensed geologists, of the seismic site class of the soils at the facilities;

(b) An on-site inspection of the facility buildings, including structural systems using structural plans where available, condition, maintenance, and nonstructural seismic hazards following standardized methods by licensed structural engineers;

(c) An estimate of costs to retrofit a prioritized subset of the facilities specified in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section to life safety standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers; and

(d) An estimate of costs to retrofit a prioritized subset of facilities specified in subsection (3)(c) of this section to immediate occupancy standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers.

(6) The department must collect and submit survey data to the superintendent of public instruction in a format compatible with the inventory and condition of schools database. The department must enter into an agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to make any necessary modifications to the inventory and condition of schools database to receive and report the survey data.

(7) The department must share that data with the school districts where the surveys were conducted, the schools where the surveys were conducted, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees.

(8) The department and the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide technical assistance to the school facilities sampled to incorporate survey information into their school safety plans.

(9) The statewide seismic needs assessment specified in this section shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2021.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $13,200,000 is provided solely for: Mitigating risk of uncharacteristic wildfire and other disturbances to protect lives, communities, property, ecosystems, and working forests; implementing forest health treatments, prioritized pursuant to chapter 76.06 RCW, on state lands and state forestlands, high-risk private lands, and federal lands, including implementation of the "good neighbor" agreement signed with the United States forest service and the bureau of land management, and "good neighbor" cross boundary competitive grants to forest collaboratives; and increasing the use of prescribed fire through improved trainings, prescribed burn certification programs, and shared stewardship strategies with federal land managers.

(2) $1,000,000 is provided solely for administering the forest health treatments pursuant to subsection (1) of this section with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must contract with the Washington conservation corps, including veterans, to provide forest health treatments that may include thinning, pruning, and brush disposal, and other wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices for firewise communities; and

(b) The department must work in conjunction with communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts in implementing wildfire preparedness and fuel modification practices for firewise communities.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Large Vessel Removals (40000051)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (RHOSP) (40000053)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Cultural Resources Conservation Easement Program (CRCEP) (40000054)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Federal ESA Mitigation Grants (91000087)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District Grant (91000099)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Assessing and Improving Economic Performance of Trust Lands (91000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to conduct the asset valuation of state lands and state forestlands held in trust and managed by the department as required in section 7022 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2017-19 (92000032)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3312. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fircrest Land Transfer (91000101)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) To the extent consistent with chapter 79.17 RCW, the department must transfer by deed up to six acres of charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions trust land that borders 15th Avenue Northeast on the Fircrest school campus in the city of Shoreline, to the King county housing authority for the development of affordable housing.

(2) To compensate the trust, the department must determine the value of the trust land property transferred under subsection (1) of this section, and it must consult with the department of social and health services in good faith to designate and exchange land of at least equivalent type and value for the purposes of implementing section 7035 of this act.

(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section may be paid out of this appropriation.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3313. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Craft Brewing and Distilling Center (91000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3314. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,100,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$2,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Burn Building - Structural Repairs (30000256)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Kennewick Laboratory Renovations and Security Improvements (30000266)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

High Throughput DNA Laboratory (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $277,000 is provided solely for renovations to the crime lab.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6020 of this act.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,072,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$529,395,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$530,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$382,788,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$387,382,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$44,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$509,931,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$554,631,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Emergency Repairs and Equal Access Grants for K-12 Public Schools (30000182)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5001, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5002, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

School Construction and Skills Centers Building

Account—State
. . . .
$2,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Classrooms and Labs (30000203)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,656,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$475,282,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$255,948,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$731,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$217,520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$948,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$893,304,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$145,749,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,042,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,870,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,912,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Administration (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $261,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for automating the school construction assistance program grant application process, known as the "d-form process," in the inventory and condition of schools database with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The school facilities and organization division of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the technical advisory committee defined in RCW 28A.525.025, must apply lean management principles and other performance management strategies to the d-form process prior to automating the process to reduce undue administrative burdens on school districts seeking state funding assistance for school construction; and

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the progress and implementation of automating the d-form process by December 1, 2020.

(2)(a) Within the remaining portion of the appropriation, the school facilities and organization division of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the technical advisory committee and the citizens advisory panel defined in RCW 28A.525.025, must apply lean management principles and other performance strategies to the study and survey process to reduce undue administrative burdens on school districts seeking state funding assistance for school construction.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on policy recommendations to streamline the study and survey process by December 1, 2020.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,124,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Health and Safety 2019-21 (40000019)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $3,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems; abatement of potentially hazardous materials; and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools 2019-21 (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington Green Schools for planning and developing green stormwater infrastructure on public school properties that have been identified as needing to reduce stormwater runoff. The office must identify infrastructure project locations based on GIS mapping and must prioritize schools with high percentages of enrollments eligible for the free and reduced price meal program to provide equity of opportunity in high need communities. It is the intent of the legislature that these projects be used to engage students and be completed in conjunction with K-12 STEM education curriculum developed to meet next generation climate standards.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop or use its previously developed criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation;

(b) Any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and

(c) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(3) The remaining portion of the appropriation may be used:

(a) For water bottle filling stations, which may include replacement of lead-contaminated drinking water fixtures.

(b) To purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's physical health which may include, but is not limited to: Fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation.

(c) To purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's nutrition which may include, but is not limited to: Garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skills Centers Minor Works (40000023)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Preservation Program 2019-21 (40000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $20,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for projects in small rural districts, with total enrollments of less than one thousand students, where the school facility does not need to be replaced and does not require an extensive modernization but does have significant building system deficiencies. No individual school district may receive a grant that exceeds $5,000,000. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall use an expedited grant application process in selecting the grant recipients funded by this subsection.

(2) $40,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for modular classrooms made with mass timber products, including cross-laminated timber, for the purpose of replacing portables in school districts with space challenges due to unavailable land for new school facilities to accommodate enrollment growth or with an overdependent use of portables to provide classroom space. The grants are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) School districts are responsible for the costs of site preparation; required permits; delivery and installation of the modular classrooms; furnishings, fixtures, and equipment; utility connections; and any other infrastructure costs related to the modular classrooms;

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize projects based on the following criteria in the following order:

(i) School districts with high ratios of portable classrooms to permanent classrooms;

(ii) School districts with low acreage of land available for new construction;

(iii) Projects that achieve lowest cost per classroom with highest percentage of mass timber products in the overall construction of the project; and

(iv) Projects that demonstrate multistory application of mass timber products.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Career Preparation and Launch Equipment Grants (40000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide competitive grants to school districts to purchase and install career and technical education equipment that expands work-integrated learning opportunities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects through a competitive grant program to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and

(b) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(3) No single district may receive more than $100,000 of the appropriation.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,046,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,454,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants (91000408)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$479,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,866,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess., with the following exception: Before June 30, 2020, the superintendent must verify that projects receiving grant awards under this section are either in the design phase or under construction, or funding for those projects shall lapse on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$109,454,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$125,046,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Everett Pathways to Medical Education (92000123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2017-19 Campus Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$420,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2019-21 Campus Preservation (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$214,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (30000045)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma (20102002)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,343,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for project and equipment costs associated with the space used by Cascadia college pursuant to subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.

(2) The remaining portion of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for a STEM building on the Bothell campus of the University of Washington to be shared jointly with Cascadia college with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The University of Washington and Cascadia college must be tenants in common of the building constructed with this appropriation;

(b) The University of Washington and Cascadia college shall have joint, equal, and undivided authority in the governance of the design, construction, and operation of the building;

(c) Half of the assignable space constructed with this appropriation must be designed for and exclusively used by Cascadia college; and

(d) Cascadia college shall pay no rent or operations and maintenance expenses to the University of Washington for the space used by Cascadia college pursuant to (c) of this subsection.

(3) The building may be delivered using the design-build procedure for public works projects, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life-cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(4) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,118,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$382,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,223,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary/Education Research Center (30000492)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$580,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$45,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (30000736)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,975,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$14,500,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$22,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$54,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Evans School - Parrington Hall Renovation (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2019-21 Minor Works - Preservation (40000004)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$35,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$141,864,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$177,330,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Hospital (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for a new behavioral health teaching hospital. The appropriation provided may be used for predesign, siting, and design costs.

(b) The university must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by February 1, 2020.

(2) The behavioral health teaching hospital must provide a minimum of fifty long-term civil commitment beds, forty geriatric psychiatric beds, ten step-down beds, and fifty medical/surgery psychiatric beds, in addition to other services. A telehealth consultation program must also be provided.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$191,250,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000024)

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

State Toxics Control Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,267,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Global Animal Health Building (30001322)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (MCR) (30001342)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,795,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett Real Estate Acquisition (40000006)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Washington State University Building Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Program (MCI&Omn Eqp): 2019-21 (40000010)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$9,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$93,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$102,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation (MCR): 2019-21 (40000011)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$21,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$85,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$107,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Spokane-Biomedical and Health Sc Building Ph II (40000012)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$83,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$84,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000041)

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,695,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (40000011)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2019-21 (40000015)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal II (40000016)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (40000017)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Albers Court Improvements (40000036)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (91000019)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (91000021)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,550,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,030,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Energy Efficiency Systems (30000772)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000783)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation: 2019-21 (40000041)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,452,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$46,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (910000018)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab I Seismic and HVAC Renovation (30000586)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Critical Power, Safety, and Security Systems (30000613)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Health and Counseling Center (30000614)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Infrastructure Master Plan (40000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of an innovative integrated infrastructure master plan at The Evergreen State College. The plan must detail a capital improvement strategy to transition the Olympia campus legacy infrastructure to a world-class set of integrated systems that supply highly reliable and optimized services for power, heat, clean water, wastewater, storm water, and solid waste.

(2) The infrastructure master plan may be developed by a consultant team selected through a design competition between private sector construction management firms experienced in performance contracting with the following conditions:

(a) No more than four firms may be selected to compete, and no more than three honoraria may be awarded to the unsuccessful competitors; and

(b) Criteria for selecting the consultant team may include, but is not limited to, the ability to create a plan that is affordable; creates greater resiliency, adaptability, and continuous improvement; and greater environmental performance.

(5) Any improvements to infrastructure from the infrastructure master plan must be maintained and operated by the staff of The Evergreen State College.

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,909,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (91000010)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Historic Lord Mansion (91000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works—Preservation: 2019-21 (91000031)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,816,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,115,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program: 2019-21 (91000033)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$184,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,316,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000034)

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Sciences Building Addition & Renovation (30000768)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000769)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Elevator Preservation Safety and ADA Upgrades (30000772)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,800,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$388,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000781)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,100,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,079,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2019-21 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000869)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$66,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (30000873)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,846,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,768,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program: 2019-21 (30000885)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,136,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000013)

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,054,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,101,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Strategic Facility Master Plan (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

W.W. Seymour Botanical Conservatory Rehabilitation. . . .$773,000

Chittenden Locks Fish Ladder Viewing G. . . .$382,000

Balfour Dock Building: Phase IIIE. . . .$307,000

Old Brewhouse Tower Rehabilitation. . . .$513,000

Harbor History Museum - Fishing Vessel Shenandoah. . . .$100,000

City of Vancouver Officer's Row Roof Repair. . . .$150,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding Expanding Public Access. . . .$240,000

Kalispel Tribe Restoration of Our Lady of Sorrows Church. . . .$33,000

Mukai Farmstead & Garden Preservation. . . .$600,000

Edmonds Museum Carnegie Library Restoration. . . .$74,000

Vancouver National Historic Reserve Trust Providence Reno. . . .$490,000

WA Trust for Historic Preservation Stimson-Green Mansion. . . .$100,000

Phinney Neighborhood Association John B. Allen School. . . .$30,000

PNW Railroad Archive Mounting Rails. . . .$47,000

City of Roslyn Historic Comm Center, Library, & City Hall. . . .$233,000

Quincy Valley Historical Society & Museum Heritage Barn. . . .$41,000

Puget Sound Electric Railway Interurban. . . .$229,000

The Cutter Theatre - 1912 Metaline Falls School Re-Roofing. . . .$26,000

Delridge Neighborhoods Dev Assoc Structural Improvements. . . .$299,000

Seattle City Light Georgetown Steam Plan. . . .$773,000

Skagit City School Rehabilitation. . . .$22,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,543,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell and Carriage House Repairs and Restoration (40000017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000026)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,737,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$48,403,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Dev Center (30000126)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,167,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,877,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,847,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,688,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$180,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$34,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,268,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,530,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional-Technical Education Center (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,056,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,330,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,387,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,663,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,208,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,531,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$632,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$948,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,278,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$230,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,782,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$719,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,933,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$305,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,642,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,448,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$296,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$211,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000043)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington: Center for Design (40000102)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,308,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,468,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (40000112)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$39,841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$38,476,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (40000169)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,318,000

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$6,209,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,527,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (40000171)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$15,252,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,252,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (40000173)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (40000258)

Community and Technical College Capital

Projects Account—State
. . . .
$23,739,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Puyallup: STEM building (40000293)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$37,230,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

2019-21 Career Preparation and Launch Equipment Grants (40000306)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to provide competitive grants to community and technical colleges to purchase and install equipment that expands career-connected learning opportunities.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,500,000

(End of part)

PART 6

2019 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 6001. 2018 c 2 s 1010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of public works projects:

180th St SE SR 527 Brook Blvd (Snohomish). . . .$3,000,000

35th Ave SE Phase II SR 524 to 180th St SE

(Snohomish). . . .$3,000,000

61st/190th Culvert Replacement & Embankment Repair

(Kenmore). . . .$1,500,000

Automated Meter Reading System (Birch Bay). . . .$1,500,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill North Flare Statn

Repair (King). . . .$1,583,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill Pump Station Repairs

(King). . . .$3,000,000

City Street Light Conversion to Light Emitting Diode

(Vancouver). . . .$4,816,000

Fairview Ave N Bridge Replacement (Seattle). . . .$10,000,000

Georgetown Wet Weather Treatment Station (King). . . .$3,500,000

((Isaacs Avenue Improvements - Phase 2 (Walla Walla). . . .$3,962,000))

Kennewick Automated Meter Reading Project

(Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

((Landslide Repairs (Aberdeen). . . .$373,000))

McKinnon Creek Wellfield Infrastructure Improvements

(Lake Forest). . . .$200,000

Miller Street Re-Alignment and Storm Repairs

(Wenatchee). . . .$4,826,000

((NE 10th Avenue (Clark). . . .$10,000,000))

Ostrich Creek Culvert Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$4,688,000

Pine Basin Watershed Storm Sewer Improvements

(Bremerton). . . .$3,881,000

((Slater Road/Jordan Creek Fish Passage Project

(Whatcom). . . .$5,000,000))

South Fork McCorkle Creek Stormwater Detention

Facility (Lexington). . . .$4,700,000

Sudbury Landfill Area 7 Cell 3 Construction

(Walla Walla). . . .$2,978,000

Sunset Reservoir Rehabilitation (Spokane). . . .$1,412,000

Thurston Co. PUD No. 1 Replacement and Upgrades

(Thurston). . . .(($1,028,000))$480,000

Tipping Floor Restoration & Safety Upgrades

(Lincoln). . . .$156,000

US 395/Ridgeline Interchange (Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Wastewater Reuse Project (Quincy). . . .$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($97,103,000))

$77,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($97,103,000))

$77,220,000

Sec. 6002. 2018 c 2 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $5,000,000 is ((provided solely)) for the public works board's emergency loan program.

(2) Up to $14,000,000 is ((provided solely)) for the public works board's preconstruction loan program.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

Sec. 6003. 2018 c 298 s 1004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center Design and

Preconstruction (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Connect Project (Marysville). . . .$642,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,800,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation

(Federal Way). . . .(($750,000))$1,250,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harbor

and Coupeville). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan.

(9) (($750,000))$1,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs; and

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs((; and

(v) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in this subsection (10)(d) by June 29, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee created in this section)).

(e) ((The Interbay advisory committee created in this section terminates June 30, 2019.

(f))) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(((g)))(f) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(((h)))(g) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. It is the intent of the legislature that beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium no state funding is provided to the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($129,799,000))

$130,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($129,799,000))

$130,941,000

Sec. 6004. 2018 c 298 s 1007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community entities to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities, and consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, or entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and behavioral health organizations, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) $49,600,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $4,600,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with acute detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $12,700,000 is provided solely for crisis diversion or stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. At least two of the facilities must be located in King county and one must be located in Pierce county. The facility in Pierce county shall receive no less than $3,200,000;

(e) $12,700,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment providers to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety or one hundred eighty day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health, and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The department of social and health services has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(f) $6,600,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community providers to develop psychiatric residential treatment beds to serve individuals being diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, the department of health, and the local behavioral health organization jurisdiction for which a proposal has been submitted and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the behavioral health organization in the region or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The behavioral health organization or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380 has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(g) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth, including but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors. In awarding funds for projects in this subsection, the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the health care authority must review projects based on the following criteria:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving children and minor youth with behavioral health needs;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(iii) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health, department of social and health services, and health care authority that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(h) $2,000,000 is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants.

(4) $35,276,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Denny

Youth Center. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Substance

Use Disorder Intensive Treatment. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Stabilization Campus (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$1,550,000

Bellingham Mental Health Triage . . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Acute Detox. . . .$2,000,000

SWWA Diversion Crisis and Involuntary Treatment. . . .$3,000,000

Daybreak Center for Adolescent Recovery. . . .$3,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$500,000

Valley City Recovery Place. . . .$2,000,000

Geriatric Diversion. . . .$500,000

Skagit Triage Expansion (Mount Vernon). . . .$326,000

Spokane Jail Diversion. . . .$2,400,000

Tri-county Detox and Crisis Center. . . .$4,000,000

Toppenish Hospital. . . .(($1,000,000))$500,000

(5) $3,000,000 is provided solely for the Evergreen treatment services building purchase, contingent on matching funds.

(6)(a) $3,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to a joint venture between MultiCare-Franciscan to provide community based behavioral health services. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. The department of commerce may not release funding for this project unless MultiCare-Franciscan enters into a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services by October 31, 2018, to collaborate on development and implementation of strategies to expand the behavioral health workforce in the region. At a minimum, the agreement must include strategies for increasing recruitment of health professionals required to staff psychiatric inpatient facilities, including psychiatrists, psychologists, nurses and other health care professionals. The agreement must also identify opportunities for coordination between the parties to expand access to clinical skill development and training opportunities in the region and strategies for collaborative service delivery between the parties when possible. To objectively evaluate the efficacy of the strategies implemented to achieve the desired outcomes of the agreement, performance measures and targets must be established to include:

(b) MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work collaboratively to decrease vacancy rates for hard-to-recruit health care professionals employed by each facility. The parties must develop strategies to attract more qualified health care professionals to the area and ensure comparable exposure to the benefits of working for each organization. The parties must measure the success of these strategies by the decrease in vacancy rate for health care professionals necessary to provide safe, quality inpatient psychiatric care in MultiCare-Franciscan and department facilities following the first year as the baseline of the partnership/consortium and with updated goals for each subsequent year. MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work to increase the competency and skills of health care professionals across both facilities by establishing organized joint- and cross-training programs. The parties must measure the success of this strategy by the number of health care professionals in total and by discipline complete cross-training activities and by the number and hours of cross-training opportunities offered under the agreement.

(7) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, detox, or secure detox.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,876,000))

$90,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($90,876,000))

$90,376,000

Sec. 6005. 2018 c 298 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($58,000,000))$83,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, (($44,131,000))$20,131,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $8,658,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than fifteen years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation ((is))and $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for ((a nonprofit, public development authority, local government, or housing authority to))the purchase of the three south annex properties. The state board for community and technical colleges must transfer the three south annex properties located at ((1531))1530 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street ((owned by the state board of community and technical colleges. The property must be used to provide services and housing for homeless youth and young adults))to one or more nonprofits or public development authorities selected by the department, if the selected entities agree to use the properties to provide services and housing for homeless youth or young adults for a minimum of twenty-five years. The transfer agreement between the state board for community and technical colleges and the selected entities must specify a mutually agreed transfer date and require the selected entities to cover any closing costs with a total purchase price of nine million dollars for all three properties.

(f) $26,006,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) ((Cross Laminated Timber)) Spokane Housing

Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$1,500,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) Parkview Apartments Affordable Housing. . . .$100,000

(viii) Supported Housing and Employment (Longview). . . .$129,000

(ix) $2,500,000 is provided solely for grants to purchase low-income mobile home parks. Up to $2,500,000 is for the Firs Mobile Home Park. ((If the Firs Mobile Home Park is not purchased, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(x) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Shelton can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Orting can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded.

(xi) $7,290,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $4,290,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(xii) $1,500,000 is provided solely for Valley Cities modular housing project in Auburn.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities;

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($44,131,000))

$20,131,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($58,000,000))

$83,500,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$8,658,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($110,789,000))

$112,289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($510,789,000))

$512,289,000

Sec. 6006. 2018 c 2 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $11,000,000 of the state building construction account, is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that advance clean and renewable energy technologies, and transmission and distribution control systems; that support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and that increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(6) $7,900,000 of the state building construction account and $3,100,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to demonstrate new approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a) Projects must be implemented by local governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department of commerce must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects the department of transportation is developing and projects funded by the Volkswagen consent decree, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems.

(b) Priorities must be given to eligible technologies that reduce the top two hundred hours of demand and the demand side.

(c) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(i) Electric vehicle and transportation system charging and open source control infrastructure, including inductive charging systems;

(ii) Electric vehicle sharing in low-income, multi-unit housing communities in urban areas;

(iii) Grid-related vehicle electrification, connecting vehicle fleets to grid operations, including school and transit buses;

(iv) Electric vehicle fleet management tools with open source software;

(v) Maritime electrification, such as electric ferries, water taxis, and shore power infrastructure.

(7)(a) $8,600,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies, as needed to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program unless the organization prefers to compete for the grants. If the organization prefers to receive grants from the program they may not participate in the consultant process determining how the grant process is structured. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects, including but not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) $750,000 of this subsection (7) is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental program.

(8) $8,000,000 of the state taxable construction account is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in advanced materials at the proposed science laboratories infrastructure facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. These state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as match to the federal funding. The instruments will support researchers at the bioproducts sciences and engineering laboratory, the joint center for deployment research in earth abundant materials, the center for advanced materials and clean energy technology, and other energy and materials collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(9) $1,600,000 of the state building construction account and $2,400,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds for the deployment of solar projects located in Washington state.

(a) Priority must be given to distribution side projects that reduce peak electricity demand.

(b) Projects must be capable of generating ((at least five hundred))more than one hundred kilowatts of direct current generating capacity.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, grants shall not exceed $200,000 per megawatt of direct current generating capacity and total grant funds per project shall not exceed $1,000,000 per applicant. Applicants may not use other state grants.

(d) At least ((25))35 percent of the total allocation of a project ((shall be provided solely for projects that provide direct benefits to low-income residents or communities. The department must attempt to prioritize an equal geographic distribution))must be for community solar projects that provide solar electricity to low-income households, low-income tribal housing programs, affordable housing providers, and nonprofit organizations providing services to low-income communities. The provisions of (c) of this subsection do not apply to projects funded under this subsection (9)(d).

(e) Priority must be given to major components made in Washington.

(f) The department must attempt to prioritize an equitable geographic distribution and a diversity of project sizes.

(10) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for the first phase of a project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of seven hundred fifty thousand tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create aluminum manufacturing jobs located in ((a))Whatcom county ((with a population of less than three hundred thousand)).

(11) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the public utility district no. 1 of Klickitat county for the remediation, survey, and evaluation of a closed-loop pump storage hydropower project at the John Day pool.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,600,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$46,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$246,100,000

Sec. 6007. 2018 c 2 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2018 and $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through: (i) Reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl; or (ii) replacing outdated heating systems that use oil or propane as fuel sources as identified by the Washington State University extension energy program. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $1,750,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $1,400,000 is provided solely for energy efficiency improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the ((cost))department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request ((will be added to the project appropriation after construction bids are received)). Prior to awarding funds, the department of commerce shall ((coordinate with))submit to the office of financial management ((to develop a process for project submittal, review, approval criteria, tracking project budget adjustments, and performance measures))a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) $500,000 is provided solely for resource conservation managers in the department of enterprise services to coordinate with state agencies and school districts to assess and adjust existing building systems and operations to optimize the efficiency in use of energy and other resources in state-owned facilities. The department of commerce will oversee an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services to fund the resource conservation managers.

(5) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved. The report must include these metrics from other states.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,000,000

Sec. 6008. 2018 c 298 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,))The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

(((2) $1,500,000 of the reappropriation from section 1005(11), chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. is instead provided solely for purchase of the south annex properties. The state board of community and technical colleges must transfer the south annex properties located at 1531 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street to a nonprofit or public development authority, if the entity agrees to use the properties to provide services and housing for homeless youth and young adults for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date. The transfer agreement must require the nonprofit or public development authority to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of nine million dollars.))

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($59,701,000))

$58,201,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($62,701,000))

$61,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($83,000,000))

$81,500,000

Sec. 6009. 2018 c 298 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium,))The community economic revitalization board may make grants and loans to local governments and federally recognized tribes to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, with a minimum of 25 megabits per second download speed, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development.

(1) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, quasi-municipal corporations, and special purpose districts.

(2) "Broadband" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed Internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(3) The board is authorized to make rural broadband loans and grants to local governments and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development. However, no more than 50 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes.

(4) Application for funding must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling.

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant local government or federally recognized Indian tribe.

(v) For equipment or facilities which would enable a public entity to provide retail telecommunications services or services that the entity is not authorized by statute to provide.

(vi) For the deployment of publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure ("backbone") solely for the sake of creating competitive, publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure.

(b) The board may provide financial assistance only for projects located in a rural community as defined by the board, or located in a rural county, that encourage, foster, develop, and improve broadband within the state in order to:

(i) Drive job creation, promote innovation, and expand markets for local businesses; or

(ii) Serve the ongoing and growing needs of local education systems, health care systems, public safety systems, industries and businesses, governmental operations, and citizens; and

(iii) Improve accessibility for underserved communities and populations.

(c) An application must be approved by the local government and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(d) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(e) When evaluating and prioritizing projects, the board must give consideration, at a minimum, to the following factors:

(i) The project's value to the community, including evidence of support from affected local businesses and government;

(ii) The project's feasibility, using standard economic principles;

(iii) Commitment of local matching resources and local participation;

(iv) The project's inclusion in a capital facilities plan, comprehensive plan, or local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements; and

(v) The project's readiness to proceed.

(5) A responsible official of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(6) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

Sec. 6010. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($500,000))

$380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,880,000

Sec. 6011. 2018 c 298 s 2004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($9,806,000))

$206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,806,000))

$206,000

Sec. 6012. 2018 c 298 s 2005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,800,000))

$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,700,000

Sec. 6013. 2018 c 298 s 2008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,200,000))

$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($11,000,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,200,000))

$600,000

Sec. 6014. 2018 c 2 s 2019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$1,500,000

Sec. 6015. 2018 c 298 s 2018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Pine Lodge Behavioral Rehabilitation Services (91000061)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$400,000

Sec. 6016. 2018 c 2 s 3024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control State Match (40000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($10,000,000))$10,194,000 of the appropriation is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds. (($10,000,000))$10,194,000 of the appropriation must be transferred into the water pollution control revolving account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$10,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$50,194,000

Sec. 6017. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,600,000))

$507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,342,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,942,000))

$2,849,000

Sec. 6018. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is ((subject to the provisions of section 3188, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.))provided solely for the following list of ranch land preservation projects:

Lust family farm and ranch preservation. . . .$2,210,000

Imrie ranches Rock creek agricultural easement. . . .$113,000

Kelley ranches agricultural easement. . . .$55,000

Dungeness watershed farmland protection phase 3. . . .$344,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,110,000))

$2,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$412,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,522,000))

$2,722,000

Sec. 6019. 2018 c 2 s 3093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000))

$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$600,000

Sec. 6020. 2018 c 2 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7028 of this act for ((direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and privately owned airports for the purpose of improvements at public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities))projects funded through the community aviation revitalization board program established in chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (Substitute House Bill No. 1456). If the bill referenced in this section is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse and any remaining amounts that were deposited into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account must be transferred to the state taxable building construction account.

(2) ((The department must convene a community aviation revitalization board to develop criteria for selecting loan recipients, to develop a process for evaluating applications, and to make decisions. The board must consist of the capital budget chair and ranking minority member of the capital budget committee of the house of representatives and the senate ways and means committee, and a representative from both the department of transportation's aviation division and the department of commerce. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of pilots. The chair of the board must be selected by the secretary of transportation. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce and the secretary of transportation must serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) The board may provide loans to privately owned airports for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, such as guaranteed long-term public access to the airport as a condition of the loan. For purposes of this subsection, "public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities" means all public use airports not listed as having more than fifty thousand annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(4) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(a) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(b) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(c) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(d) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(e) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(5))) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$2,500,000

Sec. 6021. 2018 c 2 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000))

$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,000))

$170,000

Sec. 6022. 2017 3rd. sp.s. c 4 s 5058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,915,000))

$203,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,258,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($41,173,000))

$34,461,000

Sec. 6023. 2018 c 298 s 5040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,421,000))

$296,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($37,726,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($41,147,000))

$296,000

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are forty-eight million five hundred two thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred six million one hundred seventy-two thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred thirty-two million two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $103,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the King county secure community transition center.

(6) Department of natural resources: Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to remodel spaces within agency-owned commercial buildings that will benefit the common school trust.

(7) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $9,950,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a consolidated academic support services building to create more capacity in the core campus for academic use.

(8) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College for up to $27,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student recreation center.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College Puyallup for up to $2,831,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and construct parking.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student activity center on the Clarkston campus.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $4,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Wells Hall replacement project.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build additional instructional and lab classroom space.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase one or more properties adjacent to the campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.

(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.

(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management may make an exception to the predesign requirements in this section after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comment by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. Agencies administering construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, must submit progress reports to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st of each year in a format determined by the office of financial management. After the project is completed, agencies must also submit a closeout report that identifies the total project cost and any unspent appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants. However, the office of financial management may transfer funds from the emergency repair pool to supplement the western state hospital wards renovations for forensic services project in section 2035 of this act if bids exceed the project appropriation.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer. However, the office of financial management may effect one or more transfers to supplement the western state hospital wards renovations for forensic services project in section 2035 of this act without waiting thirty days for fiscal committee response.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Consider all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, target reducing energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Where appropriate, install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Where appropriate, install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE.(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2019-2021 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $200,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter 3, Laws of 2018, (House Bill No. 1080, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. (1) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be initially allotted until agencies submit project lists to the office of financial management for review and approval.

(2) Revisions to the project lists, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from prior lists. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(3)(a) All minor works projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided.

(b) Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects.

(c) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (3)(c) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(d) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

(e) Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account, up to

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2020 and up to $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$12,000,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to

$5,500,000 for fiscal year 2020 and up to $5,500,000 for

fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$11,000,000

(3)(a) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the statewide broadband account, $12,500,000 for fiscal

year 2020 and $12,500,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$25,000,000

(b) The transfer identified in this subsection is contingent upon the enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (Third Substitute House Bill No. 1498) by June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019. STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer

to the Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account,

$4,900,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $4,900,000

for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$9,800,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

state toxics control account, $18,200,000 for fiscal year

2020 and $18,200,000 for fiscal year 2021
. . . .
$36,400,000

(1)(a) As directed by the department of ecology, in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(b) If, after using the interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of any capital projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, purposes of increasing affordable housing, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) As directed by the pollution liability insurance agency in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account the lesser of $20,000,000 or the balance of the fund exceeding $7,500,000 after excluding the reserves during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, is granted the authority to sell the property known as the Tacoma Rhodes complex for no less than fair market value. The price must cover appraisal costs, all debt service, all closing costs, and the cost of outstanding liabilities necessary to keep the department whole. The property consists of the broadway building, market building, and parking garage. The terms and conditions of the sale must meet the business needs of the state tenants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7022. (1) The department of natural resources must conduct an asset valuation of state lands and state forestlands held in trust and managed by the department. The analysis required in subsections (3) and (4) of this section may be provided through contracted services.

(2) The department must describe all trust lands, by trust, including timber lands, agricultural lands, commercial lands, and other lands, and identify revenues from leases or other sources for those lands. The department must briefly describe the income from these trust lands, and potential enhancements to income, including intergenerational income, from the asset bases of these trusts.

(3) The analysis must estimate the current fair market value of these lands for each trust beneficiary, including the separate beneficiaries of state lands as defined in RCW 79.02.010, and the beneficiaries of state forestlands as specified in chapter 79.22 RCW. The estimation of current fair market values must specify the values by the various asset classes including, but not limited to, the following asset classes: Timber lands; irrigated agriculture; dryland agriculture, including grazing lands; commercial real estate; mining; and other income production. The analysis must also estimate the value of ecosystem services and recreation benefits for asset classes that produce these benefits. The legislature encourages the department and its contractors to develop methods and tools to allow tracking of the estimated fair market values over time.

(4) For each of the different asset classes and for each of the various trusts, the analysis must calculate the average annual gross and net income as a percentage of estimated current asset value.

(5) The department must provide a progress report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, which may include any initial recommendations. The final report must be submitted by June 30, 2020, and must include options to:

(a) Improve the net rates of return on different classes of assets;

(b) Increase the reliability of, and enhance if possible, revenue for trust beneficiaries; and

(c) Present and explain factors that either (i) define, (ii) constrict, or (iii) define and constrict the department's management practices and revenue production. The factors to be considered include, but are not limited to, statutory, constitutional, operational, and social factors.

Sec. 7023. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 952 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account ((shall))may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 7024. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 953 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account ((shall))may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 7025. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2018 c 2 s 7019 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7026. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2018 c 2 s 7020 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7027. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 954 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. However,))During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts ((shall))may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7028. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 955 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. However,))During the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the capital projects account ((shall))may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7029. RCW 28B.77.070 and 2018 c 298 s 7014 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall identify budget priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature for the council to make budget recommendations for allocations for major policy changes in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan, but the legislature does not intend for the council to review and make recommendations on individual institutional budgets. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations from the council prioritize funding needs for the overall system of higher education in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan. It is also the intent of the legislature that the council's recommendations take into consideration the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the council shall outline the council's fiscal priorities under the ten-year plan that it must distribute to the institutions, the state board for community and technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the joint higher education committee.

(a) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source being requested.

(b) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include: The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget category within which the project will be submitted to the office of financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being requested.

(c) The office of financial management shall reference these reporting requirements in its budget instructions.

(3) The council shall submit recommendations on the operating budget priorities to support the ten-year plan to the office of financial management by October 1st each year, and to the legislature by January 1st each year.

(4)(a) The office of financial management shall develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded. The prioritized list of capital projects shall be based on the following priorities in the following order:

(i) Office of financial management scores pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW;

(ii) Preserving assets;

(iii) Degree production; and

(iv) Maximizing efficient use of instructional space.

(b) The office of financial management shall include all of the capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education, except for the minor works projects, in the prioritized list of capital projects provided to the legislature.

(c) The form of the prioritized list for capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education shall be provided as one list, ranked in priority order with the highest priority project ranked number "1" through the lowest priority project numbered last. The ranking for the prioritized list of capital projects may not:

(i) Include subpriorities;

(ii) Be organized by category;

(iii) Assume any state bond or building account biennial funding level to prioritize the list; or

(iv) Assume any specific share of projects by institution in the priority list.

(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit any supplemental capital budget requests and revisions to the office of financial management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

(6) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the office of financial management may, but is not obligated to, develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded.

Sec. 7030. RCW 43.63A.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish the building communities fund program. Under the program, capital and technical assistance grants may be made to nonprofit organizations for acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential community services, including social service centers and multipurpose community centers, including those serving a distinct or ethnic population. Such facilities must be located in a distressed community or serve a substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons.

(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit, evaluate, and rank applications for the building communities fund program as follows:

(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from nonprofit organizations.

(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. To be considered qualified, applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project:

(i) Will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the services provided to citizens;

(ii) Will be located in a distressed community or will serve a substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons;

(iii) Will offer three or more distinct activities that meet a single community service objective or offer a diverse set of activities that meet multiple community service objectives, including but not limited to: Providing social services; expanding employment opportunities for or increasing the employability of community residents; or offering educational or recreational opportunities separate from the public school system or private schools, as long as recreation is not the sole purpose of the facility;

(iv) Reflects a long-term vision for the development of the community, shared by residents, businesses, leaders, and partners;

(v) Requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project;

(vi) Is ready to proceed and will make timely use of the funds;

(vii) Is sponsored by one or more entities that have the organizational and financial capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant agreement and to maintain the project into the future;

(viii) Fills an unmet need for community services;

(ix) Will achieve its stated objectives; and

(x) Is a community priority as shown through tangible commitments of existing or future assets made to the project by community residents, leaders, businesses, and government partners.

(c) The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the project, except, under exceptional circumstances, the department may reduce the amount of nonstate match required. However, during the 2019-2021 biennium, the legislature may waive the match required for projects specified in section 1009 of this act. No more than ten percent of the total granted amount may be awarded to qualified eligible projects that meet the definition of exceptional circumstances defined in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, exceptional circumstances include but are not limited to: Natural disasters affecting projects; emergencies beyond an applicant's control, such as a fire or an unanticipated loss of a lease where services are currently provided; or a delay that could result in a threat to public health or safety. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(d) The department may not set a monetary limit to funding requests.

(3) The department shall submit biennially to the governor and the legislature in the department's capital budget request a ranked list of the qualified eligible projects for which applications were received. The list must include a description of each project, its total cost, and the amount of state funding requested. The appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature shall use this list to determine building communities fund projects that may receive funding in the capital budget. The total amount of state capital funding available for all projects on the biennial list shall be determined by the capital budget beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. In addition, if cash funds have been appropriated, up to three million dollars may be used for technical assistance grants. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.

(4) In addition to the list of ranked qualified eligible projects, the department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a summary report that describes the solicitation and evaluation processes, including but not limited to the number of applications received, the total amount of funding requested, issues encountered, if any, and any recommendations for process improvements.

(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.

(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 7031. RCW 43.88D.010 and 2018 c 298 s 7013 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and the four-year institutions. Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one category. The categories are:

(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at all campuses, at existing or new university centers, or through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use of existing and proposed new space;

(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated are considered replacement projects. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being replaced and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;

(e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and

(f) Other project categories as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.

(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall establish a scoring system and process for each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions shall provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and process.

(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution project proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.

(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must, at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends, reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if applicable, and impact on space utilization.

(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the predesign, design, or construction funding phase.

(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of any and all performance agreements between the office of financial management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of resources.

(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the office of financial management shall take into consideration project schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.

(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists under this section.

(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:

(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial management;

(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and

(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the joint legislative audit and review committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.

(7) By August 1st of each even-numbered year each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(8) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, by November 1, ((2018))2020, the office of financial management must score higher education capital project criteria with a rating scale that assesses how well a particular project satisfies those criteria. The office of financial management may not use a rating scale that weighs the importance of those criteria.

(9) For the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium and the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and in lieu of the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, by August 15, ((2018))2020, the institutions of higher education shall prepare and submit or resubmit to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees:

(a) Individual project proposals developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Individual project proposals scored in prior biennia pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) A prioritized list of up to five project proposals submitted pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 7032. RCW 43.155.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 5 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 974 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving account [fund] and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Not more than twenty percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account [fund], and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the state general fund such amounts as specified by the legislature. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7033. UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON TRANSFER TO SEATTLE.By June 30, 2020, the University of Washington must transfer the deed of the property and general purpose facility, King County parcel number 308500-2100, located at 2901 27th Avenue South, Seattle, to the city of Seattle for the purposes of developing affordable housing for households at or below eighty percent of the area median income and providing health care services in partnership with a public hospital system. The University of Washington may reserve easements in the transferred property at no cost to the university. The transfer shall count toward the obligation to build affordable housing under the university's institutional campus master plan agreement. Liabilities existing on the property at the time of transfer will transfer with the property. When the deed is transferred to the city, any existing leases of the property expire. The transfer must be at no cost to the city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7034. DSHS FIRCREST LAND TRANSFER TO SHORELINE.The department of social and health services must transfer the deed for up to five acres of land on the southeast corner of the Fircrest School campus to the city of Shoreline for development of a public park. The transfer must include the land between NE 150th Street North and the northern border of the land currently leased for use as a public park. The transfer must be at no cost to the city. The department may reserve easements in the transferred property at no cost to the department. When the deed is transferred to the city, the current lease expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7035. DSHS TRANSFER TO DNR.To compensate the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions trust for the property transferred out of trust status in section 3312 of this act, the department of social and health services must designate and transfer by deed property owned by the department on the Fircrest School campus to the department of natural resources for the purposes of implementing section 3312 of this act. The department of social and health services must consult with the department of natural resources to ensure that the type and value of the property transferred is in the best interest of the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7036. PROPERTY TRANSFER SEATTLE CENTRAL.If House Bill No. 1918 (community preservation auth.) is enacted by June 30, 2019, the Seattle Central College must transfer the deed of the property located at 2120 South Jackson Street, Seattle, Washington 98144, to the community preservation and development authority established in the bill. The transfer must be made by no later than June 30, 2021, once the community preservation and development authority has selected board members. The transfer must be at no cost to the community preservation and development authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7037. Section 7032 of this act takes effect only if chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (Third Substitute House Bill No. 1498) is enacted by June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7038. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7039. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---