BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.21.030 and 2001 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a remedial sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person aggrieved by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the contempt is related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court, after notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction authorized by this chapter.

(2) If the court finds that the person has failed or refused to perform an act that is yet within the person's power to perform, the court may find the person in contempt of court and impose one or more of the following remedial sanctions:

(a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a type defined in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment may extend only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

(b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars for each day the contempt of court continues.

(c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a prior order of the court.

(d) Any other remedial sanction other than the sanctions specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the court expressly finds that those sanctions would be ineffectual to terminate a continuing contempt of court.

(e)(i) In cases under chapters 13.32A((,))and 13.34((, and 28A.225)) RCW, commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days. This sanction may be imposed in addition to, or as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction authorized by this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to be a remedial sanction.

(ii) In cases under chapter 28A.225 RCW, commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed two days. This sanction may be imposed in addition to, or as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction authorized by this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to be a remedial sanction.

(3) The court may, in addition to the remedial sanctions set forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person found in contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered by the party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred in connection with the contempt proceeding, including reasonable attorney's fees.

(4) If the court finds that a person under the age of eighteen years has willfully disobeyed the terms of an order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, the court may find the person in contempt of court and may, as a sole sanction for such contempt, commit the person to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.21.030 and 2001 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a remedial sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person aggrieved by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the contempt is related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court, after notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction authorized by this chapter.

(2) If the court finds that the person has failed or refused to perform an act that is yet within the person's power to perform, the court may find the person in contempt of court and impose one or more of the following remedial sanctions:

(a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a type defined in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment may extend only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

(b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars for each day the contempt of court continues.

(c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a prior order of the court.

(d) Any other remedial sanction other than the sanctions specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the court expressly finds that those sanctions would be ineffectual to terminate a continuing contempt of court.

(e)(i) In cases under chapters 13.32A((,))and 13.34((, and 28A.225)) RCW, commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days. This sanction may be imposed in addition to, or as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction authorized by this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to be a remedial sanction.

(ii) Nothing in this subsection (2)(e) or in RCW 28A.225.090 shall be construed to limit the court's inherent contempt power or curtail its exercise.

(3) The court may, in addition to the remedial sanctions set forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person found in contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered by the party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred in connection with the contempt proceeding, including reasonable attorney's fees.

(4) If the court finds that a person under the age of eighteen years has willfully disobeyed the terms of an order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, the court may find the person in contempt of court and may, as a sole sanction for such contempt, commit the person to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2017 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:

(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;

(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Submit to a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school; or

(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law.

(2)(a) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(i) Community restitution;

(ii) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(iii) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times; or

(iv) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(b) If the child continues to fail to comply with the court order and the court makes a finding that other measures to secure compliance have been tried but have been unsuccessful and no less restrictive alternative is available, the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e). ((Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.)) Detention ordered under this subsection may be for no longer than ((seven))two days. Detention ordered under this subsection shall preferably be served at a secure crisis residential center close to the child's home rather than in a juvenile detention facility. A warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present.

(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention for a period greater than ((that permitted under a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW))two days.

(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2017 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:

(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;

(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Submit to a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school; or

(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law.

(2)(a) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(i) Community restitution;

(ii) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(iii) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times; or

(iv) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(b) If the child continues to fail to comply with the court order and the court makes a finding that other measures to secure compliance have been tried but have been unsuccessful and no less restrictive alternative is available, the court may ((order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e). Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW. Detention ordered under this subsection may be for no longer than seven days. Detention ordered under this subsection shall preferably be served at a secure crisis residential center close to the child's home rather than in a juvenile detention facility. A warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present)):

(i) Order that the department of children, youth, and families complete a family assessment; and

(ii) If the assessment indicates that services and assistance available to at-risk youth pursuant to chapter 13.32A RCW may facilitate compliance with the mandatory attendance law, recommend that an at-risk youth petition be filed by:

(A) The child's parent or guardian, with assistance from the department of children, youth, and families; or

(B) The department of children, youth, and families if the parent or guardian does not file.

(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile ((court shall find the child in contempt, and the)) court may ((order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may)):

(a) Impose alternatives to detention ((such as meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW))consistent with best practice models for reengagement with school; or

(b) Make such orders and recommendations as permitted by subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court's inherent contempt power or curtail its exercise.

(6) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.225.026 and 2017 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By the beginning of the 2017-18 school year, juvenile courts must establish, through a memorandum of understanding with each school district within their respective counties, a coordinated and collaborative approach to address truancy through the establishment of a community truancy board or, with respect to certain small districts, through other means as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each school district must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the juvenile court in the county in which it is located with respect to the operation of a community truancy board. A community truancy board may be operated by a juvenile court, a school district, or a collaboration between both entities, so long as the agreement is memorialized in a memorandum of understanding. For a school district that is located in more than one county, the memorandum of understanding shall be with the juvenile court in the county that acts as the school district's treasurer.

(3) A school district with fewer than three hundred students must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the juvenile court in the county in which it is located with respect to: (a) The operation of a community truancy board; or (b) addressing truancy through other coordinated means of intervention aimed at identifying barriers to school attendance, and connecting students and their families with community services, culturally appropriate promising practices, and evidence-based services such as functional family therapy. School districts with fewer than three hundred students may work cooperatively with other school districts or the school district's educational service district to ensure access to a community truancy board or to provide other coordinated means of intervention.

(4) All school districts must designate, and identify to the local juvenile court and to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, a person or persons to coordinate school district efforts to address excessive absenteeism and truancy, including tasks associated with: Outreach and conferences pursuant to RCW 28A.225.018; entering into a memorandum of understanding with the juvenile court; establishing protocols and procedures with the court; coordinating trainings; sharing evidence-based and culturally appropriate promising practices; identifying a person within every school to serve as a contact with respect to excessive absenteeism and truancy; and assisting in the recruitment of community truancy board members.

(5) As has been demonstrated by school districts and county juvenile courts around the state that have worked together and led the way with community truancy boards, success has resulted from involving the entire community and leveraging existing dollars from a variety of sources, including public and private, local and state, and court, school, and community. In emulating this coordinated and collaborative approach statewide pursuant to local memoranda of understanding, courts and school districts are encouraged to create strong community-wide partnerships and to leverage existing dollars and resources.

(6) The legislature applauds the collaborative efforts currently underway in some communities across the state, between juvenile courts on the one hand, and school districts, educational service districts, and community truancy boards on the other hand, aimed at improving attendance through case management and intervention, and the provision of supports and services such as classes and activities to help engage children in productive and positive activities, screenings to identify barriers to attendance and specific needs of individual children, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, such as functional family therapy and dialectical behavioral therapy, and culturally appropriate promising practices. The legislature encourages other juvenile courts to follow the lead of those already engaged in collaborative, community-wide efforts to improve attendance and to use distributions received pursuant to the omnibus appropriations act for truancy petitions to engage in similar collaborative efforts aimed at improving attendance.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.225.027 and 2016 c 205 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate to community truancy boards grant funds that may be used to supplement existing funds in order to pay for training for board members or the provision of services and treatment to children and their families. Twenty-five percent of the funds appropriated may be allocated as grant funds for training and seventy-five percent of the funds appropriated may be allocated as grant funds for the provision of services and treatment to children and their families.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this section. This is a competitive grant process. A prerequisite to applying for either or both grants is a memoranda of understanding, between a school district and a court, to institute a new or maintain an existing community truancy board that meets the requirements of RCW 28A.225.025.

(3) Successful applicants for an award of grant funds to supplement existing funds to pay for the training of community truancy board members must commit to the provision of training to board members regarding the identification of barriers to school attendance, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, research about adverse childhood experiences, evidence-based treatments and culturally appropriate promising practices, as well as the specific academic and community services and treatments available in the school, court, community, and elsewhere. This training may be provided by educational service districts.

(4) Successful applicants for an award of grant funds to supplement existing funds to pay for services and treatments provided to children and their families must commit to the provision of academic services such as tutoring, credit retrieval and school reengagement supports, community services, and evidence-based treatments that have been found to be effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, such as functional family therapy and dialectical behavioral therapy, or those that have been shown to be culturally appropriate promising practices.

Sec. 7. RCW 13.32A.015 and 1990 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to:

(1) Preserve, strengthen, and reconcile families experiencing problems with at-risk youth;

(2) Provide a legal process by which parents who are experiencing problems with at-risk youth or the department under RCW 28A.225.090(2)(b) can request and receive assistance from juvenile courts in providing appropriate care, treatment, and supervision ((to such))for youth; and

(3) Assess the effectiveness of the family reconciliation services program.

The legislature does not intend by this enactment to grant any parent the right to file an at-risk youth petition or receive juvenile court assistance in dealing with an at-risk youth. The purpose of chapter 276, Laws of 1990 is to create a process by which a parent of an at-risk youth may request and receive assistance subject to the availability of juvenile court services and resources. Recognizing that these services and resources are limited, the legislature intends that counties have the authority to impose reasonable limits on the utilization of juvenile court services and resources in matters related to at-risk youth. Any responsibilities imposed upon the department under chapter 276, Laws of 1990 shall be contingent upon the availability of funds specifically appropriated by the legislature for such purpose.

Sec. 8. RCW 13.32A.191 and 2000 c 123 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A child's parent or the department under RCW 28A.225.090(2)(b) may file with the juvenile court a petition in the interest of a child alleged to be an at-risk youth. The department shall, when requested, assist the parent in filing the petition. The petition shall be filed in the county where the petitioner resides. The petition shall set forth the name, age, and residence of the child and the names and residence of the child's parents and shall allege that:

(a) The child is an at-risk youth;

(b) The petitioner has the right to legal custody of the child;

(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the parent to maintain the care, custody, and control of the child; and

(d) Alternatives to court intervention have been attempted or there is good cause why such alternatives have not been attempted.

(2) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and shall generally request relief available under this chapter. The petition need not specify any proposed disposition following adjudication of the petition. The filing of an at-risk youth petition is not dependent upon the court's having obtained any prior jurisdiction over the child or his or her parent and confers upon the court the special jurisdiction to assist the parent in maintaining parental authority and responsibility for the child or assist the department.

(3) A petition may not be filed if a dependency petition is pending under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 9. RCW 13.32A.192 and 1997 c 146 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a proper at-risk youth petition is filed ((by a child's parent under this chapter)), the juvenile court shall:

(a)(i) Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child who resides in a place other than his or her parent's home and other than an out-of-home placement, within five calendar days unless the last calendar day is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the hearing shall be held on the preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child living at home or in an out-of-home placement, within ten days; and (ii) notify the parent and the child of such date;

(b) Notify the parent of the right to be represented by counsel at the parent's own expense;

(c) Appoint legal counsel for the child;

(d) Inform the child and his or her parent of the legal consequences of the court finding the child to be an at-risk youth; and

(e) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the fact-finding hearing.

(2) Unless out-of-home placement of the child is otherwise authorized or required by law, the child shall reside in the home of his or her parent or in an out-of-home placement requested by the parent or child and approved by the parent.

(3) If upon sworn written or oral declaration of the petitioning parent, the court has reason to believe that a child has willfully and knowingly violated a court order issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to take the child into custody and place the child in a juvenile detention facility or in a secure facility within a crisis residential center. If the child is placed in detention, a review shall be held as provided in RCW ((13.32A.065))43.185C.270.

(4) If both a child in need of services petition and an at-risk youth petition have been filed with regard to the same child, the petitions and proceedings shall be consolidated as an at-risk youth petition. Pending a fact-finding hearing regarding the petition, the child may be placed in the parent's home or in an out-of-home placement if not already placed in a temporary out-of-home placement pursuant to a child in need of services petition. The child or the parent may request a review of the child's placement including a review of any court order requiring the child to reside in the parent's home.

Sec. 10. RCW 13.32A.196 and 2000 c 123 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A dispositional hearing shall be held no later than fourteen days after the fact-finding hearing. Each party shall be notified of the time and date of the hearing.

(2) At the dispositional hearing regarding an adjudicated at-risk youth, the court shall consider the recommendations of the parties and the recommendations of any dispositional plan submitted by the department. The court may enter a dispositional order that will assist the parent in maintaining the care, custody, and control of the child and assist the family to resolve family conflicts or problems.

(3) The court may set conditions of supervision for the child that include:

(a) Regular school attendance;

(b) Counseling;

(c) Participation in a substance abuse or mental health outpatient treatment program;

(d) Reporting on a regular basis to the department or any other designated person or agency; and

(e) Any other condition the court deems an appropriate condition of supervision including but not limited to: Employment, participation in an anger management program, and refraining from using alcohol or drugs.

(4) No dispositional order or condition of supervision ordered by a court pursuant to this section shall include involuntary commitment of a child for substance abuse or mental health treatment.

(5) The court may order the parent to participate in counseling services or any other services for the child requiring parental participation. The parent shall cooperate with the court-ordered case plan and shall take necessary steps to help implement the case plan. The parent shall be financially responsible for costs related to the court-ordered plan; however, this requirement shall not affect the eligibility of the parent or child for public assistance or other benefits to which the parent or child may otherwise be entitled.

(6) The parent, or the department if the department initiated the at-risk youth proceeding under RCW 28A.225.090(2)(b), may request dismissal of an at-risk youth proceeding or out-of-home placement at any time. Upon such a request, the court shall dismiss the matter and cease court supervision of the child unless: (a) A contempt action is pending in the case; (b) a petition has been filed under RCW 13.32A.150 and a hearing has not yet been held under RCW 13.32A.179; or (c) an order has been entered under RCW 13.32A.179(3) and the court retains jurisdiction under that subsection. The court may retain jurisdiction over the matter for the purpose of concluding any pending contempt proceedings, including the full satisfaction of any penalties imposed as a result of a contempt finding.

(7) The court may order the department to monitor compliance with the dispositional order, assist in coordinating the provision of court-ordered services, and submit reports at subsequent review hearings regarding the status of the case.

Sec. 11. RCW 13.32A.250 and 2000 c 162 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all child in need of services proceedings and at-risk youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order entered pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for the purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties under this section.

(2) Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up to one hundred dollars and confinement for up to seven days, or both for contempt of court under this section.

(4) A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section shall be placed in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county.

(5) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court personnel, the department if the department initiated the at-risk youth proceeding under RCW 28A.225.090(2)(b), or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this chapter, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and take the child to detention. The order may be entered ex parte without prior notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's admission to detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance with RCW ((13.32A.065))43.185C.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 2, 4, and 7 through 11 of this act take effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---