BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.412 and 2018 c 266 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2023 regular legislative session, and every four years thereafter, the legislature shall review and rebase state basic education compensation allocations compared to school district compensation data, regionalization factors, what inflationary measure is the most representative of actual market experience for school districts, and other economic information. The legislature shall revise the minimum allocations, regionalization factors, and inflationary measure if necessary to ensure that state basic education allocations continue to provide market-rate salaries and that regionalization adjustments reflect actual economic differences between school districts.

(2)(a) For school districts with single-family residential values above the statewide median residential value, regionalization factors for school years 2018-19 through school year 2022-23 are as follows:

(i) For school districts in tercile 1, state salary allocations for school district employees are regionalized by six percent;

(ii) For school districts in tercile 2, state salary allocations for school district employees are regionalized by twelve percent; and

(iii) For school districts in tercile 3, state salary allocations for school district employees are regionalized by eighteen percent.

(b) In addition to the regionalization factors specified in (a) of this subsection, the following school districts are regionalized by six additional percentage points:

(i) School districts located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and sharing a boundary with any school district with a regionalization factor more than one tercile higher((, are regionalized by six additional percentage points)); and

(ii) School districts in King county contained entirely on an island whose only connection to the mainland is by ferry route.

(c) In addition to the regionalization factors specified in this subsection, for school districts that have certificated instructional staff median years of experience that exceed the statewide average certificated instructional staff years of experience and a ratio of certificated instructional staff advanced degrees to bachelor degrees above the statewide ratio, an experience factor of four percentage points is added to the regionalization factor, beginning in the 2019-20 school year.

(d) Additional school district adjustments are identified in the omnibus appropriations act, and these adjustments are partially reduced or eliminated by the 2022-23 school year as follows:

(i) Adjustments that increase the regionalization factor to a value that is greater than the tercile 3 regionalization factor must be reduced by two percentage points each school year beginning with school year 2020-21, through 2022-23.

(ii) Adjustments that increase the regionalization factor to a value that is less than or equal to the tercile 3 regionalization factor must be reduced by one percentage point each school year beginning with school year 2020-21, through 2022-23.

(3) To aid the legislature in reviewing and rebasing regionalization factors, the department of revenue shall, by November 1, 2022, and by November 1st every four years thereafter, determine the median single-family residential value of each school district as well as the median value of proximate districts within fifteen miles of the boundary of the school district for which the median residential value is being calculated.

(4) No district may receive less state funding for the minimum state salary allocation as compared to its prior school year salary allocation as a result of adjustments that reflect updated regionalized salaries.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Median residential value of each school district" means the median value of all single-family residential parcels included within a school district and any other school district that is proximate to the school district.

(b) "Proximate to the school district" means within fifteen miles of the boundary of the school district for which the median residential value is being calculated.

(c) "School district employees" means state-funded certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff.

(d) "School districts in tercile 1" means school districts with median single-family residential values in the first tercile of districts with single-family residential values above the statewide median residential value.

(e) "School districts in tercile 2" means school districts with median single-family residential values in the second tercile of districts with single-family residential values above the statewide median residential value.

(f) "School districts in tercile 3" means school districts with median single-family residential values in the third tercile of districts with single-family residential values above the statewide median residential value.

(g) "Statewide median residential value" means the median value of single-family residential parcels located within all school districts, reduced by five percent.

Sec. 2. 2018 c 299 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education), RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 502 of this act:

(a) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units are determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2 by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document 1.

(b) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each district are determined based on the district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.

(c) For the 2018-19 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

For School Year 2018-19

Certificated Instructional Staff

$65,216.05

Certificated Administrative Staff

$96,805.00

Classified Staff

$46,784.33

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours; and

(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours.

(c) "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((March 6))December 18, 2018, at 8:24 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.85 percent for school year 2017-18 and 23.01 percent for school year 2018-19 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.10 percent for school year 2017-18 and 21.17 percent for the 2018-19 school year for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary allocation schedule for certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary allocations for the 2017-18 school year:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2017-18

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

36,521

37,507

38,529

39,554

42,840

44,957

43,785

47,072

49,191

1

37,013

38,013

39,048

40,117

43,438

45,543

44,272

47,593

49,697

2

37,481

38,491

39,537

40,688

44,000

46,127

44,762

48,073

50,201

3

37,964

38,983

40,040

41,229

44,534

46,712

45,227

48,529

50,709

4

38,437

39,501

40,565

41,794

45,119

47,313

45,714

49,038

51,234

5

38,926

39,995

41,069

42,367

45,679

47,918

46,209

49,522

51,760

6

39,428

40,474

41,585

42,948

46,244

48,494

46,716

50,013

52,262

7

40,312

41,373

42,498

43,935

47,280

49,593

47,666

51,010

53,324

8

41,604

42,724

43,876

45,431

48,822

51,219

49,161

52,552

54,949

9

44,122

45,332

46,943

50,413

52,892

50,672

54,143

56,623

10

46,805

48,533

52,049

54,611

52,263

55,780

58,340

11

50,169

53,761

56,375

53,899

57,492

60,104

12

51,753

55,520

58,211

55,600

59,250

61,942

13

57,322

60,093

57,360

61,052

63,823

14

59,132

62,046

59,172

62,981

65,776

15

60,671

63,660

60,710

64,618

67,486

16 or more

61,884

64,932

61,924

65,910

68,836

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA" means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education).

(8) For school year 2018-19, the salary allocations for each district shall be the greater of:

(a) The derived school year 2018-19 salary allocations in subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) The derived salary allocations for school year 2017-18 increased by 2.3 percent.

--- END ---