BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.220 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.

(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:

(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through twelve and at least one thousand instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through twelve; and

(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:

(a) Instruction in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation, beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.230.090. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;

(c) If the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;

(d) Supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and

(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.

(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.

(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the one hundred eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(6) Subject to RCW 28A.150.276, nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.

(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.210.360 and 2004 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for health and fitness, including nutrition, the Washington state school directors' association, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of health, and the Washington alliance for health, physical education, recreation and dance, shall convene an advisory committee to develop a model policy regarding access to nutritious foods, opportunities for developmentally appropriate exercise, and accurate information related to these topics. The policy shall address the nutritional content of foods and beverages, including fluoridated bottled water, sold or provided throughout the school day or sold in competition with the federal school breakfast and lunch program and the availability and quality of health, nutrition, and physical education and fitness curriculum. The model policy should include the development of a physical education and fitness curriculum for students. For middle school students, physical education and fitness curriculum means a daily period of physical activity, a minimum of twenty minutes of which is aerobic activity in the student's target heart rate zone, which includes instruction and practice in basic movement and fine motor skills, progressive physical fitness, athletic conditioning, and nutrition and wellness instruction through age-appropriate activities.

(2) The school directors' association shall submit the model policy and recommendations on the related issues, along with a recommendation for local adoption, to the governor and the legislature and shall post the model policy on its web site by January 1, 2005.

(3) Each district's board of directors shall establish its own policy by August 1, 2005.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.230.095 and 2011 c 185 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that students have an opportunity to learn the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies skills. Health and fitness includes, but is not limited to, mental health and suicide prevention education. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may not require school districts to use a classroom-based assessment in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet the requirements of this section and shall clearly communicate to districts their option to use other strategies chosen by the district.

(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and the eleventh or twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school districts shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based assessments in civics.

(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report only the information necessary to comply with this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.230.130 and 2011 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school district, for students whose educational plans include application for entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.

(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a ((skills [skill]))skill center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district, for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. These programs may:

(a) Help students demonstrate the application of ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards to the world of work, occupation-specific skills, knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and employability and leadership skills; and

(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.

(3) Within existing resources, all public high schools in the state shall:

(a) Work towards the goal of offering a sufficient number of high school courses that give students the opportunity to earn the equivalent of a year's worth of postsecondary credit towards a certificate, apprenticeship program, technical degree, or associate or baccalaureate degree. These high school courses are those advanced courses that have accompanying proficiency exams or demonstrated competencies that are used to demonstrate postsecondary knowledge and skills; and

(b) Inform students and their families, emphasizing communication to underrepresented groups, about the program offerings and the opportunities to take courses that qualify for postsecondary credit through demonstrated competencies or if the student earns the qualifying score on the proficiency exam. This information shall encourage students to use the twelfth grade as the launch year for an advance start on their career and postsecondary education.

(4) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical program in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics directly to students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that provides a hands-on experience in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical education, and includes a career and technical education exploratory component shall also qualify for the career and technical education funding.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.300.130 and 2016 c 72 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, shall establish the center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work in conjunction with parents, educational service districts, institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2) The center, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, and in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall:

(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of higher education in the state to support educational improvement initiatives in Washington schools and districts;

(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status; research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students learn the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards;

(c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the availability of information, research, and other materials;

(d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and school administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(e) Provide training and consultation services, including conducting regional summer institutes;

(f) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(g) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents including, but not limited to, email, phone, and postal mail; and

(h) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and employ a director for the center.

(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or organizations including but not limited to: School districts; educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers; higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible, shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist educators and others in schools and districts.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for the improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the center for the improvement of student learning have been used and by whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and application of knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning and greater family and community involvement in the public education system.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.300.440 and 2012 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The natural science, wildlife, and environmental education grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds. The program is created to promote proven and innovative natural science, wildlife, and environmental education programs that are fully aligned with the state(('s essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards, and includes but is not limited to instruction about renewable resources, responsible use of resources, and conservation.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and publish funding criteria for environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education grants. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall involve a cross-section of stakeholder groups to develop socially, economically, and environmentally balanced funding criteria. These criteria shall be based on compliance with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and use methods that encourage critical thinking. The criteria must also include environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs with one or more of the following features:

(a) Interdisciplinary approaches to environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural issues;

(b) Programs that target underserved, disadvantaged, and multicultural populations;

(c) Programs that reach out to schools across the state that would otherwise not have access to specialized environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs;

(d) Proven programs offered by innovative community partnerships designed to improve student learning and strengthen local communities.

(3) Eligible uses of grants include, but are not limited to:

(a) Continuing in-service and preservice training for educators with materials specifically developed to enable educators to teach ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards in a compelling and effective manner;

(b) Proven, innovative programs that align the basic subject areas of the common school curriculum in chapter 28A.230 RCW with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards; the basic subject areas should be integrated by using environmental education, natural science, wildlife, forestry, agricultural, and natural environment curricula to meet the needs of various learning styles; and

(c) Support and equipment needed for the implementation of the programs in this section.

(4) Grants may only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code that can provide matching funds or in-kind services.

(5) Grants may not be used for any partisan or political activities.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.300.462 and 2011 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts are encouraged to voluntarily adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the financial education public-private partnership shall provide technical assistance and grants to support demonstration projects for district-wide adoption and implementation of the financial education learning standards under this section.

(3) School districts may apply on a competitive basis to participate as a demonstration project. The office and the partnership shall select up to four school districts as demonstration projects, with two districts located in eastern Washington and two districts located in western Washington, if possible.

(4) Selected districts must:

(a) Adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education as the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for financial education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards;

(b) Make a commitment to integrate financial education into instruction at all grade levels and in all schools in the district;

(c) Establish local partnerships within the community to promote financial education in the schools; and

(d) Conduct pre and posttesting of students' financial literacy.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with the advice of the financial education public-private partnership, shall provide assistance to the demonstration projects regarding curriculum, professional development, and innovative instructional programs to implement the financial education standards.

(6) The selected districts must report findings and results of the demonstration project to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and appropriate committees of the legislature annually.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.305.215 and 2009 c 310 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The activities in this section revise and strengthen the state learning standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210((, known as the essential academic learning requirements,)) and improve alignment of school district curriculum to the standards.

(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the state board; and (b) ((the)) mathematics and science advisory panels ((created under RCW 28A.305.219)), as appropriate, which shall provide review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education on new revised standards and curricula.

(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations in mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:

(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;

(b) Study of:

(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in international mathematics and science study and the programme for international student assessment;

(ii) College readiness standards;

(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks; and

(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including California, and the nation of Singapore; and

(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment periods.

(4)(a) By February 29, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the grade level expectations for mathematics and present the revised standards to the state board of education and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4).

(b) The state board of education shall direct an expert national consultant in mathematics to:

(i) Analyze the February 2008 version of the revised standards, including a comparison to exemplar standards previously reviewed under this section;

(ii) Recommend specific language and content changes needed to finalize the revised standards; and

(iii) Present findings and recommendations in a draft report to the state board of education.

(c) By May 15, 2008, the state board of education shall review the consultant's draft report, consult the mathematics advisory panel, hold a public hearing to receive comment, and direct any subsequent modifications to the consultant's report. After the modifications are made, the state board of education shall forward the final report and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction for implementation.

(d) By July 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the mathematics standards to conform precisely to and incorporate each of the recommendations of the state board of education under (c) of this subsection and submit the revisions to the state board of education.

(e) By July 31, 2008, the state board of education shall either approve adoption by the superintendent of public instruction of the final revised standards as the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations for mathematics, or develop a plan for ensuring that the recommendations under (c) of this subsection are implemented so that final revised mathematics standards can be adopted by September 25, 2008.

(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations in science. The recommendations shall be based on:

(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;

(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in international mathematics and science study and the programme for international student assessment; and

(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment periods.

(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the grade level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the state board of education and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The superintendent shall adopt the revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.

(7)(a) Within six months after the standards under subsection (4) of this section are adopted, the superintendent of public instruction shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no more than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary, middle, and high school grade spans.

(b) Within two months after the presentation of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the recommended mathematics curricula. The superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and adopt the recommended curricula.

(c) By June 30, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no more than three basic science curricula each for elementary and middle school grade spans and not more than three recommendations for each of the major high school courses within the following science domains: Earth and space science, physical science, and life science.

(d) Within two months after the presentation of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and adopt the recommended curricula.

(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection (7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to ((the)) mathematics and science advisory panels ((created under RCW 28A.305.219)), as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the recommendations.

(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align with the revised ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula, appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified as necessary to support each curricula.

(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and parents online at no cost to the school or parent.

(8) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall revise the high school graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 to include a minimum of three credits of mathematics, one of which may be a career and technical course equivalent in mathematics, and prescribe the mathematics content in the three required credits.

(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section. However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by the legislature ((as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e))) before implementation.

(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a comprehensive survey of the mathematics curricula being used by school districts at all grade levels and the textbook and curriculum purchasing cycle of the districts and report the results of the survey to the education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2008.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.320.173 and 2018 c 266 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public schools may develop curricula that:

(a) Links student learning with engagement in seasonal or nonseasonal outdoor-based activities, including activities related to academic requirements in science, health and fitness, and career and technical education;

(b) Aligns with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070 that are a component of the state's instructional program of basic education; and

(c) Includes locally administered competency based assessments that align with the Washington state learning standards.

(2) Public schools that develop curricula under this section may request authorization from the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 28A.300.790 to consider student participation in seasonal or nonseasonal outdoor-based activities as instructional days for the purposes of basic education requirements established in RCW 28A.150.220(5).

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.320.240 and 2015 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for school library information and technology programs that support the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school graduation requirements adopted under RCW 28A.230.090.

(2) Every board of directors shall provide resources and materials for the operation of school library information and technology programs as the board deems necessary for the proper education of the district's students or as otherwise required by law or rule of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a certificated teacher with a library media endorsement under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board.

(4) "School library information and technology program" means a school-based program that is staffed by a certificated teacher-librarian and provides a broad, flexible array of services, resources, and instruction that support student mastery of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and state standards in all subject areas and the implementation of the district's school improvement plan.

(5) The teacher-librarian, through the school library information and technology program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high school students completing high school and beyond plans required for graduation.

(6) The teacher-librarian's duties may include, but are not limited to, collaborating with his or her schools to:

(a) Integrate information and technology into curriculum and instruction, including but not limited to instructing other certificated staff about using and integrating information and technology literacy into instruction through workshops, modeling lessons, and individual peer coaching;

(b) Provide information management instruction to students and staff about how to effectively use emerging learning technologies for school and lifelong learning, as well as in the appropriate use of computers and mobile devices in an educational setting;

(c) Help teachers and students efficiently and effectively access the highest quality information available while using information ethically;

(d) Instruct students in digital citizenship including how to be critical consumers of information and provide guidance about thoughtful and strategic use of online resources; and

(e) Create a culture of reading in the school community by developing a diverse, student-focused collection of materials that ensures all students can find something of quality to read and by facilitating school-wide reading initiatives along with providing individual support and guidance for students.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.410.046 and 2011 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section, an elementary mathematics specialist is a certificated teacher who has demonstrated at least the following knowledge and skills:

(a) Enhanced mathematics content knowledge and skills necessary to provide students in grades kindergarten through eight a deep understanding of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and performance expectations in mathematics;

(b) Knowledge and skills in a variety of instructional strategies for teaching mathematics content; and

(c) Knowledge and skills in instructional strategies targeted for students struggling with mathematics.

(2) The legislature encourages the professional educator standards board to develop standards for and adopt a specialty endorsement for elementary mathematics specialists as defined under this section.

(3) School districts may work with local colleges and universities, educator preparation programs, and educational service districts to develop and offer training and professional development opportunities in the knowledge and skills necessary for a teacher to be considered an elementary mathematics specialist under this section.

(4) School districts are encouraged to use elementary mathematics specialists for direct instruction of students using an itinerant teacher model where the specialist rotates from classroom to classroom within the school.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.655.071 and 2010 c 235 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By August 2, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction may revise the state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards authorized under RCW 28A.655.070 for mathematics, reading, writing, and communication by provisionally adopting a common set of standards for students in grades kindergarten through twelve. The revised state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards may be substantially identical with the standards developed by a multistate consortium in which Washington participated, must be consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.655.070, and may include additional standards if the additional standards do not exceed fifteen percent of the standards for each content area. However, the superintendent of public instruction shall not take steps to implement the provisionally adopted standards until the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate have an opportunity to review the standards.

(2) By January 1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate:

(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards and the state ((essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards as of June 10, 2010, including the comparative level of rigor and specificity of the standards and the implications of any identified differences; and

(b) An estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school districts to implement the provisionally adopted standards, including providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum, adjustment of state assessments, and other actions.

(3) The superintendent may implement the revisions to the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards under this section after the 2011 legislative session unless otherwise directed by the legislature.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.655.075 and 2007 c 396 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and grade level expectations for educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy. The development process shall include a review of current standards that have been developed or are used by other states and national and international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the technology ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards.

(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas and experiences.

(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs, interests, and learning styles.

(2)(a) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades to assess the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards for technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the 2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to school districts for the districts' voluntary use. If a school district uses the assessments created under this section, then the school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments each school year.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.655.130 and 1999 c 388 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds are appropriated, the office of the superintendent of public instruction annually shall allocate accountability implementation funds to school districts. The purposes of the funds are to: Develop and update student learning improvement plans; implement curriculum materials and instructional strategies; provide staff professional development to implement the selected curricula and instruction; develop and implement assessment strategies and training in assessment scoring; and fund other activities intended to improve student learning for all students, including students with diverse needs. Activities funded by the allocations must be consistent with the school or district improvement plan, designed to improve the ability of teachers and other instructional certificated and classified staff to assist students in meeting the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, and designed to achieve state and local accountability goals. Activities funded by the allocations shall be designed to protect the teachers' instructional time with students and minimize the use of substitute teachers.

(2) Schools receiving funds shall develop, update as needed, and keep on file a school student learning improvement plan to achieve the student learning goals and ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and to implement the assessment system as it is developed. The plan shall delineate how the accountability implementation funds will be used to accomplish the requirements of this section. The plan shall be made available to the public and to others upon request.

(3) The amount of allocations shall be determined in the omnibus appropriations act.

(4) The state schools for the deaf and blind are eligible to receive allocations under this section.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt timelines and rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program, and require that schools and districts submit reports regarding the use of the funds.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.655.140 and 1999 c 388 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical assistance statewide, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to available funding, may employ school improvement coordinators and school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The improvement specialists shall serve on a rotating basis and shall not be permanent employees.

(2) The types of assistance provided by the improvement coordinators and specialists may include, but need not be limited to:

(a) Assistance to schools to use student performance data and develop improvement plans based on those data;

(b) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their performance on the ((Washington))statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and other assessments;

(c) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards and the ((Washington))statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and that meets the needs of diverse learners;

(d) Assistance in the identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices;

(e) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment;

(f) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community involvement programs; and

(g) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to improve student learning.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.710.040 and 2018 c 75 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A charter school must operate according to the terms of its charter contract and the provisions of this chapter.

(2) A charter school must:

(a) Comply with local, state, and federal health, safety, parents' rights, civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school districts and to the same extent as school districts, including but not limited to chapter 28A.642 RCW (discrimination prohibition) and chapter 28A.640 RCW (sexual equality);

(b) Provide a program of basic education, that meets the goals in RCW 28A.150.210, including instruction in the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards, and participate in the statewide student assessment system as developed under RCW 28A.655.070;

(c) Comply with the screening and intervention requirements under RCW 28A.320.260;

(d) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.025. Charter schools, however, may hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);

(e) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(f) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance;

(g) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW 28A.655.110;

(h) Be subject to the performance improvement goals adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130;

(i) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW and public records requirements in chapter 42.56 RCW; and

(j) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after December 6, 2012, that governs the operation and management of charter schools.

(3) Charter public schools must comply with all state statutes and rules made applicable to the charter school in the school's charter contract, and are subject to the specific state statutes and rules identified in subsection (2) of this section. For the purpose of allowing flexibility to innovate in areas such as scheduling, personnel, funding, and educational programs to improve student outcomes and academic achievement, charter schools are not subject to, and are exempt from, all other state statutes and rules applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors. Except as provided otherwise by this chapter or a charter contract, charter schools are exempt from all school district policies.

(4) A charter school may not engage in any sectarian practices in its educational program, admissions or employment policies, or operations.

(5) Charter schools are subject to the supervision of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education, including accountability measures, to the same extent as other public schools, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.06B.020 and 2013 c 23 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

The education ombuds shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including instructional guides developed to inform parents of the ((essential academic))state learning ((requirements))standards required by the superintendent of public instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements, and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been involved with their children's education;

(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and secondary education system;

(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend strategies for helping parents and community members to participate effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including understanding and respecting the roles of school building administrators and staff;

(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(5) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources, agencies, or departments;

(6) To facilitate the resolution of complaints made by parents and students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary education system;

(7) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of the education ombuds; and

(8) To consult with representatives of the following organizations and groups regarding the work of the office of the education ombuds, including but not limited to:

(a) The state parent teacher association;

(b) Certificated and classified school employees;

(c) School and school district administrators;

(d) Parents of special education students;

(e) Parents of English language learners;

(f) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;

(g) The Washington state commission on African American affairs;

(h) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and

(i) The governor's office of Indian affairs.

Sec. 18. RCW 79A.05.351 and 2015 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The outdoor education and recreation grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds in the outdoor education and recreation account. The commission shall establish and implement the program by rule to provide opportunities for public agencies, private nonprofit organizations, formal school programs, nonformal after-school programs, and community-based programs to receive grants from the account. Programs that provide outdoor education opportunities to schools shall be fully aligned with the state(('s essential academic)) learning ((requirements))standards.

(2) The program shall be phased in beginning with the schools and students with the greatest needs in suburban, rural, and urban areas of the state. The program shall focus on students who qualify for free and reduced-price lunch, who are most likely to fail academically, or who have the greatest potential to drop out of school.

(3) The director shall set priorities and develop criteria for the awarding of grants to outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural resource-based education and recreation programs considering at least the following:

(a) Programs that contribute to the reduction of academic failure and dropout rates;

(b) Programs that make use of research-based, effective environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural resource-based education curriculum;

(c) Programs that contribute to healthy life styles through outdoor recreation and sound nutrition;

(d) Various Washington state parks as venues and use of the commission's personnel as a resource;

(e) Programs that maximize the number of participants that can be served;

(f) Programs that will commit matching and in-kind resources;

(g) Programs that create partnerships with public and private entities;

(h) Programs that provide students with opportunities to directly experience and understand nature and the natural world;

(i) Programs that include ongoing program evaluation, assessment, and reporting of their effectiveness; and

(j) Programs that utilize veterans for at least fifty percent of program implementation or administration.

(4) The director shall create an advisory committee to assist and advise the commission in the development and administration of the outdoor education and recreation program. The director should solicit representation on the committee from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of fish and wildlife, the business community, outdoor organizations with an interest in education, and any others the commission deems sufficient to ensure a cross section of stakeholders. When the director creates such an advisory committee, its members shall be reimbursed from the outdoor education and recreation program account for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The outdoor education and recreation program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Funds deposited in the outdoor education and recreation program account shall be transferred only to the commission to be used solely for the commission's outdoor education and recreation program purposes identified in this section including the administration of the program. The director may accept gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source for deposit in the outdoor education and recreation program account. Any public agency in this state may develop and implement outdoor education and recreation programs. The director may make grants to public agencies and contract with any public or private agency or person to develop and implement outdoor education and recreation programs. The outdoor education and recreation program account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. RCW 28A.655.010 (Washington commission on student learning—Definitions) and 1993 c 336 s 201 are each repealed.

--- END ---