BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 38.24.050 and 2011 c 336 s 767 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the organized militia of Washington, while in active state service or inactive duty, are entitled to and shall receive the same amount of pay and allowances from the state of Washington as provided by federal laws and regulations for commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the armed forces of the United States ((army)) only if federal pay and allowances are not authorized. For periods of such active state service, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the organized militia of Washington shall receive either such pay and allowances, or for wildland fire response an amount equal to the rates established by the national wildfire coordinating group administratively determined pay plans for emergency workers, or an amount equal to ((one and one-half of)) the ((federal))state minimum wage, whichever is greater.

(2) Wildland fire response pay shall have an established minimum entry rate and additional scaled pay that recognizes the longevity and responsibility scope of more senior noncommissioned officers, warrant officers, and company grade commissioned officers. The pay plan is commensurate with the pay structure of other state agencies providing resources to wildland fire response. The director of the state military department shall establish the pay structure subject to approval of the office of financial management.

(3) The value of articles issued to any member and not returned in good order on demand, and legal fines or forfeitures, may be deducted from the member's pay.

(4) If federal pay and allowances are not authorized, all members detailed to serve on any board or commission ordered by the governor, or on any court-martial ordered by proper authority, may, at the discretion of the adjutant general, be paid a sum equal to one day's active state service for each day actually employed on the board or court or engaged in the business thereof, or in traveling to and from the same; and in addition thereto travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended when such duty is at a place other than the city or town of his or her residence.

(5) Necessary transportation, quartermasters' stores, and subsistence for troops when ordered on active state service may be contracted for and paid for as are other military bills.

--- END ---