BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.08.310 and 2010 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice architecture in this state, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use, or advertise any title or description including the word "architect," "architecture," "architectural," or language tending to imply that he or she is an architect, unless the person is registered or authorized to practice in the state of Washington under this chapter.

(2) An architect or architectural firm registered in any other jurisdiction recognized by the board may offer to practice architecture in this state if:

(a) It is clearly and prominently stated in such an offer that the architect or firm is not registered to practice architecture in the state of Washington; and

(b) Prior to practicing architecture or signing a contract to provide architectural services, the architect or firm must be registered to practice architecture in this state.

(3) A person who has an accredited architectural degree may use the title "((intern architect))architectural associate" when enrolled in a structured ((intern))training program recognized by the board and working under the direct supervision of an architect.

(4) The provisions of this section shall not affect the use of the words "architect," "architecture," or "architectural" where a person does not practice or offer to practice architecture.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.08.320 and 2010 c 129 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Accredited architectural degree" means a professional degree from an institution of higher education accredited by the national architectural accreditation board or an equivalent degree in architecture as determined by the board.

(2) "Administration of the construction contract" means the periodic observation of materials and work to observe the general compliance with the construction contract documents, and does not include responsibility for supervising construction methods and processes, site conditions, equipment operations, personnel, or safety on the work site.

(3) "Architect" means an individual who is registered under this chapter to practice architecture.

(4) "Board" means the state board for architects.

(5) "Certificate of authorization" means a certificate issued by the director to a business entity that authorizes the entity to practice architecture.

(6) "Certificate of registration" means the certificate issued by the director to newly registered architects.

(7) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(8) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(9) "Engineer" means an individual who is registered as an engineer under chapter 18.43 RCW.

(10) "Managers" means the members of a limited liability company in which management of its business is vested in the members, and the managers of a limited liability company in which management of its business is vested in one or more managers.

(11) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional service corporation, corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in the state.

(12) "Practice of architecture" means the rendering of any service((s))or related work requiring architectural education, training, and experience, in connection with the art and science of building design for construction of any structure or grouping of structures and the use of space within and surrounding the structures or the design for construction of alterations or additions to the structures, including but not specifically limited to predesign services, schematic design, design development, preparation of construction contract documents, and administration of the construction contract.

(13) "Prototypical documents" means drawings or specifications, prepared by a person registered as an architect in any state or as otherwise approved by the board, that are not intended as final and complete technical submissions for a building project, but rather are to serve as a prototype for a building or buildings to be adapted by an architect for construction in more than one location.

(14) "Registered" means holding a currently valid certificate of registration or certificate of authorization issued by the director authorizing the practice of architecture.

(15) "Registered professional design firm" means a business entity registered in Washington to offer and provide architectural services under RCW 18.08.420.

(16) "Review" means a process of examination and evaluation, of the documents, for compliance with applicable laws, codes, and regulations affecting the built environment that includes the ability to control the final product.

(17) "Structure" means any construction consisting of load-bearing members such as the foundation, roof, floors, walls, columns, girders, and beams or a combination of any number of these parts, with or without other parts or appurtenances.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.08.350 and 2010 c 129 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A certificate of registration shall be granted by the director to all qualified applicants who are certified by the board as having passed the required examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion of the required experience.

(2) Applications for examination shall be filed as the board prescribes by rule. The application and examination fees shall be determined by the director under RCW 43.24.086.

(3) An applicant for registration as an architect shall be of a good moral character, at least eighteen years of age, and shall possess one of the following qualifications:

(a) Have an accredited architectural degree and ((at least three years' practical architectural work experience in))complete a structured ((intern)) training program approved by the board; or

(b) Have a high school diploma or equivalent and at least ((nine))eight years of practical architectural work experience, including the completion of a structured ((intern)) training program under the direct supervision of an architect as determined by the board. ((Prior to applying to enroll in a structured intern training program, the applicant must have at least six years of work experience, of which))At least three of the years of required experience outside of the structured training program must be under the direct supervision of an architect. This work experience may include designing buildings as a principal activity and postsecondary education as determined by the board. The board may approve up to four years of practical architectural work experience for postsecondary education courses in architecture, architectural technology, or a related field, as determined by the board, including courses completed in a community or technical college if the courses are equivalent to courses in an accredited architectural degree program.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.08.360 and 2010 c 129 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The examination for an architect's certificate of registration shall be held at least annually at such time and place as the board determines.

(2) The board shall determine the content, scope, and grading process of the examination. The board may adopt an appropriate national examination and grading procedure.

(3) Applicants who fail to pass any section of the examination shall be permitted to retake the parts failed as prescribed by the board. Applicants have five years from the date of the first passed examination section to pass all remaining sections. If the entire examination is not successfully completed within five years, any sections that were passed more than five years prior must be retaken. If a candidate fails to pass all remaining sections within the initial five-year period, the candidate is given a new five-year period from the date of the second oldest passed section. All sections of the examination must be passed within a single five-year period for the applicant to be deemed to have passed the complete examination.

(4) Applicants for registration ((who have an accredited architectural degree)) may begin taking the examination upon enrollment in a structured ((intern)) training program as approved by the board. ((Applicants who do not possess an accredited architectural degree may take the examination only after completing the experience and intern training requirements of this chapter.))

--- END ---