BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.275 and 2018 c 260 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any contract or agreement for employee benefits executed after April 13, 1990, between a school district or educational service district and a benefit provider or employee bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an agreement to abide by state laws relating to school district and educational service district employee benefits. The term of the contract or agreement may not exceed one year((, except that the final contract or agreement entered into for the 2018-19 school year must exceed one year only by the months necessary to ensure employee benefits are maintained through December 31, 2019)). For K-12 employees, the contract year may not exceed two hundred sixty days.

(2) School districts, educational service districts, and their benefit providers shall submit data to the health care authority in accordance with RCW 41.05.075(3).

(3) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by contract or agreement with a school district or educational service district under subsection (1) of this section shall make available to the school district or educational service district the benefit plan descriptions and, where available, the demographic information on plan subscribers that the school district, educational service district, and benefit provider are required to report to the health care authority under this section.

(4) Each school district and educational service district shall:

(a) Carry out all actions required by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW including, but not limited to, those necessary for the operation of benefit plans, education of employees, claims administration, and appeals process; and

(b) Report all data relating to employees eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority in a format designed and communicated by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

--- END ---