BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

A legislative authority of a county may elect not to implement or enforce all or any part of a statewide initiative enacted by the people. The legislative authority must take such action by ordinance, which must indicate which parts of the initiative are, and are not, in effect in the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect December 5, 2019, if the proposed amendment to Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution concerning county implementation of measures initiated by the people (H-0297/19) is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---