BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2018 c 299 s 921 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The ((joint legislative task force on)) sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group is established within the office of the attorney general for the purpose of reviewing best practice models for managing all aspects of sexual assault ((examinations))investigations and for reducing the number of untested sexual assault ((examination)) kits in Washington state ((that were collected prior to the effective date of this section)).

(i) The caucus leaders from the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The caucus leaders from the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The ((president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives))attorney general, in consultation with the legislative members of the advisory group, shall ((jointly)) appoint:

(A) One member representing each of the following:

(I) The Washington state patrol;

(II) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(III) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(IV) The Washington defender association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(V) The Washington association of cities;

(VI) The Washington association of county officials;

(VII) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(VIII) The office of crime victims advocacy;

(IX) The Washington state hospital association;

(X) ((The Washington state forensic investigations council;

(XI) A public institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(XII) A private higher education institution as defined in RCW 28B.07.020; and

(XIII))) The office of the attorney general; and

(XI) A sexual assault nurse examiner; and

(B) Two members representing survivors of sexual assault.

(b) ((The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its legislative membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.))The appointed membership of the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination best practices transfers to the advisory group administered by the office of the attorney general pursuant to this section. However, the prior cochairs of the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination best practices may recommend that the attorney general replace appointees who were inactive or otherwise absent from previous meetings.

(2) The duties of the ((task force))advisory group include, but are not limited to:

(a) Researching and determining the number of untested sexual assault ((examination)) kits in Washington state;

(b) Researching the locations where the untested sexual assault ((examination)) kits are stored;

(c) Researching, reviewing, and making recommendations regarding legislative policy options for reducing the number of untested sexual assault ((examination)) kits;

(d) Researching the best practice models both in state and from other states for collaborative responses to victims of sexual assault from the point the sexual assault ((examination)) kit is collected to the conclusion of the investigation and prosecution of a case, and providing recommendations regarding any existing gaps in Washington and resources that may be necessary to address those gaps; ((and))

(e) Researching, identifying, and making recommendations for securing nonstate funding for testing the sexual assault ((examination)) kits, and reporting on progress made toward securing such funding;

(f) Prior to the end of the moratorium under section 8 of this act, developing policies and submitting recommendations on the storage, retention, and destruction of unreported sexual assault kits as well as protocols for engaging with survivors associated with unreported sexual assault kits;

(g) Monitoring implementation of state and federal legislative changes;

(h) Collaborating with the legislature, state agencies, medical facilities, and local governments to implement reforms pursuant to federal grant requirements; and

(i) Making recommendations for institutional reforms necessary to prevent sexual assault and improve the experiences of sexual assault survivors in the criminal justice system.

(3) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support ((for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research))to the advisory group.

(4) Legislative members of the ((task force))advisory group must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) ((The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force meetings and expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The first meeting of the task force must occur prior to October 1, 2015. The task force shall submit a preliminary report regarding its initial findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor no later than December 1, 2015.

(7) The task force))The advisory group must meet no less than twice annually.

(((8)))(6) The ((task force))advisory group shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor ((by September 30, 2016, and)) by December 1st of ((the following))each year.

(((9)))(7) This section expires ((June 30, 2019))December 31, 2021.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.04.080 and 2017 c 266 s 9, 2017 c 231 s 2, and 2017 c 125 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this section.

(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Arson if a death results;

(iv) Vehicular homicide;

(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;

(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4)).

(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death results;

(iii)(A) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission.

(B) If a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be prosecuted more than three years after its commission;

(iv) Indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(b); ((or))

(v) Attempted murder; or

(vi) Trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100.

(c) Violations of the following statutes, when committed against a victim under the age of eighteen, may be prosecuted up to the victim's thirtieth birthday: RCW 9A.44.040 (rape in the first degree), 9A.44.050 (rape in the second degree), 9A.44.073 (rape of a child in the first degree), 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree), 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), 9A.44.083 (child molestation in the first degree), 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree), 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree), 9A.44.100(1)(b) (indecent liberties), 9A.64.020 (incest), or 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor).

(d) A violation of any offense listed in this subsection (1)(d) may be prosecuted up to ten years after its commission or, if committed against a victim under the age of eighteen, up to the victim's thirtieth birthday, whichever is later:

(i) RCW 9.68A.100 (commercial sexual abuse of a minor);

(ii) RCW 9.68A.101 (promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor); or

(iii) RCW 9.68A.102 (promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor).

(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission or their discovery, whichever occurs later:

(i) Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080;

(ii) Any felony violation of chapter 9A.83 RCW;

(iii) Any felony violation of chapter 9.35 RCW;

(iv) Theft in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.56 RCW when accomplished by color or aid of deception;

(v) Theft from a vulnerable adult under RCW 9A.56.400; or

(vi) Trafficking in stolen property in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.82 RCW in which the stolen property is a motor vehicle or major component part of a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.80.010.

(f) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(g) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(h) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

(i) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(j) No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.

(k) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this state.

(3) In any prosecution for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section run from the date of commission or ((one))two years from the date on which the identity of the suspect is conclusively established by deoxyribonucleic acid testing or by photograph as defined in RCW 9.68A.011, whichever is later.

(4) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or filing to the setting aside.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After January 1, 2022, the auditor shall conduct a comprehensive performance audit of the statewide sexual assault tracking system under RCW 43.43.545 and the operations of the Washington state patrol crime laboratory with respect to processing sexual assault kits. In addition to other measures established by the auditor, the performance audit shall assess:

(a) Whether the Washington state patrol is operating the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system in accordance with RCW 43.43.545 and best practices; and

(b) Whether the Washington state patrol crime laboratory has taken actions consistent with best practices, chapter 70.125 RCW, and related state budgetary requirements to address testing backlogs and otherwise improve efficiency and efficacy of sexual assault kit testing.

(2) The auditor shall complete the audit and publish a report with its findings no later than December 31, 2022.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2023.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.43.545 and 2016 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol shall create and operate a statewide sexual assault kit tracking system. The Washington state patrol may contract with state or nonstate entities including, but not limited to, private software and technology providers, for the creation, operation, and maintenance of the system.

(2) The statewide sexual assault kit tracking system must:

(a) Track the location and status of sexual assault kits throughout the criminal justice process, including the initial collection in examinations performed at medical facilities, receipt and storage at law enforcement agencies, receipt and analysis at forensic laboratories, and storage and any destruction after completion of analysis;

(b) Designate sexual assault kits as unreported or reported;

(c) Allow medical facilities performing sexual assault forensic examinations, law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, the Washington state patrol bureau of forensic laboratory services, and other entities ((in the))having custody of sexual assault kits to update and track the status and location of sexual assault kits;

(((c)))(d) Allow victims of sexual assault to anonymously track or receive updates regarding the status of their sexual assault kits; and

(((d)))(e) Use electronic technology or technologies allowing continuous access.

(3) The Washington state patrol may use a phased implementation process in order to launch the system and facilitate entry and use of the system for required participants. The Washington state patrol may phase initial participation according to region, volume, or other appropriate classifications. All entities ((in the))having custody of sexual assault kits shall fully participate in the system no later than June 1, 2018. The Washington state patrol shall submit a report on the current status and plan for launching the system, including the plan for phased implementation, to the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination best practices, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor no later than January 1, 2017.

(4) The Washington state patrol shall submit a semiannual report on the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system to the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination best practices, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor. The Washington state patrol may publish the current report on its web site. The first report is due July 31, 2018, and subsequent reports are due January 31st and July 31st of each year. The report must include the following:

(a) The total number of sexual assault kits in the system statewide and by jurisdiction;

(b) The total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits where forensic analysis has been completed statewide and by jurisdiction;

(c) The number of sexual assault kits added to the system in the reporting period statewide and by jurisdiction;

(d) The total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits where forensic analysis has been requested but not completed statewide and by jurisdiction;

(e) The average and median length of time for sexual assault kits to be submitted for forensic analysis after being added to the system, including separate sets of data for all sexual assault kits in the system statewide and by jurisdiction and for sexual assault kits added to the system in the reporting period statewide and by jurisdiction;

(f) The average and median length of time for forensic analysis to be completed on sexual assault kits after being submitted for analysis, including separate sets of data for all sexual assault kits in the system statewide and by jurisdiction and for sexual assault kits added to the system in the reporting period statewide and by jurisdiction;

(g) The total and semiannual number of sexual assault kits destroyed or removed from the system statewide and by jurisdiction;

(h) The total number of sexual assault kits, statewide and by jurisdiction, where forensic analysis has not been completed and six months or more have passed since those sexual assault kits were added to the system; and

(i) The total number of sexual assault kits, statewide and by jurisdiction, where forensic analysis has not been completed and one year or more has passed since those sexual assault kits were added to the system.

(5) For the purpose of reports under subsection (4) of this section, a sexual assault kit must be assigned to the jurisdiction associated with the law enforcement agency anticipated to receive the sexual assault kit or otherwise ((in the))having custody of the sexual assault kit.

(6) Any public agency or entity, including its officials and employees, and any hospital and its employees providing services to victims of sexual assault may not be held civilly liable for damages arising from any release of information or the failure to release information related to the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system, so long as the release was without gross negligence.

(7) The Washington state patrol shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

(8) For the purposes of this section, an "unreported sexual assault kit" refers to a sexual assault kit collected from a victim who has consented to the collection of the sexual assault kit but who has not reported the alleged crime to law enforcement.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.101.272 and 2017 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall provide ongoing specialized, intensive, and integrative training for persons responsible for investigating sexual assault cases involving adult victims. The training must be based on a victim-centered, trauma-informed approach to responding to sexual assault. Among other subjects, the training must include content on the neurobiology of trauma and trauma-informed interviewing, counseling, and investigative techniques.

(2) The training must: Be based on research-based practices and standards; offer participants an opportunity to practice interview skills and receive feedback from instructors; minimize the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse investigations; provide methods of reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary whenever possible; assure, to the extent possible, that investigative interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; recognize needs of special populations; recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; require investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to permit the interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the circumstances; address record retention and retrieval; ((and)) address documentation of investigative interviews; and educate investigators on the best practices for notifying victims of the results of forensic analysis of sexual assault kits and other significant events in the investigative process, including for active investigations and cold cases.

(3) In developing the training, the commission shall seek advice from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, and experts on sexual assault and the neurobiology of trauma. The commission shall consult with the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys in an effort to design training containing consistent elements for all professionals engaged in interviewing and interacting with sexual assault victims in the criminal justice system.

(4) The commission shall develop the training and begin offering it by July 1, 2018. Officers assigned to regularly investigate sexual assault involving adult victims shall complete the training within one year of being assigned or by July 1, 2020, whichever is later.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.125.090 and 2015 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a law enforcement agency receives a sexual assault ((examination)) kit, the law enforcement agency must, within thirty days of its receipt, submit a request for laboratory examination to the Washington state patrol crime laboratory for prioritization for testing by it or another accredited laboratory that holds an outsourcing agreement with the Washington state patrol if:

(a) The law enforcement agency has received a related report or complaint alleging a sexual assault or other crime has occurred; and

(b)(i) Consent for laboratory examination has been given by the victim; or

(((b)))(ii) The victim is a person under the age of eighteen who is not emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(2) ((Subject to available funding,))Beginning May 1, 2022, when the Washington state patrol receives a request for laboratory examination of a sexual assault kit from a law enforcement agency, the Washington state patrol shall conduct the laboratory examination of the sexual assault kit, and when appropriate, enter relevant information into the combined DNA index system, within forty-five days of receipt of the request. The Washington state patrol crime laboratory must give priority to the laboratory examination of sexual assault ((examination)) kits at the request of a local law enforcement agency for:

(a) Active investigations and cases with impending court dates;

(b) Active investigations where public safety is an immediate concern;

(c) Violent crimes investigations, including active sexual assault investigations;

(d) Postconviction cases; and

(e) Other crimes' investigations and nonactive investigations, such as previously unsubmitted older sexual assault kits or recently collected sexual assault kits that the submitting agency has determined to be lower priority based on their initial investigation.

(3) The failure of a law enforcement agency to submit a request for laboratory examination, or the failure of the Washington state patrol to facilitate laboratory examination, within the time periods prescribed under this section does not constitute grounds in any criminal proceeding for challenging the validity of a DNA evidence association, and any evidence obtained from the sexual assault ((examination)) kit may not be excluded by a court on those grounds.

(4) A person accused or convicted of committing a crime against a victim has no standing to object to any failure to comply with the requirements of this section, and the failure to comply with the requirements of this section is not grounds for setting aside the conviction or sentence.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to create a private right of action or claim on the part of any individual, entity, or agency against any law enforcement agency or any contractor of any law enforcement agency.

(6) This section applies prospectively only and not retroactively. It only applies to sexual assault examinations performed on or after July 24, 2015.

(7)(a) Until June 30, ((2018))2023, the Washington state patrol shall compile the following information related to the sexual assault ((examination)) kits identified in this section and section 7 of this act:

(i) The number of requests for laboratory examination made for sexual assault ((examination)) kits and the law enforcement agencies that submitted the requests; and

(ii) The progress made towards testing the sexual assault ((examination)) kits, including the status of requests for laboratory examination made by each law enforcement agency.

(b) The Washington state patrol shall make recommendations for increasing the progress on testing any untested sexual assault ((examination)) kits.

(c) Beginning in 2015, the Washington state patrol shall report its findings and recommendations annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 70.125 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Law enforcement agencies shall submit requests for forensic analysis of all sexual assault kits collected prior to July 24, 2015, and in the possession of the agencies to the Washington state patrol crime laboratory by October 1, 2019, except submission for forensic analysis is not required when: (a) Forensic analysis has previously been conducted; (b) there is documentation of an adult victim or emancipated minor victim expressing that he or she does not want his or her sexual assault kit submitted for forensic analysis; or (c) a sexual assault kit is noninvestigatory and held by a law enforcement agency pursuant to an agreement with a hospital or other medical provider. The requirements of this subsection apply regardless of the statute of limitations or the status of any related investigation.

(2) The Washington state patrol crime laboratory may consult with local law enforcement agencies to coordinate the efficient submission of requests for forensic analysis under this section in conjunction with the implementation of the statewide tracking system under RCW 43.43.545, provided that all requests are submitted and all required information is entered into the statewide sexual assault tracking system by October 1, 2019. The Washington state patrol crime laboratory shall facilitate the forensic analysis of all sexual assault kits submitted under this section by December 1, 2021. The analysis may be conducted by the Washington state patrol laboratory or an accredited laboratory holding a contract or agreement with the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol shall process the forensic analysis of sexual assault kits in accordance with the priorities in RCW 70.125.090(2).

(3) The failure of a law enforcement agency to submit a request for laboratory examination within the time prescribed under this section does not constitute grounds in any criminal proceeding for challenging the validity of a DNA evidence association, and any evidence obtained from the sexual assault kit may not be excluded by a court on those grounds.

(4) A person accused or convicted of committing a crime against a victim has no standing to object to any failure to comply with the requirements of this section, and the failure to comply with the requirements of this section is not grounds for setting aside the conviction or sentence.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to create a private right of action or claim on the part of any individual, entity, or agency against any law enforcement agency or any contractor of any law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 70.125 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning on the effective date of this section, untested sexual assault kits may not be disposed of or otherwise destroyed, and must be adequately preserved for the purpose of forensic analysis and potential use in criminal investigations.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, unreported sexual assault kits collected prior to the effective date of this section must be stored by the entity responsible for the collection or its designee.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, unreported sexual assault kits collected on or after the effective date of this section must be transferred to and stored by the Washington state patrol crime laboratory or its designee.

(4) In lieu of the storage requirements under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, a collecting entity may enter into an agreement with a local law enforcement agency or other third party for the storage of unreported sexual assault kits.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Unreported sexual assault kit" means a sexual assault kit collected from a victim who has consented to the collection of the sexual assault kit but who has not reported the alleged crime to law enforcement.

(b) "Untested sexual assault kit" means a sexual assault kit that has not been submitted for forensic analysis to a forensic laboratory with combined DNA index system-eligible DNA methodologies. "Untested sexual assault kits" include unreported sexual assault kits as well as any untested sexual assault kits associated with a criminal report or investigation.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 70.125 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all other rights provided in law, a sexual assault survivor has the right to:

(a) Receive a medical forensic examination at no cost;

(b) Consult with a sexual assault survivor's advocate during any medical evidentiary examination and during any interview by law enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, or defense attorneys, unless an advocate cannot be summoned in a timely manner, and regardless of whether a survivor has waived the right in a previous examination or interview;

(c) Be informed, upon the request of a survivor, of when the forensic analysis of his or her sexual assault kit and other related physical evidence will be or was completed, the results of the forensic analysis, and whether the analysis yielded a DNA profile and match, provided that the disclosure is made at an appropriate time so as to not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation;

(d) Receive notice prior to the destruction or disposal of his or her sexual assault kit;

(e) Receive a copy of the police report related to the investigation without charge; and

(f) Review his or her statement before law enforcement refers a case to the prosecuting attorney.

(2) A sexual assault survivor retains all the rights of this section regardless of whether the survivor agrees to participate in the criminal justice system and regardless of whether the survivor agrees to receive a forensic examination to collect evidence.

(3) If a survivor is denied any right enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, he or she may seek an order directing compliance by the relevant party or parties by filing a petition in the superior court in the county in which the sexual assault occurred and providing notice of such petition to the relevant party or parties. Compliance with the right is the sole remedy available to the survivor. The court shall expedite consideration of a petition filed under this subsection.

(4) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to provide grounds for error in favor of a criminal defendant in a criminal proceeding. Except in the circumstances as provided in subsection (3) of this section, this section does not grant a new cause of action or remedy against the state, its political subdivisions, law enforcement agencies, or prosecuting attorneys. The failure of a person to make a reasonable effort to protect or adhere to the rights enumerated in this section may not result in civil liability against that person. This section does not limit other civil remedies or defenses of the sexual assault survivor or the offender.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or any person employed by a private police agency at a public school as described in RCW 28A.150.010 or an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(b) "Sexual assault survivor" means any person who is a victim, as defined in RCW 7.69.020, of sexual assault. However, if a victim is incapacitated, deceased, or a minor, sexual assault survivor also includes any lawful representative of the victim, including a parent, guardian, spouse, or other designated representative, unless the person is an alleged perpetrator or suspect.

(c) "Sexual assault survivor's advocate" means any person who is defined in RCW 5.60.060 as a sexual assault advocate, or a crime victim advocate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 1 of this act is added to chapter 43.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 1, 2, and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---