BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.300.490 (Task force on gangs in schools—Reports) and 2007 c 406 s 2;

(2) RCW 28A.205.010 ("Education center," "basic academic skills," defined—Certification as education center and withdrawal of certification) and 2006 c 263 s 408, 2005 c 497 s 214, 1999 c 348 s 2, 1993 c 211 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 180, 1983 c 3 s 38, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.205.020 (Common school dropouts—Reimbursement) and 1999 c 348 s 3, 1997 c 265 s 7, 1993 c 211 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 181, 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 2;

(4) RCW 28A.205.030 (Reentry of prior dropouts into common schools, rules—Eligibility for test to earn a high school equivalency certificate) and 2013 c 39 s 6;

(5) RCW 28A.205.040 (Fees—Rules—Priority for payment—Review of records) and 2013 c 39 s 7, 2006 c 263 s 412, 1999 c 348 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 183, 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 2, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 4;

(6) RCW 28A.205.050 (Rules) and 2005 c 497 s 215, 1995 c 335 s 201, 1993 c 211 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 184, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 5;

(7) RCW 28A.205.070 (Allocation of funds—Criteria—Duties of superintendent) and 2006 c 263 s 409, 1993 c 211 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 185, & 1985 c 434 s 3;

(8) RCW 28A.205.080 (Legislative findings—Distribution of funds—Cooperation with school districts) and 1997 c 265 s 8, 1993 c 211 s 7, 1990 c 33 s 186, & 1987 c 518 s 220; and

(9) RCW 28A.205.090 (Inclusion of education centers program in biennial budget request—Quarterly plans—Funds—Payment) and 1993 c 211 s 8, 1990 c 33 s 187, & 1985 c 434 s 4.

--- END ---