BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 15, 2020, the department of transportation must recommend performance measure options for Washington state ferries consistent with subsection (2) of this section to the house and senate transportation committees for review.

(2) Focusing on the themes of the just completed 2040 Washington state ferries long-range plan, the recommended measures must be focused on assisting the governor, the legislature, and the public in understanding Washington state ferries' performance in reliable service, customer experience, managing growth, and sustainability and resilience. The measures must also consider recommendations detailed in the University of Washington's study addressing "Improving Loading, Ticketing, and Community Relations for the Washington State Ferries' Triangle Route" report to the legislature.

(3) When developing a list of possible performance measures, the department of transportation must consult with ferry advisory committees, employees, commuters, elected officials, transit experts, long-range plan technical advisory group members, and members of the public.

--- END ---