BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

Under federal law as it exists on the effective date of this section, states are not permitted to observe daylight saving time year round. If the United States congress amends federal law to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year round, the legislature intends that Washington state make daylight saving time the permanent time of the state and all of its political subdivisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The time of the state of Washington and all of its political subdivisions is Pacific daylight time throughout the calendar year, as determined by reference to coordinated universal time.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.21.190 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.190 are each amended to read as follows:

No code city shall adopt any provision for the observance of daylight saving time other than as authorized by ((RCW 1.20.050 and 1.20.051))section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 1.20.050 (Standard time—Daylight saving time) and 1953 c 2 s 1;

(2) RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 2018 c 22 s 2, 1963 c 14 s 1, & 1961 c 3 s 1; and

(3) RCW 1.20.--- and 2019 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) Sections 2 through 4 of this at take effect on the first Sunday in November following the effective date of federal authorization to observe daylight saving time year-round, except if the effective date of federal authorization to observe daylight saving time year-round occurs on or after October 1st but before the first Sunday in November, sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect on the first Sunday in November in the following year.

(2) The governor shall provide written notice of the effective date of sections 2 through 4 of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the governor.

--- END ---