BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.540 and 2018 c 201 s 7019 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to remove barriers to employment for individuals with disabilities by providing medical assistance to working individuals with disabilities through a buy-in program in accordance with section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act and eligibility and cost-sharing requirements established by the authority.

(2) The authority shall establish ((income, resource, and)) cost-sharing requirements for the buy-in program in accordance with federal law and any conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The authority shall establish and modify eligibility and cost-sharing requirements in order to administer the program within available funds. The authority may consider a person's income when establishing cost-sharing requirements. The authority may not establish eligibility restrictions for the buy-in program based upon a person's income or maximum age. The authority shall make every effort to coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the working individuals with disabilities receiving benefits under this chapter or other applicable law.

(3) The authority shall seek federal approval to exclude resources accumulated in a separate account that results from earnings during an individual's enrollment in the buy-in program when determining the individual's subsequent eligibility for another medical assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---