BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers the loss or theft of the firearm shall report the facts and circumstances of the loss or theft to the local law enforcement agency where the loss or theft occurred within five days after the person first discovered the loss or theft. The report must include, to the extent known: The firearm's caliber, make, model, manufacturer, and serial number; any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the firearm; and the circumstances of the loss or theft, including the date, place, and manner.

(2) A law enforcement agency that receives a report of a lost or stolen firearm shall enter the following information, to the extent known, into the national crime information center database:

(a) The firearm's caliber, make, model, manufacturer, and serial number; and

(b) Any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the firearm.

(3) A person who fails to report a lost or stolen firearm in violation of this section is subject to the following penalties:

(a) For a first offense, the person commits a civil infraction and is subject to a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars;

(b) For a second offense, the person commits a civil infraction and is subject to a penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars; and

(c) For a third or subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---