BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the growth management planning requirements established in chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth management act, create compliance costs that are a significant burden to taxpayers and inappropriate redirection of limited financial resources away from essential local government functions. The legislature finds also that the growth management act creates unfunded mandates for counties and cities facing numerous fiscal challenges.

The legislature further finds that local governments have sufficient expertise and ability to make thoughtful land use and planning decisions that are consistent with local needs and preferences, and that a state-directed approach to land use and planning disregards the insight and responsiveness that can only be accessed through local decision makers. The legislature, therefore, intends to repeal chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth management act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 36.70A.010 (Legislative findings) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1;

(2) RCW 36.70A.011 (Findings—Rural lands) and 2002 c 212 s 1;

(3) RCW 36.70A.020 (Planning goals) and 2002 c 154 s 1 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 2;

(4) RCW 36.70A.030 (Definitions) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 18 s 2 & 2012 c 21 s 1;

(5) RCW 36.70A.035 (Public participation—Notice provisions) and 2015 c 25 s 1, 1999 c 315 s 708, & 1997 c 429 s 9;

(6) RCW 36.70A.040 (Who must plan—Summary of requirements—Resolution for partial planning—Development regulations must implement comprehensive plans) and 2014 c 147 s 1, 2000 c 36 s 1, 1998 c 171 s 1, 1995 c 400 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 1, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 4;

(7) RCW 36.70A.045 (Phasing of comprehensive plan submittal) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 15;

(8) RCW 36.70A.050 (Guidelines to classify agriculture, forest, and mineral lands and critical areas) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 5;

(9) RCW 36.70A.060 (Natural resource lands and critical areas—Development regulations) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 18 s 3, 2014 c 147 s 2, 2005 c 423 s 3, 1998 c 286 s 5, 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 21, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 6;

(10) RCW 36.70A.070 (Comprehensive plans—Mandatory elements) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 18 s 4, 2017 3rd sp.s. c 16 s 4, 2017 c 331 s 2, 2015 c 241 s 2, 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6, 2005 c 360 s 2, (2005 c 477 s 1 expired August 31, 2005), 2004 c 196 s 1, & 2003 c 152 s 1;

(11) RCW 36.70A.080 (Comprehensive plans—Optional elements) and 2011 c 318 s 801 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 8;

(12) RCW 36.70A.085 (Comprehensive plans—Port elements) and 2009 c 514 s 2;

(13) RCW 36.70A.090 (Comprehensive plans—Innovative techniques) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 9;

(14) RCW 36.70A.100 (Comprehensive plans—Must be coordinated) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 10;

(15) RCW 36.70A.103 (State agencies required to comply with comprehensive plans) and 2002 c 68 s 15, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 203, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 4;

(16) RCW 36.70A.106 (Comprehensive plans—Development regulations—Transmittal to state—Amendments—Expedited review) and 2004 c 197 s 1 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 8;

(17) RCW 36.70A.108 (Comprehensive plans—Transportation element—Multimodal transportation improvements and strategies) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 18 s 5 & 2005 c 328 s 1;

(18) RCW 36.70A.110 (Comprehensive plans—Urban growth areas) and 2017 c 305 s 1 & 2010 c 211 s 1;

(19) RCW 36.70A.115 (Comprehensive plans and development regulations must provide sufficient land capacity for development) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 16 s 1, 2009 c 121 s 3, & 2003 c 333 s 1;

(20) RCW 36.70A.120 (Planning activities and capital budget decisions—Implementation in conformity with comprehensive plan) and 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 12;

(21) RCW 36.70A.130 (Comprehensive plans—Review procedures and schedules—Amendments) and 2012 c 191 s 1;

(22) RCW 36.70A.131 (Mineral resource lands—Review of related designations and development regulations) and 1998 c 286 s 7;

(23) RCW 36.70A.140 (Comprehensive plans—Ensure public participation) and 1995 c 347 s 107 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 14;

(24) RCW 36.70A.150 (Identification of lands useful for public purposes) and 1991 c 322 s 23 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 15;

(25) RCW 36.70A.160 (Identification of open space corridors—Purchase authorized) and 1992 c 227 s 1 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 16;

(26) RCW 36.70A.165 (Property designated as greenbelt or open space—Not subject to adverse possession) and 1997 c 429 s 41;

(27) RCW 36.70A.170 (Natural resource lands and critical areas—Designations) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 17;

(28) RCW 36.70A.171 (Playing fields—Compliance with this chapter) and 2005 c 423 s 5;

(29) RCW 36.70A.172 (Critical areas—Designation and protection—Best available science to be used) and 2010 c 211 s 3 & 1995 c 347 s 105;

(30) RCW 36.70A.175 (Wetlands to be delineated in accordance with manual) and 1995 c 382 s 12;

(31) RCW 36.70A.177 (Agricultural lands—Innovative zoning techniques—Accessory uses) and 2006 c 147 s 1, 2004 c 207 s 1, & 1997 c 429 s 23;

(32) RCW 36.70A.180 (Chapter implementation—Intent) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 5 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 19;

(33) RCW 36.70A.190 (Technical assistance, procedural criteria, grants, and mediation services) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 20;

(34) RCW 36.70A.200 (Siting of essential public facilities—Limitation on liability) and 2013 c 275 s 5, 2011 c 60 s 17, 2010 c 62 s 1, 2002 c 68 s 2, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 205, 1998 c 171 s 3, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 1;

(35) RCW 36.70A.210 (Countywide planning policies) and 2009 c 121 s 2, 1998 c 171 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 28, 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 4, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 2;

(36) RCW 36.70A.211 (Siting of schools—Rural areas, when authorized—Impact fees) and 2017 c 129 s 2;

(37) RCW 36.70A.212 (Siting of schools—Periodic updates) and 2017 c 129 s 3;

(38) RCW 36.70A.213 (Extension of public facilities and utilities to serve school sited in a rural area authorized—Requirements for authorization—Report) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 32 s 1;

(39) RCW 36.70A.215 (Review and evaluation program) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 16 s 2, 2011 c 353 s 3, & 1997 c 429 s 25;

(40) RCW 36.70A.217 (Guidance for local governments on the review and evaluation program—Public participation—Analysis and recommendations) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 16 s 3;

(41) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings board—Creation—Members) and 2010 c 211 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 29, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;

(42) RCW 36.70A.252 (Growth management hearings board—Consolidation into environmental and land use hearings office) and 2010 c 210 s 15;

(43) RCW 36.70A.260 (Growth management hearings board—Regional panels) and 2010 c 211 s 5, 1994 c 249 s 30, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;

(44) RCW 36.70A.270 (Growth management hearings board—Conduct, procedure, and compensation) and 2010 c 211 s 6, 2010 c 210 s 16, 1997 c 429 s 11, 1996 c 325 s 1, 1994 c 257 s 1, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 7;

(45) RCW 36.70A.280 (Growth management hearings board—Matters subject to review) and 2014 c 147 s 3, 2011 c 360 s 17, 2010 c 211 s 7, 2008 c 289 s 5, 2003 c 332 s 2, 1996 c 325 s 2, 1995 c 347 s 108, 1994 c 249 s 31, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 9;

(46) RCW 36.70A.290 (Growth management hearings board—Petitions—Evidence) and 2011 c 277 s 1, 2010 c 211 s 8, 1997 c 429 s 12, & 1995 c 347 s 109;

(47) RCW 36.70A.295 (Growth management hearings board—Direct judicial review) and 2010 c 211 s 9 & 1997 c 429 s 13;

(48) RCW 36.70A.300 (Final orders) and 2013 c 275 s 1, 1997 c 429 s 14, 1995 c 347 s 110, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 11;

(49) RCW 36.70A.302 (Growth management hearings board—Determination of invalidity—Vesting of development permits—Interim controls) and 2010 c 211 s 10 & 1997 c 429 s 16;

(50) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and 1996 c 325 s 4;

(51) RCW 36.70A.310 (Growth management hearings board—Limitations on appeal by the state) and 2010 c 211 s 11, 1994 c 249 s 32, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 12;

(52) RCW 36.70A.320 (Presumption of validity—Burden of proof—Plans and regulations) and 1997 c 429 s 20, 1995 c 347 s 111, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 13;

(53) RCW 36.70A.3201 (Growth management hearings board—Legislative intent and finding) and 2010 c 211 s 12 & 1997 c 429 s 2;

(54) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 1997 c 429 s 21, 1995 c 347 s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14;

(55) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity issued before July 27, 1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22;

(56) RCW 36.70A.340 (Noncompliance and sanctions) and 2013 c 225 s 604, 2011 c 120 s 2, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 26;

(57) RCW 36.70A.345 (Sanctions) and 2010 c 211 s 13, 1994 c 249 s 33, & 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 5;

(58) RCW 36.70A.350 (New fully contained communities) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 16;

(59) RCW 36.70A.360 (Master planned resorts) and 1998 c 112 s 2 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 17;

(60) RCW 36.70A.362 (Master planned resorts—Existing resort may be included) and 1997 c 382 s 1;

(61) RCW 36.70A.365 (Major industrial developments) and 1995 c 190 s 1;

(62) RCW 36.70A.367 (Major industrial developments—Master planned locations) and 2014 c 149 s 1, 2007 c 433 s 1, 2004 c 208 s 1, 2003 c 88 s 1, 2002 c 306 s 1, 2001 c 326 s 1, 1998 c 289 s 2, 1997 c 402 s 1, & 1996 c 167 s 2;

(63) RCW 36.70A.368 (Major industrial developments—Master planned locations—Reclaimed surface coal mine sites) and 2007 c 194 s 1;

(64) RCW 36.70A.370 (Protection of private property) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 18;

(65) RCW 36.70A.380 (Extension of designation date) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 39;

(66) RCW 36.70A.385 (Environmental planning pilot projects) and 1998 c 245 s 30, 1995 c 399 s 43, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 20;

(67) RCW 36.70A.390 (Moratoria, interim zoning controls—Public hearing—Limitation on length—Exceptions) and 1992 c 207 s 6;

(68) RCW 36.70A.400 (Accessory apartments) and 1993 c 478 s 11;

(69) RCW 36.70A.410 (Treatment of residential structures occupied by persons with handicaps) and 1993 c 478 s 23;

(70) RCW 36.70A.420 (Transportation projects—Findings—Intent) and 1994 c 258 s 1;

(71) RCW 36.70A.430 (Transportation projects—Collaborative review process) and 1994 c 258 s 2;

(72) RCW 36.70A.450 (Family day-care provider's home facility—County or city may not prohibit in residential or commercial area—Conditions) and 2018 c 58 s 22, 2007 c 17 s 13, 2003 c 286 s 5, 1995 c 49 s 3, & 1994 c 273 s 17;

(73) RCW 36.70A.460 (Watershed restoration projects—Permit processing—Fish habitat enhancement project) and 2014 c 120 s 15, 2003 c 39 s 21, 1998 c 249 s 11, & 1995 c 378 s 11;

(74) RCW 36.70A.470 (Project review—Amendment suggestion procedure—Definitions) and 1995 c 347 s 102;

(75) RCW 36.70A.480 (Shorelines of the state) and 2010 c 107 s 2, 2003 c 321 s 5, & 1995 c 347 s 104;

(76) RCW 36.70A.481 (Construction—Chapter 347, Laws of 1995) and 1995 c 382 s 13;

(77) RCW 36.70A.490 (Growth management planning and environmental review fund—Established) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 309 & 1995 c 347 s 115;

(78) RCW 36.70A.500 (Growth management planning and environmental review fund—Awarding of grant or loan—Procedures) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 310, 1997 c 429 s 28, & 1995 c 347 s 116;

(79) RCW 36.70A.510 (General aviation airports) and 1996 c 239 s 5;

(80) RCW 36.70A.520 (National historic towns—Designation) and 2000 c 196 s 1;

(81) RCW 36.70A.530 (Land use development incompatible with military installation not allowed—Revision of comprehensive plans and development regulations) and 2004 c 28 s 2;

(82) RCW 36.70A.540 (Affordable housing incentive programs—Low-income housing units) and 2009 c 80 s 1 & 2006 c 149 s 2;

(83) RCW 36.70A.550 (Aquifer conservation zones) and 2007 c 159 s 1;

(84) RCW 36.70A.570 (Regulation of forest practices) and 2007 c 236 s 2;

(85) RCW 36.70A.590 (Complying with requirements relating to surface and groundwater resources) and 2018 c 1 s 102;

(86) RCW 36.70A.690 (On-site sewage system self-inspection) and 2017 c 105 s 1;

(87) RCW 36.70A.695 (Development regulations—Jurisdictions specified—Electric vehicle infrastructure) and 2009 c 459 s 12;

(88) RCW 36.70A.700 (Purpose—Intent—2011 c 360) and 2011 c 360 s 1;

(89) RCW 36.70A.702 (Construction) and 2011 c 360 s 15;

(90) RCW 36.70A.703 (Definitions) and 2011 c 360 s 2;

(91) RCW 36.70A.705 (Voluntary stewardship program established—Administered by commission—Agency participation) and 2011 c 360 s 3;

(92) RCW 36.70A.710 (Critical areas protection—Alternative to RCW 36.70A.060—County's responsibilities—Procedures) and 2011 c 360 s 4;

(93) RCW 36.70A.715 (Funding by commission—County's duties—Watershed group established) and 2011 c 360 s 5;

(94) RCW 36.70A.720 (Watershed group's duties—Work plan—Conditional priority funding) and 2011 c 360 s 6;

(95) RCW 36.70A.725 (Technical review of work plan—Time frame for action by director) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 961 & 2011 c 360 s 7;

(96) RCW 36.70A.730 (Report by watershed group—Director consults with statewide advisory committee) and 2011 c 360 s 8;

(97) RCW 36.70A.735 (When work plan is not approved, fails, or is unfunded—County's duties—Rules) and 2011 c 360 s 9;

(98) RCW 36.70A.740 (Commission's duties—Timelines) and 2011 c 360 s 10;

(99) RCW 36.70A.745 (Statewide advisory committee—Membership) and 2011 c 360 s 11;

(100) RCW 36.70A.750 (Agricultural operators—Individual stewardship plan) and 2011 c 360 s 12;

(101) RCW 36.70A.755 (Implementing the work plan) and 2011 c 360 s 13;

(102) RCW 36.70A.760 (Agricultural operators—Withdrawal from program) and 2011 c 360 s 14;

(103) RCW 36.70A.800 (Role of growth strategies commission) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 86;

(104) RCW 36.70A.900 (Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 17) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 88;

(105) RCW 36.70A.901 (Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 89;

(106) RCW 36.70A.902 (Section headings not law—1991 sp.s. c 32) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 40;

(107) RCW 36.70A.903 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions) and 2010 c 210 s 43; and

(108) RCW 36.70A.904 (Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 360) and 2011 c 360 s 21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The department of commerce shall prepare recommendations, in the form of draft legislation, to modify or repeal statutory provisions associated with chapter 36.70A RCW that are affected by the repeal of chapter 36.70A RCW. The recommendations required by this section must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2019.

--- END ---