BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.480 and 2016 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon written application and department verification, a combination fishing license shall be issued at the reduced rate of five dollars and all hunting licenses shall be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(a) A resident sixty-five years old or older who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having a service-connected disability; and

(b) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces with a thirty percent or more service-connected disability((;

(c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;

(d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and

(e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice in this state)).

(2) Upon written application and department verification of eligibility, fishing and hunting licenses defined by the department by rule must be issued at the reduced rate of fifty percent of the price of a resident license to a resident with a permanent disability documented by a physician, physician's assistant, or registered nurse practitioner.

(3) Upon written application and department verification ((of eligibility)), a nonstate resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(((3)))(4) Upon written application and department verification, the following recreational hunting licenses must be issued at no cost to a resident member of the state guard or national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, as long as the state guard or national guard member is: An active full-time state guard or national guard employee; or a state guard or national guard member whose status requires the state guard or national guard member to participate in drill training on a part-time basis:

(a) A small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1);

(b) A supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350; and

(c) A big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450 (1) and (2).

--- END ---