BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.331 and 2017 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial evaluation of the applications timely received.

(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and a criminal history record information check. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (10) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority must be adopted by rule.

(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection and in section 2 of this act, no license of any kind may be issued to:

(i) A person under the age of twenty-one years;

(ii) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least six months prior to applying to receive a license;

(iii) A ((partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation))business or nonprofit entity unless formed under the laws of this state((,)) and, except as provided in (d) of this subsection, unless all of the ((members thereof))interest holders are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section and have lawfully resided in the state for at least six months before applying to receive a license; or

(iv) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.

(c) Pursuant to section 2 of this act, a person or business or nonprofit entity that does not meet the requirements of (b) of this subsection may be eligible for a marijuana license in certain circumstances.

(d)(i) For any marijuana license issued by the board, all natural persons holding an ownership interest of more than ten percent of the business or nonprofit entity licensed or proposed to be licensed must qualify for and be named on the license. If no natural person owns more than ten percent of the entity, the natural person with the largest ownership interest must qualify for and be named on the license. Officers and directors must possess the same qualifications as the licensee. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any natural person holding an ownership interest of ten percent or less of the entity is not required to qualify for or be named on the license. For licensees with labor peace agreements in effect as provided in section 2 of this act, a natural person who is not required to qualify for or be named on the license is not required to be a resident of Washington state. For licensees without labor peace agreements in effect, all natural persons who own any interest in the entity must be residents of this state and natural persons who own interests of more than ten percent of the entity must meet all other requirements and qualifications in this section and chapter.

(ii) The identification of any natural person holding an ownership interest of ten percent or less but more than one percent of the entity, who is not otherwise required to qualify for and be named on the license as provided in (d)(i) of this subsection, must be disclosed to the board.

(2)(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, researching, or selling marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under rules ((and regulations)) the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses must be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board or a subpoena issued by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, compels obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(f) In accordance with section 2 of this act, the board shall suspend, cancel, or revoke the license of an establishment for which the board determines there is no longer a labor peace agreement in effect and for which a labor peace agreement is required under section 2 of this act.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board. Where the license has been suspended only, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under this chapter is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this chapter or by rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to implement and enforce this chapter. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board in the issuance of an individual license must be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee may employ any person under the age of twenty-one years.

(7)(a) Before the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it must give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns, or to the tribal government if the application is for a license within Indian country, or to the port authority if the application for a license is located on property owned by a port authority.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, the tribal government, or port authority has the right to file with the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may extend the time period for submitting written objections upon request from the authority notified by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

(c) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, ((state liquor and cannabis)) board representatives must present and defend the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not issue a license for any premises within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that such distance reduction will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health.

(c) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of research premises allowed under RCW 69.50.372 within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that the ordinance will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement, public safety, or public health.

(d) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may license premises located in compliance with the distance requirements set in an ordinance adopted under (b) or (c) of this subsection. Before issuing or renewing a research license for premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of an elementary school, secondary school, or playground in compliance with an ordinance passed pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the board must ensure that the facility:

(i) Meets a security standard exceeding that which applies to marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensees;

(ii) Is inaccessible to the public and no part of the operation of the facility is in view of the general public; and

(iii) Bears no advertising or signage indicating that it is a marijuana research facility.

(e) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not issue a license for any premises within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation, without the consent of the federally recognized tribe associated with the reservation or Indian country.

(9) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting a marijuana producer or marijuana processor from operating or locating a business within areas zoned primarily for residential use or rural use with a minimum lot size of five acres or smaller.

(10) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises.

(11) Nothing in this chapter prevents an interest in a business with a marijuana producer, processor, retailer, or transportation license from transferring, upon the death or incapacity of the owner, to an heir or assign of the owner in accordance with the uniform transfers to minors act, chapter 11.114 RCW, or otherwise, even if the heir or assign is under age twenty-one.

(12) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Chronic illegal activity" means (((a))):

(i) A pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (((b)))

(ii) An unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

(b) "Entity" has the meaning provided in RCW 23.95.105.

(c) "Interest" has the meaning provided in RCW 23.95.105.

(d) "Interest holder" has the meaning provided in RCW 23.95.105.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In accordance with RCW 69.50.331, 69.50.325, and 69.50.342, a licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer or an applicant for such a license, shall submit to the board an attestation signed by a bona fide labor organization stating the licensee or applicant has entered into a labor peace agreement with the bona fide labor organization, if the licensee or applicant:

(a) Is not formed under the laws of this state or not all interest holders who must qualify for the license have lawfully resided in the state for longer than six months before applying for the license;

(b) Is an applicant for a marijuana retailer license who, if the license is issued, would hold more than a collective total of five marijuana retailer licenses but not more than a collective total of seven marijuana retailer licenses as provided in RCW 69.50.325(3); or

(c) Is an applicant for a marijuana producer or marijuana processor license who, if the license is issued, would collectively hold more marijuana producer or marijuana processor licenses than any limit established under board rules for marijuana producers or marijuana processors without labor peace agreements in effect, as provided in RCW 69.50.325 and 69.50.342(3).

(2) The board may issue a conditional license to an applicant who has not fully complied with this section, provided that compliance with this section is required for an applicant to receive final license approval, and an applicant must meet all other license requirements established in this chapter.

(3) For an applicant or licensee relying on the authorization in this section:

(a) The submission of the attestation and the maintenance of a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization is an ongoing material condition of the establishment's license; and

(b) In accordance with RCW 69.50.331, the board shall suspend, cancel, or revoke the license of an establishment for which the board determines there is no longer a labor peace agreement in effect.

(4) The board may impose additional licensing fees to recover any additional costs incurred in investigating any nonresident required to be investigated under this section and RCW 69.50.331. If, after reasonable efforts, the board is unable to investigate any nonresident required to be investigated under this section and RCW 69.50.331, in accordance with the investigatory standards applicable to the investigation of a state resident, the board may deny a license or license renewal to an entity.

(5) Any business entity or nonprofit entity not formed under Washington state law must hold a certificate of registration under chapter 23.95 RCW to be eligible for a marijuana license under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.325 and 2018 c 132 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There shall be a marijuana producer's license regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The licensee is authorized to produce: (a) Marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers; (b) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250; and (c) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to qualifying patients and designated providers as provided under RCW 69.51A.310. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana producer's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer intends to produce marijuana.

(b) In accordance with RCW 69.50.342(3) and section 2 of this act, if the board adopts rules limiting the collective number of marijuana producer or marijuana processor licenses that an individual marijuana producer or marijuana processor licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license are limited, in the aggregate, to holding, then the board's rules must provide an exemption for individual marijuana producer or marijuana processor licensees that have in effect a labor peace agreement to allow these licensees to hold up to two more marijuana producer or processor licenses than would otherwise be allowed under rule.

(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process, package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, and marijuana concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana. Subsection (1)(b) of this section applies to marijuana processors.

(3)(a) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, an individual retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license are limited, in the aggregate, to holding a collective total of not more than five retail marijuana licenses.

(ii) Not more than a collective total of seven marijuana retailer licenses may be held by an individual retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license, if each marijuana retailer establishment is covered by a labor peace agreement as provided in section 2 of this act.

(c)(i) A marijuana retailer's license is subject to forfeiture in accordance with rules adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board pursuant to this section.

(ii) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall adopt rules to establish a license forfeiture process for a licensed marijuana retailer that is not fully operational and open to the public within a specified period from the date of license issuance, as established by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, subject to the following restrictions:

(A) No marijuana retailer's license may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine months of license issuance; and

(B) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require license forfeiture on or before twenty-four calendar months of license issuance if a marijuana retailer is not fully operational and open to the public, unless the board determines that circumstances out of the licensee's control are preventing the licensee from becoming fully operational and that, in the board's discretion, the circumstances warrant extending the forfeiture period beyond twenty-four calendar months.

(iii) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board has discretion in adopting rules under this subsection (3)(c).

(iv) This subsection (3)(c) applies to marijuana retailer's licenses issued before and after July 23, 2017. However, no license of a marijuana retailer that otherwise meets the conditions for license forfeiture established pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine calendar months of July 23, 2017.

(v) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may not require license forfeiture if the licensee has been incapable of opening a fully operational retail marijuana business due to actions by the city, town, or county with jurisdiction over the licensee that include any of the following:

(A) The adoption of a ban or moratorium that prohibits the opening of a retail marijuana business; or

(B) The adoption of an ordinance or regulation related to zoning, business licensing, land use, or other regulatory measure that has the effect of preventing a licensee from receiving an occupancy permit from the jurisdiction or which otherwise prevents a licensed marijuana retailer from becoming operational.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.342 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 according to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, ((the state liquor and cannabis))and except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the board may adopt rules not inconsistent with the spirit of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 as are deemed necessary or advisable. Without limiting the generality of the preceding sentence, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board is empowered to adopt rules regarding the following:

(a) The equipment and management of retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed, and inspection of the retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed;

(b) The books and records to be created and maintained by licensees, the reports to be made thereon to the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, and inspection of the books and records;

(c) Methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; safe handling requirements; approved pesticides and pesticide testing requirements; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(d) Security requirements for retail outlets and premises where marijuana is produced or processed, and safety protocols for licensees and their employees;

(e) Screening, hiring, training, and supervising employees of licensees;

(f) Retail outlet locations and hours of operation;

(g) Labeling requirements and restrictions on advertisement of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, cannabis health and beauty aids, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets;

(h) Forms to be used for purposes of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW or the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, the terms and conditions to be contained in licenses issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, and the qualifications for receiving a license issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, including a criminal history record information check. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may submit any criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;

(i) Application, reinstatement, and renewal fees for licenses issued under this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW, and fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the rules adopted to implement and enforce this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW;

(j) The manner of giving and serving notices required by this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW or rules adopted to implement or enforce these chapters;

(k) Times and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state; and

(l) Identification, seizure, confiscation, destruction, or donation to law enforcement for training purposes of all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or chapter 69.51A RCW or the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters.

(2) Rules adopted on retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements must be adopted in coordination and consultation with the department.

(3)(a) No rule may:

(i) Limit the number of marijuana retailer licenses that an individual retail licensee and other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license may hold in the aggregate, in a manner contrary to RCW 69.50.325(3);

(ii) Limit the number of marijuana producer or marijuana processor licenses that an individual marijuana producer or marijuana processor licensee and other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license may hold in the aggregate, in a manner contrary to RCW 69.50.325 (1) and (2); or

(iii) Require a person or interest holder to be a resident of this state or require a business or nonprofit entity to be formed under the laws of this state for the person or entity to qualify for a marijuana producer, marijuana processor, or marijuana retailer license, if the person or entity has in effect a labor peace agreement covering each licensed establishment as provided in section 2 of this act.

(b) This subsection (3) does not limit the application of RCW 69.50.345(2).

Sec. 5. RCW 69.50.101 and 2018 c 132 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(e) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(f) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(g)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(i) "Department" means the department of health.

(j) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(k) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(l) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(m) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(n) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(o) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(p) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(q) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(r) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(s) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(t) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (ff)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(u) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(v) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(w) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(x) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) Industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(y) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(z) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(aa) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(bb) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(cc) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(dd) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ee) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (x) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(ff) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(gg) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(hh) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(ii) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(jj) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(kk) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(ll) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(mm) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(nn) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(oo) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(pp) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(qq) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(rr) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(ss) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(tt) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(uu) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(vv) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

(ww) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

(xx) "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between an employer and a bona fide labor organization in which the employer agrees to remain neutral or otherwise agrees to work with or provide information to the bona fide labor organization for the purpose of unionizing employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---