BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.075 and 2011 c 60 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:

(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not less than six months;

(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the department;

(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;

(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night, during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at the time of the application for the intermediate license;

(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic violation within the last six months before the application for the intermediate license; and

(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction permit.

(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17A.005. For the remaining period of the intermediate license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three passengers who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's immediate family.

(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at least twenty-five years of age.

(4)(a) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a moving motor vehicle while using a wireless communications device unless the holder is using the device to report illegal activity, summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person or property.

(b) An offense under this subsection is subject to two times the penalty amount under RCW 46.63.110 when it occurs within a school, playground, or crosswalk speed zone, created under RCW 46.61.440, and visible signage is posted in accordance with RCW 46.61.672(4)(b).

(c) Fifty percent of the moneys collected under this subsection must be deposited into the school zone safety account.

(5) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed under this section.

(6) Except for a violation of subsection (4) of this section, enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.

(7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary for agricultural purposes.

(8) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license, he or she:

(a) Has not been involved in an accident involving only one motor vehicle;

(b) Has not been involved in an accident where he or she was cited in connection with the accident or was found to have caused the accident;

(c) Has not been involved in an accident where no one was cited or was found to have caused the accident; and

(d) Has not been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed on an intermediate licensee under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.672 and 2017 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who uses a personal electronic device while driving a motor vehicle on a public highway is guilty of a traffic infraction and must pay a fine as provided in RCW 46.63.110(3).

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) A driver who is using a personal electronic device to contact emergency services;

(b) The use of a system by a transit system employee for time-sensitive relay communication between the transit system employee and the transit system's dispatch services;

(c) An individual employed as a commercial motor vehicle driver who uses a personal electronic device within the scope of such individual's employment if such use is permitted under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 31136 as it existed on July 23, 2017; and

(d) A person operating an authorized emergency vehicle.

(3) The state preempts the field of regulating the use of personal electronic devices in motor vehicles while driving, and this section supersedes any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations enacted by any political subdivision or municipality to regulate the use of a personal electronic device by the operator of a motor vehicle.

(4)(a) A first offense under this section is subject to two times the penalty amount under RCW 46.63.110 when it occurs within a school, playground, or crosswalk speed zone, created under RCW 46.61.440, and visible signage is posted in accordance with (b) of this subsection.

(b) For the increased monetary penalties under RCW 46.20.075(4)(b) and (a) of this subsection to apply, motorists must be informed of the doubling of penalties for violations of RCW 46.20.075(4)(b) and (a) of this subsection within a school, playground, or crosswalk speed zone through the use of "fines double" signage that is posted in compliance with the uniform state standards adopted and designated by the department under RCW 47.36.030.

(c) Fifty percent of the moneys collected under this subsection must be deposited into the school zone safety account.

(5) A second or subsequent offense under this section is subject to two times the penalty amount under RCW 46.63.110.

(((5)))(6) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Driving" means to operate a motor vehicle on a public highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other momentary delays. "Driving" does not include when the vehicle has pulled over to the side of, or off of, an active roadway and has stopped in a location where it can safely remain stationary.

(b) "Personal electronic device" means any portable electronic device that is capable of wireless communication or electronic data retrieval and is not manufactured primarily for hands-free use in a motor vehicle. "Personal electronic device" includes, but is not limited to, a cell phone, tablet, laptop, two-way messaging device, or electronic game. "Personal electronic device" does not include two-way radio, citizens band radio, or amateur radio equipment.

(c) "Use" or "uses" means:

(i) Holding a personal electronic device in either hand or both hands;

(ii) Using your hand or finger to compose, send, read, view, access, browse, transmit, save, or retrieve email, text messages, instant messages, photographs, or other electronic data; however, this does not preclude the minimal use of a finger to activate, deactivate, or initiate a function of the device; or

(iii) Watching video on a personal electronic device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect October 1, 2020.

--- END ---