BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.04.071 and 2018 c 60 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bicycle" means every device propelled solely by human power, or an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in RCW 46.04.169, upon which a person or persons may ride, having two tandem wheels either of which is sixteen inches or more in diameter, or three wheels, any one of which is ((more than)) twenty inches or more in diameter.

--- END ---