BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.071 and 2005 c 369 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature recognizes that some individuals in this state ((are problem or pathological gamblers))have a gambling problem or gambling disorder. Because the state promotes and regulates gambling through the activities of the state lottery commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the Washington state gambling commission, the state has the responsibility to continue to provide resources for the support of services for problem gambling and ((pathological gamblers))gambling disorders. ((Therefore,))

(b) The Washington state gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission shall jointly develop problem gambling and gambling disorder informational signs ((concerning problem and pathological gambling)) which include a toll-free hotline number for individuals with a gambling problem ((and pathological gamblers))or gambling disorder. The signs shall be placed in the establishments of gambling licensees, horse racing licensees, and lottery retailers. ((In addition,))

(c) The Washington state gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission may also contract with other qualified entities to provide public awareness, training, and other services to ensure the intent of this section is fulfilled.

(d) Individuals and families impacted by a gambling problem or gambling disorder will benefit from the availability of a uniform self-exclusion program where people may voluntarily exclude themselves from gambling at multiple gambling establishments by submitting one self-exclusion form to the state from one location for all gambling activities. Therefore, the Washington state gambling commission must establish a statewide self-exclusion program for all licensees. The commission has discretion in establishing the scope, process, and requirements of the self-exclusion program, including denying, suspending, or revoking an application, license, or permit. However, the initial program must comply with the following minimum requirements:

(i) The program must allow persons to voluntarily exclude themselves from gambling at authorized gambling establishments that offer house-banked social card games;

(ii) The program must have a process for federally recognized Indian tribes or tribal enterprises that own gambling operations or facilities with class III gaming compacts to voluntarily participate in the self-exclusion program;

(iii) Any individual registered with the self-exclusion program created under this section is prohibited from participating in gambling activities associated with this program and forfeits all moneys and things of value obtained by the individual or owed to the individual by an authorized gambling establishment as a result of prohibited wagers or gambling activities. The commission may adopt rules for the forfeiture of any moneys or things of value, including wagers, obtained by an authorized gambling establishment while an individual is registered with the self-exclusion program created under this section.

Moneys and things of value forfeited under the self-exclusion program must be distributed to the problem gambling account created in RCW 41.05.751 and/or a charitable or nonprofit organization that provides problem gambling services or increases awareness about problem gambling pursuant to rules adopted by the commission; and

(iv) The commission must adopt rules establishing the self-exclusion program by June 30, 2021.

(e) An individual who participates in the self-exclusion program does not have a cause of action against the state of Washington, the commission, or any gambling establishment, its employees, or officers for any acts or omissions in processing or enforcing the requirements of the self-exclusion program, including a failure to prevent an individual from gambling at an authorized gambling establishment.

(f) Any personal information collected, stored, or accessed under the self-exclusion program may only be used for the administration of the self-exclusion program and may not be disseminated for any purpose other than the administration of the self-exclusion program.

(2)(a) During any period in which RCW 82.04.285(2) is in effect, the commission may not increase fees payable by licensees under its jurisdiction for the purpose of funding services for problem gambling and ((pathological)) gambling disorder. Any fee imposed or increased by the commission, for the purpose of funding these services, before July 1, 2005, ((shall have))has no force and effect after July 1, 2005.

(b) During any period in which RCW 82.04.285(2) is not in effect:

(i) The commission, the Washington state horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission may contract for services, in addition to those authorized in subsection (1) of this section, to assist in providing for problem gambling and gambling disorder treatment ((of problem and pathological gambling)); and

(ii) The commission may increase fees payable by ((licenses [licensees]))licensees under its jurisdiction for the purpose of funding the problem gambling and gambling disorder services authorized in this section ((for problem and pathological gamblers)).

Sec. 2. RCW 42.56.230 and 2018 c 109 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following personal information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;

(2)(a) Personal information:

(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files maintained by the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs; or

(iii) For the family members or guardians of a child who is subject to the exemption under this subsection (2) if the family member or guardian has the same last name as the child or if the family member or guardian resides at the same address as the child and disclosure of the family member's or guardian's information would result in disclosure of the personal information exempted under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;

(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;

(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;

(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by other law;

(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093;

(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address, social security number, or other personal information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.

(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work, public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW 46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.

(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse;

(8) All information related to individual claims resolution structured settlement agreements submitted to the board of industrial insurance appeals under RCW 51.04.063, other than final orders from the board of industrial insurance appeals.

Upon request by the legislature, the department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of the information in subsection (7)(c) and (d) of this section that is subject to public disclosure;

(9) Voluntarily submitted information contained in a database that is part of or associated with enhanced 911 emergency communications systems, or information contained or used in emergency notification systems as provided under RCW 38.52.575 and 38.52.577; ((and))

(10) Until the person reaches eighteen years of age, information, otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW, that relates to a future voter, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots

(11) All information submitted by a person to the state, either directly or through a state-licensed gambling establishment, or Indian tribes, or tribal enterprises that own gambling operations or facilities with class III gaming compacts, as part of the self-exclusion program established in RCW 9.46.071 or 67.70.040 for people with a gambling problem or gambling disorder.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except as limited by (a) of this subsection;

(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;

(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;

(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or shares may be sold;

(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as limited by (a) of this subsection;

(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a winning ticket.

(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems necessary or desirable.

(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the operation and administration of the lottery.

(5)(a) By June 30, 2021, to adopt rules to establish a program allowing a person to voluntarily exclude themselves from lottery activities including, but not limited to:

(i) Enrolling in a player loyalty or reward program operated or maintained by the lottery;

(ii) Entering or winning any second chance lottery promotion; and

(iii) Claiming or receiving from the lottery any monetary, promotional, or merchandise prize valued at more than six hundred dollars. Monetary prizes valued at more than six hundred dollars must be transferred to the problem gambling account created in RCW 41.05.751 after payment of any debts pursuant to RCW 67.70.255. Promotional and merchandise prizes valued at more than six hundred dollars must be retained by the lottery.

(b) An individual who participates in the self-exclusion program does not have a cause of action against the state of Washington, the commission, or any licensed retailer, its employees, or officers for any acts or omissions in processing or enforcing the requirements of the self-exclusion program.

(c) Any personal information collected, stored, or accessed under the self-exclusion program may not be disseminated for any purpose other than the administration of the self-exclusion program.

--- END ---