BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature stated in RCW 28A.150.210 that a "basic education is an evolving program of instruction that is intended to provide students with the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens." In order to prepare students to be global citizens, the legislature intends to require that the superintendent of public instruction develop, and periodically update, state learning standards that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures and a model ethnic studies curriculum for use in grades seven through twelve. The legislature also intends to encourage public schools with students in grades seven through twelve to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates this curriculum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

By September 1, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt state learning standards and grade-level expectations that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. These state learning standards and grade-level expectations must be periodically updated to incorporate best practices in ethnic studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) By September 1, 2020, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a model ethnic studies curriculum for use in grades seven through twelve. The model curriculum must be designed to prepare students to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. The model curriculum must be based on the state learning standards, including those adopted under section 2 of this act.

(b) The model curriculum must be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

(c) The model curriculum must be periodically updated to incorporate best practices in ethnic studies.

(2) Public schools with students in grades seven through twelve are encouraged to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the curriculum developed under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction must establish an ethnic studies advisory committee.

(b)(i) The ethnic studies advisory committee must recommend to the superintendent of public instruction state learning standards and grade-level expectations that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. Before developing or identifying state learning standards and grade-level expectations that meet the requirements of this subsection, the committee must review best practices in ethnic studies.

(ii) The ethnic studies advisory committee must advise, assist, and make recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the development of the model ethnic studies curriculum required under section 2 of this act.

(c) The ethnic studies advisory committee must be composed of a majority of educators with experience in teaching ethnic studies from public high schools and institutions of higher education, including educators representing the Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, and Hispanic affairs.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The legislature intends that nothing in this act supersedes the use of the since time immemorial: Tribal sovereignty in Washington curriculum, developed as required under RCW 28A.320.170(1)(b).

--- END ---