BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.14.150 and 2011 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The district courts shall have original jurisdiction and cognizance of any civil actions and proceedings brought under this chapter, except the district court shall transfer such actions and proceedings to the superior court when it is shown that (a) the respondent to the petition is under eighteen years of age; (b) the action involves title or possession of real property; (c) a superior court has exercised or is exercising jurisdiction over a proceeding involving the parties; or (d) the action would have the effect of interfering with a respondent's care, control, or custody of the respondent's minor child.

(2) Municipal courts may exercise jurisdiction and cognizance of any civil actions and proceedings brought under this chapter by adoption of local court rule, except the municipal court shall transfer such actions and proceedings to the superior court when it is shown that (a) the respondent to the petition is under eighteen years of age; (b) the action involves title or possession of real property; (c) a superior court has exercised or is exercising jurisdiction over a proceeding involving the parties; or (d) the action would have the effect of interfering with a respondent's care, control, or custody of the respondent's minor child.

(3) The civil jurisdiction of district and municipal courts under this chapter is limited to the issuance and enforcement of temporary orders for protection in cases that require transfer to superior court under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The district or municipal court shall transfer the case to superior court after the temporary order is entered.

(4) Superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to receive transfer of antiharassment petitions in cases where a district or municipal court judge makes findings of fact and conclusions of law showing that meritorious reasons exist for the transfer.

(5) The municipal and district courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any criminal actions brought under RCW 10.14.120 and 10.14.170.

--- END ---