BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) As set forth in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1602, it is the policy of the nation, in fulfillment of its special trust responsibilities and legal obligations to American Indians and Alaska Natives, to:

(i) Ensure the highest possible health status for American Indians and Alaska Natives and to provide all resources necessary to effect that policy;

(ii) Raise the health status of American Indians and Alaska Natives to at least the levels set forth in the goals contained within the healthy people 2020 initiative or successor objectives; and

(iii) Ensure tribal self-determination and maximum participation by American Indians and Alaska Natives in the direction of health care services so as to render the persons administering such services and the services themselves more responsive to the needs and desires of tribes and American Indian and Alaska Native communities;

(b) According to the northwest tribal epidemiology center and the department of health, American Indians and Alaska Natives in the state experience some of the greatest health disparities compared to other groups, including excessively high rates of:

(i) Premature mortality due to suicide, overdose, unintentional injury, and various chronic diseases; and

(ii) Asthma, coronary heart disease, hypertension, diabetes, prediabetes, obesity, dental caries, poor mental health, youth depressive feelings, cigarette smoking and vaping, and cannabis use;

(c) These health disparities are a direct result of both historical trauma, leading to adverse childhood experiences across multiple generations, and inadequate levels of federal funding to the Indian health service;

(d) Under a 2016 update in payment policy from the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the state has the opportunity to shift more of the cost of care for American Indian and Alaska Native medicaid enrollees from the state general fund to the federal government if all of the federal requirements are met;

(e) Because the federal requirements to achieve this cost shift and obtain the new federal funds place significant administrative burdens on Indian health service and tribal health facilities, the state has no way to shift these costs of care to the federal government unless the state provides incentives for tribes to take on these administrative burdens; and

(f) The federal government's intent for this update in payment policy is to help states, the Indian health service, and tribes to improve delivery systems for American Indians and Alaska Natives by increasing access to care, strengthening continuity of care, and improving population health.

(2) The legislature, therefore, intends to:

(a) Establish that it is the policy of this state and the intent of this chapter, in fulfillment of the state's unique relationships and shared respect between sovereign governments, to:

(i) Recognize the United States' special trust responsibility to provide quality health care and allied health services to American Indians and Alaska Natives, including those individuals who are residents of this state; and

(ii) Implement the national policies of Indian self-determination and achieving the highest possible health status for American Indians and Alaska Natives in the state;

(b) Establish the governor's Indian health advisory council to:

(i) Adopt a biennial Indian health improvement advisory plan, developed by the reinvestment committee;

(ii) Address issues with tribal implications that are not able to be resolved at the agency level; and

(iii) Provide oversight of the Indian health improvement reinvestment account;

(c) Establish the Indian health improvement reinvestment account in order to provide incentives for tribes to assume the administrative burdens created by the federal requirements for the state to shift health care costs to the federal government;

(d) Appropriate and deposit into the reinvestment account all of the new state savings, subject to federal appropriations and less agreed upon administrative costs to maintain fiscal neutrality to the state general fund; and

(e) Require the funds in the reinvestment account to be spent only on costs for projects, programs, or activities identified in the advisory plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory council" means the governor's Indian health advisory council established in section 3 of this act.

(2) "Advisory plan" means the plan described in section 4 of this act.

(3) "American Indian" or "Alaska Native" means any individual who is: (a) A member of a federally recognized tribe; or (b) eligible for the Indian health service.

(4) "Authority" means the health care authority.

(5) "Board" means the northwest Portland area Indian health board, an Oregon nonprofit corporation wholly controlled by the tribes in the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington.

(6) "Commission" means the American Indian health commission for Washington state, a Washington nonprofit corporation wholly controlled by the tribes and urban Indian organizations in the state.

(7) "Community health aide" means a tribal community health provider certified by a community health aide program of the Indian health service or one or more tribes or tribal organizations consistent with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l, who can perform a wide range of duties within the provider's scope of certified practice in health programs of a tribe, tribal organization, Indian health service facility, or urban Indian organization to improve access to culturally appropriate, quality care for American Indians and Alaska Natives and their families and communities, including but not limited to community health aides, community health practitioners, behavioral health aides, behavioral health practitioners, dental health aides, and dental health aide therapists.

(8) "Community health aide program" means a community health aide certification board for the state consistent with 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l and the training programs and certification requirements established thereunder.

(9) "Fee-for-service" means the state's medicaid program for which payments are made under the state plan, without a managed care entity, in accordance with the fee-for-service payment methodology.

(10) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603.

(11) "Indian health service" means the federal agency within the United States department of health and human services.

(12) "New state savings" means the savings to the state general fund that are achieved as a result of the centers for medicare and medicaid services state health official letter 16-002 and related guidance, calculated as the difference between (a) medicaid payments received from the centers for medicare and medicaid services based on the one hundred percent federal medical assistance percentage; and (b) medicaid payments received from the centers for medicare and medicaid services based on the federal medical assistance percentage that would apply in the absence of state health official letter 16-002 and related guidance.

(13) "Reinvestment account" means the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in section 5 of this act.

(14) "Reinvestment committee" means the Indian health improvement reinvestment committee established in section 3(4) of this act.

(15) "Tribal organization" has the meaning set forth in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 5304.

(16) "Tribally operated facility" means a health care facility operated by one or more tribes or tribal organizations to provide specialty services, including but not limited to evaluation and treatment services, secure detox services, inpatient psychiatric services, nursing home services, and residential substance use disorder services.

(17) "Tribe" means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community, including any Alaska Native village or group or regional or village corporation as defined in or established pursuant to the Alaska Native claims settlement act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) which is recognized as eligible for the special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians.

(18) "Urban Indian" means any individual who resides in an urban center and is: (a) A member of a tribe terminated since 1940 and those tribes recognized now or in the future by the state in which they reside, or who is a descendant, in the first or second degree, of any such member; (b) an Eskimo or Aleut or other Alaska Native; (c) considered by the secretary of the interior to be an Indian for any purpose; or (d) considered by the United States secretary of health and human services to be an Indian for purposes of eligibility for Indian health services, including as a California Indian, Eskimo, Aleut, or other Alaska Native.

(19) "Urban Indian organization" means an urban Indian organization, as defined by 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The governor's Indian health advisory council is established, consisting of:

(a) The following voting members:

(i) One representative from each tribe, designated by the tribal council, who is either the tribe's commission delegate or an individual specifically designated for this role, or his or her designee;

(ii) The chief executive officer of each urban Indian organization, or the urban Indian organization's commission delegate if applicable, or his or her designee;

(iii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iv) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and

(v) One member representing the governor's office; and

(b) The following nonvoting members:

(i) One member of the executive leadership team from each of the following state agencies: The authority; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of commerce; the department of corrections; the department of health; the department of social and health services; the office of the insurance commissioner; the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and the Washington health benefit exchange;

(ii) The chief operating officer of each Indian health service area office and service unit, or his or her designee;

(iii) The executive director of the commission, or his or her designee; and

(iv) The executive director of the board, or his or her designee.

(2) The advisory council shall meet at least three times per year when the legislature is not in session, in a forum that offers both in-person and remote participation where everyone can hear and be heard.

(3) The advisory council has the responsibility to:

(a) Adopt the biennial Indian health improvement advisory plan prepared and amended by the reinvestment committee as described in section 4 of this act no later than November 1st of each odd-numbered year;

(b) Address current or proposed policies or actions that have tribal implications and are not able to be resolved or addressed at the agency level;

(c) Facilitate better understanding among advisory council members and their support staff of the Indian health system, American Indian and Alaska Native health disparities and historical trauma, and tribal sovereignty and self-governance;

(d) Provide oversight of contracting and performance of service coordination organizations or service contracting entities as defined in RCW 70.320.010 in order to address their impacts on services to American Indians and Alaska Natives and relationships with Indian health care providers; and

(e) Provide oversight of the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in section 5 of this act, ensuring that amounts expended from the reinvestment account are consistent with the advisory plan adopted under section 4 of this act.

(4) The reinvestment committee of the advisory council is established, consisting of the following members of the advisory council:

(a) With voting rights on the reinvestment committee, every advisory council member who represents a tribe or an urban Indian organization; and

(b) With nonvoting rights on the reinvestment committee, every advisory council member who represents a state agency, the Indian health service area office or a service unit, the commission, and the board.

(5) The advisory council may appoint technical advisory committees, which may include members of the advisory council, as needed to address specific issues and concerns.

(6) The authority, in conjunction with the represented state agencies on the advisory council, shall supply such information and assistance as are deemed necessary for the advisory council and its committees to carry out its duties under this section.

(7) The authority shall provide (a) administrative and clerical assistance to the advisory council and its committees and (b) technical assistance with the assistance of the commission.

(8) The advisory council meetings, reports and recommendations, and other forms of collaboration described in this chapter support the tribal consultation process but are not a substitute for the requirements for state agencies to conduct consultation or maintain government-to-government relationships with tribes under federal and state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) With assistance from the authority, the commission, and other member entities of the advisory council, the reinvestment committee of the advisory council shall prepare and amend from time to time a biennial Indian health improvement advisory plan to:

(a) Raise the health status of American Indians and Alaska Natives in the state to at least the levels set forth in the goals contained in the federal healthy people 2020 initiative or successor objectives; or

(b) Help the state, the Indian health service, tribes, and urban Indian organizations, statewide or in regions, improve delivery systems for American Indians and Alaska Natives by increasing access to care, strengthening continuity of care, and improving population health through investments in capacity and infrastructure.

(2) The advisory plan shall include the following:

(a) An assessment of Indian health and Indian health care in the state;

(b) Specific recommendations for programs, projects, or activities, along with recommended reinvestment account expenditure amounts and priorities for expenditures, for the next two state fiscal bienniums. The programs, projects, and activities may include but are not limited to:

(i) Tribally operated facilities providing evaluation, treatment, and recovery services for opioid use disorder, other substance use disorders, mental illness, or specialty care;

(ii) Increased access to quality, culturally appropriate, trauma-informed specialty services, including adult and pediatric psychiatric services, medication consultation, and addiction or geriatric psychiatry;

(iii) A third-party administrative entity to provide, arrange, and make payment for services for American Indians and Alaska Natives;

(iv) Expansion of suicide prevention services, including culture-based programming, to instill and fortify cultural practices as a protective factor;

(v) Expansion of traditional healing services;

(vi) Development of a community health aide program, including a community health aide certification board for the state consistent with 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l, and support for community health aide services;

(vii) Health information technology capability within tribes and urban Indian organizations to assure the technological capacity to: (A) Produce sound evidence for Indian health care provider best practices; (B) effectively coordinate care between Indian health care providers and non-Indian health care providers; (C) provide interoperability with state claims and reportable data systems, such as for immunizations and reportable conditions; and (D) support patient-centered medical home models, including sufficient resources to purchase and implement certified electronic health record systems, such as hardware, software, training, and staffing;

(viii) Support for care coordination by tribes and other Indian health care providers to mitigate barriers to access to care for American Indians and Alaska Natives, with duties to include without limitation: (A) Follow-up of referred appointments; (B) routine follow-up care for management of chronic disease; (C) transportation; and (D) increasing patient understanding of provider instructions;

(ix) Expanded support for tribal and urban Indian epidemiology centers to create a system of epidemiological analysis that meets the needs of the state's American Indian and Alaska Native population; and

(x) Other health care services and public health services that contribute to reducing health inequities for American Indians and Alaska Natives in the state and increasing access to quality, culturally appropriate health care for American Indians and Alaska Natives in the state; and

(c) Review of how programs, projects, or activities that have received investments from the reinvestment account have or have not achieved the objectives and why.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The Indian health improvement reinvestment account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from new state savings as defined in section 2 of this act and any other moneys appropriated to the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for projects, programs, and activities authorized by section 4 of this act. Only the director of the authority or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2019, the new state savings as defined in section 2 of this act, less the state's administrative costs as agreed upon by the state and the reinvestment committee, shall be deposited into the reinvestment account. With advice from the advisory council, the authority shall develop a report and methodology to identify and track the new state savings.

(3) The authority shall pursue new state savings for medicaid managed care premiums on an actuarial basis and in consultation with tribes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This chapter may be known and cited as the "Washington Indian health improvement act."

Sec. 7. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2018 c 260 s 28, 2018 c 258 s 4, and 2018 c 127 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation revolving loan program account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, (([the]))the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, (([the]))the school employees' insurance account, ((and)) the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, and the Indian health improvement reinvestment account.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---