BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.70.340 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the fund most impacted by this potential event is the Washington opportunity pathways account. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery revenue loss would have on the Washington opportunity pathways account. The legislature further intends to use some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to fund programs and services related to problem and pathological gambling.

(2) The Washington opportunity pathways account is expected to receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state lottery games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2011 and thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the Washington opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two million dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required under subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the Washington opportunity pathways account to bring the total revenue up to one hundred two million dollars.

(3)))(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW ((43.20A.892))41.05.751, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments made to winners.

(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year 2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.

(((4) The commission shall transfer the remaining net revenues, if any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball" authorized in RCW 67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this section into the state general fund for support for the program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.

(5)))(2) The remaining net revenues((, if any,)) in the shared game lottery account after the transfers pursuant to ((this section))subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited into the Washington opportunity pathways account.

--- END ---