BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature makes the following findings:

(a) The alcohol beverage regulators in several states have recently undertaken enforcement efforts against entities shipping alcohol illegally to consumers in their states;

(b) Washington state does not have adequate information regarding illegal shipments of alcohol to Washington consumers or entities to know if there is a problem here that needs to be addressed;

(c) The liquor and cannabis board is the regulatory agency charged with enforcement of liquor laws; and

(d) The liquor and cannabis board informs and engages licensees, the public, and stakeholders in addressing issues related to the enforcement of liquor laws.

(2) The legislature directs the liquor and cannabis board to investigate whether there are illegal alcohol shipments made to Washington consumers and liquor licensees, including the size of the problem if illegal alcohol shipments are made to Washington state. If necessary the liquor and cannabis board may:

(a) Work with stakeholders, including suppliers, wholesalers, retailers, and common carriers to determine the most effective means to address the problem of illegal alcohol shipments to Washington; and

(b) Develop legislative proposals relating to stopping illegal shipments of alcohol and enforcement against making such shipments.

(3) After conducting the investigation under subsection (2) of this section, the liquor and cannabis board must report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature consistent with the requirements of RCW 43.01.036 by December 31, 2019.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2020.

--- END ---