BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1

Sec. 1001. RCW 71.24.011 and 1982 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter may be known and cited as the community ((mental))behavioral health services act.

Sec. 1002. RCW 71.24.015 and 2018 c 201 s 4001 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community ((mental))behavioral health program which shall help people experiencing mental illness or a substance use disorder to retain a respected and productive position in the community. This will be accomplished through programs that focus on resilience and recovery, and practices that are evidence-based, research-based, consensus-based, or, where these do not exist, promising or emerging best practices, which provide for:

(1) Access to ((mental))behavioral health services for adults with mental illness and children with mental illness ((or)), emotional disturbances ((who meet access to care standards which services)), or substance use disorders, that recognize the special needs of underserved populations, including minorities, children, older adults, individuals with disabilities, and low-income persons. Access to mental health and substance use disorder services shall not be limited by a person's history of confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional facility. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early identification of children with mental illness and to ensure that they receive the mental health care and treatment which is appropriate to their developmental level. This care should improve home, school, and community functioning, maintain children in a safe and nurturing home environment, and should enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional judgment while also recognizing parents' rights to participate in treatment decisions for their children;

(2) The involvement of persons with mental illness or substance use disorder, their family members, and advocates in designing and implementing ((mental))behavioral health services that reduce unnecessary hospitalization and incarceration and promote ((the)) recovery and employment ((of persons with mental illness)). To improve the quality of services available and promote the rehabilitation, recovery, and reintegration of persons with mental illness or substance use disorder, consumer and advocate participation in ((mental))behavioral health services is an integral part of the community ((mental))behavioral health system and shall be supported;

(3) Accountability of efficient and effective services through state-of-the-art outcome and performance measures and statewide standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for direct care of people with a mental illness and to assure uniform data collection across the state;

(4) Minimum service delivery standards;

(5) Priorities for the use of available resources for the care of individuals with mental illness or substance use disorder consistent with the priorities defined in the statute;

(6) Coordination of services within the department of social and health services, ((including those divisions within the department of social and health services that provide services to children, between)) the authority, the department, the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and among state mental hospitals, tribes, residential treatment facilities, county authorities, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, community ((mental))behavioral health services, and other support services, which shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of individuals with mental illness or substance use disorder, and other service providers, including Indian health care providers; and

(7) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication in service delivery and promoting complementary services among all entities that provide ((mental))behavioral health services to adults and children.

It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental disorders, or substance use disorders, including services operated by consumers and advocates. The legislature intends to encourage the development of regional ((mental))behavioral health services with adequate local flexibility to assure eligible people in need of care access to the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate to their needs, and the availability of treatment components to assure continuity of care. ((To this end, counties must enter into joint operating agreements with other counties to form regional systems of care that are consistent with the regional service areas established under RCW 74.09.870. Regional systems of care, whether operated by a county, group of counties, or another entity shall integrate planning, administration, and service delivery duties under chapter 71.05 RCW and this chapter to consolidate administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce administrative costs.)) The legislature hereby finds and declares that sound fiscal management requires vigilance to ensure that funds appropriated by the legislature for the provision of needed community ((mental))behavioral health programs and services are ultimately expended solely for the purpose for which they were appropriated, and not for any other purpose.

It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases of treatment. To this end, the legislature intends to promote active engagement with persons with mental illness and collaboration between families and service providers.

Sec. 1003. RCW 71.24.016 and 2014 c 225 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature intends that eastern and western state hospitals shall operate as clinical centers for handling the most complicated long-term care needs of patients with a primary diagnosis of mental disorder. It is further the intent of the legislature that the community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system focus on maintaining individuals with mental illness in the community. The program shall be evaluated and managed through a limited number of outcome and performance measures, as provided in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025.

(2) The legislature intends to address the needs of people with mental disorders with a targeted, coordinated, and comprehensive set of evidence-based practices that are effective in serving individuals in their community and will reduce the need for placements in state mental hospitals. The legislature further intends to explicitly hold behavioral health administrative services organizations, within available resources, and managed care organizations accountable for serving people with mental disorders who live within the boundaries of their regional service area ((and for not exceeding their allocation of state hospital beds)).

(3) The authority shall establish a work group to determine how to appropriately manage access to adult long-term inpatient involuntary care in the community and at eastern and western state hospitals. The work group shall provide recommendations to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2019.

Sec. 1004. RCW 71.24.025 and 2018 c 201 s 4002 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:

(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;

(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or

(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community ((mental))behavioral health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other ((mental))behavioral health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.

(6) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means ((any county authority or group of county authorities or other entity recognized by the director in contract in a defined region))an entity contracted with the authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under section 1046 of this act, including crisis services and administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, the involuntary treatment act, for all individuals in a defined regional service area.

(7) "Behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat ((chemical dependency and))substance use disorder, mental illness, or both.

(8) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW and substance use disorder treatment services as described in this chapter.

(9) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(10) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or

(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or

(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.

(11) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.

(12) "Community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.

(13) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally or behaviorally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health administrative services organizations.

(14) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(15) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a community ((mental))behavioral health program, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to provide a community ((mental))behavioral health program.

(16) "Department" means the department of health.

(17) "Designated crisis responder" ((means a mental health professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter))has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(18) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(19) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(20) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(6).

(21) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (22) of this section.

(22) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(23) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in the Indian health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).

(24) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(((24)))(25) "Licensed or certified service provider" means an entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department, or tribal attestation that meets state minimum standards, or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(((25)))(26) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.

(((26) "Mental health services" means all services provided by behavioral health organizations and other services provided by the state for persons who are mentally ill.))

(27) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(28) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the ((department of social and health services, behavioral health organizations))entities listed in this subsection, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(((28)))(29) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (10), (36), and (37) of this section.

(((29)))(30) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.

(((30) "Registration records" include all the records of the department of social and health services, the authority, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services for the department of social and health services, the authority, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness.))

(31) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (22) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(32) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.

(33) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.

(34) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined ((solely)) by a behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, as applicable.

(35) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(36) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:

(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;

(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;

(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or

(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.

(37) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;

(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;

(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;

(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:

(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;

(ii) Changes in custodial adult;

(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;

(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;

(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or

(vi) Homelessness.

(38) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:

(a) The authority for:

(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Community support services and resource management services;

(b) The department of health for:

(i) Licensed or certified service providers for the provision of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Residential services.

(39) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(40) "((Tribal authority))Tribe," for the purposes of this section ((and RCW 71.24.300 only)), means((: The))a federally recognized Indian tribe((s and the major Indian organizations recognized by the director insofar as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any behavioral health organization that would present a conflict of interest)).

Sec. 1005. RCW 71.24.030 and 2018 c 201 s 4003 are each amended to read as follows:

The director is authorized to make grants and/or purchase services from counties, combinations of counties, or other entities, to establish and operate community ((mental))behavioral health programs.

Sec. 1006. RCW 71.24.035 and 2018 c 201 s 4004 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority is designated as the state behavioral health authority which includes recognition as the single state authority for substance use disorders and state mental health authority.

(2) The director shall provide for public, client, tribal, and licensed or certified service provider participation in developing the state behavioral health program, developing related contracts ((with behavioral health organizations)), and any waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.

(3) The director shall provide for participation in developing the state behavioral health program for children and other underserved populations, by including representatives on any committee established to provide oversight to the state behavioral health program.

(4) ((The director shall be designated as the behavioral health organization if the behavioral health organization fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under its contract or RCW 71.24.045, until such time as a new behavioral health organization is designated.))The authority shall be designated as the behavioral health administrative services organization for a regional service area if a behavioral health administrative services organization fails to meet the authority's contracting requirements or refuses to exercise the responsibilities under its contract or state law, until such time as a new behavioral health administrative services organization is designated.

(5) The director shall:

(a) ((Develop a biennial state behavioral health program that incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental health service plans and state services for adults and children with mental disorders or substance use disorders or both;

(b))) Assure that any behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or ((county)) community behavioral health program provides medically necessary services to medicaid recipients consistent with the state's medicaid state plan or federal waiver authorities, and nonmedicaid services consistent with priorities established by the authority;

(((c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards for the delivery of behavioral health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037 including, but not limited to:

(i) Licensed or certified service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated behavioral health program to be licensed as a service provider subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules.

(ii) Inpatient services, an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services and facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW to ensure access to treatment, resource management services, and community support services;

(d) Assure that the special needs of persons who are minorities, elderly, disabled, children, low-income, and parents who are respondents in dependency cases are met within the priorities established in this section;

(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with state minimum standards which shall be used in contracting with behavioral health organizations. The standard contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver stipulations;

(f)))(b) Develop contracts in a manner to ensure an adequate network of inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services, and facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW to ensure access to treatment, resource management services, and community support services;

(c) Make contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including managed care contracts for behavioral health services, contracts entered into under RCW 74.09.522, and contracts with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals to pay them for behavioral health services;

(((g)))(d) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing procedure which is designed to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter and minimizes paperwork requirements ((of behavioral health organizations and licensed or certified service providers)). The audit procedure shall focus on the outcomes of service as provided in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025;

(((h)))(e) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the state and behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations that includes a tracking method which allows the authority ((and behavioral health organizations)) to identify behavioral health clients' participation in any behavioral health service or public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this chapter and chapter 70.02 RCW;

(((i) Periodically monitor the compliance of behavioral health organizations and their network of licensed or certified service providers for compliance with the contract between the authority, the behavioral health organization, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner;

(j)))(f) Monitor and audit behavioral health administrative services organizations as needed to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter;

(((k)))(g) Monitor and audit access to behavioral health services for individuals eligible for medicaid who are not enrolled in a managed care organization;

(h) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the authority's responsibilities under this chapter((; and

(l)))(i) Administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to persons with substance use disorders and intoxicated persons of any state plan submitted for federal funding pursuant to federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation;

(j) Require the behavioral health administrative services organizations and the managed care organizations to develop agreements with tribal, city, and county jails to accept referrals for enrollment on behalf of a confined person, prior to the person's release; and

(k) Require behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations, as applicable, to provide services as identified in RCW 71.05.585 to individuals committed for involuntary commitment under less restrictive alternative court orders when:

(i) The individual is enrolled in the medicaid program; or

(ii) The individual is not enrolled in medicaid, does not have other insurance which can pay for the services, and the behavioral health administrative services organization has adequate available resources to provide the services.

(6) The director shall use available resources only for behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations, except:

(a) To the extent authorized, and in accordance with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial appropriations act; or

(b) To incentivize improved performance with respect to the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025, integration of behavioral health and medical services at the clinical level, and improved care coordination for individuals with complex care needs.

(7) Each behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, and licensed or certified service provider shall file with the secretary of the department of health or the director, on request, such data, statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary of the department of health or the director reasonably requires. A behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or licensed or certified service provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent reports thereof, may be subject to the ((behavioral health organization)) contractual remedies in RCW 74.09.871 or may have its service provider certification or license revoked or suspended.

(8) The superior court may restrain any behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or service provider from operating without a contract, certification, or a license or any other violation of this section. The court may also review, pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial, suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(9) Upon petition by the secretary of the department of health or the director, and after hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary of the department of health or the director authorizing him or her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and accounts of any behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or service provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.

(10) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary of the department of health or the director may file an action for an injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, or operation of a behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, or service provider without a contract, certification, or a license under this chapter.

(11) The authority shall distribute appropriated state and federal funds in accordance with any priorities, terms, or conditions specified in the appropriations act.

(((12) The director shall assume all duties assigned to the nonparticipating behavioral health organizations under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW and this chapter. Such responsibilities shall include those which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where there are not participating behavioral health organizations.

The behavioral health organizations, or the director's assumption of all responsibilities under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW and this chapter, shall be included in all state and federal plans affecting the state behavioral health program including at least those required by this chapter, the medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.

(13) The director shall:

(a) Disburse funds for the behavioral health organizations within sixty days of approval of the biennial contract. The authority must either approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.

(b) Enter into biennial contracts with behavioral health organizations. The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i) Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency response systems.

(c) Notify behavioral health organizations of their allocation of available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new biennial contract period.

(d) Deny all or part of the funding allocations to behavioral health organizations based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the behavioral health organization's contract with the authority. Behavioral health organizations disputing the decision of the director to withhold funding allocations are limited to the remedies provided in the authority's contracts with the behavioral health organizations.

(14)))(12) The authority, in cooperation with the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW or certified under chapter 71.05 RCW. The authority shall periodically ((report))share the results of its efforts ((to))with the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

(((15)))(13) The authority may:

(a) Plan, establish, and maintain substance use disorder prevention and substance use disorder treatment programs as necessary or desirable;

(b) Coordinate its activities and cooperate with behavioral programs in this and other states, and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, tribal, local, or private agencies in this and other states for behavioral health services and for the common advancement of substance use disorder programs;

(c) Solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant;

(d) Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics; and

(e) Acquire, hold, or dispose of real property or any interest therein, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide substance use disorder treatment programs.

Sec. 1007. RCW 71.24.037 and 2018 c 201 s 4005 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall ((by rule establish state minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers and services, whether those service providers and services are licensed or certified to provide solely mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, or services to persons with co-occurring disorders))license or certify any agency or facility that: (a) Submits payment of the fee established under RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250; (b) submits a complete application that demonstrates the ability to comply with requirements for operating and maintaining an agency or facility in statute or rule; and (c) successfully completes the prelicensure inspection requirement.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers ((shall))that must, at a minimum, establish: (a) Qualifications for staff providing services directly to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both((,)); (b) the intended result of each service((,)); and (c) the rights and responsibilities of persons receiving behavioral health services pursuant to this chapter and chapter 71.05 RCW. The secretary shall provide for deeming of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers as meeting state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department.

(3) ((Minimum standards for community support services and resource management services shall include at least qualifications for resource management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of patient information between behavioral health service providers.

(4) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this chapter. RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of a license or certification denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.))The department shall review reports or other information alleging a failure to comply with this chapter or the standards and rules adopted under this chapter and may initiate investigations and enforcement actions based on those reports.

(4) The department shall conduct inspections of agencies and facilities, including reviews of records and documents required to be maintained under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

(5) Minimum standards for community support services and resource management services must include at least qualifications for resource management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of patient information between behavioral health service providers.

(6) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this chapter. RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of a license or certification denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(7) No licensed or certified behavioral health service provider may advertise or represent itself as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider if approval has not been granted((,))or has been denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(((6)))(8) Licensure or certification as a behavioral health service provider is effective for one calendar year from the date of issuance of the license or certification. The license or certification must specify the types of services provided by the behavioral health service provider that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(((7)))(9) Licensure or certification as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider must specify the types of services provided that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(((8)))(10) Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may not provide types of services for which the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider has not been certified. Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending, if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.

(((9)))(11) The department periodically shall inspect licensed or certified behavioral health service providers at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

(((10)))(12) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and accounts of, any licensed or certified behavioral health service provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of this chapter.

(((11)))(13) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a current list of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers.

(((12)))(14) Each licensed or certified behavioral health service provider shall file with the department or the authority upon request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department or the authority reasonably requires. A licensed or certified behavioral health service provider that without good cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may have its license or certification revoked or suspended.

(((13)))(15) The authority shall use the data provided in subsection (((12)))(14) of this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient substance use disorder treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation must be done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the authority shall randomly select and review the information on individual children who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into substance use disorder treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and the outcome of the child's treatment.

(((14)))(16) Any settlement agreement entered into between the department and licensed or certified behavioral health service providers to resolve administrative complaints, license or certification violations, license or certification suspensions, or license or certification revocations may not reduce the number of violations reported by the department unless the department concludes, based on evidence gathered by inspectors, that the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider did not commit one or more of the violations.

(((15)))(17) In cases in which a behavioral health service provider that is in violation of licensing or certification standards attempts to transfer or sell the behavioral health service provider to a family member, the transfer or sale may only be made for the purpose of remedying license or certification violations and achieving full compliance with the terms of the license or certification. Transfers or sales to family members are prohibited in cases in which the purpose of the transfer or sale is to avoid liability or reset the number of license or certification violations found before the transfer or sale. If the department finds that the owner intends to transfer or sell, or has completed the transfer or sale of, ownership of the behavioral health service provider to a family member solely for the purpose of resetting the number of violations found before the transfer or sale, the department may not renew the behavioral health service provider's license or certification or issue a new license or certification to the behavioral health service provider.

Sec. 1008. RCW 71.24.045 and 2018 c 201 s 4006 and 2018 c 175 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

((The behavioral health organization shall:

(1) Contract as needed with licensed or certified service providers. The behavioral health organization may, in the absence of a licensed or certified service provider entity, become a licensed or certified service provider entity pursuant to minimum standards required for licensing or certification by the department for the purpose of providing services not available from licensed or certified service providers;

(2) Operate as a licensed or certified service provider if it deems that doing so is more efficient and cost effective than contracting for services. When doing so, the behavioral health organization shall comply with rules adopted by the director that shall provide measurements to determine when a behavioral health organization provided service is more efficient and cost effective;

(3) Monitor and perform biennial fiscal audits of licensed or certified service providers who have contracted with the behavioral health organization to provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring and audits shall be performed by means of a formal process which insures that the licensed or certified service providers and professionals designated in this subsection meet the terms of their contracts;

(4) Establish reasonable limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health organization;

(5) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met within the priorities established in this chapter;

(6) Maintain patient tracking information in a central location as required for resource management services and the authority's information system;

(7) Collaborate to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities;

(8) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases;

(9) Work closely with the designated crisis responder to maximize appropriate placement of persons into community services;

(10) Coordinate services for individuals who have received services through the community mental health system and who become patients at a state psychiatric hospital to ensure they are transitioned into the community in accordance with mutually agreed upon discharge plans and upon determination by the medical director of the state psychiatric hospital that they no longer need intensive inpatient care; and

(11) Allow reimbursement for time spent supervising persons working toward satisfying supervision requirements established for the relevant practice areas pursuant to RCW 18.225.090.))(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization contracted with the authority pursuant to section 1046 of this act shall:

(a) Administer crisis services for the assigned regional service area. Such services must include:

(i) A behavioral health crisis hotline for its assigned regional service area;

(ii) Crisis response services twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, three hundred sixty-five days a year;

(iii) Services related to involuntary commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW;

(iv) Additional noncrisis behavioral health services, within available resources, to individuals who meet certain criteria set by the authority in its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organization. These services may include services provided through federal grant funds, provisos, and general fund state appropriations;

(v) Care coordination, diversion services, and discharge planning for nonmedicaid individuals transitioning from state hospitals or inpatient settings to reduce rehospitalization and utilization of crisis services, as required by the authority in contract; and

(vi) Regional coordination, cross-system and cross-jurisdiction coordination with tribal governments, and capacity building efforts, such as supporting the behavioral health advisory board, the behavioral health ombuds, and efforts to support access to services or to improve the behavioral health system;

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided as required under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(c) Coordinate services for individuals under RCW 71.05.365;

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of resource management services, residential services, and community support services as required under its contract with the authority;

(e) Contract with a sufficient number, as determined by the authority, of licensed or certified providers for crisis services and other behavioral health services required by the authority;

(f) Maintain adequate reserves or secure a bond as required by its contract with the authority;

(g) Establish and maintain quality assurance processes;

(h) Meet established limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health administrative services organization;

(i) Maintain patient tracking information as required by the authority; and

(j) Collaborate to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities.

(2) The behavioral health administrative services organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted managed care organizations to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

(a) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met;

(b) Collaborate with local government entities to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities; and

(c) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

Sec. 1009. RCW 71.24.061 and 2018 c 288 s 2 and 2018 c 201 s 4007 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall provide flexibility ((in provider contracting to behavioral health organizations for children's mental health services. Behavioral health organization contracts shall authorize behavioral health organizations to allow and encourage licensed or certified community mental health centers to subcontract with individual licensed mental health professionals when necessary to meet the need for))to encourage licensed or certified community behavioral health agencies to subcontract with an adequate, culturally competent, and qualified children's mental health provider network.

(2) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose or that nonstate funds are available, a children's mental health evidence-based practice institute shall be established at the University of Washington division of public behavioral health and justice policy. The institute shall closely collaborate with entities currently engaged in evaluating and promoting the use of evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices in children's mental health treatment, including but not limited to the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, Seattle children's hospital, the University of Washington school of nursing, the University of Washington school of social work, and the Washington state institute for public policy. To ensure that funds appropriated are used to the greatest extent possible for their intended purpose, the University of Washington's indirect costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of appropriated funding. The institute shall:

(a) Improve the implementation of evidence-based and research-based practices by providing sustained and effective training and consultation to licensed children's mental health providers and child-serving agencies who are implementing evidence-based or researched-based practices for treatment of children's emotional or behavioral disorders, or who are interested in adapting these practices to better serve ethnically or culturally diverse children. Efforts under this subsection should include a focus on appropriate oversight of implementation of evidence-based practices to ensure fidelity to these practices and thereby achieve positive outcomes;

(b) Continue the successful implementation of the "partnerships for success" model by consulting with communities so they may select, implement, and continually evaluate the success of evidence-based practices that are relevant to the needs of children, youth, and families in their community;

(c) Partner with youth, family members, family advocacy, and culturally competent provider organizations to develop a series of information sessions, literature, and online resources for families to become informed and engaged in evidence-based and research-based practices;

(d) Participate in the identification of outcome-based performance measures under RCW 71.36.025(2) and partner in a statewide effort to implement statewide outcomes monitoring and quality improvement processes; and

(e) Serve as a statewide resource to the authority and other entities on child and adolescent evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices for children's mental health treatment, maintaining a working knowledge through ongoing review of academic and professional literature, and knowledge of other evidence-based practice implementation efforts in Washington and other states.

(3)(a) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, the ((health care)) authority in collaboration with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital shall:

(((a)))(i) Implement a program to support primary care providers in the assessment and provision of appropriate diagnosis and treatment of children with mental and behavioral health disorders and track outcomes of this program;

(((b)))(ii) Beginning January 1, 2019, implement a two-year pilot program called the partnership access line for moms and kids to:

(((i)))(A) Support obstetricians, pediatricians, primary care providers, mental health professionals, and other health care professionals providing care to pregnant women and new mothers through same-day telephone consultations in the assessment and provision of appropriate diagnosis and treatment of depression in pregnant women and new mothers; and

(((ii)))(B) Facilitate referrals to children's mental health services and other resources for parents and guardians with concerns related to the mental health of the parent or guardian's child. Facilitation activities include assessing the level of services needed by the child; within seven days of receiving a call from a parent or guardian, identifying mental health professionals who are in-network with the child's health care coverage who are accepting new patients and taking appointments; coordinating contact between the parent or guardian and the mental health professional; and providing postreferral reviews to determine if the child has outstanding needs. In conducting its referral activities, the program shall collaborate with existing databases and resources to identify in-network mental health professionals.

(((c)))(b) The program activities described in (a)(i) and (((b)(i)))(a)(ii)(A) of this subsection shall be designed to promote more accurate diagnoses and treatment through timely case consultation between primary care providers and child psychiatric specialists, and focused educational learning collaboratives with primary care providers.

(4) The ((health care)) authority, in collaboration with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and Seattle children's hospital, shall report on the following:

(a) The number of individuals who have accessed the resources described in subsection (3) of this section;

(b) The number of providers, by type, who have accessed the resources described in subsection (3) of this section;

(c) Demographic information, as available, for the individuals described in (a) of this subsection. Demographic information may not include any personally identifiable information and must be limited to the individual's age, gender, and city and county of residence;

(d) A description of resources provided;

(e) Average time frames from receipt of call to referral for services or resources provided; and

(f) Systemic barriers to services, as determined and defined by the health care authority, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, and Seattle children's hospital.

(5) Beginning December 30, 2019, and annually thereafter, the ((health care)) authority must submit, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and recommendations for improving services and service delivery from subsection (4) of this section.

(6) The ((health care)) authority shall enforce requirements in managed care contracts to ensure care coordination and network adequacy issues are addressed in order to remove barriers to access to mental health services identified in the report described in subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 1010. RCW 71.24.100 and 2018 c 201 s 4008 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county authority or a group of county authorities may enter into a joint operating agreement to ((respond to a request for a detailed plan and))submit a request to contract with the ((state))authority to operate a behavioral health administrative services organization whose boundaries are consistent with the regional service areas established under RCW 74.09.870. ((Any agreement between two or more county authorities shall provide:

(1) That each county shall bear a share of the cost of mental health services; and

(2) That the treasurer of one participating county shall be the custodian of funds made available for the purposes of such mental health services, and that the treasurer may make payments from such funds upon audit by the appropriate auditing officer of the county for which he or she is treasurer.))

(2) All counties within the regional service area must mutually agree to enter into a contract with the authority to become a behavioral health administrative services organization and appoint a single fiscal agent for the regional service area. Similarly, in order to terminate such contract, all counties that are contracted with the authority as a behavioral health administrative services organization must mutually agree to terminate the contract with the authority.

(3) Once the authority receives a request from a county or a group of counties within a regional service area to be the designated behavioral health administrative services organization, the authority must promptly collaborate with the county or group of counties within that regional service area to determine the most feasible implementation date and coordinate readiness reviews.

(4) Nothing in this chapter prevents a county or a group of counties within a regional service area from establishing and creating a provider organization licensed or certified by the department. Any county-administered provider organization must be established within the local government in a manner that ensures that the provider organization has a clear separation of powers, duties, and fiscal responsibilities, separate from the county-run behavioral health administrative services organization.

(5) Nothing in this section limits the authority's ability to take remedial actions up to and including termination of a contract in order to enforce contract terms or to remedy nonperformance of contractual duties.

Sec. 1011. RCW 71.24.155 and 2018 c 201 s 4009 are each amended to read as follows:

Grants shall be made by the authority to behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations for community ((mental))behavioral health programs totaling not less than ninety-five percent of available resources. The authority may use up to forty percent of the remaining five percent to provide community demonstration projects, including early intervention or primary prevention programs for children, and the remainder shall be for emergency needs and technical assistance under this chapter.

Sec. 1012. RCW 71.24.160 and 2018 c 201 s 4010 are each amended to read as follows:

The behavioral health administrative services organizations shall make satisfactory showing to the director that state funds shall in no case be used to replace local funds from any source being used to finance mental health services prior to January 1, 1990. Maintenance of effort funds devoted to judicial services related to involuntary commitment reimbursed under RCW 71.05.730 must be expended for other purposes that further treatment for mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorders.

Sec. 1013. RCW 71.24.215 and 2018 c 201 s 4011 are each amended to read as follows:

Clients receiving ((mental))behavioral health services funded by available resources shall be charged a fee under sliding-scale fee schedules, based on ability to pay, approved by the authority ((or the department of social and health services, as appropriate)). Fees shall not exceed the actual cost of care.

Sec. 1014. RCW 71.24.220 and 2018 c 201 s 4012 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may withhold state grants in whole or in part for any community ((mental))behavioral health program in the event of a failure to comply with this chapter or the related rules adopted by the authority.

Sec. 1015. RCW 71.24.240 and 2018 c 201 s 4013 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to establish eligibility for funding under this chapter, any behavioral health administrative services organization seeking to obtain federal funds for the support of any aspect of a community ((mental))behavioral health program as defined in this chapter shall submit program plans to the director for prior review and approval before such plans are submitted to any federal agency.

Sec. 1016. RCW 71.24.250 and 2014 c 225 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

The behavioral health administrative services organization may accept and expend gifts and grants received from private, county, state, and federal sources.

Sec. 1017. RCW 71.24.260 and 1986 c 274 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall waive postgraduate educational requirements applicable to mental health professionals under this chapter for those persons who have a bachelor's degree and on June 11, 1986:

(1) Are employed by an agency subject to licensure under this chapter, the community ((mental))behavioral health services act, in a capacity involving the treatment of mental illness; and

(2) Have at least ten years of full-time experience in the treatment of mental illness.

Sec. 1018. RCW 71.24.300 and 2018 c 201 s 4014 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a behavioral health organization the joint operating agreement or the county authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the behavioral health organization.

(2) The roles and responsibilities of the county and tribal authorities shall be determined by the terms of that agreement including a determination of membership on the governing board and advisory committees, the number of tribal representatives to be party to the agreement, and the provisions of law and shall assure the provision of culturally competent services to the tribes served.

(3) The state behavioral health authority may not determine the roles and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under behavioral health organizations by rule, except to assure that all duties required of behavioral health organizations are assigned and that counties and the behavioral health organization do not duplicate functions and that a single authority has final responsibility for all available resources and performance under the behavioral health organization's contract with the director.

(4) If a behavioral health organization is a private entity, the authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the behavioral health organization.

(5) The roles and responsibilities of the private entity and the tribal authorities shall be determined by the authority, through negotiation with the tribal authority.

(6) Behavioral health organizations shall submit an overall six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume within available resources all of the following duties:

(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource management services, residential services, and community support services.

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, all investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.

(c) Provide within the boundaries of each behavioral health organization evaluation and treatment services for at least ninety percent of persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Behavioral health organizations may contract to purchase evaluation and treatment services from other organizations if they are unable to provide for appropriate resources within their boundaries. Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community is maintained, the director is authorized to approve exceptions on a case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and treatment services within the boundaries of each behavioral health organization. Such exceptions are limited to:

(i) Contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions; or

(ii) Individuals detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days at the state hospitals at the discretion of the director.

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment, consultation, education services, employment services as described in RCW 71.24.035, and mental health services to children.

(e) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from resource management services.

(7) A behavioral health organization may request that any state-owned land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the persons with mental illness and which is within the boundaries of a behavioral health organization be made available to support the operations of the behavioral health organization. State agencies managing such capital assets shall give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.

(8) Each behavioral health organization shall appoint a behavioral health advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight regarding the activities of the behavioral health organization, and work with the behavioral health organization to resolve significant concerns regarding service delivery and outcomes. The authority shall establish statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the authority regarding behavioral health organization performance. The composition of the board shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of the region and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of consumers of substance use disorder and mental health services and their families, law enforcement, and, where the county is not the behavioral health organization, county elected officials. Composition and length of terms of board members may differ between behavioral health organizations but shall be included in each behavioral health organization's contract and approved by the director.

(9) Behavioral health organizations shall assume all duties specified in their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual agreements with the director.

(10) Behavioral health organizations may receive technical assistance from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for housing and housing support services to the housing trust fund established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under this subsection must be fully integrated with the behavioral health organization six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by subsection (6) of this section.))The authority must allow for the inclusion of tribes in any interlocal leadership structure or committees formed under RCW 71.24.880, when requested by a tribe.

(2) If an interlocal leadership structure is not formed under RCW 71.24.880, the roles and responsibilities of the behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, counties, and each tribe shall be determined by the authority through negotiation with the tribes.

Sec. 1019. RCW 71.24.335 and 2017 c 202 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the ((department))authority, ((a)) behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations shall reimburse a provider for a behavioral health service provided to a covered person who is under eighteen years old through telemedicine or store and forward technology if:

(a) The behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization in which the covered person is enrolled provides coverage of the behavioral health service when provided in person by the provider; and

(b) The behavioral health service is medically necessary.

(2)(a) If the service is provided through store and forward technology there must be an associated visit between the covered person and the referring provider. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of telemedicine for the associated office visit.

(b) For purposes of this section, reimbursement of store and forward technology is available only for those services specified in the negotiated agreement between the behavioral health administrative services organization, or managed care organization, and the provider.

(3) An originating site for a telemedicine behavioral health service subject to subsection (1) of this section means an originating site as defined in rule by the department or the health care authority.

(4) Any originating site, other than a home, under subsection (3) of this section may charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the patient. Reimbursement must be subject to a negotiated agreement between the originating site and the behavioral health administrative services organization, or managed care organization, as applicable. A distant site or any other site not identified in subsection (3) of this section may not charge a facility fee.

(5) ((A))Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations may not distinguish between originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) ((A))Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations may subject coverage of a telemedicine or store and forward technology behavioral health service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization in which the covered person is enrolled, including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable to coverage of a comparable behavioral health care service provided in person.

(7) This section does not require a behavioral health administrative services organization or a managed care organization to reimburse:

(a) An originating site for professional fees;

(b) A provider for a behavioral health service that is not a covered benefit ((under the behavioral health organization)); or

(c) An originating site or provider when the site or provider is not a contracted provider ((with the behavioral health organization)).

(8) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;

(b) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW;

(c) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient receiving behavioral health services through telemedicine;

(d) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;

(e) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a covered person's medical or behavioral health information from an originating site to the provider at a distant site which results in medical or behavioral health diagnosis and management of the covered person, and does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email; and

(f) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care or behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or email.

(9) The ((department must, in consultation with the health care)) authority((,))must adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Sec. 1020. RCW 71.24.350 and 2018 c 201 s 4019 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall require each behavioral health administrative services organization to provide for a separately funded behavioral health ombuds office ((in each behavioral health organization)) that is independent of the behavioral health administrative services organization and managed care organizations for the assigned regional service area. The ombuds office shall maximize the use of consumer advocates.

Sec. 1021. RCW 71.24.370 and 2018 c 201 s 4021 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for monetary damage claims which have been reduced to final judgment by a superior court, this section applies to all claims against the state, state agencies, state officials, or state employees that exist on or arise after March 29, 2006.

(2) Except as expressly provided in contracts entered into ((between))by the authority ((and the behavioral health organizations after March 29, 2006)), the entities identified in subsection (3) of this section shall have no claim for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, judicial review under chapter 34.05 RCW, or civil liability against the state ((or)), state agencies, state officials, or state employees for actions or inactions performed pursuant to the administration of this chapter with regard to the following: (a) The allocation or payment of federal or state funds; (b) the use or allocation of state hospital beds; or (c) financial responsibility for the provision of inpatient mental health care.

(3) This section applies to counties, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and entities which contract to provide behavioral health ((organization)) services and their subcontractors, agents, or employees.

Sec. 1022. RCW 71.24.380 and 2018 c 201 s 4022 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall purchase ((mental health and chemical dependency treatment))behavioral health services primarily through managed care contracting, but may continue to purchase behavioral health services directly from ((tribal clinics and other tribal providers))providers serving medicaid clients who are not enrolled in a managed care organization.

(2)(((a) The director shall request a detailed plan from the entities identified in (b) of this subsection that demonstrates compliance with the contractual elements of RCW 74.09.871 and federal regulations related to medicaid managed care contracting including, but not limited to: Having a sufficient network of providers to provide adequate access to mental health and chemical dependency services for residents of the regional service area that meet eligibility criteria for services, ability to maintain and manage adequate reserves, and maintenance of quality assurance processes. Any responding entity that submits a detailed plan that demonstrates that it can meet the requirements of this section must be awarded the contract to serve as the behavioral health organization.

(b)(i) For purposes of responding to the request for a detailed plan under (a) of this subsection, the entities from which a plan will be requested are:

(A) A county in a single county regional service area that currently serves as the regional support network for that area;

(B) In the event that a county has made a decision prior to January 1, 2014, not to contract as a regional support network, any private entity that serves as the regional support network for that area;

(C) All counties within a regional service area that includes more than one county, which shall form a responding entity through the adoption of an interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement must specify the terms by which the responding entity shall serve as the behavioral health organization within the regional service area.

(ii) In the event that a regional service area is comprised of multiple counties including one that has made a decision prior to January 1, 2014, not to contract as a regional support network the counties shall adopt an interlocal agreement and may respond to the request for a detailed plan under (a) of this subsection and the private entity may also respond to the request for a detailed plan. If both responding entities meet the requirements of this section, the responding entities shall follow the authority's procurement process established in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) If an entity that has received a request under this section to submit a detailed plan does not respond to the request, a responding entity under subsection (1) of this section is unable to substantially meet the requirements of the request for a detailed plan, or more than one responding entity substantially meets the requirements for the request for a detailed plan, the authority shall use a procurement process in which other entities recognized by the director may bid to serve as the behavioral health organization in that regional service area.

(4) Contracts for behavioral health organizations must begin on April 1, 2016.

(5) Upon request of all of the county authorities in a regional service area, the authority may purchase behavioral health services through an integrated medical and behavioral health services contract with a behavioral health organization or a managed health care system as defined in RCW 74.09.522, pursuant to standards to be developed by the authority. Any contract for such a purchase must comply with all federal medicaid and state law requirements related to managed health care contracting.))The director shall require that contracted managed care organizations have a sufficient network of providers to provide adequate access to behavioral health services for residents of the regional service area that meet eligibility criteria for services, and for maintenance of quality assurance processes. Contracts with managed care organizations must comply with all federal medicaid and state law requirements related to managed health care contracting, including RCW 74.09.522.

(3) A managed care organization must contract with the authority's selected behavioral health administrative services organization for the assigned regional service area for the administration of crisis services. The contract shall require the managed care organization to reimburse the behavioral health administrative services organization for behavioral health crisis services delivered to individuals enrolled in the managed care organization.

(4) A managed care organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted behavioral health administrative services organization to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(5) A managed care organization must work closely with designated crisis responders, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and behavioral health providers to maximize appropriate placement of persons into community services, ensuring the client receives the least restrictive level of care appropriate for their condition. Additionally, the managed care organization shall work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

(6) As an incentive to county authorities to become early adopters of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services, the standards adopted by the authority ((under subsection (5) of this section)) shall provide for an incentive payment to counties which elect to move to full integration by January 1, 2016. Subject to federal approval, the incentive payment shall be targeted at ten percent of savings realized by the state within the regional service area in which the fully integrated purchasing takes place. Savings shall be calculated in alignment with the outcome and performance measures established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025, and incentive payments for early adopter counties shall be made available for up to a six-year period, or until full integration of medical and behavioral health services is accomplished statewide, whichever comes sooner, according to rules to be developed by the authority.

Sec. 1023. RCW 71.24.385 and 2018 c 201 s 4023 and 2018 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations, as applicable, shall develop the means to serve the needs of people:

(a) With mental disorders residing within the boundaries of their regional service area. Elements of the program may include:

(i) Crisis diversion services;

(ii) Evaluation and treatment and community hospital beds;

(iii) Residential treatment;

(iv) Programs for intensive community treatment;

(v) Outpatient services, including family support;

(vi) Peer support services;

(vii) Community support services;

(viii) Resource management services; and

(ix) Supported housing and supported employment services.

(b) With substance use disorders and their families, people incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated people.

(i) Elements of the program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of substance use disorder treatment services that includes:

(A) Withdrawal management;

(B) Residential treatment; and

(C) Outpatient treatment.

(ii) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, or recovery support services.

(iii) The authority may contract for the use of an approved substance use disorder treatment program or other individual or organization if the director considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(2)(a) The ((behavioral health))managed care organization and the behavioral health administrative services organization shall have the flexibility, within the funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose and the terms of their contract, to design the mix of services that will be most effective within their service area of meeting the needs of people with behavioral health disorders and avoiding placement of such individuals at the state mental hospital. ((Behavioral health))Managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are encouraged to maximize the use of evidence-based practices and alternative resources with the goal of substantially reducing and potentially eliminating the use of institutions for mental diseases.

(b) ((The behavioral health))Managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations may allow reimbursement to providers for services delivered through a partial hospitalization or intensive outpatient program. Such payment and services are distinct from the state's delivery of wraparound with intensive services under the T.R. v. Strange and ((McDermott, formerly the T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter,))Birch settlement agreement.

(3)(a) Treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts.

(b) Consistent with RCW 71.24.580, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

Sec. 1024. RCW 71.24.405 and 2018 c 201 s 4025 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall ((establish a))work comprehensively and collaboratively((effort within))with behavioral health administrative services organizations and with local ((mental))behavioral health service providers ((aimed at creating))to create innovative and streamlined community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery systems((, in order to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 71.24.400)) and to capture the diversity of the community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system. The authority ((must accomplish the following))shall periodically:

(1) ((Identification))Identify, review, and ((cataloging of))catalog all rules, regulations, duplicative administrative and monitoring functions, and other requirements that ((currently)) lead to inefficiencies in the community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system and, if possible, eliminate the requirements;

(2) ((The systematic and incremental development of a single system of accountability for all federal, state, and local funds provided to the community mental health service delivery system. Systematic efforts should be made to include federal and local funds into the single system of accountability;

(3) The elimination of process))Review regulations ((and related)), contracts, and reporting requirements((. In place of the regulations and requirements, a set))to ensure achievement of outcomes for ((mental))behavioral health adult and children clients ((according to this chapter must be used to measure the performance of mental health service providers and behavioral health organizations. Such outcomes shall focus on stabilizing out-of-home and hospital care, increasing stable community living, increasing age-appropriate activities, achieving family and consumer satisfaction with services, and system efficiencies))under RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act);

(((4) Evaluation of the feasibility of contractual agreements between the authority and behavioral health organizations and mental health service providers that link financial incentives to the success or failure of mental health service providers and behavioral health organizations to meet outcomes established for mental health service clients;

(5) The involvement of mental))(3) Involve behavioral health consumers and their representatives((. Mental health consumers and their representatives will be involved in the development of outcome standards for mental health clients under section 5 of this act; and

(6) An independent evaluation component to measure the success of the authority in fully implementing the provisions of RCW 71.24.400 and this section)); and

(4) Provide for an independent evaluation component to measure the success of the authority in fully implementing the provisions of RCW 71.24.400 and this section.

Sec. 1025. RCW 71.24.420 and 2018 c 201 s 4027 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall operate the community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system authorized under this chapter within the following constraints:

(1) The full amount of federal funds for ((mental))behavioral health services, plus qualifying state expenditures as appropriated in the biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to the authority each year in the biennial appropriations act to carry out the provisions of the community ((mental))behavioral health service delivery system authorized in this chapter.

(2) The authority may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome measures established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act) and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes.

(3) The authority shall implement strategies that accomplish the outcome measures established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes.

(4) The authority shall monitor expenditures against the appropriation levels provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 1026. RCW 71.24.430 and 2018 c 201 s 4028 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall ensure the coordination of allied services for ((mental))behavioral health clients. The authority shall implement strategies for resolving organizational, regulatory, and funding issues at all levels of the system, including the state, the behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and local service providers.

(2) The authority shall propose, in operating budget requests, transfers of funding among programs to support collaborative service delivery to persons who require services from multiple department of social and health services and authority programs. ((The authority shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives on actions and projects it has taken to promote collaborative service delivery))The authority shall provide status reports as requested by the legislature.

Sec. 1027. RCW 71.24.450 and 1997 c 342 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Many ((acute and chronically mentally ill)) offenders with acute and chronic mental illness are delayed in their release from Washington correctional facilities due to their inability to access reasonable treatment and living accommodations prior to the maximum expiration of their sentences. Often the offender reaches the end of his or her sentence and is released without any follow-up care, funds, or housing. These delays are costly to the state, often lead to psychiatric relapse, and result in unnecessary risk to the public.

Many of these offenders ((rarely possess))lack the skills or emotional stability to maintain employment or even complete applications to receive entitlement funding. ((Nationwide only five percent of diagnosed schizophrenics are able to maintain part-time or full-time employment.)) Housing and appropriate treatment are difficult to obtain.

This lack of resources, funding, treatment, and housing creates additional stress for the ((mentally ill)) offender with mental illness, impairing self-control and judgment. When the mental illness is instrumental in the offender's patterns of crime, such stresses may lead to a worsening of his or her illness, reoffending, and a threat to public safety.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to create a ((pilot)) program to provide for postrelease mental health care and housing for a select group of ((mentally ill)) offenders with mental illness entering community living, in order to reduce incarceration costs, increase public safety, and enhance the offender's quality of life.

Sec. 1028. RCW 71.24.455 and 2018 c 201 s 4029 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall select and contract with a behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, behavioral health agency, or private provider to provide specialized access and services to offenders with mental illness upon release from total confinement within the department of corrections who have been identified by the department of corrections and selected by the behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, behavioral health agency, or private provider as high-priority clients for services and who meet service program entrance criteria. The program shall enroll no more than twenty-five offenders at any one time, or a number of offenders that can be accommodated within the appropriated funding level, and shall seek to fill any vacancies that occur.

(2) Criteria shall include a determination by department of corrections staff that:

(a) The offender suffers from a major mental illness and needs continued mental health treatment;

(b) The offender's previous crime or crimes have been determined by either the court or department of corrections staff to have been substantially influenced by the offender's mental illness;

(c) It is believed the offender will be less likely to commit further criminal acts if provided ongoing mental health care;

(d) The offender is unable or unlikely to obtain housing and/or treatment from other sources for any reason; and

(e) The offender has at least one year remaining before his or her sentence expires but is within six months of release to community housing and is currently housed within a work release facility or any department of corrections' division of prisons facility.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization, managed care organization, behavioral health agency, or private provider shall provide specialized access and services to the selected offenders. The services shall be aimed at lowering the risk of recidivism. An oversight committee composed of a representative of the authority, a representative of the selected managed care organization, behavioral health administrative services organization, or private provider, and a representative of the department of corrections shall develop policies to guide the pilot program, provide dispute resolution including making determinations as to when entrance criteria or required services may be waived in individual cases, advise the department of corrections and the managed care organization, behavioral health administrative services organization, or private provider on the selection of eligible offenders, and set minimum requirements for service contracts. The selected managed care organization, behavioral health administrative services organization, or private provider shall implement the policies and service contracts. The following services shall be provided:

(a) Intensive case management to include a full range of intensive community support and treatment in client-to-staff ratios of not more than ten offenders per case manager including: (i) A minimum of weekly group and weekly individual counseling; (ii) home visits by the program manager at least two times per month; and (iii) counseling focusing on maintaining and promoting ongoing stability, relapse prevention, and ((past, current, or future behavior of the offender))recovery.

(b) The case manager shall attempt to locate and procure housing appropriate to the living and clinical needs of the offender and as needed to maintain the psychiatric stability of the offender. The entire range of emergency, transitional, and permanent housing and involuntary hospitalization must be considered as available housing options. A housing subsidy may be provided to offenders to defray housing costs up to a maximum of six thousand six hundred dollars per offender per year and be administered by the case manager. Additional funding sources may be used to offset these costs when available.

(c) The case manager shall collaborate with the assigned prison, work release, or community corrections staff during release planning, prior to discharge, and in ongoing supervision of the offender while under the authority of the department of corrections.

(d) Medications including the full range of psychotropic medications including atypical antipsychotic medications may be required as a condition of the program. Medication prescription, medication monitoring, and counseling to support offender understanding, acceptance, and compliance with prescribed medication regimens must be included.

(e) A systematic effort to engage offenders to continuously involve themselves in current and long-term treatment and appropriate habilitative activities shall be made.

(f) Classes appropriate to the clinical and living needs of the offender and appropriate to his or her level of understanding.

(g) The case manager shall assist the offender in the application and qualification for entitlement funding, including medicaid, state assistance, and other available government and private assistance at any point that the offender is qualified and resources are available.

(h) The offender shall be provided access to daily activities such as drop-in centers, prevocational and vocational training and jobs, and volunteer activities.

(4) Once an offender has been selected into the pilot program, the offender shall remain in the program until the end of his or her sentence or unless the offender is released from the pilot program earlier by the department of corrections.

(5) Specialized training in the management and supervision of high-crime risk offenders with mental illness shall be provided to all participating mental health providers by the authority and the department of corrections prior to their participation in the program and as requested thereafter.

(((6) The pilot program provided for in this section must be providing services by July 1, 1998.))

Sec. 1029. RCW 71.24.460 and 2018 c 201 s 4030 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority, in collaboration with the department of corrections and the oversight committee created in RCW 71.24.455, shall track outcomes and submit to the legislature annual reports regarding services and outcomes. The reports shall include the following: (1) A statistical analysis regarding the reoffense and reinstitutionalization rate by the enrollees in the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455; (2) a quantitative description of the services provided in the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455; and (3) recommendations for any needed modifications in the services and funding levels to increase the effectiveness of the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455. ((By December 1, 2003, the department shall certify the reoffense rate for enrollees in the program authorized by RCW 71.24.455 to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative committees. If the reoffense rate exceeds fifteen percent, the authorization for the department to conduct the program under RCW 71.24.455 is terminated on January 1, 2004.))

Sec. 1030. RCW 71.24.470 and 2018 c 201 s 4031 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall contract, to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose, for case management services and such other services as the director deems necessary to assist offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370 for participation in the offender reentry community safety program. The contracts may be with ((behavioral health organizations or)) any ((other)) qualified and appropriate entities.

(2) The case manager has the authority to assist these offenders in obtaining the services, as set forth in the plan created under RCW 72.09.370(2), for up to five years. The services may include coordination of mental health services, assistance with unfunded medical expenses, obtaining ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment, housing, employment services, educational or vocational training, independent living skills, parenting education, anger management services, and such other services as the case manager deems necessary.

(3) The legislature intends that funds appropriated for the purposes of RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section ((and distributed to the behavioral health organizations)) are to supplement and not to supplant general funding. Funds appropriated to implement RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section are not to be considered available resources as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the priorities, terms, or conditions in the appropriations act established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(4) The offender reentry community safety program was formerly known as the community integration assistance program.

Sec. 1031. RCW 71.24.480 and 2018 c 201 s 4032 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed or certified service provider ((or behavioral health organization,)) acting in the course of the provider's ((or organization's)) duties under this chapter, is not liable for civil damages resulting from the injury or death of another caused by a participant in the offender reentry community safety program who is a client of the provider or organization, unless the act or omission of the provider or organization constitutes:

(a) Gross negligence;

(b) Willful or wanton misconduct; or

(c) A breach of the duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the client has communicated a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim or victims.

(2) In addition to any other requirements to report violations, the licensed or certified service provider ((and behavioral health organization)) shall report an offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior, regardless of whether there is an ascertainable victim, in progress reports and other established processes that enable courts and supervising entities to assess and address the progress and appropriateness of treatment.

(3) A licensed or certified service provider's ((or behavioral health organization's)) mere act of treating a participant in the offender reentry community safety program is not negligence. Nothing in this subsection alters the licensed or certified service provider's ((or behavioral health organization's)) normal duty of care with regard to the client.

(4) The limited liability provided by this section applies only to the conduct of licensed or certified service providers ((and behavioral health organizations)) and does not apply to conduct of the state.

(5) For purposes of this section, "participant in the offender reentry community safety program" means a person who has been identified under RCW 72.09.370 as an offender who: (a) Is reasonably believed to be dangerous to himself or herself or others; and (b) has a mental disorder.

Sec. 1032. RCW 71.24.490 and 2018 c 201 s 4033 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority must collaborate with ((regional support networks or)) behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and the Washington state institute for public policy to estimate the capacity needs for evaluation and treatment services within each regional service area. Estimated capacity needs shall include consideration of the average occupancy rates needed to provide an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment. ((A regional service network or))Behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations must develop and maintain an adequate plan to provide for evaluation and treatment needs.

Sec. 1033. RCW 71.24.500 and 2018 c 201 s 4034 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of social and health services and the)) authority shall periodically publish written guidance and provide trainings to behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and behavioral health providers related to how these organizations may provide outreach, assistance, transition planning, and rehabilitation case management reimbursable under federal law to persons who are incarcerated, involuntarily hospitalized, or in the process of transitioning out of one of these services. The guidance and trainings may also highlight preventive activities not reimbursable under federal law which may be cost-effective in a managed care environment. The purpose of this written guidance and trainings is to champion best clinical practices including, where appropriate, use of care coordination and long-acting injectable psychotropic medication, and to assist the health community to leverage federal funds and standardize payment and reporting procedures. ((The authority and the department of social and health services shall construe governing laws liberally to effectuate the broad remedial purposes of chapter 154, Laws of 2016, and provide a status update to the legislature by December 31, 2016.))

Sec. 1034. RCW 71.24.520 and 2018 c 201 s 4036 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority, in the operation of the ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder program(([,])), may:

(1) Plan, establish, and maintain prevention and treatment programs as necessary or desirable;

(2) Make contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including managed care contracts for behavioral health services, contracts entered into under RCW 74.09.522, and contracts with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals to pay them for services rendered or furnished to persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, or intoxicated persons;

(3) Enter into agreements for monitoring of verification of qualifications of counselors employed by approved treatment programs;

(4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter and contract, cooperate, and coordinate with other public or private agencies or individuals for those purposes;

(5) Solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant;

(6) Administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to persons with substance use disorders and intoxicated persons of any state plan submitted for federal funding pursuant to federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation;

(7) Coordinate its activities and cooperate with ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder programs in this and other states, and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local, or private agencies in this and other states for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and for the common advancement of ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder programs;

(8) Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

(9) Do other acts and things necessary or convenient to execute the authority expressly granted to it;

(10) Acquire, hold, or dispose of real property or any interest therein, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide treatment programs.

Sec. 1035. RCW 71.24.535 and 2018 c 201 s 4039 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall:

(1) Develop, encourage, and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons in cooperation with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals and provide technical assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

(2) Assure that any ((behavioral health organization managed care contract, or))contract with a managed care ((contract under RCW 74.09.522))organization for behavioral health services or programs for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families((, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons)) provides medically necessary services to medicaid recipients. This must include a continuum of mental health and substance use disorder services consistent with the state's medicaid plan or federal waiver authorities, and nonmedicaid services consistent with priorities established by the authority;

(3) Coordinate the efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism and drug addiction, and treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(4) Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs to provide treatment for persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons who are clients of the correctional system;

(5) Cooperate with the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education, schools, police departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations and individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of substance use disorders, treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and preparing curriculum materials thereon for use at all levels of school education;

(6) Prepare, publish, evaluate, and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals and the consequences of their use;

(7) Develop and implement, as an integral part of substance use disorder treatment programs, an educational program for use in the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, which program shall include the dissemination of information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals, the consequences of their use, the principles of recovery, and HIV and AIDS;

(8) Organize and foster training programs for persons engaged in treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(9) Sponsor and encourage research into the causes and nature of substance use disorders, treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and serve as a clearinghouse for information relating to substance use disorders;

(10) Specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and collect and make available relevant statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

(11) Advise the governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons for inclusion in the state's comprehensive health plan;

(12) Review all state health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding under federal legislation, and advise the governor on provisions to be included relating to substance use disorders;

(13) Assist in the development of, and cooperate with, programs for ((alcohol and other psychoactive chemical))substance use disorder education and treatment for employees of state and local governments and businesses and industries in the state;

(14) Use the support and assistance of interested persons in the community to encourage persons with substance use disorders voluntarily to undergo treatment;

(15) Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs designed to deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while intoxicated;

(16) Encourage general hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without discrimination persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and to provide them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

(17) Encourage all health and disability insurance programs to include substance use disorders as a covered illness; and

(18) Organize and sponsor a statewide program to help court personnel, including judges, better understand substance use disorders and the uses of substance use disorder treatment programs and medications.

Sec. 1036. RCW 71.24.540 and 2018 c 201 s 4040 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall contract with behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or counties ((operating drug courts and counties in the process of implementing new drug courts)), as applicable, for the provision of substance use disorder treatment services ordered by a county-operated drug court.

Sec. 1037. RCW 71.24.545 and 2018 c 201 s 4041 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish by appropriate means a comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(2)(a) The program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment services that includes:

(i) Withdrawal management;

(ii) Residential treatment; and

(iii) Outpatient treatment.

(b) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, or recovery support services.

(3) All appropriate public and private resources shall be coordinated with and used in the program when possible.

(4) The authority may contract for the use of an approved treatment program or other individual or organization if the director considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(5) ((By April 1, 2016,))Treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts. Consistent with RCW 71.24.580, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

Sec. 1038. RCW 71.24.555 and 2018 c 201 s 4042 are each amended to read as follows:

To be eligible to receive its share of liquor taxes and profits, each city and county shall devote no less than two percent of its share of liquor taxes and profits to the support of a substance use disorder program ((approved by the behavioral health organization and the director, and)) licensed or certified by the department of health.

Sec. 1039. RCW 71.24.565 and 2018 c 201 s 4043 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall adopt and may amend and repeal rules for acceptance of persons into the approved treatment program, considering available treatment resources and facilities, for the purpose of early and effective treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons. In establishing the rules, the ((secretary))director shall be guided by the following standards:

(1) If possible a patient shall be treated on a voluntary rather than an involuntary basis.

(2) A patient shall be initially assigned or transferred to outpatient treatment, unless he or she is found to require residential treatment.

(3) A person shall not be denied treatment solely because he or she has withdrawn from treatment against medical advice on a prior occasion or because he or she has relapsed after earlier treatment.

(4) An individualized treatment plan shall be prepared and maintained on a current basis for each patient.

(5) Provision shall be made for a continuum of coordinated treatment services, so that a person who leaves a facility or a form of treatment will have available and use other appropriate treatment.

Sec. 1040. RCW 71.24.580 and 2018 c 205 s 2 and 2018 c 201 s 4044 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for treatment and recovery support services for criminally involved offenders and authorization of these services shall not be subject to determinations of medical necessity. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to continue in the 2019-2021 biennium the policy of transferring to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, including but not limited to the recovery support and other programmatic elements outlined in RCW 2.30.030 authorizing therapeutic courts; and

(b) "Treatment support" includes transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560 and treatment support services. No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).

(10) The authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties which is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided by chapter 290, Laws of 2002. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 290, Laws of 2002.

Sec. 1041. RCW 71.24.600 and 2018 c 201 s 4047 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall not refuse admission for diagnosis, evaluation, guidance or treatment to any applicant because it is determined that the applicant is financially unable to contribute fully or in part to the cost of any services or facilities available under the community behavioral health program ((on alcoholism)).

For nonmedicaid clients, through its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organizations, the authority may limit admissions of such applicants or modify its programs in order to ensure that expenditures for services or programs do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and are allocated by the authority for such services or programs. For nonmedicaid clients, the authority may establish admission priorities in the event that the number of eligible applicants exceeds the limits set by the authority.

Sec. 1042. RCW 71.24.625 and 2018 c 201 s 4052 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied by ((the)) behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations in a consistent and uniform manner. The authority shall also ensure that, to the extent possible within available funds, the ((behavioral health organization-)) designated ((chemical dependency specialists))crisis responders are specifically trained in adolescent ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder issues, the ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder commitment laws, and the criteria for commitment((, as specified in this chapter and chapter 70.96A RCW)).

Sec. 1043. RCW 71.24.630 and 2018 c 201 s 4053 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall maintain an integrated and comprehensive screening and assessment process for substance use and mental disorders and co-occurring substance use and mental disorders.

(a) The process adopted shall include, at a minimum:

(i) An initial screening tool that can be used by intake personnel system-wide and which will identify the most common types of co-occurring disorders;

(ii) An assessment process for those cases in which assessment is indicated that provides an appropriate degree of assessment for most situations, which can be expanded for complex situations;

(iii) Identification of triggers in the screening that indicate the need to begin an assessment;

(iv) Identification of triggers after or outside the screening that indicate a need to begin or resume an assessment;

(v) The components of an assessment process and a protocol for determining whether part or all of the assessment is necessary, and at what point; and

(vi) Emphasis that the process adopted under this section is to replace and not to duplicate existing intake, screening, and assessment tools and processes.

(b) The authority shall consider existing models, including those already adopted by other states, and to the extent possible, adopt an established, proven model.

(c) The integrated, comprehensive screening and assessment process shall be implemented statewide by all substance use disorder and mental health treatment providers ((as well as all designated mental health professionals, designated chemical dependency specialists,)) and designated crisis responders.

(2) The authority shall provide for adequate training to effect statewide implementation ((by the dates designated in this section)) and, upon request, shall report the rates of co-occurring disorders the stage of screening or assessment at which the co-occurring disorder was identified to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) The authority shall establish ((contractual penalties to contracted treatment providers, the behavioral health organizations, and their contracted providers for failure to))performance-based contracts with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations and implement the integrated screening and assessment process.

Sec. 1044. RCW 71.24.845 and 2014 c 225 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((behavioral health organizations shall jointly))authority, in consultation with the established behavioral health administrative services organizations, shall develop a uniform transfer agreement to govern the transfer of clients between behavioral health administrative services organizations, taking into account the needs of the regional service area. ((By September 1, 2013, the behavioral health organizations shall submit the uniform transfer agreement to the department. By December 1, 2013, the department shall establish guidelines to implement the uniform transfer agreement and may modify the uniform transfer agreement as necessary to avoid impacts on state administrative systems.))

Sec. 1045. RCW 71.24.870 and 2017 c 207 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must immediately perform a review of its rules, policies, and procedures related to the documentation requirements for behavioral health services.)) Rules adopted by the department relating to the provision of behavioral health services must:

(a) Identify areas in which duplicative or inefficient documentation requirements can be eliminated or streamlined for providers;

(b) Limit prescriptive requirements for individual initial assessments to allow clinicians to exercise professional judgment to conduct age-appropriate, strength-based psychosocial assessments, including current needs and relevant history according to current best practices;

(c) ((By April 1, 2018, provide a single set of regulations for agencies to follow that provide mental health, substance use disorder, and co-occurring treatment services;

(d))) Exempt providers from duplicative state documentation requirements when the provider is following documentation requirements of an evidence-based, research-based, or state-mandated program that provides adequate protection for patient safety; and

(((e)))(d) Be clear and not unduly burdensome in order to maximize the time available for the provision of care.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, audits conducted by the department relating to provision of behavioral health services must:

(a) Rely on a sampling methodology to conduct reviews of personnel files and clinical records based on written guidelines established by the department that are consistent with the standards of other licensing and accrediting bodies;

(b) Treat organizations with multiple locations as a single entity. The department must not require annual visits at all locations operated by a single entity when a sample of records may be reviewed from a centralized location;

(c) Share audit results with behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations to assist with their review process and, when appropriate, take steps to coordinate and combine audit activities;

(d) ((Coordinate audit functions between the department and the department of health to combine audit activities into a single site visit and eliminate redundancies;

(e))) Not require information to be provided in particular documents or locations when the same information is included or demonstrated elsewhere in the clinical file, except where required by federal law; and

(((f)))(e) Ensure that audits involving manualized programs such as wraparound with intensive services or other evidence or research-based programs are conducted to the extent practicable by personnel familiar with the program model and in a manner consistent with the documentation requirements of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall contract with one or more behavioral health administrative services organizations to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in this chapter and chapter 71.05 RCW to provide crisis services to assigned regional service areas.

(2) For clients eligible for medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, the authority shall contract with one or more managed care organizations as set forth in RCW 71.24.380 and 74.09.871 to provide medically necessary physical and behavioral health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that ongoing coordination between state agencies, the counties, and the behavioral health administrative services organizations is necessary to coordinate the behavioral health system. To this end, the authority shall establish a committee to meet quarterly to address systemic issues.

(2) The committee established in subsection (1) of this section must be convened by the authority, meet quarterly, and include representatives from:

(a) The authority;

(b) The department of social and health services;

(c) The department;

(d) The office of the governor;

(e) One representative from the behavioral health administrative services organization per regional service area; and

(f) One county representative per regional service area.

PART 2

Sec. 2001. RCW 71.34.020 and 2018 c 201 s 5002 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(2) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "((Chemical dependency))Substance use disorder" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.

(5) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(9) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(10) "Designated crisis responder" ((means a person designated by a behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter))has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(11) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(12) (("Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning))"Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately-operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure detoxification facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(18) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(19) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(20) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a handicap, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(21) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(22) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(23) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(24) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified service providers as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(25) "Parent" means:

(a) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the child, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement; or

(b) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(26) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(27) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(28) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(29) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(30) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(31) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(32) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(33) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(34) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(35) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated minors:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the minor;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(36) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(37) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(38) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(39) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

Sec. 2002. RCW 71.34.300 and 2018 c 201 s 5003 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The ((county or combination of counties))authority is responsible for development and coordination of the evaluation and treatment program for minors((, for incorporating the program into the mental health plan,)) and for coordination of evaluation and treatment services and resources with the community ((mental))behavioral health program required under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(((2) The county shall be responsible for maintaining its support of involuntary treatment services for minors at its 1984 level, adjusted for inflation, with the authority responsible for additional costs to the county resulting from this chapter. Maintenance of effort funds devoted to judicial services related to involuntary commitment reimbursed under RCW 71.05.730 must be expended for other purposes that further treatment for mental health and chemical dependency disorders.))

Sec. 2003. RCW 71.34.330 and 2014 c 225 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

Attorneys appointed for minors under this chapter shall be compensated for their services as follows:

(1) Responsible others shall bear the costs of such legal services if financially able according to standards set by the court of the county in which the proceeding is held.

(2) If all responsible others are indigent as determined by these standards, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall reimburse the county in which the proceeding is held for the direct costs of such legal services, as provided in RCW 71.05.730.

Sec. 2004. RCW 71.34.379 and 2011 c 302 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) By December 1, 2011,))Facilities licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW are required to adopt policies and protocols regarding the notice requirements described in RCW 71.34.375((; and

(2) By December 1, 2012, the department, in collaboration with the department of health, shall provide a detailed report to the legislature regarding the facilities' compliance with RCW 71.34.375 and subsection (1) of this section)).

Sec. 2005. RCW 71.34.385 and 2018 c 201 s 5007 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied ((by the counties)) in a consistent and uniform manner. The authority shall also ensure that, to the extent possible within available funds, the designated crisis responders are specifically trained in adolescent mental health issues, the mental health and substance use disorder civil commitment laws, and the criteria for civil commitment.

Sec. 2006. RCW 71.34.415 and 2014 c 225 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

A county may apply to its behavioral health administrative services organization for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter, as provided in RCW 71.05.730.

Sec. 2007. RCW 71.34.670 and 2018 c 201 s 2001 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall adopt rules defining "appropriately trained professional person" operating within their scope of practice within Title 18 RCW for the purposes of conducting mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder evaluations under RCW 71.34.600(3) and 71.34.650(1).

Sec. 2008. RCW 71.34.750 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 276 and 2016 c 155 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist(([,])), a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment:

(a) The court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(i) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(ii) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(iii) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(b) If commitment is for a substance use disorder, the court must find that there is an available approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the ((secretary))director for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

Sec. 2009. RCW 71.34.750 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 277 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist(([,])), a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment, the court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(a) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(b) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(c) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the ((secretary))director for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

Sec. 2010. RCW 71.36.010 and 2018 c 201 s 5023 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agency" means a state, tribal, or local governmental entity or a private not-for-profit organization.

(2) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means ((a county authority or group of county authorities or other nonprofit entity that has entered into contracts with the health care authority pursuant to))an entity contracted with the health care authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under section 1046 of this act, including crisis services and administration of the involuntary treatment act, chapter 71.05 RCW, for all individuals in a defined regional service area under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age, except as expressly provided otherwise in state or federal law.

(4) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(5) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners or county executive.

(6) "Early periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment" means the component of the federal medicaid program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(r), as amended.

(7) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population.

(8) "Family" means a child's biological parents, adoptive parents, foster parents, guardian, legal custodian authorized pursuant to Title 26 RCW, a relative with whom a child has been placed by the department of social and health services, or a tribe.

(9) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the health care authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(10) "Promising practice" or "emerging best practice" means a practice that presents, based upon preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.

(((10)))(11) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

(((11)))(12) "Wraparound process" means a family driven planning process designed to address the needs of children and youth by the formation of a team that empowers families to make key decisions regarding the care of the child or youth in partnership with professionals and the family's natural community supports. The team produces a community-based and culturally competent intervention plan which identifies the strengths and needs of the child or youth and family and defines goals that the team collaborates on achieving with respect for the unique cultural values of the family. The "wraparound process" shall emphasize principles of persistence and outcome-based measurements of success.

Sec. 2011. RCW 71.36.025 and 2018 c 201 s 5024 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the goal of the legislature that((, by 2012,)) the children's mental health system in Washington state include the following elements:

(a) A continuum of services from early identification, intervention, and prevention through crisis intervention and inpatient treatment, including peer support and parent mentoring services;

(b) Equity in access to services for similarly situated children, including children with co-occurring disorders;

(c) Developmentally appropriate, high quality, and culturally competent services available statewide;

(d) Treatment of each child in the context of his or her family and other persons that are a source of support and stability in his or her life;

(e) A sufficient supply of qualified and culturally competent children's mental health providers;

(f) Use of developmentally appropriate evidence-based and research-based practices;

(g) Integrated and flexible services to meet the needs of children who, due to mental illness or emotional or behavioral disturbance, are at risk of out-of-home placement or involved with multiple child-serving systems.

(2) The effectiveness of the children's mental health system shall be determined through the use of outcome-based performance measures. The health care authority and the evidence-based practice institute established in RCW 71.24.061, in consultation with parents, caregivers, youth, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, mental health services providers, health plans, primary care providers, tribes, and others, shall develop outcome-based performance measures such as:

(a) Decreased emergency room utilization;

(b) Decreased psychiatric hospitalization;

(c) Lessening of symptoms, as measured by commonly used assessment tools;

(d) Decreased out-of-home placement, including residential, group, and foster care, and increased stability of such placements, when necessary;

(e) Decreased runaways from home or residential placements;

(f) Decreased rates of ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder;

(g) Decreased involvement with the juvenile justice system;

(h) Improved school attendance and performance;

(i) Reductions in school or child care suspensions or expulsions;

(j) Reductions in use of prescribed medication where cognitive behavioral therapies are indicated;

(k) Improved rates of high school graduation and employment; and

(l) Decreased use of mental health services upon reaching adulthood for mental disorders other than those that require ongoing treatment to maintain stability.

Performance measure reporting for children's mental health services should be integrated into existing performance measurement and reporting systems developed and implemented under chapter 71.24 RCW.

Sec. 2012. RCW 71.36.040 and 2018 c 201 s 5025 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The legislature supports recommendations made in the August 2002 study of the public mental health system for children conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(2))) The health care authority shall, within available funds:

(a) Identify internal business operation issues that limit the ((agency's))authority's ability to meet legislative intent to coordinate existing categorical children's mental health programs and funding;

(b) Collect reliable mental health cost, service, and outcome data specific to children. This information must be used to identify best practices and methods of improving fiscal management;

(c) Revise the early and periodic screening diagnosis and treatment plan to reflect the mental health system structure in place ((on July 27, 2003, and thereafter revise the plan)) as necessary to conform to ((subsequent)) changes in the structure.

(((3)))(2) The health care authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly identify school districts where mental health and education systems coordinate services and resources to provide public mental health care for children. The health care authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work together to share information about these approaches with other school districts, managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and state agencies.

PART 3

Sec. 3001. RCW 71.05.020 and 2018 c 305 s 1, 2018 c 291 s 1, and 2018 c 201 s 3001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "((Chemical dependency))Substance use disorder" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires;

(8) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(9) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(10) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(11) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department ((under RCW 71.24.035)), such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(12) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(13) "Department" means the department of health;

(14) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county((,))or an entity appointed by the county, ((or the behavioral health organization)) to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(15) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(16) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(17) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(18) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(19) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(20) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(21) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(22) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(23) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(24) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court. For purposes of this chapter, at any hearing the petitioner, the respondent, the witnesses, and the presiding judicial officer may be present and participate either in person or by video, as determined by the court. The term "video" as used herein shall include any functional equivalent. At any hearing conducted by video, the technology used must permit the judicial officer, counsel, all parties, and the witnesses to be able to see, hear, and speak, when authorized, during the hearing; to allow attorneys to use exhibits or other materials during the hearing; and to allow respondent's counsel to be in the same location as the respondent unless otherwise requested by the respondent or the respondent's counsel. Witnesses in a proceeding may also appear in court through other means, including telephonically, pursuant to the requirements of superior court civil rule 43. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court, upon its own motion or upon a motion for good cause by any party, may require all parties and witnesses to participate in the hearing in person rather than by video. In ruling on any such motion, the court may allow in-person or video testimony; and the court may consider, among other things, whether the respondent's alleged mental illness affects the respondent's ability to perceive or participate in the proceeding by video;

(25) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(26) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(27) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(28) "Information related to mental health services" means all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;

(29) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(30) "In need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment" means that a person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary behavioral health treatment during the preceding thirty-six months; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, based on a history of nonadherence with treatment or in view of the person's current behavior; (c) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (d) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time;

(31) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(32) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public mental health and substance use disorder service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(33) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585;

(34) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(35) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(36) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(37) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(38) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(39) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery systems or behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW, approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section, secure detoxification facilities as defined in this section, and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(40) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(41) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW;

(42) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders;

(43) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, chemical dependency professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(44) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(45) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(46) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(47) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure detoxification facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(48) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(49) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(50) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(51) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated persons:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(52) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(54) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(55) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(56) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(57) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department ((under RCW 71.24.035)), which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(58) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 3002. RCW 71.05.025 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature intends that the procedures and services authorized in this chapter be integrated with those in chapter 71.24 RCW to the maximum extent necessary to assure a continuum of care to persons with mental illness or who have mental disorders or substance use disorders, as defined in either or both this chapter and chapter 71.24 RCW. To this end, behavioral health administrative services organizations established in accordance with chapter 71.24 RCW shall institute procedures which require timely consultation with resource management services by designated crisis responders, managed care organizations, evaluation and treatment facilities, secure detoxification facilities, and approved substance use disorder treatment programs to assure that determinations to admit, detain, commit, treat, discharge, or release persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders under this chapter are made only after appropriate information regarding such person's treatment history and current treatment plan has been sought from resource management services.

Sec. 3003. RCW 71.05.026 and 2018 c 201 s 3002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for monetary damage claims which have been reduced to final judgment by a superior court, this section applies to all claims against the state, state agencies, state officials, or state employees that exist on or arise after March 29, 2006.

(2) Except as expressly provided in contracts entered into by((between)) the authority ((and the behavioral health organizations after March 29, 2006)), the entities identified in subsection (3) of this section shall have no claim for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, judicial review under chapter 34.05 RCW, or civil liability against the state or state agencies for actions or inactions performed pursuant to the administration of this chapter with regard to the following: (a) The allocation or payment of federal or state funds; (b) the use or allocation of state hospital beds; or (c) financial responsibility for the provision of inpatient mental health care or inpatient substance use disorder treatment.

(3) This section applies to counties, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and entities which contract to provide behavioral health ((organization)) services and their subcontractors, agents, or employees.

Sec. 3004. RCW 71.05.027 and 2018 c 201 s 3003 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) Not later than January 1, 2007,))All persons providing treatment under this chapter shall also ((implement the))provide an integrated comprehensive screening and assessment process for ((chemical dependency))substance use disorders and mental disorders adopted pursuant to RCW 71.24.630 ((and shall document the numbers of clients with co-occurring mental and substance abuse disorders based on a quadrant system of low and high needs)).

(((2) Treatment providers and behavioral health organizations who fail to implement the integrated comprehensive screening and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental disorders by July 1, 2007, shall be subject to contractual penalties established under RCW 71.24.630.))

Sec. 3005. RCW 71.05.110 and 2014 c 225 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

Attorneys appointed for persons pursuant to this chapter shall be compensated for their services as follows: (1) The person for whom an attorney is appointed shall, if he or she is financially able pursuant to standards as to financial capability and indigency set by the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is held, bear the costs of such legal services; (2) if such person is indigent pursuant to such standards, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall reimburse the county in which the proceeding is held for the direct costs of such legal services, as provided in RCW 71.05.730.

Sec. 3006. RCW 71.05.203 and 2018 c 201 s 3006 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority and each behavioral health administrative services organization or agency employing designated crisis responders shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated crisis responder decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must inform the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201 and, to the extent feasible, provide the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator with written or electronic information about the petition process. If provision of written or electronic information is not feasible, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must refer the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to a web site where published information on the petition process may be accessed. The designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must document the manner and date on which the information required under this subsection was provided to the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator.

(3) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must, upon request, disclose the date of a designated crisis responder investigation under this chapter to an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator of a person to assist in the preparation of a petition under RCW 71.05.201.

Sec. 3007. RCW 71.05.300 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The petition for ninety day treatment shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court at least three days before expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment. At the time of filing such petition, the clerk shall set a time for the person to come before the court on the next judicial day after the day of filing unless such appearance is waived by the person's attorney, and the clerk shall notify the designated crisis responder. The designated crisis responder shall immediately notify the person detained, his or her attorney, if any, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, the prosecuting attorney, and the behavioral health administrative services organization administrator, and provide a copy of the petition to such persons as soon as possible. The behavioral health administrative services organization administrator or designee may review the petition and may appear and testify at the full hearing on the petition.

(2) At the time set for appearance the detained person shall be brought before the court, unless such appearance has been waived and the court shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented by an attorney, his or her right to a jury trial, and, if the petition is for commitment for mental health treatment, his or her loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed. If the detained person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested, appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist, psychiatrist, or other professional person, designated by the detained person to examine and testify on behalf of the detained person.

(3) The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 to seek less restrictive alternative courses of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person. In the case of a person with a developmental disability who has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), then the appointed professional person under this section shall be a developmental disabilities professional.

(4) The court shall also set a date for a full hearing on the petition as provided in RCW 71.05.310.

Sec. 3008. RCW 71.05.365 and 2016 sp.s. c 37 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person has been involuntarily committed for treatment to a hospital for a period of ninety or one hundred eighty days, and the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital determines that the person no longer requires active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care, the behavioral health administrative services organization, ((full integration entity under RCW 71.24.380))managed care organization, or agency providing oversight of long-term care or developmental disability services that is responsible for resource management services for the person must work with the hospital to develop an individualized discharge plan and arrange for a transition to the community in accordance with the person's individualized discharge plan within fourteen days of the determination.

Sec. 3009. RCW 71.05.445 and 2018 c 201 s 3021 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a mental health service provider conducts its initial assessment for a person receiving court-ordered treatment, the service provider shall inquire and shall be told by the offender whether he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections.

(b) When a person receiving court-ordered treatment or treatment ordered by the department of corrections discloses to his or her mental health service provider that he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections, the mental health service provider shall notify the department of corrections that he or she is treating the offender and shall notify the offender that his or her community corrections officer will be notified of the treatment, provided that if the offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562 or 71.05.132 and the offender has provided the mental health service provider with a copy of the order granting relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562 or 71.05.132, the mental health service provider is not required to notify the department of corrections that the mental health service provider is treating the offender. The notification may be written or oral and shall not require the consent of the offender. If an oral notification is made, it must be confirmed by a written notification. For purposes of this section, a written notification includes notification by email or facsimile, so long as the notifying mental health service provider is clearly identified.

(2) The information to be released to the department of corrections shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties.

(3) The authority and the department of corrections, in consultation with behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, mental health service providers as defined in RCW 71.05.020, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(4) The information received by the department of corrections under this section shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in this chapter, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(5) No mental health service provider or individual employed by a mental health service provider shall be held responsible for information released to or used by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section.

(6) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information and records related to mental health services for any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(7) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

(8) The authority shall, subject to available resources, electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services, and addresses of specific behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, and mental health service providers that delivered mental health services to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between the authority and the department of corrections.

Sec. 3010. RCW 71.05.458 and 2016 c 158 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

As soon as possible, but no later than twenty-four hours from receiving a referral from a law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, a mental health professional contacted by the designated ((mental health professional))crisis responder agency must attempt to contact the referred person to determine whether additional mental health intervention is necessary, including, if needed, an assessment by a designated ((mental health professional))crisis responder for initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153. Documentation of the mental health professional's attempt to contact and assess the person must be maintained by the designated ((mental health professional))crisis responder agency.

Sec. 3011. RCW 71.05.730 and 2015 c 250 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county may apply to its behavioral health administrative services organization on a quarterly basis for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health administrative services organization shall in turn be entitled to reimbursement from the behavioral health administrative services organization that serves the county of residence of the individual who is the subject of the civil commitment case. ((Reimbursements under this section shall be paid out of the behavioral health organization's nonmedicaid appropriation.))

(2) Reimbursement for judicial services shall be provided per civil commitment case at a rate to be determined based on an independent assessment of the county's actual direct costs. This assessment must be based on an average of the expenditures for judicial services within the county over the past three years. In the event that a baseline cannot be established because there is no significant history of similar cases within the county, the reimbursement rate shall be equal to eighty percent of the median reimbursement rate of counties included in the independent assessment.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Civil commitment case" includes all judicial hearings related to a single episode of hospitalization or less restrictive alternative treatment, except that the filing of a petition for a one hundred eighty-day commitment under this chapter or a petition for a successive one hundred eighty-day commitment under chapter 71.34 RCW shall be considered to be a new case regardless of whether there has been a break in detention. "Civil commitment case" does not include the filing of a petition for a one hundred eighty-day commitment under this chapter on behalf of a patient at a state psychiatric hospital.

(b) "Judicial services" means a county's reasonable direct costs in providing prosecutor services, assigned counsel and defense services, court services, and court clerk services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.

(4) To the extent that resources have a shared purpose, the behavioral health administrative services organization may only reimburse counties to the extent such resources are necessary for and devoted to judicial services as described in this section.

(5) No filing fee may be charged or collected for any civil commitment case subject to reimbursement under this section.

Sec. 3012. RCW 71.05.740 and 2018 c 201 s 3031 are each amended to read as follows:

All behavioral health administrative services organizations in the state of Washington must forward historical mental health involuntary commitment information retained by the organization, including identifying information and dates of commitment to the authority. As soon as feasible, the behavioral health administrative services organizations must arrange to report new commitment data to the authority within twenty-four hours. Commitment information under this section does not need to be resent if it is already in the possession of the authority. Behavioral health administrative services organizations and the authority shall be immune from liability related to the sharing of commitment information under this section.

Sec. 3013. RCW 71.05.750 and 2018 c 201 s 3033 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A designated crisis responder shall make a report to the authority when he or she determines a person meets detention criteria under RCW 71.05.150, 71.05.153, 71.34.700, or 71.34.710 and there are not any beds available at an evaluation and treatment facility, the person has not been provisionally accepted for admission by a facility, and the person cannot be served on a single bed certification or less restrictive alternative. Starting at the time when the designated crisis responder determines a person meets detention criteria and the investigation has been completed, the designated crisis responder has twenty-four hours to submit a completed report to the authority.

(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must contain at a minimum:

(a) The date and time that the investigation was completed;

(b) The identity of the responsible behavioral health administrative services organization and managed care organization, if applicable;

(c) The county in which the person met detention criteria;

(d) A list of facilities which refused to admit the person; and

(e) Identifying information for the person, including age or date of birth.

(3) The authority shall develop a standardized reporting form or modify the current form used for single bed certifications for the report required under subsection (2) of this section and may require additional reporting elements as it determines are necessary or supportive. The authority shall also determine the method for the transmission of the completed report from the designated crisis responder to the authority.

(4) The authority shall create quarterly reports displayed on its web site that summarize the information reported under subsection (2) of this section. At a minimum, the reports must display data by county and by month. The reports must also include the number of single bed certifications granted by category. The categories must include all of the reasons that the authority recognizes for issuing a single bed certification, as identified in rule.

(5) The reports provided according to this section may not display "protected health information" as that term is used in the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, nor information contained in "mental health treatment records" as that term is used in chapter 70.02 RCW or elsewhere in state law, and must otherwise be compliant with state and federal privacy laws.

(6) For purposes of this section, the term "single bed certification" means a situation in which an adult on a seventy-two hour detention, fourteen-day commitment, ninety-day commitment, or one hundred eighty-day commitment is detained to a facility that is:

(a) Not licensed or certified as an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility; or

(b) A licensed or certified inpatient evaluation and treatment facility that is already at capacity.

Sec. 3014. RCW 71.05.755 and 2018 c 201 s 3034 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall promptly share reports it receives under RCW 71.05.750 with the responsible ((regional support network or)) behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable. The ((regional support network or)) behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, receiving this notification must attempt to engage the person in appropriate services for which the person is eligible and report back within seven days to the authority.

(2) The authority shall track and analyze reports submitted under RCW 71.05.750. The authority must initiate corrective action when appropriate to ensure that each ((regional support network or)) behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, has implemented an adequate plan to provide evaluation and treatment services. Corrective actions may include remedies under ((RCW 71.24.330 and 74.09.871, including requiring expenditure of reserve funds))the authority's contract with such entity. An adequate plan may include development of less restrictive alternatives to involuntary commitment such as crisis triage, crisis diversion, voluntary treatment, or prevention programs reasonably calculated to reduce demand for evaluation and treatment under this chapter.

Sec. 3015. RCW 71.05.760 and 2018 c 201 s 3035 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) ((By April 1, 2018, the authority, by rule, must combine the functions of a designated mental health professional and designated chemical dependency specialist by establishing a designated crisis responder who is authorized to conduct investigations, detain persons up to seventy-two hours to the proper facility, and carry out the other functions identified in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.)) The ((behavioral health organizations))authority or its designee shall provide training to the designated crisis responders ((as required by the authority)).

(b)(i) To qualify as a designated crisis responder, a person must have received ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder training as determined by the ((department))authority and be a:

(A) Psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker;

(B) Person who is licensed by the department as a mental health counselor or mental health counselor associate, or marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist associate;

(C) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university and who have, in addition, at least two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental health professional;

(D) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which waiver was granted before 1986;

(E) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a mental health professional that was requested by the regional support network and granted by the department of social and health services before July 1, 2001; or

(F) Person who has been granted an exception of the minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

(ii) Training must include ((chemical dependency)) training specific to the duties of a designated crisis responder, including diagnosis of substance abuse and dependence and assessment of risk associated with substance use.

(((c) The authority must develop a transition process for any person who has been designated as a designated mental health professional or a designated chemical dependency specialist before April 1, 2018, to be converted to a designated crisis responder. The behavioral health organizations shall provide training, as required by the authority, to persons converting to designated crisis responders, which must include both mental health and chemical dependency training applicable to the designated crisis responder role.))

(2)(a) The authority must ensure that at least one sixteen-bed secure detoxification facility is operational by April 1, 2018, and that at least two sixteen-bed secure detoxification facilities are operational by April 1, 2019.

(b) If, at any time during the implementation of secure detoxification facility capacity, federal funding becomes unavailable for federal match for services provided in secure detoxification facilities, then the authority must cease any expansion of secure detoxification facilities until further direction is provided by the legislature.

PART 4

Sec. 4001. RCW 74.09.337 and 2017 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For children who are eligible for medical assistance and who have been identified as requiring mental health treatment, the authority must oversee the coordination of resources and services through (a) the managed health care system as defined in RCW 74.09.325 and (b) tribal organizations providing health care services. The authority must ensure the child receives treatment and appropriate care based on their assessed needs, regardless of whether the referral occurred through primary care, school-based services, or another practitioner.

(2) The authority must require each managed health care system as defined in RCW 74.09.325 ((and each behavioral health organization)) to develop and maintain adequate capacity to facilitate child mental health treatment services in the community ((or transfers to a behavioral health organization, depending on the level of required care)). Managed health care systems ((and behavioral health organizations)) must:

(a) Follow up with individuals to ensure an appointment has been secured;

(b) Coordinate with and report back to primary care provider offices on individual treatment plans and medication management, in accordance with patient confidentiality laws;

(c) Provide information to health plan members and primary care providers about the behavioral health resource line available twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week; and

(d) Maintain an accurate list of providers contracted to provide mental health services to children and youth. The list must contain current information regarding the providers' availability to provide services. The current list must be made available to health plan members and primary care providers.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2020.

Sec. 4002. RCW 74.09.495 and 2018 c 175 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To better assure and understand issues related to network adequacy and access to services, the authority ((and the department)) shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, on the status of access to behavioral health services for children (([from]))from birth through age seventeen using data collected pursuant to RCW 70.320.050.

(2) At a minimum, the report must include the following components broken down by age, gender, and race and ethnicity:

(a) The percentage of discharges for patients ages six through seventeen who had a visit to the emergency room with a primary diagnosis of mental health or alcohol or other drug dependence during the measuring year and who had a follow-up visit with any provider with a corresponding primary diagnosis of mental health or alcohol or other drug dependence within thirty days of discharge;

(b) The percentage of health plan members with an identified mental health need who received mental health services during the reporting period;

(c) The percentage of children served by behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations, including the types of services provided;

(d) The number of children's mental health providers available in the previous year, the languages spoken by those providers, and the overall percentage of children's mental health providers who were actively accepting new patients; and

(e) Data related to mental health and medical services for eating disorder treatment in children and youth by county, including the number of:

(i) Eating disorder diagnoses;

(ii) Patients treated in outpatient, residential, emergency, and inpatient care settings; and

(iii) Contracted providers specializing in eating disorder treatment and the overall percentage of those providers who were actively accepting new patients during the reporting period.

Sec. 4003. RCW 74.09.515 and 2014 c 225 s 100 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall adopt rules and policies providing that when youth who were enrolled in a medical assistance program immediately prior to confinement are released from confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review of their continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required under federal or state law.

(2) The authority, in collaboration with the department, county juvenile court administrators, managed care organizations, the department of children, youth, and families, and behavioral health administrative services organizations, shall establish procedures for coordination ((between department))among field offices, juvenile rehabilitation ((administration)) institutions, and county juvenile courts that result in prompt reinstatement of eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for youth who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:

(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services' applications on behalf of confined youth in anticipation of their release from confinement;

(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of confined youth and, to the extent practicable, completion of the review before the youth is released; and

(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services' identity cards to youth eligible for medical assistance services immediately upon their release from confinement.

(3) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means detained in a facility operated by or under contract with the department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation administration, or detained in a juvenile detention facility operated under chapter 13.04 RCW.

(4) The authority shall adopt standardized statewide screening and application practices and forms designed to facilitate the application of a confined youth who is likely to be eligible for a medical assistance program.

Sec. 4004. RCW 74.09.522 and 2018 c 201 s 7017 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Managed health care system" means any health care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services covered under this chapter or other applicable law and rendered by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(b) "Nonparticipating provider" means a person, health care provider, practitioner, facility, or entity, acting within their scope of practice, that does not have a written contract to participate in a managed health care system's provider network, but provides health care services to enrollees of programs authorized under this chapter or other applicable law whose health care services are provided by the managed health care system.

(2) The authority shall enter into agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care services to recipients of ((temporary assistance for needy families))medicaid under the following conditions:

(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand recipients statewide;

(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of all recipients of ((temporary assistance for needy families))programs as allowed for in the approved state plan amendment or federal waiver for Washington state's medicaid program;

(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the authority may limit recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority shall not restrict a recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as established by the authority by rule;

(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the authority under federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(e)(i) In negotiating with managed health care systems the authority shall adopt a uniform procedure to enter into contractual arrangements((, to be included in contracts issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2015)), including:

(A) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;

(B) The financial integrity of the responding system;

(C) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care management within health homes, including comprehensive medication management services for patients with multiple chronic conditions consistent with the findings and goals established in RCW 74.09.5223;

(D) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that, by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and inpatient use;

(E) Promoting provider participation in the program of training and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to support provider participation in the training, unless the managed care system is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for chronic care management;

(F) Provider reimbursement methods within the medical billing processes that incentivize pharmacists or other qualified providers licensed in Washington state to provide comprehensive medication management services consistent with the findings and goals established in RCW 74.09.5223;

(G) Evaluation and reporting on the impact of comprehensive medication management services on patient clinical outcomes and total health care costs, including reductions in emergency department utilization, hospitalization, and drug costs; and

(H) Established consistent processes to incentivize integration of behavioral health services in the primary care setting, promoting care that is integrated, collaborative, colocated, and preventive.

(ii)(A) Health home services contracted for under this subsection may be prioritized to enrollees with complex, high cost, or multiple chronic conditions.

(B) Contracts that include the items in (e)(i)(C) through (G) of this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the absence of these provisions;

(f) The authority shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary to implement this chapter;

(g) The authority shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is not possible or feasible, the authority may enter into prepaid capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;

(h) The authority shall define those circumstances under which a managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services;

(i) Nothing in this section prevents the authority from entering into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive services under this chapter; and

(j) The authority must consult with the federal center for medicare and medicaid innovation and seek funding opportunities to support health homes.

(3) The authority shall ensure that publicly supported community health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems are seriously considered as contractors. The authority shall coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter 70.47 RCW.

(4) The authority shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and other states in this geographical region in order to develop recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while controlling related costs.

(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a large number of managed health care system options for medicaid clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status, continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized. To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall guide the authority in its healthy options managed health care purchasing efforts:

(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to contract with the authority to the extent that minimum contracting requirements defined by the authority are met, at payment rates that enable the authority to operate as far below appropriated spending levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this section.

(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:

(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income populations;

(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;

(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services offered to enrollees;

(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services, including ability to supply an adequate provider network;

(v) Payment rates; and

(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract requirements established by the authority, including consideration of past and current performance and participation in other state or federal health programs as a contractor.

(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year contracting periods.

(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.

(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state laws. The authority shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the Washington state health care authority to take action under a contract upon finding that a contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's ability to meet its contract obligations.

(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the authority and contract bidders or the authority and contracting carriers related to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be clearly set out in the procurement document.

(6) The authority may apply the principles set forth in subsection (5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to the extent appropriate.

(7) ((By April 1, 2016,))Any contract with a managed health care system to provide services to medical assistance enrollees shall require that managed health care systems offer contracts to ((behavioral health organizations,)) mental health providers((, or chemical dependency))and substance use disorder treatment providers to provide access to primary care services integrated into behavioral health clinical settings, for individuals with behavioral health and medical comorbidities.

(8) Managed health care system contracts effective on or after April 1, 2016, shall serve geographic areas that correspond to the regional service areas established in RCW 74.09.870.

(9) A managed health care system shall pay a nonparticipating provider that provides a service covered under this chapter or other applicable law to the system's enrollee no more than the lowest amount paid for that service under the managed health care system's contracts with similar providers in the state if the managed health care system has made good faith efforts to contract with the nonparticipating provider.

(10) For services covered under this chapter or other applicable law to medical assistance or medical care services enrollees ((and provided on or after August 24, 2011)), nonparticipating providers must accept as payment in full the amount paid by the managed health care system under subsection (9) of this section in addition to any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment that is due from the enrollee for the service provided. An enrollee is not liable to any nonparticipating provider for covered services, except for amounts due for any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment under the terms and conditions set forth in the managed health care system contract to provide services under this section.

(11) Pursuant to federal managed care access standards, 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438, managed health care systems must maintain a network of appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the contract with the authority, including hospital-based physician services. The authority will monitor and periodically report on the proportion of services provided by contracted providers and nonparticipating providers, by county, for each managed health care system to ensure that managed health care systems are meeting network adequacy requirements. No later than January 1st of each year, the authority will review and report its findings to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature for the preceding state fiscal year.

(12) Payments under RCW 74.60.130 are exempt from this section.

(13) Subsections (9) through (11) of this section expire July 1, 2021.

Sec. 4005. RCW 74.09.555 and 2014 c 225 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall adopt rules and policies providing that when persons with a mental disorder, who were enrolled in medical assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released from confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review of their continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required under federal or state law.

(2) The authority, in collaboration with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of corrections, managed care organizations, and ((the)) behavioral health administrative services organizations, shall establish procedures for coordination between the authority and department field offices, institutions for mental disease, and correctional institutions, as defined in RCW 9.94.049, that result in prompt reinstatement of eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:

(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of their release from confinement;

(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the review before the person is released;

(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services identity cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services immediately upon their release from confinement; and

(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration, through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of applications for federal supplemental security income or social security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of applications on behalf of confined persons.

(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional institution or institution for mental diseases shall provide the authority with that information for purposes of making medical assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the person's release from confinement. The authority shall, to the maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in making its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible for medical assistance.

(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means incarcerated in a correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049, or admitted to an institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R. part 435, Sec. 1009 on July 24, 2005.

(5) For purposes of this section, "likely to be eligible" means that a person:

(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or the medical care services program immediately before he or she was confined and his or her enrollment was terminated during his or her confinement; or

(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or the medical care services program at any time during the five years before his or her confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations during the person's confinement indicate that the person continues to be disabled and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months following release.

(6) The economic services administration within the department shall adopt standardized statewide screening and application practices and forms designed to facilitate the application of a confined person who is likely to be eligible for medicaid.

Sec. 4006. RCW 74.09.871 and 2018 c 201 s 2007 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any agreement or contract by the authority to provide behavioral health services as defined under RCW 71.24.025 to persons eligible for benefits under medicaid, Title XIX of the social security act, and to persons not eligible for medicaid must include the following:

(a) Contractual provisions consistent with the intent expressed in RCW 71.24.015((,))and 71.36.005((, and 70.96A.011));

(b) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided, including increased use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(c) Accountability for the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes;

(d) Standards requiring behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations to maintain a network of appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the contract with the authority and to protect essential ((existing)) behavioral health system infrastructure and capacity, including a continuum of ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder services;

(e) Provisions to require that medically necessary ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder and mental health treatment services be available to clients;

(f) Standards requiring the use of behavioral health service provider reimbursement methods that incentivize improved performance with respect to the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act) and 71.36.025, integration of behavioral health and primary care services at the clinical level, and improved care coordination for individuals with complex care needs;

(g) Standards related to the financial integrity of the ((responding organization. The authority shall adopt rules establishing the solvency requirements and other financial integrity standards for behavioral health organizations))contracting entity. This subsection does not limit the authority of the authority to take action under a contract upon finding that a ((behavioral health organization's))contracting entity's financial status jeopardizes the ((organization's))contracting entity's ability to meet its contractual obligations;

(h) Mechanisms for monitoring performance under the contract and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the requirements of the contract including, but not limited to, financial deductions, termination of the contract, receivership, reprocurement of the contract, and injunctive remedies;

(i) Provisions to maintain the decision-making independence of designated ((mental health professionals or designated chemical dependency specialists))crisis responders; and

(j) Provisions stating that public funds appropriated by the legislature may not be used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II, United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.

(2) The following factors must be given significant weight in any ((purchasing))procurement process under this section:

(a) Demonstrated commitment and experience in serving low-income populations;

(b) Demonstrated commitment and experience serving persons who have mental illness, ((chemical dependency))substance use disorders, or co-occurring disorders;

(c) Demonstrated commitment to and experience with partnerships with county and municipal criminal justice systems, housing services, and other critical support services necessary to achieve the outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act), 70.320.020, and 71.36.025;

(d) Recognition that meeting enrollees' physical and behavioral health care needs is a shared responsibility of contracted behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed ((health)) care ((systems))organizations, service providers, the state, and communities;

(e) Consideration of past and current performance and participation in other state or federal behavioral health programs as a contractor; and

(f) The ability to meet requirements established by the authority.

(3) For purposes of purchasing behavioral health services and medical care services for persons eligible for benefits under medicaid, Title XIX of the social security act and for persons not eligible for medicaid, the authority must use regional service areas. The regional service areas must be established by the authority as provided in RCW 74.09.870.

(4) Consideration must be given to using multiple-biennia contracting periods.

(5) Each behavioral health administrative services organization operating pursuant to a contract issued under this section shall ((enroll))serve clients within its regional service area who meet the authority's eligibility criteria for mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder services within available resources.

PART 5

Sec. 5001. RCW 9.41.280 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks," consisting of two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other means;

(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars," which are multipointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect;

(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas; or

(f)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun which projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(ii) Any device, object, or instrument which is used or intended to be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric shock, charge, or impulse.

(2) Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation or indication of such violation.

Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been examined and evaluated by the designated crisis responder unless the court in its discretion releases the person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail.

Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the person to the designated crisis responder for examination and evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The designated crisis responder shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any examination by the designated crisis responder, the results of the examination shall be sent to the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any determination about the person.

The designated crisis responder shall, to the extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the person is detained or confined.

If the designated crisis responder determines it is appropriate, the designated crisis responder may refer the person to the local behavioral health administrative services organization for follow-up services ((or the department of social and health services)) or other community providers for other services to the family and individual.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on the property of the academy;

(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school district security activities. However, a person who is not a commissioned law enforcement officer and who provides school security services under the direction of a school administrator may not possess a device listed in subsection (1)(f) of this section unless he or she has successfully completed training in the use of such devices that is equivalent to the training received by commissioned law enforcement officers;

(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed;

(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or air gun competition approved by the school or school district;

(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;

(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;

(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school; or

(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5) Subsection (1)(f)(i) of this section does not apply to any person who possesses a device listed in subsection (1)(f)(i) of this section, if the device is possessed and used solely for the purpose approved by a school for use in a school authorized event, lecture, or activity conducted on the school premises.

(6) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school building.

(7) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

Sec. 5002. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 524 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);

(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6);

(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the United States;

(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance;

(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation order during the period of the sentence;

(f) The end of the standard sentence range for the current offense is greater than one year; and

(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current offense.

(2) A motion for a special drug offender sentencing alternative may be made by the court, the offender, or the state.

(3) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is eligible for an alternative sentence under this section and that the alternative sentence is appropriate, the court shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.662 or a residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.664. The residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment-based alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months or less.

(4) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may order the department to complete either or both a risk assessment report and a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder screening report as provided in RCW 9.94A.500.

(5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence under the residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment-based alternative, the court may order an examination of the offender by the department. The examination shall, at a minimum, address the following issues:

(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;

(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that criminal behavior will occur in the future;

(iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)); and

(iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the alternative.

(b) The examination report must contain:

(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others; and

(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions.

(6) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this section:

(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703 and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers appropriate. In addition, an offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring for alcohol or controlled substances.

(b) The department may impose conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 and 9.94A.737.

(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.

(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of this subsection.

(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense at any time during the period of community custody if the offender violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.

(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under (c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously served under this section.

(8) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon failure to complete, or administrative termination from, the special drug offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall receive no credit for time served in community custody prior to termination of the offender's participation in the program.

(9) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period served in total confinement.

(10) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under a special drug offender sentencing alternative may be paid, at the option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice treatment account under RCW 71.24.580.

Sec. 5003. RCW 9.94A.664 and 2009 c 389 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence for a residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment-based alternative shall include a term of community custody equal to one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater, conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment certified ((under chapter 70.96A RCW))by the department of health for a period set by the court between three and six months.

(2)(a) The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody, treatment and other conditions as proposed in the examination report completed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.

(b) If the court imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within available resources, make ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the term of community custody.

(3)(a) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the treatment provider must send the treatment plan to the court within thirty days of the offender's arrival to the residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment program.

(b) Upon receipt of the plan, the court shall schedule a progress hearing during the period of residential ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment, and schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the expiration of the term of community custody.

(c) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment.

(4) At a progress hearing or treatment termination hearing, the court may:

(a) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community custody status on the expiration date determined under subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of community custody; or

(c) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.701.

(5) If the court imposes a term of total confinement, the department shall, within available resources, make ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the term of total confinement and subsequent term of community custody.

Sec. 5004. RCW 10.31.110 and 2014 c 225 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the individual has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is not a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and the individual is known by history or consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization to suffer from a mental disorder, the arresting officer may:

(a) Take the individual to a crisis stabilization unit as defined in RCW 71.05.020(((6))). Individuals delivered to a crisis stabilization unit pursuant to this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours. The individual must be examined by a mental health professional within three hours of arrival;

(b) Take the individual to a triage facility as defined in RCW 71.05.020. An individual delivered to a triage facility which has elected to operate as an involuntary facility may be held up to a period of twelve hours. The individual must be examined by a mental health professional within three hours of arrival;

(c) Refer the individual to a mental health professional for evaluation for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 71.05 RCW; or

(d) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary participation in outpatient treatment.

(2) If the individual is released to the community, the mental health provider shall inform the arresting officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the arresting officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(3) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under this section, the police officer shall be guided by standards mutually agreed upon with the prosecuting authority, which address, at a minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal history of the individual, the mental health history of the individual, where available, and the circumstances surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.

(4) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not require individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding the criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental health treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any criminal or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity from prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.

(5) If an individual violates such agreement and the mental health treatment alternative is no longer appropriate:

(a) The mental health provider shall inform the referring law enforcement agency of the violation; and

(b) The original charges may be filed or referred to the prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed accordingly.

(6) The police officer is immune from liability for any good faith conduct under this section.

Sec. 5005. RCW 10.77.010 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Admission" means acceptance based on medical necessity, of a person as a patient.

(2) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less-restrictive setting.

(3) "Conditional release" means modification of a court-ordered commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(4) A "criminally insane" person means any person who has been acquitted of a crime charged by reason of insanity, and thereupon found to be a substantial danger to other persons or to present a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security unless kept under further control by the court or other persons or institutions.

(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health services.

(6) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(7) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter, pending evaluation.

(8) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist or psychologist, or a social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary.

(9) "Developmental disability" means the condition as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5).

(10) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(11) "Furlough" means an authorized leave of absence for a resident of a state institution operated by the department designated for the custody, care, and treatment of the criminally insane, consistent with an order of conditional release from the court under this chapter, without any requirement that the resident be accompanied by, or be in the custody of, any law enforcement or institutional staff, while on such unescorted leave.

(12) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct.

(13) "History of one or more violent acts" means violent acts committed during: (a) The ten-year period of time prior to the filing of criminal charges; plus (b) the amount of time equal to time spent during the ten-year period in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(14) "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, sibling, or domestic partner.

(15) "Incompetency" means a person lacks the capacity to understand the nature of the proceedings against him or her or to assist in his or her own defense as a result of mental disease or defect.

(16) "Indigent" means any person who is financially unable to obtain counsel or other necessary expert or professional services without causing substantial hardship to the person or his or her family.

(17) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual release, and a projected possible date for release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.

(18) "Professional person" means:

(a) A psychiatrist licensed as a physician and surgeon in this state who has, in addition, completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology or the American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry;

(b) A psychologist licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW; or

(c) A social worker with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(19) (("Registration records" include all the records of the department, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services to the department, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness.

(20))) "Release" means legal termination of the court-ordered commitment under the provisions of this chapter.

(((21)))(20) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee.

(((22)))(21) "Treatment" means any currently standardized medical or mental health procedure including medication.

(((23)))(22) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(((24)))(23) "Violent act" means behavior that: (a)(i) Resulted in; (ii) if completed as intended would have resulted in; or (iii) was threatened to be carried out by a person who had the intent and opportunity to carry out the threat and would have resulted in, homicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property; or (b) recklessly creates an immediate risk of serious physical injury to another person. As used in this subsection, "nonfatal injuries" means physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. "Nonfatal injuries" shall be construed to be consistent with the definition of "bodily injury," as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

Sec. 5006. RCW 10.77.065 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) The expert conducting the evaluation shall provide his or her report and recommendation to the court in which the criminal proceeding is pending. For a competency evaluation of a defendant who is released from custody, if the evaluation cannot be completed within twenty-one days due to a lack of cooperation by the defendant, the evaluator shall notify the court that he or she is unable to complete the evaluation because of such lack of cooperation.

(ii) A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to the designated crisis responder, the prosecuting attorney, the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(iv) of this subsection. Upon request, the evaluator shall also provide copies of any source documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated crisis responder.

(iii) Any facility providing inpatient services related to competency shall discharge the defendant as soon as the facility determines that the defendant is competent to stand trial. Discharge shall not be postponed during the writing and distribution of the evaluation report. Distribution of an evaluation report by a facility providing inpatient services shall ordinarily be accomplished within two working days or less following the final evaluation of the defendant. If the defendant is discharged to the custody of a local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must continue the medication regimen prescribed by the facility, when clinically appropriate, unless the defendant refuses to cooperate with medication and an involuntary medication order by the court has not been entered.

(iv) If there is no professional person at the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, a professional person at the behavioral health administrative services organization to receive the report and recommendation.

(v) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must notify the evaluator of the name of the professional person, or person designated under (a)(iv) of this subsection, to receive the report and recommendation.

(b) If the evaluator concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the person should be evaluated by a designated crisis responder under chapter 71.05 RCW, the court shall order such evaluation be conducted prior to release from confinement when the person is acquitted or convicted and sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less, or when charges are dismissed pursuant to a finding of incompetent to stand trial.

(2) The designated crisis responder shall provide written notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW. The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of any proceedings commenced by the designated crisis responder under subsection (2) of this section to the secretary.

(4) A facility conducting a civil commitment evaluation under RCW 10.77.086(4) or 10.77.088(1)(c)(ii) that makes a determination to release the person instead of filing a civil commitment petition must provide written notice to the prosecutor and defense attorney at least twenty-four hours prior to release. The notice may be given by email, facsimile, or other means reasonably likely to communicate the information immediately.

(5) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

Sec. 5007. RCW 13.40.165 and 2016 c 106 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW ((70.96A.520))71.24.615. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to assure that minors in need of ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorder treatment receive an appropriate continuum of culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and residential treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the department that provide these services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver these services. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to protect the rights of minors against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty and to enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs and in accordance with sound professional judgment. The mental health, substance abuse, and co-occurring disorder treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer services that involve minors' parents, guardians, and family.

(2) The court must consider eligibility for the ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder or mental health disposition alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50 RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent, substance abusing, or has significant mental health or co-occurring disorders may order an examination by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder counselor from a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW or a mental health professional as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW to determine if the youth is chemically dependent, substance abusing, or suffers from significant mental health or co-occurring disorders. The offender shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(3) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems, mental health diagnoses, previous treatment attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's information.

(4) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;

(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;

(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and

(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

(5) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and the court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(6)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section.

(b) If the court determines that this disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol, mental health, or co-occurring disorder treatment and/or inpatient mental health or drug/alcohol treatment. The court shall only order inpatient treatment under this section if a funded bed is available. If the inpatient treatment is longer than ninety days, the court shall hold a review hearing every thirty days beyond the initial ninety days. The respondent may appear telephonically at these review hearings if in compliance with treatment. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community supervision and other sanctions, including up to thirty days of confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community restitution, and payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.

(7) The mental health/co-occurring disorder/drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers appropriate.

If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.

(8) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim" may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent, disabled, or deceased.

(9) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.

(10) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

(11) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(12) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the costs incurred by the juvenile courts for the mental health, ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder, and/or co-occurring disorder evaluations, treatment, and costs of supervision required under this section shall be paid by the ((department))health care authority.

Sec. 5008. RCW 36.28A.440 and 2018 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a mental health field response grant program. The purpose of the program is to assist local law enforcement agencies to establish and expand mental health field response capabilities, utilizing mental health professionals to professionally, humanely, and safely respond to crises involving persons with behavioral health issues with treatment, diversion, and reduced incarceration time as primary goals. A portion of the grant funds may also be used to develop data management capability to support the program.

(2) Grants must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies based on locally developed proposals to incorporate mental health professionals into the agencies' mental health field response planning and response. Two or more agencies may submit a joint grant proposal to develop their mental health field response proposals. Proposals must provide a plan for improving mental health field response and diversion from incarceration through modifying or expanding law enforcement practices in partnership with mental health professionals. A peer review panel appointed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in consultation with ((integrated)) managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations must review the grant applications. Once the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs certifies that the application satisfies the proposal criteria, the grant funds will be distributed. To the extent possible, at least one grant recipient agency should be from the east side of the state and one from the west side of the state with the crest of the Cascades being the dividing line. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall make every effort to fund at least eight grants per fiscal year with funding provided for this purpose from all allowable sources under this section. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may prioritize grant applications that include local matching funds. Grant recipients must be selected and receiving funds no later than October 1, 2018.

(3) Grant recipients must include at least one mental health professional who will perform professional services under the plan. A mental health professional may assist patrolling officers in the field or in an on-call capacity, provide preventive, follow-up, training on mental health field response best practices, or other services at the direction of the local law enforcement agency. Nothing in this subsection (3) limits the mental health professional's participation to field patrol. Grant recipients are encouraged to coordinate with local public safety answering points to maximize the goals of the program.

(4) Within existing resources, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall:

(a) Consult with the department of social and health services research and data analysis unit to establish data collection and reporting guidelines for grant recipients. The data will be used to study and evaluate whether the use of mental health field response programs improves outcomes of interactions with persons experiencing behavioral health crises, including reducing rates of violence and harm, reduced arrests, and jail or emergency room usage;

(b) Consult with the ((department of social and health services behavioral health administration))health care authority, the department of health, and the managed care system to develop requirements for participating mental health professionals; and

(c) Coordinate with public safety answering points, behavioral health, and the department of social and health services to develop and incorporate telephone triage criteria or dispatch protocols to assist with mental health, law enforcement, and emergency medical responses involving mental health situations.

(5) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program. The report must include information on grant recipients, use of funds, participation of mental health professionals, and feedback from the grant recipients by December 1st of each year the program is funded.

(6) Grant recipients shall develop and provide or arrange for training necessary for mental health professionals to operate successfully and competently in partnership with law enforcement agencies. The training must provide the professionals with a working knowledge of law enforcement procedures and tools sufficient to provide for the safety of the professionals, partnered law enforcement officers, and members of the public.

(7) Nothing in this section prohibits the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs from soliciting or accepting private funds to support the program created in this section.

Sec. 5009. RCW 41.05.690 and 2014 c 223 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a performance measures committee, the purpose of which is to identify and recommend standard statewide measures of health performance to inform public and private health care purchasers and to propose benchmarks to track costs and improvements in health outcomes.

(2) Members of the committee must include representation from state agencies, small and large employers, health plans, patient groups, federally recognized tribes, consumers, academic experts on health care measurement, hospitals, physicians, and other providers. The governor shall appoint the members of the committee, except that a statewide association representing hospitals may appoint a member representing hospitals, and a statewide association representing physicians may appoint a member representing physicians. The governor shall ensure that members represent diverse geographic locations and both rural and urban communities. The chief executive officer of the lead organization must also serve on the committee. The committee must be chaired by the director of the authority.

(3) The committee shall develop a transparent process for selecting performance measures, and the process must include opportunities for public comment.

(4) By January 1, 2015, the committee shall submit the performance measures to the authority. The measures must include dimensions of:

(a) Prevention and screening;

(b) Effective management of chronic conditions;

(c) Key health outcomes;

(d) Care coordination and patient safety; and

(e) Use of the lowest cost, highest quality care for preventive care and acute and chronic conditions.

(5) The committee shall develop a measure set that:

(a) Is of manageable size;

(b) Is based on readily available claims and clinical data;

(c) Gives preference to nationally reported measures and, where nationally reported measures may not be appropriate, measures used by state agencies that purchase health care or commercial health plans;

(d) Focuses on the overall performance of the system, including outcomes and total cost;

(e) Is aligned with the governor's performance management system measures and common measure requirements specific to medicaid delivery systems under RCW 70.320.020 and 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act);

(f) Considers the needs of different stakeholders and the populations served; and

(g) Is usable by multiple payers, providers, hospitals, purchasers, public health, and communities as part of health improvement, care improvement, provider payment systems, benefit design, and administrative simplification for providers and hospitals.

(6) State agencies shall use the measure set developed under this section to inform and set benchmarks for purchasing decisions.

(7) The committee shall establish a public process to periodically evaluate the measure set and make additions or changes to the measure set as needed.

Sec. 5010. RCW 43.20A.895 and 2014 c 225 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The systems responsible for financing, administration, and delivery of publicly funded mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder services to adults must be designed and administered to achieve improved outcomes for adult clients served by those systems through increased use and development of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices, as defined in RCW 71.24.025. For purposes of this section, client outcomes include: Improved health status; increased participation in employment and education; reduced involvement with the criminal justice system; enhanced safety and access to treatment for forensic patients; reduction in avoidable utilization of and costs associated with hospital, emergency room, and crisis services; increased housing stability; improved quality of life, including measures of recovery and resilience; and decreased population level disparities in access to treatment and treatment outcomes.

(2) The ((department and the health care)) authority must implement a strategy for the improvement of the ((adult)) behavioral health system.

(((a) The department must establish a steering committee that includes at least the following members: Behavioral health service recipients and their families; local government; representatives of behavioral health organizations; representatives of county coordinators; law enforcement; city and county jails; tribal representatives; behavioral health service providers, including at least one chemical dependency provider and at least one psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; housing providers; medicaid managed care plan representatives; long-term care service providers; organizations representing health care professionals providing services in mental health settings; the Washington state hospital association; the Washington state medical association; individuals with expertise in evidence-based and research-based behavioral health service practices; and the health care authority.

(b) The adult behavioral health system improvement strategy must include:

(i) An assessment of the capacity of the current publicly funded behavioral health services system to provide evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices;

(ii) Identification, development, and increased use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices;

(iii) Design and implementation of a transparent quality management system, including analysis of current system capacity to implement outcomes reporting and development of baseline and improvement targets for each outcome measure provided in this section;

(iv) Identification and phased implementation of service delivery, financing, or other strategies that will promote improvement of the behavioral health system as described in this section and incentivize the medical care, behavioral health, and long-term care service delivery systems to achieve the improvements described in this section and collaborate across systems. The strategies must include phased implementation of public reporting of outcome and performance measures in a form that allows for comparison of performance and levels of improvement between geographic regions of Washington; and

(v) Identification of effective methods for promoting workforce capacity, efficiency, stability, diversity, and safety.

(c) The department must seek private foundation and federal grant funding to support the adult behavioral health system improvement strategy.

(d) By May 15, 2014, the Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the department, the University of Washington evidence-based practice institute, the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute, and the Washington institute for mental health research and training, shall prepare an inventory of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices for prevention and intervention services pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The department shall use the inventory in preparing the behavioral health improvement strategy. The department shall provide the institute with data necessary to complete the inventory.

(e) By August 1, 2014, the department must report to the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of implementation of the behavioral health improvement strategy, including strategies developed or implemented to date, timelines, and costs to accomplish phased implementation of the adult behavioral health system improvement strategy.

(3) The department must contract for the services of an independent consultant to review the provision of forensic mental health services in Washington state and provide recommendations as to whether and how the state's forensic mental health system should be modified to provide an appropriate treatment environment for individuals with mental disorders who have been charged with a crime while enhancing the safety and security of the public and other patients and staff at forensic treatment facilities. By August 1, 2014, the department must submit a report regarding the recommendations of the independent consultant to the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.))

Sec. 5011. RCW 43.20C.030 and 2014 c 225 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of social and health services, in consultation with a university-based evidence-based practice institute entity in Washington, the Washington partnership council on juvenile justice, the child mental health systems of care planning committee, the children, youth, and family advisory committee, the health care authority, the Washington state racial disproportionality advisory committee, a university-based child welfare research entity in Washington state, behavioral health administrative services organizations established in chapter 71.24 RCW, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators, and the Washington state institute for public policy, shall:

(1) Develop strategies to use unified and coordinated case plans for children, youth, and their families who are or are likely to be involved in multiple systems within the department;

(2) Use monitoring and quality control procedures designed to measure fidelity with evidence-based and research-based prevention and treatment programs; and

(3) Utilize any existing data reporting and system of quality management processes at the state and local level for monitoring the quality control and fidelity of the implementation of evidence-based and research-based practices.

Sec. 5012. RCW 43.185.060 and 2014 c 225 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

Organizations that may receive assistance from the department under this chapter are local governments, local housing authorities, behavioral health administrative services organizations established under chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations.

Eligibility for assistance from the department under this chapter also requires compliance with the revenue and taxation laws, as applicable to the recipient, at the time the grant is made.

Sec. 5013. RCW 43.185.070 and 2015 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the department for the housing assistance program, the department must announce to all known interested parties, and through major media throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least ninety days' duration. This announcement must be made as often as the director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The department must then promptly grant as many applications as will utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the department as provided in RCW 43.185.050.

(2) In awarding funds under this chapter, the department must:

(a) Provide for a geographic distribution on a statewide basis; and

(b) Until June 30, 2013, consider the total cost and per-unit cost of each project for which an application is submitted for funding under RCW 43.185.050(2) (a) and (j), as compared to similar housing projects constructed or renovated within the same geographic area.

(3) The department, with advice and input from the affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020, or a subcommittee of the affordable housing advisory board, must report recommendations for awarding funds in a cost-effective manner. The report must include an implementation plan, timeline, and any other items the department identifies as important to consider to the legislature by December 1, 2012.

(4) The department must give first priority to applications for projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit public development authorities and public housing authorities as created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such projects and activities must be evaluated under subsection (5) of this section. Second priority must be given to activities and projects which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All projects and activities must be evaluated by some or all of the criteria under subsection (5) of this section, and similar projects and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria.

(5) The department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar projects and activities must be evaluated under the same criteria:

(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;

(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special needs populations;

(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;

(d) Local government project contributions in the form of infrastructure improvements, and others;

(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other project-related responsibility opportunities;

(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;

(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and resources to implement the project;

(h) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;

(i) Projects that provide housing for persons and families with the lowest incomes;

(j) Projects serving special needs populations which are under statutory mandate to develop community housing;

(k) Project location and access to employment centers in the region or area;

(l) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities for disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as defined in RCW 50.72.020;

(m) Project location and access to available public transportation services; and

(n) Projects involving collaborative partnerships between local school districts and either public housing authorities or nonprofit housing providers, that help children of low-income families succeed in school. To receive this preference, the local school district must provide an opportunity for community members to offer input on the proposed project at the first scheduled school board meeting following submission of the grant application to the department.

(((6) The department may only approve applications for projects for persons with mental illness that are consistent with a behavioral health organization six-year capital and operating plan.))

Sec. 5014. RCW 43.185.110 and 2014 c 225 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

The affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020 shall advise the director on housing needs in this state, including housing needs for persons with mental illness or developmental disabilities or youth who are blind or deaf or otherwise disabled, operational aspects of the grant and loan program or revenue collection programs established by this chapter, and implementation of the policy and goals of this chapter. Such advice shall be consistent with policies and plans developed by behavioral health administrative services organizations according to chapter 71.24 RCW for individuals with mental illness and the developmental disabilities planning council for individuals with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 5015. RCW 43.185C.340 and 2016 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall administer a grant program that links homeless students and their families with stable housing located in the homeless student's school district. The goal of the program is to provide educational stability for homeless students by promoting housing stability.

(2) The department, working with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall develop a competitive grant process to make grant awards of no more than one hundred thousand dollars per school, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars per school district, to school districts partnered with eligible organizations on implementation of the proposal. For the purposes of this subsection, "eligible organization" means any local government, local housing authority, ((regional support network))behavioral health administrative services organization established under chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of Washington, or regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organization. Applications for the grant program must include contractual agreements between the housing providers and school districts defining the responsibilities and commitments of each party to identify, house, and support homeless students.

(3) The grants awarded to school districts shall not exceed fifteen school districts per school year. In determining which partnerships will receive grants, preference must be given to districts with a demonstrated commitment of partnership and history with eligible organizations.

(4) Activities eligible for assistance under this grant program include but are not limited to:

(a) Rental assistance, which includes utilities, security and utility deposits, first and last month's rent, rental application fees, moving expenses, and other eligible expenses to be determined by the department;

(b) Transportation assistance, including gasoline assistance for families with vehicles and bus passes;

(c) Emergency shelter; and

(d) Housing stability case management.

(5) All beneficiaries of funds from the grant program must be unaccompanied youth or from very low-income households. For the purposes of this subsection, "very low-income household" means an unaccompanied youth or family or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than fifty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the grant recipient is located.

(6)(a) Grantee school districts must compile and report information to the department. The department shall report to the legislature the findings of the grantee, the housing stability of the homeless families, the academic performance of the grantee population, and any related policy recommendations.

(b) Data on all program participants must be entered into and tracked through the Washington homeless client management information system as described in RCW 43.185C.180.

(7) In order to ensure that school districts are meeting the requirements of an approved program for homeless students, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the programs at least once every two years. Monitoring shall begin during the 2016-17 school year.

(8) Any program review and monitoring under this section may be conducted concurrently with other program reviews and monitoring conducted by the department. In its review, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor program components that include but need not be limited to the process used by the district to identify and reach out to homeless students, assessment data and other indicators to determine how well the district is meeting the academic needs of homeless students, district expenditures used to expand opportunities for these students, and the academic progress of students under the program.

Sec. 5016. RCW 43.380.050 and 2016 c 188 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the council is empowered to:

(a) Meet at such times and places as necessary;

(b) Advise the legislature and the governor on issues relating to reentry and reintegration of offenders;

(c) Review, study, and make policy and funding recommendations on issues directly and indirectly related to reentry and reintegration of offenders in Washington state, including, but not limited to: Correctional programming and other issues in state and local correctional facilities; housing; employment; education; treatment; and other issues contributing to recidivism;

(d) Apply for, receive, use, and leverage public and private grants as well as specifically appropriated funds to establish, manage, and promote initiatives and programs related to successful reentry and reintegration of offenders;

(e) Contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out initiatives and programs;

(f) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly administration of initiatives and programs;

(g) Create committees and subcommittees of the council as is necessary for the council to conduct its business; and

(h) Create and consult with advisory groups comprising nonmembers. Advisory groups are not eligible for reimbursement under RCW 43.380.060.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the council may select an executive director to administer the business of the council.

(a) The council may delegate to the executive director by resolution all duties necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the council. Approval by a majority vote of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the executive director.

(b) The executive director may not be a member of the council while serving as executive director.

(c) Employment of the executive director must be confirmed by the senate and terminates after a term of three years. At the end of a term, the council may consider hiring the executive director for an additional three-year term or an extension of a specified period less than three years. The council may fix the compensation of the executive director.

(d) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the executive director shall reside in and be funded by the department.

(3) In conducting its business, the council shall solicit input and participation from stakeholders interested in reducing recidivism, promoting public safety, and improving community conditions for people reentering the community from incarceration. The council shall consult: The two largest caucuses in the house of representatives; the two largest caucuses in the senate; the governor; local governments; educators; ((mental health and substance abuse))behavioral health providers; behavioral health administrative services organizations; managed care organizations; city and county jails; the department of corrections; specialty courts; persons with expertise in evidence-based and research-based reentry practices; and persons with criminal histories and their families.

(4) The council shall submit to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature a preliminary report of its activities and recommendations by December 1st of its first year of operation, and every two years thereafter.

Sec. 5017. RCW 48.01.220 and 2014 c 225 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

The activities and operations of ((mental health)) behavioral health administrative services organizations, ((to the extent they pertain to the operation of a medical assistance managed care system in accordance with chapters 71.24 and 74.09 RCW))as defined in RCW 71.24.025, are exempt from the requirements of this title.

Sec. 5018. RCW 66.08.180 and 2011 c 325 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210. However, the board shall reserve from distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.

(1) All license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; hotel; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; spirits, beer, and wine VIP airport lounge; and sports entertainment facility licenses shall every three months be disbursed by the board as follows:

(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW 68.50.107; and

(b) Of the remaining funds:

(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research and for the dissemination of such research; and

(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the ((department of social and health services))health care authority solely to carry out the purposes of RCW ((70.96A.050))71.24.535;

(2) The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW 66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the board to the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention programs for kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the superintendent of public instruction;

(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and 66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the ((department of social and health services))health care authority solely to carry out the purposes of RCW ((70.96A.050))71.24.535; and

(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210 shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the department of social and health services and appropriated are separately accounted for.

Sec. 5019. RCW 70.02.010 and 2018 c 201 s 8001 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(2) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Commitment" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(5) "Custody" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(6) "Deidentified" means health information that does not identify an individual and with respect to which there is no reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual.

(7) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(8) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(9) "Detention" or "detain" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(10) "Directory information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, location within a health care facility, and the general health condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(11) "Discharge" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(12) "Evaluation and treatment facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(13) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an officer of any agency or authority in the United States, a state, a tribe, a territory, or a political subdivision of a state, a tribe, or a territory who is empowered by law to: (a) Investigate or conduct an official inquiry into a potential criminal violation of law; or (b) prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal proceeding arising from an alleged violation of law.

(14) "General health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(15) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.

(16) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides health care to patients.

(17) "Health care information" means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health care, including a patient's deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs. The term includes any required accounting of disclosures of health care information.

(18) "Health care operations" means any of the following activities of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor to the extent that the activities are related to functions that make an entity a health care provider, a health care facility, or a third-party payor:

(a) Conducting: Quality assessment and improvement activities, including outcomes evaluation and development of clinical guidelines, if the obtaining of generalizable knowledge is not the primary purpose of any studies resulting from such activities; population-based activities relating to improving health or reducing health care costs, protocol development, case management and care coordination, contacting of health care providers and patients with information about treatment alternatives; and related functions that do not include treatment;

(b) Reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals, evaluating practitioner and provider performance and third-party payor performance, conducting training programs in which students, trainees, or practitioners in areas of health care learn under supervision to practice or improve their skills as health care providers, training of nonhealth care professionals, accreditation, certification, licensing, or credentialing activities;

(c) Underwriting, premium rating, and other activities relating to the creation, renewal, or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health benefits, and ceding, securing, or placing a contract for reinsurance of risk relating to claims for health care, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, if any applicable legal requirements are met;

(d) Conducting or arranging for medical review, legal services, and auditing functions, including fraud and abuse detection and compliance programs;

(e) Business planning and development, such as conducting cost-management and planning-related analyses related to managing and operating the health care facility or third-party payor, including formulary development and administration, development, or improvement of methods of payment or coverage policies; and

(f) Business management and general administrative activities of the health care facility, health care provider, or third-party payor including, but not limited to:

(i) Management activities relating to implementation of and compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) Customer service, including the provision of data analyses for policy holders, plan sponsors, or other customers, provided that health care information is not disclosed to such policy holder, plan sponsor, or customer;

(iii) Resolution of internal grievances;

(iv) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor with another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor or an entity that following such activity will become a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, and due diligence related to such activity; and

(v) Consistent with applicable legal requirements, creating deidentified health care information or a limited dataset for the benefit of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor.

(19) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(20) "Human immunodeficiency virus" or "HIV" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(21) "Imminent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(22) "Information and records related to mental health services" means a type of health care information that relates to all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services by a mental health service agency or mental health professional to persons who are receiving or have received services for mental illness. The term includes mental health information contained in a medical bill, registration records, as defined in RCW ((71.05.020))70.97.010, and all other records regarding the person maintained by the department, by the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staff, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW and their staff, and by treatment facilities. The term further includes documents of legal proceedings under chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information. For health care information maintained by a hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020 or a health care facility or health care provider that participates with a hospital in an organized health care arrangement defined under federal law, "information and records related to mental health services" is limited to information and records of services provided by a mental health professional or information and records of services created by a hospital-operated behavioral health program as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The term does not include psychotherapy notes.

(23) "Information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases" means a type of health care information that relates to the identity of any person upon whom an HIV antibody test or other sexually transmitted infection test is performed, the results of such tests, and any information relating to diagnosis of or treatment for any confirmed sexually transmitted infections.

(24) "Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research subjects.

(25) "Legal counsel" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(26) "Local public health officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(27) "Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(28) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of health under chapter 71.05 RCW, whether that person works in a private or public setting.

(29) "Mental health service agency" means a public or private agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020 and receives funding from public sources. This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW 71.34.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or behavioral health programs, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(30) "Minor" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(31) "Parent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(32) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(33) "Payment" means:

(a) The activities undertaken by:

(i) A third-party payor to obtain premiums or to determine or fulfill its responsibility for coverage and provision of benefits by the third-party payor; or

(ii) A health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, to obtain or provide reimbursement for the provision of health care; and

(b) The activities in (a) of this subsection that relate to the patient to whom health care is provided and that include, but are not limited to:

(i) Determinations of eligibility or coverage, including coordination of benefits or the determination of cost-sharing amounts, and adjudication or subrogation of health benefit claims;

(ii) Risk adjusting amounts due based on enrollee health status and demographic characteristics;

(iii) Billing, claims management, collection activities, obtaining payment under a contract for reinsurance, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, and related health care data processing;

(iv) Review of health care services with respect to medical necessity, coverage under a health plan, appropriateness of care, or justification of charges;

(v) Utilization review activities, including precertification and preauthorization of services, and concurrent and retrospective review of services; and

(vi) Disclosure to consumer reporting agencies of any of the following health care information relating to collection of premiums or reimbursement:

(A) Name and address;

(B) Date of birth;

(C) Social security number;

(D) Payment history;

(E) Account number; and

(F) Name and address of the health care provider, health care facility, and/or third-party payor.

(34) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(35) "Professional person" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(36) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(37) "Psychotherapy notes" means notes recorded, in any medium, by a mental health professional documenting or analyzing the contents of conversations during a private counseling session or group, joint, or family counseling session, and that are separated from the rest of the individual's medical record. The term excludes mediation prescription and monitoring, counseling session start and stop times, the modalities and frequencies of treatment furnished, results of clinical tests, and any summary of the following items: Diagnosis, functional status, the treatment plan, symptoms, prognosis, and progress to date.

(38) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a basic office visit.

(39) "Release" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(40) "Resource management services" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(41) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(42) "Sexually transmitted infection" or "sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as "sexually transmitted disease" in RCW 70.24.017.

(43) "Test for a sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(44) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan, excluding fitness or wellness plans; or a state or federal health benefit program.

(45) "Treatment" means the provision, coordination, or management of health care and related services by one or more health care providers or health care facilities, including the coordination or management of health care by a health care provider or health care facility with a third party; consultation between health care providers or health care facilities relating to a patient; or the referral of a patient for health care from one health care provider or health care facility to another.

(46) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

Sec. 5020. RCW 70.02.230 and 2018 c 201 s 8002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, RCW 70.02.050, 71.05.445, 74.09.295, 70.02.210, 70.02.240, 70.02.250, and 70.02.260, or pursuant to a valid authorization under RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission to a provider for mental health services and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing mental health services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies must be confidential.

(2) Information and records related to mental health services, other than those obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW, may be disclosed only:

(a) In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the requirements of chapter 71.05 RCW, in the provision of services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings if provided to a professional person:

(i) Employed by the facility;

(ii) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;

(iii) Who is a designated crisis responder;

(iv) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(v) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the person is confined or supervised; or

(vi) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of a facility in which the patient resides or will reside;

(c)(i) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such a designation;

(ii) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any:

(A) The information that the person is presently a patient in the facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;

(B) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and

(iii) Other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator;

(d)(i) To the courts as necessary to the administration of chapter 71.05 RCW or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter 10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter 10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for the purpose of competency restoration.

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(e)(i) When a mental health professional or designated crisis responder is requested by a representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the mental health professional or designated crisis responder shall, if requested to do so, advise the representative in writing of the results of the investigation including a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person investigated. The written report must be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(f) To the attorney of the detained person;

(g) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2), 71.05.340(1)(b), and 71.05.335. The prosecutor must be provided access to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others. Information must be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the person's counsel;

(h)(i) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(i)(i) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act;

(j) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in those sections;

(k) Upon the death of a person. The person's next of kin, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, must be notified. Next of kin who are of legal age and competent must be notified under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children, brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient are governed by RCW 70.02.140;

(l) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after the death of a patient;

(m) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(((iii)))(iv). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(ii) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(((iii)))(iv);

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(n) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee;

(o) Pursuant to lawful order of a court;

(p) To qualified staff members of the department, to the authority, to ((the director of)) behavioral health administrative services organizations, to managed care organizations, to resource management services responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment modality or facility;

(q) Within the mental health service agency where the patient is receiving treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to perform their duties;

(r) Within the department and the authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or substance use disorder of persons who are under the supervision of the department;

(s) Between the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse of persons who are under the supervision of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(t) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the information and records related to mental health services could be injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure must be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;

(u)(i) Consistent with the requirements of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, to:

(A) A health care provider who is providing care to a patient, or to whom a patient has been referred for evaluation or treatment; or

(B) Any other person who is working in a care coordinator role for a health care facility or health care provider or is under an agreement pursuant to the federal health insurance portability and accountability act with a health care facility or a health care provider and requires the information and records to assure coordinated care and treatment of that patient.

(ii) A person authorized to use or disclose information and records related to mental health services under this subsection (2)(u) must take appropriate steps to protect the information and records relating to mental health services.

(iii) Psychotherapy notes may not be released without authorization of the patient who is the subject of the request for release of information;

(v) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (u) of this subsection;

(w) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from one evaluation and treatment facility to another. The release of records under this subsection is limited to the information and records related to mental health services required by law, a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record;

(x) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(y) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information must notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the request and of the resource management services' right to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the additional information;

(z) To all current treating providers of the patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient within the last twelve months. For purposes of coordinating health care, the department or the authority may release without written authorization of the patient, information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in RCW 70.02.050(1)(d). The department, or the authority, if applicable, shall notify the patient that billing and collection information has been released to named providers, and provide the substance of the information released and the dates of such release. Neither the department nor the authority may release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the client;

(aa)(i) To the secretary of social and health services and the director of the health care authority for either program evaluation or research, or both so long as the secretary or director, where applicable, adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both. Such rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding persons who have received services such that the person who received such services is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . ."

(ii) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary, or director, where applicable;

(bb) To any person if the conditions in RCW 70.02.205 are met.

(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the information and records related to mental health services of any patient who receives treatment for ((chemical dependency))a substance use disorder, the department or the authority may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(4) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a particular person who is committed to the department of social and health services or the authority under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(4)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.

(5) The fact of admission to a provider of mental health services, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside that chapter without the written authorization of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in RCW 70.02.260, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(4)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW must be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained.

(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of the provisions of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:

(i) One thousand dollars; or

(ii) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any.

(b) It is not a prerequisite to recovery under this subsection that the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with special, as contrasted with general, damages.

(c) Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her ward, in violation of the provisions of this section, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this subsection.

(d) The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail in any action authorized by this subsection, reasonable attorney fees in addition to those otherwise provided by law.

(e) If an action is brought under this subsection, no action may be brought under RCW 70.02.170.

Sec. 5021. RCW 70.02.250 and 2018 c 201 s 8004 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Information and records related to mental health services delivered to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW must be released, upon request, by a mental health service agency to department of corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations, supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community. The request must be in writing and may not require the consent of the subject of the records.

(2) The information to be released to the department of corrections must include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties, including those records and reports identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The authority shall, subject to available resources, electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services, and addresses of specific behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, and mental health service agencies that delivered mental health services to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between the authority and the department of corrections.

(4) The authority, in consultation with the department, the department of corrections, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW, mental health service agencies as defined in RCW 70.02.010, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules must:

(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5) The information received by the department of corrections under this section must remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in chapter 71.34 RCW, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(6) No mental health service agency or individual employed by a mental health service agency may be held responsible for information released to or used by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section.

(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under this chapter.

Sec. 5022. RCW 70.97.010 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 419 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications.

(2) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient.

(3) "((Chemical dependency))Substance use disorder" means alcoholism, drug addiction, or dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires and as those terms are defined in chapter 71.05 RCW.

(4) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(5) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that an individual should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting.

(6) "Conditional release" means a modification of a commitment that may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under chapter 71.05 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(8) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(9) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in chapter 71.05 RCW.

(10) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of an individual under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(11) "Discharge" means the termination of facility authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(12) "Enhanced services facility" means a facility that provides treatment and services to persons for whom acute inpatient treatment is not medically necessary and who have been determined by the department to be inappropriate for placement in other licensed facilities due to the complex needs that result in behavioral and security issues.

(13) "Expanded community services program" means a nonsecure program of enhanced behavioral and residential support provided to long-term and residential care providers serving specifically eligible clients who would otherwise be at risk for hospitalization at state hospital geriatric units.

(14) "Facility" means an enhanced services facility.

(15) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which an individual, as a result of a mental disorder, as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, or both:

(a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or

(b) Manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years before the filing of a petition under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility or a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(17) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(18) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that:

(i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself;

(ii) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior that has caused such harm or that places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or

(iii) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(19) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions.

(20) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary under the authority of chapter 71.05 RCW.

(21) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and also means a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined in rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(22) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology.

(23) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(24) "Registration records" include all the records of the authority, department, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services to ((the department, county departments, or facilities))such entities which identify individuals who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness.

(25) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(26) "Resident" means a person admitted to an enhanced services facility.

(27) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the secretary's designee.

(28) "Significant change" means:

(a) A deterioration in a resident's physical, mental, or psychosocial condition that has caused or is likely to cause clinical complications or life-threatening conditions; or

(b) An improvement in the resident's physical, mental, or psychosocial condition that may make the resident eligible for release or for treatment in a less intensive or less secure setting.

(29) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(30) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, detoxification, residential, inpatient, and outpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation, mental health or ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder education and counseling, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation, and career counseling, which may be extended to persons with mental disorders, ((chemical dependency))substance use disorders, or both, and their families.

(31) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning individuals who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department or the health care authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations ((and))or their staffs, managed care organizations contracted with the health care authority under chapter 74.09 RCW or their staffs, and by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by an individual providing treatment services for the department, the health care authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(32) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 5023. RCW 70.320.010 and 2014 c 225 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the health care authority.

(2) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(3) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well-established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in this section.

(4) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(5) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in this subsection but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(6) "Service coordination organization" or "service contracting entity" means the authority and department, or an entity that may contract with the state to provide, directly or through subcontracts, a comprehensive delivery system of medical, behavioral, long-term care, or social support services, including entities such as ((behavioral health organizations as defined in RCW 71.24.025,)) managed care organizations that provide medical services to clients under chapter 74.09 RCW and RCW 71.24.380, ((counties providing chemical dependency services under chapters 74.50 and 70.96A RCW,)) and area agencies on aging providing case management services under chapter 74.39A RCW.

Sec. 5024. RCW 72.09.350 and 2018 c 201 s 9011 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of corrections and the University of Washington may enter into a collaborative arrangement to provide improved services for offenders with mental illness with a focus on prevention, treatment, and reintegration into society. The participants in the collaborative arrangement may develop a strategic plan within sixty days after May 17, 1993, to address the management of offenders with mental illness within the correctional system, facilitating their reentry into the community and the mental health system, and preventing the inappropriate incarceration of individuals with mental illness. The collaborative arrangement may also specify the establishment and maintenance of a corrections mental health center located at McNeil Island corrections center. The collaborative arrangement shall require that an advisory panel of key stakeholders be established and consulted throughout the development and implementation of the center. The stakeholders advisory panel shall include a broad array of interest groups drawn from representatives of mental health, criminal justice, and correctional systems. The stakeholders advisory panel shall include, but is not limited to, membership from: The department of corrections, the department of social and health services ((mental health division and division of juvenile rehabilitation)), the health care authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations under chapter 74.09 RCW, local and regional law enforcement agencies, the sentencing guidelines commission, county and city jails, mental health advocacy groups for individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities, the traumatically brain-injured, and the general public. The center established by the department of corrections and University of Washington, in consultation with the stakeholder advisory groups, shall have the authority to:

(a) Develop new and innovative treatment approaches for corrections mental health clients;

(b) Improve the quality of mental health services within the department and throughout the corrections system;

(c) Facilitate mental health staff recruitment and training to meet departmental, county, and municipal needs;

(d) Expand research activities within the department in the area of treatment services, the design of delivery systems, the development of organizational models, and training for corrections mental health care professionals;

(e) Improve the work environment for correctional employees by developing the skills, knowledge, and understanding of how to work with offenders with special chronic mental health challenges;

(f) Establish a more positive rehabilitative environment for offenders;

(g) Strengthen multidisciplinary mental health collaboration between the University of Washington, other groups committed to the intent of this section, and the department of corrections;

(h) Strengthen department linkages between institutions of higher education, public sector mental health systems, and county and municipal corrections;

(i) Assist in the continued formulation of corrections mental health policies;

(j) Develop innovative and effective recruitment and training programs for correctional personnel working with offenders with mental illness;

(k) Assist in the development of a coordinated continuum of mental health care capable of providing services from corrections entry to community return; and

(l) Evaluate all current and innovative approaches developed within this center in terms of their effective and efficient achievement of improved mental health of inmates, development and utilization of personnel, the impact of these approaches on the functioning of correctional institutions, and the relationship of the corrections system to mental health and criminal justice systems. Specific attention should be paid to evaluating the effects of programs on the reintegration of offenders with mental illness into the community and the prevention of inappropriate incarceration of persons with mental illness.

(2) The corrections mental health center may conduct research, training, and treatment activities for the offender with mental illness within selected sites operated by the department. The department shall provide support services for the center such as food services, maintenance, perimeter security, classification, offender supervision, and living unit functions. The University of Washington may develop, implement, and evaluate the clinical, treatment, research, and evaluation components of the mentally ill offender center. The institute of for public policy and management may be consulted regarding the development of the center and in the recommendations regarding public policy. As resources permit, training within the center shall be available to state, county, and municipal agencies requiring the services. Other state colleges, state universities, and mental health providers may be involved in activities as required on a subcontract basis. Community mental health organizations, research groups, and community advocacy groups may be critical components of the center's operations and involved as appropriate to annual objectives. Clients with mental illness may be drawn from throughout the department's population and transferred to the center as clinical need, available services, and department jurisdiction permits.

(3) The department shall prepare a report of the center's progress toward the attainment of stated goals and provide the report to the legislature annually.

Sec. 5025. RCW 72.09.370 and 2018 c 201 s 9012 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The offender reentry community safety program is established to provide intensive services to offenders identified under this subsection and to thereby promote public safety. The secretary shall identify offenders in confinement or partial confinement who: (a) Are reasonably believed to be dangerous to themselves or others; and (b) have a mental disorder. In determining an offender's dangerousness, the secretary shall consider behavior known to the department and factors, based on research, that are linked to an increased risk for dangerousness of offenders with mental illnesses and shall include consideration of an offender's ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder or abuse.

(2) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section, a team consisting of representatives of the department of corrections, the health care authority, and, as necessary, the indeterminate sentence review board, divisions or administrations within the department of social and health services, specifically including the division of developmental disabilities, the appropriate ((behavioral health))managed care organization contracted with the health care authority, the appropriate behavioral health administrative services organization, and the providers, as appropriate, shall develop a plan, as determined necessary by the team, for delivery of treatment and support services to the offender upon release. In developing the plan, the offender shall be offered assistance in executing a mental health directive under chapter 71.32 RCW, after being fully informed of the benefits, scope, and purposes of such directive. The team may include a school district representative for offenders under the age of twenty-one. The team shall consult with the offender's counsel, if any, and, as appropriate, the offender's family and community. The team shall notify the crime victim/witness program, which shall provide notice to all people registered to receive notice under RCW 72.09.712 of the proposed release plan developed by the team. Victims, witnesses, and other interested people notified by the department may provide information and comments to the department on potential safety risk to specific individuals or classes of individuals posed by the specific offender. The team may recommend: (a) That the offender be evaluated by the designated crisis responder, as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW; (b) department-supervised community treatment; or (c) voluntary community mental health or ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder or abuse treatment.

(3) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section, the team shall determine whether or not an evaluation by a designated crisis responder is needed. If an evaluation is recommended, the supporting documentation shall be immediately forwarded to the appropriate designated crisis responder. The supporting documentation shall include the offender's criminal history, history of judicially required or administratively ordered involuntary antipsychotic medication while in confinement, and any known history of involuntary civil commitment.

(4) If an evaluation by a designated crisis responder is recommended by the team, such evaluation shall occur not more than ten days, nor less than five days, prior to release.

(5) A second evaluation by a designated crisis responder shall occur on the day of release if requested by the team, based upon new information or a change in the offender's mental condition, and the initial evaluation did not result in an emergency detention or a summons under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(6) If the designated crisis responder determines an emergency detention under chapter 71.05 RCW is necessary, the department shall release the offender only to a state hospital or to a consenting evaluation and treatment facility. The department shall arrange transportation of the offender to the hospital or facility.

(7) If the designated crisis responder believes that a less restrictive alternative treatment is appropriate, he or she shall seek a summons, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW, to require the offender to appear at an evaluation and treatment facility. If a summons is issued, the offender shall remain within the corrections facility until completion of his or her term of confinement and be transported, by corrections personnel on the day of completion, directly to the identified evaluation and treatment facility.

(8) The secretary shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 5026. RCW 72.09.381 and 2018 c 201 s 9014 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of the department of corrections and the director of the health care authority shall, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations contracted with the health care authority, and provider representatives, each adopt rules as necessary to implement chapter 214, Laws of 1999.

Sec. 5027. RCW 72.10.060 and 2014 c 225 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall, for any person committed to a state correctional facility after July 1, 1998, inquire at the time of commitment whether the person had received outpatient mental health treatment within the two years preceding confinement and the name of the person providing the treatment.

The secretary shall inquire of the treatment provider if he or she wishes to be notified of the release of the person from confinement, for purposes of offering treatment upon the inmate's release. If the treatment provider wishes to be notified of the inmate's release, the secretary shall attempt to provide such notice at least seven days prior to release.

At the time of an inmate's release if the secretary is unable to locate the treatment provider, the secretary shall notify the health care authority and the behavioral health administrative services organization in the county the inmate will most likely reside following release.

If the secretary has, prior to the release from the facility, evaluated the inmate and determined he or she requires postrelease mental health treatment, a copy of relevant records and reports relating to the inmate's mental health treatment or status shall be promptly made available to the offender's present or future treatment provider. The secretary shall determine which records and reports are relevant and may provide a summary in lieu of copies of the records.

Sec. 5028. RCW 72.23.025 and 2014 c 225 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to improve the quality of service at state hospitals, eliminate overcrowding, and more specifically define the role of the state hospitals. The legislature intends that eastern and western state hospitals shall become clinical centers for handling the most complicated long-term care needs of patients with a primary diagnosis of mental disorder. To this end, the legislature intends that funds appropriated for mental health programs, including funds for behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations contracted with the health care authority, and the state hospitals, be used for persons with primary diagnosis of mental disorder. The legislature finds that establishment of institutes for the study and treatment of mental disorders at both eastern state hospital and western state hospital will be instrumental in implementing the legislative intent.

(2)(a) There is established at eastern state hospital and western state hospital, institutes for the study and treatment of mental disorders. The institutes shall be operated by joint operating agreements between state colleges and universities and the department of social and health services. The institutes are intended to conduct training, research, and clinical program development activities that will directly benefit persons with mental illness who are receiving treatment in Washington state by performing the following activities:

(i) Promote recruitment and retention of highly qualified professionals at the state hospitals and community mental health programs;

(ii) Improve clinical care by exploring new, innovative, and scientifically based treatment models for persons presenting particularly difficult and complicated clinical syndromes;

(iii) Provide expanded training opportunities for existing staff at the state hospitals and community mental health programs;

(iv) Promote bilateral understanding of treatment orientation, possibilities, and challenges between state hospital professionals and community mental health professionals.

(b) To accomplish these purposes the institutes may, within funds appropriated for this purpose:

(i) Enter joint operating agreements with state universities or other institutions of higher education to accomplish the placement and training of students and faculty in psychiatry, psychology, social work, occupational therapy, nursing, and other relevant professions at the state hospitals and community mental health programs;

(ii) Design and implement clinical research projects to improve the quality and effectiveness of state hospital services and operations;

(iii) Enter into agreements with community mental health service providers to accomplish the exchange of professional staff between the state hospitals and community mental health service providers;

(iv) Establish a student loan forgiveness and conditional scholarship program to retain qualified professionals at the state hospitals and community mental health providers when the secretary has determined a shortage of such professionals exists.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the institutes may enter into agreements with the department or the state hospitals which may involve changes in staffing necessary to implement improved patient care programs contemplated by this section.

(d) The institutes are authorized to seek and accept public or private gifts, grants, contracts, or donations to accomplish their purposes under this section.

Sec. 5029. RCW 74.09.758 and 2014 c 223 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority and the department may restructure medicaid procurement of health care services and agreements with managed care systems on a phased basis to better support integrated physical health, mental health, and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder treatment, consistent with assumptions in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312, Laws of 2014, and recommendations provided by the behavioral health task force. The authority and the department may develop and utilize innovative mechanisms to promote and sustain integrated clinical models of physical and behavioral health care.

(2) The authority and the department may incorporate the following principles into future medicaid procurement efforts aimed at integrating the delivery of physical and behavioral health services:

(a) Medicaid purchasing must support delivery of integrated, person-centered care that addresses the spectrum of individuals' health needs in the context of the communities in which they live and with the availability of care continuity as their health needs change;

(b) Accountability for the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 (as recodified by this act) and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes;

(c) Medicaid benefit design must recognize that adequate preventive care, crisis intervention, and support services promote a recovery-focused approach;

(d) Evidence-based care interventions and continuous quality improvement must be enforced through contract specifications and performance measures that provide meaningful integration at the patient care level with broadly distributed accountability for results;

(e) Active purchasing and oversight of medicaid managed care contracts is a state responsibility;

(f) A deliberate and flexible system change plan with identified benchmarks to promote system stability, provide continuity of treatment for patients, and protect essential existing behavioral health system infrastructure and capacity; and

(g) Community and organizational readiness are key determinants of implementation timing; a phased approach is therefore desirable.

(3) The principles identified in subsection (2) of this section are not intended to create an individual entitlement to services.

(4) The authority shall increase the use of value-based contracting, alternative quality contracting, and other payment incentives that promote quality, efficiency, cost savings, and health improvement, for medicaid and public employee purchasing. The authority shall also implement additional chronic disease management techniques that reduce the subsequent need for hospitalization or readmissions. It is the intent of the legislature that the reforms the authority implements under this subsection are anticipated to reduce extraneous medical costs, across all medical programs, when fully phased in by fiscal year 2017 to generate budget savings identified in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 5030. RCW 74.34.020 and 2018 c 201 s 9016 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.

(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, and personal exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult which have the following meanings:

(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct, including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is consensual.

(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving, or prodding.

(c) "Mental abuse" means a willful verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. Mental abuse may include ridiculing, yelling, or swearing.

(d) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.

(e) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.

(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.

(4) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.

(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; ((or)) chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by the department ((or the department of health)).

(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use, control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;

(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or

(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property, income, resources, or trust funds.

(8) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 30A.22.040 and 30A.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as defined in RCW 21.20.005.

(9) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.

(10) "Incapacitated person" means a person who is at a significant risk of personal or financial harm under RCW 11.88.010(1) (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(11) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW.

(12) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.

(13)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a vulnerable adult's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including but not limited to:

(i) Acts that prevent a vulnerable adult from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or

(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct the vulnerable adult from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that a vulnerable adult is not present, or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the vulnerable adult.

(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter 11.92 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.

(14) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

(15) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to the vulnerable adult's body that he or she cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.

(16) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.

(17) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable adults.

(18) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding without undue force a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.

(19) "Protective services" means any services provided by the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral for legal assistance.

(20) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.

(21) "Social worker" means:

(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or

(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(22) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:

(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or

(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d) Admitted to any facility; or

(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or

(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

(23) "Vulnerable adult advocacy team" means a team of three or more persons who coordinate a multidisciplinary process, in compliance with chapter 266, Laws of 2017 and the protocol governed by RCW 74.34.320, for preventing, identifying, investigating, prosecuting, and providing services related to abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults.

Sec. 5031. RCW 74.34.068 and 2014 c 225 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After the investigation is complete, the department may provide a written report of the outcome of the investigation to an agency or program described in this subsection when the department determines from its investigation that an incident of abuse, abandonment, financial exploitation, or neglect occurred. Agencies or programs that may be provided this report are home health, hospice, or home care agencies, or after January 1, 2002, any in-home services agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, an adult day care or day health program, behavioral health administrative services organizations and managed care organizations authorized under chapter 71.24 RCW, or other agencies. The report may contain the name of the vulnerable adult and the alleged perpetrator. The report shall not disclose the identity of the person who made the report or any witness without the written permission of the reporter or witness. The department shall notify the alleged perpetrator regarding the outcome of the investigation. The name of the vulnerable adult must not be disclosed during this notification.

(2) The department may also refer a report or outcome of an investigation to appropriate state or local governmental authorities responsible for licensing or certification of the agencies or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

PART 6

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002. RCW 43.20A.895 is recodified as a section in chapter 71.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28A.310.202 (ESD board—Partnership with behavioral health organization to operate a wraparound model site);

(2) RCW 44.28.800 (Legislation affecting persons with mental illness—Report to legislature);

(3) RCW 71.24.049 (Identification by behavioral health organization—Children's mental health services);

(4) RCW 71.24.320 (Behavioral health organizations—Procurement process—Penalty for voluntary termination or refusal to renew contract);

(5) RCW 71.24.330 (Behavioral health organizations—Contracts with authority—Requirements);

(6) RCW 71.24.360 (Establishment of new behavioral health organizations);

(7) RCW 71.24.382 (Mental health and chemical dependency treatment providers and programs—Vendor rate increases);

(8) RCW 71.24.515 (Chemical dependency specialist services—To be available at children and family services offices—Training in uniform screening);

(9) RCW 71.24.620 (Persons with substance use disorders—Intensive case management pilot projects);

(10) RCW 71.24.805 (Mental health system review—Performance audit recommendations affirmed);

(11) RCW 71.24.810 (Mental health system review—Implementation of performance audit recommendations);

(12) RCW 71.24.840 (Mental health system review—Study of long-term outcomes);

(13) RCW 71.24.860 (Task force—Integrated behavioral health services);

(14) RCW 71.24.902 (Construction);

(15) RCW 72.78.020 (Inventory of services and resources by counties); and

(16) RCW 74.09.872 (Behavioral health organizations—Access to chemical dependency and mental health professionals).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 71.24.110 (Joint agreements of county authorities—Permissive provisions) and 2014 c 225 s 15, 1999 c 10 s 7, 1982 c 204 s 8, & 1967 ex.s. c 111 s 11;

(2) RCW 71.24.310 (Administration of chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW through behavioral health organizations—Implementation of chapter 71.05 RCW) and 2018 c 201 s 4015, 2017 c 222 s 1, 2014 c 225 s 40, & 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 994;

(3) RCW 71.24.340 (Behavioral health organizations—Agreements with city and county jails) and 2018 c 201 s 4018, 2014 c 225 s 16, & 2005 c 503 s 13;

(4) RCW 71.24.582 (Review of expenditures for drug and alcohol treatment) and 2018 c 201 s 2002 & 2002 c 290 s 6;

(5) RCW 74.09.492 (Children's mental health—Treatment and services—Authority's duties) and 2017 c 202 s 2;

(6) RCW 74.09.521 (Medical assistance—Program standards for mental health services for children) and 2014 c 225 s 101, 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 28, 2009 c 388 s 1, & 2007 c 359 s 11;

(7) RCW 74.09.873 (Tribal-centric behavioral health system) and 2018 c 201 s 2009, 2014 c 225 s 65, & 2013 c 338 s 7;

(8) RCW 74.50.010 (Legislative findings) and 1988 c 163 s 1 & 1987 c 406 s 2;

(9) RCW 74.50.011 (Additional legislative findings) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 1;

(10) RCW 74.50.035 (Shelter services—Eligibility) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 2;

(11) RCW 74.50.040 (Client assessment, treatment, and support services) and 1987 c 406 s 5;

(12) RCW 74.50.050 (Treatment services) and 2002 c 64 s 1, 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 5, 1988 c 163 s 3, & 1987 c 406 s 6;

(13) RCW 74.50.055 (Treatment services—Eligibility) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 10 & 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 4;

(14) RCW 74.50.060 (Shelter assistance program) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 33, 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 31, 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 3, 1988 c 163 s 4, & 1987 c 406 s 7;

(15) RCW 74.50.070 (County multipurpose diagnostic center or detention center) and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 429 & 1987 c 406 s 8;

(16) RCW 74.50.080 (Rules—Discontinuance of service) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 6 & 1989 c 3 s 2; and

(17) RCW 74.50.900 (Short title) and 1987 c 406 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005. Section 2009 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. Section 2008 of this act expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007. Section 1003 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008. Except as provided in sections 6005 and 6007 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---