BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is a need for additional bed capacity and services for individuals with behavioral health needs. The legislature further finds that for many individuals, it is best for them to receive treatment in their communities and in smaller facilities that help them stay closer to home. The legislature further finds that the state hospitals are struggling to keep up with rising demand; there are challenges to finding appropriate placements for patients ready to discharge, and there are a shortage of appropriate facilities for individuals with complex behavioral health needs.

Therefore, the legislature intends to provide more options in the continuum of care for behavioral health clients by creating new facility types and by expanding the capacity of current provider types in the community.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.24.025 and 2018 c 201 s 4002 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:

(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;

(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or

(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other mental health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.

(6) "Behavioral health organization" means any county authority or group of county authorities or other entity recognized by the director in contract in a defined region.

(7) "Behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat chemical dependency and mental illness.

(8) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW and substance use disorder treatment services as described in this chapter.

(9) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(10) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or

(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or

(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.

(11) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.

(12) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.

(13) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health organizations.

(14) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(15) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a community mental health program, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to provide a community mental health program.

(16) "Department" means the department of health.

(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.

(18) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(19) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(20) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(6).

(21) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (22) of this section.

(22) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(23) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(24) "Licensed or certified service provider" means an entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department, or tribal attestation that meets state minimum standards, or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(25) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.

(26) "Mental health services" means all services provided by behavioral health organizations and other services provided by the state for persons who are mentally ill.

(27) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(28) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (10), (36), and (37) of this section.

(29) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.

(30) "Registration records" include all the records of the department of social and health services, the authority, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services for the department of social and health services, the authority, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness.

(31) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (22) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(32) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.

(33) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.

(34) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined solely by a behavioral health organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health organization.

(35) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(36) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:

(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;

(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;

(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or

(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.

(37) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health organization to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;

(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;

(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;

(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:

(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;

(ii) Changes in custodial adult;

(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;

(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;

(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or

(vi) Homelessness.

(38) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:

(a) The authority for:

(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Community support services and resource management services;

(b) The department of health for:

(i) Licensed or certified service providers for the provision of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Residential services.

(39) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(40) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the major Indian organizations recognized by the director insofar as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any behavioral health organization that would present a conflict of interest.

(41) "Intensive behavioral health treatment facility" means a community-based residential treatment facility for behavioral health patients whose impairment or behaviors require care that cannot be met in other settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall license or certify intensive behavioral health treatment facilities that meet state minimum standards. The secretary must establish rules working with the authority and the department of social and health services to create standards for licensure or certification of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities. The rules, at a minimum, must:

(1) Require twenty-four hour supervision of residents;

(2) Establish staffing requirements that provide an appropriate response to the acuity of the residents;

(3) Establish requirements for the ability to use limited egress;

(4) Limit services to persons at least eighteen years of age; and

(5) Establish resident rights that are substantially similar to the rights of residents in long-term care facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1, 2019, the secretary of health, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the long-term care ombuds, and relevant stakeholders must provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on providing resident rights and access to ombuds services to the residents of the intensive behavioral health treatment facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The health care authority shall establish a pilot program to provide mental health drop-in center services. The mental health drop-in center services shall provide a peer-focused recovery model during daytime hours through a community-based, therapeutic, less restrictive alternative to hospitalization for acute psychiatric needs. The program shall assist clients in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness. Clients may refer themselves, be brought to the center by law enforcement, be brought to the center by family members, or be referred by an emergency department.

(2) The pilot program shall be conducted in the largest city in a regional service area that has at least nine counties. Funds to support the pilot program shall be distributed through the behavioral health administrative service organization that serves the pilot program.

(3) The pilot program shall begin on January 1, 2020, and conclude July 1, 2022.

(4) By December 1, 2020, the health care authority shall submit a preliminary report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The preliminary report shall include a survey of peer mental health programs that are operating in the state, including the location, type of services offered, and number of clients served. By December 1, 2021, the health care authority shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the pilot program. The report shall include information about the number of clients served, the needs of the clients, the method of referral for the clients, and recommendations on how to expand the program statewide, including any recommendations to account for different needs in urban and rural areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority and the entities identified in RCW 71.24.310 and 71.24.380 shall: (a) Work with willing community hospitals licensed under chapters 70.41 and 71.12 RCW and evaluation and treatment facilities licensed or certified under chapter 71.05 RCW to assess their capacity to become licensed or certified to provide long-term inpatient care and to meet the requirements of this chapter; and (b) enter into contracts and payment arrangements with such hospitals and evaluation and treatment facilities choosing to provide long-term mental health placements, to the extent that willing licensed or certified facilities are available.

(2) Nothing in this section requires any community hospital or evaluation and treatment facility to be licensed or certified to provide long-term mental health placements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. By November 15, 2019, the health care authority shall confer with the department of health, hospitals licensed under chapters 70.41 and 71.12 RCW, and evaluation and treatment facilities licensed or certified under chapter 71.05 RCW to review laws and regulations and identify changes that may be necessary to address care delivery and cost-effective treatment for adults on ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day commitment orders. The health care authority must report its findings to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2019.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.38.111 and 2017 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall not require a certificate of need for the offering of an inpatient tertiary health service by:

(a) A health maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations if (i) the organization or combination of organizations has, in the service area of the organization or the service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty thousand individuals, (ii) the facility in which the service will be provided is or will be geographically located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals, and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the combination;

(b) A health care facility if (i) the facility primarily provides or will provide inpatient health services, (ii) the facility is or will be controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty thousand individuals, (iii) the facility is or will be geographically located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals, and (iv) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the combination; or

(c) A health care facility (or portion thereof) if (i) the facility is or will be leased by a health maintenance organization or combination of health maintenance organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or the service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty thousand individuals and, on the date the application is submitted under subsection (2) of this section, at least fifteen years remain in the term of the lease, (ii) the facility is or will be geographically located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals, and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be individuals enrolled with such organization;

if, with respect to such offering or obligation by a nursing home, the department has, upon application under subsection (2) of this section, granted an exemption from such requirement to the organization, combination of organizations, or facility.

(2) A health maintenance organization, combination of health maintenance organizations, or health care facility shall not be exempt under subsection (1) of this section from obtaining a certificate of need before offering a tertiary health service unless:

(a) It has submitted at least thirty days prior to the offering of services reviewable under RCW 70.38.105(4)(d) an application for such exemption; and

(b) The application contains such information respecting the organization, combination, or facility and the proposed offering or obligation by a nursing home as the department may require to determine if the organization or combination meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or the facility meets or will meet such requirements; and

(c) The department approves such application. The department shall approve or disapprove an application for exemption within thirty days of receipt of a completed application. In the case of a proposed health care facility (or portion thereof) which has not begun to provide tertiary health services on the date an application is submitted under this subsection with respect to such facility (or portion), the facility (or portion) shall meet the applicable requirements of subsection (1) of this section when the facility first provides such services. The department shall approve an application submitted under this subsection if it determines that the applicable requirements of subsection (1) of this section are met.

(3) A health care facility (or any part thereof) with respect to which an exemption was granted under subsection (1) of this section may not be sold or leased and a controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of such facility may not be acquired and a health care facility described in (1)(c) which was granted an exemption under subsection (1) of this section may not be used by any person other than the lessee described in (1)(c) unless:

(a) The department issues a certificate of need approving the sale, lease, acquisition, or use; or

(b) The department determines, upon application, that (i) the entity to which the facility is proposed to be sold or leased, which intends to acquire the controlling interest, or which intends to use the facility is a health maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations which meets the requirements of (1)(a)(i), and (ii) with respect to such facility, meets the requirements of (1)(a)(ii) or (iii) or the requirements of (1)(b)(i) and (ii).

(4) In the case of a health maintenance organization, an ambulatory care facility, or a health care facility, which ambulatory or health care facility is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations, the department may under the program apply its certificate of need requirements to the offering of inpatient tertiary health services to the extent that such offering is not exempt under the provisions of this section or RCW 70.38.105(7).

(5)(a) The department shall not require a certificate of need for the construction, development, or other establishment of a nursing home, or the addition of beds to an existing nursing home, that is owned and operated by a continuing care retirement community that:

(i) Offers services only to contractual members;

(ii) Provides its members a contractually guaranteed range of services from independent living through skilled nursing, including some assistance with daily living activities;

(iii) Contractually assumes responsibility for the cost of services exceeding the member's financial responsibility under the contract, so that no third party, with the exception of insurance purchased by the retirement community or its members, but including the medicaid program, is liable for costs of care even if the member depletes his or her personal resources;

(iv) Has offered continuing care contracts and operated a nursing home continuously since January 1, 1988, or has obtained a certificate of need to establish a nursing home;

(v) Maintains a binding agreement with the state assuring that financial liability for services to members, including nursing home services, will not fall upon the state;

(vi) Does not operate, and has not undertaken a project that would result in a number of nursing home beds in excess of one for every four living units operated by the continuing care retirement community, exclusive of nursing home beds; and

(vii) Has obtained a professional review of pricing and long-term solvency within the prior five years which was fully disclosed to members.

(b) A continuing care retirement community shall not be exempt under this subsection from obtaining a certificate of need unless:

(i) It has submitted an application for exemption at least thirty days prior to commencing construction of, is submitting an application for the licensure of, or is commencing operation of a nursing home, whichever comes first; and

(ii) The application documents to the department that the continuing care retirement community qualifies for exemption.

(c) The sale, lease, acquisition, or use of part or all of a continuing care retirement community nursing home that qualifies for exemption under this subsection shall require prior certificate of need approval to qualify for licensure as a nursing home unless the department determines such sale, lease, acquisition, or use is by a continuing care retirement community that meets the conditions of (a) of this subsection.

(6) A rural hospital, as defined by the department, reducing the number of licensed beds to become a rural primary care hospital under the provisions of Part A Title XVIII of the Social Security Act Section 1820, 42 U.S.C., 1395c et seq. may, within three years of the reduction of beds licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, increase the number of licensed beds to no more than the previously licensed number without being subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(7) A rural health care facility licensed under RCW 70.175.100 formerly licensed as a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW may, within three years of the effective date of the rural health care facility license, apply to the department for a hospital license and not be subject to the requirements of RCW 70.38.105(4)(a) as the construction, development, or other establishment of a new hospital, provided there is no increase in the number of beds previously licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and there is no redistribution in the number of beds used for acute care or long-term care, the rural health care facility has been in continuous operation, and the rural health care facility has not been purchased or leased.

(8) A rural hospital determined to no longer meet critical access hospital status for state law purposes as a result of participation in the Washington rural health access preservation pilot identified by the state office of rural health and formerly licensed as a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW may apply to the department to renew its hospital license and not be subject to the requirements of RCW 70.38.105(4)(a) as the construction, development, or other establishment of a new hospital, provided there is no increase in the number of beds previously licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW. If all or part of a formerly licensed rural hospital is sold, purchased, or leased during the period the rural hospital does not meet critical access hospital status as a result of participation in the Washington rural health access preservation pilot and the new owner or lessor applies to renew the rural hospital's license, then the sale, purchase, or lease of part or all of the rural hospital is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(9)(a) A nursing home that voluntarily reduces the number of its licensed beds to provide assisted living, licensed assisted living facility care, adult day care, adult day health, respite care, hospice, outpatient therapy services, congregate meals, home health, or senior wellness clinic, or to reduce to one or two the number of beds per room or to otherwise enhance the quality of life for residents in the nursing home, may convert the original facility or portion of the facility back, and thereby increase the number of nursing home beds to no more than the previously licensed number of nursing home beds without obtaining a certificate of need under this chapter, provided the facility has been in continuous operation and has not been purchased or leased. Any conversion to the original licensed bed capacity, or to any portion thereof, shall comply with the same life and safety code requirements as existed at the time the nursing home voluntarily reduced its licensed beds; unless waivers from such requirements were issued, in which case the converted beds shall reflect the conditions or standards that then existed pursuant to the approved waivers.

(b) To convert beds back to nursing home beds under this subsection, the nursing home must:

(i) Give notice of its intent to preserve conversion options to the department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date of the license reduction; and

(ii) Give notice to the department of health and to the department of social and health services of the intent to convert beds back. If construction is required for the conversion of beds back, the notice of intent to convert beds back must be given, at a minimum, one year prior to the effective date of license modification reflecting the restored beds; otherwise, the notice must be given a minimum of ninety days prior to the effective date of license modification reflecting the restored beds. Prior to any license modification to convert beds back to nursing home beds under this section, the licensee must demonstrate that the nursing home meets the certificate of need exemption requirements of this section.

The term "construction," as used in (b)(ii) of this subsection, is limited to those projects that are expected to equal or exceed the expenditure minimum amount, as determined under this chapter.

(c) Conversion of beds back under this subsection must be completed no later than four years after the effective date of the license reduction. However, for good cause shown, the four-year period for conversion may be extended by the department of health for one additional four-year period.

(d) Nursing home beds that have been voluntarily reduced under this section shall be counted as available nursing home beds for the purpose of evaluating need under RCW 70.38.115(2) (a) and (k) so long as the facility retains the ability to convert them back to nursing home use under the terms of this section.

(e) When a building owner has secured an interest in the nursing home beds, which are intended to be voluntarily reduced by the licensee under (a) of this subsection, the applicant shall provide the department with a written statement indicating the building owner's approval of the bed reduction.

(10)(a) The department shall not require a certificate of need for a hospice agency if:

(i) The hospice agency is designed to serve the unique religious or cultural needs of a religious group or an ethnic minority and commits to furnishing hospice services in a manner specifically aimed at meeting the unique religious or cultural needs of the religious group or ethnic minority;

(ii) The hospice agency is operated by an organization that:

(A) Operates a facility, or group of facilities, that offers a comprehensive continuum of long-term care services, including, at a minimum, a licensed, medicare-certified nursing home, assisted living, independent living, day health, and various community-based support services, designed to meet the unique social, cultural, and religious needs of a specific cultural and ethnic minority group;

(B) Has operated the facility or group of facilities for at least ten continuous years prior to the establishment of the hospice agency;

(iii) The hospice agency commits to coordinating with existing hospice programs in its community when appropriate;

(iv) The hospice agency has a census of no more than forty patients;

(v) The hospice agency commits to obtaining and maintaining medicare certification;

(vi) The hospice agency only serves patients located in the same county as the majority of the long-term care services offered by the organization that operates the agency; and

(vii) The hospice agency is not sold or transferred to another agency.

(b) The department shall include the patient census for an agency exempted under this subsection (10) in its calculations for future certificate of need applications.

(11) To alleviate the need to board psychiatric patients in emergency departments and increase capacity of hospitals to serve individuals on ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day commitment orders, for the period of time from May 5, 2017, through June 30, ((2019))2021:

(a) The department shall suspend the certificate of need requirement for a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that changes the use of licensed beds to increase the number of beds to provide psychiatric services, including involuntary treatment services. A certificate of need exemption under this subsection (11)(a) shall be valid for two years.

(b) The department may not require a certificate of need for:

(i) The addition of beds as described in RCW 70.38.260 (2) and (3); or

(ii) The construction, development, or establishment of a psychiatric hospital licensed as an establishment under chapter 71.12 RCW that will have no more than sixteen beds and provide treatment to adults on ninety or one hundred eighty-day involuntary commitment orders, as described in RCW 70.38.260(4).

Sec. 9. RCW 70.38.260 and 2017 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For a grant awarded during fiscal years ((2016))2018 and ((2017))2019 by the department of commerce under this section, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and psychiatric hospitals licensed as establishments under chapter 71.12 RCW are not subject to certificate of need requirements for the addition of the number of new psychiatric beds indicated in the grant. The department of commerce may not make a prior approval of a certificate of need application a condition for a grant application under this section. The period during which an approved hospital or psychiatric hospital project qualifies for a certificate of need exemption under this section is two years from the date of the grant award.

(2)(a) Until June 30, ((2019))2021, a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW is exempt from certificate of need requirements for the addition of new psychiatric beds.

(b) A hospital that adds new psychiatric beds under this subsection (2) must:

(i) Notify the department of the addition of new psychiatric beds. The department shall provide the hospital with a notice of exemption within thirty days; and

(ii) Commence the project within two years of the date of receipt of the notice of exemption.

(c) Beds granted an exemption under RCW 70.38.111(11)(b) must remain psychiatric beds unless a certificate of need is granted to change their use or the hospital voluntarily reduces its licensed capacity.

(3)(a) Until June 30, ((2019))2021, a psychiatric hospital licensed as an establishment under chapter 71.12 RCW is exempt from certificate of need requirements for the one-time addition of up to thirty new psychiatric beds, if it demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department:

(i) That its most recent two years of publicly available fiscal year-end report data as required under RCW 70.170.100 and 43.70.050 reported to the department by the psychiatric hospital, show a payer mix of a minimum of fifty percent medicare and medicaid based on a calculation using patient days; and

(ii) A commitment to maintaining the payer mix in (a) of this subsection for a period of five consecutive years after the beds are made available for use by patients.

(b) A psychiatric hospital that adds new psychiatric beds under this subsection (3) must:

(i) Notify the department of the addition of new psychiatric beds. The department shall provide the psychiatric hospital with a notice of exemption within thirty days; and

(ii) Commence the project within two years of the date of receipt of the notice of exemption.

(c) Beds granted an exemption under RCW 70.38.111(11)(b) must remain psychiatric beds unless a certificate of need is granted to change their use or the psychiatric hospital voluntarily reduces its licensed capacity.

(4)(a) Until June 30, ((2019))2021, an entity seeking to construct, develop, or establish a psychiatric hospital licensed as an establishment under chapter 71.12 RCW is exempt from certificate of need requirements if the proposed psychiatric hospital will have no more than sixteen beds and dedicate a portion of the beds to providing treatment to adults on ninety or one hundred eighty-day involuntary commitment orders. The psychiatric hospital may also provide treatment to adults on a seventy-two hour detention or fourteen-day involuntary commitment order.

(b) An entity that seeks to construct, develop, or establish a psychiatric hospital under this subsection (4) must:

(i) Notify the department of the addition of construction, development, or establishment. The department shall provide the entity with a notice of exemption within thirty days; and

(ii) Commence the project within two years of the date of receipt of the notice of exemption.

(c) Entities granted an exemption under RCW 70.38.111(11)(b)(ii) may not exceed sixteen beds unless a certificate of need is granted to increase the psychiatric hospital's capacity.

(5) This section expires June 30, ((2022))2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. By December 1, 2019, the secretary of health must, in consultation with the department of social and health services, department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority, provide recommendations to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature on youth short-term residential intensive behavioral health and developmental disabilities services. The recommendations must establish staffing requirements that provide an appropriate level of treatment for residents and include both licensed mental health professionals and developmental disability professionals. The recommendations should also consider developmental disability-related services necessary to support the youth and the youth's family in preparation for and after discharge.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.39A.030 and 2018 c 278 s 6 and 2018 c 225 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of available funding, the department shall expand cost-effective options for home and community services for consumers for whom the state participates in the cost of their care.

(2) In expanding home and community services, the department shall take full advantage of federal funding available under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal social security act, including home health, adult day care, waiver options, and state plan services and expand the availability of in-home services and residential services, including services in adult family homes, assisted living facilities, and enhanced services facilities.

(3)(a) The department shall by rule establish payment rates for home and community services that support the provision of cost-effective care. Beginning July 1, 2019, the department shall adopt a data-driven medicaid payment methodology as specified in RCW 74.39A.032 for contracted assisted living, adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care. In the event of any conflict between any such rule and a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 and 74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.

(b) The department may authorize an enhanced adult residential care rate for nursing homes that temporarily or permanently convert their bed use under chapter 70.38 RCW for the purposes of providing assisted living, enhanced adult residential care ((under chapter 70.38 RCW)), or adult residential care, when the department determines that payment of an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster expansion of these contracted ((enhanced adult residential care)) services. As an incentive for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of ((its))their nursing home bed capacity for the purposes of providing assisted living, enhanced adult residential care, or adult residential care, including but not limited to serving individuals with behavioral health treatment needs, the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the ((enhanced adult)) residential care rate.

(((c) The department may authorize a supplemental assisted living services rate for up to four years for facilities that convert from nursing home use and do not retain rights to the converted nursing home beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department determines that payment of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster expansion of contracted assisted living services.))

--- END ---