BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each electric utility must provide for the reimbursement of costs incurred by a retail electric customer who uses an emergency generator to provide electricity to the customer's home or business during an interruption of service, scheduled by the electric utility, for the primary purpose of connecting neighboring retail electric customers.

(2) A retail electric customer seeking reimbursement under this section must provide original receipts, invoices, or other documentation of the costs incurred in order to receive reimbursement from the electric utility.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "emergency generator" means a stationary combustion device, such as a reciprocating internal combustion engine or turbine that serves solely as a secondary source of mechanical or electrical power whenever the primary energy supply is disrupted or discontinued due to factors that are beyond the control of the retail electric customer.

--- END ---