BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.79 RCW to read as follows:

When issuing a search warrant to draw a sample of a person's blood and conduct toxicological analysis, a magistrate may not limit the scope of the toxicological analysis or otherwise prohibit general toxicological screening if probable cause exists to indicate impairment arising from alcohol or any drug.

--- END ---