BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the demand for skilled workers in the construction trades is expected to increase over the next decade. In Snohomish county alone, workforce Snohomish estimates an increase of two thousand two hundred jobs. However, the average age of a building trades apprentice is in the late twenties, representing a lost decade of productivity. Therefore, the legislature recognizes the need to develop clear, seamless education pathways into careers in the building trades for high school students and adult learners. The legislature intends to support this need by establishing a dual credit apprenticeship preparation program that will prepare participants for entry into a registered apprenticeship program in the building trades.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Marysville school district shall collaborate with Everett Community College, Arlington school district, other local school districts, local labor unions, and local industry groups to develop the regional apprenticeship pathways program.

(2) The regional apprenticeship pathways program must establish an education-based apprenticeship preparation program recognized by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council that prepares individuals for registered apprenticeships within the building trades.

(3) The apprenticeship preparation program must provide dual credit for participants by meeting high school graduation requirements and providing opportunities for credit leading to a college credential. In addition, the apprenticeship preparation program must provide participants with preferred or direct entry into a registered apprenticeship program in the building trades.

--- END ---