BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.260 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The licensing and enforcement system modernization project account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 66.08.2601 and 66.08.2602 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be only used for the expenses of replacing and modernizing the board's licensing, enforcement, and imaging system. The expenditures may be expended for automation of licenses and permits, electronic payments, data warehousing, project management and system testing, consulting, contracting, and staff time, and any necessary data conversion, software, hardware, and related equipment costs. Before making expenditures from the account, the board must conduct a thorough business process examination to ensure the new system provides efficient and effective service delivery. As part of the examination, the board must evaluate and articulate how any new system procurement serves the current and future needs of the internal and external stakeholders, the customers, and the public. Only the director of the board or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) This section expires ((June 30, 2019))September 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2019.

--- END ---