BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that it is a goal of our state to divert juveniles who have committed status offenses, behaviors that are prohibited under law only because of an individual's status as a minor, away from the juvenile justice system because a stay in detention is a predictive factor for future criminal justice system involvement. The legislature finds that Washington has been using the valid court order exception of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act, a loophole in federal law allowing judges to detain status offenders for disobeying court orders, more than any other state in the country. The legislature finds that use of the valid court order exception to detain youth for acts like truancy, breaking curfew, or running away from home is counterproductive and may worsen outcomes for at-risk youth.

(2) The legislature further finds that these youth should not be confined with or treated with the same interventions as criminal offenders. The legislature also finds that studies show a disproportionality in race, gender, and socioeconomic status of youth referred to courts or detained, or both. Likewise, the legislature finds that community-based interventions are more effective at addressing underlying causes of status offenses than detention and can reduce court caseloads and lower system costs. As a result, it is the intent of the legislature to strengthen and fund community-based programs that are culturally relevant and focus on addressing disproportionality of youth of color, especially at-risk youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to eliminate the use of juvenile detention as a remedy for contempt of a valid court order for youth under chapters 13.34 and 28A.225 RCW and child in need of services petition youth under chapter 13.32A RCW. As of July 1, 2019, such youth may not be committed to juvenile detention as a contempt sanction under chapter 13.32A, 13.34, or 28A.225 RCW, and a warrant may not be issued for such youth for failure to appear at a court hearing that requires commitment of such youth to juvenile detention.

(2)(a) It is also the policy of the state of Washington to entirely phase out the use of juvenile detention as a remedy for contempt of a valid court order for at-risk youth under chapter 13.32A RCW by July 1, 2021. After this date, at-risk youth may not be committed to juvenile detention as a contempt sanction under chapter 13.32A RCW, and a warrant may not be issued for failure to appear at a court hearing that requires commitment of the at-risk youth to juvenile detention.

(b) Until July 1, 2021, any at-risk youth committed to juvenile detention as a sanction for contempt under chapter 13.32A RCW, or for failure to appear at a court hearing under chapter 13.32A RCW, must be detained in such a manner so that no direct communication or physical contact may be made between the youth and any youth who is detained to juvenile detention pursuant to a violation of criminal law, unless these separation requirements would result in a youth being detained in solitary confinement.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.21.030 and 2001 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a remedial sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person aggrieved by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the contempt is related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court, after notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction authorized by this chapter.

(2) If the court finds that the person has failed or refused to perform an act that is yet within the person's power to perform, the court may find the person in contempt of court and impose one or more of the following remedial sanctions:

(a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a type defined in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment may extend only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

(b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars for each day the contempt of court continues.

(c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a prior order of the court.

(d) Any other remedial sanction other than the sanctions specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the court expressly finds that those sanctions would be ineffectual to terminate a continuing contempt of court.

(e) In at-risk youth petition cases only under chapter((s)) 13.32A((, 13.34, and 28A.225)) RCW and subject to the requirements under RCW 13.32A.250, commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed ((seven days))seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The seventy-two hour period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two hour period. This sanction may be imposed in addition to, or as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction authorized by this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to be a remedial sanction.

(3) The court may, in addition to the remedial sanctions set forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person found in contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered by the party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred in connection with the contempt proceeding, including reasonable attorney's fees.

(4) If the court finds that a person under the age of eighteen years has willfully disobeyed the terms of an order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, the court may find the person in contempt of court and may, as a sole sanction for such contempt, commit the person to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days.

Sec. 4. RCW 7.21.030 and 2019 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this act) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a remedial sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person aggrieved by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the contempt is related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court, after notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction authorized by this chapter.

(2) If the court finds that the person has failed or refused to perform an act that is yet within the person's power to perform, the court may find the person in contempt of court and impose one or more of the following remedial sanctions:

(a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a type defined in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment may extend only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

(b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars for each day the contempt of court continues.

(c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a prior order of the court.

(d) Any other remedial sanction other than the sanctions specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the court expressly finds that those sanctions would be ineffectual to terminate a continuing contempt of court.

(((e) In at-risk youth petition cases only under chapter 13.32A RCW and subject to the requirements under RCW 13.32A.250, commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The seventy-two hour period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two hour period. This sanction may be imposed in addition to, or as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction authorized by this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to be a remedial sanction.))

(3) The court may, in addition to the remedial sanctions set forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person found in contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered by the party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred in connection with the contempt proceeding, including reasonable attorney's fees.

(4) If the court finds that a person under the age of eighteen years has willfully disobeyed the terms of an order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, the court may find the person in contempt of court and may, as a sole sanction for such contempt, commit the person to juvenile detention for a period of time not to exceed seven days.

Sec. 5. RCW 13.32A.250 and 2000 c 162 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all child in need of services proceedings and at-risk youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order entered pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for the purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties under this section.

(2) Failure by a party in an at-risk youth proceeding to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section.

(3) For at-risk youth proceedings only:

(a) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(i) Community restitution;

(ii) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(iii) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times;

(iv) Parent teen mediation services and interventions offered by dispute resolution centers under chapter 7.75 RCW; or

(v) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(b) The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up to one hundred dollars and confinement for up to ((seven days))seventy-two hours, or both for contempt of court under this section if (i) one of the less restrictive alternatives under (a) of this subsection has been attempted and another violation of the order has occurred, or (ii) the court issues a formal finding that none of the less restrictive alternatives is available. The seventy-two hour period excludes Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays and shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two hour period.

(((4)))(c) A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section shall be placed in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county.

(((5)))(d) A child involved in a child in need of services proceeding may not be placed in confinement under this section.

(4) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(((6)))(5) For at-risk youth proceedings only, whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this chapter, the court must direct the court clerk to command the presence of the child by the issuance of a summons or other method approved by local court rule instead of a warrant, unless the court finds probable cause to believe that the child would not appear in response to the command or finds probable cause to believe that the arrest is necessary to prevent serious bodily harm to the juvenile or another, in which case the court may issue a warrant. A warrant of arrest must be supported by an affidavit or sworn testimony, which must be recorded electronically or by stenographer, establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. The warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present if the child named in the warrant is a pupil at the school. The court must communicate the summons to the child through mail, telephone, text message, or other method of communication needed in order to ensure the child has received the information. If the child fails to appear via the summons or other method, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and take the child to detention. ((The order may be entered ex parte without prior notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's admission to detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance with RCW 13.32A.065.))

Sec. 6. RCW 13.32A.250 and 2019 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In all child in need of services proceedings and at-risk youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order entered pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for the purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties under this section.

(2) Failure by a party ((in an at-risk youth proceeding)) to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(((e), subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section)).

(3) ((For at-risk youth proceedings only:

(a) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(i) Community restitution;

(ii) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(iii) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times;

(iv) Parent teen mediation services and interventions offered by dispute resolution centers under chapter 7.75 RCW; or

(v) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(b) The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up to one hundred dollars and confinement for up to seventy-two hours, or both for contempt of court under this section if (i) one of the less restrictive alternatives under (a) of this subsection has been attempted and another violation of the order has occurred, or (ii) the court issues a formal finding that none of the less restrictive alternatives is available. The seventy-two hour period excludes Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays and shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two hour period.

(c) A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section shall be placed in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county.

(d) A child involved in a child in need of services proceeding may not be placed in confinement under this section.

)) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(((5) For at-risk youth proceedings only, whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this chapter, the court must direct the court clerk to command the presence of the child by the issuance of a summons or other method approved by local court rule instead of a warrant, unless the court finds probable cause to believe that the child would not appear in response to the command or finds probable cause to believe that the arrest is necessary to prevent serious bodily harm to the juvenile or another, in which case the court may issue a warrant. A warrant of arrest must be supported by an affidavit or sworn testimony, which must be recorded electronically or by stenographer, establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. The warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present if the child named in the warrant is a pupil at the school. The court must communicate the summons to the child through mail, telephone, text message, or other method of communication needed in order to ensure the child has received the information. If the child fails to appear via the summons or other method, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and take the child to detention.))

Sec. 7. RCW 13.32A.150 and 2000 c 123 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the juvenile court shall not accept the filing of a child in need of services petition by the child or the parents or the filing of an at-risk youth petition by the parent, unless verification is provided that the department has completed a family assessment. The family assessment shall involve the multidisciplinary team if one exists. The family assessment or plan of services developed by the multidisciplinary team shall be aimed at family reconciliation, reunification, and avoidance of the out-of-home placement of the child. ((If the department is unable to complete an assessment within two working days following a request for assessment the child or the parents may proceed under subsection (2) of this section or the parent may proceed under RCW 13.32A.191.))

(2) A child or a child's parent may file with the juvenile court a child in need of services petition to approve an out-of-home placement for the child before completion of a family assessment. The department shall, when requested, assist either a parent or child in the filing of the petition. The petition must be filed in the county where the parent resides. The petition shall allege that the child is a child in need of services and shall ask only that the placement of a child outside the home of his or her parent be approved. The filing of a petition to approve the placement is not dependent upon the court's having obtained any prior jurisdiction over the child or his or her parent, and confers upon the court a special jurisdiction to approve or disapprove an out-of-home placement under this chapter.

(3) A petition may not be filed if the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 13.34.165 and 2000 c 122 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(((e))).

(2) ((The maximum term of confinement that may be imposed as a remedial sanction for contempt of court under this section is confinement for up to seven days.

(3) A child held for contempt under this section shall be confined only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county.

)) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, juvenile court personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a court order entered pursuant to this chapter.

(((5)))(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of a motion ((for contempt)) and the information set forth in a supporting declaration, that a child ((has violated a placement order entered under this chapter))is missing from care, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and ((take))return the child to ((detention))department custody. ((The order may be entered ex parte without prior notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's admission to detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance with RCW 13.32A.065.))

(b) If the department is notified of the child's whereabouts and authorizes the child's location, the court must withdraw the order directing law enforcement to pick up and return the child to department custody.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.225.090 and 2017 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:

(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum attendance requirements, which shall not consider a suspension day as an unexcused absence;

(b) If there is space available and the program can provide educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public educational program;

(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d) Submit to a substance abuse assessment if the court finds on the record that such assessment is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any assessment, including a urinalysis test ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the recommendations of the substance abuse assessment at no expense to the school; or

(e) Submit to a mental health evaluation or other diagnostic evaluation and adhere to the recommendations of the drug assessment, at no expense to the school, if the court finds on the court records that such evaluation is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior of the child, and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law.

(2)(((a))) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may impose:

(((i)))(a) Community restitution;

(((ii)))(b) Nonresidential programs with intensive wraparound services;

(((iii)))(c) A requirement that the child meet with a mentor for a specified number of times; ((or

))(d) Parent teen mediation services and interventions offered by dispute resolution centers under chapter 7.75 RCW; or

(e) Other services and interventions that the court deems appropriate.

(((b) If the child continues to fail to comply with the court order and the court makes a finding that other measures to secure compliance have been tried but have been unsuccessful and no less restrictive alternative is available, the court may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e). Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW. Detention ordered under this subsection may be for no longer than seven days. Detention ordered under this subsection shall preferably be served at a secure crisis residential center close to the child's home rather than in a juvenile detention facility. A warrant of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a child inside of school during school hours in a location where other students are present.))

(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may ((order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may)) impose alternatives to detention ((such as meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW))consistent with best practice models for reengagement with school.

(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven year old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.185C.260 and 2018 c 58 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement officer shall take a child into custody:

(a) If a law enforcement agency has been contacted by the parent of the child that the child is absent from parental custody without consent; or

(b) If a law enforcement officer reasonably believes, considering the child's age, the location, and the time of day, that a child is in circumstances which constitute a danger to the child's safety or that a child is violating a local curfew ordinance; or

(c) If an agency legally charged with the supervision of a child has notified a law enforcement agency that the child has run away from placement((; or

)).

(2) Law enforcement custody shall not extend beyond the amount of time reasonably necessary to transport the child to a destination authorized by law and to place the child at that destination. Law enforcement custody continues until the law enforcement officer transfers custody to a person, agency, or other authorized entity under this chapter, or releases the child because no placement is available. Transfer of custody is not complete unless the person, agency, or entity to whom the child is released agrees to accept custody.

(3) If a law enforcement officer takes a child into custody pursuant to either subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and transports the child to a crisis residential center, the officer shall, within twenty-four hours of delivering the child to the center, provide to the center a written report detailing the reasons the officer took the child into custody. The center shall provide the department of children, youth, and families with a copy of the officer's report if the youth is in the care of or receiving services from the department of children, youth, and families.

(4) If the law enforcement officer who initially takes the juvenile into custody or the staff of the crisis residential center have reasonable cause to believe that the child is absent from home because he or she is abused or neglected, a report shall be made immediately to the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) Nothing in this section affects the authority of any political subdivision to make regulations concerning the conduct of minors in public places by ordinance or other local law.

(6) If a law enforcement officer has a reasonable suspicion that a child is being unlawfully harbored in violation of RCW 13.32A.080, the officer shall remove the child from the custody of the person harboring the child and shall transport the child to one of the locations specified in RCW 43.185C.265.

(7) No child may be placed in a secure facility except as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.185C.265 and 2015 c 69 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1) (a) or (b) shall inform the child of the reason for such custody and shall:

(a) Transport the child to his or her home or to a parent at his or her place of employment, if no parent is at home. The parent may request that the officer take the child to the home of an adult extended family member, responsible adult, crisis residential center, the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families, or a licensed youth shelter. In responding to the request of the parent, the officer shall take the child to a requested place which, in the officer's belief, is within a reasonable distance of the parent's home. The officer releasing a child into the custody of a parent, an adult extended family member, responsible adult, or a licensed youth shelter shall inform the person receiving the child of the reason for taking the child into custody and inform all parties of the nature and location of appropriate services available in the community; or

(b) After attempting to notify the parent, take the child to a designated crisis residential center's secure facility or a center's semi-secure facility if a secure facility is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable distance if:

(i) The child expresses fear or distress at the prospect of being returned to his or her home which leads the officer to believe there is a possibility that the child is experiencing some type of abuse or neglect;

(ii) It is not practical to transport the child to his or her home or place of the parent's employment; or

(iii) There is no parent available to accept custody of the child; or

(c) After attempting to notify the parent, if a crisis residential center is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable distance, request the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families to accept custody of the child. If the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families determines that an appropriate placement is currently available, the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families shall accept custody and place the child in an out-of-home placement. Upon accepting custody of a child from the officer, the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families may place the child in an out-of-home placement for up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, without filing a child in need of services petition, obtaining parental consent, or obtaining an order for placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. Upon transferring a child to the department of ((social and health services'))children, youth, and families' custody, the officer shall provide written documentation of the reasons and the statutory basis for taking the child into custody. If the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families declines to accept custody of the child, the officer may release the child after attempting to take the child to the following, in the order listed: The home of an adult extended family member; a responsible adult; or a licensed youth shelter. The officer shall immediately notify the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families if no placement option is available and the child is released.

(2) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1)(c) ((or (d))) shall inform the child of the reason for custody. An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1)(c) may release the child to the supervising agency, may return the child to the placement authorized by the supervising agency, or shall take the child to a designated crisis residential ((center's secure facility. If the secure facility is not available, not located within a reasonable distance, or full, the officer shall take the child to a semi-secure crisis residential center. An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1)(d) may place the child in a juvenile detention facility as provided in RCW 43.185C.270 or a secure facility, except that the child shall be taken to detention whenever the officer has been notified that a juvenile court has entered a detention order under this chapter or chapter 13.34 RCW))center.

(3) Every officer taking a child into custody shall provide the child and his or her parent or parents or responsible adult with a copy of the statement specified in RCW 43.185C.290(6).

(4) Whenever an officer transfers custody of a child to a crisis residential center or the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families, the child may reside in the crisis residential center or may be placed by the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families in an out-of-home placement for an aggregate total period of time not to exceed seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. Thereafter, the child may continue in out-of-home placement only if the parents have consented, a child in need of services petition has been filed, or an order for placement has been entered under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(5) The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families shall ensure that all law enforcement authorities are informed on a regular basis as to the location of all designated secure and semi-secure facilities within centers in their jurisdiction, where children taken into custody under RCW 43.185C.260 may be taken.

Sec. 12. RCW 2.56.032 and 2016 c 205 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) To accurately track the extent to which courts order youth into a secure detention facility in Washington state for the violation of a court order related to a truancy, at-risk youth, or a child in need of services petition, all juvenile courts shall transmit youth-level secure detention data to the administrative office of the courts.

(b) Data may either be entered into the statewide management information system for juvenile courts or securely transmitted to the administrative office of the courts at least monthly. Juvenile courts shall provide, at a minimum, the name and date of birth for the youth, the court case number assigned to the petition, the reasons for admission to the juvenile detention facility, the date of admission, the date of exit, and the time the youth spent in secure confinement.

(c) Courts are also encouraged to report individual-level data reflecting whether a detention alternative, such as electronic monitoring, was used, and the time spent in detention alternatives.

(d) The administrative office of the courts and the juvenile court administrators must work to develop uniform data standards for detention.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall deliver an annual statewide report to the legislature that details the number of Washington youth who are placed into detention facilities during the preceding calendar year. The first report shall be delivered by March 1, 2017, and shall detail the most serious reason for detention and youth gender, race, and ethnicity. The report must have a specific emphasis on youth who are detained for reasons relating to a truancy, at-risk youth, or a child in need of services petition. Until July 1, 2022, the report must monitor trends in the use of at-risk youth petitions under chapter 13.32A RCW as well as track the race and gender of youth with at-risk petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.185C.270 (Youth services—Officer taking child into custody—Placing in detention—Detention review hearing—Hearing on contempt) and 2015 c 69 s 15; and

(2) 1998 c 296 s 35 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Except for sections 4 and 6 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 4 and 6 of this act take effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---