BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.24.060 and 2003 c 111 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

When filing for office, a candidate shall file using the name appearing on the candidate's voter registration. A candidate may, separately indicate the manner in which ((he or she))the candidate desires ((his or her))the first, or given, name to be printed on the ballot. For ((filing purposes))the ballot, a candidate may use a nickname by which ((he or she is))the candidate is commonly known ((as his or her first name, but the last name shall be the name under which he or she is registered to vote)).

No candidate may:

(1) Use a nickname that denotes present or past occupation, including military rank;

(2) Use a nickname that denotes the candidate's position on issues or political affiliation;

(3) Use a nickname designed intentionally to mislead voters;

(4) Use a last name or surname that is different from the last name or surname that appears on the candidate's voter registration.

--- END ---