BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70B.070 and 1995 c 347 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Within twenty-eight))A project permit application shall be deemed complete upon submittal, except that within ten days after receiving a project permit application that is submitted online or in person without an appointment, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall ((mail or)) provide ((in person)) a written determination to the applicant, stating either:

(a) That the application is complete; or

(b) That the application is incomplete and what is necessary to make the application complete.

To the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.

(2) A project permit application is complete for purposes of this section when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government and is sufficient for continued processing even though additional information may be required or project modifications may be undertaken subsequently. The determination of completeness shall not preclude the local government from requesting additional information or studies either at the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new information is required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur.

(3) The determination of completeness may include the following as optional information:

(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation;

(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040; or

(c) Other information the local government chooses to include.

(4)(a) An application shall be deemed complete under this section if the local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(b) Within ((fourteen))five days after an applicant has submitted to a local government additional information identified by the local government as being necessary for a complete application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether the application is complete or what additional information is necessary.

--- END ---