BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that public safety will be improved if hands-free wireless communications devices are widely adopted for use in motor vehicles to replace technology that requires drivers to move their hands from the steering wheel and/or their eyes from the roadway to send or receive messages. The legislature has recently changed the penalties for texting while driving, and redefined the behavior that will subject motorists to penalties. The legislature finds that the legislature can help reduce the cost of communications technology that can be operated hands-free in motor vehicles, and thereby encourage compliance with the new law, by eliminating the sales tax on these items. The legislature's objective is to do everything in its power to make the transition to compliance with the law affordable for all persons irrespective of income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to any sale of hands-free wireless communications devices, whether sold as original equipment by the manufacturer of an automobile or as an aftermarket product or service.

(2) For purposes of this section, "hands-free wireless communications device" means a device specifically designed and configured to allow voice-operated and hands-free operation."

(3) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a hands-free wireless communications device, whether sold as original equipment by the manufacturer of an automobile or as an aftermarket product or service.

(2) For purposes of this section, "hands-free wireless communications device" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The provisions of RCW 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---