BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.25.190 and 2000 c 171 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit:

(1) The temporary practice in this state of chiropractic by any chiropractor licensed by another state, territory, or country in which he or she resides. However, the chiropractor shall not establish a practice open to the general public and shall not engage in temporary practice under this section for a period longer than thirty days. The chiropractor shall register his or her intention to engage in the temporary practice of chiropractic in this state with the commission before engaging in the practice of chiropractic, and shall agree to be bound by such conditions as may be prescribed by rule by the commission.

(2) The practice of chiropractic((, except the administration of a chiropractic adjustment,)) by a person who is a regular senior student in an accredited school of chiropractic approved by the commission if the practice is part of a regular course of instruction offered by the school and the student is under the direct supervision and control of a chiropractor duly licensed pursuant to this chapter and approved by the commission. A senior student practicing chiropractic under this subsection must pass an open book written jurisprudence examination approved by the commission prior to administering a chiropractic adjustment.

(3) The practice of chiropractic by a person serving a period of postgraduate chiropractic training in a program of clinical chiropractic training sponsored by a school of chiropractic accredited in this state if the practice is part of his or her duties as a clinical postgraduate trainee and the trainee is under the direct supervision and control of a chiropractor duly licensed pursuant to this chapter and approved by the commission.

(4) The practice of chiropractic by a person who is eligible and has applied to take the next available examination for licensing offered by the commission, except that the unlicensed chiropractor must provide all services under the direct control and supervision of a licensed chiropractor approved by the commission. The unlicensed chiropractor may continue to practice as provided by this subsection until the results of the next available examination are published, but in no case for a period longer than six months. The commission shall adopt rules necessary to effectuate the intent of this subsection.

Any provision of chiropractic services by any individual under subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the commission as provided in chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---