BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each person holding state elective office in the legislative, executive, and judicial branches of the state government, and each member of the state board of education, must complete all statewide high school assessments required for graduation from a public school.

(b) Persons completing assessments under this section must:

(i) Comply with the assessment requirements in effect at the time the assessments are completed; and

(ii) Complete the assessments at least once while serving in office or on the state board of education, but may retake an assessment in one or more content area.

(2)(a) Except as provided otherwise by this subsection (2), assessments completed under this section must be provided to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for ensuring that the assessment results are promptly determined.

(b) Assessments completed under this section by the superintendent of public instruction must be provided to the state board of education, and the state board of education is responsible for ensuring that the results are promptly determined.

(3) Individual results from assessments completed under this section must be published on the web site of the employing state agency or, for members of the state board of education, the web site of the state board of education, within ninety days of the completion of the assessments.

--- END ---