BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A joint legislative task force on criminal sentencing is established.

(2) The task force is composed of members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint members representing the following:

(i) Caseload forecast council;

(ii) Department of corrections;

(iii) Sentencing guidelines commission;

(iv) Statewide family council administered by the department of corrections;

(v) Statewide reentry council;

(vi) Superior court judges' association;

(vii) Washington association of criminal defense attorneys or the Washington defender association;

(viii) Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(ix) Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(x) Washington state association of counties;

(xi) Washington state minority and justice commission;

(xii) A labor organization representing active law enforcement officers in Washington state; and

(xiii) Two different community organizations representing the interests of incarcerated persons.

(3) The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than September 1, 2019. The legislative membership shall choose the task force's cochairs, which must include one senator and one representative from among the legislative membership of the task force.

(4) The task force shall review state sentencing laws, including a consideration of the report of the sentencing guidelines commission required by section 129, chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The task force shall develop recommendations for the purpose of:

(a) Reducing sentencing implementation complexities and errors;

(b) Improving the effectiveness of the sentencing system; and

(c) Promoting and improving public safety.

(5) The task force shall submit an initial report, including findings and recommendations, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2019. The task force shall submit a final report by December 31, 2020.

(6) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(7) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(8) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(9) This section expires January 1, 2021.

--- END ---