BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.57.020 and 2010 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more regional centers. For purposes of this chapter, "regional center" means a convention, conference, or special events center, or any combination of facilities, and related parking facilities, serving a regional population constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt service. "Regional center" also includes an existing convention, conference, or special events center, and related parking facilities, serving a regional population, that is improved or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, where the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars, including debt service. A "special events center" is a facility, available to the public, used for community events, sporting events, trade shows, and artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances. A regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a regional population if state and local government investment in the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is equal to or greater than ten million dollars.

(b) A public facilities district created under RCW 35.57.010(1)(e):

(i) Is authorized, in addition to the authority granted under (a) of this subsection, to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more recreational facilities other than a ski area;

(ii) If exercising its authority under (a) or (b)(i) of this subsection, must obtain voter approval to fund each recreational facility or regional center pursuant to RCW 82.14.048(((3)))(4)(a); and

(iii) Possesses all of the powers with respect to recreational facilities other than a ski area that all public facilities districts possess with respect to regional centers under subsections (3), (4), and (7) of this section.

(c) A public facilities district created under RCW 35.57.010(1)(a) by a city or town that participated in the creation of an additional public facilities district under RCW 35.57.010(1)(e):

(i) Is authorized, in addition to the authority granted under (a) of this subsection, to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more recreational facilities other than a ski area;

(ii) If exercising its authority under (c)(i) of this subsection, must obtain voter approval to fund each recreational facility pursuant to RCW 82.14.048(4)(a); and

(iii) Possesses all of the powers with respect to recreational facilities other than a ski area that all public facilities districts possess with respect to regional centers.

(2) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with any city or town for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.

(3) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a regional center.

(4) A public facilities district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the public facilities district to construct a regional center.

(5) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or management of its public facilities.

(6) A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional center.

(7) A city or town in conjunction with any special agency, authority, or other district established by a county or any other governmental agency is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional center funded in whole or in part by a public facilities district.

(8) Any provision required to be submitted for voter approval under this section, may not be submitted for voter approval prior to January 1, 2011.

--- END ---