BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must develop and implement a proactive policing grant program. The purpose of the program is to provide additional, nonsupplanted funding to law enforcement agencies to address the individual public safety needs of their community.

(2) Grants must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies based on locally developed proposals to address public safety needs of their respective community. Two or more agencies may submit a joint grant proposal. A peer review panel appointed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must review the grant application. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may prioritize grant applications that include local matching funds. To the extent practicable, grants should be awarded on a two-year cycle.

(3) Grant proposals must:

(a) Demonstrate the public safety problem to be addressed;

(b) Identify the strategy for addressing the problem; and

(c) Identify specific data elements to measure the current state of the problem and to measure whether or not the action to address the problem was successful.

(4) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the program. The report must include information on grant recipients, use of funds, and feedback from the grant recipients by December 1st of each year the program is funded.

--- END ---