BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that recent acts of mass violence across the nation have threatened the safety of children at school. Thus, the legislature intends to implement short and long-term strategies that empower school districts to protect our students and provide a safe and secure learning environment. The legislature further intends to adopt policies that support our schools and enable them to increase security, provide greater protections for students and staff, and develop local strategies to identify and intervene against potential threats. The legislature finds that safety-focused design elements in the built environment can reduce and deter criminal activity and increase safety. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage the incorporation of these design elements into the construction of school facilities as a long-term strategy to reduce incidences of violence and increase the safety of students and staff.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.335.010 and 2013 c 233 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(a) Cause all school buildings to be properly heated, lighted, and ventilated and maintained in a clean and sanitary condition; and

(b) Maintain and repair, furnish, and insure such school buildings.

(2) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall also:

(a) Consider installing a perimeter security control mechanism or system on all school campuses, as appropriate to the design of the campus; and

(b) For new school construction projects or remodeling projects of more than forty percent of an existing school building that are initiated after July ((28, 2013))1, 2020, consider school building plans and designs that promote:

(i) An optimal level of security for the specific school site that incorporates evolving technology and best practices to protect students and staff in the event of a threat during school hours;

(ii) Direct control and observation of the public entering school grounds; ((and))

(iii) The public entering school grounds through as few entrances as possible, such as through the main entrance of a school's administrative offices; and

(iv) Effective physical safety and security through natural surveillances, natural access controls, and territorial reinforcements, or other safety-focused environmental design elements, while maintaining functional and aesthetic qualities of school buildings, grounds, and surroundings.

(3) The purpose of subsection (2) of this section is to promote generally the safety of all students and staff in Washington public schools. Nothing in subsection (2) of this section creates any civil liability for school districts, or creates a new cause of action or new theory of negligence against a school district board of directors, a school district, or the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 28A.525.050 (Applications for aid—Recommendations) and 2006 c 263 s 303 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.080 are each repealed.

--- END ---