BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Narrow track vehicle" means a fully enclosed motor vehicle with three or four wheels that does not exceed forty inches in width. A "narrow track vehicle" that does not exceed one hundred two inches in length is classified as a "short narrow track vehicle."

Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.320 and 2010 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Motor vehicle" means every vehicle that is self-propelled and every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails. "Motor vehicle" includes a neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.357. "Motor vehicle" includes a medium-speed electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.295. "Motor vehicle" includes a narrow track vehicle as defined in section 1 of this act. An electric personal assistive mobility device is not considered a motor vehicle. A power wheelchair is not considered a motor vehicle. A golf cart is not considered a motor vehicle, except for the purposes of chapter 46.61 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.184 and 2015 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the operator of a bicycle, moped, ((or)) street legal motorcycle, or narrow track vehicle approaching an intersection, including a left turn intersection, that is controlled by a triggered traffic control signal using a vehicle detection device that is inoperative due to the size or composition of the bicycle, moped, ((or)) street legal motorcycle, or narrow track vehicle shall come to a full and complete stop at the intersection. If the traffic control signal, including the left turn signal, as appropriate, fails to operate after one cycle of the traffic signal, the operator may, after exercising due care, proceed directly through the intersection or proceed to turn left, as appropriate. It is not a defense to a violation of RCW 46.61.050 that the operator of a bicycle, moped, ((or)) motorcycle, or narrow track vehicle proceeded under the belief that a traffic control signal used a vehicle detection device or was inoperative due to the size or composition of the bicycle, moped, ((or)) motorcycle, or narrow track vehicle when the signal did not use a vehicle detection device or that any such device was not in fact inoperative due to the size or composition of the bicycle, moped, ((or)) motorcycle, or narrow track vehicle. For purposes of this section, "bicycle" includes a bicycle, as defined in RCW 46.04.071, and an electric-assisted bicycle, as defined in RCW 46.04.169.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.575 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels parallel to and within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

(2) Except when otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within twelve inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

(3) Local authorities may by ordinance or resolution permit angle parking on any roadway, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless the secretary of transportation has determined by order that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic.

(4)(a) When local authorities permit angle parking of motorcycles on a roadway, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a short narrow track vehicle, as defined in section 1 of this act, may also park in the angled manner specified for motorcycles, except when a short narrow track vehicle is specifically prohibited from parking in this manner by local ordinance.

(b) A short narrow track vehicle, as defined in section 1 of this act, may park in parking stalls restricted to motorcycle parking only, except when a short narrow track vehicle is specifically prohibited from parking in these parking stalls by local ordinance.

(5) The secretary with respect to highways under his or her jurisdiction may place official traffic control devices prohibiting, limiting, or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where the secretary has determined by order, such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon. No person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by such devices.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.608 and 2013 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All motorcycles and narrow track vehicles are entitled to full use of a lane and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle or narrow track vehicle of the full use of a lane. This subsection shall not apply to motorcycles or narrow track vehicles operated two abreast in a single lane, as permitted under subsection (4) of this section.

(2) The operator of a motorcycle or narrow track vehicle shall not overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken. However, this subsection shall not apply when the operator of a motorcycle or narrow track vehicle overtakes and passes a pedestrian or bicyclist while maintaining a safe passing distance of at least three feet.

(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle or narrow track vehicle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a single lane. Narrow track vehicles may only be operated two abreast in a single lane when they are in the process of stopping or have come to a complete stop alongside one another.

(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to police officers in the performance of their official duties.

--- END ---