BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:

(1) Programs for the electrification of transportation have the potential to allow electric utilities to optimize the use of electric grid infrastructure, improve the management of electric loads, and better manage the integration of variable renewable energy resources. Depending upon each utility's unique circumstances, electrification of transportation programs may provide cost-effective energy efficiency, through more efficient use of energy resources, and more efficient use of the electric delivery system. Electrification of transportation may result in cost savings and benefits for all ratepayers.

(2) State policy can achieve the greatest return on investment in reducing greenhouse gas emissions and improving air quality by expediting the transition to alternative fuel vehicles, including electric vehicles. Potential benefits associated with electrification of transportation include the monetization of environmental attributes associated with carbon reduction in the transportation sector.

(3) Legislative clarity is important for utilities to offer programs and services, including incentives, in the electrification of transportation for their customers. It is the intent of the legislature to achieve parity among all electric utilities, so each electric utility, depending on its unique circumstances, can determine its appropriate role in the development of electrification of transportation infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governing authority of an electric utility formed under this chapter may adopt an electrification of transportation plan that, at a minimum, establishes a finding that utility outreach and investment in the electrification of transportation infrastructure does not increase net costs to ratepayers in excess of one-quarter of one percent.

(2) In adopting an electrification of transportation plan under subsection (1) of this section, the governing authority may consider some or all of the following: (a) The applicability of multiple options for electrification of transportation across all customer classes; (b) the impact of electrification on the utility's load, and whether demand response or other load management opportunities, including direct load control and dynamic pricing, are operationally appropriate; (c) system reliability and distribution system efficiencies; (d) interoperability concerns, including the interoperability of hardware and software systems in electrification of transportation proposals; and (e) overall customer experience.

(3) An electric utility formed under this chapter may, upon making a determination in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, offer incentive programs in the electrification of transportation for its customers, including the promotion of electric vehicle adoption and advertising programs to promote the utility's services, incentives, or rebates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission of a public utility district may adopt an electrification of transportation plan that, at a minimum, establishes a finding that outreach and investment in the electrification of transportation infrastructure does not increase net costs to ratepayers in excess of one-quarter of one percent.

(2) In adopting an electrification of transportation plan under subsection (1) of this section, the commission of a public utility district may consider some or all of the following: (a) The applicability of multiple options for electrification of transportation across all customer classes; (b) the impact of electrification on the district's load, and whether demand response or other load management opportunities, including direct load control and dynamic pricing, are operationally appropriate; (c) system reliability and distribution system efficiencies; (d) interoperability concerns, including the interoperability of hardware and software systems in electrification of transportation proposals; and (e) overall customer experience.

(3) A public utility district may, upon making a determination in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, offer incentive programs in the electrification of transportation for its customers, including the promotion of electric vehicle adoption and advertising programs to promote the district's services, incentives, or rebates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An electric utility regulated by the utilities and transportation commission under this chapter may submit to the commission an electrification of transportation plan that deploys electric vehicle supply equipment or provides other electric transportation programs, services, or incentives to support electrification of transportation, provided that such electric vehicle supply equipment, programs, or services may not increase costs to customers in excess of one-quarter of one percent above the benefits of electric transportation to all customers over a period consistent with the utility's planning horizon under its most recent integrated resource plan.

(2) In reviewing an electrification of transportation plan under subsection (1) of this section, the commission may consider the following: (a) The applicability of multiple options for electrification of transportation across all customer classes; (b) the impact of electrification on the utility's load, and whether demand response or other load management opportunities, including direct load control and dynamic pricing, are operationally appropriate; (c) system reliability and distribution system efficiencies; (d) interoperability concerns, including the interoperability of hardware and software systems in electrification of transportation proposals; (e) the benefits and costs of the planned actions; and (f) the overall customer experience.

(3) The commission must issue an acknowledgment of an electrification of transportation plan within six months of the submittal of the plan. The commission may establish by rule the requirements for preparation and submission of an electrification of transportation plan. An electric utility may submit a plan under this section before or during rule-making proceedings.

Sec. 5. RCW 80.28.360 and 2015 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing rates for each electrical company regulated under this title, the commission may allow an incentive rate of return on investment through December 31, 2030, on capital expenditures for electric vehicle supply equipment that is deployed for the benefit of ratepayers, provided that the capital expenditures do not increase costs to ratepayers in excess of one-quarter of one percent. The commission must consider and may adopt other policies to improve access to and promote fair competition in the provision of electric vehicle supply equipment.

(2) An incentive rate of return on investment under this section may be allowed only if the company chooses to pursue capital investment in electric vehicle supply equipment on a fully regulated basis similar to other capital investments behind a customer's meter. In the case of an incentive rate of return on investment allowed under this section, an increment of up to two percent must be added to the rate of return on common equity allowed on the company's other investments.

(3) The incentive rate of return on investment authorized in subsection (2) of this section applies only to projects which have been installed after July 1, 2015((, and which are reasonably expected, at the time they are placed in the rate base, to result in real and tangible benefits for ratepayers by being installed and located where electric vehicles are most likely to be parked for intervals longer than two hours)).

(4) The incentive rate of return on investment increment pursuant to this section may be earned only for a period up to the depreciable life of the electric vehicle supply equipment as defined in the depreciation schedules developed by the company and submitted to the commission for review. When the capital investment has fully depreciated, an electrical company may gift the electric vehicle supply equipment to the owner of the property on which it is located.

(5) By December 31, 2017, the commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with regard to the use of any incentives allowed under this section, the quantifiable impacts of the incentives on actual electric vehicle deployment, and any recommendations to the legislature about utility participation in the electric vehicle market.

--- END ---