BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that substance use disorder is a disease impacting the whole family and the whole society and requires a system of care that includes prevention, treatment, and recovery services that support and strengthen impacted individuals, families, and the community at large.

(2) The legislature further finds that access to quality recovery housing is crucial for helping individuals remain in recovery from substance use disorder beyond treatment. Furthermore, recovery housing serves to preserve the state's financial investment in a person's treatment. Without access to quality recovery housing, individuals are much less likely to recover from substance use disorder and more likely to face continued issues that impact their well-being, their families, and their communities. These issues include death by overdose or other substance use disorder-related medical complications; higher health care costs; high use of emergency departments and public health care systems; higher risk for involvement with law enforcement and incarceration; and an inability to obtain and maintain employment. These challenges are compounded by an overall lack of affordable housing nationwide.

(3) The legislature recognizes that recovery is a long-term process and requires a comprehensive approach. Recognizing the potential for fraudulent and unethical recovery housing operators, this act is designed to address the quality of recovery housing in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish and maintain a registry of approved recovery residences. The authority may contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence certification organization based in Washington to establish and maintain the registry.

(2) The authority or the contracted entity described in subsection (1) of this section shall determine that a recovery residence is approved for inclusion in the registry if the recovery residence has been certified by a nationally recognized recovery residence certification organization based in Washington that is approved by the authority or if the recovery residence is a chapter of a national recovery residence organization with peer-run homes that is approved by the authority as meeting the following standards in its certification process:

(a) Peers are required to be involved in the governance of the recovery residence;

(b) Recovery support is integrated into the daily activities;

(c) The recovery residence must be maintained as a home-like environment that promotes healthy recovery;

(d) Resident activities are promoted within the recovery residence and in the community through work, education, community engagement, or other activities; and

(e) The recovery residence maintains an environment free from alcohol and illicit drugs.

(3) Nothing in this section requires that a recovery residence become certified by the certifying organization approved by the authority in subsection (2) of this section or be included in the registry, unless the recovery residence decides to participate in the recovery residence program activities established in this chapter.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "recovery residence" means a home-like environment that promotes healthy recovery from a substance use disorder and supports persons recovering from a substance use disorder through the use of peer recovery support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority shall contract with the nationally recognized recovery residence organization based in Washington that is approved by the authority in section 2 of this act to provide technical assistance to recovery residences actively seeking certification. The technical assistance shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) New manager training;

(b) Assistance preparing facility operations documents and policies; and

(c) Support for working with residents on medication-assisted treatment.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish a revolving fund for loans to operators of new recovery residences or existing recovery residences actively seeking certification and registration under section 2 of this act. Approved uses of the funds include, but are not limited to:

(a) Facility modifications necessary to achieve certification; and

(b) Operating start-up costs, including rent or mortgage payments, security deposits, salaries for on-site staff, and minimal maintenance costs.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2023, a licensed or certified service provider may not refer a patient who is in need of housing to support the patient's recovery from a substance use disorder to a recovery residence that is not included in the registry of approved recovery residences maintained by the authority under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.24.385 and 2018 c 201 s 4023 and 2018 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, behavioral health organizations shall develop the means to serve the needs of people:

(a) With mental disorders residing within the boundaries of their regional service area. Elements of the program may include:

(i) Crisis diversion services;

(ii) Evaluation and treatment and community hospital beds;

(iii) Residential treatment;

(iv) Programs for intensive community treatment;

(v) Outpatient services, including family support;

(vi) Peer support services;

(vii) Community support services;

(viii) Resource management services; and

(ix) Supported housing and supported employment services.

(b) With substance use disorders and their families, people incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated people.

(i) Elements of the program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of substance use disorder treatment services that includes:

(A) Withdrawal management;

(B) Residential treatment; and

(C) Outpatient treatment.

(ii) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, ((or)) recovery support services, or technology-based recovery supports.

(iii) The authority may contract for the use of an approved substance use disorder treatment program or other individual or organization if the director considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(2)(a) The behavioral health organization shall have the flexibility, within the funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose and the terms of their contract, to design the mix of services that will be most effective within their service area of meeting the needs of people with behavioral health disorders and avoiding placement of such individuals at the state mental hospital. Behavioral health organizations are encouraged to maximize the use of evidence-based practices and alternative resources with the goal of substantially reducing and potentially eliminating the use of institutions for mental diseases.

(b) The behavioral health organization may allow reimbursement to providers for services delivered through a partial hospitalization or intensive outpatient program. Such payment and services are distinct from the state's delivery of wraparound with intensive services under the T.R. v. Strange and McDermott, formerly the T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter, settlement agreement.

(3)(a) Treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts.

(b) Consistent with RCW 71.24.580, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---