BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Psychiatric per diem payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW for services provided by a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased on or after the effective date of this section, sufficiently to ensure that services are provided. Increased psychiatric per diem payments under this section are effective from the effective date of this section through June 30, 2019, and apply only when services are provided by a hospital that:

(a) Is designated as a rural hospital by the department of health;

(b) Has less than fifty staffed acute care beds, as reported in the hospital's 2017 department of health year-end report;

(c) Is not currently designated as a critical access hospital, and does not meet current federal eligibility requirements for designation as a critical access hospital;

(d) Is not currently participating in the certified public expenditure full cost reimbursement program; and

(e) Has combined medicare and medicaid inpatient days greater than fifty percent of total days, as reported in the hospital's 2017 cost report.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---