BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.730 and 2015 c 134 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday may petition the indeterminate sentence review board for early release from sentences for those crimes after serving no less than twenty years of total confinement, provided the person has not been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's eighteenth birthday, the person has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department in the twelve months prior to filing the petition for early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 10.95.030 or 9.94A.507.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person who has been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's eighteenth birthday may petition for early release for crimes committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday, provided that: (i) He or she has served no less than twenty-five years of total confinement for sentences for those crimes committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday; (ii) he or she has served the full sentences for all crimes committed subsequent to the person's eighteenth birthday; (iii) he or she has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department in the twelve months prior to filing the petition for early release; and (iv) the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 10.95.030 or 9.94A.507.

(2)(a) No later than five years prior to the date the offender will be eligible to petition for release, the department shall conduct an assessment of the offender and identify programming and services that would be appropriate to prepare the offender for return to the community. To the extent possible, the department shall make programming available as identified by the assessment.

(b) For an offender who is eligible to petition for release under subsection (1)(b) of this section within five years of the effective date of this section, the department shall promptly conduct an assessment of the offender and identify programming and services that would be appropriate to prepare the offender for return to the community. To the extent possible, the department shall make programming available as identified by the assessment on an expedited basis.

(3) No later than one hundred eighty days from receipt of the petition for early release, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an examination of the person, incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability that the person will engage in future criminal behavior if released on conditions to be set by the board. The board may consider a person's failure to participate in an evaluation under this subsection in determining whether to release the person. The board shall order the person released under such affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person will commit new criminal law violations if released. The board shall give public safety considerations the highest priority when making all discretionary decisions regarding the ability for release and conditions of release.

(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section, the board shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present statements as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. The procedures for victim and survivor of victim input shall be provided by rule. To facilitate victim and survivor of victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and known contact information for victims of record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of the judgment and sentence.

(5) An offender released by the board is subject to the supervision of the department for a period of time to be determined by the board, up to the length of the court-imposed term of incarceration. The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by the court or board and promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.

(6) An offender whose petition for release is denied may file a new petition for release five years from the date of denial or at an earlier date as may be set by the board.

(7) An offender released under the provisions of this section may be returned to the institution at the discretion of the board if the offender is found to have violated a condition of community custody. The offender is entitled to a hearing pursuant to RCW 9.95.435. If the board finds that the offender has committed a new violation, the board may return the offender to the institution for up to the remainder of the court-imposed term of incarceration. The offender may file a new petition for release five years from the date of return to the institution or at an earlier date as may be set by the board.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.95.030 and 2015 c 134 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.

(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW 10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to death if the person had an intellectual disability at the time the crime was committed, under the definition of intellectual disability set forth in (a) of this subsection. A diagnosis of intellectual disability shall be documented by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the court, who is an expert in the diagnosis and evaluation of intellectual disabilities. The defense must establish an intellectual disability by a preponderance of the evidence and the court must make a finding as to the existence of an intellectual disability.

(a) "Intellectual disability" means the individual has: (i) Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii) existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii) both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental period.

(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual functioning.

(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning" means intelligence quotient seventy or below.

(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and social responsibility expected for his or her age.

(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between conception and the eighteenth birthday.

(3)(a)(((i))) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for an offense committed prior to the person's ((sixteenth))eighteenth birthday shall be sentenced to a ((maximum term of life imprisonment and a minimum term))range of total confinement with a minimum term of twenty-five years and a maximum term determined by the court. The maximum term may not exceed a life sentence. Sentences imposed under this section must be served concurrently with sentences imposed for any other current offenses.

(((ii) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for an offense committed when the person is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old shall be sentenced to a maximum term of life imprisonment and a minimum term of total confinement of no less than twenty-five years. A minimum term of life may be imposed, in which case the person will be ineligible for parole or early release.))

(b) In setting ((a minimum))the maximum term, the court must take into account mitigating factors that account for the diminished culpability of youth as provided in Miller v. Alabama, ((132 S.Ct. 2455))567 U.S. 460 (2012) including, but not limited to, the age of the individual, the youth's childhood and life experience, the degree of responsibility the youth was capable of exercising, ((and)) the youth's chances of becoming rehabilitated, and any progress towards rehabilitation demonstrated by the youth following the commission of the crime for which he or she is being sentenced.

(c) A person sentenced under this subsection shall serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state. During the minimum term of total confinement, the person shall not be eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized leave or absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply: (i) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; or (ii) for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((3)))(1)(c).

(d) Any person sentenced pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to community custody under the supervision of the department of corrections and the authority of the indeterminate sentence review board. As part of any sentence under this subsection, the court shall require the person to comply with any conditions imposed by the board.

(e) No later than five years prior to the expiration of the person's minimum term, the department of corrections shall conduct an assessment of the offender and identify programming and services that would be appropriate to prepare the offender for return to the community. To the extent possible, the department shall make programming available as identified by the assessment.

(f) No later than one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration of the person's minimum term, the department of corrections shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an examination of the person, incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability that the person will engage in future criminal behavior if released on conditions to be set by the board. The board may consider a person's failure to participate in an evaluation under this subsection in determining whether to release the person. After serving his or her minimum sentence, the board shall order the person released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person will commit new criminal law violations if released. If the board does not order the person released, the board shall set a new minimum term not to exceed five additional years. The board shall give public safety considerations the highest priority when making all discretionary decisions regarding the ability for release and conditions of release.

(g) In a hearing conducted under (f) of this subsection, the board shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present statements as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. The procedures for victim and survivor of victim input shall be provided by rule. To facilitate victim and survivor of victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and known contact information for victims of record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of the judgment and sentence.

(h) An offender released by the board is subject to the supervision of the department of corrections for a period of time to be determined by the board, up to the length of the court-imposed maximum term of incarceration. The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by the court or board and promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.

(i) An offender released or discharged under this section may be returned to the institution at the discretion of the board if the offender is found to have violated a condition of community custody. The offender is entitled to a hearing pursuant to RCW 9.95.435. The board shall set a new minimum term of incarceration not to exceed five years.

Sec. 3. RCW 10.95.035 and 2015 c 134 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person, who was sentenced prior to ((June 1, 2014, under this chapter or any prior law, to a term of life without the possibility of parole for an offense))the effective date of this section and is still incarcerated as of the effective date of this section for a conviction of aggravated murder committed prior to ((their))his or her eighteenth birthday, shall be returned to the sentencing court or the sentencing court's successor for sentencing consistent with RCW 10.95.030 and Miller v. Alabama, 567 U.S. 460 (2012). The release and supervision of a person ((who receives a minimum term of less than life))resentenced pursuant to this section will be governed by RCW 10.95.030.

(2) The court shall provide an opportunity for victims and survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present a statement personally or by representation.

(3) The court's order setting a minimum term is subject to review to the same extent as a minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.

(4) A resentencing under this section shall not reopen the defendant's conviction to challenges that would otherwise be barred by RCW 10.73.090, 10.73.100, 10.73.140, or other procedural barriers.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.510 and 2014 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL

OFFENDER SCORE

0

1

2

3

4

5

6

7

8

9 or

more

XVI

Life sentence without parole/death penalty for offenders at or over the age of eighteen. For offenders under the age of eighteen, ((a term of twenty-five years to life))an indeterminate term pursuant to RCW 10.95.030.

XV

23y4m

24y4m

25y4m

26y4m

27y4m

28y4m

30y4m

32y10m

36y

40y

240-

250-

261-

271-

281-

291-

312-

338-

370-

411-

320

333

347

361

374

388

416

450

493

548

XIV

14y4m

15y4m

16y2m

17y

17y11m

18y9m

20y5m

22y2m

25y7m

29y

123-

134-

144-

154-

165-

175-

195-

216-

257-

298-

220

234

244

254

265

275

295

316

357

397

XIII

12y

13y

14y

15y

16y

17y

19y

21y

25y

29y

123-

134-

144-

154-

165-

175-

195-

216-

257-

298-

164

178

192

205

219

233

260

288

342

397

XII

9y

9y11m

10y9m

11y8m

12y6m

13y5m

15y9m

17y3m

20y3m

23y3m

93-

102-

111-

120-

129-

138-

162-

178-

209-

240-

123

136

147

160

171

184

216

236

277

318

XI

7y6m

8y4m

9y2m

9y11m

10y9m

11y7m

14y2m

15y5m

17y11m

20y5m

78-

86-

95-

102-

111-

120-

146-

159-

185-

210-

102

114

125

136

147

158

194

211

245

280

X

5y

5y6m

6y

6y6m

7y

7y6m

9y6m

10y6m

12y6m

14y6m

51-

57-

62-

67-

72-

77-

98-

108-

129-

149-

68

75

82

89

96

102

130

144

171

198

IX

3y

3y6m

4y

4y6m

5y

5y6m

7y6m

8y6m

10y6m

12y6m

31-

36-

41-

46-

51-

57-

77-

87-

108-

129-

41

48

54

61

68

75

102

116

144

171

VIII

2y

2y6m

3y

3y6m

4y

4y6m

6y6m

7y6m

8y6m

10y6m

21-

26-

31-

36-

41-

46-

67-

77-

87-

108-

27

34

41

48

54

61

89

102

116

144

VII

18m

2y

2y6m

3y

3y6m

4y

5y6m

6y6m

7y6m

8y6m

15-

21-

26-

31-

36-

41-

57-

67-

77-

87-

20

27

34

41

48

54

75

89

102

116

VI

13m

18m

2y

2y6m

3y

3y6m

4y6m

5y6m

6y6m

7y6m

12+-

15-

21-

26-

31-

36-

46-

57-

67-

77-

14

20

27

34

41

48

61

75

89

102

V

9m

13m

15m

18m

2y2m

3y2m

4y

5y

6y

7y

6-

12+-

13-

15-

22-

33-

41-

51-

62-

72-

12

14

17

20

29

43

54

68

82

96

IV

6m

9m

13m

15m

18m

2y2m

3y2m

4y2m

5y2m

6y2m

3-

6-

12+-

13-

15-

22-

33-

43-

53-

63-

9

12

14

17

20

29

43

57

70

84

III

2m

5m

8m

11m

14m

20m

2y2m

3y2m

4y2m

5y

1-

3-

4-

9-

12+-

17-

22-

33-

43-

51-

3

8

12

12

16

22

29

43

57

68

II

4m

6m

8m

13m

16m

20m

2y2m

3y2m

4y2m

0-90

2-

3-

4-

12+-

14-

17-

22-

33-

43-

Days

6

9

12

14

18

22

29

43

57

I

3m

4m

5m

8m

13m

16m

20m

2y2m

0-60

0-90

2-

2-

3-

4-

12+-

14-

17-

22-

Days

Days

5

6

8

12

14

18

22

29

Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent standard sentence ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

--- END ---