BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.50.115 and 2013 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A midwife licensed under this chapter may obtain and administer prophylactic ophthalmic medication, postpartum oxytocic, vitamin K, Rho immune globulin (human), and local anesthetic and may administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed by a physician. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed midwife shall not be liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the midwife.

The secretary, after consultation with representatives of the midwife advisory committee, the pharmacy quality assurance commission, and the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, may adopt rules that authorize licensed midwives to purchase and use legend drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized in this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.71.002 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of the ((medical quality assurance)) commission to regulate the competency and quality of professional health care providers under its jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensing, consistent standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline. Rules, policies, and procedures developed by the commission must promote the delivery of quality health care to the residents of the state of Washington.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.71.010 and 2018 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((following terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings set forth))definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly ((indicates))requires otherwise((:)).

(1) "Commission" means the Washington ((state)) medical ((quality assurance)) commission.

(2) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

(3) "Maintenance of certification" means the satisfactory participation in a formal recertification program to maintain board certification after initial certification from the American board of medical specialties or other accrediting organization recognized by the commission.

(4) "Resident physician" means an individual who has graduated from a school of medicine which meets the requirements set forth in RCW 18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter, the term ((shall)) includes individuals designated as intern or medical fellow.

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.71.015 and 2006 c 8 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington ((state)) medical ((quality assurance)) commission is established, consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and six individuals who are members of the public. At least two of the public members shall not be from the health care industry. Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the state must be represented by at least one physician member of the commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor. Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and physician assistant members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the board of medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission. No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed.

Each member of the commission must be a citizen of the United States, must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician, must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least five years.

The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.

Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.

Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.

Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.71A.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 318 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Physician assistant" means a person who is licensed by the commission to practice medicine to a limited extent only under the supervision of a physician as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW and who is academically and clinically prepared to provide health care services and perform diagnostic, therapeutic, preventative, and health maintenance services.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission.

(3) "Practice medicine" has the meaning defined in RCW 18.71.011.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.71A.020 and 2015 c 252 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program approved by the commission and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners, or the ((medical quality assurance)) commission as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician assistant training course.

(b) Such rules shall provide:

(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician or physicians at the place where services are rendered.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information as the commission may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of fifty dollars per year shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician assistant participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by the commission;

(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)(a) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW.

(b) The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(5) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to the contract entity within sixty days of deposit.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.130.040 and 2017 c 336 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(iv) Massage therapists and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;

(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates—advanced, and social work associates—independent clinical under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xiv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xvii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;

(xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;

(xix) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;

(xx) Animal massage therapists certified under chapter 18.240 RCW;

(xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;

(xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW;

(xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW;

(xxiv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW; and

(xxvi) Behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, and behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW, licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;

(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;

(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW;

(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW; and

(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses. The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to conditions.

(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.360.030 and 2017 c 336 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall adopt rules specifying the minimum qualifications for a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, medical assistant-phlebotomist, and forensic phlebotomist.

(a) The qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician must be equivalent to the qualifications for hemodialysis technicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.135 RCW as of January 1, 2012.

(b) The qualifications for a forensic phlebotomist must include training consistent with the occupational safety and health administration guidelines and must include between twenty and thirty hours of work in a clinical setting with the completion of more than one hundred successful venipunctures. The secretary may not require more than forty hours of classroom training for initial training, which may include online preclass homework.

(2) The secretary shall adopt rules that establish the minimum requirements necessary for a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice to endorse a medical assistant as qualified to perform the duties authorized by this chapter and be able to file an attestation of that endorsement with the department.

(3) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, the podiatric medical board, the nursing care quality assurance commission, the board of naturopathy, and the optometry board shall each review and identify other specialty assistive personnel not included in this chapter and the tasks they perform. The department of health shall compile the information from each disciplining authority listed in this subsection and submit the compiled information to the legislature no later than December 15, 2012.

Sec. 9. RCW 69.41.030 and 2018 c 196 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed osteopathic physician assistant, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.

(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 10. RCW 69.45.010 and 2013 c 19 s 81 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(2) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor of such drug or substance, so designated under or pursuant to chapter 69.50 RCW, the uniform controlled substances act.

(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a drug or device, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(4) "Department" means the department of health.

(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a drug, biological, or device and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(6) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by administering or dispensing, a legend drug.

(7) "Drug samples" means any federal food and drug administration approved controlled substance, legend drug, or products requiring prescriptions in this state, which is distributed at no charge to a practitioner by a manufacturer or a manufacturer's representative, exclusive of drugs under clinical investigations approved by the federal food and drug administration.

(8) "Legend drug" means any drug that is required by state law or by regulations of the commission to be dispensed on prescription only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.

(9) "Manufacturer" means a person or other entity engaged in the manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices, but does not include a manufacturer's representative.

(10) "Manufacturer's representative" means an agent or employee of a drug manufacturer who is authorized by the drug manufacturer to possess drug samples for the purpose of distribution in this state to appropriately authorized health care practitioners.

(11) "Person" means any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, or any other legal entity.

(12) "Practitioner" means a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or the public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized to prescribe by the nursing care quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission.

(13) "Reasonable cause" means a state of facts found to exist that would warrant a reasonably intelligent and prudent person to believe that a person has violated state or federal drug laws or regulations.

(14) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 11. RCW 69.50.101 and 2018 c 132 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.

(e) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(f) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(g)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(i) "Department" means the department of health.

(j) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(k) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(l) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(m) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(n) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(o) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(p) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(q) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(r) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.

(s) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(t) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (ff)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(u) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(v) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(w) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(x) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include:

(1) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination; or

(2) Industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.120.010.

(y) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(z) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(aa) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(bb) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(cc) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(dd) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(ee) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (x) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(ff) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(gg) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(hh) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(ii) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(jj) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(kk) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(ll) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical ((quality assurance)) commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(mm) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(nn) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(oo) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(pp) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(qq) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(rr) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(ss) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(tt) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(uu) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(vv) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

Sec. 12. RCW 69.50.402 and 2016 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person:

(a) Who is subject to Article III to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of RCW 69.50.308;

(b) Who is a registrant, to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by his or her registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by his or her registration to another registrant or other authorized person;

(c) Who is a practitioner, to prescribe, order, dispense, administer, supply, or give to any person:

(i) Any amphetamine, including its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers classified as a schedule II controlled substance by the commission pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(ii) Any nonnarcotic stimulant classified as a schedule II controlled substance and designated as a nonnarcotic stimulant by the commission pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

except for the treatment of narcolepsy, or for the treatment of hyperkinesis, or for the treatment of drug-induced brain dysfunction, or for the treatment of epilepsy, or for the differential diagnostic psychiatric evaluation of depression, or for the treatment of depression shown to be refractory to other therapeutic modalities, or for the treatment of multiple sclerosis, or for the treatment of any other disease states or conditions for which the United States food and drug administration has approved an indication, or for the clinical investigation of the effects of such drugs or compounds, in which case an investigative protocol therefor shall have been submitted to and reviewed and approved by the commission before the investigation has been begun: PROVIDED, That the commission, in consultation with the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission and the osteopathic disciplinary board, may establish by rule, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, disease states or conditions in addition to those listed in this subsection for the treatment of which Schedule II nonnarcotic stimulants may be prescribed, ordered, dispensed, administered, supplied, or given to patients by practitioners: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That investigations by the commission of abuse of prescriptive authority by physicians, licensed pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW, pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be done in consultation with the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission;

(d) To refuse or fail to make, keep or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice, or information required under this chapter;

(e) To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by this chapter; or

(f) Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or place, which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of this chapter for the purpose of using these substances, or which is used for keeping or selling them in violation of this chapter.

(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than two years, fined not more than two thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 13. RCW 69.51A.300 and 2015 c 70 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of naturopathy, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, and the nursing care quality assurance commission shall develop and approve continuing education programs related to the use of marijuana for medical purposes for the health care providers that they each regulate that are based upon practice guidelines that have been adopted by each entity.

Sec. 14. RCW 70.41.200 and 2013 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:

(a) The establishment of one or more quality improvement committees with the responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. Different quality improvement committees may be established as a part of a quality improvement program to review different health care services. Such committees shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to revise hospital policies and procedures;

(b) A process, including a medical staff privileges sanction procedure which must be conducted substantially in accordance with medical staff bylaws and applicable rules, regulations, or policies of the medical staff through which credentials, physical and mental capacity, professional conduct, and competence in delivering health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation of staff privileges;

(c) A process for the periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental capacity, professional conduct, and competence in delivering health care services of all other health care providers who are employed or associated with the hospital;

(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;

(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes and incidents injurious to patients including health care-associated infections as defined in RCW 43.70.056, patient grievances, professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;

(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential file maintained by the hospital;

(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient safety, medication errors, injury prevention, infection control, staff responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and

(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements of this section.

(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith, participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.

(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure, except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care and treatment received.

(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions taken as a result of those activities.

(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(6) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission or the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals. Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process, and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit.

(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a coordinated quality improvement committee maintained by an ambulatory surgical facility under RCW 70.230.070, a quality assurance committee maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or 74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 74.42.640 (7) and (9), and 4.24.250.

(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.

(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 15. RCW 70.41.230 and 2016 c 68 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or association of any physician or hiring a physician, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from the physician and the physician shall provide the following information:

(a) The name of any hospital or facility with or at which the physician had or has any association, employment, privileges, or practice during the prior five years: PROVIDED, That the hospital may request additional information going back further than five years, and the physician shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a request for additional information;

(b) Whether the physician has ever been or is in the process of being denied, revoked, terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced, limited, sanctioned, placed on probation, monitored, or not renewed for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished, withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection in order to avoid an adverse action or to preclude an investigation or while under investigation relating to professional competence or conduct:

(i) License to practice any profession in any jurisdiction;

(ii) Other professional registration or certification in any jurisdiction;

(iii) Specialty or subspecialty board certification;

(iv) Membership on any hospital medical staff;

(v) Clinical privileges at any facility, including hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, or skilled nursing facilities;

(vi) Medicare, medicaid, the food and drug administration, the national institute of health (office of human research protection), governmental, national, or international regulatory agency, or any public program;

(vii) Professional society membership or fellowship;

(viii) Participation or membership in a health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, independent practice association, physician-hospital organization, or other entity;

(ix) Academic appointment;

(x) Authority to prescribe controlled substances (drug enforcement agency or other authority);

(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the physician deems appropriate;

(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the physician deems appropriate;

(e) A waiver by the physician of any confidentiality provisions concerning the information required to be provided to hospitals pursuant to this subsection; and

(f) A verification by the physician that the information provided by the physician is accurate and complete.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to granting privileges or association to any physician or hiring a physician, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from any hospital with or at which the physician had or has privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the preceding five years, the following information concerning the physician:

(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;

(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state by a licensing or disciplinary board; and

(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals pursuant to RCW 18.71.0195.

(3) In lieu of the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, when granting or renewing privileges or association of any physician providing telemedicine or store and forward services, an originating site hospital may rely on a distant site hospital's decision to grant or renew clinical privileges or association of the physician if the originating site hospital obtains reasonable assurances, through a written agreement with the distant site hospital, that all of the following provisions are met:

(a) The distant site hospital providing the telemedicine or store and forward services is a medicare participating hospital;

(b) Any physician providing telemedicine or store and forward services at the distant site hospital will be fully privileged to provide such services by the distant site hospital;

(c) Any physician providing telemedicine or store and forward services will hold and maintain a valid license to perform such services issued or recognized by the state of Washington; and

(d) With respect to any distant site physician who holds current privileges at the originating site hospital whose patients are receiving the telemedicine or store and forward services, the originating site hospital has evidence of an internal review of the distant site physician's performance of these privileges and sends the distant site hospital such performance information for use in the periodic appraisal of the distant site physician. At a minimum, this information must include all adverse events, as defined in RCW 70.56.010, that result from the telemedicine or store and forward services provided by the distant site physician to the originating site hospital's patients and all complaints the originating site hospital has received about the distant site physician.

(4) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission or the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery shall be advised within thirty days of the name of any physician denied staff privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings under subsection (1) of this section.

(5) A hospital or facility that receives a request for information from another hospital or facility pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall provide such information concerning the physician in question to the extent such information is known to the hospital or facility receiving such a request, including the reasons for suspension, termination, or curtailment of employment or privileges at the hospital or facility. A hospital, facility, or other person providing such information in good faith is not liable in any civil action for the release of such information.

(6) Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care and treatment received.

(7) Hospitals shall be granted access to information held by the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission and the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery pertinent to decisions of the hospital regarding credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.

(8) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 16. RCW 70.230.080 and 2013 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every ambulatory surgical facility shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:

(a) The establishment of one or more quality improvement committees with the responsibility to review the services rendered in the ambulatory surgical facility, both retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. Different quality improvement committees may be established as a part of the quality improvement program to review different health care services. Such committees shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to revise the policies and procedures of the ambulatory surgical facility;

(b) A process, including a medical staff privileges sanction procedure which must be conducted substantially in accordance with medical staff bylaws and applicable rules, regulations, or policies of the medical staff through which credentials, physical and mental capacity, professional conduct, and competence in delivering health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation of staff privileges;

(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all persons who are employed or associated with the ambulatory surgical facility;

(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;

(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information concerning the ambulatory surgical facility's experience with negative health care outcomes and incidents injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the ambulatory surgical facility for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;

(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning individual practitioners within the practitioner's personnel or credential file maintained by the ambulatory surgical facility;

(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and

(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements of this section.

(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith, participates on the quality improvement committee is not subject to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.

(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure, except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence of information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any, and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by rule of the department to be made regarding the care and treatment received.

(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a semiannual basis, report to the management of the ambulatory surgical facility, as identified in the facility's application, in which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions taken as a result of those activities.

(5) The department shall adopt such rules as are deemed appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(6) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or the podiatric medical board, as appropriate, may review and audit the records of committee decisions in which a practitioner's privileges are terminated or restricted. Each ambulatory surgical facility shall produce and make accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained is not subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of an ambulatory surgical facility to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

(7) The department and any accrediting organization may review and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review committee in connection with their inspection and review of the ambulatory surgical facility. Information so obtained is not subject to the discovery process, and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Each ambulatory surgical facility shall produce and make accessible to the department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit.

(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, a quality assurance committee maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or 74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents are not subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 70.41.200(3), 74.42.640 (7) and (9), and 4.24.250.

(9) An ambulatory surgical facility that participates in a coordinated quality improvement program under RCW 43.70.510 shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this section.

(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 17. RCW 70.230.130 and 2007 c 273 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Each ambulatory surgical facility shall keep written records of decisions to restrict or terminate privileges of practitioners. Copies of such records shall be made available to the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or the podiatric medical board, within thirty days of a request, and all information so gained remains confidential in accordance with RCW 70.230.080 and 70.230.120 and is protected from the discovery process. Failure of an ambulatory surgical facility to comply with this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 18. RCW 70.230.140 and 2013 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or association of any practitioner or hiring a practitioner, an ambulatory surgical facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from the practitioner and the practitioner shall provide the following information:

(a) The name of any hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility with or at which the practitioner had or has any association, employment, privileges, or practice during the prior five years: PROVIDED, That the ambulatory surgical facility may request additional information going back further than five years, and the physician shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a request for additional information;

(b) Whether the physician has ever been or is in the process of being denied, revoked, terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced, limited, sanctioned, placed on probation, monitored, or not renewed for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished, withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection in order to avoid an adverse action or to preclude an investigation or while under investigation relating to professional competence or conduct:

(i) License to practice any profession in any jurisdiction;

(ii) Other professional registration or certification in any jurisdiction;

(iii) Specialty or subspecialty board certification;

(iv) Membership on any hospital medical staff;

(v) Clinical privileges at any facility, including hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, or skilled nursing facilities;

(vi) Medicare, medicaid, the food and drug administration, the national institute of health (office of human research protection), governmental, national, or international regulatory agency, or any public program;

(vii) Professional society membership or fellowship;

(viii) Participation or membership in a health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, independent practice association, physician-hospital organization, or other entity;

(ix) Academic appointment;

(x) Authority to prescribe controlled substances (drug enforcement agency or other authority);

(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the practitioner deems appropriate;

(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the practitioner deems appropriate;

(e) A waiver by the practitioner of any confidentiality provisions concerning the information required to be provided to ambulatory surgical facilities pursuant to this subsection; and

(f) A verification by the practitioner that the information provided by the practitioner is accurate and complete.

(2) Prior to granting privileges or association to any practitioner or hiring a practitioner, an ambulatory surgical facility approved under this chapter shall request from any hospital or ambulatory surgical facility with or at which the practitioner had or has privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the preceding five years, the following information concerning the practitioner:

(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;

(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state by a licensing or disciplinary board; and

(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals or ambulatory surgical facilities pursuant to RCW 18.130.070.

(3) The Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medical board, or dental quality assurance commission, as appropriate, shall be advised within thirty days of the name of any practitioner denied staff privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) A hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility that receives a request for information from another hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall provide such information concerning the physician in question to the extent such information is known to the hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility receiving such a request, including the reasons for suspension, termination, or curtailment of employment or privileges at the hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or facility. A hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, other facility, or other person providing such information in good faith is not liable in any civil action for the release of such information.

(5) Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any, and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by rule of the department to be made regarding the care and treatment received.

(6) Ambulatory surgical facilities shall be granted access to information held by the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medical board pertinent to decisions of the ambulatory surgical facility regarding credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.

(7) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 19. RCW 74.09.290 and 2018 c 201 s 7015 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary or director shall have the authority to:

(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical and other services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law, except that the Washington ((state)) medical ((quality assurance)) commission shall generally serve in an advisory capacity to the secretary or director in the conduct of audits or investigations of physicians. Any overpayment discovered as a result of an audit of a provider under this authority shall be offset by any underpayments discovered in that same audit sample. In order to determine the provider's actual, usual, customary, or prevailing charges, the secretary or director may examine such random representative records as necessary to show accounts billed and accounts received except that in the conduct of such examinations, patient names, other than public assistance applicants or recipients, shall not be noted, copied, or otherwise made available to the department or authority. In order to verify costs incurred by the department or authority for treatment of public assistance applicants or recipients, the secretary or director may examine patient records or portions thereof in connection with services to such applicants or recipients rendered by a health care provider, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 5.60.060, 18.53.200, 18.83.110, or any other statute which may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential: PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall be removed from the premises of the health care provider, and that the disclosure of any records or information by the department or the authority is prohibited and shall be punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, unless such disclosure is directly connected to the official purpose for which the records or information were obtained: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the disclosure of patient information as required under this section shall not subject any physician or other health services provider to any liability for breach of any confidential relationship between the provider and the patient, but no evidence resulting from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding against the patient unless a waiver of the applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the secretary or director shall destroy all copies of patient medical records in their possession upon completion of the audit, investigation or proceedings;

(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law;

(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider of services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law; and

(4) Adopt, promulgate, amend, and repeal administrative rules, in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the policies and purposes of this section and RCW 74.09.200 through 74.09.280.

Sec. 20. RCW 74.42.230 and 2016 c 148 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The resident's attending or staff physician or authorized practitioner approved by the attending physician shall order all medications for the resident. The order may be oral or written and shall continue in effect until discontinued by a physician or other authorized prescriber, unless the order is specifically limited by time. An "authorized practitioner," as used in this section, is a registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the committee of osteopathic examiners, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical ((quality assurance)) commission, or a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW when authorized by the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(2) An oral order shall be given only to a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician. The oral order shall be recorded and physically or electronically signed immediately by the person receiving the order. The attending physician shall sign the record of the oral order in a manner consistent with good medical practice.

(3) A licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician receiving and recording an oral order may, if so authorized by the physician or authorized practitioner, communicate that order to a pharmacy on behalf of the physician or authorized practitioner. The order may be communicated verbally by telephone, by facsimile manually signed by the person receiving the order pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or by electronic transmission pursuant to RCW 69.41.055. The communication of a resident's order to a pharmacy by a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician acting at the prescriber's direction has the same force and effect as if communicated directly by the delegating physician or authorized practitioner. Nothing in this provision limits the authority of a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or physician to delegate to an authorized agent, including but not limited to delegation of operation of a facsimile machine by credentialed facility staff, to the extent consistent with his or her professional license.

--- END ---