BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.29.056 and 2013 c 87 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to RCW 18.29.230 and (e) of this subsection, dental hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years' practical clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the preceding five years may be employed, retained, or contracted by health care facilities and senior centers to perform authorized dental hygiene operations and services without dental supervision.

(b) Subject to RCW 18.29.230 and (e) of this subsection, dental hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years' practical clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the preceding five years may perform authorized dental hygiene operations and services without dental supervision under a lease agreement with a health care facility or senior center.

(c) Dental hygienists performing operations and services under (a) or (b) of this subsection are limited to removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, application of topical preventive or prophylactic agents, application of topical anesthetic agents, polishing and smoothing restorations, and performance of root planing and soft-tissue curettage, but shall not perform injections of anesthetic agents, administration of nitrous oxide, or diagnosis for dental treatment.

(d) The performance of dental hygiene operations and services in health care facilities shall be limited to patients, students, and residents of the facilities.

(e) A dental hygienist employed, retained, or contracted to perform services under this section or otherwise performing services under a lease agreement under this section in a senior center must, before providing services:

(i) Enter into a written practice arrangement plan, approved by the department, with a dentist licensed in this state, under which the dentist will provide off-site supervision of the dental services provided. This agreement does not create an obligation for the dentist to accept referrals of patients receiving services under the program; and

(ii) ((Collect data on the patients treated by dental hygienists under the program, including age, treatments rendered, insurance coverage, if any, and patient referral to dentists. This data must be submitted to the department of health at the end of each annual quarter, during the period of time between October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2013; and

)) Obtain information from the patient's primary health care provider about any health conditions of the patient that would be relevant to the provision of preventive dental care. The information may be obtained by the dental hygienist's direct contact with the provider or through a written document from the provider that the patient presents to the dental hygienist.

(f) For dental planning and dental treatment, dental hygienists shall refer patients to licensed dentists.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Health care facilities" are limited to hospitals; nursing homes; home health agencies; group homes serving the elderly, individuals with disabilities, and juveniles; state-operated institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections; and federal, state, and local public health facilities, state or federally funded community and migrant health centers, and tribal clinics.

(b) "Senior center" means a multipurpose community facility operated and maintained by a nonprofit organization or local government for the organization and provision of a combination of some of the following: Health, social, nutritional, educational services, and recreational activities for persons sixty years of age or older.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.29.110 and 1991 c 3 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a dental hygiene examining committee consisting of ((three))four practicing dental hygienists and one public member appointed by the secretary, to be known as the Washington dental hygiene examining committee. Each dental hygiene member shall be licensed and have been actively practicing dental hygiene for a period of not less than five years immediately before appointment and shall not be connected with any dental hygiene school. The public member shall not be connected with any dental hygiene program or engaged in any practice or business related to dental hygiene. Members of the committee shall be appointed by the secretary to prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure. Members shall be appointed to serve for terms of three years from October 1 of the year in which they are appointed. Terms of the members shall be staggered. Each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Any member of the committee may be removed by the secretary for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, after being given a written statement of the charges against him or her and sufficient opportunity to be heard thereon. Members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.29.190 and 2015 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall issue an initial limited license without the examination required by this chapter to any applicant who, as determined by the secretary:

(a) Holds a valid license in another state or Canadian province that allows a substantively equivalent scope of practice in subsection (3)(a) through (j) of this section;

(b) Is currently engaged in active practice in another state or Canadian province. For the purposes of this section, "active practice" means five hundred sixty hours of practice in the preceding twenty-four months;

(c) Files with the secretary documentation certifying that the applicant:

(i) Has graduated from an accredited dental hygiene school approved by the secretary;

(ii) Has successfully completed the dental hygiene national board examination; and

(iii) Is licensed to practice in another state or Canadian province;

(d) Provides information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(e) Demonstrates to the secretary a knowledge of Washington state law pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene, including the administration of legend drugs;

(f) Pays any required fees; and

(g) Meets requirements for AIDS education.

(2) The term of the initial limited license issued under this section is eighteen months and it is renewable upon:

(a) Demonstration of successful passage of a substantively equivalent dental hygiene patient evaluation/prophylaxis examination;

(b) Demonstration of successful passage of a substantively equivalent local anesthesia examination; ((and))

(c) Demonstration of didactic and clinical competency in the administration of nitrous oxide analgesia; and

(d) Demonstration of successful passage of an educational program on the administration of local anesthesia and nitrous oxide analgesia.

(3) A person practicing with an initial limited license granted under this section has the authority to perform hygiene procedures that are limited to:

(a) Oral inspection and measuring of periodontal pockets;

(b) Patient education in oral hygiene;

(c) Taking intra-oral and extra-oral radiographs;

(d) Applying topical preventive or prophylactic agents;

(e) Polishing and smoothing restorations;

(f) Oral prophylaxis and removal of deposits and stains from the surface of the teeth;

(g) Recording health histories;

(h) Taking and recording blood pressure and vital signs;

(i) Performing subgingival and supragingival scaling; and

(j) Performing root planing.

(4)(a) A person practicing with an initial limited license granted under this section may not perform the following dental hygiene procedures unless authorized in (b) or (c) of this subsection:

(i) Give injections of local anesthetic;

(ii) Place restorations into the cavity prepared by a licensed dentist and afterwards carve, contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration;

(iii) Soft tissue curettage; or

(iv) Administer nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.

(b) A person licensed in another state or Canadian province who can demonstrate substantively equivalent licensing standards in the administration of local anesthetic may receive a temporary endorsement to administer local anesthesia. For purposes of the renewed limited license, this endorsement demonstrates the successful passage of the local anesthesia examination.

(c) A person licensed in another state or Canadian province who can demonstrate substantively equivalent licensing standards in restorative procedures may receive a temporary endorsement for restorative procedures.

(d) A person licensed in another state or Canadian province who can demonstrate substantively equivalent licensing standards in administering nitrous oxide analgesia may receive a temporary endorsement to administer nitrous oxide analgesia.

(5)(a) A person practicing with a renewed limited license granted under this section may:

(i) Perform hygiene procedures as provided under subsection (3) of this section;

(ii) Give injections of local anesthetic;

(iii) Perform soft tissue curettage; and

(iv) Administer nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.

(b) A person practicing with a renewed limited license granted under this section may not place restorations into the cavity prepared by a licensed dentist and afterwards carve, contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.29.220 and 2009 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, a dental hygienist licensed in this state may assess for and apply sealants and apply fluoride ((varnishes)), and may remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of teeth in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools:

(1) Without attending the department's school sealant endorsement program if the dental hygienist was licensed as of April 19, 2001; or

(2) If the dental hygienist is school sealant endorsed under RCW 43.70.650.

((A hygienist providing services under this section must collect data on patients treated, including age, treatment rendered, methods of reimbursement for treatment, evidence of coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, and patient referrals to dentists. This data must be submitted to the department of health at the end of each annual quarter, during the period of time between October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2013.))

--- END ---