BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the employment security department.

(2) "Grant" means the opportunities for employment in hospitality grant established in section 2 of this act.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(4) "Targeted population" means persons who are:

(a) Experiencing homelessness;

(b) Reentering the workforce after an extended absence;

(c) A veteran;

(d) A spouse of a veteran; or

(e) Seeking a job in hospitality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The opportunities for employment in hospitality grant is established. The purpose of the grant is to increase the number of people from the targeted population employed in the hospitality industry.

(2) The entity or person awarded the grant must:

(a) Coordinate with the secretary to connect participants with wraparound services available through the department of social and health services for which the entity or person is eligible;

(b) Host a minimum of four hiring events: At least three in western Washington; and at least one in eastern Washington;

(c) Offer the targeted population postemployment services and training;

(d) Create an annual report, jointly with the employment security department and the department of social and health services, that includes data showing the number of individuals from the targeted population served and the number of individuals from the targeted population who are successfully employed in the hospitality industry, and submit it to the relevant committees of the legislature; and

(e) Participate in other activities deemed by the commissioner to support the purpose of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The commissioner shall:

(a) Develop and write the grant;

(b) Publicly solicit applicants for the grant;

(c) Award the grant; and

(d) Perform any audits necessary to ensure grant funds are used solely to support the objectives of the grant.

(2) The secretary shall coordinate with grant recipients to help refer individuals from the targeted population to wraparound services for which they are eligible.

(3) A portion of the grant shall be used to cover the costs incurred by the commissioner and secretary under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2019, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

--- END ---