BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that to close the gender gap in computer science fields, it is important that computer science student participation rates are incorporated into the existing reporting infrastructure at the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The legislature finds that it is critical to track the gender and demographic composition of computer science course takers as well as the specific courses that they are taking. Grade level, socioeconomic, and distinctive factors should be included to establish a clear baseline of current student participation and identify areas for student participation improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning June 30, 2020, and by each June 30th thereafter, each school district shall submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall post conspicuously on its web site, a report for the preceding academic year that must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The total number of computer science courses offered in each school and whether these courses are advanced placement classes;

(2) The number and percentage of students who enrolled in a computer science program, disaggregated by:

(a) Gender;

(b) Race and ethnicity;

(c) Special education status;

(d) English language learner status;

(e) Eligibility for the free and reduced-price lunch program; and

(f) Grade level; and

(3) The number of computer science instructors at each school, disaggregated by:

(a) Certification, if applicable;

(b) Gender; and

(c) Highest academic degree.

--- END ---