BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70.493 and 2011 c 158 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After June 10, 2004, a county may designate a manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

(2) A county may not prohibit the entry or require the removal of a manufactured/mobile home, park model, or recreational vehicle authorized in a manufactured housing community under chapter 59.20 RCW on the basis of the community's status as a nonconforming use.

(3)(a) A county is authorized to allow for the development of mobile home park subdivisions or manufactured housing subdivisions as defined in RCW 59.20.030 for senior citizens that are located outside of urban areas.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "senior citizen" means a person age fifty-five or older.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Mobile home park subdivisions or manufactured housing subdivisions as defined in RCW 59.20.030 for senior citizens are authorized to be located outside of urban growth areas. Such subdivisions are necessary to provide affordable housing in rural areas. For purposes of this section, "senior citizen" means a person age fifty-five or older.

--- END ---