BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.56.110 and 2018 c 199 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:

(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest at the rate specified in the contracts: PROVIDED, That said interest rate is set forth in the judgment.

(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative procedure act shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent.

(3)(a) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of a "public agency" as defined in RCW 42.30.020 shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the equivalent coupon issue yield, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, of the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.

(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, judgments founded on the tortious conduct of individuals or other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative capacities, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the prime rate, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system on the first business day of the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.

(4) Except as provided under subsection (1) of this section, judgments for unpaid private student loan debt, as defined in RCW 6.01.060, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the prime rate, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system on the first business day of the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry.

(5) Except as provided under subsection (1) of this section, judgments for unpaid consumer debt, as defined in RCW 6.01.060, shall bear interest from the date of entry at a rate of nine percent.

(6) Except as provided under subsections (1)((, (2), (3), and (4)))through (5) of this section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry thereof. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered. The method for determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection is also the method for determining the "rate applicable to civil judgments" for purposes of RCW 10.82.090.

Sec. 2. RCW 6.01.060 and 2018 c 199 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certified mail" includes, for mailings to a foreign country, any form of mail that requires or permits a return receipt.

(2) "Consumer debt" means any obligation or alleged obligation of a consumer to pay money arising out of a transaction in which the money, property, insurance, or services which are the subject of the transaction are primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(3) "Private student loan" means any loan not guaranteed by the federal or state government that is used solely for personal use to finance postsecondary education and costs of attendance at an educational institution. A private student loan includes a loan made solely to refinance a private student loan. A private student loan does not include an extension of credit made under an open-end consumer credit plan, a reverse mortgage transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.

Sec. 3. RCW 6.15.010 and 2018 c 199 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 6.15.050, the following personal property is exempt from execution, attachment, and garnishment:

(a) All wearing apparel of every individual and family, but not to exceed three thousand five hundred dollars in value in furs, jewelry, and personal ornaments for any individual.

(b) All private libraries including electronic media, which includes audiovisual, entertainment, or reference media in digital or analogue format, of every individual, but not to exceed three thousand five hundred dollars in value, and all family pictures and keepsakes.

(c) A cell phone, personal computer, and printer.

(d) To each individual or, as to community property of spouses maintaining a single household as against a creditor of the community, to the community:

(i) The individual's or community's household goods, appliances, furniture, and home and yard equipment, not to exceed six thousand five hundred dollars in value for the individual or thirteen thousand dollars for the community, no single item to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars, said amount to include provisions and fuel for the comfortable maintenance of the individual or community;

(ii) Other personal property, except personal earnings as provided under RCW 6.15.050(1), not to exceed three thousand dollars in value, of which not more than one thousand five hundred dollars in value may consist of cash, and of which not more than:

(A) For all debts except private student loan debt and consumer debt, five hundred dollars in value may consist of bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities. The maximum exemption under this subsection (1)(d)(ii)(A) may not exceed five hundred dollars, regardless of the number of existing separate bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities.

(B) For all private student loan debt, two thousand five hundred dollars in value may consist of bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities. The maximum exemption under this subsection (1)(d)(ii)(B) may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars, regardless of the number of existing separate bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities.

(C) For all consumer debt, two thousand dollars in value may consist of bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities. The maximum exemption under this subsection (1)(d)(ii)(C) may not exceed two thousand dollars, regardless of the number of existing separate bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities;

(iii) For an individual, a motor vehicle used for personal transportation, not to exceed three thousand two hundred fifty dollars or for a community two motor vehicles used for personal transportation, not to exceed six thousand five hundred dollars in aggregate value;

(iv) Any past due, current, or future child support paid or owed to the debtor, which can be traced;

(v) All professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or a dependent of the debtor; and

(vi) To any individual, the right to or proceeds of a payment not to exceed twenty thousand dollars on account of personal bodily injury, not including pain and suffering or compensation for actual pecuniary loss, of the debtor or an individual of whom the debtor is a dependent; or the right to or proceeds of a payment in compensation of loss of future earnings of the debtor or an individual of whom the debtor is or was a dependent, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor. The exemption under this subsection (1)(d)(vi) does not apply to the right of the state of Washington, or any agent or assignee of the state, as a lienholder or subrogee under RCW 43.20B.060.

(e) To each qualified individual, one of the following exemptions:

(i) To a farmer, farm trucks, farm stock, farm tools, farm equipment, supplies and seed, not to exceed ten thousand dollars in value;

(ii) To a physician, surgeon, attorney, member of the clergy, or other professional person, the individual's library, office furniture, office equipment and supplies, not to exceed ten thousand dollars in value;

(iii) To any other individual, the tools and instruments and materials used to carry on his or her trade for the support of himself or herself or family, not to exceed ten thousand dollars in value.

(f) Tuition units, under chapter 28B.95 RCW, purchased more than two years prior to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment, and contributions to any other qualified tuition program under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 529 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and to a Coverdell education savings account, also known as an education individual retirement account, under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 530 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, contributed more than two years prior to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment.

(2) For purposes of this section, "value" means the reasonable market value of the debtor's interest in an article or item at the time it is selected for exemption, exclusive of all liens and encumbrances thereon.

Sec. 4. RCW 6.27.100 and 2018 c 199 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A writ issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be substantially in the form provided in RCW 6.27.105. All other writs of garnishment shall be substantially in the following form, but:

(a) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support";

(b) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for private student loan debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt"; ((and))

(c) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for consumer debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt"; and

(d) If the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

"IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .,

Plaintiff,

No. . . . .

vs.

. . . .,

WRIT OF

Defendant,

GARNISHMENT

. . . .,

Garnishee

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO: . . . .

Garnishee

AND TO: . . . .

Defendant

The above-named plaintiff has applied for a writ of garnishment against you, claiming that the above-named defendant is indebted to plaintiff and that the amount to be held to satisfy that indebtedness is $ . . . . . ., consisting of:

Balance on Judgment or Amount of Claim

$ . . . .

Interest under Judgment from . . . . to . . . .

$ . . . .

Per Day Rate of Estimated Interest

$ . . . . per day

Taxable Costs and Attorneys' Fees

$ . . . .

Estimated Garnishment Costs:

Filing and Ex Parte Fees

$ . . . .

Service and Affidavit Fees

$ . . . .

Postage and Costs of Certified Mail

$ . . . .

Answer Fee or Fees

$ . . . .

Garnishment Attorney Fee

$ . . . .

Other

$ . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court, by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment, delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.

YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses listed at the bottom of this writ.

If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.

JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

[Seal]

. . . .

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff (or Plaintiff, if no attorney)

Clerk of the Court

. . . .

. . . .

Address

By

. . . .

. . . .

Name of Defendant

Address"

. . . .

Address of Defendant

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . .day of . . . . . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address of the Clerk of the Court"

. . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . .

Address of Defendant

Sec. 5. RCW 6.27.105 and 2018 c 199 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A writ that is issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be substantially in the following form, but:

(a) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support";

(b) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for private student loan debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt"; ((and))

(c) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for consumer debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt"; and

(d) If the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

"IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .,

Plaintiff,

No. . . . .

vs.

. . . .,

WRIT OF

Defendant

GARNISHMENT FOR

CONTINUING LIEN ON

. . . .,

EARNINGS

Garnishee

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO:. . . .

Garnishee

AND TO:. . . .

Defendant

The above-named plaintiff has applied for a writ of garnishment against you, claiming that the above-named defendant is indebted to plaintiff and that the amount to be held to satisfy that indebtedness is $ . . . . . ., consisting of:

Balance on Judgment or Amount of Claim

$ . . . .

Interest under Judgment from . . . . to . . . .

$ . . . .

Per Day Rate of Estimated Interest

$ . . . . per day

Taxable Costs and Attorneys' Fees

$ . . . .

Estimated Garnishment Costs:

Filing and Ex Parte Fees

$ . . . .

Service and Affidavit Fees

$ . . . .

Postage and Costs of Certified Mail

$ . . . .

Answer Fee or Fees

$ . . . .

Garnishment Attorney Fee

$ . . . .

Other

$ . . . .

THIS IS A WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN. THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD the nonexempt portion of the defendant's earnings due at the time of service of this writ and shall also hold the defendant's nonexempt earnings that accrue through the last payroll period ending on or before SIXTY days after the date of service of this writ. HOWEVER, IF THE GARNISHEE IS PRESENTLY HOLDING THE NONEXEMPT PORTION OF THE DEFENDANT'S EARNINGS UNDER A PREVIOUSLY SERVED WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN, THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD UNDER THIS WRIT only the defendant's nonexempt earnings that accrue from the date the previously served writ or writs terminate and through the last payroll period ending on or before sixty days after the date of termination of the previous writ or writs. IN EITHER CASE, THE GARNISHEE SHALL STOP WITHHOLDING WHEN THE SUM WITHHELD EQUALS THE AMOUNT STATED IN THIS WRIT OF GARNISHMENT.

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court, by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment, delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.

YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses listed at the bottom of this writ.

If, at the time this writ was served, you owed the defendant any earnings (that is, wages, salary, commission, bonus, tips, or other compensation for personal services or any periodic payments pursuant to a nongovernmental pension or retirement program), the defendant is entitled to receive amounts that are exempt from garnishment under federal and state law. You must pay the exempt amounts to the defendant on the day you would customarily pay the compensation or other periodic payment. As more fully explained in the answer, the basic exempt amount is the greater of seventy-five percent of disposable earnings or a minimum amount determined by reference to the employee's pay period, to be calculated as provided in the answer. However, if this writ carries a statement in the heading of ((either:)) "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support," the basic exempt amount is fifty percent of disposable earnings; ((or))and if this writ carries a statement in the heading of "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt," the basic exempt amount is the greater of eighty-five percent of disposable earnings or fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable; and if this writ carries a statement in the heading of "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt," the basic exempt amount is the greater of eighty percent of disposable earnings or thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage.

YOU MAY DEDUCT A PROCESSING FEE FROM THE REMAINDER OF THE EMPLOYEE'S EARNINGS AFTER WITHHOLDING UNDER THIS WRIT. THE PROCESSING FEE MAY NOT EXCEED TWENTY DOLLARS FOR THE FIRST ANSWER AND TEN DOLLARS AT THE TIME YOU SUBMIT THE SECOND ANSWER.

If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.

JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

[Seal]

. . . .

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff (or Plaintiff, if no attorney)

Clerk of the Court

. . . .

. . . .

Address

By

. . . .

. . . .

Name of Defendant

Address"

. . . .

Address of Defendant

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . .day of . . . . . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address of the Clerk of the Court"

. . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . .

Address of Defendant

Sec. 6. RCW 6.27.140 and 2018 c 199 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The notice required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font:

NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT

AND OF YOUR RIGHTS

A Writ of Garnishment issued in a Washington court has been or will be served on the garnishee named in the attached copy of the writ. After receipt of the writ, the garnishee is required to withhold payment of any money that was due to you and to withhold any other property of yours that the garnishee held or controlled. This notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING EXEMPTION RIGHTS:

WAGES. If the garnishee is your employer who owes wages or other personal earnings to you, your employer is required to pay amounts to you that are exempt under state and federal laws, as explained in the writ of garnishment. You should receive a copy of your employer's answer, which will show how the exempt amount was calculated. If the garnishment is for child support, the exempt amount paid to you will be a percent of your disposable earnings, which is fifty percent of that part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld. If the garnishment is for private student loan debt, the exempt amount paid to you will be the greater of the following: A percent of your disposable earnings, which is eighty-five percent of the part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld, or fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable. If the garnishment is for consumer debt, the exempt amount paid to you will be the greater of the following: A percent of your disposable earnings, which is eighty percent of the part of your earnings remaining after your employer deducts those amounts which are required by law to be withheld, or thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage.

BANK ACCOUNTS. If the garnishee is a bank or other institution with which you have an account in which you have deposited benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, veterans' benefits, unemployment compensation, or any federally qualified pension, such as a state or federal pension, individual retirement account (IRA), or 401K plan, you may claim the account as fully exempt if you have deposited only such benefit funds in the account. It may be partially exempt even though you have deposited money from other sources in the same account. An exemption is also available under RCW 26.16.200, providing that funds in a community bank account that can be identified as the earnings of a stepparent are exempt from a garnishment on the child support obligation of the parent.

OTHER EXEMPTIONS. If the garnishee holds other property of yours, some or all of it may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010, a Washington statute that exempts certain property of your choice (including up to $2,500.00 in a bank account if you owe on private student loan debts; up to $2,000.00 in a bank account if you owe on consumer debts; or up to $500.00 in a bank account for all other debts) and certain other property such as household furnishings, tools of trade, and a motor vehicle (all limited by differing dollar values).

HOW TO CLAIM EXEMPTIONS. Fill out the enclosed claim form and mail or deliver it as described in instructions on the claim form. If the plaintiff does not object to your claim, the funds or other property that you have claimed as exempt must be released not later than 10 days after the plaintiff receives your claim form. If the plaintiff objects, the law requires a hearing not later than 14 days after the plaintiff receives your claim form, and notice of the objection and hearing date will be mailed to you at the address that you put on the claim form.

THE LAW ALSO PROVIDES OTHER EXEMPTION RIGHTS. IF NECESSARY, AN ATTORNEY CAN ASSIST YOU TO ASSERT THESE AND OTHER RIGHTS, BUT YOU MUST ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID LOSS OF RIGHTS BY DELAY.

(2)(a) If the writ is to garnish funds or property held by a financial institution, the claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font:

[Caption to be filled in by judgment creditor

or plaintiff before mailing.]

Name of Court

. . . .

No . . . . . .

Plaintiff,

vs.

. . . .

EXEMPTION CLAIM

Defendant,

Garnishee Defendant

INSTRUCTIONS:

1.

Read this whole form after reading the enclosed notice. Then put an X in the box or boxes that describe your exemption claim or claims and write in the necessary information on the blank lines. If additional space is needed, use the bottom of the last page or attach another sheet.

2.

Make two copies of the completed form. Deliver the original form by first-class mail or in person to the clerk of the court, whose address is shown at the bottom of the writ of garnishment. Deliver one of the copies by first-class mail or in person to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney, whose name and address are shown at the bottom of the writ. Keep the other copy. YOU SHOULD DO THIS AS QUICKLY AS POSSIBLE, BUT NO LATER THAN 28 DAYS (4 WEEKS) AFTER THE DATE ON THE WRIT.

I/We claim the following money or property as exempt:

IF BANK ACCOUNT IS GARNISHED:

[ ] The account contains payments from:

[ ]

Temporary assistance for needy families, SSI, or other public assistance. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Social Security. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Veterans' Benefits. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Federally qualified pension, such as a state or federal pension, individual retirement account (IRA), or 401K plan. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Unemployment Compensation. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Child support. I receive $ . . . . . monthly.

[ ]

Other. Explain . . . .

[ ]

$2,500 exemption for private student loan debts.

[ ]

$2,000 exemption for consumer debts.

[ ]

$500 exemption for all other debts.

IF EXEMPTION IN BANK ACCOUNT IS CLAIMED, ANSWER ONE OR BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING:

[ ]

No money other than from above payments are in the account.

[ ]

Moneys in addition to the above payments have been deposited in the account. Explain . . . .

. . . .

. . . .

OTHER PROPERTY:

[ ]

Describe property . . . .

. . . .

(If you claim other personal property as exempt, you must attach a list of all other personal property that you own.)

. . . .

. . . .

Print: Your name

If married or in a state registered domestic partnership,

name of husband/wife/state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

Your signature

Signature of husband,

wife, or state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address

(if different from yours)

. . . .

. . . .

Telephone number

Telephone number

(if different from yours)

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

(b) If the writ is directed to an employer to garnish earnings, the claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form, subject to (c) of this subsection, printed or typed in no smaller than size twelve point font type:

[Caption to be filled in by judgment creditor

or plaintiff before mailing.]

. . . .

Name of Court

. . . .

No . . . . . .

Plaintiff,

vs.

. . . .

EXEMPTION CLAIM

Defendant,

. . . .

Garnishee Defendant

INSTRUCTIONS:

1.

Read this whole form after reading the enclosed notice. Then put an X in the box or boxes that describe your exemption claim or claims and write in the necessary information on the blank lines. If additional space is needed, use the bottom of the last page or attach another sheet.

2.

Make two copies of the completed form. Deliver the original form by first-class mail or in person to the clerk of the court, whose address is shown at the bottom of the writ of garnishment. Deliver one of the copies by first-class mail or in person to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney, whose name and address are shown at the bottom of the writ. Keep the other copy. YOU SHOULD DO THIS AS QUICKLY AS POSSIBLE, BUT NO LATER THAN 28 DAYS (4 WEEKS) AFTER THE DATE ON THE WRIT.

I/We claim the following money or property as exempt:

IF PENSION OR RETIREMENT BENEFITS ARE GARNISHED:

[ ]

Name and address of employer who is paying the

benefits:. . . .

. . . .

IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR CHILD SUPPORT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.

IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR PRIVATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.

IF EARNINGS ARE GARNISHED FOR CONSUMER DEBT:

[ ]

I claim maximum exemption.

. . . .

. . . .

Print: Your name

If married or in a state registered domestic partnership,

name of husband/wife/state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

Your signature

Signature of husband,

wife, or state registered domestic partner

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address

(if different from yours)

. . . .

. . . .

Telephone number

Telephone number

(if different from yours)

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

(c) If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of child support, the exemption language pertaining to child support may be omitted.

(d) If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of private student loan debt, the exemption language pertaining to private student loan debt may be omitted.

(e) If the writ under (b) of this subsection is not a writ for the collection of consumer debt, the exemption language pertaining to consumer debt may be omitted.

Sec. 7. RCW 6.27.150 and 2018 c 199 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the garnishee is an employer owing the defendant earnings, then for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greatest of the following:

(a) Thirty-five times the federal minimum hourly wage in effect at the time the earnings are payable; or

(b) Seventy-five percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(2) In the case of a garnishment based on a judgment or other order for child support or court order for spousal maintenance, other than a mandatory wage assignment order pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, or a mandatory assignment of retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, the exemption shall be fifty percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(3) In the case of a garnishment based on a judgment or other order for the collection of private student loan debt, for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greater of the following:

(a) Fifty times the minimum hourly wage of the highest minimum wage law in the state at the time the earnings are payable; or

(b) Eighty-five percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(4) In the case of a garnishment based on a judgment or other order for the collection of consumer debt, for each week of such earnings, an amount shall be exempt from garnishment which is the greater of the following:

(a) Thirty-five times the state minimum hourly wage; or

(b) Eighty percent of the disposable earnings of the defendant.

(5) The exemptions stated in this section shall apply whether such earnings are paid, or are to be paid, weekly, monthly, or at other intervals, and whether earnings are due the defendant for one week, a portion thereof, or for a longer period.

(((5)))(6) Unless directed otherwise by the court, the garnishee shall determine and deduct exempt amounts under this section as directed in the writ of garnishment and answer, and shall pay these amounts to the defendant.

(((6)))(7) No money due or earned as earnings as defined in RCW 6.27.010 shall be exempt from garnishment under the provisions of RCW 6.15.010, as now or hereafter amended.

--- END ---