BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.40.015 and 2009 c 381 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth is established to provide statewide leadership for the coordination and delivery of educational services to children who are deaf or hard of hearing. The activities of the center shall be under the authority of the director and the board of trustees. The superintendent and board of trustees of the state school for the deaf ((as of July 26, 2009,)) shall be the director and board of trustees of the center.

(2) The center's primary functions are:

(a) Managing and directing the supervision of the state school for the deaf;

(b) Providing statewide leadership and support for the coordination of regionally delivered educational services in the full range of communication modalities, for children who are deaf or hard of hearing; and

(c) Collaborating with appropriate public and private partners for the training and professional development of educators serving children who are deaf or hard of hearing.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.40.019 and 2009 c 381 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor shall appoint a director for the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth. The director shall have a master's or higher degree from an accredited college or university in school administration or deaf education, five or more years of experience teaching or providing habilitative services to deaf or hard of hearing students, and three or more years administrative or supervisory experience in programs for deaf or hard of hearing students.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.40.0191 and 2009 c 381 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth:

(1) Shall be responsible for the supervision and management of the center, including the state school for the deaf, and the property of various kinds. The director may designate an individual to oversee the day-to-day operation and supervision of students at the school;

(2) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers, and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other provisions of law;

(3) Shall provide technical assistance and support as appropriate to local and regional efforts to build critical mass and communication-rich networking opportunities for children who are deaf or hard of hearing and their families;

(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational training, with the assistance of the faculty and the approval of the board of trustees;

(5) Shall, as approved by the board of trustees, control and authorize the use of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, applied research and training for the instruction of students who are deaf or hard of hearing, outreach and support to families of children who are deaf or hard of hearing, or other purposes consistent with the purposes of the center;

(6) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the center;

(7) Shall prepare, submit to the board of trustees for approval, and administer the budget consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW generally, as applicable;

(8) Shall provide technical assistance and support to educational service districts for the regional delivery of a full range of educational services to students who are deaf or hard of hearing, including but not limited to services relying on American Sign Language, auditory oral education, total communication, and signed exact English;

(9) As requested by educational service districts, shall recruit, employ, and deploy itinerant teachers to provide in-district services to children who are deaf or hard of hearing;

(10) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification, for the teachers at the school and employees of the center;

(11) May establish, with the approval of the board of trustees, new facilities as needs demand;

(12) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees and as deemed necessary for the governance, management, and operation of the center;

(13) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees, for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, and maintained by the center;

(14) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts as the director deems essential to the purpose of the center;

(15) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions will aid in carrying out the programs of the center; sell, lease, or exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof;

(16) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees, providing for the transferability of employees between the center and the school for the blind consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect; and

(17) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees, and perform all other acts not forbidden by law as the director deems necessary or appropriate to the administration of the center.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.40.024 and 2009 c 381 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and 72.40.0191, the superintendent of the school for the blind and the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, shall:

(1) Monitor the location and educational placement of each student reported to the superintendent and the director, or the director's designee, by the educational service district superintendents;

(2) Provide information about educational programs, instructional techniques, materials, equipment, and resources available to students with visual or auditory impairments to the parent or guardian, educational service district superintendent, and the superintendent of the school district where the student resides; and

(3) Serve as a consultant to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, provide instructional leadership, and assist school districts in improving their instructional programs for students with visual or hearing impairments.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.40.028 and 2018 c 266 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

All teachers employed by the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the state school for the blind shall meet all certification requirements and the programs shall meet all accreditation requirements and conform to the standards defined by law or by rule of the Washington professional educator standards board or the office of the state superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent and the director, by rule, may adopt additional educational standards for their respective facilities. Salaries of all certificated employees shall be based on the statewide average salary set forth in RCW 28A.150.410, adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the program or facility is located. The superintendent and the director may provide for provisional certification for teachers in their respective facilities including certification for emergency, temporary, substitute, or provisional duty.

Sec. 6. RCW 72.40.070 and 2009 c 381 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of each educational service district to make a full and specific report of visually impaired or deaf or hard of hearing youth to the superintendent of the school for the blind or the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, as the case may be and the superintendent of public instruction, annually. The superintendent of public instruction shall report about the deaf or hard of hearing or visually impaired youth to the school for the blind and the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, as the case may be, annually.

Sec. 7. RCW 72.40.120 and 2009 c 381 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any appropriation for the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth or the school for the blind shall be made directly to the center or the school for the blind.

Sec. 8. RCW 72.40.200 and 2009 c 381 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the state school for the blind shall promote the personal safety of students and protect the children who attend from child abuse and neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020.

Sec. 9. RCW 72.40.210 and 2009 c 381 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the superintendent of the state school for the blind or their designees shall immediately report to the persons indicated the following events:

(1) To the child's parent, custodian, or guardian:

(a) The death of the child;

(b) Hospitalization of a child in attendance or residence at the facility;

(c) Allegations of child abuse or neglect in which the parent's child in attendance or residence at the facility is the alleged victim;

(d) Allegations of physical or sexual abuse in which the parent's child in attendance or residence at the facility is the alleged perpetrator;

(e) Life-threatening illness;

(f) The attendance at the facility of any child who is a registered sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 as permitted by RCW 4.24.550.

(2) Notification to the parent shall be made by the means most likely to be received by the parent. If initial notification is made by telephone, such notification shall be followed by notification in writing within forty-eight hours after the initial verbal contact is made.

Sec. 10. RCW 72.40.220 and 2009 c 381 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, and the superintendent of the state school for the blind shall maintain in writing and implement behavior management policies and procedures that accomplish the following:

(a) Support the child's appropriate social behavior, self-control, and the rights of others;

(b) Foster dignity and self-respect for the child;

(c) Reflect the ages and developmental levels of children in care.

(2) The state school for the deaf and the state school for the blind shall use proactive, positive behavior support techniques to manage potential child behavior problems. These techniques shall include but not be limited to:

(a) Organization of the physical environment and staffing patterns to reduce factors leading to behavior incidents;

(b) Intervention before behavior becomes disruptive, in the least invasive and least restrictive manner available;

(c) Emphasis on verbal de-escalation to calm the upset child;

(d) Redirection strategies to present the child with alternative resolution choices.

Sec. 11. RCW 72.40.250 and 2009 c 381 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and 72.40.024, the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, and the superintendent of the state school for the blind shall:

(1) Develop written procedures for the supervision of employees and volunteers who have the potential for contact with students. Such procedures shall be designed to prevent child abuse and neglect by providing for adequate supervision of such employees and volunteers, taking into consideration such factors as the student population served, architectural factors, and the size of the facility. Such procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Staffing patterns and the rationale for such;

(b) Responsibilities of supervisors;

(c) The method by which staff and volunteers are made aware of the identity of all supervisors, including designated on-site supervisors;

(d) Provision of written supervisory guidelines to employees and volunteers;

(e) Periodic supervisory conferences for employees and volunteers; and

(f) Written performance evaluations of staff to be conducted by supervisors in a manner consistent with applicable provisions of the civil service law.

(2) Develop written procedures for the protection of students when there is reason to believe an incident has occurred which would render a minor student an abused or neglected child within the meaning of RCW 26.44.020. Such procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Investigation. Immediately upon notification that a report of child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and health services or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the director, or the director's designee, shall:

(i) Preserve any potential evidence through such actions as securing the area where suspected abuse or neglect occurred;

(ii) Obtain proper and prompt medical evaluation and treatment, as needed, with documentation of any evidence of abuse or neglect; and

(iii) Provide necessary assistance to the department of social and health services and local law enforcement in their investigations;

(b) Safety. Upon notification that a report of suspected child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and health services or a law enforcement agency, the superintendent or the director or his or her designee, with consideration for causing as little disruption as possible to the daily routines of the students, shall evaluate the situation and immediately take appropriate action to assure the health and safety of the students involved in the report and of any other students similarly situated, and take such additional action as is necessary to prevent future acts of abuse or neglect. Such action may include:

(i) Consistent with federal and state law:

(A) Removing the alleged perpetrator from the school;

(B) Increasing the degree of supervision of the alleged perpetrator; and

(C) Initiating appropriate disciplinary action against the alleged perpetrator;

(ii) Provision of increased training and increased supervision to volunteers and staff pertinent to the prevention and remediation of abuse and neglect;

(iii) Temporary removal of the students from a program and reassignment of the students within the school, as an emergency measure, if it is determined that there is a risk to the health or safety of such students in remaining in that program. Whenever a student is removed, pursuant to this subsection (2)(b)(iii), from a special education program or service specified in his or her individualized education program, the action shall be reviewed in an individualized education program meeting; and

(iv) Provision of counseling to the students involved in the report or any other students, as appropriate;

(c) Corrective action plans. Upon receipt of the results of an investigation by the department of social and health services pursuant to a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, the superintendent or the director, or the director's designee, after consideration of any recommendations by the department of social and health services for preventive and remedial action, shall implement a written plan of action designed to assure the continued health and safety of students and to provide for the prevention of future acts of abuse or neglect.

Sec. 12. RCW 72.40.290 and 2012 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from contracts, grants, gifts, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property, or payments received from RCW 72.40.0191 (14) and (15) and 72.40.050 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for duties related to RCW 72.40.0191 (14) and (15) and 72.40.050. Only the director of the center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 13. RCW 26.44.210 and 2009 c 381 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must investigate referrals of alleged child abuse or neglect occurring at the state school for the deaf, including alleged incidents involving students abusing other students; determine whether there is a finding of abuse or neglect; and determine whether a referral to law enforcement is appropriate under this chapter.

(2) The department must send a copy of the investigation report, including the finding, regarding any incidents of alleged child abuse or neglect at the state school for the deaf to the ((center's)) director of the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee. The department may include recommendations to the director and the board of trustees or its successor board for increasing the safety of the school's students.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.155.160 and 2018 c 58 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of children, youth, and families, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the Washington state school for the blind, school districts, educational service districts, and all other state and local government educational agencies and the department of services for the blind, the department of social and health services, and all other state and local government agencies concerned with the care, education, or habilitation or rehabilitation of children with disabilities may enter into interagency cooperative agreements for the purpose of providing assistive technology devices and services to children with disabilities. Such arrangements may include but are not limited to interagency agreements for the acquisition, including joint funding, maintenance, loan, sale, lease, or transfer of assistive technology devices and for the provision of assistive technology services including but not limited to assistive technology assessments and training.

For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any service that directly assists a child with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device. Assistive technology service includes:

(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability, including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary environment;

(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;

(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying, retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;

(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;

(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability or if appropriate, the child's family; and

(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers, or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise substantially involved in the major life functions of children with disabilities.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.310.010 and 2009 c 381 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the intent and purpose of this chapter to establish educational service districts as regional agencies which are intended to:

(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local school districts;

(2) Assist the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education in the performance of their respective statutory or constitutional duties; and

(3) Provide services to school districts and to the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the school for the blind to assure equal educational opportunities.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.310.180 and 2009 c 381 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every educational service district board shall:

(1) Comply with rules ((or regulations)) of the state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) If the district board deems necessary, establish and operate for the schools within the boundaries of the educational service district a depository and distribution center for films, tapes, charts, maps, and other instructional material as recommended by the school district superintendents within the service area of the educational service district((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the district may also provide the services of the depository and distribution center to private schools within the district so long as such private schools pay such fees that reflect actual costs for services and the use of instructional materials as may be established by the educational service district board.

(3) Establish cooperative service programs for school districts within the educational service district and joint purchasing programs for schools within the educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.320.080(3)((: PROVIDED, That)). However, on matters relating to cooperative service programs the board and superintendent of the educational service district shall seek the prior advice of the superintendents of local school districts within the educational service district.

(4) Establish direct student service programs for school districts within the educational service district including pupil transportation. However, for the provision of state-funded pupil transportation for special education cooperatives programs for special education conducted under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, the educational service district, with the consent of the participating school districts, shall be entitled to receive directly state apportionment funds for that purpose: PROVIDED, That the board of directors and superintendent of a local school district request the educational service district to perform said service or services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors and superintendents agree to provide the requested services: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW are strictly adhered to: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors may contract with the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the school for the blind to provide transportation services or other services necessary for the regional delivery of educational services for children who are deaf or hearing impaired.

Sec. 17. RCW 28A.310.200 and 2009 c 381 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every educational service district board shall:

(1) Approve the budgets of the educational service district in accordance with the procedures provided for in this chapter;

(2) Meet regularly according to the schedule adopted at the organization meeting and in special session upon the call of the chair or a majority of the board;

(3) Approve the selection of educational service district personnel and clerical staff as provided in RCW 28A.310.230;

(4) Fix the amount of and approve the bonds for those educational service district employees designated by the board as being in need of bonding;

(5) Keep in the educational service district office a full and correct transcript of the boundaries of each school district within the educational service district;

(6) Acquire by borrowing funds or by purchase, lease, devise, bequest, and gift and otherwise contract for real and personal property necessary for the operation of the educational service district and to the execution of the duties of the board and superintendent thereof and sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of that property not necessary for district purposes. No real property shall be acquired or alienated without the prior approval of the superintendent of public instruction and the acquisition or alienation of all such property shall be subject to such provisions as the superintendent may establish. When borrowing funds for the purpose of acquiring property, the educational service district board shall pledge as collateral the property to be acquired. Borrowing shall be evidenced by a note or other instrument between the district and the lender;

(7) Under RCW 28A.310.010, upon the written request of the board of directors of a local school district or districts served by the educational service district, the educational service district board of directors may provide cooperative and informational services not in conflict with other law that provide for the development and implementation of programs, activities, services, or practices that support the education of preschool through twelfth grade students in the public schools or that support the effective, efficient, or safe management and operation of the school district or districts served by the educational service district;

(8) Adopt such bylaws and rules for its own operation as it deems necessary or appropriate; and

(9) Enter into contracts, including contracts with common and educational service districts and the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth and the school for the blind for the joint financing of cooperative service programs conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), and employ consultants and legal counsel relating to any of the duties, functions, and powers of the educational service districts.

Sec. 18. RCW 28A.335.205 and 2009 c 381 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state school for the blind, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, school districts, educational service districts, and all other state or local governmental agencies concerned with education may loan, lease, sell, or transfer assistive devices for the use and benefit of children with disabilities to children with disabilities or their parents or to any other public or private nonprofit agency providing services to or on behalf of individuals with disabilities including but not limited to any agency providing educational, health, or rehabilitation services. The notice requirement in RCW 28A.335.180 does not apply to the loan, lease, sale, or transfer of such assistive devices. The sale or transfer of such devices is authorized under this section regardless of whether or not the devices have been declared surplus. The sale or transfer shall be recorded in an agreement between the parties and based upon the item's depreciated value.

For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with disabilities.

For the purpose of implementing this section, each educational agency shall establish and maintain an inventory of assistive technology devices in its possession that exceed one hundred dollars and, for each such device, shall establish a value, which shall be adjusted annually to reflect depreciation.

This section shall not enhance or diminish the obligation of school districts to provide assistive technology to children with disabilities where needed to achieve a free and appropriate public education and equal opportunity in accessing academic and extracurricular activities.

Sec. 19. RCW 28A.400.300 and 2012 c 186 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by law, shall:

(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all certificated and classified employees;

(b) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of directors prescribe((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board of directors shall adopt written policies granting to such persons annual leave with compensation for illness, injury and emergencies as follows:

(i) For such persons under contract with the school district for a full year, at least ten days;

(ii) For such persons under contract with the school district as part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of days contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;

(iii) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;

(iv) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken shall be the same as the compensation such person would have received had such person not taken the leave provided in this proviso;

(v) Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from year to year up to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given contract, but not greater than one year. Such accumulated time may be taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave;

(vi) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under administrative practice of school districts prior to the effective date of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for illness or injury accumulated under this proviso;

(vii) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of forty-five days shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to retire, if such leave is taken it may not be compensated under the provisions of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;

(viii) Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to and from one district to another, the office of superintendent of public instruction, offices of educational service district superintendents and boards, the state school for the blind, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, institutions of higher education, and community and technical colleges, to and from such districts, schools, offices, institutions of higher education, and community and technical colleges;

(ix) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving said district may, under rules of the board, be granted to such person when the person returns to the employment of the district.

(2) When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school district within the state and commences employment with another school district within the state, the employee shall retain the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits that the employee had in his or her previous position((: PROVIDED, That)). However, classified employees who transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall not retain any seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school district and beginning employment with another. If the school district to which the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority, leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in that district who has similar occupational status and total years of service.

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, discharges of certificated and classified employees in school districts that are dissolved due to financial insolvency shall be conducted in accordance with RCW 28A.315.229.

Sec. 20. RCW 28A.400.303 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 1 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 220 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children or developmentally disabled persons shall require a record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity may provide a copy of the record report to the applicant at the applicant's request. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the district, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the record check.

(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for their employees and applicants for employment.

(3)(a) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, schools that are the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, and their contractors may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children under eighteen years of age or developmentally disabled persons, during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization under circumstances where access will or may involve the following:

(i) Groups of five or fewer children under twelve years of age;

(ii) Groups of three or fewer children between twelve and eighteen years of age; or

(iii) Developmentally disabled persons.

(b) For purposes of (a) of this subsection, "unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(i) Another employee or volunteer from the same school or organization; or

(ii) Any relative or guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled persons to which the prospective employee or volunteer has access during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization.

(4) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of children, youth, and families consistent with RCW 43.216.270 can meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The cost of record checks must include: The fees established by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for the criminal history background checks; a fee paid to the superintendent of public instruction for the cost of administering this section and RCW 28A.195.080 and 28A.410.010; and other applicable fees for obtaining the fingerprints.

Sec. 21. RCW 28A.400.305 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 28A.400.303. The rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:

(1) Written procedures providing a school district, approved private school, Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, state school for the blind, federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded school employee, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, or applicant for certification or employment access to and review of information obtained based on the record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and

(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of public instruction record check database to only those individuals processing record check information at the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts, approved private schools, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, the appropriate educational service district or districts, the appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, the appropriate charter schools, and the appropriate state-tribal education compact schools.

Sec. 22. RCW 28A.600.020 and 2016 c 72 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.600.010 shall be interpreted to ensure that the optimum learning atmosphere of the classroom is maintained, and that the highest consideration is given to the judgment of qualified certificated educators regarding conditions necessary to maintain the optimum learning atmosphere.

(2) Any student who creates a disruption of the educational process in violation of the building disciplinary standards while under a teacher's immediate supervision may be excluded by the teacher from his or her individual classroom and instructional or activity area for all or any portion of the balance of the school day, or up to the following two days, or until the principal or designee and teacher have conferred, whichever occurs first. Except in emergency circumstances, the teacher first must attempt one or more alternative forms of corrective action. In no event without the consent of the teacher may an excluded student return to the class during the balance of that class or activity period or up to the following two days, or until the principal or his or her designee and the teacher have conferred.

(3) In order to preserve a beneficial learning environment for all students and to maintain good order and discipline in each classroom, every school district board of directors shall provide that written procedures are developed for administering discipline at each school within the district. Such procedures shall be developed with the participation of parents and the community, and shall provide that the teacher, principal or designee, and other authorities designated by the board of directors, make every reasonable attempt to involve the parent or guardian and the student in the resolution of student discipline problems. Such procedures shall provide that students may be excluded from their individual classes or activities for periods of time in excess of that provided in subsection (2) of this section if such students have repeatedly disrupted the learning of other students. The procedures must be consistent with the rules of the superintendent of public instruction and must provide for early involvement of parents in attempts to improve the student's behavior.

(4) The procedures shall assure, pursuant to RCW 28A.400.110, that all staff work cooperatively toward consistent enforcement of proper student behavior throughout each school as well as within each classroom.

(5)(a) A principal shall consider imposing long-term suspension or expulsion as a sanction when deciding the appropriate disciplinary action for a student who, after July 27, 1997:

(i) Engages in two or more violations within a three-year period of RCW 9A.46.120, 28A.600.455, 28A.600.460, 28A.635.020, 28A.600.020, 28A.635.060, or 9.41.280; or

(ii) Engages in one or more of the offenses listed in RCW 13.04.155.

(b) The principal shall communicate the disciplinary action taken by the principal to the school personnel who referred the student to the principal for disciplinary action.

(6) Any corrective action involving a suspension or expulsion from school for more than ten days must have an end date of not more than the length of an academic term, as defined by the school board, from the time of corrective action. Districts shall make reasonable efforts to assist students and parents in returning to an educational setting prior to and no later than the end date of the corrective action. Where warranted based on public health or safety, a school may petition the superintendent of the school district, pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, for authorization to exceed the academic term limitation provided in this subsection. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules outlining the limited circumstances in which a school may petition to exceed the academic term limitation, including safeguards to ensure that the school district has made every effort to plan for the student's return to school. School districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the number of petitions made to the school board and the number of petitions granted on an annual basis.

(7) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district, educational service district, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the state school for the blind if it has suspended or expelled a student from the student's regular school setting from providing educational services to the student in an alternative setting or modifying the suspension or expulsion on a case-by-case basis. An alternative setting should be comparable, equitable, and appropriate to the regular education services a student would have received without the exclusionary discipline. Example alternative settings include alternative high schools, one-on-one tutoring, and online learning.

Sec. 23. RCW 28A.600.420 and 2009 c 381 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any elementary or secondary school student who is determined to have carried a firearm onto, or to have possessed a firearm on, public elementary or secondary school premises, public school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public schools, shall be expelled from school for not less than one year under RCW 28A.600.010. The superintendent of the school district, educational service district, or state school for the blind, or the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the director's designee, may modify the expulsion of a student on a case-by-case basis.

(2) For purposes of this section, "firearm" means a firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921, and a "firearm" as defined in RCW 9.41.010.

(3) This section shall be construed in a manner consistent with the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1401 et seq.

(4) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district, educational service district, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, or the state school for the blind if it has expelled a student from such student's regular school setting from providing educational services to the student in an alternative setting.

(5) This section does not apply to:

(a) Any student while engaged in military education authorized by school authorities in which rifles are used but not other firearms; or

(b) Any student while involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the rifles of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed but not other firearms; or

(c) Any student while participating in a rifle competition authorized by school authorities.

(6) A school district may suspend or expel a student for up to one year subject to subsections (1), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, if the student acts with malice as defined under RCW 9A.04.110 and displays an instrument that appears to be a firearm, on public elementary or secondary school premises, public school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public schools.

Sec. 24. RCW 39.26.300 and 2018 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority are each authorized to purchase interpreter services on behalf of limited English-speaking applicants and recipients of public assistance.

(2) The department of labor and industries is authorized to purchase interpreter services for medical and vocational providers authorized to provide services to limited English-speaking injured workers or crime victims.

(3) No later than September 1, 2020, the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, the health care authority, and the department of labor and industries must purchase in-person spoken language interpreter services directly from language access providers as defined in RCW 74.04.025, or through limited contracts with scheduling and coordinating delivery organizations, or both. Each state agency must have at least one contract with an entity that provides interpreter services through telephonic and video remote technologies. Nothing in this section precludes the department of labor and industries from purchasing in-person spoken language interpreter services directly from language access providers or from directly reimbursing language access providers.

(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the department of labor and industries may pay a language access provider directly for the costs of interpreter services when the services are necessary for use by a medical provider for emergency or urgent care, or where the medical provider determines that advanced notice is not feasible.

(5) Upon the expiration of any contract in effect on June 7, 2018, but no later than September 1, 2020, the department must develop and implement a model that all state agencies must use to procure spoken language interpreter services by purchasing directly from language access providers or through contracts with scheduling and coordinating entities, or both. The department must have at least one contract with an entity that provides interpreter services through telephonic and video remote technologies. If the department determines it is more cost-effective or efficient, it may jointly purchase these services with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, the health care authority, and the department of labor and industries as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The department of social and health services, (([the]))the department of children, youth, and families, the health care authority, and the department of labor and industries have the authority to procure interpreters through the department if the demand for spoken language interpreters cannot be met through their respective contracts.

(6) All interpreter services procured under this section must be provided by language access providers who are certified or authorized by the state, or nationally certified by the certification commission for health care interpreters or the national board for certification of medical interpreters. When a nationally certified, state-certified, or authorized language access provider is not available, a state agency is authorized to contract with a spoken language interpreter with other certifications or qualifications deemed to meet agency needs. Nothing in this subsection precludes providing interpretive services through state employees or employees of medical or vocational providers.

(7) Nothing in this section is intended to address how state agencies procure interpreters for sensory-impaired persons.

(8) For purposes of this section, "state agency" means any state office or activity of the executive branch of state government, including state agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and correctional and other types of institutions, but excludes institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the school for the blind, and the Washington center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth.

Sec. 25. RCW 41.40.088 and 2009 c 381 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A plan 1 member who is employed by a school district or districts, an educational service district, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, institutions of higher education, or community colleges:

(a) Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an eligible position, earns compensation earnable for six hundred thirty hours or more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period, except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position;

(b) If a member in an eligible position does not meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, the member is entitled to a service credit month for each month of the period he or she earns earnable compensation for seventy or more hours; and the member is entitled to a one-quarter service credit month for those calendar months during which he or she earned compensation for less than seventy hours.

(2) Except for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position, a plan 2 or plan 3 member who is employed by a school district or districts, an educational service district, the state school for the blind, the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth, institutions of higher education, or community colleges:

(a) Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an eligible position, earns compensation earnable for eight hundred ten hours or more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period;

(b) If a member in an eligible position for each month of the period from September through August of the following year does not meet the hours requirements of (a) of this subsection, the member is entitled to one-half service credit month for each month of the period if he or she earns earnable compensation for at least six hundred thirty hours but less than eight hundred ten hours during that period, and is employed nine months of that period;

(c) In all other instances, a member in an eligible position is entitled to service credit months as follows:

(i) One service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;

(ii) One-half service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(iii) One-quarter service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned for less than seventy hours;

(d) After August 31, 2000, school districts and educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2018 c 260 s 28, 2018 c 258 s 4, and 2018 c 127 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation revolving loan program account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, (([the]))the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, (([the]))the school employees' insurance account, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 27. RCW 70.198.020 and 2018 c 58 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established an advisory council in the department of social and health services for the purpose of advancing the development of a comprehensive and effective statewide system to provide prompt and effective early interventions for children in the state who are deaf or hard of hearing and their families.

(2) Members of the advisory council shall have training, experience, or interest in hearing loss in children. Membership shall include, but not be limited to, the following: Pediatricians; audiologists; teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing; parents of children who are deaf or hard of hearing; a representative from the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth; and representatives of the early support for infants and toddlers program in the department of children, youth, and families, the department of health, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 28. RCW 72.42.010 and 2009 c 381 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intention of the legislature, in creating a board of trustees for the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth to perform the duties set forth in this chapter, that the board of trustees perform needed oversight services to the governor and the legislature of the center in the development of programs for the hard of hearing, and in the operation of the center, including the school for the deaf.

Sec. 29. RCW 72.42.015 and 2009 c 381 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise as used in this chapter "director" means the director of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth.

Sec. 30. RCW 72.42.016 and 2009 c 381 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter:

(1) "Center" means the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth serving local school districts across the state; and

(2) "School" means the Washington state residential school for the deaf located in Vancouver, Washington.

Sec. 31. RCW 72.42.060 and 2009 c 381 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Each member of the board of trustees shall receive travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended, and such payments shall be a proper charge to any funds appropriated or allocated for the support of the Washington ((state)) center for ((childhood deafness and hearing loss))deaf and hard of hearing youth.

--- END ---