BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in consultation with the health plan contracted to provide health care coverage to foster youth, shall evaluate:

(a) Traumatic brain injury screening tools that could be used with children entering out-of-home care as defined under RCW 13.34.030 and the evidence base for such tools;

(b) Options to include traumatic brain injury screening tools in existing screens or regular health care appointments for children in out-of-home care as defined under RCW 13.34.030; and

(c) The recommended treatment actions based on health care, behavioral health care, and trauma-related best practices for youth for whom a potential traumatic brain injury is identified using a screening tool.

(2) By December 1, 2019, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall provide a report based on the requirements in this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---