BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate the outcomes of resource and assessment centers contracted by the department of children, youth, and families. For this evaluation, the Washington state institute for public policy shall collect data regarding:

(a) The type of placement children experience following placement at a resource and assessment center;

(b) The number of placement changes that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster youth;

(c) The length of stay in foster care that children experience following placement in a resource and assessment center compared with other foster youth;

(d) The likelihood that children placed in a resource and assessment center will be placed with siblings; and

(e) The length of time that foster families accepting children placed in resource and assessment centers continue to foster children compared to foster families receiving children directly from child protective services.

(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of children, youth, and families, the oversight board for children, youth, and families under RCW 43.216.015, and the governor by December 1, 2020, that provides the findings of the evaluation conducted under this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, "resource and assessment center" means an entity that meets the requirements of RCW 74.15.311.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2021.

--- END ---