BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state of Washington lost one thousand two hundred ninety-seven lives to suicide in 2017, including two hundred fifty-five veterans and seventy-seven individuals working in the construction industry. The legislature finds that Washington's suicide rate is eleven percent higher than the national average and that men in the middle years (ages thirty-five to sixty-four) account for four out of ten suicide deaths in Washington, creating significant trauma for children, communities, and workplaces affected. The legislature finds that veterans and their family members are disproportionately impacted by suicide and that many veterans reenter the workforce in industries and professions with this highest suicide risk such as, construction, law enforcement, corrections, and emergency medical services. The legislature finds that means safety, defined as reducing access during times of crisis and/or increased safe storage of means commonly used in suicide, is a promising population-level strategy for reducing suicide. Therefore, the legislature seeks to implement best practices for workplace mental health promotion and suicide prevention and to provide resources to develop and implement a statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop and implement a statewide plan to reduce suicide among service members, veterans, and their families. In developing and implementing the plan, the department shall:

(1) Collaborate with government and nongovernment agencies and organizations to establish promising best practices for suicide awareness and prevention materials, training, and outreach programs targeted to service members, veterans, and their families;

(2) Cultivate peer-led organizations serving veterans in transition and recovery;

(3) Create and deliver statewide suicide awareness and prevention training programs with content specific to service members, veterans, and their families; and

(4) Provide safer homes materials and trainings, and distribute safe firearms storage devices, to the Washington national guard, the Washington state patrol, allied veteran groups, and other organizations serving or employing veterans, following the recommendations of the safer homes, suicide aware task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

The safer homes, suicide aware task force shall distribute to all firearms dealers in the state suicide awareness and prevention materials tailored to firearms owners that are developed by the safer homes, suicide aware task force under RCW 43.70.445. Firearms dealers are strongly encouraged to post on the premises and make available to firearms purchasers and transferees the suicide awareness and prevention materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall distribute or make available through electronic means to all licensed pharmacies suicide awareness and prevention materials developed by the safer homes, suicide aware task force under RCW 43.70.445. Each licensed pharmacy shall, when deemed appropriate through patient evaluation, make available to patients at the point of care the suicide awareness and prevention materials distributed by the commission.

(2) The commission shall survey each pharmacist licensed under this chapter on methods to bridge the gap between practice and suicide awareness and prevention training, including identifying barriers that exist in putting the training into practice. The commission shall consult with the safer homes, suicide aware task force in developing the survey. The commission may distribute the survey as part of each pharmacist's license renewal. The commission shall compile and analyze the survey data and report the results to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020.

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.20.746 and 2016 c 90 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The schools of pharmacy at the University of Washington and Washington State University shall convene a work group to jointly develop a curriculum on suicide assessment, treatment, and management for pharmacy students. The curriculum must include material on identifying at-risk patients and limiting access to lethal means. When developing the curriculum, the schools shall consult with experts on suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and with the ((safe homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force created in RCW 43.70.445 on appropriate suicide awareness and prevention messaging. The schools of pharmacy shall submit a progress report to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(2) The pharmacy quality assurance commission shall, for purposes of RCW 43.70.442(4)(a), consider a pharmacist who has successfully completed the curriculum developed under subsection (1) of this section prior to licensure as possessing the minimum training and experience necessary to be exempt from the training requirements in RCW 43.70.442.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.70.445 and 2017 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, a ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force is established to raise public awareness and increase suicide prevention education among new partners who are in key positions to help reduce suicide. The task force shall be administered and staffed by the University of Washington school of social work. To the extent possible, the task force membership should include representatives from geographically diverse and priority populations, including tribal populations.

(b) The ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force comprises a suicide prevention and firearms subcommittee and a suicide prevention and health care subcommittee, as follows:

(i) The suicide prevention and firearms subcommittee shall consist of the following members and be cochaired by the University of Washington school of social work and a member ((identified in (b)(i)(A) of this subsection (1)))elected by the subcommittee members:

(A) A representative of the national rifle association and a representative of the second amendment foundation;

(B) Two representatives of suicide prevention organizations, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(C) Two representatives of the firearms industry, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(D) Two individuals who are suicide attempt survivors or who have experienced suicide loss, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(E) Two representatives of law enforcement agencies, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(F) One representative from the department of health;

(G) One representative from the department of veterans affairs, and one other individual representing veterans to be selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee; and

(H) No more than two other interested parties, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee.

(ii) The suicide prevention and health care subcommittee shall consist of the following members and be cochaired by the University of Washington school of social work and a member ((identified in (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection (1)))elected by the subcommittee members:

(A) Two representatives of the Washington state pharmacy association;

(B) Two representatives of retailers who operate pharmacies, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(C) One faculty member from the University of Washington school of pharmacy and one faculty member from the Washington State University school of pharmacy;

(D) One representative of the department of health;

(E) One representative of the pharmacy quality assurance commission;

(F) ((Two))One representative((s)) of the Washington state poison control center;

(G) One representative of the department of veterans affairs, and one other individual representing veterans to be selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee;

(H) Three members representing health care ((professionals providing suicide prevention training in the state))systems, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee; and

(I) No more than two other interested parties, selected by the cochairs of the subcommittee.

(((c) The University of Washington school of social work shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.))

(2) The task force shall:

(a) Develop and prepare to disseminate online trainings on suicide awareness and prevention for firearms dealers and their employees and firearm range owners and their employees;

(b) In consultation with the department of fish and wildlife, review the firearm safety pamphlet produced by the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 9.41.310 and, by January 1, 2017, recommend changes to the pamphlet to incorporate information on suicide awareness and prevention;

(c) Develop and approve suicide awareness and prevention messages for posters and brochures that are tailored to be effective for firearms owners for distribution to firearms dealers and firearms ranges;

(d) Develop suicide awareness and prevention messages for posters and brochures for distribution to pharmacies;

(e) In consultation with the department of fish and wildlife, develop strategies for creating and disseminating suicide awareness and prevention information for hunting safety classes, including messages to parents that can be shared during online registration, in either follow-up email communications, or in writing, or both;

(f) Develop suicide awareness and prevention messages for training for the schools of pharmacy and provide input on trainings being developed for community pharmacists;

(g) Create a web site that will be a clearinghouse for the newly created suicide awareness and prevention materials developed by the task force;

(h) Conduct a survey of firearms dealers and firearms ranges in the state to determine the types and amounts of incentives that would be effective in encouraging those entities to participate in ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware projects;

(i) Gather input on collateral educational materials that will help health care professionals in suicide prevention work; ((and))

(j) Create, implement, and evaluate a suicide awareness and prevention pilot program in two counties, one rural and one urban, that have high suicide rates. The pilot program shall include:

(i) Developing and directing advocacy efforts with firearms dealers to pair suicide awareness and prevention training with distribution of safe storage devices;

(ii) Developing and directing advocacy efforts with pharmacies to pair suicide awareness and prevention training with distribution of medication disposal kits and safe storage devices;

(iii) Training health care providers on suicide awareness and prevention, paired with distribution of medication disposal kits and safe storage devices; and

(iv) Training local law enforcement officers on suicide awareness and prevention, paired with distribution of medication disposal kits and safe storage devices;

(k) Develop a plan to provide resources to industries, professions, and workplaces impacted by high rates of suicide. In developing and implementing the plan, the task force shall:

(i) Develop customized trainings and provide consultation to workplaces in developing a comprehensive approach to workplace safety that incorporates mental health and suicide prevention focusing first on construction, unions, and the trade associations; and

(ii) Develop an online resource to disseminate best practices in workplace mental health and suicide prevention and host a biannual workplace summit;

(l) During the 2019-2021 biennium:

(i) Deliver the task force's SAFER intervention and firearms and medication locking devices in partnership with nongovernment organizations in twelve rural communities across Washington; and

(ii) Develop and distribute a tool kit for suicide prevention and curriculum for firearms safety instructors for their inclusion in firearms safety courses; and

(m) Incorporate into the suicide awareness and prevention materials and training created, produced, and distributed by the task force information on how a person may access information on obtaining an extreme risk protection order under chapter 7.94 RCW.

(3) ((The task force shall, in consultation with the department of health, develop and prioritize a list of projects to carry out the task force's purposes and submit the prioritized list to the department of health for funding from the suicide-safer homes project account created in RCW 43.70.446.

)) Beginning December 1, 2016, the task force shall annually report to the legislature on the status of its work. The task force shall submit a final report by December 1, ((2019))2021, that includes the findings of the suicide awareness and prevention pilot program evaluation under subsection (2) of this section and recommendations on possible continuation of the program. The task force shall submit its reports in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(((5)))(4) This section expires July 1, ((2020))2022.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.41.310 and 2016 c 90 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After a public hearing, the department of fish and wildlife shall publish a pamphlet on firearms safety and the legal limits of the use of firearms. The pamphlet shall include current information on firearms laws and regulations and state preemption of local firearms laws. By July 1, 2017, the department of fish and wildlife shall update the pamphlet to incorporate information on suicide awareness and prevention as recommended by the ((safe homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force established in RCW 43.70.445.

(2) This pamphlet may be used in the department's hunter safety education program and shall be provided to the department of licensing for distribution to firearms dealers and persons authorized to issue concealed pistol licenses. The department of fish and wildlife shall reimburse the department of licensing for costs associated with distribution of the pamphlet.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.70.446 and 2017 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project is created within the department of health for the purpose of accepting private funds for use by the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force created in RCW 43.70.445 in developing and providing suicide education and prevention materials, training, and outreach programs to help create suicide-safer homes. The secretary may accept gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source for deposit in the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project account created in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project account and all receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private sources to support the activities of the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project. Only the secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account to fund projects identified and prioritized by the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force. Funds deposited in the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project account may be used for the development and production of suicide prevention materials and training programs, for providing financial incentives to encourage firearms dealers and others to participate in suicide prevention training, and to implement pilot programs involving community outreach on creating suicide-safer homes.

(3) The ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware project account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.70.447 and 2017 c 262 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2020, the school of dentistry at the University of Washington shall develop a curriculum on suicide assessment, treatment, and management for dental students and licensed dentists. The curriculum must meet the minimum standards established under RCW 43.70.442 and must include material on identifying at-risk patients and limiting access to lethal means. When developing the curriculum, the school of dentistry must consult with experts on suicide assessment, treatment, and management and with the ((suicide-safer homes))safer homes, suicide aware task force established in RCW 43.70.445. The school of dentistry shall submit a progress report to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature by July 1, 2019.

(2) The dental quality assurance commission shall, for purposes of RCW 43.70.442(4)(a), consider a dentist who has successfully completed the curriculum developed under subsection (1) of this section prior to licensure as possessing the minimum training and experience necessary to be exempt from the training requirements in RCW 43.70.442.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW 28B.20.746 is recodified as a section in chapter 43.70 RCW.

--- END ---