BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.413 RCW to read as follows:

The paraeducator board must promote the use of paraeducators to meet educator workforce needs by:

(1) Communicating to school districts and educational service districts the requirements for requesting a limited teaching certificate on behalf of a paraeducator;

(2) Encouraging and supporting paraeducators to take on the role of teacher under a limited teaching certificate or by enrolling in an alternative route teacher certification program under chapter 28A.660 RCW; and

(3) Supporting school districts and educational service districts in using paraeducators in teacher roles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 10, 2019, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the paraeducator board must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations on reducing barriers to school districts and educational service districts using paraeducators on limited teaching certificates in teacher roles or to supporting paraeducators to become fully certificated teachers.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.413.060 and 2018 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts must implement this section only in school years for which state funding is appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section and only for the number of days that are funded by the appropriation.

(2) School districts must provide a four-day fundamental course of study on the state standards of practice, as defined by the board, to paraeducators who have not completed the course, either in the district or in another district within the state. At least one day of the fundamental course of study must be provided in person. School districts must use best efforts to provide the fundamental course of study before the paraeducator begins to work with students and their families, and at a minimum by the deadlines provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school districts must provide the fundamental course of study required in subsection (2) of this section by the deadlines provided in (a) of this subsection:

(a)(i) For paraeducators hired on or before September 1st, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided by September 30th of that year and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire, regardless of the size of the district; and

(ii) For paraeducators hired after September 1st:

(A) For districts with ten thousand or more students, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within four months of the date of hire and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire or by September 1st of the following year, whichever is sooner; and

(B) For districts with fewer than ten thousand students, no later than September 1st of the following year.

(b)(i) For paraeducators hired for the 2018-19 school year, by September 1, 2020; and

(ii) For paraeducators not hired for the 2018-19 school year, but hired for the 2019-20 school year, by September 1, 2021.

(4) School districts may collaborate with other school districts or educational service districts to meet the requirements of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.413.070 and 2018 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) School districts must implement this section only in school years for which state funding is appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section and only for the number of days that are funded by the appropriation.

(b) School districts are encouraged to provide at least one day of the ten days of general courses, as defined by the board, on the state paraeducator standards of practice as a professional learning day, where paraeducators collaborate with certified staff and other classified staff on applicable courses.

(2)(a) Paraeducators may become eligible for a general paraeducator certificate by completing the four-day fundamental course of study, as required under RCW 28A.413.060, and an additional ten days of general courses, as defined by the board, on the state paraeducator standards of practice, described in RCW 28A.413.050.

(b) Paraeducators are not required to meet the general paraeducator certificate requirements under this subsection (2) unless the courses necessary to meet the requirements are funded by the state in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and RCW 28A.413.060(1).

(3) Beginning September 1, 2019, school districts must:

(a) Provide paraeducators with general courses on the state paraeducator standards of practice; and

(b) Ensure all paraeducators employed by the district meet the general certification requirements of this section within three years of completing the four-day fundamental course of study.

(4) The general paraeducator certificate does not expire.

--- END ---