BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of issuing and renewing liquor licenses, and for determining fees for and making other decisions with respect to liquor licenses, arts and crafts activities may not be considered a gaming activity when conducted on the premises of a business licensed or proposed to be licensed under this title.

(2) No decision on whether to issue or renew a liquor license, or in determining fees for or making any other decision with respect to a liquor license, may include, as a factor, consideration, or other basis in making the licensing decision, the fact that an applicant's business activities at the premises, in any area or areas of the premises, includes offering, conducting, or making available arts and crafts activities to or for customers or guests, regardless of whether a fee is charged to customers or guests related to the arts and crafts activities.

(3) For purposes of this section, "arts and crafts activities" include, but are not limited to, any of the following activities:

(a) Painting;

(b) Pottery; and

(c) Sign making.

--- END ---