BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.113 and 2017 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium))Beginning January 1, 2021, and every January 1st of subsequent odd-numbered years, cities and towns ((shall))must provide to the department of transportation ((commission, or its successor entity, preservation rating information on at least seventy percent of the total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation rating information requirement shall increase in five percent increments in subsequent biennia, but in no case shall it exceed eighty percent. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based upon the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard approved by the department of transportation. Beginning January 1, 2007, the preservation rating information shall be submitted to the department.

(2) The requirement that cities and towns report preservation rating information to the department of transportation or the transportation commission under subsection (1) of this section is eliminated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

))a report on the latest average pavement condition for principal and minor arterial systems and collector systems as defined in RCW 47.05.021(1).

--- END ---