BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.789 and 2017 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the maximum extent practicable, but no later than the first full quarter after a community or technical college has implemented the ctcLink system, a community or technical college shall provide the following information to students during registration by displaying it in the online course description or by providing a link that connects to the bookstore's web site or other web site where students can search and view:

(a) The cost of any required textbook or other course materials; ((and))

(b) Whether a course uses open educational resources; and

(c) Whether a course uses low-cost required instructional materials. For the purposes of this subsection, "low-cost" means the required instructional materials equal fifty dollars or less.

(2) If a course's required textbooks and course materials are not determined prior to registration due to an unassigned faculty member, the textbooks' and course materials' cost must be provided as soon as feasible after a faculty member is assigned.

(3) Each community and technical college shall report to the college board which courses provided textbooks' and course materials' costs to students during registration, and what percent of total classes this equaled. The college board shall report the information to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by January 1st of each biennium, beginning with January 1, 2019.

--- END ---