BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.535 and 2017 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A community or technical college may issue a high school diploma or certificate as provided under this section.

(1) An individual who satisfactorily meets the requirements for high school completion shall be awarded a diploma from the college, subject to rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education.

(2) ((An individual enrolled through the option established under RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400 who satisfactorily completes an associate degree, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student.

)) An individual((, twenty-one))sixteen years or older or enrolled through the option established under RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400, ((who enrolls in a community or technical college for the purpose of obtaining an associate degree and)) who satisfactorily completes an associate degree through a community or technical college, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student. Individuals under twenty-one years of age under this subsection are ((not)) eligible for funding provided under chapter 28A.150 RCW.

(((4) An individual who enrolls in a technical college through the option established under RCW 28B.50.533, who satisfactorily completes an associate degree, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student.))

--- END ---