BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To establish a uniform standard by which concurrent enrollment programs and professional development activities may be measured, any college or university offering concurrent enrollment program courses at a public high school, or college in the high school programs under RCW 28A.600.290, must receive accreditation by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment by the 2027-28 school year.

(2) Any college or university engaged in concurrent enrollment program courses at a public high school, or college in the high school programs under RCW 28A.600.290, during or before the 2019-20 academic year that are not accredited by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment must continue to meet the same quality and eligibility standards and obtain approval in a manner consistent with the procedure established by rules adopted under RCW 28A.600.290 for the college in the high school program until the program is accredited by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment.

(3) After the 2027-28 school year, any college or university with concurrent enrollment program courses in place at a public high school, or college in the high school programs under RCW 28A.600.290, during or before the 2019-20 academic year that have not been accredited in accordance with subsection (1) of this section or do not have an application pending further action by the accrediting body under subsection (1) of this section may not offer a concurrent enrollment program course at a public high school or college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290.

(4) New college and university concurrent enrollment program courses that are implemented after the 2019-20 academic year have seven years from the beginning of the first term of classes to submit an application for accreditation for review by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment to comply with this section.

(5) All colleges and universities are encouraged to provide institutional resources to support the transition to accreditation, including professional development, engage with national associations focused on concurrent enrollment accreditation, and collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges or an organization that represents the public, four-year universities, and colleges.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Concurrent enrollment program" means a partnership between K-12 schools and postsecondary education institutions through which credit-bearing college courses offered by public or private institutions of higher education and taught by appropriately qualified high school teachers are taken in high school by high school students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma, and for which earned credits are recorded on a college or university transcript. "Concurrent enrollment program" does not include programs under RCW 28B.50.531 or the running start program.

(b) "Public high school" means a high school that is a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010.

--- END ---