BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the responsible teen communications act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that exchange of intimate images by minors is increasingly common, and that such actions may lead to harm and long-term consequences. The legislature intends to develop age-appropriate prevention and interventions to prevent harm and to hold accountable youth who harm others through exchange of intimate images.

(2) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington association for the treatment of sexual abusers, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of social and health services, the juvenile court administrators, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives from public defense, youth representatives, and other relevant stakeholders, shall convene a work group to make recommendations to the legislature regarding age-appropriate prevention and intervention strategies to address potential harms caused by exchange of intimate images by minors.

(3) By December 1, 2019, the work group shall make a report to the legislature identifying education, prevention, and other responses to the harms that may be associated with exchange of intimate images by minors.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.68A.050 and 2017 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person eighteen years of age or older commits the crime of dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) A person eighteen years of age or older commits the crime of dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of dealing in one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of a minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4)(a) Any person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she sells a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a misdemeanor.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under eighteen years of age who finances, attempts to finance, develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, or possesses a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4).

(7) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this section, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.68A.060 and 2017 c 126 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of sending or bringing into the state one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) This section does not apply to a minor who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, visual or printed matter depicting any minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(4) This section does not apply to a person under thirteen years of age who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.68A.070 and 2017 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly possesses a visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly possesses any visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of possession of one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) This section does not apply to a minor's possession of visual or printed matter depicting any minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(4) This section does not apply to a person under thirteen years of age in possession of visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.68A.075 and 2010 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e) is guilty of viewing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree, a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g) is guilty of viewing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree, a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of determining whether a person intentionally viewed over the internet a visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the trier of fact shall consider the title, text, and content of the visual or printed matter, as well as the internet history, search terms, thumbnail images, downloading activity, expert computer forensic testimony, number of visual or printed matter depicting minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct, defendant's access to and control over the electronic device and its contents upon which the visual or printed matter was found, or any other relevant evidence. The state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the viewing was initiated by the user of the computer where the viewing occurred.

(4) For the purposes of this section, each separate internet session of intentionally viewing over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct constitutes a separate offense.

(5) This section does not apply to a minor who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under thirteen years of age who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

Sec. 8. RCW 13.40.070 and 2018 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor. The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint to determine whether:

(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court; and

(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.

(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging decision for both filed and diverted cases.

(3) If the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5), (6), and (8) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met, the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community supervision.

(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter 10.37 RCW.

(5) The prosecutor shall file an information with the juvenile court if (a) an alleged offender is accused of an offense that is defined as a sex offense or violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030, other than assault in the second degree or robbery in the second degree; or (b) an alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion.

(6) Where a case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert the case if the alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or violation and the alleged offense is the offender's first offense or violation. If the alleged offender is charged with a related offense that may be filed under subsections (5) and (8) of this section, a case under this subsection may also be filed.

(7) Where a case is legally sufficient to charge an alleged offender with:

(a) Either prostitution or prostitution loitering and the alleged offense is the offender's first prostitution or prostitution loitering offense, the prosecutor shall divert the case; ((or))

(b) Voyeurism in the second degree, the offender is under seventeen years of age, and the alleged offense is the offender's first voyeurism in the second degree offense, the prosecutor shall divert the case, unless the offender has received two diversions for any offense in the previous two years;

(c) Minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct under section 4(5) of this act and the alleged offense is the offender's first violation of section 4(5) of this act, the prosecutor shall divert the case; or

(d) A distribution, transfer, dissemination, or exchange of sexually explicit images of other minors thirteen years of age or older offense as provided in section 4(1) of this act and the alleged offense is the offender's first violation of section 4(1) of this act, the prosecutor shall divert the case.

(8) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted. In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the prosecutor may be guided by the length, seriousness, and recency of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.

(9) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.

(10) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1) through (9) of this section may be performed by a juvenile court probation counselor for any complaint referred to the court alleging the commission of an offense which would not be a felony if committed by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient written notice to the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not review such complaints.

(11) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to community-based programs, restorative justice programs, mediation, or victim offender reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

(12) Prosecutors and juvenile courts are encouraged to engage with and partner with community-based programs to expand, improve, and increase options to divert youth from formal processing in juvenile court. Nothing in this chapter should be read to limit partnership with community-based programs to create diversion opportunities for juveniles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW to read as follows:

A minor who possesses any depiction or depictions of any other minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011 forfeits any right to continued possession of the depiction or depictions and any court exercising jurisdiction over such depiction or depictions shall order forfeiture of the depiction or depictions to the custody of law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 9A.86 RCW to read as follows:

A minor who possesses any image of any other minor which constitutes an intimate image as defined in RCW 9A.86.010 forfeits any right to continued possession of the image and any court exercising jurisdiction over such image shall order forfeiture of the image.

--- END ---