BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature declares that:

(1) October of each year will be known as Filipino American history month;

(2) October is designated as a time for people of this state to commemorate the contributions to the history and heritage of the state and country by Filipino Americans; and

(3) Educational institutions, public entities, and private organizations are encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Filipino Americans.

--- END ---