BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2014 c 96 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in ((RCW 84.14.040 and 84.14.060))section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (section 2 of this act) and sections 4 and 5, chapter 96, Laws of 2014. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(a).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to stimulate the construction of new multifamily housing in urban growth areas located in unincorporated areas of rural counties where housing options, including affordable housing options, are severely limited. It is the legislature's intent to provide the value of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements qualifying under chapter 84.14 RCW an exemption from ad valorem property taxation for eight to twelve years, as provided for in RCW 84.14.020, in order to provide incentives to developers to construct new multifamily housing thereby increasing the number of affordable housing units for low to moderate-income residents in certain rural counties.

(3) If a review finds that at least twenty percent of the new housing is developed and occupied by households making at or below eighty percent of the area median income, at the time of occupancy, adjusted for family size for the county where the project is located or where the housing is intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the household may earn up to one hundred fifteen percent of the area median income, at the time of sale, adjusted for family size for the county where the project is located, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to data provided by counties in which beneficiaries are utilizing the preference, the office of financial management, the department of commerce, the United States department of housing and urban development, and other data sources as needed by the joint legislative audit and review committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.14.060 and 2014 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the city or county may approve the application if it finds that:

(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four additional multifamily units are being developed;

(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020;

(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion, in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the time the application is approved;

(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines adopted by the city or county under this chapter; and

(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing authority in accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040.

(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master plan, except as provided in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d).

(3) An application may not be approved for a residential targeted area in a rural county on or after January 1, ((2020))2025.

--- END ---