BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.12.225 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of personal property, valued at less than twelve thousand dollars, purchased or received as a prize in a contest of chance, as defined in RCW 82.04.285, from a nonprofit organization or a library, if the gross income the nonprofit organization or library receives from the sale is exempt under RCW 82.04.3651.

(2) ((This section expires July 1, 2020.))(a) Beginning December 2019, and each December thereafter, the department must adjust the value limit for the exemption under subsection (1) of this section by multiplying the current value limit for the exemption under subsection (1) of this section by the greater of one or one plus the percentage change in the consumer price index for the most recent twelve-month period available as of December 1st of the current calendar year, and rounding the result to the nearest ten dollars. If an adjustment under this subsection (2) would reduce the value limit for the exemption under subsection (1) of this section, the department may not adjust the value limit for use in the following year. The department must promptly publish the adjusted value limit for the next calendar year on its public web site. Each adjusted value limit calculated under this subsection takes effect on the following January 1st.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (2):

(i) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers, all items, (CPI-U) for the Seattle area as calculated by the United States bureau of labor statistics or successor agency. If the United States bureau of labor statistics or successor agency ceases to calculate a CPI-U for the Seattle area, "consumer price index" means a successor index as determined by the department consistent with the purpose of this subsection (2); and

(ii) "Seattle area" means the geographic area sample that includes Seattle and surrounding areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---