BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health carrier offering a health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, must include coverage for hearing instruments for persons who are eighteen years of age or younger. Coverage must include a new hearing instrument every five years, and services and supplies such as the initial assessment, fitting, adjustment, and auditory training.

(2) The hearing instrument must be recommended by a licensed audiologist, hearing aid specialist, or a licensed physician or osteopathic physician who specializes in otolaryngology and dispensed by a licensed audiologist, hearing aid specialist, or a licensed physician or osteopathic physician who specializes in otolaryngology.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "hearing instrument" and "hearing aid specialist" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 18.35.010.

--- END ---