BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.005 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Adult family homes are an important part of the state's long-term care system. Adult family homes provide an alternative to institutional care and promote a high degree of independent living for residents.

(b) Persons with functional limitations have broadly varying service needs. Adult family homes that can meet those needs are an essential component of a long-term system. Different populations living in adult family homes, such as persons with developmental disabilities and elderly persons, often have significantly different needs and capacities from one another.

(c) There is a need to update certain restrictive covenants to take into consideration the legislative findings cited in (a) and (b) of this subsection; the need to prevent or reduce institutionalization; and the legislative and judicial mandates to provide care and services in the least restrictive setting appropriate to the needs of the individual. Restrictive covenants which directly or indirectly restrict or prohibit the use of property for adult family homes (i) are contrary to the public interest served by establishing adult family homes and (ii) discriminate against individuals with disabilities in violation of RCW 49.60.224.

(2) It is the legislature's intent that department rules and policies relating to the licensing and operation of adult family homes recognize and accommodate the different needs and capacities of the various populations served by the homes. Furthermore, the development and operation of adult family homes that promote the health, welfare, and safety of residents, and provide quality personal care and special care services should be encouraged.

(3) The legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable and their health and ((well-being))welfare are dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of their caregivers are the key to good care. The legislature finds that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's population ages and residents' needs increase. The legislature intends that current training standards be enhanced.

(4) The legislature finds that the state of Washington has a compelling interest in developing and enforcing standards that promote the health, welfare, and safety of vulnerable adults residing in adult family homes. The health, safety, and ((well-being))welfare of vulnerable adults must be the paramount concern in the security and operation of an adult family home and in determining whether to issue a license to an applicant, whether to suspend or revoke a license, or whether to take other licensing actions.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.128.280 and 2013 c 300 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to enhance the selection of an appropriate adult family home, all adult family homes licensed under this chapter shall disclose the scope of, and charges for, the care, services, and activities provided by the home or customarily arranged for by the home. The disclosure must be provided to the home's residents and the residents' representatives, if any, prior to admission, and to interested prospective residents and their representatives upon request, using standardized disclosure forms developed by the department with stakeholders' input. The home may also disclose supplemental information to prospective residents and other interested persons.

(2)(a) The disclosure forms that the department develops must be standardized, reasonable in length, and easy to read. The form setting forth the scope of an adult family home's care, services, and activities must be available from the adult family home through a link to the department's web site developed pursuant to this section. This form must indicate, among other categories, the scope of personal care and medication service provided, the scope of skilled nursing services or nursing delegation provided or available, any specialty care designations held by the adult family home, the customary number of caregivers present during the day and whether the home has awake staff at night, any particular cultural or language access available, and clearly state whether the home admits medicaid clients or retains residents who later become eligible for medicaid. The adult family home shall provide or arrange for the care, services, and activities disclosed in its form.

(b) The department must also develop a second standardized disclosure form with stakeholders' input for use by adult family homes to set forth an adult family home's charges for its care, services, items, and activities, including the charges not covered by the home's daily or monthly rate, or by medicaid, medicare, or other programs. This form must be available from the home and disclosed to residents and their representatives, if any, prior to admission, and to interested prospective residents and their representatives upon request.

(3)(a) If the adult family home decreases the scope of care, services, or activities it provides, due to circumstances beyond the home's control, the home shall provide a minimum of thirty days' written notice to the residents, and the residents' representative if any, before the effective date of the decrease in the scope of care, services, or activities provided.

(b) If the adult family home voluntarily decreases the scope of care, services, or activities it provides, and any such decrease will result in the discharge of one or more residents, then ninety days' written notice must be provided prior to the effective date of the decrease. Notice must be given to the residents and the residents' representative, if any.

(c) If the adult family home increases the scope of care, services, or activities it provides, the home shall promptly provide written notice to the residents, and the residents' representative if any, and shall indicate the date on which the increase is effective.

(4) When the care needs of a resident exceed the disclosed scope of care or services that the adult family home provides, the home may exceed the care or services previously disclosed, provided that the additional care or services are permitted by the adult family home's license, and the home can safely and appropriately serve the resident with available staff or through the provision of reasonable accommodations required by state or federal law. The provision of care or services to a resident that exceed those previously disclosed by the home does not mean that the home is capable of or required to provide the same care or services to other residents, unless required as a reasonable accommodation under state or federal law.

(5) An adult family home ((may deny admission to))shall only admit a prospective resident if the home determines that the needs of the prospective resident ((cannot))can be met, and the prospective resident is not likely to pose a substantial risk to the health, welfare, and safety of any other resident, so long as the adult family home operates in compliance with state and federal law, including RCW 70.129.030(3) and the reasonable accommodation requirements of state and federal antidiscrimination laws.

(6) The department shall work with consumers, advocates, and other stakeholders to combine and improve existing web resources to create a more robust, comprehensive, and user-friendly web site for family members, residents, and prospective residents of adult family homes in Washington. The department may contract with outside vendors and experts to assist in the development of the web site. The web site should be easy to navigate and have links to information important for residents, prospective residents, and their family members or representatives including, but not limited to: (a) Explanations of the types of licensed long-term care facilities, levels of care, and specialty designations; (b) lists of suggested questions when looking for a care facility; (c) warning signs of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation; and (d) contact information for the department and the long-term care ((ombudsman [ombuds]))ombuds. In addition, the consumer oriented web site should include a searchable list of all adult family homes in Washington, with links to inspection and investigation reports and any enforcement actions by the department for the previous three years. If a violation or enforcement remedy is deleted, rescinded, or modified under RCW 70.128.167 or chapter 34.05 RCW, the department shall make the appropriate changes to the information on the web site as soon as reasonably feasible, but no later than thirty days after the violation or enforcement remedy has been deleted, rescinded, or modified. To facilitate the comparison of adult family homes, the web site should also include a link to each licensed adult family home's disclosure form required by subsection (2)(a) of this section. The department's web site should also include periodically updated information about whether an adult family home has a current vacancy, if the home provides such information to the department, or may include links to other consumer-oriented web sites with the vacancy information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to admission to an adult family home, a person who has been convicted of a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or the person's representative, shall disclose to the adult family home employee responsible for processing the person's admission to the home, the details of the person's criminal history, including any specific offenses for which the person was convicted, the dates of any offenses, and the location of any offenses.

(2) If a provider or resident manager of an adult family home receives information from a person under subsection (1) of this section or a fact sheet under RCW 9A.44.130, and the home admits the person, the provider or resident manager of the home shall distribute the disclosure information or the fact sheet to all residents. If the provider or resident manager of the adult family home determines that the distribution to a resident is not appropriate due to the resident's medical, emotional, or mental status, the provider or resident manager of the home shall distribute the disclosed information or the fact sheet to the resident's representative or emergency contact.

(3) If a provider or resident manager discovers that a resident who is required to make a disclosure under subsection (1) of this section fails to disclose the information, the adult family home may consider the failure to disclose as grounds for transfer and discharge of the resident. When an adult family home has grounds for transfer and discharge under this subsection, it may notify the resident that the provider intends to transfer and discharge the resident. If the provider decides to transfer and discharge the resident, the provider must provide the resident with at least thirty days' notice in writing and provide the resident with all necessary discharge planning services.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.44.130 and 2017 c 174 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has a fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section. When a person required to register under this section is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at the time of release from custody with an official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person.

(b) Any adult or juvenile who is required to register under (a) of this subsection must give notice to the county sheriff of the county with whom the person is registered within three business days:

(i) Prior to arriving at a school or institution of higher education to attend classes;

(ii) Prior to starting work at an institution of higher education; or

(iii) After any termination of enrollment or employment at a school or institution of higher education.

(2)(a) A person required to register under this section must provide the following information when registering: (i) Name and any aliases used; (ii) complete and accurate residential address or, if the person lacks a fixed residence, where he or she plans to stay; (iii) date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) social security number; (viii) photograph; and (ix) fingerprints.

(b) A person may be required to update any of the information required in this subsection in conjunction with any address verification conducted by the county sheriff or as part of any notice required by this section.

(c) A photograph or copy of an individual's fingerprints, which may include palmprints may be taken at any time to update an individual's file.

(3) Any person required to register under this section who intends to travel outside the United States must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested, or in person, signed written notice of the plan to travel outside the country to the county sheriff of the county with whom the person is registered at least twenty-one days prior to travel. The notice shall include the following information: (a) Name; (b) passport number and country; (c) destination; (d) itinerary details including departure and return dates; (e) means of travel; and (f) purpose of travel. If the offender subsequently cancels or postpones travel outside the United States, the offender must notify the county sheriff not later than three days after cancellation or postponement of the intended travel outside the United States or on the departure date provided in the notification, whichever is earlier. The county sheriff shall notify the United States marshals service as soon as practicable after receipt of the notification. In cases of unexpected travel due to family or work emergencies, or for offenders who travel routinely across international borders for work-related purposes, the notice must be submitted in person at least twenty-four hours prior to travel to the sheriff of the county where such offenders are registered with a written explanation of the circumstances that make compliance with this subsection (3) impracticable.

(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the following deadlines:

(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. Sex offenders or kidnapping offenders who are in custody of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability services from the department of social and health services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in meeting the initial registration requirement under this section. Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for any violation of this section.

When a person required to register under this section is in the custody of the state department of corrections or a local corrections or probations agency and has been approved for partial confinement as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the person must register at the time of transfer to partial confinement with the official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the county in which the offender is in partial confinement. The offender must also register within three business days from the time of the termination of partial confinement or release from confinement with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

(ii) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders or kidnapping offenders who are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other federal or military correctional agency must register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation.

(iii) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted of a sex offense and kidnapping offenders who are convicted for a kidnapping offense but who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon sentencing shall report to the county sheriff to register within three business days of being sentenced.

(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS, TEMPORARY RESIDENTS, OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign country must register within three business days of establishing residence or reestablishing residence if the person is a former Washington resident. If the offender is under the jurisdiction of an agency of this state when the offender moves to Washington, the agency shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.

Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who are visiting Washington state and intend to reside or be present in the state for ten days or more shall register his or her temporary address or where he or she plans to stay with the county sheriff of each county where the offender will be staying within three business days of arrival. Registration for temporary residents shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the photograph and fingerprints.

(v) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing a sex offense or a kidnapping offense and who is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and health services, must register within three business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The state department of social and health services shall provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to register.

(vi) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than three business days after entering the county and provide the information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their supervision.

(viii) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington, who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and photograph with the new state within three business days after establishing residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or attend school in the new state. The person must also send written notice within three business days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington state. The county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to the Washington state patrol.

(b) The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether the person is living within the county.

(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a complaint for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, or arraignment on charges for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the crime of failure to register under RCW 9A.44.132 who asserts as a defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register within three business days following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this subsection (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original charge.

(5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff within three business days of moving.

(b) If any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a new county, within three business days of moving the person must register with the county sheriff of the county into which the person has moved and provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last registered is responsible for address verification pursuant to RCW 9A.44.135 until the person completes registration of his or her new residence address.

(6)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks a fixed residence shall provide signed written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within three business days after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The notice shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the photograph, fingerprints, and palmprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in another county.

(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered. The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The person must keep an accurate accounting of where he or she stays during the week and provide it to the county sheriff upon request. The lack of a fixed residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.

(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within three business days of ceasing to have a fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (4)(a)(vi) or (vii) and (6) of this section. To prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

(7) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name change. No sex offender under the requirement to register under this section at the time of application shall be granted an order changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to register under this section who receives an order changing his or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within three business days of the entry of the order.

(8)(a) Prior to admission to an adult family home, a person who is required to register as a sex offender under this section shall notify the appropriate county sheriff that the person is being admitted to the adult family home.

(b) A county sheriff who receives notice under (a) of this subsection or who knows that a person required to register as a sex offender under this section is planning to be admitted to an adult family home shall notify the provider or resident manager of the home and deliver a fact sheet to the provider or resident manager of the home containing the following information:

(i) The name and physical description of the person;

(ii) The person's conviction history, including the dates of conviction;

(iii) The risk level classification assigned to the person; and

(iv) The profile of likely victims.

(9) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a peace officer, including a county sheriff, or law enforcement agency, for failing to release information authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Prior to admitting a person who has been convicted of a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the provider or resident manager of an adult family home must notify the department of the person's admission and submit an assessment of how the admission and the care for the person will not compromise either (i) the health, safety, and welfare of the other residents of the home, or (ii) the security and operation of the home.

(b) Each year following admission, the provider or resident manager of the adult family home must submit a supplemental assessment which includes updated information related to the initial assessment as well as reports of events that have occurred that may compromise either (i) the health, safety, and welfare of the other residents of the home, or (ii) the security and operation of the home.

(c) The initial assessment and supplemental assessments shall include documentation of any additional training provided to resident managers and caregivers to prevent any risk to the health and safety of residents as required by RCW 70.128.130.

(2) The department may establish forms for an adult family home to use when completing the assessment under subsection (1) of this section. The department shall establish procedures to streamline the submission of the assessment required under subsection (1) of this section with other assessment submission requirements and schedules to reduce delays and minimize reporting burdens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To prevent the perpetuation of segregated housing patterns, the department shall determine the location of licensed adult family homes.

(2) Before issuing a license for an adult family home, the department shall determine the number of other adult family homes within a one thousand two hundred feet radius.

(3) None of the data collected may be used in a manner that violates the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

Sec. 7. RCW 70.128.130 and 2012 c 164 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provider is ultimately responsible for the day-to-day operations of each licensed adult family home.

(2) The provider shall promote the health, safety, and ((well-being))welfare of each resident residing in each licensed adult family home.

(3) Adult family homes shall be maintained internally and externally in good repair and condition. Such homes shall have safe and functioning systems for heating, cooling, hot and cold water, electricity, plumbing, garbage disposal, sewage, cooking, laundry, artificial and natural light, ventilation, and any other feature of the home.

(4) In order to preserve and promote the residential home-like nature of adult family homes, adult family homes licensed after August 24, 2011, shall:

(a) Have sufficient space to accommodate all residents at one time in the dining and living room areas;

(b) Have hallways and doorways wide enough to accommodate residents who use mobility aids such as wheelchairs and walkers; and

(c) Have outdoor areas that are safe and accessible for residents to use.

(5) The adult family home must provide all residents access to resident common areas throughout the adult family home including, but not limited to, kitchens, dining and living areas, and bathrooms, to the extent that they are safe under the resident's care plan.

(6) Adult family homes shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary manner, including proper sewage disposal, food handling, and hygiene practices.

(7) Adult family homes shall develop a fire drill plan for emergency evacuation of residents, shall have working smoke detectors in each bedroom where a resident is located, shall have working fire extinguishers on each floor of the home, and shall not keep nonambulatory patients above the first floor of the home.

(8) The adult family home shall ensure that all residents can be safely evacuated in an emergency.

(9) Adult family homes shall have clean, functioning, and safe household items and furnishings.

(10) Adult family homes shall provide a nutritious and balanced diet and shall recognize residents' needs for special diets.

(11) Adult family homes shall establish health care procedures for the care of residents including medication administration and emergency medical care.

(a) Adult family home residents shall be permitted to self-administer medications.

(b) Adult family home providers may administer medications and deliver special care only to the extent authorized by law.

(12) Adult family home providers shall either: (a) Reside at the adult family home; or (b) employ or otherwise contract with a qualified resident manager to reside at the adult family home. The department may exempt, for good cause, a provider from the requirements of this subsection by rule.

(13) A provider will ensure that any volunteer, student, employee, or person residing within the adult family home who will have unsupervised access to any resident shall not have been convicted of a crime listed under RCW 43.43.830 or 43.43.842, or been found to have abused, neglected, exploited, or abandoned a minor or vulnerable adult as specified in RCW 74.39A.056(2). A provider may conditionally employ a person pending the completion of a criminal conviction background inquiry, but may not allow the person to have unsupervised access to any resident.

(14) A provider shall offer activities to residents under care as defined by the department in rule.

(15) An adult family home must be financially solvent, and upon request for good cause, shall provide the department with detailed information about the home's finances. Financial records of the adult family home may be examined when the department has good cause to believe that a financial obligation related to resident care or services will not be met.

(16)(a) An adult family home provider must ensure that staff are competent and receive necessary training to perform assigned tasks. Staff must satisfactorily complete department-approved staff orientation, basic training, and continuing education as specified by the department by rule. The provider shall ensure that a qualified caregiver is on-site whenever a resident is at the adult family home; any exceptions will be specified by the department in rule. Notwithstanding RCW 70.128.230, until orientation and basic training are successfully completed, a caregiver may not provide hands-on personal care to a resident without on-site supervision by a person who has successfully completed basic training or been exempted from the training pursuant to statute.

(b) If a person who has been convicted of a serious violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, has been admitted to an adult family home, the adult family home provider must ensure that the resident manager and any caregivers have received appropriate training necessary to minimize any risk to the health and safety of the residents as the risk may be related to any specific behaviors associated with the offense committed by the person. The adult family home must document all training conducted under this subsection and make it available for review by the department on request.

(17) The provider and resident manager must assure that there is:

(a) A mechanism to communicate with the resident in his or her primary language either through a qualified person on-site or readily available at all times, or other reasonable accommodations, such as language lines; and

(b) Staff on-site at all times capable of understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to respond appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and understand resident care plans.

--- END ---