BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of social and health services shall convene a work group to examine the siting of community-based facilities statewide serving individuals who are civilly committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) who have a history of violent and assaultive behaviors and sexually violent predators as defined in chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2) The work group membership must be composed of the following:

(a) One representative of the behavioral health administration;

(b) One representative of the aging and long-term support administration;

(c) One representative of both western state hospital and eastern state hospital;

(d) One representative of the managed care organization or behavioral health administrative services organization entities;

(e) One representative of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(f) One representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(g) One representative of the Washington association of counties;

(h) One representative of the association of Washington cities;

(i) One representative from the department of corrections;

(j) One representative from the licensed home and community-based facility and services community;

(k) One consumer and family advocate representative;

(l) One representative from the local nonprofit mental health provider community; and

(m) One community member representing neighborhoods and communities.

(3) The work group shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature not later than December 1, 2019, with recommendations for policy changes that balance public safety, and individual due process and liberty interests. Recommendations may be made on the following subjects as they relate to individuals civilly committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) who have a history of violent and assaultive behaviors and sexually violent predators as defined in chapter 71.09 RCW:

(a) Community-based facility siting guidelines to assist with the equitable statewide distribution of civilly committed persons with violent histories;

(b) The adequacy of home and community-based facilities and services, treatment options and providers, and supportive services upon discharge;

(c) Discharge processes and services that adequately protect patients, residents, and the community; and

(d) System strategies to improve information sharing between the state hospitals, behavioral health system providers, law enforcement, courts, and communities and remove barriers to treatment and discharge while promoting public safety.

--- END ---