BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends that the joint transportation committee study the adoption of electric vehicles by all public agencies in the state of Washington in a manner that provides credible and actionable information for state and local policymakers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The joint transportation committee must conduct a study on the electrification of public fleets in the state of Washington. The study must include the following:

(a) An inventory of existing public fleets for the state of Washington, cities, counties, public utility districts, ports, school districts, colleges and universities, and all other political subdivisions of the state. The inventory must differentiate among electric vehicles, hybrid vehicles, gasoline powered vehicles, and any other functional categories;

(b) A review of currently available electric vehicles in common government vehicle classes, including but not limited to passenger vehicles, light duty vehicles, medium duty vehicles, heavy duty vehicles, and emergency response vehicles. This review must include the average vehicle cost differential among the commercially available fuel options. The review must include a cost benefit analysis analyzing conversion of different vehicle classes and include recommendations for those types of vehicles that should be excluded from consideration due to insufficient alternatives, unreliable technology, or excessive cost;

(c) The projected costs of achieving substantial conversion to electric fleets by 2025, 2030, and 2035 for governments. This cost estimate must include vehicle acquisition costs, charging infrastructure, and other associated costs;

(d) The total potential costs and total potential economic and noneconomic benefits of the plan for shifting to a public fleet of electric vehicles to Washington's economy, using the best available economic models, emission estimation techniques, and other scientific methods;

(e) Identification and analysis of financing mechanisms that could be used to finance the transition of publicly owned vehicles to electric vehicles. These mechanisms include, but are not limited to:

(i) Energy or carbon savings performance contracting;

(ii) Utility grants and rebates;

(iii) Revolving loan funds;

(iv) State grant programs;

(v) Private third-party financing;

(vi) Fleet management services;

(vii) Leasing;

(viii) Vehicle use optimization; and

(ix) Vehicle to grid technology;

(f) An analysis of methods to maximize ethical sourcing of materials used in electric vehicles;

(g) Predicted number, type, year of installation, and location profile of electric vehicle fueling stations needed to provide prompt, efficient, and cost-effective fueling of Washington publicly owned electric vehicles during the transition period, and an estimate of the yearly and aggregate cost to the public in building out fueling stations; and

(h) An analysis of the electrical generation, transmission, and distribution upgrades and build-out required to provide prompt, efficient, and cost-effective fueling of Washington publicly owned electric vehicles during the transition period, and an analysis of the investment required to implement the upgrades.

(2) In developing and implementing the study under subsection (1) of this section, the agency must solicit input from interested stakeholders including, but not limited to, representatives of state agencies, cities, counties, colleges and universities, public utility districts, port districts, and electric vehicle advocates.

(3) The joint transportation committee must report the results of its study to the legislature by December 31, 2019.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that uses chemical energy stored in rechargeable battery packs, and electric motors and motor controllers instead of internal combustion engines for propulsion. "Electric vehicle" includes hydrogen fuel cell electric vehicles, which are vehicles that use a fuel cell, instead of a battery, or in combination with a battery or super capacitor, to power their on-board electric motor.

(b) "Medium duty vehicles and heavy duty vehicles" means motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight in excess of ten thousand pounds.

(c) "Passenger vehicles and light duty vehicles" means motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of up to ten thousand pounds.

(5) This section expires January 31, 2020.

--- END ---