BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.045 and 2010 c 161 s 822 are each amended to read as follows:

The moneys collected by the department for ORV registrations, temporary ORV use permits, decals, and tabs under ((this)) chapters 46.09 and ((chapter)) 46.17 RCW must be distributed from time to time, but at least once a year, in the following manner:

(1) The department shall retain enough money to cover expenses incurred in the administration of ((this)) chapter 46.09 RCW. The amount kept by the department must never exceed eighteen percent of fees collected.

(2) The remaining moneys must be distributed for off-road vehicle recreation facilities by the recreation and conservation funding board in accordance with RCW 46.09.520(2)(d)(ii)(A).

--- END ---