BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.108.010 and 2016 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Animal massage therapist" means an individual with a license to practice massage therapy in this state with additional training in animal therapy.

(2) "Board" means the Washington state board of massage.

(3) "Certified reflexologist" means an individual who is certified under this chapter.

(4) "Foot zone therapy" means a service that is limited to applying pressure with hands and zoning tools from the ankle down to the bottom of the feet based on zoning maps. Foot zone therapy does not include the diagnosis of or treatment for specific diseases or joint manipulations.

(5) "Health carrier" means the same as the definition in RCW 48.43.005.

(((5)))(6) "Intraoral massage" means the manipulation or pressure of soft tissue inside the mouth or oral cavity for therapeutic purposes.

(((6)))(7) "Massage" and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes. Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction, reflexology, Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and fascial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force, nor does it include genital manipulation.

(((7)))(8) "Massage business" means the operation of a business where massages are given.

(((8)))(9) "Massage therapist" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(((9)))(10) "Reflexology" means a health care service that is limited to applying alternating pressure with thumb and finger techniques to reflexive areas of the lower one-third of the extremities, feet, hands, and outer ears based on reflex maps. Reflexology does not include the diagnosis of or treatment for specific diseases, or joint manipulations. Reflexology does not include foot zone therapy.

(((10)))(11) "Reflexology business" means the operation of a business where reflexology services are provided.

(((11)))(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.108.030 and 2016 c 41 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a massage therapist without first applying for and receiving from the department a license to practice. However, this subsection does not prohibit a certified reflexologist from practicing reflexology.

(b) A person represents himself or herself as a massage therapist when the person adopts or uses any title or any description of services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Massage, massage practitioner, massage therapist, massage therapy, therapeutic massage, massage technician, massage technology, massagist, masseur, masseuse, myotherapist or myotherapy, touch therapist, reflexologist except when used by a certified reflexologist, acupressurist, body therapy or body therapist, or any derivation of those terms that implies a massage technique or method.

(2)(a) No person may practice reflexology or represent himself or herself as a reflexologist by use of any title without first being certified as a reflexologist or licensed as a massage therapist by the department.

(b) A person represents himself or herself as a reflexologist when the person adopts or uses any title in any description of services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Reflexologist, reflexology, ((foot pressure therapy, foot reflex therapy,)) or any derivation of those terms that implies a reflexology technique or method. However, this subsection does not prohibit a licensed massage therapist from using any of these terms as a description of services.

(c) A person may not use the term "certified reflexologist" without first being certified by the department.

(d) A person who practices only foot zone therapy within established professional standards and ethics is not required to become licensed and certified pursuant to this chapter.

--- END ---