BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The legislature finds, regarding the don't drip and drive program undertaken by the department of ecology between 2011 and 2017, that the program:

(i) Was designed to improve vehicle owners' awareness of vehicle leaks and to motivate the owners of leaking vehicles to fix the leaks;

(ii) Has achieved progress in addressing a significant source of water pollution in the Puget Sound region: Vehicles that leak fluids that cause significant water quality impairments;

(iii) Was developed in partnership with an extensive coalition of municipalities and other partners in the Puget Sound region;

(iv) Was founded on extensive research and a well developed educational campaign;

(v) Has been funded by a series of one-time grants; and

(vi) Has resulted in the reduction of the source of water pollution from vehicle fluids, as well as a number of ancillary benefits, including improved vehicle fuel economy for vehicle owners, better air quality, the delayed need for vehicle repairs, improved reliability in vehicle operation, and others;

(b) The legislature further finds that the results of the program demonstrate benefits that could be realized: More comprehensively, were the scope of the program to emphasize all benefits of proper vehicle maintenance; more broadly, were the program to be expanded statewide; and continuously, were the program to be funded with a permanent revenue source;

(c) The legislature further finds that the benefits of proper vehicle maintenance are more pronounced in older vehicles; and

(d) The legislature also recognizes the value of partnerships with local governments and private sector stakeholders in ensuring the development and establishment of a robust and enduring program.

(2) The legislature finds that an ongoing and statewide vehicle maintenance improvement program to sustain and expand on the progress under the don't drip and drive program is appropriate and necessary. Such a program must be based on proper groundwork in the form of a carefully developed implementation plan. The legislature therefore intends to initiate such development by directing the stormwater center at Washington State University to guide the formulation of the plan, in collaboration with local partners and affected stakeholders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The Washington stormwater center of the Washington State University shall develop and coordinate a statewide don't drip and drive program.

(1) The program's mission is to use behavior change strategies to prevent stormwater pollution from leaking motor vehicles, to help drivers properly maintain vehicles, and to help local jurisdictions meet national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) requirements.

(2) The program must be based on the following principles:

(a) The program must utilize local partnerships. The program should partner with local jurisdictions and other public, private, and nonprofit businesses and organizations, including tribal and regional organizations as appropriate, to promote the voluntary program and assist with program implementation.

(b) The program should use messaging designed to motivate vehicle owners to identify and repair leaks in their vehicles.

(c) The program should make use of incentives as needed to ensure success, to the extent that funding or resources is provided for such purposes.

(d) The program should take steps to address environmental justice and equity issues, such as through outreach to low-income vehicle owners, to vehicle owners who speak languages other than English, and to those who may not be available to participate in the program during normal business hours.

(3) With respect to the scope of the program:

(a) The program should be expanded to all areas of Washington state. Any local jurisdiction should have the opportunity to participate, but should not be required to do so.

(b) The program materials and tool kits should be available and generalized enough to be adaptable to any jurisdiction.

(c) The program should provide technical assistance to local jurisdictions to assist in developing partnerships, offering workshops, and promoting the program.

(d) The program should provide for: Adequate marketing and advertising; public events and workshops; and partnerships with commercial and nonprofit organizations.

(e) The program should include outreach to businesses and owners of fleet vehicles.

(f) The program should utilize an array of media types with accessible communications and various languages.

(g) The program should account for differences in regional needs and not employ a one size-fits-all approach.

(4) In administering the program, the stormwater center may leverage expertise by contracting with nonprofit or for profit trade associations of vehicle repair professionals. The stormwater center should work closely with a statewide steering committee with representatives of: The departments of commerce, ecology, and transportation; local governments holding municipal stormwater permits; local governments that have previously provided oversight for the don't drip and drive program funded at the department of ecology; environmental and environmental justice stakeholders; trade schools and community colleges; and other regional partnerships, with neighboring states or British Columbia, as appropriate.

(5) The program should be designed with goals and objectives and include performance measures to track progress. The program should include regular reporting to the governor and legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. It is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent funding is provided in either the 2020 supplemental omnibus operating budget or the 2020 supplemental transportation budget to Washington State University for the purposes of this bill, the stormwater center utilize funding for the following purposes:

(1) The initial development of a plan for the implementation of a statewide don't drip and drive program; and

(2) The provision of technical assistance and education to local governments, community organizations, and businesses, that are undertaking or seek to potentially undertake behavior change strategies to prevent stormwater pollution from leaking motor vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---