BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall allow all child day care centers until at least August 1, 2024, to comply with any changes made to professional development requirements after the effective date of this section.

(2) For purposes of this section, "professional development requirements" means any professional credentials including academic degrees, coursework, or certificates, attendance at conferences, informal learning, or other education required for licensure by the department.

--- END ---