BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2014 c 140 s 40 (uncodified); and

(2) 2007 c 334 s 4 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---