BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The federal patient protection and affordable care act requires the segregation of premiums charged and collected by a qualified health plan for coverage of abortion services for which federal funding is prohibited;

(b) Washington has achieved full compliance with this requirement by requiring health carriers to submit a single invoice to enrollees and to segregate into a separate account the premium amounts attributable to coverage of abortion services for which federal funding is prohibited;

(c) This approach has eased the administrative burden on enrollees and carriers, decreased costs, and prevented consumer confusion while preserving the constitutionally protected right to safe and legal medical abortion care; and

(d) Section 1303 of the patient protection and affordable care act states that the act does not preempt or otherwise have any effect on state laws regarding the prohibition of, or requirement of, coverage, funding, or procedural requirements on abortions.

(2) The legislature therefore intends to codify the state's current practice of requiring health carriers to bill enrollees with a single invoice and to segregate into a separate account the premium attributable to abortion services for which federal funding is prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

In accordance with RCW 48.43.073 related to requirements for coverage and funding of abortion services, an issuer offering a qualified health plan must:

(1) Bill enrollees and collect payment through a single invoice that includes all benefits and services covered by the qualified health plan; and

(2) Include in the segregation plan required under applicable federal and state law a certification that the issuer's billing and payment processes meet the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---