BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Within existing resources, the health care authority shall develop an addendum to the designated crisis responder statewide protocols adopted pursuant to RCW 71.05.214 in consultation with representatives of designated crisis responders, the department of social and health services, local government, law enforcement, county and city prosecutors, public defenders, and groups concerned with mental illness and substance use disorders. The addendum must update the current protocols to address the implementation of the integration of mental health and substance use disorder treatment systems, to include general processes for referrals and investigations of individuals with substance use disorders and the applicability of commitment criteria to individuals with substance use disorders. The authority shall adopt and submit the addendum to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2019.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.020 and 2018 c 305 s 1, 2018 c 291 s 1, and 2018 c 201 s 3001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "Chemical dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires;

(8) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(9) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(10) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(11) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department under RCW 71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(12) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(13) "Department" means the department of health;

(14) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, an entity appointed by the county, or the behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(15) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(16) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(17) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(18) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(19) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(20) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(21) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(22) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(23) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(24) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court. For purposes of this chapter, at any hearing the petitioner, the respondent, the witnesses, and the presiding judicial officer may be present and participate either in person or by video, as determined by the court. The term "video" as used herein shall include any functional equivalent. At any hearing conducted by video, the technology used must permit the judicial officer, counsel, all parties, and the witnesses to be able to see, hear, and speak, when authorized, during the hearing; to allow attorneys to use exhibits or other materials during the hearing; and to allow respondent's counsel to be in the same location as the respondent unless otherwise requested by the respondent or the respondent's counsel. Witnesses in a proceeding may also appear in court through other means, including telephonically, pursuant to the requirements of superior court civil rule 43. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court, upon its own motion or upon a motion for good cause by any party, may require all parties and witnesses to participate in the hearing in person rather than by video. In ruling on any such motion, the court may allow in-person or video testimony; and the court may consider, among other things, whether the respondent's alleged mental illness affects the respondent's ability to perceive or participate in the proceeding by video;

(25) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(26) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(27) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(28) "Information related to mental health services" means all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;

(29) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(30) "In need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment" means that a person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary behavioral health treatment during the preceding thirty-six months; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, based on a history of nonadherence with treatment or in view of the person's current behavior; (c) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (d) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time;

(31) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(32) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public mental health and substance use disorder service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(33) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585;

(34) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(35) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(36) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(37) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(38) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(39) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery systems or behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW, approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section, and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(40) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(41) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW;

(42) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders;

(43) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, chemical dependency professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(44) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(45) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(46) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(47) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(48) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(49) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(50) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(51) "Secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated persons:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(52) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(54) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(55) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(56) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(57) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department under RCW 71.24.035, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(58) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.050 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the right of any person to apply voluntarily to any public or private agency or practitioner for treatment of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, either by direct application or by referral. Any person voluntarily admitted for inpatient treatment to any public or private agency shall be released immediately upon his or her request. Any person voluntarily admitted for inpatient treatment to any public or private agency shall orally be advised of the right to immediate discharge, and further advised of such rights in writing as are secured to them pursuant to this chapter and their rights of access to attorneys, courts, and other legal redress. Their condition and status shall be reviewed at least once each one hundred eighty days for evaluation as to the need for further treatment or possible discharge, at which time they shall again be advised of their right to discharge upon request.

(2) If the professional staff of any public or private agency or hospital regards a person voluntarily admitted who requests discharge as presenting, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, they may detain such person for sufficient time to notify the designated crisis responder of such person's condition to enable the designated crisis responder to authorize such person being further held in custody or transported to an evaluation and treatment center, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, which shall in ordinary circumstances be no later than the next judicial day.

(3) If a person is brought to the emergency room of a public or private agency or hospital for observation or treatment, the person refuses voluntary admission, and the professional staff of the public or private agency or hospital regard such person as presenting as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or as presenting an imminent danger because of grave disability, they may detain such person for sufficient time to notify the designated crisis responder of such person's condition to enable the designated crisis responder to authorize such person being further held in custody or transported to an evaluation treatment center, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program pursuant to the conditions in this chapter, but which time shall be no more than six hours from the time the professional staff notify the designated crisis responder of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(4) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated crisis responder has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.150 and 2018 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder, substance use disorder, or both presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, or that a person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment; the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention or involuntary outpatient treatment, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section or a petition for involuntary outpatient behavioral health treatment under RCW 71.05.148. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, triage facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2)(a) An order to detain a person with a mental disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, or to detain a person with a substance use disorder to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment period may be issued by a judge of the superior court upon request of a designated crisis responder, subject to (d) of this subsection, whenever it appears to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:

(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is an available secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the person.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.150 and 2018 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder, substance use disorder, or both presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, or that a person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment; the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention or involuntary outpatient treatment, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section or a petition for involuntary outpatient behavioral health treatment under RCW 71.05.148. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, triage facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2)(a) An order to detain a person with a mental disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, or to detain a person with a substance use disorder to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment period may be issued by a judge of the superior court upon request of a designated crisis responder whenever it appears to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:

(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.153 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of substance use disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken, into emergency custody in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180, if a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is available and has adequate space for the person.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, a peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(i) Pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or

(ii) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(b) A peace officer's delivery of a person, based on a substance use disorder, to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is subject to the availability of a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(4) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (3) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(5) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the mental health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated mental health professional has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.05.153 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of substance use disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken, into emergency custody in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(3) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or

(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(4) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (3) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(5) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the mental health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated mental health professional has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.05.210 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a chemical dependency professional instead of a mental health professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however, a person may only be referred to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.05.210 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a chemical dependency professional instead of a mental health professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.05.220 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 229 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time a person is involuntarily admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the professional person in charge or his or her designee shall take reasonable precautions to inventory and safeguard the personal property of the person detained. A copy of the inventory, signed by the staff member making it, shall be given to the person detained and shall, in addition, be open to inspection to any responsible relative, subject to limitations, if any, specifically imposed by the detained person. For purposes of this section, "responsible relative" includes the guardian, conservator, attorney, spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person. The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any other person without the consent of the patient or order of the court.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.240 and 2018 c 291 s 7 and 2018 c 201 s 3009 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the initial detention of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180, or at a time determined under RCW 71.05.148. If requested by the person or his or her attorney, the hearing may be postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in RCW 71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department.

(b) Commitment for up to fourteen days based on a substance use disorder must be to either a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. A court may only enter a commitment order based on a substance use disorder if there is an available secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for not to exceed ninety days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm or grave disability, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment not to exceed ninety days.

(4) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(5) The court shall specifically state to such person and give such person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also state to the person and provide written notice that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.05.240 and 2018 c 291 s 8 and 2018 c 201 s 3010 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the initial detention of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180, or at a time determined under RCW 71.05.148. If requested by the person or his or her attorney, the hearing may be postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in RCW 71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department.

(b) Commitment for up to fourteen days based on a substance use disorder must be to either a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for not to exceed ninety days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm or grave disability, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment not to exceed ninety days.

(4) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(5) The court shall specifically state to such person and give such person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also state to the person and provide written notice that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

Sec. 13. RCW 71.05.360 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol license if the person is committed under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320 for mental health treatment.

(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental illness or substance use disorders. Competency shall not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 or 11.88 RCW.

(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following evaluation or treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder shall be given a written statement setting forth the substance of this section.

(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment.

(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.

(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.

(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where the person is detained that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within seventy-two hours of the initial detention:

(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental disorder or substance use disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is gravely disabled;

(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent; and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;

(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;

(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause hearing; and

(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to the probable cause hearing.

(6) When proceedings are initiated under RCW 71.05.153, no later than twelve hours after such person is admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program the personnel of the facility or the designated crisis responder shall serve on such person a copy of the petition for initial detention and the name, business address, and phone number of the designated attorney and shall forthwith commence service of a copy of the petition for initial detention on the designated attorney.

(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.

(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:

(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;

(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;

(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;

(d) To remain silent;

(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.

(9) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.

The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.

(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:

(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment program;

(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;

(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217 or pursuant to an administrative hearing under RCW 71.05.215;

(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217;

(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;

(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue.

(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court. If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to assist him or her.

(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her attorney shall have the right to designate and have the court appoint a reasonably available independent physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person to examine the person detained, the results of which examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert examination, otherwise such expert examination shall be at public expense.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.

(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from confinement.

(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.

Sec. 14. RCW 71.05.590 and 2018 c 291 s 9 and 2018 c 201 s 3026 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release order, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the court order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer appropriate incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be made to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the agency or facility in requesting this hearing and issuing an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To cause the person to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the agency or facility monitoring or providing services under the court order, or to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, or to an evaluation and treatment facility if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility with available space or an approved substance use disorder treatment program with available space if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment. The person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the purpose of an evaluation to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when in the clinical judgment of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services temporary detention is appropriate. This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section or, if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, initiate initial inpatient detention procedures under subsection (6) of this section.

(3) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(4)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care order a person subject to a court order under this chapter to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment and has adequate space. Proceedings under this subsection (4) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a person detained under this subsection (4) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The person has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the court order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period may be for no longer than the period authorized in the original court order. A court may not issue an order to detain a person for inpatient treatment in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program under this subsection unless there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and with adequate space for the person.

(5) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(6)(a) If the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, a designated crisis responder may initiate inpatient detention procedures under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 when appropriate. A designated crisis responder or the secretary may, upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care to a person subject to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.320 subsequent to an order for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment entered under RCW 71.05.148, order the person to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention for inpatient evaluation in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection may be held for evaluation for up to seventy-two hours, excluding weekends and holidays, pending a court hearing. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within seventy-two hours of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The issues for the court to determine are whether to continue the detention of the person for inpatient treatment or whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. To continue detention after the seventy-two hour period, the court must find that the person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, that no such alternatives are in the best interest of the person or others.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person for inpatient treatment in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder program under this subsection unless there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and with adequate space for the person.

Sec. 15. RCW 71.05.590 and 2018 c 291 s 10 and 2018 c 201 s 3027 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release order, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the court order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer appropriate incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be made to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the agency or facility in requesting this hearing and issuing an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To cause the person to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the agency or facility monitoring or providing services under the court order, or to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, or to an evaluation and treatment facility if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment. The person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the purpose of an evaluation to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when in the clinical judgment of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services temporary detention is appropriate. This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section or, if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, initial inpatient detention procedures under subsection (6) of this section.

(3) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(4)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care order a person subject to a court order under this chapter to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection (4) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a person detained under this subsection (4) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The person has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the court order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period may be for no longer than the period authorized in the original court order.

(5) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(6)(a) If the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment as defined in RCW 71.05.020, a designated crisis responder may initiate inpatient detention procedures under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 when appropriate. A designated crisis responder or the secretary may, upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care to a person subject to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.320 subsequent to an order for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment entered under RCW 71.05.148, order the person to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention for inpatient evaluation in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection may be held for evaluation for up to seventy-two hours, excluding weekends and holidays, pending a court hearing. The designated crisis responder or the secretary may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The issues for the court to determine are whether to continue the detention of the person for inpatient treatment or whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. To continue detention after the seventy-two hour period, the court must find that the person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, that no such alternatives are in the best interest of the person or others.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person for inpatient treatment in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder program under this subsection unless there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and with adequate space for the person.

Sec. 16. RCW 71.05.760 and 2018 c 201 s 3035 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) By April 1, 2018, the authority, by rule, must combine the functions of a designated mental health professional and designated chemical dependency specialist by establishing a designated crisis responder who is authorized to conduct investigations, detain persons up to seventy-two hours to the proper facility, and carry out the other functions identified in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health organizations shall provide training to the designated crisis responders as required by the authority.

(b)(i) To qualify as a designated crisis responder, a person must have received chemical dependency training as determined by the department and be a:

(A) Psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker;

(B) Person who is licensed by the department as a mental health counselor or mental health counselor associate, or marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist associate;

(C) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university and who have, in addition, at least two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental health professional;

(D) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which waiver was granted before 1986;

(E) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a mental health professional that was requested by the regional support network and granted by the department of social and health services before July 1, 2001; or

(F) Person who has been granted an exception of the minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

(ii) Training must include chemical dependency training specific to the duties of a designated crisis responder, including diagnosis of substance abuse and dependence and assessment of risk associated with substance use.

(c) The authority must develop a transition process for any person who has been designated as a designated mental health professional or a designated chemical dependency specialist before April 1, 2018, to be converted to a designated crisis responder. The behavioral health organizations shall provide training, as required by the authority, to persons converting to designated crisis responders, which must include both mental health and chemical dependency training applicable to the designated crisis responder role.

(2)(a) The authority must ensure that at least one sixteen-bed secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility is operational by April 1, 2018, and that at least two sixteen-bed secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facilities are operational by April 1, 2019.

(b) If, at any time during the implementation of secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility capacity, federal funding becomes unavailable for federal match for services provided in secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facilities, then the authority must cease any expansion of secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facilities until further direction is provided by the legislature.

Sec. 17. RCW 71.05.190 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 220 are each amended to read as follows:

If the person is not approved for admission by a facility providing seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment, and the individual has not been arrested, the facility shall furnish transportation, if not otherwise available, for the person to his or her place of residence or other appropriate place. If the individual has been arrested, the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program shall detain the individual for not more than eight hours at the request of the peace officer. The facility shall make reasonable attempts to contact the requesting peace officer during this time to inform the peace officer that the person is not approved for admission in order to enable a peace officer to return to the facility and take the individual back into custody.

Sec. 18. RCW 71.05.180 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 219 are each amended to read as follows:

If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the person, it may detain him or her for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of acceptance as set forth in RCW 71.05.170. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays.

Sec. 19. RCW 71.05.160 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

Any facility receiving a person pursuant to RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 shall require the designated crisis responder to prepare a petition for initial detention stating the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and stating that there is evidence, as a result of his or her personal observation or investigation, that the actions of the person for which application is made constitute a likelihood of serious harm, or that he or she is gravely disabled, and stating the specific facts known to him or her as a result of his or her personal observation or investigation, upon which he or she bases the belief that such person should be detained for the purposes and under the authority of this chapter.

If a person is involuntarily placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program pursuant to RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153, on the next judicial day following the initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall file with the court and serve the designated attorney of the detained person the petition or supplemental petition for initial detention, proof of service of notice, and a copy of a notice of emergency detention.

Sec. 20. RCW 71.05.157 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder is notified by a jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge review under RCW 71.05.232 is to be released to the community, the designated crisis responder shall evaluate the person within seventy-two hours of release.

(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the designated crisis responder and the department of corrections of the violation and request an evaluation for purposes of revocation of the less restrictive alternative.

(3) When a designated crisis responder becomes aware that an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community and the supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of a treatment order or a condition of supervision that relates to public safety, or the designated crisis responder detains a person under this chapter, the designated crisis responder shall notify the person's treatment provider and the department of corrections.

(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections and the department of corrections shall provide documentation of its risk assessment or other concerns to the petitioner and the court if the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or high needs offender.

(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment provider or designated crisis responder to provide offender supervision.

(6) No jail or state correctional facility may be considered a less restrictive alternative to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

Sec. 21. RCW 71.05.148 and 2018 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

This section establishes a process for initial evaluation and filing of a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, but however does not preclude the filing of a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment following a period of inpatient detention in appropriate circumstances:

(1) The designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at a mental health facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2) The designated crisis responder must investigate and evaluate the specific facts alleged and the reliability or credibility of any person providing information. The designated crisis responder may spend up to forty-eight hours to complete the investigation, provided that the person may not be held for investigation for any period except as authorized by RCW 71.05.050 or 71.05.153.

(3) If the designated crisis responder finds that the person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, they may file a petition requesting the court to enter an order for up to ninety days (([of]))of less restrictive alternative treatment. The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and stating that there is evidence, as a result of the designated crisis responder's personal observation or investigation, that the person is in need of assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment, and stating the specific facts known as a result of personal observation or investigation, upon which the designated crisis responder bases this belief;

(b) The declaration of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment;

(c) A designation of retained counsel for the person or, if counsel is appointed, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person;

(d) The name of an agency or facility which agreed to assume the responsibility of providing less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court;

(e) A summons to appear in court at a specific time and place within five judicial days for a probable cause hearing, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) If the person is in the custody of jail or prison at the time of the investigation, a petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment may be used to facilitate continuity of care after release from custody or the diversion of criminal charges as follows:

(a) If the petition is filed in anticipation of the person's release from custody, the summons may be for a date up to five judicial days following the person's anticipated release date, provided that a clear time and place for the hearing is provided; or

(b) The hearing may be held prior to the person's release from custody, provided that (i) the filing of the petition does not extend the time the person would otherwise spend in the custody of jail or prison; (ii) the charges or custody of the person is not a pretext to detain the person for the purpose of the involuntary commitment hearing; and (iii) the person's release from custody must be expected to swiftly follow the adjudication of the petition. In this circumstance, the time for hearing is shortened to three judicial days after the filing of the petition.

(5) The petition must be served upon the person and the person's counsel with a notice of applicable rights. Proof of service must be filed with the court.

(6) A petition for assisted outpatient behavioral health treatment filed under this section must be adjudicated under RCW 71.05.240.

Sec. 22. RCW 71.05.120 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 208 and 2016 c 158 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) No officer of a public or private agency, nor the superintendent, professional person in charge, his or her professional designee, or attending staff of any such agency, nor any public official performing functions necessary to the administration of this chapter, nor peace officer responsible for detaining a person pursuant to this chapter, nor any designated crisis responder, nor the state, a unit of local government, an evaluation and treatment facility, a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program shall be civilly or criminally liable for performing duties pursuant to this chapter with regard to the decision of whether to admit, discharge, release, administer antipsychotic medications, or detain a person for evaluation and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were performed in good faith and without gross negligence.

(2) Peace officers and their employing agencies are not liable for the referral of a person, or the failure to refer a person, to a mental health agency pursuant to a policy adopted pursuant to RCW 71.05.457 if such action or inaction is taken in good faith and without gross negligence.

(3) This section does not relieve a person from giving the required notices under RCW 71.05.330(2) or 71.05.340(1)(b), or the duty to warn or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior where the patient has communicated an actual threat of physical violence against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims. The duty to warn or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior is discharged if reasonable efforts are made to communicate the threat to the victim or victims and to law enforcement personnel.

Sec. 23. RCW 71.24.037 and 2018 c 201 s 4005 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall by rule establish state minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers and services, whether those service providers and services are licensed or certified to provide solely mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, or services to persons with co-occurring disorders.

(2) Minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers shall, at a minimum, establish: Qualifications for staff providing services directly to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, the intended result of each service, and the rights and responsibilities of persons receiving behavioral health services pursuant to this chapter. The secretary shall provide for deeming of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers as meeting state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department.

(3) Minimum standards for community support services and resource management services shall include at least qualifications for resource management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of patient information between behavioral health service providers.

(4) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this chapter. RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of a license or certification denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(5) No licensed or certified behavioral health service provider may advertise or represent itself as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider if approval has not been granted, has been denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(6) Licensure or certification as a behavioral health service provider is effective for one calendar year from the date of issuance of the license or certification. The license or certification must specify the types of services provided by the behavioral health service provider that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(7) Licensure or certification as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider must specify the types of services provided that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(8) The department shall develop a process by which a provider may obtain dual licensure as an evaluation and treatment facility and secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility.

(9) Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may not provide types of services for which the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider has not been certified. Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending, if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.

(((9)))(10) The department periodically shall inspect licensed or certified behavioral health service providers at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

(((10)))(11) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and accounts of, any licensed or certified behavioral health service provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of this chapter.

(((11)))(12) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a current list of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers.

(((12)))(13) Each licensed or certified behavioral health service provider shall file with the department or the authority upon request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department or the authority reasonably requires. A licensed or certified behavioral health service provider that without good cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may have its license or certification revoked or suspended.

(((13)))(14) The authority shall use the data provided in subsection (((12)))(13) of this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient substance use disorder treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation must be done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the authority shall randomly select and review the information on individual children who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into substance use disorder treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and the outcome of the child's treatment.

(((14)))(15) Any settlement agreement entered into between the department and licensed or certified behavioral health service providers to resolve administrative complaints, license or certification violations, license or certification suspensions, or license or certification revocations may not reduce the number of violations reported by the department unless the department concludes, based on evidence gathered by inspectors, that the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider did not commit one or more of the violations.

(((15)))(16) In cases in which a behavioral health service provider that is in violation of licensing or certification standards attempts to transfer or sell the behavioral health service provider to a family member, the transfer or sale may only be made for the purpose of remedying license or certification violations and achieving full compliance with the terms of the license or certification. Transfers or sales to family members are prohibited in cases in which the purpose of the transfer or sale is to avoid liability or reset the number of license or certification violations found before the transfer or sale. If the department finds that the owner intends to transfer or sell, or has completed the transfer or sale of, ownership of the behavioral health service provider to a family member solely for the purpose of resetting the number of violations found before the transfer or sale, the department may not renew the behavioral health service provider's license or certification or issue a new license or certification to the behavioral health service provider.

Sec. 24. RCW 71.34.020 and 2018 c 201 s 5002 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(2) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Chemical dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.

(5) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(9) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a person designated by a behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter.

(11) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(12) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately-operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(18) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(19) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(20) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a handicap, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(21) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(22) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(23) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(24) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified service providers as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(25) "Parent" means:

(a) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the child, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement; or

(b) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(26) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(27) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(28) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(29) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(30) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(31) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(32) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(33) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(34) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(35) "Secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated minors:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the minor;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(36) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(37) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(38) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

Sec. 25. RCW 71.34.375 and 2018 c 201 s 5005 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a parent or guardian, for the purpose of mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, or evaluation, brings his or her minor child to an evaluation and treatment facility, a hospital emergency room, an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 72.23 RCW, an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW operating inpatient psychiatric beds for minors, a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility is required to promptly provide written and verbal notice of all statutorily available treatment options contained in this chapter. The notice need not be given more than once if written and verbal notice has already been provided and documented by the facility.

(2) The provision of notice must be documented by the facilities required to give notice under subsection (1) of this section and must be accompanied by a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the parent or guardian. The notice must contain the following information:

(a) All current statutorily available treatment options including but not limited to those provided in this chapter; and

(b) The procedures to be followed to utilize the treatment options described in this chapter.

(3) The department of health shall produce, and make available, the written notification that must include, at a minimum, the information contained in subsection (2) of this section. The department of health must revise the written notification as necessary to reflect changes in the law.

Sec. 26. RCW 71.05.435 and 2018 c 201 s 3020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a person who is the subject of an involuntary commitment order under this chapter is discharged from an evaluation and treatment facility, state hospital, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing involuntary treatment services, the entity discharging the person shall provide notice of the person's discharge to the designated crisis responder office responsible for the initial commitment and the designated crisis responder office that serves the county in which the person is expected to reside. The entity discharging the person must also provide these offices with a copy of any less restrictive order or conditional release order entered in conjunction with the discharge of the person, unless the entity discharging the person has entered into a memorandum of understanding obligating another entity to provide these documents.

(2) The notice and documents referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be provided as soon as possible and no later than one business day following the discharge of the person. Notice is not required under this section if the discharge is for the purpose of transferring the person for continued detention and treatment under this chapter at another treatment facility.

(3) The authority shall maintain and make available an updated list of contact information for designated crisis responder offices around the state.

Sec. 27. RCW 71.34.410 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 259 are each amended to read as follows:

No public or private agency or governmental entity, nor officer of a public or private agency, nor the superintendent, or professional person in charge, his or her professional designee or attending staff of any such agency, nor any public official performing functions necessary to the administration of this chapter, nor peace officer responsible for detaining a person under this chapter, nor any designated crisis responder, nor professional person, nor evaluation and treatment facility, nor secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, nor approved substance use disorder treatment program shall be civilly or criminally liable for performing actions authorized in this chapter with regard to the decision of whether to admit, release, or detain a person for evaluation and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were performed in good faith and without gross negligence.

Sec. 28. RCW 71.34.600 and 2018 c 201 s 5013 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her minor child to:

(a) An evaluation and treatment facility or an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW and request that the professional person examine the minor to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment; or

(b) A secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program and request that a substance use disorder assessment be conducted by a professional person to determine whether the minor has a substance use disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment.

(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission, evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the facility.

(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate whether the minor has a mental disorder or has a substance use disorder. The evaluation shall be completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to the facility, unless the professional person determines that the condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the authority if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.

(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under the provisions of this section except that no provider may refuse to treat a minor under the provisions of this section solely on the basis that the minor has not consented to the treatment. No provider may admit a minor to treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.

(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.

(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.610, the professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to petition superior court for release from the facility.

(7) For the purposes of this section "professional person" means "professional person" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

Sec. 29. RCW 71.34.660 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 266 are each amended to read as follows:

A minor child shall have no cause of action against an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, inpatient facility, or provider of outpatient mental health treatment or outpatient substance use disorder treatment for admitting or accepting the minor in good faith for evaluation or treatment under RCW 71.34.600 or 71.34.650 based solely upon the fact that the minor did not consent to evaluation or treatment if the minor's parent has consented to the evaluation or treatment.

Sec. 30. RCW 71.34.700 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a minor, thirteen years or older, is brought to an evaluation and treatment facility or hospital emergency room for immediate mental health services, the professional person in charge of the facility shall evaluate the minor's mental condition, determine whether the minor suffers from a mental disorder, and whether the minor is in need of immediate inpatient treatment.

(2) If a minor, thirteen years or older, is brought to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility with available space, or a hospital emergency room for immediate substance use disorder treatment, the professional person in charge of the facility shall evaluate the minor's condition, determine whether the minor suffers from substance use disorder, and whether the minor is in need of immediate inpatient treatment.

(3) If it is determined under subsection (1) or (2) of this section that the minor suffers from a mental disorder or substance use disorder, inpatient treatment is required, the minor is unwilling to consent to voluntary admission, and the professional person believes that the minor meets the criteria for initial detention set forth herein, the facility may detain or arrange for the detention of the minor for up to twelve hours in order to enable a designated crisis responder to evaluate the minor and commence initial detention proceedings under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 31. RCW 71.34.700 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 268 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a minor, thirteen years or older, is brought to an evaluation and treatment facility or hospital emergency room for immediate mental health services, the professional person in charge of the facility shall evaluate the minor's mental condition, determine whether the minor suffers from a mental disorder, and whether the minor is in need of immediate inpatient treatment.

(2) If a minor, thirteen years or older, is brought to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or a hospital emergency room for immediate substance use disorder treatment, the professional person in charge of the facility shall evaluate the minor's condition, determine whether the minor suffers from substance use disorder, and whether the minor is in need of immediate inpatient treatment.

(3) If it is determined under subsection (1) or (2) of this section that the minor suffers from a mental disorder or substance use disorder, inpatient treatment is required, the minor is unwilling to consent to voluntary admission, and the professional person believes that the minor meets the criteria for initial detention set forth herein, the facility may detain or arrange for the detention of the minor for up to twelve hours in order to enable a designated crisis responder to evaluate the minor and commence initial detention proceedings under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 32. RCW 71.34.710 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 269 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) When a designated crisis responder receives information that a minor, thirteen years or older, as a result of a mental disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility providing inpatient treatment.

(ii) When a designated crisis responder receives information that a minor, thirteen years or older, as a result of substance use disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody and transported to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, if a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is available and has adequate space for the minor.

(b) If the minor is not taken into custody for evaluation and treatment, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by the designated crisis responder in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the designated crisis responder's report or notes.

(2) Within twelve hours of the minor's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve on the minor a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the minor's parent and the minor's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(3) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the minor both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the minor's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the minor for further treatment.

The minor shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the minor is indigent.

(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of a minor under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within twenty-four hours of the minor's arrival, the facility must evaluate the minor's condition and either admit or release the minor in accordance with this chapter.

(5) A designated crisis responder may not petition for detention of a minor to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the minor.

(6) If a minor is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the minor as necessary.

Sec. 33. RCW 71.34.710 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 270 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) When a designated crisis responder receives information that a minor, thirteen years or older, as a result of a mental disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility providing inpatient treatment.

(ii) When a designated crisis responder receives information that a minor, thirteen years or older, as a result of substance use disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody and transported to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(b) If the minor is not taken into custody for evaluation and treatment, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by the designated crisis responder in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the designated crisis responder's report or notes.

(2) Within twelve hours of the minor's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve on the minor a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the minor's parent and the minor's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(3) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the minor both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the minor's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the minor for further treatment.

The minor shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the minor is indigent.

(4) Whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of a minor under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within twenty-four hours of the minor's arrival, the facility must evaluate the minor's condition and either admit or release the minor in accordance with this chapter.

(5) If a minor is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the minor as necessary.

Sec. 34. RCW 71.34.720 and 2018 c 201 s 5017 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a chemical dependency professional, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program or, if detained to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however a minor may only be referred to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the minor.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 35. RCW 71.34.720 and 2018 c 201 s 5018 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a chemical dependency professional, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment program or, if detained to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 36. RCW 71.34.730 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 273 and 2016 c 155 s 20 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The professional person in charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where a minor has been admitted involuntarily for the initial seventy-two hour treatment period under this chapter may petition to have a minor committed to an evaluation and treatment facility or, in the case of a minor with a substance use disorder, to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for fourteen-day diagnosis, evaluation, and treatment.

If the professional person in charge of the facility does not petition to have the minor committed, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the treatment and evaluation facility's report.

(2) A petition for commitment of a minor under this section shall be filed with the superior court in the county where the minor is residing or being detained.

(a) A petition for a fourteen-day commitment shall be signed by: (i) Two physicians; (ii) one physician and a mental health professional; (iii) one physician assistant and a mental health professional; or (iv) one psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner and a mental health professional. The person signing the petition must have examined the minor, and the petition must contain the following:

(A) The name and address of the petitioner;

(B) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for fourteen-day commitment;

(C) The name, telephone number, and address if known of every person believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the minor;

(D) A statement that the petitioner has examined the minor and finds that the minor's condition meets required criteria for fourteen-day commitment and the supporting facts therefor;

(E) A statement that the minor has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment but has been unwilling or unable to consent to necessary treatment;

(F) If the petition is for mental health treatment, a statement that the minor has been advised of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed;

(G) A statement recommending the appropriate facility or facilities to provide the necessary treatment; and

(H) A statement concerning whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(b) A copy of the petition shall be personally delivered to the minor by the petitioner or petitioner's designee. A copy of the petition shall be sent to the minor's attorney and the minor's parent.

Sec. 37. RCW 71.34.740 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 274 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A commitment hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the minor's admission, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays, unless a continuance is requested by the minor or the minor's attorney.

(2) The commitment hearing shall be conducted at the superior court or an appropriate place at the facility in which the minor is being detained.

(3) At the commitment hearing, the evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor.

(4) The minor shall be present at the commitment hearing unless the minor, with the assistance of the minor's attorney, waives the right to be present at the hearing.

(5) If the parents are opposed to the petition, they may be represented at the hearing and shall be entitled to court-appointed counsel if they are indigent.

(6) At the commitment hearing, the minor shall have the following rights:

(a) To be represented by an attorney;

(b) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;

(c) To question persons testifying in support of the petition.

(7) If the hearing is for commitment for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the commitment hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the minor both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.34.730 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the minor is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(8) If the minor has received medication within twenty-four hours of the hearing, the court shall be informed of that fact and of the probable effects of the medication.

(9) Rules of evidence shall not apply in fourteen-day commitment hearings.

(10) For a fourteen-day commitment, the court must find by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The minor has a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled;

(b) The minor is in need of evaluation and treatment of the type provided by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program to which continued inpatient care is sought or is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment found to be in the best interests of the minor;

(c) The minor is unwilling or unable in good faith to consent to voluntary treatment; and

(d) If commitment is for a substance use disorder, there is an available secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the minor.

(11) If the court finds that the minor meets the criteria for a fourteen-day commitment, the court shall either authorize commitment of the minor for inpatient treatment or for less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as are necessary. If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for a fourteen-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(12) Nothing in this section prohibits the professional person in charge of the facility from releasing the minor at any time, when, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, further inpatient treatment is no longer necessary. The release may be subject to reasonable conditions if appropriate.

Whenever a minor is released under this section, the professional person in charge shall within three days, notify the court in writing of the release.

(13) A minor who has been committed for fourteen days shall be released at the end of that period unless a petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment is pending before the court.

Sec. 38. RCW 71.34.740 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 275 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A commitment hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the minor's admission, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays, unless a continuance is requested by the minor or the minor's attorney.

(2) The commitment hearing shall be conducted at the superior court or an appropriate place at the facility in which the minor is being detained.

(3) At the commitment hearing, the evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor.

(4) The minor shall be present at the commitment hearing unless the minor, with the assistance of the minor's attorney, waives the right to be present at the hearing.

(5) If the parents are opposed to the petition, they may be represented at the hearing and shall be entitled to court-appointed counsel if they are indigent.

(6) At the commitment hearing, the minor shall have the following rights:

(a) To be represented by an attorney;

(b) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;

(c) To question persons testifying in support of the petition.

(7) If the hearing is for commitment for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the commitment hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the minor both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.34.730 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the minor is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(8) If the minor has received medication within twenty-four hours of the hearing, the court shall be informed of that fact and of the probable effects of the medication.

(9) Rules of evidence shall not apply in fourteen-day commitment hearings.

(10) For a fourteen-day commitment, the court must find by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The minor has a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled;

(b) The minor is in need of evaluation and treatment of the type provided by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program to which continued inpatient care is sought or is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment found to be in the best interests of the minor; and

(c) The minor is unwilling or unable in good faith to consent to voluntary treatment.

(11) If the court finds that the minor meets the criteria for a fourteen-day commitment, the court shall either authorize commitment of the minor for inpatient treatment or for less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as are necessary. If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for a fourteen-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(12) Nothing in this section prohibits the professional person in charge of the facility from releasing the minor at any time, when, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, further inpatient treatment is no longer necessary. The release may be subject to reasonable conditions if appropriate.

Whenever a minor is released under this section, the professional person in charge shall within three days, notify the court in writing of the release.

(13) A minor who has been committed for fourteen days shall be released at the end of that period unless a petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment is pending before the court.

Sec. 39. RCW 71.34.750 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 276 and 2016 c 155 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist(([,])), a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment:

(a) The court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(i) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(ii) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(iii) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(b) If commitment is for a substance use disorder, the court must find that there is an available approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the secretary for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

Sec. 40. RCW 71.34.750 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 277 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist(([,])), a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment, the court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(a) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(b) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(c) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the secretary for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

Sec. 41. RCW 71.34.780 and 2018 c 201 s 5020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor, if committed for mental health treatment, be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility or, if committed for substance use disorder treatment, be taken into custody and transported to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor.

(2) The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, with the court in the county ordering the less restrictive alternative treatment. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release may be filed with the court in the county ordering inpatient treatment or the county where the minor on conditional release is residing. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. Upon motion for good cause, the hearing may be transferred to the county of the minor's residence or to the county in which the alleged violations occurred. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or, subject to subsection (4) of this section, whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

(4) A court may not order the return of a minor to inpatient treatment in a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available with adequate space for the minor.

Sec. 42. RCW 71.34.780 and 2018 c 201 s 5021 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor, if committed for mental health treatment, be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility or, if committed for substance use disorder treatment, be taken into custody and transported to a secure ((detoxification))withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2) The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, with the court in the county ordering the less restrictive alternative treatment. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release may be filed with the court in the county ordering inpatient treatment or the county where the minor on conditional release is residing. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. Upon motion for good cause, the hearing may be transferred to the county of the minor's residence or to the county in which the alleged violations occurred. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43. Sections 4, 6, 8, 11, 14, 30, 32, 34, 37, 39, and 41 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44. Sections 5, 7, 9, 12, 15, 31, 33, 35, 38, 40, and 42 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

--- END ---