BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

CHILD SUPPORT GUIDELINES

Sec. 1. RCW 26.19.025 and 2011 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in 2011 and every four years thereafter, the division of child support shall convene a work group to review the child support guidelines and the child support review report ((prepared under RCW 26.19.026 and 26.18.210))described in subsection (7) of this section, consider the data required under subsection (8) of this section, and determine if the application of the child support guidelines results in appropriate support orders. Membership of the work group shall be determined as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) The governor, in consultation with the division of child support, shall appoint the following members:

(i) The director of the division of child support;

(ii) A professor of law specializing in family law;

(iii) A representative from the Washington state bar association's family law executive committee;

(iv) An economist;

(v) A representative of the tribal community;

(vi) Two representatives from the superior court judges' association, including a superior court judge and a court commissioner who is familiar with child support issues;

(vii) A representative from the administrative office of the courts;

(viii) A prosecutor appointed by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(ix) A representative from legal services;

(x) Three noncustodial parents, each of whom may be a representative of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual, with at least one representing the interests of low-income, noncustodial parents;

(xi) Three custodial parents, each of whom may be a representative of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual, with at least one representing the interests of low-income, custodial parents; and

(xii) An administrative law judge appointed by the office of administrative hearings.

(2) Appointments to the work group shall be made by December 1, 2010, and every four years thereafter. The governor shall appoint the chair from among the work group membership.

(3) The division of child support shall provide staff support to the work group, and shall carefully consider all input received from interested organizations and individuals during the review process.

(4) The work group may form an executive committee, create subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other procedures, as needed, for operation of the work group.

(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) By October 1, 2011, and every four years thereafter, the work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature, including recommendations for legislative action, if necessary.

(7) The division of child support must prepare a child support review report for the use of each quadrennial work group. This report, along with the data described in subsection (8) of this section, must be used in the review of the child support guidelines to ensure that deviations from the guidelines are limited and guideline amounts are appropriate based on criteria established by the division of child support, as directed by relevant state and federal law.

(8) During the quadrennial review, the data considered by the work group must include:

(a) Economic data on the cost of raising children; labor market data by occupation and skill level for the state and local job markets including, but not limited to, unemployment rates, employment rates, hours worked, and earnings; the impact of the guidelines' policies and amounts on parents who have family incomes below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level; and factors that influence employment rates and compliance with child support orders among parents who are obligated to pay support; and

(b) Case data, gathered through sampling or other methods, on the application of, and deviations from, the child support guidelines, as well as the rates of default and imputed child support orders and orders determined using the low-income adjustment. The analysis must also include a comparison of payments on child support orders by case characteristics, including whether the order was entered by default, based on imputed income, or determined using the low-income adjustment.

PART II

CRITERIA FOR MODIFICATION OR ADJUSTMENT OF CHILD SUPPORT ORDERS

Sec. 2. RCW 26.09.170 and 2010 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.09.070(7), the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing subsequent to the petition for modification or motion for adjustment except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing the adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in this section, only upon a showing of a substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to property disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under the laws of this state.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving maintenance or registration of a new domestic partnership of the party receiving maintenance.

(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the child or by the death of the parent obligated to support the child.

(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or a court of comparable jurisdiction, provisions for the support of a child are terminated upon the marriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of parties to a paternity order, or upon the remarriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of parties to a decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the order, including provisions establishing paternity, remain in effect.

(5)(a) A party to an order of child support may petition for a modification based upon a showing of substantially changed circumstances at any time.

(b) An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances.

(6) An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been entered without a showing of substantially changed circumstances:

(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or the child;

(b) ((If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support which was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age category on which the current support amount was based;

(c))) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete high school; or

(((d)))(c) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent with RCW 26.09.100.

(7)(a) If twenty-four months have passed from the date of the entry of the order or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is later, the order may be adjusted without a showing of substantially changed circumstances based upon:

(i) Changes in the income of the parents; or

(ii) Changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19 RCW.

(b) Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and child support worksheets.

(c) If the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation pursuant to this subsection by more than thirty percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the court may implement the change in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before a motion for another adjustment under this subsection may be filed.

(8)(a) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support if public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child and the department has determined that the child support order is at least ((twenty-five))fifteen percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 ((and reasons for the deviation are not set forth in the findings of fact or order)).

(b) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case if:

(i) The department has determined that the child support order is at least ((twenty-five))fifteen percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011;

(ii) The department has determined the case meets the department's review criteria; and

(iii) A party to the order or another state or jurisdiction has requested a review.

(c) If incarceration of the parent who is obligated to pay support is the basis for the difference between the existing child support order amount and the proposed amount of support determined as a result of a review, the department may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support even if:

(i) There is no other change of circumstances; and

(ii) The change in support does not meet the fifteen percent threshold.

(d) The determination of ((twenty-five percent or more shall))whether the child support order is at least fifteen percent above or below the appropriate child support amount must be based on the current income of the parties ((and the department shall not be required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order)).

(9) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support under subsections (5) through (7) of this section if:

(a) Public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child;

(b) A party to the order in a nonassistance case has requested a review; or

(c) Another state or jurisdiction has requested a modification of the order.

(10) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any proceeding under this section, a court of this state shall permit a party or witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good cause is shown.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.20A.059 and 2018 c 150 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, the physical custodian, or the responsible parent may petition for a prospective modification of a final administrative order if:

(a) The administrative order has not been superseded by a superior court order; and

(b) There has been a substantial change of circumstances, except as provided under RCW 74.20A.055(4)(d) or subsection (2) of this section.

(2) An order of child support may be modified at any time without a showing of substantially changed circumstances if incarceration of the parent who is obligated to pay support is the basis for the inconsistency between the existing child support order amount and the amount of support determined as a result of a review.

(3) An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of circumstances:

(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or the child; or

(b) ((If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support that was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age category on which the current support amount was based; or

(c))) If a child is a full-time student and reasonably expected to complete secondary school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training before the child becomes nineteen years of age upon a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday.

(((3)))(4) An order may be modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is to:

(a) Require medical support under RCW 26.09.105 for a child covered by the order; or

(b) Modify an existing order for health care coverage.

(((4)))(5) Support orders may be adjusted once every twenty-four months based upon changes in the income of the parents without a showing of substantially changed circumstances.

(((5)))(6)(a) All administrative orders entered on, before, or after September 1, 1991, may be modified based upon changes in the child support schedule established in chapter 26.19 RCW without a substantial change of circumstances. The petition may be filed based on changes in the child support schedule after twelve months has expired from the entry of the administrative order or the most recent modification order setting child support, whichever is later. However, if a party is granted relief under this provision, twenty-four months must pass before another petition for modification may be filed pursuant to subsection (((4)))(5) of this section.

(b) If, pursuant to subsection (((4)))(5) of this section or (a) of this subsection, the order modifies a child support obligation by more than thirty percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the change may be implemented in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before a petition for modification under subsection (((4)))(5) of this section may be filed.

(((6)))(7) An increase in the wage or salary of the parent or custodian who is receiving the support transfer payments is not a substantial change in circumstances for purposes of modification under subsection (1)(b) of this section. An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances.

(((7)))(8) The department shall file the petition and a supporting affidavit with the secretary or the secretary's designee when the department petitions for modification.

(((8)))(9) The responsible parent or the physical custodian shall follow the procedures in this chapter for filing an application for an adjudicative proceeding to petition for modification.

(((9)))(10) Upon the filing of a proper petition or application, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall issue an order directing each party to appear and show cause why the order should not be modified.

(((10)))(11) If the presiding or reviewing officer finds a modification is appropriate, the officer shall modify the order and set current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW.

PART III

ANNUAL FEE FOR SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT SERVICES

Sec. 4. RCW 74.20.040 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department receives an application for public assistance on behalf of a child, the department shall take appropriate action under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 74.20A RCW, or other appropriate statutes of this state to establish or enforce support obligations against the parent or other persons owing a duty to pay support moneys.

(2) The secretary may accept a request for support enforcement services on behalf of persons who are not recipients of public assistance and may take appropriate action to establish or enforce support obligations against the parent or other persons owing a duty to pay moneys. The secretary may condition requests accepted under this subsection ((may be conditioned)) upon the payment of a fee as required by subsection (6) of this section or through regulation issued by the secretary. The secretary may establish by regulation, reasonable standards and qualifications for support enforcement services ((under this subsection))provided to persons who are not currently receiving public assistance.

(3) The secretary may accept requests for support enforcement services from child support enforcement agencies in other states operating child support programs under Title IV-D of the social security act or from foreign countries, and may take appropriate action to establish and enforce support obligations, or to enforce subpoenas, information requests, orders for genetic testing, and collection actions issued by the other agency against the parent or other person owing a duty to pay support moneys, the parent or other person's employer, or any other person or entity properly subject to child support collection or information-gathering processes. The request shall contain and be accompanied by such information and documentation as the secretary may by rule require, and be signed by an authorized representative of the agency. The secretary may adopt rules setting forth the duration and nature of services provided under this subsection.

(4) The department may take action to establish, enforce, and collect a support obligation, including performing related services, under this chapter and chapter 74.20A RCW, or through the attorney general or prosecuting attorney for action under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.20, 26.21A, 26.26A, or ((26.26))26.26B RCW or other appropriate statutes or the common law of this state.

(5) Whenever a support order is filed with the Washington state support registry under chapter 26.23 RCW, the department may take appropriate action under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 26.23 or 74.20A RCW, or other appropriate law of this state to establish or enforce the support obligations contained in that order against the responsible parent or other persons owing a duty to pay support moneys.

(6)(a) Effective October 1, 2019, the secretary((, in the case of an individual who has never received assistance under a state program funded under part A and for whom the state has collected at least five hundred dollars of support,)) shall impose an annual fee of ((twenty-five))thirty-five dollars for each case in which support enforcement services are furnished((, which))where:

(i) The person entitled to receive support has never received assistance under the temporary assistance for needy families program, the aid for dependent families and children program, or a tribal temporary assistance for needy families program; and

(ii) The state has collected at least five hundred fifty dollars of support.

(b) The annual fee shall be retained by the state from support collected on behalf of the ((individual))person entitled to receive support, but not from the first five hundred fifty dollars of support.

(c) The secretary may, on showing of necessity, waive or defer any such fee or cost.

(7) Fees, due and owing, may be retained from support payments directly or collected as delinquent support moneys utilizing any of the remedies in this chapter (( 74.20 RCW)), chapter 74.20A ((RCW, chapter))or 26.21A RCW, or any other remedy at law or equity available to the department or any agencies with whom it has a cooperative or contractual arrangement to establish, enforce, or collect support moneys or support obligations.

(8) The secretary may waive the fee, or any portion thereof, as a part of a compromise of disputed claims or may grant partial or total charge off of said fee if the secretary finds there are no available, practical, or lawful means by which said fee may be collected or to facilitate payment of the amount of delinquent support moneys or fees owed.

(9) The secretary shall adopt rules conforming to federal laws, including but not limited to complying with section 7310 of the federal deficit reduction act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 654, and rules and regulations required to be observed in maintaining the state child support enforcement program required under Title IV-D of the federal social security act. The adoption of these rules shall be calculated to promote the cost-effective use of the agency's resources and not otherwise cause the agency to divert its resources from its essential functions.

--- END ---