BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a retailer's license to be designated as a community event license to be issued to a nonprofit society or organization to sell beer and/or wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event on a specified date or dates. The fee for a license under this section is seventy-five dollars per day.

(2) Sales and service of beer and/or wine may be confined to designated locations or areas at an event licensed under this section. Consumption of beer and/or wine is not limited or confined to designated locations or areas, and beer and/or wine purchased at the event may be possessed and consumed by individuals age twenty-one and over at any location or area within the overall location or area approved in the license application, including on sidewalks and city or county streets if approved by the board and local jurisdiction.

(3)(a) An applicant may apply to the board for a community event license on a form developed by the board. The applicant shall include a description of the premises, location, or area proposed to be covered by the license in the application, and, if issued, the license must include a description of the premises, location, or area approved for the event. The board may require additional information in an application.

(b) Under RCW 66.24.010(8) the board must notify the city, town, or county of the license application. If approving the event, the city, town, or county legislative authority must notify the board of its approval. For the board to approve the community event license, the notice from the legislative authority must state that the legislative authority approves of the applicant's proposed event to be conducted under a community event license and must include a description of the premises, location, or area approved of by the legislative authority for the event. The board may not approve an application for a community event license covering a location or area not approved by the local legislative authority.

(4) During all times an event is being conducted under a community event license, the perimeter or boundary of the approved premises, location, or area must be visibly marked so that attendees can reasonably determine the edge or boundary of the event while present. Nothing in this subsection requires a physical barrier around the perimeter or boundary of the event.

(5)(a) A holder of a community event license may pay for beer and/or wine immediately following the event.

(b) Beer and/or wine may be purchased from any lawful source that a holder of a special occasion license issued under RCW 66.24.380 may purchase beer and/or wine from.

(c) Any domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, out-of-state brewery or out-of-state winery with a certificate of approval, or manufacturer of beer or wine may pour at any event licensed under this section.

(d) Any domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, out-of-state brewery or out-of-state winery with a certificate of approval, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of beer and/or wine may donate beer and/or wine to holders of community event licenses that are nonprofit organizations organized under either section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code, as it exists on the effective date of this section. If donated product is sold, it may not be advertised or sold below the manufacturers' cost.

(e) Any domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, out-of-state brewery or out-of-state winery with a certificate of approval, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of beer and/or wine may provide advertising, pouring, and dispensing of beer or wine, as applicable, at a beer or wine tasting exhibition or judging event, but may not provide, money, goods, or services to holders of community event licenses.

(f) Wineries and breweries participating in an event conducted under a community event license may pay reasonable booth fees to the community event licensee.

--- END ---