BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The purpose of this act is to provide one additional educational staff associate in every school to promote a safe learning environment and provide support in meeting the academic and social-emotional needs of all students. The legislature finds that many challenges face students of today, both academically and emotionally. Educational staff associates provide essential mental health skills, are integrally involved in the every day learning of students, and are an important part of the school environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) In addition to amounts allocated under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction must allocate to school districts state funding for one educational staff associate on each school campus.

(b) Amounts allocated under this section may be used only to support staffing for educational staff associates on school campuses. Amounts allocated under this section are part of the funding deemed necessary by the legislature to support school districts in offering the minimum program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Educational staff associate" means school counselors, psychologists, social workers, nurses, speech language pathologists, occupational therapists, and physical therapists as certificated by the professional educator standards board under chapter 28A.410 RCW.

(b) "School campus" means a school facility, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction by rules adopted under RCW 28A.525.020, that is used primarily for in-person instruction of students in any grade level from kindergarten through twelfth grade.

--- END ---