BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of financial management shall conduct a feasibility study and make recommendations regarding the establishment of a single point of contact, also known as a full point of contact, system for firearm background checks. The office of financial management may contract with an independent expert to assist with the feasibility study. The study must consider and make recommendations regarding, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Whether or not public safety in Washington could be improved by implementing a single point of contact system in Washington;

(b) Whether a single point of contact system in Washington would more effectively keep prohibited persons from obtaining firearms while continuing to respect a person's right to bear arms consistent with Article 1, section 24 of the state Constitution and the Second Amendment of the Constitution of the United States;

(c) Whether a single point of contact system in Washington would simplify the background check process for those purchasing firearms, firearms dealers, and law enforcement agencies;

(d) The feasibility of creating a single point of contact system within the Washington state patrol or the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, creating a new agency for this purpose, or a combination of these options;

(e) What computer system improvements would need to be made to most effectively and efficiently administer a single point of contact system in Washington; and

(f) The approximate cost to establish a single point of contact system in Washington, and the approximate annual cost to operate such a system.

(2) The office of financial management shall submit a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(3) The office of financial management and its agents and employees are immune from civil liability arising out of their work pursuant to this section unless it is shown that the office of financial management or its agents and employees acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---