BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In 2016, the legislature directed state parks to develop options and recommendations to improve the consistency, equity, and simplicity in recreational access fee systems. This process identified the layering of park permit requirements that apply to sno-parks, and so the legislature intends to address this issue.

Sec. 2. RCW 79A.80.060 and 2011 c 320 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The discover pass or the day-use permit are not required, for persons who have a valid sno-park ((seasonal)) permit issued by the state parks and recreation commission, at designated sno-parks between November 1st through March 31st.

--- END ---