BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.04.005 and 2018 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this title, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) "Aged, blind, or disabled assistance program" means the program established under RCW 74.62.030.

(2) "Applicant" means any person who has made a request, or on behalf of whom a request has been made, to any county or local office for assistance.

(3) "Authority" means the health care authority.

(4) "County or local office" means the administrative office for one or more counties or designated service areas.

(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Director" means the director of the health care authority.

(7) "Essential needs and housing support program" means the program established in RCW 43.185C.220.

(8) "Federal aid assistance" means the specific categories of assistance for which provision is made in any federal law existing or hereafter passed by which payments are made from the federal government to the state in aid or in respect to payment by the state for public assistance rendered to any category of needy persons for which provision for federal funds or aid may from time to time be made, or a federally administered needs-based program.

(9) "Income" means:

(a) All appreciable gains in real or personal property (cash or kind) or other assets, which are received by or become available for use and enjoyment by an applicant or recipient during the month of application or after applying for or receiving public assistance. The department may by rule and regulation exempt income received by an applicant for or recipient of public assistance which can be used by him or her to decrease his or her need for public assistance or to aid in rehabilitating him or her or his or her dependents, but such exemption shall not, unless otherwise provided in this title, exceed the exemptions of resources granted under this chapter to an applicant for public assistance. In addition, for cash assistance the department may disregard income pursuant to RCW 74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.

(b) If, under applicable federal requirements, the state has the option of considering property in the form of lump sum compensatory awards or related settlements received by an applicant or recipient as income or as a resource, the department shall consider such property to be a resource.

(10) "Need" means the difference between the applicant's or recipient's standards of assistance for himself or herself and the dependent members of his or her family, as measured by the standards of the department, and value of all nonexempt resources and nonexempt income received by or available to the applicant or recipient and the dependent members of his or her family.

(11) "Public assistance" or "assistance" means public aid to persons in need thereof for any cause, including services, medical care, assistance grants, disbursing orders, work relief, benefits under RCW 74.62.030 and 43.185C.220, and federal aid assistance.

(12) "Qualifying family member" includes: (a) A victim's spouse, children, parents, and unmarried siblings under the age of eighteen, when the victim is under twenty-one years of age; and (b) a victim's spouse and children, when the victim is twenty-one years of age or older.

(13) "Recipient" means any person receiving assistance and in addition those dependents whose needs are included in the recipient's assistance.

(((13)))(14) "Resource" means any asset, tangible or intangible, owned by or available to the applicant at the time of application, which can be applied toward meeting the applicant's need, either directly or by conversion into money or its equivalent. The department may by rule designate resources that an applicant may retain and not be ineligible for public assistance because of such resources. Exempt resources shall include, but are not limited to:

(a) A home that an applicant, recipient, or their dependents is living in, including the surrounding property;

(b) Household furnishings and personal effects;

(c) One motor vehicle, other than a motor home, used and useful having an equity value not to exceed ten thousand dollars;

(d) A motor vehicle necessary to transport a household member with a physical disability. This exclusion is limited to one vehicle per person with a physical disability;

(e) All other resources, including any excess of values exempted, not to exceed six thousand dollars or other limit as set by the department, to be consistent with limitations on resources and exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance;

(f) Applicants for or recipients of benefits under RCW 74.62.030 and 43.185C.220 shall have their eligibility based on resource limitations consistent with the temporary assistance for needy families program rules adopted by the department; and

(g) If an applicant for or recipient of public assistance possesses property and belongings in excess of the ceiling value, such value shall be used in determining the need of the applicant or recipient, except that: (i) The department may exempt resources or income when the income and resources are determined necessary to the applicant's or recipient's restoration to independence, to decrease the need for public assistance, or to aid in rehabilitating the applicant or recipient or a dependent of the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the department may provide grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine months from the date the agreement is signed pursuant to this section to persons who are otherwise ineligible because of excess real property owned by such persons when they are making a good faith effort to dispose of that property if:

(A) The applicant or recipient signs an agreement to repay the lesser of the amount of aid received or the net proceeds of such sale;

(B) If the owner of the excess property ceases to make good faith efforts to sell the property, the entire amount of assistance may become an overpayment and a debt due the state and may be recovered pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;

(C) Applicants and recipients are advised of their right to a fair hearing and afforded the opportunity to challenge a decision that good faith efforts to sell have ceased, prior to assessment of an overpayment under this section; and

(D) At the time assistance is authorized, the department files a lien without a sum certain on the specific property.

(((14)))(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(((15)))(16) "Standards of assistance" means the level of income required by an applicant or recipient to maintain a level of living specified by the department.

(((16) For purposes of determining eligibility for public assistance and participation levels in the cost of medical care, the department shall exempt restitution payments made to people of Japanese and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the Civil Liberties Act of 1988 and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution Act passed by congress, P.L. 100-383, including all income and resources derived therefrom.

))

(17) "Victim of human trafficking" means a noncitizen and any qualifying family members who have:

(a) Filed or are preparing to file an application for T nonimmigrant status with the appropriate federal agency pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(T);

(b) Filed or are preparing to file a formal application with the appropriate federal agency for status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(U);

(c) Been harmed by either any violation of chapter 9A.40 or 9.68A RCW, or both, or by substantially similar crimes under federal law or the laws of any other state, and who:

(i) Are otherwise taking steps to meet the conditions for federal benefits eligibility under 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7105; or

(ii) Have filed or are preparing to file a formal application with the appropriate federal agency for status under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1158.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of determining eligibility for public assistance and participation levels in the cost of medical care, the department shall exempt restitution payments made to people of Japanese and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the Civil Liberties Act of 1988 and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution Act passed by congress, P.L. 100-383, including all income and resources derived therefrom.

(2) In the construction of words and phrases used in this title, the singular number shall include the plural, the masculine gender shall include both the feminine and neuter genders, and the present tense shall include the past and future tenses, unless the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.08A.120 and 1999 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may establish a food assistance program for legal immigrants and victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 who are ineligible for the federal food stamp program.

(2) The rules for the state food assistance program shall follow exactly the rules of the federal food stamp program except for the provisions pertaining to immigrant status.

(3) The benefit under the state food assistance program shall be established by the legislature in the biennial operating budget.

(4) The department may enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture to use the existing federal food stamp program coupon system for the purposes of administering the state food assistance program.

(5) In the event the department is unable to enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture, the department may issue vouchers to eligible households for the purchase of eligible foods at participating retailers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

Victims of human trafficking, as defined in RCW 74.04.005, are eligible for state family assistance programs as provided in rule on the effective date of this section, who otherwise meet program eligibility requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Medical care services must be provided to victims of human trafficking, as defined in RCW 74.04.005, who are not eligible for medicaid under RCW 74.09.510 or section 1902(a)(10)(a)(i)(VIII) of the social security act, who otherwise qualify for the state family assistance program under this act.

(2) Enrollment in medical care services may not result in expenditures that exceed the amount that has been appropriated in the state's operating budget. If it appears that continued enrollment will result in expenditures exceeding the appropriated level for a particular fiscal year, the authority may freeze new enrollment and establish a waiting list of persons who may receive benefits only when sufficient funds are available.

(3) To the extent possible, the authority must:

(a) Add the medical care services enrollees into the apple health for kids, with the same benefits and services provided to medicaid apple health for kids enrollees; and

(b) Coordinate with the department, food assistance programs for legal immigrants, state family assistance programs, and refugee cash assistance.

--- END ---