BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.060 and 1990 c 33 s 190 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In enacting RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170, it is the judgment of the legislature that it is necessary to protect the health of the public and individuals by providing a means for the eventual achievement of full immunization of school-age children against certain vaccine-preventable diseases.

(2) To assure the public regarding the safety of these immunization measures, nothing in RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 shall require administration of any vaccine that does not meet the following criteria:

(a) A pivotal trial conducted by the United States food and drug administration has evaluated the safety of the vaccine against a control group that received:

(i) A placebo;

(ii) Another vaccine or substance licensed by the United States food and drug administration that was evaluated against a control group that received a placebo;

(b) A pivotal trial conducted by the United States food and drug administration has evaluated the vaccine for at least one year after the administration of the vaccine to capture potential autoimmune, neurological, and chronic health effects that arise after administration of the vaccine;

(c) The vaccine has been evaluated for its potential to cause cancer;

(d) The vaccine has been evaluated for its potential to mutate genes;

(e) The vaccine has been evaluated for its potential to impair fertility;

(f) The vaccine has been evaluated for its potential to cause autism spectrum disorder; and

(g) The department of health has publicly disclosed the injury rate of the vaccine when administered with the vaccines required under RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170.

--- END ---