BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.32.330 and 1891 c 54 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Every court of record shall have the power to appoint a crier and as many bailiffs, judicial assistants, or other legal professionals as may be necessary for the orderly and expeditious dispatch of the legal business of the court. In counties with a population over five hundred thousand, each superior court judge has the right to hire at minimum one such employee.

--- END ---