BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (section 6 of this act). This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to induce certain designated behaviors by taxpayers, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(a).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to preserve the affordable housing opportunities provided by existing manufactured/mobile home communities. It is the legislature's intent to encourage owners to sell existing communities to tenants and eligible organizations by providing a real estate excise tax exemption.

(3) To measure the effectiveness of this tax preference in achieving the specific public policy objective described in subsection (2) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee must, at minimum, review the number of units of housing that are preserved as a result of qualified sales of manufactured/mobile home communities and the total amount of exemptions claimed, as reported to the department of revenue.

(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee may use any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.155 and 2010 c 161 s 511 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a certificate of title for an original or transfer manufactured home transaction as required in this title or chapter 65.20 RCW, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay a ((one hundred dollar)) fee, in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law if the manufactured home:

(a) Is located in a mobile home park;

(b) Is one year old or older; and

(c) Is new or ownership changes, excluding changes that involve adding or deleting spouse or domestic partner coregistered owners or legal owners((; and

(d) Sales price is five thousand dollars or more)).

(2) The ((one hundred dollar)) fee amount established in subsection (4) of this section must be forwarded to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the fee in the mobile home park relocation fund created in RCW 59.21.050.

(3) The department and the state treasurer may adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.

(4) The amount of the fee that the department must collect must be 0.25 percent of the sale price of the manufactured home, but in no case may the fee be less than one hundred dollars or greater than five hundred dollars.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.30.050 and 2013 c 144 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must register all manufactured/mobile home communities, which registration must be renewed annually. Each community must be registered separately. The department must mail registration notifications to all known manufactured/mobile home community landlords. Registration information packets must include:

(a) Registration forms; and

(b) Registration assessment information, including registration due dates and late fees, and the collections procedures, liens, and charging costs to tenants.

(2) To apply for registration or registration renewal, the landlord of a manufactured/mobile home community must file with the department an application for registration or registration renewal on a form provided by the department and must pay a registration fee as described in subsection (3) of this section. The department may require the submission of information necessary to assist in identifying and locating a manufactured/mobile home community and other information that may be useful to the state, which must include, at a minimum:

(a) The names and addresses of the owners of the manufactured/mobile home community;

(b) The name and address of the manufactured/mobile home community;

(c) The name and address of the landlord and manager of the manufactured/mobile home community;

(d) The number of lots within the manufactured/mobile home community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW; and

(e) The addresses of each manufactured/mobile home lot within the manufactured/mobile home community that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.

(3) Each manufactured/mobile home community landlord must pay to the department:

(a) A one-time business license application fee for the first year of registration and, in subsequent years, an annual renewal application fee, as provided in RCW 19.02.075; and

(b) An annual registration assessment of ((ten))fifteen dollars for each manufactured/mobile home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a manufactured/mobile home community. Manufactured/mobile home community landlords may charge a maximum of five dollars of this assessment to tenants. Nine dollars of the registration assessment for each manufactured/mobile home must be deposited into the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account created in RCW 59.30.070 to fund the costs associated with the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program. ((The remaining))One dollar of the registration assessment must be deposited into the business license account created in RCW 19.02.210. The remaining five dollars of the registration assessment must be deposited into the mobile home park relocation fund created in RCW 59.21.050. The annual registration assessment must be reviewed once each biennium by the department and the attorney general and may be adjusted to reasonably relate to the cost of administering this chapter. The registration assessment may not exceed ((ten))fifteen dollars, but if the assessment is reduced, the portion allocated to the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account ((and)), the business license account, and the mobile home park relocation fund must be adjusted proportionately.

(4) Initial registrations of manufactured/mobile home communities must be filed before November 1, 2007, or within three months of the availability of mobile home lots for rent within the community. The manufactured/mobile home community is subject to a delinquency fee of two hundred fifty dollars for late initial registrations. The delinquency fee must be deposited in the business license account. Renewal registrations that are not renewed by the expiration date as assigned by the department are subject to delinquency fees under RCW 19.02.085.

(5) Thirty days after sending late fee notices to a noncomplying landlord, the department may issue a warrant under RCW 59.30.090 for the unpaid registration assessment and delinquency fee. If a warrant is issued by the department under RCW 59.30.090, the department must add a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the unpaid registration assessment and delinquency fee, but not less than ten dollars. The warrant penalty must be deposited into the business license account created in RCW 19.02.210. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the collection of warrants issued under RCW 59.30.090.

(6) Registration is effective on the date determined by the department, and the department must issue a registration number to each registered manufactured/mobile home community. The department must provide an expiration date, assigned by the department, to each manufactured/mobile home community who registers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 59.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A relocation coordination program is created within the department for the purpose of assisting tenants of a mobile home park scheduled for closure or conversion to another use with the process of relocation.

(2) The relocation coordination program assistance may include, but is not limited to, performing casework on behalf of individual tenants, maintaining and distributing informational resources for tenants regarding the process for relocating and disposal of manufactured/mobile homes, researching and distributing current information regarding available locations for manufactured/mobile homes and other forms of available housing, and researching and distributing information regarding other sources of financial assistance that may be available to secure new housing.

Sec. 5. RCW 59.21.050 and 2011 c 158 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The existence of the mobile home park relocation fund in the custody of the state treasurer is affirmed.

(b) Expenditures from the fund may only be used as follows:

(i) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all moneys received from the fee as specified in RCW 46.17.155 must be used only for relocation assistance awarded under this chapter.

(ii) All moneys received from the fee as specified in RCW 59.30.050 must be used only for the relocation coordination program created in section 4 of this act.

(c) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. All relocation payments to tenants shall be made from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(2) A park tenant is eligible for assistance under this chapter only after an application is submitted by that tenant or an organization acting on the tenant's account under RCW 59.21.021(4) on a form approved by the director which shall include:

(a) For those persons who maintained ownership of and relocated their homes or removed their homes from the park: (i) A copy of the notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the tenancy is terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof that the applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; (iii) a copy of the contract for relocating the home which includes the date of relocation, or other proof of actual relocation expenses incurred on a date certain; and (iv) a statement of any other available assistance;

(b) For those persons who sold their homes and incurred no relocation expenses: (i) A copy of the notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the tenancy is terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof that the applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; and (iii) a copy of the record of title transfer issued by the department of licensing when the tenant sold the home rather than relocate it due to park closure or conversion.

(3) The department may deduct a percentage amount of the fee collected under RCW 46.17.155 for administration expenses incurred by the department.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.45.010 and 2018 c 223 s 3 and 2018 c 221 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.

(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.

(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:

(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and

(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.

(3) The term "sale" does not include:

(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.

(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.

(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.

(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.

(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.

(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.

(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.

(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.

(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.

(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030((, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018)).

(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.

(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.

(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.

(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:

(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;

(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;

(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and

(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for fifty years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.

(iii) A "qualified entity" is:

(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or

(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.

(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 6 of this act expires January 1, 2030.

--- END ---