BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.120A.010 and 2010 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the legislature adopts the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2005, except as provided in this chapter. The department of ecology shall adopt rules to implement the emission standards of the state of California for passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty ((passenger)) vehicles, and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain consistency with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act). ((Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the department of ecology shall not adopt the zero emission vehicle program regulations contained in Title 13 section 1962 of the California Code of Regulations effective January 1, 2005. During rule development, the department of ecology shall convene an advisory group composed of industry and consumer group representatives. Any proposed rules or changes to rules shall be subject to review and comment by the advisory group, prior to rule adoption. The order of adoption for the rules required in this section shall include the signature of the governor.)) The rules shall be effective only for those model years for which the state of Oregon has adopted the California motor vehicle emission standards. This section does not limit the department of ecology's authority to regulate motor vehicle emissions for any other class of vehicle.

(2) Motor vehicles with a model year equal to or later than the first model year for which new vehicles sold to Washington state residents are required to comply with California motor vehicle emission standards are exempt from emission inspections under chapter 70.120 RCW.

(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a resident of this state of a motor vehicle acquired and used while the resident is a member of the armed services and is stationed outside this state pursuant to military orders.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.120A.050 and 2014 c 76 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No model year 2010 or subsequent model year new passenger car, light duty truck, or medium duty ((passenger)) vehicle may be sold in Washington unless there is securely and conspicuously affixed in a clearly visible location a label on which the manufacturer clearly discloses comparative greenhouse gas emissions for that new vehicle.

(2) The label required by this section should include a greenhouse gas index or rating system that contains quantitative and graphical information presented in a continuous, easy-to-read scale that compares the greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle with the average projected greenhouse gas emissions from all passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty ((passenger)) vehicles of the same model year. For reference purposes, the index or rating system should also identify the greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle model of that same model year that has the lowest greenhouse gas emissions.

(3) The index or rating system included in the label under subsection (2) of this section shall be updated as necessary to ensure that the differences in greenhouse gas emissions among vehicles are readily apparent to the consumer.

(4) An automobile manufacturer may apply to the department of ecology for approval of an alternative to the disclosure labeling requirement that is at least as effective in providing notification and disclosure of the vehicle's greenhouse gas emissions as is the labeling required by this section.

(5) A label that complies with the requirements of the California greenhouse gas vehicle labeling program shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this section and any rules adopted under this section.

(6) The department of ecology may adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---