BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance to school districts for the original construction of any school plant facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed in accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of works of art under this section, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school district boards of directors. In selecting the artist, the Washington state arts commission must give preference to artists located within one hundred miles of the project site. The superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of directors of the districts where the sites are selected shall have the right to:

(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection process by the Washington state arts commission;

(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process with full voting rights;

(3) Reject the results of the selection process;

(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on school district premises if such works are portable.

Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for the administration, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.

The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors' association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.025 and 2015 c 55 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University and with the boards of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical college districts, determine the amount to be made available for the purchases of art under RCW 28B.10.027, and payment therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, the selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the board of regents or trustees. In selecting the artist, the Washington state arts commission must give preference to artists located within one hundred miles of the project site.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.17.210 and 2005 c 36 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state arts commission shall determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of art in consultation with the agency, except where another person or agency is specified under RCW 43.19.455, 28A.335.210, or 28B.10.025, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the directors of the state agencies. In selecting the artist, the Washington state arts commission must give preference to artists located within one hundred miles of the project site.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.19.455 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided under RCW 43.17.210, the Washington state arts commission shall determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of art under RCW 43.17.200 in consultation with the director, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the director. In selecting the artist, the Washington state arts commission must give preference to artists located within one hundred miles of the project site.

--- END ---