BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.295 and 2012 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) United States veterans discharged under honorable conditions (United States veterans) and individuals serving on active duty in the United States armed forces (active duty military personnel) may purchase a veterans remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem. ((The))

(b) Veterans of allied forces discharged under honorable conditions (allied forces veterans) may purchase an allied forces veterans remembrance emblem.

(c) Emblems((is))are to be displayed on license plates in the manner described by the department, existing vehicular registration procedures, and current laws.

(2) United States veterans and active duty military personnel who served during periods of war or armed conflict may purchase a remembrance emblem depicting campaign ribbons which they were awarded.

(3) The following campaign ribbon remembrance emblems are available:

(a) World War I victory medal;

(b) World War II Asiatic-Pacific campaign medal;

(c) World War II European-African Middle East campaign medal;

(d) World War II American campaign medal;

(e) Korean service medal;

(f) Vietnam service medal;

(g) Armed forces expeditionary medal awarded after 1958; and

(h) Southwest Asia medal.

The director may issue additional campaign ribbon emblems by rule as authorized decorations by the United States department of defense.

(4) The following military service award emblems are available:

(a) Distinguished Service Cross;

(b) Navy Cross;

(c) Air Force Cross;

(d) Silver Star medal; and

(e) Bronze Star medal.

(5) The department must make available an allied forces veteran emblem.

(6) United States veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a veteran remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem or emblems must:

(a) Pay a prescribed fee set by the department; and

(b) Show proof of eligibility through:

(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran;

(ii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a campaign ribbon if an individual serving on military active duty;

(iii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a military service award; or

(iv) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as required under this section.

(((6)))(7) Allied forces veterans requesting an allied forces veteran remembrance emblem or emblems must:

(a) Pay a prescribed fee set by the department; and

(b) Provide certification from the Washington department of veterans affairs that the allied forces veteran qualifies for emblems under this section.

(8) United States veterans, allied forces veterans, or active duty military personnel who purchase a veteran remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem must be the legal or registered owner of the vehicle on which the emblem is to be displayed.

--- END ---