BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.113 (Preservation rating information—Review) and 2017 c 139 s 1, 2013 c 306 s 704, 2011 c 353 s 7, 2006 c 334 s 21, & 2003 c 363 s 305 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

Given the importance of cost-effective asset management and maintaining a state of good repair, the department shall continue to collect preservation rating information for all types of highways for which it collects this information as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---