BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.545.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:

The purposes of RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531 are to:

(1) Simplify the annual process of determining and paying the amounts due by nonhigh school districts to high school districts for educating students residing in a nonhigh school district;

(2) Provide for a payment schedule that coincides to the extent practicable with the ability of nonhigh school districts to pay and the need of high school districts for payment; ((and))

(3) Establish that the maximum amount due per annual average full-time equivalent student by a nonhigh school district for each school year is ((no greater than))the lesser of:

(a) The enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the high school district; or

(b) The enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the nonhigh school district;

(4) If the nonhigh school district has not levied an enrichment levy during the current school year, then the amount due per annual average full-time equivalent student by the nonhigh school district is the enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the high school district; and

(5) Designate the revenue provided to secondary school buildings to ensure dollars are being spent to support secondary school students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.545 RCW to read as follows:

Upon a nonhigh school district's request, a host high school district shall provide an annual data report to the nonhigh school district within sixty days of the request. The report must include attendance, grades, discipline, and state assessment data for all nonhigh secondary students sent to the high school district.

--- END ---