BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.380.020 and 2016 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington statewide reentry council is created and located within the department for the purpose of promoting successful reentry of offenders after incarceration.

(2) Through the executive director that may be appointed by the council, the department shall administer the council by:

(a) Providing the council and its executive director use of the department's facilities; and

(b) Managing grants and other funds received, used, and disbursed by the council.

(((3) The department may not designate additional full-time staff to the administration of the council beyond the executive director.))

--- END ---