BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.16.010 and 2009 c 521 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of this chapter, unless clearly indicated by the context, words and phrases shall have the following meaning:

(1) "Beneficiary" shall mean any person or persons designated by a firefighter in a writing filed with the board, and who shall be entitled to receive any benefits of a deceased firefighter under this chapter.

(2) "Board" shall mean the municipal firefighters' pension board.

(3) "Child or children" shall mean a child or children unmarried and under eighteen years of age.

(4) "Contributions" shall mean and include all sums deducted from the salary of firefighters and paid into the fund as hereinafter provided.

(5) "Disability" shall mean and include injuries or sickness sustained as a result of the performance of duty.

(6) "Firefighter" shall mean any person regularly or temporarily, or as a substitute, employed and paid as a member of a fire department, who has passed a civil service examination for firefighter and who is actively employed as a firefighter; and shall include any "prior firefighter."

(7) "Fire department" shall mean the regularly organized, full time, paid, and employed force of firefighters of the municipality.

(8) "Fund" shall mean the firefighters' pension fund created herein.

(9) "Municipality" shall mean every city ((and)), town, and regional fire protection service authority, having a regularly organized full time, paid, fire department employing firefighters.

(10) "Performance of duty" shall mean the performance of work and labor regularly required of firefighters and shall include services of an emergency nature rendered while off regular duty, but shall not include time spent in traveling to work before answering roll call or traveling from work after dismissal at roll call.

(11) "Prior firefighter" shall mean a firefighter who was actively employed as a firefighter of a fire department prior to the first day of January, 1947, and who continues such employment thereafter.

(12) "Retired firefighter" shall mean and include a person employed as a firefighter and retired under the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended.

(13) "Widow or widower" means the surviving wife, husband, or state registered domestic partner of a retired firefighter who was retired on account of length of service and who was lawfully married to, or in a state registered domestic partnership with, such firefighter; and whenever that term is used with reference to the wife or former wife, husband or former husband, or current or former state registered domestic partner of a retired firefighter who was retired because of disability, it shall mean his or her lawfully married wife, husband, or state registered domestic partner on the date he or she sustained the injury or contracted the illness that resulted in his or her disability. Said term shall not mean or include a surviving wife, husband, or state registered domestic partner who by process of law within one year prior to the retired firefighter's death, collected or attempted to collect from him or her funds for the support of herself or himself or for his or her children.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.16.020 and 2007 c 218 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created in each city and town a municipal firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, ex officio, the mayor, or in a city of the first class, the mayor or a designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, who shall be chairperson of the board, the city comptroller or clerk, the chairperson of finance of the city council, or if there is no chairperson of finance, the city treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of those employed and retired firefighters who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board. The members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two year term. The two firefighters elected as members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve as an alternate in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighters or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be, a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.

(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board may be elected under subsection (1) of this section. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.18, 41.26, and 52.26 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.18.010 and 2009 c 521 s 90 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of this chapter, unless clearly indicated otherwise by the context, words and phrases shall have the meaning hereinafter ascribed.

(1) "Basic salary" means the basic monthly salary, including longevity pay, attached to the rank held by the retired firefighter at the date of his or her retirement, without regard to extra compensation which such firefighter may have received for special duties assignments not acquired through civil service examination: PROVIDED, That such basic salary shall not be deemed to exceed the salary of a battalion chief.

(2) "Beneficiary" shall mean any person or persons designated by a firefighter in a writing filed with the board, and who shall be entitled to receive any benefits of a deceased firefighter under this chapter.

(3) "Board" shall mean the municipal firefighters' pension board.

(4) "Child" or "children" means a firefighter's child or children under the age of eighteen years, unmarried, and in the legal custody of such firefighter at the time of his death or her death.

(5) "Contributions" shall mean and include all sums deducted from the salary of firefighters and paid into the fund as hereinafter provided.

(6) "Disability" shall mean and include injuries or sickness sustained by a firefighter.

(7) "Earned interest" means and includes all annual increments to the firefighters' pension fund from income earned by investment of the fund. The earned interest payable to any firefighter when he or she leaves the service and accepts his or her contributions, shall be that portion of the total earned income of the fund which is directly attributable to each individual firefighter's contributions. Earnings of the fund for the preceding year attributable to individual contributions shall be allocated to individual firefighters' accounts as of January 1st of each year.

(8) "Fire department" shall mean the regularly organized, full time, paid, and employed force of firefighters of the municipality.

(9) "Firefighter" means any person hereafter regularly or temporarily, or as a substitute newly employed and paid as a member of a fire department, who has passed a civil service examination for firefighters and who is actively employed as a firefighter or, if provided by the municipality by appropriate local legislation, as a fire dispatcher: PROVIDED, Nothing in chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess. shall impair or permit the impairment of any vested pension rights of persons who are employed as fire dispatchers at the time chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess. takes effect; and any person heretofore regularly or temporarily, or as a substitute, employed and paid as a member of a fire department, and who has contributed under and been covered by the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW as now or hereafter amended and who has come under the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 41.18.170 and who is actively engaged as a firefighter or as a member of the fire department as a firefighter or fire dispatcher.

(10) "Fund" shall have the same meaning as in RCW 41.16.010 as now or hereafter amended. Such fund shall be created in the manner and be subject to the provisions specified in chapter 41.16 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

(11) "Municipality" shall mean every city, town ((and)), fire protection district, or regional fire protection service authority having a regularly organized full time, paid, fire department employing firefighters.

(12) "Performance of duty" shall mean the performance of work or labor regularly required of firefighters and shall include services of an emergency nature normally rendered while off regular duty.

(13) "Retired firefighter" means and includes a person employed as a firefighter and retired under the provisions of this chapter.

(14) "Widow or widower" means the surviving spouse of a firefighter and shall include the surviving wife, husband, or state registered domestic partner of a firefighter, retired on account of length of service, who was lawfully married to, or in a state registered domestic partnership with, him or to her for a period of five years prior to the time of his or her retirement; and the surviving wife, husband, or state registered domestic partner of a firefighter, retired on account of disability, who was lawfully married to, or in a state registered domestic partnership with, him or her at and prior to the time he or she sustained the injury or contracted the illness resulting in his or her disability. The word shall not mean the divorced wife or husband or former state registered domestic partner of an active or retired firefighter.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.18.015 and 2007 c 218 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created in each fire protection district which qualifies under this chapter, a firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, the chairperson of the fire commissioners for said district who shall be chairperson of the board, the county auditor, county treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of the employed and retired firefighters. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the pension board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. The first members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two-year term. The two firefighter elected members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighter or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of said board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.

(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board may be elected under subsection (1) of this section. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.16, 41.26, and 52.26 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.20.010 and 2012 c 117 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The mayor or his or her designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, and the clerk, treasurer, president of the city council or mayor pro tem of each city of the first class, or in case any such city has no city council, the commissioner who has supervision of the police department, together with three active or retired members of the police department, to be elected as herein provided, in addition to the duties now required of them, are constituted a board of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department of each such city, and shall provide for the disbursement of the fund, and designate the beneficiaries thereof.

(2) The police department and the retired law enforcement officers of each city of the first class shall elect three members to act as members of the board. Members shall be elected for three year terms. Existing members shall continue in office until replaced as provided for in this section.

(3) Such election shall be held in the following manner. Not more than thirty nor less than fifteen days preceding the first day of June in each year, written notice of the nomination of any member or retired member of the department for membership on the board may be filed with the secretary of the board. Each notice of nomination shall be signed by not less than five members or retired members of the department, and nothing herein contained shall prevent any member or retired member of the department from signing more than one notice of nomination. The election shall be held on a date to be fixed by the secretary during the month of June. Notice of the dates upon which notice of nomination may be filed and of the date fixed for the election of such members of the board shall be given by the secretary of the board by posting written notices thereof in a prominent place in the police headquarters. For the purpose of such election, the secretary of the board shall prepare and furnish printed or typewritten ballots in the usual form, containing the names of all persons regularly nominated for membership and shall furnish a ballot box for the election. Each member and each retired member of the police department shall be entitled to vote at the election for one nominee as a member of the board. The chief of the department shall appoint two members to act as officials of the election, who shall be allowed their regular wages for the day, but shall receive no additional compensation therefor. The election shall be held in the police headquarters of the department and the polls shall open at 7:30 a.m. and close at 8:30 p.m. The one nominee receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected to the board and his or her term shall commence on the first day of July succeeding the election. In the first election the nominee receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to the three year term, the second greatest to the two year term and the third greatest to the one year term. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. Ballots shall contain all names of those nominated, both active and retired. Notice of nomination and voting by retired members shall be conducted by the board.

(4) If no eligible active or retired members of the police department are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (3) of this section, then any active or retired law enforcement officers who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board may be elected under subsection (3) of this section. This includes active and retired law enforcement officers under this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.26.030 and 2018 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.

(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of retirement.

(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(4)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.

(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time care of a state institution, who is:

(i) A natural born child;

(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous child;

(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this chapter.

(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which the child returns to school.

(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(8) "Director" means the director of the department.

(9) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.

(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in subsections (17) and (19) of this section.

(14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any city, town, county, ((or)) district, or regional fire protection service authority or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.

(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or firefighter:

(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, district, ((or)) public corporation, or regional fire protection service authority established under RCW 35.21.730 to provide emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030;

(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency;

(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as of January 1, 1996; or

(v) The department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving at a prison or civil commitment center on an island.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an "employer." The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an "employer," but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an "employer" under this chapter.

(15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.

(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.

(c) In calculating final average salary under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer; and

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.

(16) "Fire department" includes a fire station operated by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections when employing firefighters serving a prison or civil commitment center on an island.

(17) "Firefighter" means:

(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing a civil service examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;

(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (17)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (17)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for firefighter;

(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW; and

(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician that meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(12), and whose duties include providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030.

(18) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor and cannabis board, and the state department of corrections. A general authority law enforcement agency under this chapter does not include a government contractor.

(19) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (19)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (19)(e) shall not apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(20) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical expenses," provided that they have not been considered as "hospital expenses".

(i) The fees of the following:

(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;

(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(21) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply under subsection((s)) (17) or (19) of this section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(22) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(23) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(24) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(25) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(26) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.

(27) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for herein.

(28) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(29)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.

(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual service.

(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(30) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(31) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(32) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(33) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(34) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.26.110 and 2013 c 213 s 1 and 2013 c 23 s 69 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized to be created in this section.

(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by those cities and composed of the following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor; one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are either no firefighters or law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers or firefighters eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement officers as provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act.

(b) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (a) of this subsection, then any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officer under this chapter and chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board may be elected under (a) of this subsection.

(c) Each county shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from an employer within the county ((who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and)) who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county ((who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and)) who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the county ((who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established)) are eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by the firefighters eligible to vote.

(d) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (c) of this subsection, then any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officer under this chapter or chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board may be elected under (c) of this subsection.

(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.

(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified in this chapter.

--- END ---