BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a common carrier who accepts shipments of wine, beer, or spirits from licensed wine, beer, or spirits manufacturers within this state may not discriminate against any other licensed wine, beer, or spirits manufacturers within this state by refusing to accept their product for shipment to licensees or consumers.

(2) Without violating subsection (1) of this section, a common carrier may refuse to accept a shipment from a licensed wine, beer, or spirits manufacturer in this state if:

(a) The shipment is destined for delivery to a person not old enough to purchase, receive, or accept the shipment;

(b) The recipient is not otherwise entitled by law to receive such shipment;

(c) The shipment is destined for delivery to a destination within any state in which the state does not allow for the import and acceptance of such shipments to individual consumers;

(d) The common carrier is not usually engaged in the business of delivering parcels or packages to consumers at their place of residence; or

(e) The wine, beer, or spirits manufacturer is not current on their billing with the common carrier.

(3) A common carrier who violates the nondiscrimination requirements of this section is prohibited from accepting any wine, beer, or spirits shipments from any wine, beer, or spirits manufacturer within this state, regardless of the destination.

(4) For purposes of this section, "common carrier" means any person, business, or entity that operates in this state and is engaged in the business of shipping or transporting parcels or packages of goods, products, or anything else to consumers, businesses, or locations.

--- END ---