BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.070 and 1994 c 154 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as required to perform duties within the scope of employment, no state officer or state employee may use his or her position to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or herself, or his or her spouse, child, parents, or other persons. As used in this section, "special privileges" includes, without limitation, securing or seeking to secure unwanted or unwelcome romantic, personal, or sexual attention or favors from staff or any other person.

--- END ---