BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of this section is to establish criteria for using appropriated funds intended to address diversity, equity, and inclusion goals at the community and technical colleges.

(2) Beginning July 30, 2020, all community and technical colleges must submit, on an annual basis, strategic plans to the college board for achieving diversity, equity, and inclusion on their campuses.

(3) Colleges must create their strategic plans using an inclusive process of stakeholders to include, but not be limited to, classified staff, faculty, administrative exempt staff, students, and community organizations.

(4) Colleges may request funds from the college board to implement and maintain their strategic plan. A college's request for funds to implement and maintain its strategic plan must include funding for staffing whose primary responsibilities are to implement and monitor the effectiveness of the strategic plan.

(5) A college's overhead costs to implement the strategic plan may not exceed five percent of the funds allocated to the college for implementation of the strategic plan.

(6) Each college shall assess its progress towards meeting the goals of diversity, equity, and inclusion. The assessment must detail progress on each goal, describe obstacles encountered, prioritize goals in the strategic plan for the following year, and identify resources needed for continued progress.

--- END ---