BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state occupies and preempts the entire field with respect to voting practices and procedures. Counties and political subdivisions may adopt or administer only those voting practices and procedures that are specifically permitted by state law, including rules adopted by the secretary of state, or that meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Counties and political subdivisions may adopt or administer voting practices and procedures that are not specifically permitted by state law if:

(a) They are necessary for an election to occur;

(b) They are not prohibited by or inconsistent with federal or state law, including rules adopted by the secretary of state; and

(c) They do not materially disrupt the uniformity of voting practices and procedures throughout the state.

(3) The secretary of state shall undertake a review of Washington counties and political subdivisions to identify areas in which voting practices and procedures are not uniform statewide. The secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29A.04.611(35) as necessary to ensure statewide uniformity in the conduct of elections.

(4) For purposes of this section, "voting practices and procedures" includes the manner in which ballots are designed, distributed, collected, and canvassed, the manner in which votes are counted, and the manner in which election results are certified and audited.

(5) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or political subdivision from adopting or administering policies related to:

(a) The use of voting systems governed by chapter 29A.12 RCW;

(b) The determination of precinct boundaries;

(c) The location of voting centers or ballot deposit sites; or

(d) Redistricting a governmental unit pursuant to RCW 29A.76.010.

--- END ---