BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The transportation commission shall conduct a study of discounted tolls and other similar programs, for low-income drivers, that are provided by other states, countries, or other jurisdictions. The transportation commission may contract with a consultant to conduct all or a portion of this study.

(2) In conducting the study, the transportation commission shall consult with both the department of transportation and the department of social and health services.

(3) The transportation commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following issues when conducting the study of discounted tolls and other similar programs, for low-income drivers:

(a) The benefits, requirements, and any potential detriments to the users of a program;

(b) The most cost-effective way to implement a program given existing financial commitments, shared cost requirements across facilities, and technical requirements to execute and maintain a program; and

(c) The implications of a program for tolling policies, revenues, costs, operations, and enforcement.

(4) The transportation commission shall provide a report detailing the findings of this study and recommendations for implementing a discounted toll or other appropriate program in the state of Washington to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

--- END ---