BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.011 and 1992 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this chapter, "retail car rental" means renting ((a)), to a consumer, a:

(1) Rental car, as defined in RCW 46.04.465((, to a consumer)); or

(2) Any other passenger car, as defined in RCW 46.04.382, that the owner, as defined in RCW 46.04.380, offers for rental, without an operator, through a marketplace facilitator. A rental for periods exceeding thirty consecutive days is not a retail car rental under this subsection (2).

--- END ---