BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local jurisdictions must reimburse emergency response workers for any volunteer services provided when called to active Washington state emergency service. No later than ten days following the initial date the emergency response worker begins providing emergency services, the local jurisdiction shall provide reimbursement to the volunteer emergency response worker for his or her service on behalf of the jurisdiction. Reimbursements shall be provided on a biweekly basis.

(2) The volunteer emergency response reimbursement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Funding to local jurisdictions under this section must be provided by the department through an interagency agreement or other applicable contract instrument to fund reimbursements to volunteer emergency response workers for services provided due to an emergency call. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(3) By December 31st of each year, each local jurisdiction shall annually remit any reimbursement amounts received from the department during the calendar year from the volunteer emergency response reimbursement account to the state treasurer.

(4) As used in this section:

(a) "Emergency response worker" means any first responder.

(b) "Emergency service" includes but is not limited to services provided when called for active wild fires, landslides, earthquakes, and other severe weather events.

(c) "First responder" means a volunteer firefighter, reserve law enforcement officer, or emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certified by this state.

(d) "Local jurisdiction" means any city, town, county, special purpose district, or other political subdivision of the state.

--- END ---