BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that transparency in higher education budgeting is essential to the maintenance of public trust in the higher education system. Such transparency is not only an appropriate check on future higher education cost increases, it should also counteract any perception that public institutions of higher education are not adequately accountable for student and taxpayer dollars. Therefore, to ensure general accessibility to meaningful budget information and to improve public confidence in the system, the legislature intends to require that administrative, academic, and auxiliary unit budgets of the public four-year institutions of higher education are posted on the education data center's data dashboard. The legislature intends that the public four-year institutions of higher education include a link to the unit budgets in a visible, easy to locate section on the institution's web site, along with a clear description of the information that can be found at the link. This will help the institutions of higher education increase transparency and accountability to the students, parents, and taxpayers they serve.

The legislature finds that placing the responsibility for posting unit budgets within the education data center takes advantage of the independence, expertise, and technology base within the education data center. The legislature intends that the education data center use information that is already being collected by the four-year public institutions of higher education for their own budgeting purposes and for the education data center.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.77.090 and 2013 c 23 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An accountability monitoring and reporting system is established as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance goals in higher education.

(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in other states, the following data must be reported to the education data center annually by December 1st, and at a minimum include data recommended by a national organization representing state chief executives. The education data center in consultation with the council may change the data requirements to be consistent with best practices across the country. This data must, to the maximum extent possible, be disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and include the following for the four-year institutions of higher education:

(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;

(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;

(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;

(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher education;

(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in years and average number of credits that graduating students took to earn a bachelor's degree;

(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in remedial mathematics, English, or both;

(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive academic years;

(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of credit during their first academic year;

(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;

(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed out of those attempted during an academic year;

(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences, computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including participation and degree completion rates for students from traditionally underrepresented populations;

(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education including by student level;

(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;

(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length, awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at the state level;

(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length, awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four years old with a high school diploma;

(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the institution;

(q) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation rates, and debt load shall be disaggregated for students in the following income brackets to the maximum extent possible:

(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;

(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family income; and

(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family income; and

(r) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of undergraduate instruction.

(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time first-year students.

(4) In conjunction with the office of financial management, all four-year institutions of higher education must display the data described in subsection (2) of this section in a uniform dashboard format on the office of financial management's web site no later than December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by December 1st. To the maximum extent possible, the information must be viewable by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet the needs of various target audiences such as students, parents, researchers, and the general public.

(5) The council shall use performance data from the education data center for the purposes of strategic planning, to report on progress toward achieving statewide goals, and to develop priorities proposed in the ten-year plan for higher education.

(6)(a) The state universities, regional universities, and the state college shall submit to the education data center the anticipated college-level revenues and expenditures made from state-appropriated funds and tuition revenue.

(i) The state universities shall submit the information to the education data center within ninety days of the board of regents adoption of the university's operating budget, beginning with the fiscal year 2021 operating budget.

(ii) The regional universities and the state college shall submit the information to the education data center within ninety days of the board of trustees adoption of the university's or college's operating budget, beginning with the fiscal year 2021 operating budget.

(b) The education data center must compile and display the information on the data dashboard by December 1st each year.

(c) The education data center must report the information to the higher education committees of the legislature each year by December 31st.

(d) The state universities, regional universities, and the state college shall each include on their web sites in a visible, easy to locate section, a link to the information on the education data center's web site that includes a description of the information available via the link.

--- END ---