BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.48.111 and 2009 c 245 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) First and secondary specialized forest products buyers and huckleberry buyers are required to record:

(i) If the person is a first specialized forest product buyer, the permit number or, if applicable, a sequentially numbered load ticket generated by the landowner or the landowner's agent that includes, at a minimum, all information required on a bill of lading and the forest practices application or notification number if the seller claims the specialized forest product in question is exempt from the permit requirements of this chapter, as provided in RCW 76.48.211, due to its harvest within the operational area defined by a valid forest practices application or notification under chapter 76.09 RCW;

(ii) Whether or not the products were accompanied by a bill of lading, authorization, or sales invoice;

(iii) The type of specialized forest product purchased, and, if applicable, an indication that huckleberries were purchased;

(iv) The name of the seller;

(v) The amount of specialized forest product or huckleberries purchased;

(vi) The date of delivery;

(vii) The name of the person driving the vehicle in which the specialized forest products were transported to the buyer, as confirmed by a visual inspection of the applicable driver's license, unless the buyer has previously recorded the driver's information in an accessible record; and

(viii) Except for transactions involving Christmas trees, the license plate number of the vehicle in which the specialized forest products were transported to the buyer.

(b) First and secondary specialized forest products buyers and huckleberry buyers shall keep a record of this information, along with any accompanying bill of lading, sales invoice, or authorization, for a period of one year from the date of purchase and must make the records available for inspection upon demand by enforcement officials authorized under RCW 76.48.181 to enforce this chapter.

(c) In lieu of a permit number or forest practices identification and load ticket number, the buyer may, when applicable, note that the seller claims that the products offered for sale are exempt from the permit requirements of this chapter under RCW 76.48.211, or were lawfully transported into Washington from out of state. All other information required by this section must be recorded.

(2) This section does not apply to buyers of specialized forest products at the retail sales level.

(3) Records of buyers of specialized forest products and huckleberries collected under this section may be made available to colleges and universities for the purpose of research.

--- END ---