BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the Washington state forest practices habitat conservation plan was approved in 2006 by the United States fish and wildlife service and the national oceanic and atmospheric administration's marine fisheries service. The legislature further finds that the conservation plan protects habitat of aquatic species, supports economically viable and healthy forests, and creates regulatory stability for landowners. The legislature further finds that funding for the adaptive management program and participation grants are required to implement the forest and fish agreement and meet the goals of the conservation plan. The legislature further finds that the surcharge on the timber products business and occupation tax rate was agreed to by the forest products industry, tribal leaders, and stakeholders as a way to provide funding and safeguard the future of the conservation plan. The legislature further finds that the forestry industry assumed significant financial obligation with the enactment of this conservation plan, in exchange for operational certainty under the endangered species act. Therefore, the legislature concludes that the timber products business and occupation tax rate and the surcharge should continue until the expiration date of the forest and fish agreement, in 2056.

(2) The legislature finds that Washington has one of the strongest economies in the country. However, the local economies in some rural counties continue to struggle. The legislature further finds that the economic prosperity of our state must be shared by all of our communities. The legislature further finds that forest product sectors provide family-wage jobs in economically struggling areas of the state. The legislature further finds that in 2017 the Washington forest products industry, directly and indirectly, employed one hundred one thousand workers, earning 5.5 billion dollars in wages. Therefore, the legislature concludes that the forest products industries support our local rural economies and contribute towards the effort to lower unemployment rates across the state, especially in rural areas.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.260 and 2018 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products; and

(e) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, (([or]))or field residue((,)) and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, ((2024))2036, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, ((2024))2036.

(b) Until July 1, ((2024))2036, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, ((2024))2036.

(c) Until July 1, ((2024))2036, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, ((2024))2036.

(d) Until July 1, ((2024))2036, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.261 and 2017 c 323 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) (a), (b), (c), and (d). ((The surcharge and this section expire July 1, 2024.))

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:

(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during any fiscal biennium; or

(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.

(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the later of the first day of October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least thirty days following the date that the office of financial management makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this section. The surcharge is imposed again on the first day of the following July.

(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the department must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this subsection.

(b) The department must adjust the surcharge by an amount that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge takes effect at the beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the date that the office of financial management makes the certification under subsection (5) of this section.

(d) The surcharge is imposed again at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.

(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of the surcharge imposed under this section.

(f) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the surcharge.

(5) The office of financial management must make the certification to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2036.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The provisions of RCW 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---