BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.700 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) In accordance with the requirements of this section, each school district must provide a report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction that includes the following information:

(i) A list of the career and technical education courses available to the district's students during the previous two school years, including those available through a skill center. Beginning September 1, 2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually post the information received under this subsection (1)(a)(i) on its web site;

(ii) The number of students enrolled in career and technical education courses offered by the district or accessed through a skill center;

(iii) A summary of annual outreach efforts by the district to provide students with information about career and technical education course offerings. The summary required by this subsection (1)(a)(iii) must include information about: The type of outreach; the personnel classification of the person conducting the outreach; and the intended recipients of the outreach efforts;

(iv) The faculty-student ratio in the career and technical education courses offered by the district, available to the district's students through a skill center, or both;

(v) An indication of whether the career and technical instruction is offered on the school campus, at a skill center, or both;

(vi) The career cluster of the offered courses;

(vii) The nature and number of industry partnerships related to career and technical education courses available to students of the district; and

(viii) The number and type of general and program specific advisory boards in the district that advise career and technical education curriculum and instruction, including a summary of the composition of the boards, board recruiting practices, and the frequency of their meetings.

(b) Each school district must provide the initial report required by this subsection (1) to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by May 1, 2021, and must provide subsequent reports annually on or before each May 1st. Each school district must post the reports required by this subsection (1) on its web site upon providing a report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction as required by this subsection (1)(b).

(2) Beginning September 1, 2021, and every two years thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, provide the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate with a report summarizing the information provided by the school districts under subsection (1) of this section. The report required by this subsection (2) must also include recommendations for improving the content of career and technical education courses, including their alignment with industry requirements, and the delivery of career and technical education instruction.

--- END ---