BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.030 and 2014 c 216 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing body of any county or city, while not required by legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the purposes authorized by this chapter, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such tax must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county or city as the case may be. This sales and use tax does not apply to natural or manufactured gas, except for natural gas that is used as a transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310 and is taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of such tax imposed by a county is ((five-tenths of)) one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax imposed by a city may not exceed ((five-tenths of)) one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). However, in the event a county imposes a sales and use tax under this subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this subsection by any city therein may not exceed four hundred and twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent.

(2) In addition to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the governing body of any county or city may by resolution or ordinance impose an additional sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such additional tax must be collected upon the same taxable events upon which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section is imposed. The rate of such additional tax imposed by a county is up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a city is up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). However, in the event a county imposes a sales and use tax under the authority of this subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate imposed under the authority of this subsection by a city within the county, the county must receive fifteen percent of the city tax. In the event that the county imposes a sales and use tax under the authority of this subsection at a rate which is less than the rate imposed under this subsection by a city within the county, the county must receive that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of the rate of tax imposed by the county under the authority of this subsection. The authority to impose a tax under this subsection is intended in part to compensate local government for any losses from the phaseout of the property tax on business inventories.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.020 and 2014 c 140 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six ((and five-tenths)) percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:

(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and

(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.

(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:

(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of marijuana;

(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and

(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.

(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.

(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.

(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---