BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that the Puget Sound region is faced with growing traffic congestion and must improve mobility for people and goods by maximizing the effectiveness of the freeway system. Investments in the Interstate 405, state route number 167, and state route number 509 corridors are essential for providing benefits for the movement of vehicles and people. Further, the legislature recognizes that in 2015, the passage of the connecting Washington transportation revenue proposal assumed that tolling would be a component of projects on these corridors.

(2) The legislature recognizes that completion of state route number 167 in Pierce county and completion of state route number 509 in King county provide essential connections to the Port of Tacoma and the Port of Seattle and will help ensure people and goods move more reliably through the Puget Sound region. The completion of these corridors, known as the Gateway project, will play an essential role in enhancing the state's economic competitiveness, both nationally and globally.

(3) The legislature acknowledges that as one of the most congested freeway sections in the state, the combined Interstate number 405 and state route number 167 corridor in King county serves as an ideal candidate for an express toll lanes network. The express toll lanes network provides a tool for managing the use of high occupancy vehicle lanes while generating funds to improve projects in the corridor.

(4) Therefore, it is the intent of this act to expedite the delivery of the Puget Sound Gateway project, designate the Puget Sound Gateway project as an eligible toll facility, and authorize the imposition of tolls on the Puget Sound Gateway facility. It is further the intent of this act to direct the department of transportation to develop and operate an express toll lanes corridor on Interstate 405 from the city of Lynnwood on the north end to the intersection of state route number 167 and state route number 512 on the south end.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right-of-way, and construction of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 eligible toll facility projects, as allowed in RCW 47.56.880, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the department of transportation a total of one billion five hundred million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington first payable from toll revenue and excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in accordance with section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Upon the request of the department, the state finance committee shall supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of bonds authorized by this act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts, and at the price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this act shall be deposited in the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes operations account created under RCW 47.56.884 and shall be available only for the purposes enumerated in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (section 1 of this act), for the payment of bond anticipation notes or other interim financing, if any, capitalizing interest on the bonds, and for the payment of bond issuance costs, including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Bonds issued under the authority of this section and sections 2, 6, and 7 of this act shall distinctly state that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay such principal and interest as the same shall become due. The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be first payable in the manner provided in this section and sections 2, 6, and 7 of this act from toll revenue and then from proceeds of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels to the extent toll revenue is not available for that purpose. Toll revenue and the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapter 82.38 RCW are hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the authority of this section and sections 2, 6, and 7 of this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 eligible toll facility, and on any other eligible toll facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, and excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of this section and sections 2, 6, and 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. For bonds issued under the authority of this section and sections 2, 5, and 7 of this act, the state treasurer shall first withdraw toll revenue from the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes operations account created under RCW 47.56.884, and, to the extent toll revenue is not available, excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the toll facility bond retirement account, or a special subaccount in the account, such amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.

Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by this section and sections 2, 5, and 7 of this act shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is, or may be, appropriated to the department for state highway purposes. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against any other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall be repaid from available toll revenue in the manner provided in the bond proceedings or, if toll revenue is not available for that purpose, from the first excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds. Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by this section and sections 2, 5, and 7 of this act shall be reimbursed to the motor vehicle fund from toll revenue in the manner and with the priority specified in the bond proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Bonds issued under the authority of sections 2, 5, and 6 of this act and this section and any other general obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuel excise taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and special fuel excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. If and to the extent that the state finance committee determines, in consultation with the department and the tolling authority, that it will be beneficial for the state to issue any bonds authorized in sections 2 and 5 through 7 of this act as toll revenue bonds rather than as general obligation bonds, the state finance committee is authorized to issue and sell, upon the request of the department, such bonds as toll revenue bonds and not as general obligation bonds. Notwithstanding section 5 of this act, each such bond shall contain a recital that payment or redemption of the bond and payment of the interest and any premium thereon is payable solely from and secured solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien upon toll revenue and is not a general obligation of the state to which the full faith and credit of the state is pledged.

Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 eligible toll facility, and on any other eligible toll facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 47.10.882 and 2011 c 377 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The toll facility bond retirement account is created in the state treasury for the purpose of payment of the principal of and interest and premium on bonds. Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 ((and)), chapter 377, Laws of 2011, and chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (this act) shall be payable from the toll facility bond retirement account. The state finance committee may provide that special subaccounts be created in the account to facilitate payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings.

Sec. 10. RCW 47.10.887 and 2011 c 377 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state finance committee may determine and include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds under chapter 498, Laws of 2009 ((and)), chapter 377, Laws of 2011, and chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (this act), such terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions as it may deem appropriate in order to assist with the marketing and sale of the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights of the owners of bonds including, among other things:

(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible toll facilities;

(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll revenue;

(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely by toll revenue as provided by RCW 47.10.886, or shall be payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit of the state as provided in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.883 through 47.10.885;

(4) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely by toll revenue as provided by section 8 of this act, or shall be payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit of the state as provided in sections 2 and 5 through 7 of this act;

(5) In consultation with the department of transportation and the tolling authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to debt service on bonds;

(((5)))(6) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;

(((6)))(7) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged, or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with respect to toll revenue only; and

(((7)))(8) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities must first be approved by the department of transportation.

The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon the tolling authority and the department of transportation and their respective officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken by them or by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of eligible toll facilities and in connection with the collection, deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of the proceeds of the bonds and toll revenue.

Sec. 11. RCW 47.10.888 and 2011 c 377 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 ((and)), chapter 377, Laws of 2011, and chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (this act), "toll revenue" means all toll receipts, all interest income derived from the investment of toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds received for the benefit of transportation facilities in the state, including eligible toll facilities. However, for the purpose of any pledge of toll revenue to the payment of particular bonds issued under chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and chapter 377, Laws of 2011, "toll revenue" means and includes only such toll revenue or portion thereof that is pledged to the payment of those bonds in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. Toll revenue constitutes "fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any undertaking, facility, or project" as that phrase is used in Article VIII, section 1(c)(1) of the state Constitution.

(2) For the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 ((and)), chapter 377, Laws of 2011, and chapter . . ., Laws of 2019 (this act), "tolling authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 47.56.810.

Sec. 12. RCW 47.56.880 and 2011 c 369 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The imposition of tolls for express toll lanes on Interstate 405 between ((the junctions with)) Interstate 5 on the north end ((and NE 6th Street)) in the city of ((Bellevue))Lynnwood and Interstate 5 on the south end in the city of Tukwila, and for state route number 167 between Interstate 405 on the north end and state route number 512 on the south end is authorized((,)). Interstate 405 ((is))and state route number 167 are designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue generated in the corridor must only be expended on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 projects as identified in the project list incorporated in the omnibus transportation appropriations act and as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.

(2) Tolls for the express toll lanes must be set as follows:

(a) The schedule of toll rates must be set by the tolling authority pursuant to RCW 47.56.850. Toll rates may vary in amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the highway facility, or other criteria, as the tolling authority deems appropriate.

(b) In those locations with two express toll lanes in each direction, the toll rate must be the same in both lanes.

(c) Toll charges may not be assessed on transit buses and vanpools.

(d) The department shall establish performance standards for travel time, speed, and reliability for the express toll lanes ((project)). The department must automatically adjust the toll rate within the schedule established by the tolling authority, using dynamic tolling, to ensure ((that average vehicle speeds in the lanes remain above forty-five miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak hours))the most efficient movement of traffic.

(e) The tolling authority shall periodically review the toll rates against traffic performance of all lanes to determine if the toll rates are effectively maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability on the highway facilities.

(3) ((The department may construct and operate express toll lanes on Interstate 405 between the city of Bellevue on the south end and Interstate 5 on the north end. Operation of the express toll lanes may not commence until the department has completed capacity improvements necessary to provide a two-lane system from NE 6th Street in the city of Bellevue to state route number 522 and the conversion of the existing high occupancy vehicle lane to an express toll lane between state route number 522 and the city of Lynnwood. Construction of the capacity improvements described in this subsection, including items that enable implementation of express toll lanes such as conduit and other underground features, must begin as soon as practicable. However, any contract term regarding tolling equipment, such as gantries, barriers, or cameras, for Interstate 405 may not take effect unless specific appropriation authority is provided in 2012 stating that funding is provided solely for tolling equipment on Interstate 405.)) The department shall work with local jurisdictions to minimize and monitor impacts to local streets and, after consultation with local jurisdictions, recommend mitigation measures to the legislature in those locations where it is appropriate.

(4) The department shall monitor the express toll lanes ((project)) and shall annually report until December 31, 2030, to the transportation commission and the legislature on the impacts from the project on the following performance measures:

(a) Whether the express toll lanes maintain speeds of forty-five miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak periods, or an alternate metric determined by the department in conjunction with the federal highway administration;

(b) Whether the average traffic speed changed in the general purpose lanes;

(c) Whether transit ridership changed;

(d) Whether the actual use of the express toll lanes is consistent with the projected use;

(e) Whether the express toll lanes generated sufficient revenue to pay for all ((Interstate 405)) express toll lane-related operating costs; and

(f) Whether travel times and volumes have increased or decreased on adjacent local streets and state highways((; and

(g) Whether the actual gross revenues are consistent with projected gross revenues as identified in the fiscal note for Engrossed House Bill No. 1382 distributed by the office of financial management on March 15, 2011.

(5) If after two years of operation of the express toll lanes on Interstate 405 performance measures listed in subsection (4)(a) and (e) of this section are not being met, the express toll lanes project must be terminated as soon as practicable)).

(((6)))(5) The department, in consultation with the transportation commission, shall consider making operational changes necessary to fix any unintended consequences of implementing the express toll lanes ((project)).

(((7)))(6) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the express toll lanes established under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 13. RCW 47.56.884 and 2011 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes operations account is created in the motor vehicle fund. All revenues received by the department as toll charges collected from Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lane users must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation((.))consistent with RCW 47.56.820((, expenditures from the account may be used for debt service, planning, administration, construction, maintenance, operation, repair, rebuilding, enforcement, and the expansion of express toll lanes on Interstate 405)). It is the legislature's intent to use toll revenue to fund the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 projects as identified in the project list incorporated in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. It is the intent of the legislature that the Puget Sound Gateway project be advanced in order to maximize net mobility benefits for both freight and the traveling public. It is the intent of the legislature for tolling to begin on stage one of the project sooner than currently planned in order to leverage toll funds, advance one hundred twenty-nine million dollars of connecting Washington--state funds by two biennia to the 2023-2025 biennium, and advance local and federal contributions, as identified in the project list incorporated in the omnibus transportation appropriations act. This will allow the department of transportation to deliver and open to the public stage two of the project in fiscal year 2028, three years earlier than originally planned, and to realize twenty million dollars in cost savings in connecting Washington--state funds at the end of the project to be used on other emergent needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. (1) The Puget Sound Gateway project is designated an eligible toll facility, tolls are authorized to be imposed on the Puget Sound Gateway facility, and toll revenue generated must be expended only as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.

(2)(a) In setting toll rates for the Puget Sound Gateway facility, pursuant to RCW 47.56.850, the tolling authority shall set a variable schedule of toll rates to maintain travel time, speed, and reliability on the Puget Sound Gateway facility.

(b) The tolling authority may adjust toll rates to reflect inflation as measured by the consumer price index or as necessary for those costs that are eligible under RCW 47.56.820 and to meet the obligations of the tolling authority under RCW 47.56.850.

(3) For the purposes of this section and section 16 of this act, "Puget Sound Gateway facility" means the state route number 167 roadway between north Meridian Avenue in Puyallup and Interstate 5 in Fife, the state route number 509 spur between Interstate 5 in Fife and state route number 509 in Tacoma, and the state route number 509 roadway between south 188th street and Interstate 5 in SeaTac.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A special account to be known as the Puget Sound Gateway facility account is created in the motor vehicle fund.

(1) Deposits to the account must include:

(a) All proceeds of bonds and loans issued for the Puget Sound Gateway project, including capitalized interest;

(b) All tolls and other revenues received from the operation of the Puget Sound Gateway facility, to be deposited at least monthly;

(c) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment of those revenues;

(d) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any surplus real property acquired for completing the Puget Sound Gateway project, including existing state route number 509 right-of-way in SeaTac and Des Moines; and

(e) All damages liquidated or otherwise, collected under any contract involving the Puget Sound Gateway project.

(2) Subject to the covenants made by the state in the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds for the construction of the Puget Sound Gateway project, toll charges, other revenues, and interest received from the operations of the Puget Sound Gateway facility may be used to:

(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and

(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.

(3) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer shall transfer funds from the Puget Sound Gateway facility account to the motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds issued for the construction of the Puget Sound Gateway project in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle fund for amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond retirement fund to provide for any bond principal and interest due on that date. The state treasurer may establish subaccounts for segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other revenues.

(4) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.84.092 and 2018 c 287 s 7, 2018 c 275 s 10, and 2018 c 203 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. RCW 47.56.403 (High occupancy toll lane pilot project) and 2017 c 313 s 712, 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 705, 2013 c 306 s 709, 2011 c 367 s 709, & 2005 c 312 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. Sections 15 and 16 of this act are each added to chapter 47.56 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of "toll facilities created after July 1, 2008."

--- END ---