BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the last workday of the first and third calendar quarters, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection (2) of this section from the general fund to the motor vehicle fund. The first two transfers under this subsection (1) must occur by September 30, 2019, and April 30, 2020.

(2) The department must estimate the state general fund revenues derived from expenditures by the state department of transportation. The department must perform the estimate for tax collections in the immediately preceding third and fourth calendar quarters for the April transfer under subsection (1) of this section and tax collections in the immediately preceding first and second calendar quarters for the September transfer under subsection (1) of this section. The department must notify the state treasurer of this amount at least twenty days prior to the April or September transfer under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Digital product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.192.

(b) "Expenditures by the state department of transportation" means amounts paid by the state department of transportation with respect to the purchase of any tangible personal property, digital product, or labor, which is subject to state sales or use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfers under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The one Washington road account is created in the motor vehicle fund. Money in the account must be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for highway purposes identified in the omnibus transportation budget and to pay the principal and interest on the bonds authorized for one Washington road account projects or improvements. For the purposes of this section "highway purposes" has the same meaning as provided in Article II, section 40 of the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must deposit into the one Washington road account all revenue received from taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon the sale of, use of, or charge made for:

(a) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire, or otherwise of persons or property, including fixed loads and facilities for human habitation; but not including: (i) Dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers, lumber carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other automotive equipment not designed primarily for use upon public streets or highways, (ii) motor vehicles or their trailers used entirely upon private property, or (iii) mobile homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.302;

(b) Travel trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.623;

(c) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;

(d) Materials, labor, equipment, contracts, and components used for building, repairing, or improving of any publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle as described in RCW 82.04.050; and

(e) Construction, improvement, or repair of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by the Washington state ferries or for the repair, overhaul, or the dry docking of any ferry operated by the Washington state ferries.

(2) The department must deposit revenue received under subsection (1) of this section into the one Washington road account, created in section 3 of this act, as follows:

(a) Twenty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2022;

(b) Forty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2023;

(c) Sixty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2024;

(d) Eighty percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2025; and

(e) One hundred percent of all revenue received during fiscal year 2026 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---