BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All new signs that pertain to land use restrictions or closures must include a reference to the supporting section of the Revised Code of Washington or Washington Administrative Code, or to other legal authority.

(2) The department shall update existing sign standards and policies to ensure that all signs pertaining to land use restrictions or closures include a reference to the supporting section of the Revised Code of Washington or Washington Administrative Code, or to other legal authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All new signs that pertain to land use restrictions or closures must include a reference to the supporting section of the Revised Code of Washington or Washington Administrative Code, or to other legal authority.

(2) The department shall update existing sign standards and policies to ensure that all signs pertaining to land use restrictions or closures include a reference to the supporting section of the Revised Code of Washington or Washington Administrative Code, or to other legal authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies prospectively. Nothing in this act requires any agency of state government to increase or change its existing sign update, replacement, or removal schedules. Agencies should use any remaining stock of signs.

--- END ---