BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, from the general fund to the state military department for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall contract with a vendor to include as part of the enhanced 911 emergency service the ability to allow an immediate display on the screen indicating that a person with a disability may be present at the scene of an emergency, the caller's identification, location, phone number, address, and if made available, additional information on the person with a disability that would assist the first responder in the emergency response.

(2) The department must:

(a) Submit a request for proposal to solicit information for how to identify the resources, capabilities, techniques, protocols, and procedures available or required to purchase an alert system or to develop, maintain, and operate an alert system capable of accomplishing the full intent of subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Select a vender that ensures the system is fully encrypted and able to collect, protect, and display the information only when needed by authorized personnel. The vendor must:

(i) Ensure that all information provided by either the person with a disability or the person's caretaker is voluntary in nature;

(ii) Not use this information for a commercial purpose; and

(iii) Keep the data set confidential. No part of the disability information is disclosable; and

(c) Report the actual costs of vendor contracts for the implementation and ongoing annual licenses and maintenance of the system to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

All information provided by either the person with a disability or the person's caretaker for the purposes of the alert system under section 2 of this act, whether maintained by a state or local agency or maintained by an agency or a vendor with whom an agency has contracted, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

--- END ---