BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the budget estimates required under RCW 43.88.090(1), when submitting biennial budget requests to the governor for the ensuing biennium, each agency must provide the governor with budget requests based on the following percentages of the current biennium's appropriation levels: Ninety percent, one hundred percent, one hundred ten percent. For each of these appropriation levels, the agency must provide analysis of the impact on the agency's activities, using the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements developed under RCW 43.88.090.

--- END ---