BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature acknowledges that efforts by high schools to prepare students to transition from their educational environment into the labor market often follow an outdated model that focuses almost solely on college preparation. Sixty years of using this model has resulted in a labor market crisis. Over half of college graduates are underemployed or unemployed because their degree is not in demand and may never be in demand. In contrast, the trades demand seven million workers and this number is growing.

(2) The legislature finds that WorkSource in the Washington employment security department provides free employment and training services for job seekers, such as interest assessments, job listings, resume and application assistance, access to computers and other equipment, and training referrals. Many public high schools are not using WorkSource's critical resources. Instead, some are paying for services and resources that are substantially similar to those provided by WorkSource.

(3) The legislature intends to increase the effective use of state resources by requiring public high schools to partner with WorkSource to promote the use of its employment and training services. In addition, the legislature intends to require that public school students register for WorkSource in the eleventh grade. In this way, public high schools will save money, career preparation will be more consistent across the state, and youth will be better prepared to enter the labor market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to increase students' posthigh school job readiness, school districts must partner with the employment security department to promote the use of employment and training services for job seekers provided by a partnership of state, local, and nonprofit agencies, known as WorkSource. These employment and training services, such as interest assessments, job listings, resume and application assistance, access to computers and other equipment, and training referrals, may be available either online or in-person at job centers located across the state.

(2) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year, school districts must require students to register for the employment and training services described in subsection (1) of this section during the eleventh grade. Students may use either a student's social security number or state student identification number to register.

(3) Each school district must enter a data-sharing agreement with the employment security department so that school district staff can assist students in registering for and using the employment and training services described in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 50.08 RCW to read as follows:

The employment security department must enter data-sharing agreements with school districts so that school district staff can assist students in registering for and using the employment and training services for job seekers provided by a partnership of state, local, and nonprofit agencies, known as WorkSource, as required under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---