BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Washington is home to approximately fifty-eight thousand women veterans and women comprise ten percent of the nation's veteran population. Women have served through all periods of United States history, whether fighting in disguise or as spies during the American Revolution and Civil War; as nurses, truck drivers, intelligence analysts, and airplane mechanics in World War II; or as helicopter pilots in combat zones in Afghanistan and Iraq. Today approximately ten thousand five hundred women are on active duty in Washington state, and women are the fastest growing segment of the veteran population, with one million nine hundred thousand women veterans representing every branch of the military living nationwide, a number that is expected to increase over the next ten years. To honor the sacrifice and contributions of women veterans to our country, recognize their unique life experiences, and raise greater awareness of the need for services and support for women veterans, the legislature hereby creates the women veterans special license plate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The women veterans account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to maintain effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of the funds.

(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds generated by the issuance of the women veterans special license plate under RCW 46.18.200.

(3) All receipts from the sale of the women veterans special license plates as required under RCW 46.17.220 must be deposited into the women veterans account.

(4) All moneys deposited into the women veterans account must be used by the department for activities that benefit women service members, women veterans, or their families. Funds from the account may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the department.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.17.220 and 2019 c 384 s 2 and 2019 c 177 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(1) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(2) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(3) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(4) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(5) Collector vehicle

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(6) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(7) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(8) Fred Hutch

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(9) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(10) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(11) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(12) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(13) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(14) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(15) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(16) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(17) Purple Heart

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(18) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(19) San Juan Islands

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(20) Seattle Mariners

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(21) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(22) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(23) Seattle Storm

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(24) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(25) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(26) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(27) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(28) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(29) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(30) Washington farmers and ranchers

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(31) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(32) Washington state aviation

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(33) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(34) Washington state wrestling

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(35) Washington tennis

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(36) Washington's fish collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(37) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(38) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(39) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(40) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(41) Women veterans

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

Sec. 4. RCW 46.18.200 and 2019 c 384 s 1 and 2019 c 177 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the department:

(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates unless otherwise specified;

(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the department;

(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW; and

(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.

(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special license plates:

LICENSE PLATE

DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

4-H

Displays the "4-H" logo.

Armed forces collection

Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty military personnel, reservists, and members of the national guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and national guard.

Breast cancer awareness

Displays a pink ribbon symbolizing breast cancer awareness.

Endangered wildlife

Displays a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.

Fred Hutch

Displays the Fred Hutch logo.

Gonzaga University alumni association

Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak

Recognizes an organization that supports programs that provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe

Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial

Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.

Music matters

Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics

Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who are members of the Washington state council of firefighters.

San Juan Islands

Displays a symbol or artwork recognizing the San Juan Islands.

Seattle Mariners

Displays the "Seattle Mariners" logo.

Seattle Seahawks

Displays the "Seattle Seahawks" logo.

Seattle Sounders FC

Displays the "Seattle Sounders FC" logo.

Seattle Storm

Displays the "Seattle Storm" logo.

Seattle University

Recognizes Seattle University.

Share the road

Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington

Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

State flower

Recognizes the Washington state flower.

Volunteer firefighters

Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington farmers and ranchers

Recognizes farmers and ranchers in Washington state.

Washington lighthouses

Recognizes an organization that supports selected Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education programs.

Washington state aviation

Displays a Stearman biplane in the foreground with an image of Mount Rainier in the background.

Washington state parks

Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural, cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington state wrestling

Promotes and supports college wrestling in the state of Washington.

Washington tennis

Builds awareness and year-round opportunities for tennis in Washington state. Displays a symbol or artwork recognizing tennis in Washington state.

Washington's fish collection

Recognizes Washington's fish.

Washington's national park fund

Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and supports priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wildlife collection

Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets

Recognizes an organization that assists local member agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington

Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

Women veterans

Recognizes women veterans.

(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof of eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state council of firefighters.

(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ten years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service before ten years of service have been completed, the volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in service for at least ten years and then leaves, the license plate may be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.68.425 and 2016 c 31 s 3 and 2016 c 30 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;

(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and

(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.

(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE

ACCOUNT

CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces

RCW 43.60A.140

As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)

Breast cancer awareness

RCW 43.70.327

Must be used only by the department of health for efforts consistent with the breast, cervical, and colon health program

Endangered wildlife

RCW 77.12.170

Must be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activities

Keep kids safe

RCW 43.121.100

As specified in RCW 43.121.100

Purple Heart

RCW 43.60A.140

As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)

Washington state parks

RCW 79A.05.059

Provide public educational opportunities and enhancement of Washington state parks

Washington's fish collection

RCW 77.12.170

Only for the department of fish and wildlife's use to support steelhead species management activities including, but not limited to, activities supporting conservation, recovery, and research to promote healthy, fishable steelhead

Washington's wildlife collection

RCW 77.12.170

Only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species management activities

Wild on Washington

RCW 77.12.170

Dedicated to the department of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as defined in RCW 77.32.560

Women veterans

section 2 of this act

As specified in section 2(4) of this act

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Women veterans special license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing the efforts of women veterans in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---