BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that military spouses make enormous sacrifices in supporting the mission and service of their service members, by leaving their support systems, jobs, and careers. Such sacrifices become harder when resources are not available to assist these spouses transition to new job and career opportunities while living in a new state. The legislature intends to create a liaison whose duties will focus on providing these critical supports to military spouses when they relocate to the state of Washington. The legislature also encourages the United States military to partner with Washington in supporting these necessary investments. The legislature intends to create these initial supports with the hopes that the federal government will make these critical investments in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The position of military spouse liaison is created within the department.

(2) The duties of the military spouse liaison include, but are not limited to:

(a) Conducting outreach to and advocating on behalf of military spouses in Washington;

(b) Providing assistance and information to military spouses seeking professional licenses and credentials or other employment in Washington; and

(c) Researching issues facing military spouses and creating informational materials to assist military spouses and their families.

(3) The military spouse liaison is encouraged to periodically report on the work of the liaison to the relevant committees of the legislature and participate in policy development relating to military spouses.

--- END ---