BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.16.100 and 1998 c 345 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All sums paid to the commission under this chapter, including those sums collected for license fees and excluding those sums collected under RCW 67.16.102 and 67.16.105(3), ((shall))must be disposed of by the commission as follows: One hundred percent thereof ((shall))must be retained by the commission for the payment of the salaries of its members, secretary, clerical, office, and other help and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. ((No salary, wages, expenses, or compensation of any kind shall be paid by the state in connection with the work of the commission.))

(2) Any moneys collected or paid to the commission under the terms of this chapter and not expended at the close of the fiscal biennium ((shall))must be paid to the state treasurer and be placed in the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115. The commission may, with the approval of the office of financial management, retain any sum required for working capital.

--- END ---