BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town may not adopt or enforce an ordinance, order, resolution, or rule that prohibits or regulates, including by requiring a license, permit, or fee, the occasional sale of lemonade or other nonalcoholic beverages from a stand on private property by any person under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

A county may not adopt or enforce an ordinance, order, resolution, or rule that prohibits or regulates, including by requiring a license, permit, or fee, the occasional sale of lemonade or other nonalcoholic beverages from a stand on private property by any person under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---