BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In 2017, the legislature directed the department of fish and wildlife to conduct a budget and performance assessment.

That assessment identified a structural deficit in the current state wildlife account, which does not differentiate between restricted use revenues and nonrestricted revenues.

The legislature intends to increase transparency and accountability to the public by clearly dividing restricted and nonrestricted revenues into two separate accounts.

This act does not alter any current legal restrictions on revenue uses or alter the amounts of revenue collected.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.070 and 2019 c 249 s 1, 2019 c 135 s 1, and 2019 c 46 s 5004 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.

The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:

(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;

(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;

(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;

(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.90, 7.92, or 7.94 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26B.020, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26A.470;

(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;

(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or

(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person.

No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.

(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.

(b) The issuing authority shall deny a permit to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law.

(c) (a) and (b) of this subsection apply whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.

(d) A background check for an original license must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the issuing authority. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the issuing authority. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions.

(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.

(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.

The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by aliens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.

A photograph of the applicant may be required as part of the application and printed on the face of the license.

The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.

The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this subsection.

(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.

The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;

(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;

(d) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and

(e) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.

(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.

The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;

(c) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and

(d) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.

(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.

(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.

(9)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and

(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.

(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.

(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.

(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.

(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:

(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;

(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or

(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

(14) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this subsection (14) shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection (14) shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.

(15)(a) By October 1, 2019, law enforcement agencies that issue concealed pistol licenses shall develop and implement a procedure for the renewal of concealed pistol licenses through a mail application process, and may develop an online renewal application process, for any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service.

(b) A person applying for a license renewal under this subsection shall:

(i) Provide a copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service;

(ii) Apply for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license; and

(iii) Pay the renewal licensing fee under subsection (6) of this section, and, if applicable, the late renewal penalty under subsection (9) of this section.

(c) A license renewed under this subsection takes effect on the expiration date of the prior license and is valid for a period of one year.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.84.092 and 2019 c 421 s 15, 2019 c 403 s 14, 2019 c 365 s 19, 2019 c 287 s 19, and 2019 c 95 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, ((the state wildlife account,)) the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.68.435 and 2010 c 161 s 821 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All revenue derived from personalized license plate fees provided for in RCW 46.17.210 must be forwarded to the state treasurer and deposited as follows:

(a) Ten dollars to the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account and used for the management of resources associated with the nonconsumptive use of wildlife;

(b) Two dollars to the wildlife rehabilitation account created under RCW 77.12.471; and

(c) The remainder to the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account to be used for the preservation, protection, perpetuation, and enhancement of nongame species of wildlife including, but not limited to, song birds, raptors, protected wildlife, rare and endangered wildlife, aquatic life, and specialized-habitat types, both terrestrial and aquatic, as well as all unclassified marine fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates.

(2) Administrative costs incurred by the department as a direct result of administering the personalized license plate program must be appropriated by the legislature from the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account from those funds deposited in the account resulting from the sale of personalized license plates. If the actual costs incurred by the department are less than that which has been appropriated by the legislature, the remainder must revert to the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.12.170 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established in the state treasury the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account which consists of moneys received from:

(a) ((Rentals or concessions of the department;

(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;

(c) The assessment of administrative penalties;

(d) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW and application fees;

(e) Fees for informational materials published by the department;

(f))) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and Endangered Wildlife license plates, Washington's Wildlife license plate collection, and Washington's fish license plate collection as provided in chapter 46.17 RCW;

(((g) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;

(h) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320. However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant to RCW 77.15.425;

(i) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(j)))(b) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the commission;

(((k)))(c) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560;

(((l)))(d) Moneys received from the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be dedicated to stewardship, operations, and maintenance of department lands used for public recreation purposes; ((and

(m) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039))(e) Fees for informational materials published by the department;

(f) Those portions of the sale of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, endorsements, and application fees that are specified for a limited purpose within chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW; and

(g) Income directed to the limited fish and wildlife account by any other statute not listed in this subsection.

(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account.

(3) There is established in the state treasury the fish, wildlife, and conservation account that consists of moneys received from:

(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;

(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;

(c) The assessment of administrative penalties;

(d) Those portions of the sale of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, endorsements, and application fees that are not specified for a limited purpose within chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW;

(e) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under RCW 77.12.140;

(f) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(g) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039;

(h) Income directed to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account by any other statute not listed in this subsection.

(4) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (3) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account.

(5) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320 must be deposited into the special wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.323. However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages and court-ordered restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited in the enforcement reward account pursuant to RCW 77.15.425.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.12.177 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account:

(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title; and

(b) Moneys received for damages to fish, shellfish, or wildlife.

(2) Beginning with fiscal year 2018, and each fiscal year thereafter, the director must determine both the total amount of fees deposited in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account for the sale of commercial licenses required under this title, and the portion of those fees that is attributable to the fee increases enacted in chapter 8, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. The director must certify these amounts to the state treasurer, who must transfer the difference between these two amounts to the state general fund within one month of the close of the fiscal year. The portion of those fees that is attributable to the fee increases enacted in chapter 8, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. is retained in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account.

(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.

(4) Proceeds from the sale of fish or shellfish taken in test fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.

(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from state general funded hatcheries by the department shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement group account established in RCW 77.95.090.

(6) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and enforcement.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.12.184 and 2009 c 333 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall deposit all moneys received from the following activities into the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3):

(a) The sale of interpretive, recreational, historical, educational, and informational literature and materials;

(b) The sale of advertisements in regulation pamphlets and other appropriate mediums; and

(c) Enrollment fees in department-sponsored educational training events.

(2) Moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be spent primarily for producing regulation booklets for users and for the development, production, reprinting, and distribution of informational and educational materials. The department may also spend these moneys for necessary expenses associated with training activities, and other activities as determined by the director.

(3) Regulation pamphlets may be subsidized through appropriate advertising, but must be made available free of charge to the users.

(4) The director may enter into joint ventures with other agencies and organizations to generate revenue for providing public information and education on wildlife and hunting and fishing rules.

Sec. 8. RCW 77.12.190 and 2009 c 333 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Moneys in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account and fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170 may be used only for the purposes of this title, including the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects.

Sec. 9. RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall maintain and manage real or personal property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and maintenance of the property.

The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3): PROVIDED, That the commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.

If the commission determines that real or personal property held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department, the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public interest.

If the state acquired real property with use limited to specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to sale.

Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3).

Sec. 10. RCW 77.12.230 and 2009 c 333 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may pay lawful local improvement district assessments for projects that may benefit wildlife or wildlife-oriented recreation made against lands held by the state for department purposes. The payments may be made from money appropriated from the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) to the department.

Sec. 11. RCW 77.12.240 and 2009 c 333 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may authorize the removal or killing of wildlife that is destroying or injuring property, or when it is necessary for wildlife management or research.

(2) The department shall dispose of wildlife taken or possessed by them under this title in the manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state. Proceeds from sales shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3).

Sec. 12. RCW 77.12.323 and 2012 c 187 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established in the state ((wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170))treasury a special wildlife account. Moneys received under RCW 77.12.320 as now or hereafter amended as compensation for wildlife losses shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to the special wildlife account.

(2) The state treasurer may invest and reinvest the surplus as provided by RCW 43.84.080.

Sec. 13. RCW 77.12.380 and 2009 c 333 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of a request under RCW 77.12.360, the commissioner of public lands shall determine if the withdrawal would benefit the people of the state. If the withdrawal would be beneficial, the commissioner shall have the lands appraised for their lease value. Before withdrawal, the department shall transmit to the commissioner a voucher authorizing payment from the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) in favor of the fund for which the lands are held. The payment shall equal the amount of the lease value for the duration of the withdrawal.

Sec. 14. RCW 77.12.390 and 2009 c 333 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of a voucher under RCW 77.12.380, the commissioner of public lands shall withdraw the lands from lease. The commissioner shall forward the voucher to the state treasurer, who shall draw a warrant against the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) in favor of the fund for which the withdrawn lands are held.

Sec. 15. RCW 77.12.670 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, the department, after soliciting recommendations from the public, shall select the design for the migratory bird stamp.

(2) All revenue derived from the sale of migratory bird license validations or stamps by the department to any person hunting waterfowl or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for migratory waterfowl hunters as determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those migratory waterfowl projects specified by the director of the department for the acquisition and development of migratory waterfowl habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection, and propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state. Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may not be used on lands controlled by private hunting clubs or on private lands that charge a fee for public access. Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may be used for migratory waterfowl projects on private land where public hunting is provided by written permission or on areas established by the department as waterfowl hunting closures.

(3) All revenue derived from the sale of the license validation and stamp by the department to persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl migratory birds shall be deposited in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters as determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those nonwaterfowl migratory bird projects specified by the director for the acquisition and development of nonwaterfowl migratory bird habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection, and propagation of nonwaterfowl migratory birds in the state.

(4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and stamp sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors, the department shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl hunters and solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the yearly migratory bird hunter harvest information program survey results or, in the event that these results are not available, other similar survey results. A two-year average of the most recent survey results shall be used to determine the proportion of the revenue attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed to solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year. For fiscal year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and four percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to solely nonwaterfowl migratory game hunters.

(5) Acquisition shall include but not be limited to the acceptance of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the rental, lease, or purchase of real estate or any interest therein. If the department acquires any fee interest, leasehold, or rental interest in real property under this section, it shall allow the general public reasonable access to that property and shall, if appropriate, ensure that the deed or other instrument creating the interest allows such access to the general public. If the department obtains a covenant in real property in its favor or an easement or any other interest in real property under this section, it shall exercise its best efforts to ensure that the deed or other instrument creating the interest grants to the general public in the form of a covenant running with the land reasonable access to the property. The private landowner from whom the department obtains such a covenant or easement shall retain the right of granting access to the lands by written permission, but may not charge a fee for access.

(6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps in any given year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The excess stamps may be sold to the public.

Sec. 16. RCW 77.12.690 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director is responsible for the selection of the annual migratory bird stamp design. The department shall create collector art prints and related artwork, utilizing the same design. The administration, sale, distribution, and other matters relating to the prints and sales of stamps with prints and related artwork shall be the responsibility of the department.

(2) The total amount brought in from the sale of prints and related artwork shall be deposited in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1). The costs of producing and marketing of prints and related artwork shall be paid out of the total amount brought in from sales of those same items. Net funds derived from the sale of prints and related artwork shall be used by the director to contract with one or more appropriate individuals or nonprofit organizations for the development of waterfowl propagation projects within Washington which specifically provide waterfowl for the Pacific flyway. The department shall not contract with any individual or organization that obtains compensation for allowing waterfowl hunting except if the individual or organization does not permit hunting for compensation on the subject property.

Sec. 17. RCW 77.32.050 and 2011 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All recreational and commercial licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets shall be issued under the authority of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and for the collection, payment, and handling of license fees, including terms and conditions to govern dealers, and dealer fees. A transaction fee on commercial and recreational documents issued through an automated licensing system may be set by the commission and collected from licensees. The department may authorize all or part of such fee to be paid directly to a contractor providing automated licensing system services. The department and dealers shall collect and retain dealer fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard hunting or fishing recreational license document or commercial license document, except that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags or when a licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display card format rather than a standard department licensing document form. Dealer fees must be uniform throughout the state.

(2) ((Until September 1, 2011, the department shall charge an additional transaction fee of ten percent on all recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets. These transaction fees must be deposited into the state wildlife account, created in RCW 77.12.170, for funding fishing and hunting opportunities for recreational license holders.

(3))) The application fee is waived for all commercial license documents that are issued through the automated licensing system.

Sec. 18. RCW 77.32.430 and 2018 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules adopted by the commission. Except as provided in this section, there is no charge for an initial catch record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs eleven dollars.

(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than seven dollars and fifty cents when purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars when purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).

(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term charter stamp licenses are neither subject to the ten-dollar charge nor to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section. Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.

(4) A catch record card for halibut may not cost more than five dollars when purchased with an annual saltwater or combination fishing license and must be provided at no cost for those who purchase a one-day temporary saltwater fishing license or one-day temporary charter stamp.

(5) The department shall include provisions for recording marked and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.

(6)(a) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards, catch card penalty fees, and the Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1).

(i)(A) One dollar of the funds received from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be used for the removal and disposal of derelict shellfish gear either directly by the department or under contract with a third party. The department is required to maintain a separate accounting of these funds and provide an annual report to the commission and the legislature by January 1st of every year.

(B) The remaining portion of the funds received from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be used for education, sampling, monitoring, and management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries.

(ii) Funds received from the sale of halibut catch record cards must be used for monitoring and management of recreational halibut fisheries, including expanding opportunities for recreational anglers.

(b) Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and not supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab recreational fisheries management.

Sec. 19. RCW 77.32.460 and 2011 c 339 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.

(a) The fee for this license is thirty-five dollars for residents, one hundred sixty-five dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.

(b) The fee for this license if purchased at the same time as a big game combination license package is twenty dollars for residents, eighty-eight dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.

(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is sixty dollars for nonresidents.

(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required to hunt for turkey.

(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game license at no charge.

(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(c) ((All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the state wildlife account.)) One-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management within the limited fish and wildlife account. An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated solely for upland game bird management within the limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1). The remainder of the moneys received from turkey tags must be appropriated to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3). Moneys received from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these purposes.

Sec. 20. RCW 77.32.470 and 2011 c 339 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary, or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore waters.

(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or combination licenses are as follows:

(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is forty-five dollars for residents, one hundred eight dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is twenty-five dollars for residents, fifty-two dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The fee for this license is twenty-five dollars for residents, seventy-five dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to three consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:

(i) One day - Eight dollars for residents and sixteen dollars for nonresidents;

(ii) Two days - Twelve dollars for residents and twenty-four dollars for nonresidents; and

(iii) Three days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars for nonresidents.

(b) The fee for a charter stamp is eight dollars for a one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.

(c) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season as defined by rule of the commission.

(d) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this subsection. Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to qualify for the resident rate.

(e) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.

(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the individual license contained within any combination.

(6) The commission may adopt rules to allow the use of two fishing poles per fishing license holder for use on selected state waters. If authorized by the commission, license holders must purchase a two-pole stamp to use a second pole. The proceeds from the sale of the two-pole stamp must be deposited into the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1) and used for the operation and maintenance of state-owned fish hatcheries. The fee for a two-pole stamp is thirteen dollars for residents and nonresidents, and five dollars for seniors.

Sec. 21. RCW 77.32.530 and 2009 c 333 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission in consultation with the director may authorize hunting of big game animals and wild turkeys through auction. The department may conduct the auction for the hunt or contract with a nonprofit wildlife conservation organization to conduct the auction for the hunt.

(2) The commission in consultation with the director may authorize hunting of up to a total of thirty big game animals and wild turkeys per year through raffle. The department may conduct raffles or contract with a nonprofit wildlife conservation organization to conduct raffles for hunting these animals. In consultation with the gambling commission, the director may adopt rules for the implementation of raffles involving hunting.

(3) The director shall establish the procedures for the hunts, which shall require any participants to obtain any required license, permit, or tag. Representatives of the department may participate in the hunt upon the request of the commission to ensure that the animals to be killed are properly identified.

(4) After deducting the expenses of conducting an auction or raffle, any revenues retained by a nonprofit organization, as specified under contract with the department, shall be devoted solely for wildlife conservation, consistent with its qualification as a bona fide nonprofit organization for wildlife conservation.

(5) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles shall be deposited in the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1). The revenues shall be used to improve game management and shall supplement, rather than replace, other funds budgeted for management of game species. The commission may solicit input from groups or individuals with special interest in and expertise on a species in determining how to use these revenues.

(6) A nonprofit wildlife conservation organization may petition the commission to authorize an auction or raffle for a special hunt for big game animals and wild turkeys.

Sec. 22. RCW 77.32.560 and 2011 c 320 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1) and must be dedicated to the support of the department's watchable wildlife activities. The department may also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for marketing the decal and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in the state.

(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife attractions and ways to protect and promote them.

(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities.

Sec. 23. RCW 77.36.070 and 2009 c 333 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand dollars per fiscal year from the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) for claims and assessment costs for damage to commercial crops caused by wild deer or elk submitted under RCW 77.36.100.

Sec. 24. RCW 77.36.170 and 2014 c 221 s 922 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may pay no more than fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year from the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) for claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.

(2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the department may also accept and expend money from other sources to address injury or loss of livestock or other property caused by wolves consistent with the requirements on that source of funding.

(3) If any wildlife account expenditures authorized under subsection((s)) (1) ((and (4))) of this section are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer the unspent amount to the wolf-livestock conflict account created in RCW 77.36.180.

(((4) During the 2014 fiscal year, the department may pay no more than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars from the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170 for claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.))

Sec. 25. RCW 77.44.050 and 2009 c 333 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The warm water game fish account is ((hereby)) created in the state ((wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170))treasury. Moneys in the account are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for the purpose of funding the warm water game fish enhancement program, including the development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture of warm water game fish, improvement of warm water fish habitat, management of warm water fish populations, and other practical activities that will improve the fishing for warm water fish. Funds for warm water game fish as provided in RCW 77.32.440 shall not serve as replacement funding for department-operated warm water fish projects existing on December 31, 1994.

Sec. 26. RCW 79A.55.090 and 1988 c 36 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

No funds shall be expended from the ((wildlife fund))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1) or the fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3) to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 27. RCW 79A.80.090 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 988 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The recreation access pass account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received from the sale of discover passes and day-use permits must be deposited into the account.

(2) Each fiscal biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in revenue must be distributed to the agencies in the following manner:

(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and deposited into the ((state))limited fish and wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170(1);

(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources and deposited into the parkland trust revolving fund created in RCW 43.30.385;

(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship account created in RCW 79A.05.215;

(d) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the recreation access pass account may be used for Skamania county court costs. During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the recreation access pass account may be used for the state parks and recreation commission, in partnership with the departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources, to develop options and recommendations to improve recreational access fee systems.

(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts identified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.27.070 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 8 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the following:

(1) The excise tax on anadromous game fish is deposited in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3).

(2) The excise tax on ocean waters, Columbia river, Willapa Bay, and Grays Harbor chinook, coho, and chum salmon is deposited as follows:

(a) The equivalent of five and twenty-five one-hundredths percent shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(b) The equivalent of one percent shall be deposited in the ((state wildlife))fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29. This act takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---