BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.331 and 2019 c 394 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, research, transport, or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products subject to the regulations established under RCW 69.50.385, or sell marijuana, the board must conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial evaluation of the applications timely received.

(a) The board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, cancellation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the board may consider any prior criminal arrests or convictions of the applicant, any public safety administrative violation history record with the board, and a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (((7)(c) and (10)))(8)(c) and (11) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority must be adopted by rule.

(b) No license of any kind may be issued to:

(i) A person under the age of twenty-one years;

(ii) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least six months prior to applying to receive a license;

(iii) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section; ((or))

(iv) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee; or

(v) Any entity when there is a written objection from a city, town, county, port authority, or tribal government of a federally recognized Indian tribe, pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

(2)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to RCW 43.05.160, 69.50.563, 69.50.562, 69.50.334, and 69.50.342(3) suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, researching, or selling marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder must be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board must immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, and consider mitigating and aggravating circumstances in any case and deviate from any prescribed penalty, under rules the board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses must be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, compels obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The board must notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under this chapter is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this chapter or by rules adopted by the board to implement and enforce this chapter. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an individual license must be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee may employ any person under the age of twenty-one years.

(7) The board may not issue a new or renewed marijuana license for any premises in which the city, town, county, port authority, or tribal government of a federally recognized Indian tribe, as applicable, has provided a written objection under subsection (8) of this section stating that the jurisdiction's local zoning ordinances prohibit the use of the property for activities authorized under the terms of the applicable marijuana license. For purposes of making licensing decisions in conformity with local zoning ordinances under this subsection, the board may rely on a written statement submitted to the board by the following entities, stating that the jurisdiction's local zoning ordinances either do or do not prohibit the use of the property for activities authorized under the terms of the marijuana license:

(a) The chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town if the application is for a license in an incorporated city or town;

(b) The county legislative authority if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns;

(c) The port authority if the application is for a license on property owned by a port authority; or

(d) The tribal government if the application is for a license on property within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation.

(8)(a) Before the board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it must give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns, or to the tribal government if the application is for a license within Indian country, or to the port authority if the application for a license is located on property owned by a port authority.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, the tribal government, or port authority has the right to file with the board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The board may extend the time period for submitting written objections upon request from the authority notified by the board.

(c) The written objections must include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, board representatives must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(((8)))(9)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, the board may not issue a license for any premises within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that such distance reduction will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health.

(c) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of research premises allowed under RCW 69.50.372 within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the facilities described in (a) of this subsection by enacting an ordinance authorizing such distance reduction, provided that the ordinance will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's civil regulatory enforcement, criminal law enforcement, public safety, or public health.

(d) The board may license premises located in compliance with the distance requirements set in an ordinance adopted under (b) or (c) of this subsection. Before issuing or renewing a research license for premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of an elementary school, secondary school, or playground in compliance with an ordinance passed pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the board must ensure that the facility:

(i) Meets a security standard exceeding that which applies to marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensees;

(ii) Is inaccessible to the public and no part of the operation of the facility is in view of the general public; and

(iii) Bears no advertising or signage indicating that it is a marijuana research facility.

(e) The board may not issue a license for any premises within Indian country, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151, including any fee patent lands within the exterior boundaries of a reservation, without the consent of the federally recognized tribe associated with the reservation or Indian country.

(((9)))(10) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting a marijuana producer or marijuana processor from operating or locating a business within areas zoned primarily for residential use or rural use with a minimum lot size of five acres or smaller.

(((10)))(11) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.51A.250 and 2017 c 317 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Qualifying patients or designated providers may form a cooperative and share responsibility for acquiring and supplying the resources needed to produce and process marijuana only for the medical use of members of the cooperative. No more than four qualifying patients or designated providers may become members of a cooperative under this section and all members must hold valid recognition cards. All members of the cooperative must be at least twenty-one years old. The designated provider of a qualifying patient who is under twenty-one years old may be a member of a cooperative on the qualifying patient's behalf. All plants grown in the cooperative must be from an immature plant or clone purchased from a licensed marijuana producer as defined in RCW 69.50.101. Cooperatives may also purchase marijuana seeds from a licensed marijuana producer.

(2) Qualifying patients and designated providers who wish to form a cooperative must register the location with the state liquor and cannabis board and this is the only location where cooperative members may grow or process marijuana. This registration must include the names of all participating members and copies of each participant's recognition card. Only qualifying patients or designated providers registered with the state liquor and cannabis board in association with the location may participate in growing or receive useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products grown at that location.

(3) No cooperative may be located in any of the following areas:

(a) Within one mile of a marijuana retailer;

(b) Within the smaller of either:

(i) One thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, library, or any game arcade that admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older; or

(ii) The area restricted by ordinance, if the cooperative is located in a city, county, or town that has passed an ordinance pursuant to RCW 69.50.331(((8)))(9); or

(c) Where prohibited by a city, town, or county zoning provision.

(4) The state liquor and cannabis board must deny the registration of any cooperative if the location does not comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If a qualifying patient or designated provider no longer participates in growing at the location, he or she must notify the state liquor and cannabis board within fifteen days of the date the qualifying patient or designated provider ceases participation. The state liquor and cannabis board must remove his or her name from connection to the cooperative. Additional qualifying patients or designated providers may not join the cooperative until sixty days have passed since the date on which the last qualifying patient or designated provider notifies the state liquor and cannabis board that he or she no longer participates in that cooperative.

(6) Qualifying patients or designated providers who participate in a cooperative under this section:

(a) May grow up to the total amount of plants for which each participating member is authorized on their recognition cards, up to a maximum of sixty plants. At the location, the qualifying patients or designated providers may possess the amount of useable marijuana that can be produced with the number of plants permitted under this subsection, but no more than seventy-two ounces;

(b) May only participate in one cooperative;

(c) May only grow plants in the cooperative and if he or she grows plants in the cooperative may not grow plants elsewhere;

(d) Must provide assistance in growing plants. A monetary contribution or donation is not to be considered assistance under this section. Participants must provide nonmonetary resources and labor in order to participate; and

(e) May not sell, donate, or otherwise provide marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to a person who is not participating under this section.

(7) The location of the cooperative must be the domicile of one of the participants. Only one cooperative may be located per property tax parcel. A copy of each participant's recognition card must be kept at the location at all times.

(8) The state liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules to implement this section including:

(a) Any security requirements necessary to ensure the safety of the cooperative and to reduce the risk of diversion from the cooperative;

(b) A seed to sale traceability model that is similar to the seed to sale traceability model used by licensees that will allow the state liquor and cannabis board to track all marijuana grown in a cooperative.

(9) The state liquor and cannabis board or law enforcement may inspect a cooperative registered under this section to ensure members are in compliance with this section. The state liquor and cannabis board must adopt rules on reasonable inspection hours and reasons for inspections.

--- END ---