BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that our state has a robust agricultural system, with Washington farmers producing diverse foods available at regional markets throughout the state. The legislature further finds that one in six Washington children do not know where their next meal will come from and that promoting access to fresh foods supports Washington farmers as well as food-insecure families. Hunger for families with children continues to be a significant issue across our state and a growing concern. Hunger and unhealthy diets also impact the health and development of children and a child's ability to learn. Therefore, the legislature intends to expand access to nutritious foods by increasing the fruit and vegetable benefit for participants in the women, infant, and children farmers market nutrition program.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.70.700 and 2008 c 215 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules authorizing retail operation farms stores, owned and operated by a farmer and colocated with a site of agricultural production, to participate in the women, infant, and children farmers market nutrition program to provide locally grown, nutritious, unprepared fruits and vegetables to eligible program participants.

(2) Such rules must meet the provisions of 7 C.F.R. part 3016, uniform administrative requirements for grants and cooperative agreements to state and local governments, as it existed on June 12, 2008, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall distribute a fruit and vegetable benefit of no less than thirty-two dollars per summer farmers market season to each eligible participant in the women, infant, and children farmers market nutrition program. To the extent that federal funds are available, federal funds must be used to pay for the benefit.

--- END ---