BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) An agency may not adopt a rule or issue a policy statement that effectuates the policy goals of an initiative or referendum that has been rejected by the people in a statewide election within two years of the election at which the measure was rejected.

(2) In judicial review of a rule or agency action under chapter 34.05 RCW for compliance with this section, the will of the people, as reflected in the people's rejection of certain policy goals through their vote, must be broadly construed.

(3) For purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW 34.05.010 apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governor may not issue an executive order or policy statement that effectuates the policy goals of an initiative or referendum that has been rejected by the people in a statewide election within two years of the election at which the measure was rejected.

(2) In judicial review of an executive order or policy statement for compliance with this section, the will of the people, as reflected in the people's rejection of certain policy goals through their vote, must be broadly construed.

(3) For purposes of this section, "policy statement" means the same as in RCW 34.05.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.570 and 2004 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another statute provides otherwise:

(a) The burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is on the party asserting invalidity;

(b) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to the agency action at the time it was taken;

(c) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on each material issue on which the court's decision is based; and

(d) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that a person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by the action complained of.

(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a party to the proceeding.

(b)(i) The validity of any rule may be determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment addressed to the superior court of Thurston county, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule in question.

(ii) From June 10, 2004, until July 1, 2008:

(A) If the petitioner's residence or principal place of business is within the geographical boundaries of the third division of the court of appeals as defined by RCW 2.06.020(3), the petition may be filed in the superior court of Spokane, Yakima, or Thurston county; and

(B) If the petitioner's residence or principal place of business is within the geographical boundaries of district three of the first division of the court of appeals as defined by RCW 2.06.020(1), the petition may be filed in the superior court of Whatcom or Thurston county.

(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory rule-making procedures; ((or)) the rule is arbitrary and capricious; or the rule violates section 1 of this act.

(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding only if it determines that:

(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based, is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied;

(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the agency conferred by any provision of law;

(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;

(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;

(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional evidence received by the court under this chapter;

(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by the agency;

(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050 was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the appropriate time for making such a motion;

(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; or

(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious.

(4) Review of other agency action.

(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.

(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence, pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the petition and answer.

(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the action is:

(i) Unconstitutional;

(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority conferred by a provision of law;

(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; ((or))

(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency officials lawfully entitled to take such action; or

(v) Taken pursuant to a rule or policy that violates section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 34 RCW.

--- END ---