BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.12.865 and 2010 c 193 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section and RCW 77.12.870, "derelict fishing gear" includes lost or abandoned fishing nets, fishing lines, and other commercial and recreational fishing equipment. The term does not include lost or abandoned vessels or shellfish pots.

(2) The department, in partnership with the Northwest straits commission, the department of natural resources, and other interested parties, must publish guidelines for the safe removal and disposal of derelict fishing gear. The guidelines may be updated as deemed necessary by the department. The guidelines must be made available to any person interested in derelict fishing gear removal.

(3) ((Derelict fishing gear removal conducted))A person who encounters derelict fishing gear may collect it and turn it in to a fish and wildlife officer. No criminal or civil liability, including under chapter 77.55 RCW, may be imposed by any court on a person for actions taken in accordance with the guidelines prepared in subsection (2) of this section ((is not subject to permitting under RCW 77.55.021)), except upon proof of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct by the person.

--- END ---