BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must administer a grant program to support job sharing in school districts for certificated instructional staff. Grant awards must be used by school districts to support health benefit costs under chapter 41.05 RCW for state-funded full-time equivalent positions being filled by two or more employees in excess of the health insurance benefit allocation provided per certificated staff unit in the omnibus operating appropriations act. Districts that have implemented job sharing arrangements in the 2019-20 school year will be given priority for grant funding. By December 1, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature districts receiving awards under this section, award amounts, and the number of full-time equivalent positions supported by the awards. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---