BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that prospective students must make important decisions about higher education, and to do so, prospective students and their families need accurate estimates of actual college costs. Students who might overestimate costs may not apply to colleges they can afford, and students who underestimate costs might drop out of college for financial reasons before attaining a degree.

Although colleges and universities provide students with information about the cost of attending college, having this information early in the process and having more individualized information is especially important to low-income students, first-generation college students, and individuals who do not have regular access to college and financial aid counselors.

Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the usability and usefulness of cost-related information that institutions provide so that prospective students and their families have the information they need to make informed choices about pursuing postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning August 1, 2020, institutions of higher education shall provide predictive cost estimates, in a student's letter of acceptance, to full-time resident students applying for undergraduate degree programs for the 2021-22 academic year and for academic years thereafter.

(2) The institutions of higher education may also include, with the predictive cost estimate, information on where the student can access financial aid information, including all available student financial aid programs and information regarding federal tax credits related to higher education available for students or their families.

(3) For purposes of this section, "predictive cost estimate" means a nonbinding estimate of the total cost to pursue a degree or certificate at the institution based on credit requirements and the typical time to completion. For programs that require an application process, the predictive cost estimate is a nonbinding estimate of the total cost to complete the program in the student's chosen field of study based on credit requirements and the typical time of completion. "Predictive cost estimate" must include projected increases in tuition and mandatory fees.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.0681 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((In addition to the requirement in RCW 28B.76.300(4), institutions))Institutions of higher education shall disclose to their undergraduate resident students on the tuition billing statement, in dollar figures for a full-time equivalent student:

(a) The full cost of ((instruction))attendance;

(b) The amount collected from student tuition and fees; and

(c) The difference between the amounts for the full cost of instruction and the student tuition and fees.

(2) ((The tuition billing statement shall note that the difference between the cost and tuition under subsection (1)(c) of this section was paid by state tax funds and other moneys.

(3) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, the amount determined in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be labeled an "opportunity pathway" on the tuition billing statement.

(4))) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, institutions of higher education shall label financial aid awarded to resident undergraduate students as an "opportunity pathway" on the tuition billing statement or financial aid award notification. Aid granted to students outside of the financial aid package provided through the institution of higher education and loans provided by the federal government are not subject to the labeling provisions in this subsection. All other aid from all sources including federal, state, and local governments, local communities, nonprofit and for-profit organizations, and institutions of higher education must be included. The disclosure requirements specified in this section do not change the source, award amount, student eligibility, or student obligations associated with each award. Institutions of higher education retain the ability to customize their tuition billing statements to inform students of the assistance source, amount, and type so long as provisions of this section are also fulfilled.

(((5)))(3) Institutions of higher education shall provide the following information to all undergraduate resident students either on the tuition billing statement or via a link to a web site detailing the following information:

(a) The sources of all institutional revenue received during the prior academic or fiscal year, including but not limited to state, federal, local, and private sources;

(b) The uses of tuition revenue collected during the prior academic or fiscal year by program category as determined by the office of financial management; and

(c) The accountability and performance data under RCW ((28B.76.270))28B.77.090.

(((6)))(4) The tuition billing statement disclosures shall be in twelve-point type and boldface type where appropriate.

(((7)))(5) All tuition billing statements or financial aid award notifications at institutions of higher education must notify resident undergraduate students of federal tax credits related to higher education for which they may be eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Prior to increasing tuition for each academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with student undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases.

(b) Each governing board shall make public its proposal for tuition increases twenty-one days before the governing board of the institution considers adoption and, within the twenty-one days, allow an opportunity for public comment.

(2)(a) Prior to increasing tuition for each academic year, the state board for community and technical colleges system shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases.

(b) The state board shall make public its proposal for tuition increases twenty-one days before adoption of the increase and, within the twenty-one days, allow an opportunity for public comment.

--- END ---