BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.320.270 and 2018 c 75 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning with the 2018-19 school year((, as part of the annual student assessment inventory)), school districts that screen students for indicators of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia must ((report the))collect data on: The number of students and grade levels of the students screened, disaggregated by student subgroups; use of screening tools and resources; and interventions provided using multitiered systems of support, as required by RCW 28A.320.260. Each school district must aggregate the school reports and submit the aggregated report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the dyslexia advisory council convened under RCW 28A.300.710 must use this data when developing best practice recommendations in accordance with RCW 28A.300.710 and 28A.300.720.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.710 and 2018 c 75 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene a dyslexia advisory council to advise the superintendent on matters relating to dyslexia in an academic setting. The council must include interested stakeholders including, but not limited to, literacy and dyslexia experts, special education experts, primary school teachers, school administrators, school psychologists, representatives of school boards, and representatives of nonprofit organizations with expertise in dyslexia. Members of the council must serve without compensation.

(2) By June 1, 2019, the council must identify and describe screening tools and resources that satisfy developmental and academic criteria, including considerations of validity and reliability, that indicate typical literacy development or dyslexia, taking into account typical child neurological development, and report this information to the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) By June 1, 2020, the council must develop recommendations and report to the superintendent of public instruction regarding:

(a) Best practices for school district implementation of screenings as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff conducting the screenings;

(b) Best practices for using multitiered systems of support to provide interventions as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff in instructional methods specifically targeting students' areas of weakness;

(c) Sample educational information for parents and families related to dyslexia that includes a list of resources for parental support; and

(d) Best practices to address the needs of students above grade two who show indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia.

(4) By ((January 15))July 1, 2022, the council must review school district implementation of screenings and their use of multitiered systems of support to provide interventions as required under RCW 28A.320.260, and report to the superintendent of public instruction with updates on its recommendations for the best practices and sample educational information required under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) This section expires August 1, 2023.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.720 and 2018 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By ((June 1, 2021))September 1, 2020, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's recommendations required under RCW 28A.300.710 and make available to school districts:

(a) Best practices for school district implementation of screenings as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff conducting the screenings;

(b) Best practices for using multitiered systems of support to provide interventions as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff in instructional methods specifically targeting students' areas of weakness;

(c) Sample educational information for parents and families related to dyslexia that includes a list of resources for parental support; and

(d) Best practices to address the needs of students above grade two who show indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia.

(2) By ((February 15))August 1, 2022, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's updated report required under RCW 28A.300.710 and revise the best practices and sample educational information made available to school districts required under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) By November 1, 2022, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the superintendent of public instruction must report to the house of representatives and senate education committees with the following information from the 2021-22 school year:

(a) The number of students: (i) Screened pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260; (ii) with indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia identified under RCW 28A.300.700; and (iii) provided interventions pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260;

(b) Descriptions from school districts of the types of interventions used in accordance with RCW 28A.320.260 and rates of student progress, when available; and

(c) Descriptions from school districts of the issues districts had related to implementing the provisions of RCW 28A.320.260.

--- END ---