BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2021, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2019 c 413 s 1009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,455,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for the Byrd Barr place, formerly known as Centerstone, building renovation project.

(2) $220,000 of the amount reappropriated in this section is provided solely for El Centro de la Raza boiler fan and master plan for rehabilitation. This amount is not subject to the match requirements, pursuant to RCW 43.63A.125.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,184,000))

$17,990,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,859,000))

$19,665,000

Sec. 1002. 2019 c 413 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The))

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6005 ((of this act)), chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state reappropriation from section 6005(1)(e), chapter 413, Laws of 2019 and $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state reappropriation from section 6005(1)(e), chapter 413, Laws of 2019 are instead provided solely for the department to contract directly with YouthCare Service Center to purchase the 1534 Broadway site from Capitol Hill Housing in order for YouthCare Service Center to develop a youth community center.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,165,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$73,139,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$7,513,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$97,817,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,972,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$111,789,000

Sec. 1003. 2019 c 413 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, except that funding may not be directed to the Valley View Health Center.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,534,000))

$15,534,000

Sec. 1004. 2019 c 413 s 1029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($129,050,000))$132,666,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation ((and $45,950,000)), $47,084,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $70,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for production and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $35,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with ((behavioral or)) chronic mental illness. When evaluating applications for this population, the department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that show:

(i) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more health care entities that provide behavioral health care services to individuals eligible for the housing provided under this subsection;

(ii) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, necessary treatment and supportive services to the tenants and maintain the beds or housing units for at least a forty-year period;

(iii) Readiness to begin structural modifications or construction resulting in a fast project completion;

(iv) Program requirements that adhere to the key elements of permanent supportive housing programs including choice in housing and living arrangements, functional separation of housing and services, community integration, rights of tenancy, and voluntary recovery-focused services; and

(v) To achieve geographic distribution, the department must prioritize projects in rural areas as defined by the department per RCW 43.185.050 and unserved communities with the goal of maximizing the investment and increasing the number of supportive housing units in rural, unserved communities.

(b) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grant awards for modular housing which includes high quality affordable housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. These funds must be awarded to projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, off-site infrastructure costs, and any capitalized reserves, compliant with the Americans with disabilities act, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a fifty year period.

(c) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a state match or state matches on private contributions that fund the production and preservation of affordable housing. Awards must be made using a competitive process. If any funding remains unallocated after the first fiscal year during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department may allocate the remaining funding through its annual competitive process for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing.

(d)(i) (($10,000,000))$20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively.

(ii) The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment to be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property.

(iii) To allocate preservation funds, the department must review applications and evaluate projects based on the following criteria:

(A) The age of the property, with priority given to buildings that are more than fifteen years old;

(B) The population served, with priority given to projects with at least 50 percent of the housing units being occupied by families and individuals at or below 50 percent area median income;

(C) The degree to which the applicant demonstrates that the improvements will result in a reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both;

(D) The potential for additional years added to the affordability period of the property; and

(E) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(e)(i) $7,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient affordable housing projects.

(ii) To receive funding, a project must provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department and must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems either designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied or designed to achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section.

(iii) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(A) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve either net-zero energy use when fully occupied or will achieve the most recent building standard of the passive house institute US as of the effective date of this section;

(B) The life-cycle cost of the project;

(C) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(D) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(E) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(F) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(G) Whether the project is being well managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(H) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(I) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(iv) The department must monitor and track the results of the housing projects that receive ultra-high energy efficiency funding under this section.

(f) (($45,950,000))$47,084,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

Bellwether Housing (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Crosswalk Teen Shelter and Transitional Housing

Project (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

FFC New Construction (Statewide). . . .$1,384,000

FUSION Emergency Housing for Homeless Families

(Federal Way). . . .$3,000,000

Highland Village (Airway Heights). . . .$5,500,000

Home At Last (Tacoma). . . .(($1,500,000))

$2,250,000

Interfaith Works Shelter (Olympia). . . .$3,000,000

NorthHaven Affordable Senior Housing Campus

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Pateros Gardens (Pateros). . . .$1,400,000

Roslyn Housing Project (Roslyn). . . .$2,000,000

SCIDpda North Lot (Seattle). . . .$9,000,000

((Seattle Indian Health Board - Low Income Housing

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000))

Tenny Creek Assisted Living (Vancouver). . . .$1,750,000

THA Arlington Drive (Tacoma). . . .$800,000

(g) $6,000,000 of the appropriation for Capitol Hill Housing Broadway (Seattle) in (f) of this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of the three south annex properties. The state board for community and technical colleges must transfer the three south annex properties located at 1500 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street in Seattle to Capitol Hill Housing to provide services and housing for homeless youth or young adults at the 1500 Broadway and 909 East Pine street properties for a minimum of fifty years. The transfer agreement between the state board for community and technical colleges and Capitol Hill Housing must specify a mutually agreed transfer date and require Capitol Hill Housing to cover any closing costs with a total purchase price of nine million dollars for the three properties. The contract between the department and Capitol Hill Housing must:

(i) Provide that Capitol Hill Housing is responsible for maintaining and securing the 1500 Broadway and 909 East Pine properties until the site is redeveloped;

(ii) Specify that, if Capitol Hill Housing does not construct at least seventy affordable housing units on the site by 2028, this funding must be fully repaid to the state or the land must revert back to the state; and

(iii) Require that Capitol Hill Housing transfer the 1534 Broadway property to YouthCare Service Center for the purpose of developing a youth community center.

(h) $5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grant awards for the development of community housing and cottage communities to shelter individuals or households experiencing homelessness. This funding must be awarded to projects that develop a minimum of four individual structures in the same location. Individual structures must contain insulation, electricity, overhead lights, and heating. Kitchens and bathrooms may be contained within the individual structures or offered as a separate facility that is shared with the community. When evaluating applications for this grant program, the department must prioritize projects that demonstrate:

(i) The availability of land to locate the community;

(ii) A strong readiness to proceed to construction;

(iii) A longer term of commitment to maintain the community;

(iv) A commitment by the applicant to provide, directly or through a formal partnership, case management and employment support services to the tenants;

(v) Access to employment centers, health care providers and other services; and

(vi) A community engagement strategy.

(i) $60,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing projects that provide permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

(j)(($57,050,000))$55,666,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations in need of housing. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing for veterans;

(ii) (($5,000,000))$3,616,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people with developmental disabilities;

(iii) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing that serves people who are employed as farmworkers; and

(iv)(A) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership.

(B) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the department must use a separate application form for applications to provide homeownership opportunities and evaluate homeownership project applications as allowed under chapter 43.185A RCW.

(C) In addition to the definition of "first-time home buyer" in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding homeownership projects during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium "first time home buyer" also includes:

(I) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(II) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and has only owned a home with a spouse;

(III) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(IV) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3)(a) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(b) By June 30, 2021, the department must report on its web site the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to eighty percent of the area median income, up to fifty percent of the area median income, and up to thirty percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(4)(a) The department, in cooperation with the housing finance commission, must develop and implement a process for the collection of certified final development cost data from each grant or loan recipient under this section. The department must use this data as part of its cost containment policy.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2019, and continuing annually, the department must provide the legislature with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(5) $15,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the preservation of affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability, including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing.

(a) Within the amount provided in this subsection (5), the department must implement necessary procedures no later than July 1, 2020, to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state.

(b) The department must adhere to the following award terms and procedures for the rapid response program created under (a) of this subsection (5):

(i) The funding is not subject to the ninety-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(ii) Awards must be in the form of a recoverable grant with a forty-year low income housing covenant on the land.

(iii) If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(iv) Awards may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio.

(v) No single award may exceed $2,500,000, although the department must consider waivers of this award cap if an applicant demonstrates sufficient need.

(vi) The award limit in (v) of this subsection (5) may only be applied to the use of awards provided under this subsection (5). The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

(vii) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection, "greatest public benefit" includes, but is not limited to:

(A) The greatest number of units that will be preserved;

(B) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(C) The scarcity of the affordable housing applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units in the same geographic location; and

(D) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($45,950,000))

$47,084,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State
. . . .
(($129,050,000))

$132,666,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$85,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($175,000,000))

$264,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($655,000,000))

$744,750,000

Sec. 1005. 2019 c 413 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000037)

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$1,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,311,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,331,000))

$6,687,000

Sec. 1006. 2019 c 413 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $6,107,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that: Advance clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Priority must be given to: (i) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and (ii) projects that have a partner that is a tribe or nonprofit organization that serves community eligible entities. Utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(d) $4,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing shore power electrification at terminal five for the northwest seaport alliance. In order to receive this grant, the northwest seaport alliance must demonstrate that they applied to the VW settlement for this project and were denied.

(6)(a) $8,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants will be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program. Clean energy organizations who compete for grants from the program may not participate in the design of the grant program. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(d) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects, energy efficiency, and resource recovery to demonstrate advanced nutrient recovery systems that produce value added biofertilizers, reduce trucking of lagoon water, and improve soil health and air and water quality. Grants shall include at least one project east of the Cascades and one project west of the Cascades. State agencies must promote and demonstrate the use of such recovered biofertilizers through state procurement and contracts.

(7)(a) $3,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by or for the benefit of households with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide at least fifteen percent matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(8) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington Maritime Innovation Center. The center must be used to support technology acceleration and incubation, and act as a focal point for maritime sustainability, including, but not limited to, supporting technology development for maritime decarbonization and electrification.

(9) $8,300,000 of the state taxable construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in grid-scale energy storage at the proposed grid-scale energy storage research, development, and testing facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. The state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as a match to the federal funding. The instruments will support collaborations with the University of Washington and the Washington State University.

(10) $593,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the port of Grays Harbor for an offshore ocean wave renewable energy demonstration project.

(11) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the ((Port of)) Skagit county public works department for the Guemes ferry dock shore power charging infrastructure.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,300,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$32,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$192,600,000

Sec. 1007. 2019 c 413 s 1037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($200,000))$300,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to the department for the early learning facilities grants in this section.

(2) (($6,100,000))$9,062,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Proclaim Liberty Early Learning Facility. . . .$1,000,000

Roosevelt Child Care Center. . . .$1,500,000

City of Monroe, Boys & Girls Club ECEAP Facility. . . .$1,000,000

Family Support Center Olympia. . . .$600,000

Centralia-Chehalis Early Learning Conversion

Project. . . .(($2,000,000))

$3,000,000

Club Discovery Early Learning. . . .$100,000

Anacortes Family Center. . . .$309,000

Boys & Girls Club Daycare. . . .$773,000

Issaquah School District Early Learning Center. . . .$155,000

Opportunity Council Early Learning Central Kitchen. . . .$52,000

Samish Longhouse Early Learning Center Expansion. . . .$273,000

Triumph Treatment Services Child Care. . . .$300,000

(3) $4,186,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects for school districts, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, in the following amounts:

Toppenish School District. . . .$111,000

Manson School District. . . .$400,000

Kettle Falls School District. . . .$395,000

North Thurston School District. . . .$324,000

Ellensburg School District . . . .$800,000

Everett School District. . . .$800,000

Tukwila School District. . . .$196,000

Richland School District. . . .$800,000

Lake Quinault School District. . . .$360,000

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants and loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092 to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations.

(5) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department of commerce and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(6) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556.

(7) The department of commerce must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(8) When prioritizing applications for projects, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, within the boundaries of a regional transit authority in a county that has received distributions or appropriations under RCW 43.79.520, the department must give priority to applications for which at least ten percent of the total project cost is supported by those distributions or appropriations.

(9) The department, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families must identify buildings in the inventory and condition of schools database that are no longer included in the inventory of K-12 instructional space for purposes of calculating school construction assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.515 RCW, but that could be repurposed as early learning facilities and made available to eligible organizations. The department must report its findings and the list of buildings identified in this section to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 15, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,300,000))

$9,362,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
(($18,014,000))

$22,014,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—State
. . . .
$4,186,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,500,000))

$35,562,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,500,000))

$115,562,000

Sec. 1008. 2019 c 413 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004 of this act.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($84,500,000))

$77,223,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,876,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($90,376,000))

$83,099,000

Sec. 1009. 2019 c 413 s 1033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
(($8,600,000))

$18,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($43,000,000))

$53,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for roof repairs.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

Sec. 1011. 2019 c 413 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department of commerce must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department of commerce may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility or land if the project results in increased capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a fifteen-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) (($47,000,000))$74,277,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) (($4,000,000))$11,277,000 is provided solely for at least ((two))six enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. The department may award the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(a) to eligible applicants that applied in the first round;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $4,000,000 is provided solely for at least two facilities with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $2,000,000 is provided solely for one or more crisis diversion or stabilization facilities to add sixteen beds in the Spokane region that will address both urban and rural needs, consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al. and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $5,000,000 is provided solely for at least four mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(f) $8,000,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the omnibus operating appropriations act for these purposes.

(g) $4,000,000 is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs;

(h) $8,000,000 is provided solely for at least four intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(i) (($2,000,000))$22,000,000 is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues. The department may award the amounts provided in this subsection (5)(i) to eligible applicants that applied in the first round.

(6) $1,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state is provided solely for deposit into the revolving fund established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1528 (recovery support services) for capital improvements. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(7) (($49,543,000))(a) $47,935,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

CHAS Spokane Behavioral Health. . . .$400,000

((Chelan SUD Design. . . .$206,000

Columbia Valley Community Health Remodel. . . .$31,000))

Colville SUD Facility. . . .$4,523,000

((Community Health of Snohomish County Edmonds. . . .$1,000,000))

DESC Health Clinic. . . .$6,000,000

Detox/Inpatient SUD Building (Centralia). . . .$750,000

Evergreen RC Addiction Treatment Facility for

Mothers (Everett). . . .$2,000,000

HealthPoint Behavioral Health Expansion (Auburn). . . .$1,030,000

Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah). . . .$3,000,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavioral Health. . . .$7,200,000

Lynnwood Sea Mar Behavioral Health Expansion. . . .$1,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$535,000

North Sound SUD Treatment Facility (Everett). . . .$1,500,000

Oak Harbor Tri-County Behavioral Health. . . .$1,000,000

Peninsula Community Health Services Behavioral

Health Expansion (Bremerton). . . .$1,700,000

Providence Regional Medical Center. . . .$4,700,000

((Sea Mar Community Health Centers Seattle BH

(Seattle). . . .$371,000))

Sedro-Woolley North Sound E&T. . . .$6,600,000

Spokane Crisis Stabilization. . . .$2,000,000

Virginia Mason Acute Stabilization. . . .$2,200,000

Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$488,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$309,000

YVFWC Children's Village. . . .$1,000,000

(b) $3,577,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity:

Chelan SUD Design. . . .$206,000

Community Health of Snohomish County Edmonds. . . .$1,000,000

The Parkside Place Project (Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Seattle BH (Seattle). . . .$371,000

(8)(((a) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a contract with MultiCare to provide a mixed-use psychiatric care facility in Auburn. The facility must include twelve to eighteen crisis stabilization beds, sixty commitment beds for short-term stays, and sixty long-term involuntary commitment beds for persons on a ninety-day or one hundred eighty-day civil commitment.

(b) The funding in this subsection is subject to the recipient maintaining and operating the beds for at least thirty years to serve (i) persons who are publicly funded and (ii) persons who are detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(9))) $408,000 is provided solely for the department for the purpose of providing technical assistance for the community behavioral health grants.

(((10)))(9) The department of commerce must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(((11)))(10) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(((12)))(11) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects in unserved areas of the state.

(((13)))(12) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2020. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($117,951,000))

$126,197,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$127,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$360,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($477,951,000))

$487,197,000

Sec. 1012. 2019 c 413 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

?al?al "Home" in Lushootseed (Seattle). . . .$947,000

4th Ave. Street Enhancement (White Center). . . .$670,000

Abigail Stuart House (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Aging in PACE Washington (AiPACE) (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Airport Utility Extension (Pullman). . . .$1,626,000

Aquatic and Recreation Center (King County). . . .$1,050,000

Arivva Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Arlington B&G Club Parking Safety (Arlington). . . .$530,000

Asotin Masonic Lodge (Asotin). . . .$62,000

Auburn Arts & Culture Center (Auburn). . . .$500,000

Audubon Center (Sequim). . . .$1,000,000

B&GC of Olympic Peninsula (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

B&GC of Thurston County (Lacey). . . .$98,000

Ballard Food Bank (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Battle Ground YMCA (Battle Ground). . . .$500,000

Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue HERO House (Bellevue). . . .$46,000

Benton Co. Museum Building Improvements (Prosser). . . .$103,000

Big Brothers Big Sisters Learning Lab (Olympia). . . .$56,000

Blue Mountain Action Council Comm. Services Center

(Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Bothell Downtown Revitalization (Bothell). . . .$1,500,000

Bowers Field Airport (Ellensburg). . . .$275,000

Boys & Girls Club of Thurston Co. Upgrades (Rochester). . . .$31,000

Boys & Girls Club Roof and Flooring Repairs (Federal Way). . . .$319,000

Brezee Creek Culvert Replacement/East 4th St. Widening

(La Center). . . .$1,500,000

Browns Park Project (Spokane Valley). . . .$536,000

Buffalo Soldiers' Museum (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Camas Washougal Nature Play Area (Washougal). . . .$103,000

Campus Towers (Longview). . . .$228,000

Carbonado Water Source Protection Acquisition

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Carl Maxey Center (Spokane). . . .$350,000

Carlisle Lake Park Improvements (Onalaska). . . .$213,000

Carlyle Housing Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Cathlamet Pioneer Center Restoration (Cathlamet). . . .$165,000

Centerville Fire Dept. (Centerville). . . .$216,000

Centerville Grange (Centerville). . . .$90,000

Centralia Fox Theater (Centralia). . . .$1,000,000

Chehalis River Bridge Ped Safety Lighting Ph2 (Aberdeen). . . .$323,000

Cheney Reclaimed Water Project (Cheney). . . .$2,000,000

Chief Kitsap Education and Community Resource Center

(Poulsbo). . . .$1,000,000

Chief Leschi Schools Facilities & Safety Project

(Puyallup). . . .$250,000

Chief Leschi Schools Safety & Security (Puyallup). . . .$250,000

((Children's Center Design & Feasibility Study

(Vancouver). . . .$400,000))

Clymer Museum Remodel Ph2 (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Colfax Pantry Building (Colfax). . . .$247,000

Community Services of Moses Lake Food Bank Facility

(Moses Lake). . . .$2,000,000

Conconully Community Services Complex (Conconully). . . .$515,000

Cosmopolis Elem. Energy & Safety (Cosmopolis). . . .$206,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$150,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$43,000

Dakota Homestead (Seattle). . . .$155,000

Dawson Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .(($258,000))

$515,000

Dayton Pump Station (Edmonds). . . .$515,000

((Dock and Marine Terminal (Seattle). . . .$750,000))

Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

Dungeness River Audubon Center Expansion (Sequim). . . .$500,000

East Blaine Infrastructure (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Ejido Community Farm (Whatcom). . . .$250,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Office (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Enumclaw Aquatic Center (Enumclaw). . . .$258,000

Enumclaw Expo Center Roof (Enumclaw). . . .$250,000

Everett TOD Study (Everett). . . .$200,000

Everett YMCA (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Evergreen High School Health Center (Vancouver). . . .$388,000

Evergreen Speedway Capital Improvement (Monroe). . . .$150,000

Excelsior Integrated Care Ctr. Sports Court (Spokane). . . .$266,000

Excelsior Roof & Gym Repair (Spokane). . . .$263,000

Excelsior Vocational Education Space (Spokane). . . .$164,000

Expanding on Excellence Capital Campaign (White Salmon). . . .$500,000

Family Education and Support Services (Tumwater). . . .$500,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement Phase 1 (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Fennel Creek Trailhead (Bonney Lake). . . .$258,000

Filipino Hall Renovation (Wapato). . . .$63,000

Fircrest Pool (Fircrest). . . .$1,000,000

FISH Food Bank (Ellensburg). . . .$772,000

Fishtrap Creek Habitat Improvement (Lynden). . . .$258,000

Flood Plain Stabilization, Habitat Enhancement (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Food Lifeline (Seattle). . . .$1,004,000

Foothills Trail Extension (Wilkeson). . . .$500,000

Fort Steilacoom Park Artificial Turf Infields

(Lakewood). . . .$1,015,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$800,000

Garfield Co. Hospital HVAC (Pomeroy). . . .$250,000

Gateway Center (Grays Harbor). . . .$500,000

Gene Coulon Memorial Beach Park Play Equipment

Upgrade (Renton). . . .$618,000

George Community Hall Roof (George). . . .$201,000

George Davis Creek Fish Passage Project (Sammamish). . . .$515,000

Gig Harbor Food Bank (Gig Harbor). . . .$180,000

Goldendale Airport (Goldendale). . . .$550,000

((Grand Connection Downtown Park Gateway (Bellevue). . . .$1,000,000))

Granger Historical Museum Construction (Granger). . . .$150,000

Granite Falls Police Dept. Renovation Project

(Granite Falls). . . .$412,000

Grays Harbor and Willapa Bay Sedimentation (Grays Harbor). . . .$464,000

Grays Harbor YMCA (Grays Harbor). . . .$293,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial (Maple Valley). . . .$102,000

Green Bridges, Healthy Communities; Aurora Bridge I-5

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Greenwood Cemetery Restoration (Centralia). . . .$402,000

Greenwood Cemetery Safety Upgrades (Centralia). . . .$91,000

HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,000,000

HealthPoint Dental Expansion (SeaTac). . . .$1,545,000

Heritage Senior Housing (Chelan). . . .$52,000

High Dune Trail & Conservation Project (Ocean Shores). . . .$140,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Revitalization (Chelan). . . .$52,000

Historic Olympic Stadium Preservation Project (Hoquiam). . . .$515,000

Historical Museum & Community Center Roof Replacement

(Washtucna). . . .$24,000

Historical Society Energy Upgrades (Anderson Island). . . .$14,000

Hoh Tribe Broadband (Grays Harbor). . . .$129,000

Horseshoe Lake ADA Upgrades (Woodland). . . .$82,000

Housing Needs Study (Statewide). . . .$200,000

Howard Bowen Event Complex (Sumas). . . .$1,712,000

Howe Farm Water Service (Port Orchard). . . .$52,000

ICHS Bellevue Clinic Renovation Project (Bellevue). . . .$1,600,000

Illahee Preserve's Lost Continent Acquisition (Bremerton). . . .$335,000

((Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$458,000))

Imagine Children's Museum Expansion and Renovation

(Everett). . . .$2,000,000

Index Water System Design (Index). . . .$23,000

Infrastructure for Economic Development (Port Townsend). . . .$675,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center Phase 1 (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Interactive Educ. Enh./Friends Issaquah Hatchery

(Issaquah). . . .$113,000

Intersection Improvements Juanita Dr. (Kirkland). . . .$750,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial (Bainbridge Island). . . .$155,000

Japanese Gulch Daylight Project (Mukilteo). . . .$400,000

Keller House and Carriage House Paint Restoration

(Colville). . . .$45,000

Key Kirkland Sidewalk Repairs (Kirkland). . . .$537,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Gig Harbor). . . .$1,000,000

Ki-Be School Parking Lot Improvements (Benton City). . . .$268,000

Kitsap Conservation Study (Kitsap). . . .$51,000

Kittitas Valley Event Center (Ellensburg). . . .$206,000

Klickitat Co. Sheriff Office Training Bldg. (Goldendale). . . .$335,000

KNKX Radio Studio (Tacoma). . . .$824,000

Lacey Veterans Services Hub Facility Renovation (Lacey). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Chelan Community Center (Lake Chelan). . . .$250,000

Lake Chelan Water Supply (Wenatchee). . . .$464,000

Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase II (Lake Stevens). . . .$1,000,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$250,000

Lake Wilderness Park Improvements (Maple Valley). . . .$200,000

Land Use & Infrastructure Subarea Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$300,000

Larson Gallery Renovation (Yakima). . . .$875,000

Leffler Park (Manson). . . .$265,000

Legacy in Motion (Puyallup). . . .$1,750,000

Legacy Site Utility Infrastructure (Maple Valley). . . .$154,000

Lewis Co. CHS Pediatric Clinic (Centralia). . . .$84,000

Little Badger Mountain Trailhead (Richland). . . .$464,000

Little Mountain Road Pipeline and Booster Station

(Mount Vernon). . . .$1,300,000

Long Beach Police Department (Long Beach). . . .$705,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$1,000,000

Lummi Hatchery Project (San Juan). . . .$1,000,000

Mabton City Park (Mabton). . . .$54,000

Main Street Redevelopment Project - Phase 2

(University Place). . . .$985,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$2,250,000

Mary's Place (Burien). . . .$2,050,000

Marymount Museum/Spana-Park Senior Center (Spanaway). . . .$1,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

McCormick Woods Sewer Lift #2 Improvements (Port Orchard). . . .$800,000

Melanie Dressel Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Mercer Is/Aubrey Davis Park Trail Upgrade (Mercer Island). . . .$500,000

Missing & Murdered Indigenous Women Memorial (Toppenish). . . .$49,000

Monroe B&G Club ADA Improvements (Monroe). . . .$464,000

Mountlake Terrace Main Street (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$750,000

Mt. Adams Comm. Forest, Klickitat Canyon Rim Purchase

(Glenwood). . . .$400,000

Mt. Adams School District Athletic Fields (Harrah). . . .$242,000

Mt. Peak Fire Lookout Tower (Enumclaw). . . .$381,000

Mt. Spokane SP Ski Lift (Mead). . . .$750,000

Mukilteo Promenade (Mukilteo). . . .$500,000

Museum Storage Building (Steilacoom). . . .$72,000

Naches Fire/Rescue, Yakima Co. #3 (Naches). . . .$200,000

Naselle HS Music/Vocational Wing (Naselle). . . .$258,000

Naselle Primary Care Clinic (Naselle). . . .$216,000

Naselle SD Flooring (Naselle). . . .$237,000

NCRA Maint. Bldg., Parking Lot, Event Space (Castle Rock). . . .$283,000

NEW Health Programs, Colville Dental Clinic (Colville). . . .$1,250,000

Newman Lake Flood Control Zone District (Newman Lake). . . .$415,000

North Elliott Bay Public Dock; Marine Transit Terminal

(Seattle). . . .(($1,000,000))

$1,750,000

Northshore Senior Center Rehabilitation Project (Bothell). . . .$500,000

Northwest African American Museum (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Northwest Native Canoe Center (Seattle). . . .$986,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding (Port Hadlock). . . .$464,000

Oak Harbor Marina (Oak Harbor). . . .$400,000

Oakville SD Kitchen Renovation (Oakville). . . .$517,000

Oddfellows Ellensburg Bldg. Restoration (Ellensburg). . . .$267,000

Opening Doors - Permanent Supportive Housing Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$750,000

Orting City Hall and Police Station (Orting). . . .$600,000

Orting Ped Evac Crossing (Orting). . . .$103,000

Othello Regional Water (Othello). . . .$425,000

Outdoors for All (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Pacific Co. Fairgrounds Roof (Menlo). . . .$210,000

Packwood FEMA Floodplain Study (Packwood). . . .$637,000

Pasco Farmers Market & Park (Pasco). . . .$154,000

Pendergast Regional Park Phase II (Bremerton). . . .$50,000

Peninsula Community Health Service Dental Mobile

(Bremerton). . . .$340,000

PenMet - Cushman Trail Enhancements (Gig Harbor). . . .$52,000

PenMet Community Rec Center (Gig Harbor). . . .$173,000

Pet Overpopulation Prevention Vet Clinic Building

(West Richland). . . .$300,000

Pine Garden Apartment Roof (Shelton). . . .$46,000

Pioneer Park Fountain (Walla Walla). . . .$9,000

Pomeroy Booster Pumping Station (Pomeroy). . . .(($96,000))

$112,000

Port of Everett (Everett). . . .$300,000

Port of Ilwaco Boatyard Modernization (Ilwaco). . . .$545,000

Port of Willapa Harbor Dredging Support Boat (Tokeland). . . .$180,000

Poulsbo Historical Society (Poulsbo). . . .$400,000

Prairie View Schoolhouse Community Center (Waverly). . . .$57,000

Protect Sewer Plant from Erosion (Ocean Shores). . . .$155,000

Puyallup Culvert Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$515,000

Puyallup Street Frontage Improvement (Puyallup). . . .$258,000

Puyallup VFW Kitchen Renovation (Puyallup). . . .$52,000

Quincy Hospital (Quincy). . . .$300,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Recreation Park Renovation (Chehalis). . . .$258,000

Redmond Pool (Redmond). . . .$1,000,000

Renton Trail Connector (Renton). . . .$500,000

Richmond Highland Recreation Center Repairs (Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Rise Together White Center Project (King County). . . .$1,000,000

Ritzville Business & Entrepreneurship Center (Ritzville). . . .$350,000

Rosalia Sewer Improvements (Rosalia). . . .$500,000

Roslyn Downtown Assoc. (Roslyn). . . .$480,000

Royal Park & Rec Ctr. (Royal City). . . .$250,000

Sargent Oyster House Maritime Museum (Allyn). . . .$218,000

Schmid Ballfields Ph3 (Washougal). . . .$584,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$500,000

Sea Mar Community Health Centers Tumwater Dental

(Olympia). . . .$170,000

Seaport Landing (Aberdeen). . . .(($349,000))$404,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Seattle Goodwill (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Sewage Lagoon Decommissioning (Concrete). . . .$255,000

Shelton Civic Center Parking Lot (Shelton). . . .$283,000

Shoreline Maintenance Facility - Brightwater Site

(Shoreline). . . .$500,000

Skabob House Cultural Center (Shelton). . . .$350,000

Skagit County Sheriff Radios (Skagit). . . .$1,000,000

Skamania Courthouse Plaza (Stevenson). . . .$150,000

Snohomish Carnegie Project (Snohomish). . . .$500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct

(Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Snohomish Fire District #26 Communications Project

(Gold Bar). . . .$27,000

Snoqualmie Early Learning Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activities Center (North Bend). . . .$412,000

South Fork Snoqualmie Levee Setback Project (North Bend). . . .$250,000

SOZO Sports Indoor Arena (Yakima). . . .$600,000

Spokane Sportsplex (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Springbrook Park Expansion & Clover Creek Restoration

(Lakewood). . . .$773,000

SR 503 Ped/Bike Ph1&2 (Woodland). . . .$235,000

SR 530 "Oso" Slide Memorial (Arlington). . . .$300,000

Stan and Joan Cross Park (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Starfire Sports STEM (Tukwila). . . .$250,000

((Step by Step (Puyallup). . . .$500,000))

Stevens Co. Disaster Response Communications (Colville). . . .$500,000

Sultan Water Treatment Plant Design (Sultan). . . .$246,000

Sumas History Themed Playground and Water Park (Sumas). . . .$288,000

Sunnyside Airport Hangar Maintenance Facility

(Sunnyside). . . .(($500,000))

$750,000

Sunnyside Yakima Valley-TEC Welding Program (Yakima). . . .$26,000

Sunset Multi-Service & Career Development Center

(Renton). . . .$1,000,000

SW WA Dance Center (Chehalis). . . .$62,000

SW WA Fairgrounds (Chehalis). . . .$103,000

SW Washington Regional Agriculture & Innovation Park

(Tenino). . . .$1,500,000

Swede Hall Renovation (Rochester). . . .$196,000

((Tacoma Beacon Center Renovation (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000))

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma). . . .$413,000

Tam O'Shanter Park Circulation & Parking Phase 2

(Kelso). . . .$1,030,000

Tehaleh Slopes Bike Trail (Bonney Lake). . . .$309,000

((Telford Helipad (Creston). . . .$52,000))

Tenino City Hall Renovation (Tenino). . . .$515,000

Terminal 1 Waterfront Development (Vancouver). . . .$4,700,000

The AMP: Aids Memorial Pathway (Seattle). . . .$600,000

The Morck Hotel (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Toledo Sewer & Water (Toledo). . . .$469,000

Tonasket Senior Citizen Ctr. (Tonasket). . . .$33,000

Town Center to Burke Gilman Trail Connector

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$500,000

Tukwila Village Food Hall (Tukwila). . . .$400,000

Twin Springs Park (Kenmore). . . .$155,000

Twisp Civic Building & EOC (Twisp). . . .$1,288,000

United Way of Pierce County HVAC (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

University Place Arts (University Place). . . .$34,000

Vertical Evacuation (Ocean Shores). . . .$500,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Veterans Supportive Housing (Yakima). . . .$2,500,000

VOA Lynnwood Center (Lynnwood). . . .(($1,000,000))$1,050,000

Volunteer Park Amphitheater (Seattle). . . .$500,000

West Kelso Affordable Housing & Community Facility Study

(Kelso). . . .$258,000

WA Poison Control IT (Seattle). . . .$151,000

Waitsburg Taggart Road Waterline (Waitsburg). . . .$456,000

Wallula Dodd Water System Improvement (Walla Walla). . . .$1,000,000

Wapato Creek Restoration (Fife). . . .$258,000

Warren Ave. Playfield (Bremerton). . . .$206,000

Washington Park Boat Launch Storm Damage (Anacortes). . . .$200,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Westport Dredge Material Use (Westport). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Coupeville (Coupeville). . . .$849,000

Whidbey Is. B&G Oak Harbor (Oak Harbor). . . .$743,000

((White Center Community HUB (Seattle). . . .$500,000))

Wilkeson Water Protection (Wilkeson). . . .$36,000

Willapa BH - Long Beach Safety Improvement Project

(Long Beach). . . .$225,000

William Shore Memorial Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$840,000

Wing Luke Museum Homestead Home (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Wisdom Ridge Business Park (Ridgefield). . . .$2,000,000

Yakima Co. Veterans Dental Facility (Yakima). . . .$469,000

Yakima Valley Fair & Rodeo Multi-Use Facility

(Grandview). . . .$200,000

Yelm Business Incubator Serving Thurston/Pierce

Counties (Yelm). . . .$200,000

Yelm Water Tower (Yelm). . . .$303,000

YMCA Childcare Center Tenant Improvements (Woodinville). . . .$1,000,000

(8) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Oak Harbor to enhance the fiscal sustainability and revenue generation of the city-owned marina through feasibility work, planning, development, and acquisition.

(9) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract for a study regarding both available and needed affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans in Washington state. The study must include data to inform policies related to affordable housing for farmworkers and Native Americans and supplement the housing assessment conducted by the affordable housing advisory board created in chapter 43.185B RCW.

(10) $200,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Tacoma buffalo soldiers' museum to conduct a feasibility study for the rehabilitation of building 734, the band barracks at Fort Lawton in Discovery park. The study will provide an assessment of general conditions of building 734 and cost estimates for a comprehensive rehabilitation of the building to meet current building codes including, but not limited to heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and mechanical systems, seismic retrofits, and compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.

(11) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit public utility district for the Little Mountain Road pipeline and booster station. $1,000,000 of these funds are provided solely for the design phase of the project; $150,000 of these funds are provided solely for land acquisition; and $150,000 of these funds are provided solely to the district for a public outreach effort to solicit input on the project from residents and rate payers.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($162,793,000))

$159,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($162,793,000))

$159,511,000

Sec. 1013. 2019 c 413 s 1043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.))

(2) The funding in this section is provided solely for grants, loans, and administrative expenses related to implementation of the broadband program. Of the total funds:

(a) (($14,440,000))$10,775,000 is provided solely for loans. Moneys attributable to appropriations of state bond proceeds may not be expended for loans to nongovernmental entities.

(b) (($7,110,000))$10,775,000 is provided solely for grants.

(((4)))(3) By January 1, 2021, in the first report to the legislature required under section 6 of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5511 (broadband service), the governor's statewide broadband office must include a list of potential regional projects that will accelerate broadband access by providing connections to local jurisdictions, with recommendations for how to fund such larger scale projects. This list must be developed within existing resources.

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$21,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$101,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

92nd Ave. Sewer Ext. (Battle Ground). . . .$258,000

Algona Wetland Preserve and Trail (Algona). . . .$50,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$10,000

Anderson Road Infrastructure (Chelan). . . .$258,000

Ashley House (Shoreline). . . .$100,000

Asotin County Library Meeting Space (Clarkston). . . .$13,000

Auburn Family YMCA (Auburn). . . .$128,000

Ballard P-Patch (Seattle). . . .$258,000

Bellevue Parks Changing Tables (Bellevue). . . .$100,000

Brewery Park Visitor Center (Tumwater). . . .$50,000

Centralia Chehalis Steam Train Repair (Chehalis). . . .$154,000

Civil War Monument, WA Soldiers Home (Orting). . . .$7,000

Community House on Broadway Kitchen Upgrades

(Longview). . . .$41,000

Community Youth Services Renovation (Olympia). . . .$155,000

Doris Morrison Environmental Learning Center

(Greenacres). . . .$500,000

Downtown Pasco Revitalization (Pasco). . . .$350,000

Edmonds Carbon Recovery (Edmonds). . . .$250,000

El Centro de la Raza (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Federal Way Little League Fields (Federal Way). . . .$50,000

Federal Way Safety Cameras (Federal Way). . . .$103,000

Filipino-American Community Center (Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Five Mile Roundabout Art Project (Spokane). . . .$25,000

Fort Worden PDA - Sage Arts & Ed Ctr (Port Townsend). . . .$560,000

Franklin Pierce Farm ARC (Tacoma). . . .$1,070,000

Fusion Housing (Federal Way). . . .$62,000

Gig Harbor Peninsula FISH (Gig Harbor). . . .$250,000

Grant Co. Fairgrounds Lighting (Moses Lake). . . .$290,000

Hilltop Housing (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Kitsap Humane Society (Silverdale). . . .$500,000

Klickitat Co. Domestic Violence Shelter (Goldendale). . . .$250,000

Lakebay Marina Acquisition & Preservation (Lakebay). . . .$100,000

Levee Repair (Starbuck). . . .$50,000

Levee Repair (Waitsburg). . . .$100,000

LGBTQ Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Lions Club Community Ctr. Generator (Lyle). . . .$5,000

Longview Police Dept. New Office (Longview). . . .$250,000

Lower Yakima River Restoration (Richland). . . .$258,000

Mason Co./Shelton YMCA (Shelton). . . .$750,000

Mini Mart City Park (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Our Lady of Fatima Community Ctr. (Moses Lake). . . .$128,000

Pataha Flour Mill Elevator (Pomeroy). . . .$40,000

Pete's Pool Ball Field Renovation (Enumclaw). . . .$77,000

Pike Place Market Public Access (Seattle). . . .$50,000

Point Wilson Lighthouse (Port Townsend). . . .$60,000

Port Angeles Boys and Girls Club (Port Angeles). . . .$400,000

Port Townsend School District Food Preservation

(Port Townsend). . . .$5,000

REACH Literacy Center (Lacey). . . .$50,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$350,000

Renewable Hydrogen Production Pilot (East Wenatchee). . . .$250,000

Roy Water Tower (Roy). . . .$26,000

S. Kitsap HS NJROTC Equipment (Port Orchard). . . .$24,000

Sargent Oyster House Restoration (Allyn). . . .$10,000

Satsop Business Park (Elma). . . .$155,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Skagit Pump Modernization Design (Mount Vernon). . . .$52,000

Sky Valley Teen Center (Sultan). . . .$103,000

Star Park Shelter (Ferndale). . . .$180,000

Thurston Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$50,000

Waikiki Springs Nature Preserve (Spokane). . . .$1,548,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum & Cultural Ctr. (Wenatchee). . . .$283,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

William Shore Pool (Port Angeles). . . .$500,000

Yelm Lions Club Cabin Renovation (Yelm). . . .$207,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,680,000

Sec. 1015. 2019 c 413 s 1051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($200,000))

$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$221,000

Sec. 1016. 2019 c 413 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, except that no funding may be directed to the Yelm historic building.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($28,000,000))

$27,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,569,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($40,569,000))

$40,530,000

Sec. 1017. 2019 c 413 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($1,000,000))$2,000,000 is provided solely for a rapid response manufactured housing community preservation pilot program for the purpose of preserving manufactured and mobile home communities. To implement the program, the department of commerce must contract directly with the northwest cooperative development center—resident owned communities through a rapid contracting process, allowing the contractor to work with residents of one or more mobile home parks to engage in one or more purchase and sale agreements, with the purpose of preserving the mobile home community as a nonprofit, or co-op run affordable housing project and benefitting people and households at or below eighty percent of the area median income. The department of commerce, in collaboration with the contractor, must submit a report to the legislature by June 30, 2021, reporting how the funds were distributed, how many mobile home parks were purchased, and the demographics of the residents.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port Hadlock Wastewater Facility Project (91001545)

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$1,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,422,000

Sec. 1019. 2019 c 413 s 1031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Board (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) During the 2019-2021 biennium, the public works board must prioritize water and sewer infrastructure projects.

(2) (($1,422,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the port Hadlock wastewater facility project.

(3))) $1,400,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Eatonville water treatment plant project.

(((4)))(3) $1,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Ferndale wastewater treatment project. Additionally, the public works board must prioritize financing a loan of up to $4,000,000 for project.

(((5)))(4) $4,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Wenatchi landing sewer extension – phase 1.

(((6)))(5) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this section is provided solely for a grant for the Belfair sewer extension project. Additionally, the public works board must prioritize financing a loan of up to $9,000,000 for the project.

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($95,000,000))

$93,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($95,000,000))

$93,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Hospital Preservation and Development Plan (91001544)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000 is provided to the department to contract with the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority to conduct a conceptual design and scoping for a master preservation and development plan of the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority property located at 1200 12th Avenue South, Seattle, WA 98144. The master preservation and development plan must create a longer-range framework for future development of the campus, identify priorities for capital improvement, identify potential reuse of appropriate facilities for community needs, including behavioral health, and ensure the maximization of highest and best use of public resources while adhering to the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority's mission of addressing health equity disparities for disadvantaged populations.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $7,182,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a competitive grant program for capital projects that preserve existing shelter capacity or increase low-barrier homeless shelter capacity for unaccompanied youth and young adults, families with children, or adults who are currently experiencing homelessness or are at imminent risk of experiencing homelessness. Grant funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, system replacements, predevelopment and development costs, and new construction. The department must prioritize projects that:

(a) Provide access to shelter and on-site staff twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week;

(b) Offer voluntary on-site supportive services and voluntary case-management services to help address individuals' housing, medical, and other social needs;

(c) Incorporate trauma-informed operational practices, such as ensuring adequate space for individuals and providing secure storage for individuals' belongings; or

(d) Serve persons who have a behavioral health disability or a complex physical health condition and have had frequent or lengthy contact with a crisis service or an institutional setting such as an emergency department, inpatient hospital, psychiatric institution, evaluation and treatment center, or correctional facility.

(2) $7,424,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a youth homeless shelter grant program for the following list of shelter projects:

Auburn Resource Center (Auburn). . . .$1,500,000

Community House (Longview). . . .$206,000

Crosswalk Teen Shelter (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000

Harbor Hope Center Home for Girls (Gig Harbor). . . .$294,000

Noah's Ark Homeless Shelter (Wapato). . . .$100,000

Positive Adolescent Dev (PAD) Emergency Housing

(Bellingham). . . .$206,000

Rod's House Mixed Use Facility (Yakima). . . .$2,000,000

ROOTS Young Adult Shelter (Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Snoqualmie Valley Resource Center (Snoqualmie). . . .$206,000

St. Vincent de Paul Cold Weather Shelter (Renton). . . .$206,000

YMCA Oasis Teen Shelter (Mount Vernon). . . .$100,000

(3) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department of commerce must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

Sec. 1022. 2019 c 413 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $1,785,000 for fiscal year 2020 and $1,785,000 for fiscal year 2021 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, federally recognized tribal governments, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded in small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $3,573,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, federally recognized tribal governments, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $5,357,000 is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request. Prior to awarding funds, the department shall submit to the office of financial management a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,500,000

Sec. 1023. 2019 c 413 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriation is subject to))appropriations are provided solely for the environmental impact statement in accordance with the provisions of section 1034, chapter 298, Laws of 2018. It is the intent of the legislature to fully fund future capital requests necessary to complete the Capitol Lake long-term management planning in accordance with the provisions of section 1034, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,369,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$284,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$715,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,250,000))

$6,699,000

Sec. 1024. 2019 c 413 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

((Enterprise Services Account—State
. . . .
$207,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,246,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State
. . . .
$79,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,532,000))

$3,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($368,000))

$261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,900,000))

$3,586,000

Sec. 1025. 2019 c 413 s 1090 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Newhouse Replacement (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to further analyze the space needs and cost estimates necessary to replace the Irv Newhouse Building, add house of representative office space with a building or buildings to serve the legislative office needs on west campus, and recommend a preferred alternative to address the needs of both the house of representatives and the senate.

(1) The additional analysis must consider the findings from the December 2018 Newhouse replacement predesign problem statement and alternatives analysis.

(2) In conducting the study, the department must consult with the house of representatives, the senate, and the tenants of any impacted building.

(3) The recommended preferred alternative must be submitted to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 2020, and the department must consult with the leadership of the senate, the leadership of the house of representatives, or their designee(s).

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$256,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($450,000))

$700,000

Sec. 1026. 2019 c 413 s 1093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

King County Area Readiness Center (30000592)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to acquire land in King county for a readiness center and to complete a predesign. If the department has not signed a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2021, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse. The department must work to secure federal funding to cover the majority of future costs for design and construction.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,600,000))

$7,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($83,900,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($90,500,000))

$7,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2019 c 413 s 1005 (uncodified); and

(2) 2019 c 413 s 1059 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 2001. 2019 c 413 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000003)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($470,000))

$1,888,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($470,000))

$1,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Training Facility Capital and Functional Needs Assessment (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a capital and functional needs assessment of the criminal justice training center that includes an evaluation of:

(a) The current condition of the facilities;

(b) Capital needs to safely and effectively facilitate current and future law enforcement training; and

(c) Potential alternative funding sources to finance future capital needs, including, but not limited to:

(i) Reimbursement from law enforcement agencies; and

(ii) Public-private partnerships.

(2) Additionally, the assessment must compare the benefits and costs of alternative methods to address capital and function needs, including but not limited to:

(a) Fully modernizing the facilities located at the current location; and

(b) Relocating the training center to a new location.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 2003. 2019 c 413 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Accident Account—State
. . . .
(($342,000))

$366,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
(($342,000))

$366,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($684,000))

$732,000

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,450,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($350,000))

$302,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,934,000

Sec. 2004. 2019 c 413 s 2010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($855,000))

$843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the replacement of the entire roof on the 2010 building with asphalt shingles.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,950,000

Sec. 2007. 2019 c 413 s 2030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

(2) The department shall work with the city of Shoreline on the future siting of a behavioral health facility and a nursing facility.

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 2008. 2019 c 413 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,665,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($11,015,000))

$12,185,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,680,000))

$13,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$159,345,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($172,025,000))

$173,195,000

Sec. 2009. 2019 c 413 s 2038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$955,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($965,000))

$1,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,920,000))

$2,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($25,920,000))

$26,755,000

Sec. 2010. 2019 c 413 s 2039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects installing fire alarms at the following locations: (a) Fircrest School; (b) Lakeland Village; (c) Western State Hospital; (d) Rainier School; and (e) Echo Glen. The Echo Glen project may include duress alarms. ((The projects listed in this section must be designed under one contract, and installed under one contract.)) The department must consult with the department of children, youth, and families to prioritize the projects.

(2) When the ((bid is))bids are received, the department must report to the appropriate legislative committees the overall ((bid))bids for the projects.

(3) The department must report to the appropriate legislative committees any best practices on the process by December 31, 2019.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Lead Testing Laboratory Remodeling (91000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1860 (school drinking water/lead). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2020, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$410,000

Sec. 2012. 2019 c 413 s 2072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($570,000))

$755,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,025,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,743,000))

$2,558,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,445,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,783,000))

$16,983,000

Sec. 2013. 2019 c 413 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($125,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$325,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Naselle Youth Camp - Eagle Lodge: Medical, Dental & Social Services (30002758)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

Sec. 2016. 2019 c 413 s 2080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project was formerly administered by the department of social and health services. Due to the transfer of the juvenile rehabilitation program from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families on July 1, 2019, the administration of this project shall also transfer to the department of children, youth, and families on that date.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($800,000))

$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Naselle Youth Camp - Moolock Lodge: Remodel & Renovation (40000430)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Echo Glen Cottage 4 Remodel & Renovation (40000526)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, & FAMILIES

Green Hill School: Baker Living Unit Renovation & Remodel (40000529)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

Sec. 2020. 2019 c 413 s 2084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Implementation of JRA Capacity (91000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for ((a predesign for Echo Glen, a predesign for Green Hill, and)) a comprehensive strategic capital master plan. ((If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1646 is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($750,000))

$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Perimeter Wall Renovation (30000117)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,935,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,135,000

Sec. 2022. 2019 c 413 s 2086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$830,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($9,718,000))

$10,207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$170,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,718,000))

$11,207,000

Sec. 2023. 2019 c 413 s 2091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Bldg E Roof Replacement (30000810)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,022,000))

$586,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,696,000))

$2,260,000

Sec. 2024. 2019 c 413 s 2093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($10,085,000))

$9,997,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,585,000))

$11,497,000

Sec. 2025. 2019 c 413 s 2094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,400,000))

$1,957,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,800,000))

$2,357,000

Sec. 2026. 2019 c 413 s 2096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC ADA Compliance Retrofit (30001118)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($250,000))

$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$921,000

Sec. 2027. 2019 c 413 s 2098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($100,000))

$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$5,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Clinic Roof Replacement (40000180)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,439,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,264,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The predesign must compare the benefits of addressing each system as part of a single project with the benefits of addressing each system as a separate project in design and construction phases.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,731,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,131,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2019 c 413 s 3008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,813,000))

$3,531,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($71,296,000))

$71,578,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,109,000

Sec. 3002. 2019 c 413 s 3009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($324,000))

$318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($38,710,000))

$38,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,034,000

Sec. 3003. 2019 c 413 s 3011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($19,152,000))

$18,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($43,712,000))

$44,261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,864,000

Sec. 3004. 2019 c 413 s 3016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,526,000))

$2,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,474,000))

$47,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

Sec. 3005. 2019 c 413 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($1,940,000))

$1,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($23,115,000))

$23,212,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,055,000

Sec. 3006. 2019 c 413 s 3023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($169,000))

$168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,431,000))

$7,432,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,600,000

Sec. 3007. 2019 c 413 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($10,710,000))

$10,489,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($51,827,000))

$52,048,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,537,000

Sec. 3008. 2019 c 413 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,171,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,436,000))

$2,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($17,893,000))

$18,682,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,500,000

Sec. 3009. 2019 c 413 s 3030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($8,908,000))

$8,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($992,000))

$1,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,900,000

Sec. 3010. 2019 c 413 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations and appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,967,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($15,786,000))

$12,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,994,000))

$22,853,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,747,000

Sec. 3011. 2019 c 413 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($672,000))

$519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,328,000))

$1,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

Sec. 3012. 2019 c 413 s 3034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($27,816,000))

$26,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,384,000))

$4,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,200,000

Sec. 3013. 2019 c 413 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($19,149,000))

$19,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($16,411,000))

$16,191,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,560,000

Sec. 3014. 2019 c 413 s 3038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($7,917,000))

$7,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,464,000))

$6,496,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,381,000

Sec. 3015. 2019 c 413 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($5,877,000))

$5,872,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($0))

$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,877,000

Sec. 3016. 2019 c 413 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
(($12,203,000))

$12,250,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,541,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($33,744,000))

$33,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($56,000))

$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

Sec. 3017. 2019 c 413 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($2,099,000))

$1,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($83,000))

$872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,182,000

Sec. 3018. 2019 c 413 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation and appropriation are subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($11,400,000))

$11,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($0))

$66,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

Sec. 3019. 2019 c 413 s 3069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 298, Laws of 2018, except funds directed to the Northwest Seaport Alliance for a clean truck fund in section 3010(6), chapter 298, Laws of 2018, may also be used for the Northwest Seaport Alliance to provide shore power electrification to vessels in Tacoma.

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$26,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

Sec. 3020. 2019 c 413 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Appropriations in this section are provided solely for competitive grants to local governments implementing projects that reduce the impacts of stormwater on Washington state's waters.

(2) $29,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants directed to areas of Puget Sound that will benefit southern resident killer whales.

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($44,000,000))

$49,006,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($204,000,000))

$209,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000286)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Remedial Action Grants (40000288)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$32,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,656,000

Sec. 3023. 2019 c 413 s 3093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000209)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Up to (($23,757,000))$24,007,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including project level environmental review, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, the office of Chehalis basin, and other parties.

(b) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to $250,000 is for contracting with an independent third party to assess the financial impacts on landowners whose property could become the site of a flood retention structure and temporary reservoir project, including, but not limited to, timber valuation, construction of alternative transportation networks, and lost timber production associated with the project.

(2) Up to $49,450,000 of the appropriation is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) The office of Chehalis basin board has discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1) and (2) of this section if needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation; however, $10,000,000 of the amounts in this section are provided solely for the final design, permitting, property acquisition, and construction of the Aberdeen Hoquiam north shore levee and related stormwater conveyance and pump station upgrades.

(4) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($73,207,000))

$73,457,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$288,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($361,207,000))

$361,457,000

Sec. 3024. 2019 c 413 s 3096 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,802,000))

$2,398,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,849,000))

$2,445,000

Sec. 3025. 2019 c 413 s 3097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($304,000))

$179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($8,966,000))

$9,091,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000704)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2424 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6256 (heating oil insurance program). If neither of these bills is enacted by June 30, 2020, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,000,000

Sec. 3027. 2019 c 413 s 3115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,295,000))

$1,582,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,963,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,349,000))

$4,636,000

Sec. 3028. 2019 c 413 s 3119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($458,000))

$349,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($569,000))

$460,000

Sec. 3029. 2019 c 413 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($25,000))

$79,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($397,000))

$343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,383,000

Sec. 3030. 2019 c 413 s 3123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($551,000))

$583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($4,793,000))

$4,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,344,000

Sec. 3031. 2019 c 413 s 3129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,493,000))

$1,668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,061,000))

$886,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,554,000

Sec. 3032. 2019 c 413 s 3131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($141,000))

$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,100,000))

$1,080,000

Sec. 3033. 2019 c 413 s 3132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($237,000))

$148,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($337,000))

$248,000

Sec. 3034. 2019 c 413 s 3135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($587,000))

$520,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,508,000))

$2,441,000

Sec. 3035. 2019 c 413 s 3137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($1,086,000))

$1,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,272,000))

$1,236,000

Sec. 3036. 2019 c 413 s 3141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($402,000))

$537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($647,000))

$512,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,049,000

Sec. 3037. 2019 c 413 s 3143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works—Program (30000979)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($845,000))

$620,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,491,000))

$1,266,000

Sec. 3038. 2019 c 413 s 3144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($903,000))

$955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($112,000))

$60,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,015,000

Sec. 3039. 2019 c 413 s 3145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($320,000))

$367,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($130,000))

$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($450,000))

$739,000

Sec. 3040. 2019 c 413 s 3149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($185,000))

$177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$242,000

Sec. 3041. 2019 c 413 s 3150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($288,000))

$267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($750,000))

$729,000

Sec. 3042. 2019 c 413 s 3151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($467,000))

$784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($533,000))

$216,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 3043. 2019 c 413 s 3152 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($267,000))

$313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($46,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,006,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,319,000

Sec. 3044. 2019 c 413 s 3153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($214,000))

$339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($163,000))

$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,013,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,390,000

Sec. 3045. 2019 c 413 s 3156 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($53,000))

$194,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($247,000))

$106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,905,000

Sec. 3046. 2019 c 413 s 3160 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,994,000))

$3,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,694,000))

$21,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascades Trail: Crab Creek Trestle Replacement (40000162)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

Sec. 3048. 2019 c 413 s 3204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amounts appropriated in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital documents No. 2020-467-HSBA, developed on February 25, 2020, and No. 2020-467-HB, developed February 14, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,000,000

Sec. 3049. 2019 c 413 s 3218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3086, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

(2) A maximum of $615,000 of unused funds in this appropriation may be used for replacement and repair of dock facilities available for public use at Van Riper marina, without requiring matching resources, and provided that a grant and lease term of 30 years is offered to the recipient from the state.

(3) A maximum of $302,000 of unused amounts in this appropriation may be used for the state route number 547 pedestrian and bicycle safety trail near Kendall, without requiring matching resources.

(4) A maximum of $448,000 of unused amounts in this appropriation may be used for the Stanwood Port Susan trail project near Stanwood, without requiring matching resources.

(5) A maximum of $300,000 of unused amounts in this appropriation may be used for the ebey waterfront trail near Marysville, without requiring matching resources.

(6) A maximum of $400,000 of unused amounts in this appropriation may be used for trail lighting on the cross Kirkland corridor (CKC) at the I-405 underpass in Totem Lake near Kirkland, without requiring matching resources.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,559,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$1,337,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$15,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,885,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Community Forest Project List Development (91001354)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations.

(1) The recreation and conservation office shall consult with the department of natural resources and stakeholders to develop funding criteria and a ranked project list to establish community forest projects for funding consideration in the 2021-2023 biennium.

(2) The recreation and conservation office shall develop options for establishing accounting assurances for future revenues that may be generated from community forests.

(3) The criteria established under subsection (1) of this section must allow for a review of project submissions by the recreation and conservation funding board in a manner that is complementary to existing conservation funding programs administered by the office.

(4) A project may be included in the ranked list created under subsection (1) of this section only if it meets the following conditions:

(a) The property under consideration must be forestland;

(b) Acquisition of the property under consideration must be fee simple;

(c) The entity acquiring the property under consideration must be a nonprofit conservation organization, local government, tribe, or a state agency working directly with one or more of the these entities; and

(d) The community forest project must promote, enhance, or develop community and economic benefits.

(5) The recreation and conservation office shall submit the funding criteria and the ranked project list required under subsection (1) of this section and the accounting options required under subsection (2) of this section to the legislature by December 31, 2020.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000

Sec. 3051. 2019 c 413 s 3223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission must, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$4,849,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,800,000))

$12,649,000

Sec. 3052. 2019 c 413 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3052, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,200,000))

$3,199,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$3,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

Sec. 3054. 2019 c 413 s 3236 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,900,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for repair of the Wiley Slough dike.))

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$863,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,680,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$13,943,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$72,421,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$158,364,000

Sec. 3055. 2019 c 413 s 3242 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,555,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,710,000))

$4,646,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($3,031,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,440,000))

$16,345,000

Sec. 3056. 2019 c 413 s 3247 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,400,000))

$1,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,670,000))

$2,524,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,070,000

Sec. 3057. 2019 c 413 s 3252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: In constructing the project, the department must consider the firelight toilet technology.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($75,000))

$68,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,794,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,037,000))

$5,030,000

Sec. 3058. 2019 c 413 s 3253 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,423,000))

$2,577,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,086,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,000))

$198,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,511,000))

$5,861,000

Sec. 3059. 2019 c 413 s 3254 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($200,000))

$177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($800,000))

$777,000

Sec. 3060. 2019 c 413 s 3255 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($315,000))

$276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,445,000))

$5,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wiley Slough Dike Raising (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,183,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

(1) Nothing in this section alters the obligation set forth in the permanent injunction, including the compliance deadline, entered on March 29, 2013, in United States v. Washington, sub-proceeding 01-1 (Culverts), or the guidelines for compliance within the specified timeline with the permanent injunction as developed by the state agencies during the implementation process.

(2) Nothing in this section creates an obligation on the part of the state to provide funding for corrections for nonstate-owned culverts. Nothing in this section precludes the state from providing funding for corrections for nonstate-owned culverts.

(3) In order to provide recommendations, the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must develop a comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan that works in conjunction with the state approach and that fully satisfies the requirements of the United States v. Washington permanent injunction and makes both local and state funding recommendations for additional nonstate barrier corrections across state culvert correction programs that maximize the fisheries habitat gain and other benefits to prey available for southern resident killer whale and salmon recovery.

(4) The comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan must be consistent with the principles and requirements of the United States v. Washington permanent injunction and RCW 77.95.180 and must achieve coordinated investment strategy goals of permanent injunction compliance and the following additional resource benefits. The Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board chair, representing the board and the appropriate department of fish and wildlife executive management, shall consult with tribes to develop a watershed approach. Provided it is consistent with the United States v. Washington permanent injunction, prioritization of barrier corrections must be developed on a watershed basis and must maximize the following resource priorities:

(a) Stocks that are listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act;

(b) Stocks that contribute to protection and recovery of southern resident orca whales;

(c) Critical stocks of anadromous fish that limit or prevent harvest of anadromous fish, as identified in the Pacific salmon treaty; and

(d) Weak stocks of anadromous fish that limit or prevent harvest of anadromous fish, as determined in North of Cape Falcon process.

(5) The comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan must include recommendations on methods and procedures for state agencies and local governments to complete and maintain accurate barrier inventories. This plan must also allow for efficient bundling of projects to minimize disruption to the public due to construction as well as adjustments in response to obstacles and opportunities encountered during delivery.

(6) The Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must also:

(a) Provide to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature its recommendation as to statutory or policy changes, or budget needs for the board or state capital budget programs, for better implementation and coordination among the state's culvert correction programs by January 15, 2021; and

(b) Develop a plan to seek and maximize the chances of success of significant federal investment in the comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan.

(7) It is the intent of the legislature that, in developing future budgets, state agencies administering state culvert correction programs will recommend, to the maximum extent possible, funding in their culvert correction programs for correction of barriers that are part of the comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan developed by the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board under this section.

(8) By November 1, 2020, and March 1, 2021, the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board and the department of transportation must provide updates on the development of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The first update must include a project timeline and plan to ensure that all agencies with culvert correction programs are involved in the creation of the comprehensive plan.

(9) Prior to presenting the comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan, the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must present the status of the plan to the annual Washington state and Western Washington treaty tribes fish passage barrier repair progress and coordination meeting. The board must submit the comprehensive statewide culvert remediation plan and the process by which it will be adaptively managed over time to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees by January 15, 2021.

Sec. 3063. 2019 c 413 s 3274 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($400,000))

$520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($3,100,000))

$2,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

Sec. 3064. 2019 c 413 s 3275 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($600,000))

$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($881,000))

$662,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,481,000))

$1,337,000

Sec. 3065. 2019 c 413 s 3294 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (40000052)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,500,000))

$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($22,500,000))

$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,694,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000058)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000061)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Whitmarsh (March Point) Landfill Site Cleanup (40000069)

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2019 c 413 s 3099 (uncodified); and

(2) 2019 c 413 s 3296 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 4001. 2019 c 413 s 4001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$2,832,000

Fire Service Training Account—State
. . . .
$414,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,132,000))

$3,546,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Telford Helipad (40000001)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2019 c 413 s 5001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($472,000))

$32,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,072,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($35,544,000))

$35,104,000

Sec. 5002. 2019 c 413 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Level (40000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$879,021,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($160,032,000))

$211,883,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,840,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,042,053,000))

$1,094,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,870,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,912,245,000))

$5,964,936,000

Sec. 5003. 2019 c 413 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that small school districts with total enrollments of one thousand students or less may have school facilities with significant building systems deficiencies and low property values, and that raising enough funds to participate in the school construction assistance program to replace or modernize their school facilities would present an extraordinary tax burden on property owners or would exceed allowable debt.

(2) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer the grant program and provide technical assistance to small school districts seeking grants funded in this section.

(3) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts interested in seeking modernization grants in subsection (4) of this section. The superintendent may prioritize planning grants for school districts with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts with significant building system deficiencies and limited financial capacity with the following conditions:

(a) The superintendent of public instruction must appoint an advisory committee whose members have experience in financing and managing school facilities in small school districts to assist the office in designing the grant application process, developing the prioritization criteria, and evaluating the grant applications. Advisory committee members may not be involved in developing projects or applying for grants funded in this section.

(b) In addition to prioritization criteria developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the advisory committee pursuant to (4)(a) of this section, the office and the advisory committee must also prioritize projects that: (i) Improve student health, safety, and academic performance for the largest number of students; (ii) provide the most available school district resources, including in-kind resources; and (iii) make use of mass-timber products, including cross-laminated timber, or aggregates and concretes materials.

(c) The superintendent must submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee, to the legislature by January 15, 2020. The list must include: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources. The appropriated funds in this subsection may be awarded only ((after the legislature approves the list))to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. 2020-350-HA, developed February 12, 2020.

(5) For projects in this section that are also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite and streamline the administrative requirements, timelines, and matching requirements for the funds provided in this section to be used promptly. Funds provided in this section plus state funds provided in the school construction assistance program grant must not exceed total project costs minus available local resources.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

Sec. 5004. 2019 c 413 s 5025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The))

(1) Except as provided for under subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

(2) School districts that receive reappropriations in this section may use the reappropriation to fund local share of project cost requirements for projects also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,486,000

Sec. 5005. 2019 c 413 s 5030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000142)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for classroom additions and other modernizations at Leschi elementary school in Seattle public schools.

(2) $10,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for classroom additions at Madison middle school in Seattle public schools.

(3) $3,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for heating and ventilation upgrades at North Beach elementary school in Seattle public schools.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for modular classrooms ((made with mass timber products, including cross-laminated timber,)) for the purpose of replacing portables in school districts with space challenges due to unavailable land for new school facilities to accommodate enrollment growth or with an overdependent use of portables to provide classroom space. The grants are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) School districts are responsible for the costs of site preparation; required permits; delivery and installation of the modular classrooms; furnishings, fixtures, and equipment; utility connections; and any other infrastructure costs related to the modular classrooms;

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize projects based on the following criteria in the following order:

(i) School districts with high ratios of portable classrooms to permanent classrooms; and

(ii) School districts with low acreage of land available for new construction;

(iii) Projects that achieve lowest cost per classroom ((with highest percentage of mass timber products in the overall construction of the project)); and

(iv) Projects that ((demonstrate))are multistory ((application of mass timber products)).

(5) $100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Republic school district for predesign and scoping work related to the replacement of a school facility. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate $9,000,000 for the Republic school district in the 2021-23 fiscal biennium for the demolition of an existing school facility and for the design and construction of a new school, subject to the Republic school district securing a local match equal to not less than $4,500,000.

(6) School districts that receive funding in this section may use that funding for the local share of project cost requirements for projects also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($23,000,000))

$23,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($23,000,000))

$23,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for school seismic safety retrofit grants to school districts for seismic retrofits and seismic safety related improvements of school buildings used for the instruction of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade. The superintendent of public instruction must prioritize school seismic safety retrofit grants for school districts with the most significant building deficiencies and the greatest seismic risks as determined by the most recent geological data and building engineering assessments, beginning with facilities classified as very high risk.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$213,240,000

Sec. 5007. 2019 c 413 s 5032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$8,076,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($170,000))

$9,438,000

Sec. 5008. 2019 c 413 s 5033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2019-21 Campus Preservation (40000004)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($580,000))

$655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,320,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,900,000))

$2,975,000

Sec. 5009. 2019 c 413 s 5034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON ((STATE)) CENTER FOR ((CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS))DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($786,000))

$787,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($214,000))

$213,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$50,511,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,000,000))

$56,148,000

Sec. 5010. 2019 c 413 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON ((STATE)) CENTER FOR ((CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS))DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTH

Minor Works: Preservation 2019-21 (30000045)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,500,000

Sec. 5011. 2019 c 413 s 5044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Facility (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1593 (behavioral health teaching facility). The appropriation provided may be used for predesign, siting, ((and)) design costs, enabling projects, and early work packages. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2019, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

(b) The university must submit the predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by February 1, 2020.

(2) The behavioral health teaching facility must provide a minimum of fifty long-term civil commitment beds, fifty geriatric/voluntary psychiatric beds, and fifty licensed medical/surgery beds, with the capacity to treat patients with psychiatric diagnoses and/or substance use disorders. The project construction must also include construction of a 24/7 telehealth consultation program within the facility.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$33,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$191,250,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$224,500,000

Sec. 5012. 2019 c 413 s 5060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($245,000))

$345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($100,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,695,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,040,000

Sec. 5013. 2019 c 413 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation: 2019-21 (40000041)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,840,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000,000))

$5,160,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus Security Enhancements (40000074)

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,840,000

Sec. 5015. 2019 c 413 s 5079 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Historic Lord Mansion (91000029)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($404,000))

$337,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($504,000))

$737,000

Sec. 5016. 2019 c 413 s 5093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($9,054,000))

$8,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,697,000))

$9,054,000

Sec. 5017. 2019 c 413 s 5097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Metro Parks Tacoma - W.W. Seymour Botanical

Conservatory Rehab. . . .$773,000

Discover Your Northwest - Chittenden Locks Fish

Ladder Viewing. . . .$382,000

Foss Waterway Seaport - Balfour Dock Building:

Phase IIIE. . . .$307,000

City of Tumwater, WA - Old Brewhouse Tower Rehab. . . .$513,000

Gig Harbor - Harbor History Museum - Fishing

Vessel Shenandoah. . . .$100,000

City of Vancouver, Washington - Re-roof 3 Bldgs

Officer's Row. . . .$150,000

NW School of Wooden Boatbuilding - Expanding Public

Access. . . .$240,000

Kalispel Tribe - Restoration of Our Lady of

Sorrows Church. . . .$33,000

KC Dept. of Natural Resources - Mukai Farmstead & Garden

Preserv. . . .$600,000

City of Edmonds - Edmonds Museum (Carnegie Library

Restoration). . . .$74,000

Vancouver National Historic Reserve Trust - Renovate

Providence. . . .$490,000

Washington Trust for Historic Preservation - Stimson-Green

Mansion. . . .$100,000

Phinney Neighborhood Association - John B.

Allen School. . . .$30,000

PNW Railroad Archive - Mounting rails. . . .$47,000

City of Roslyn - Historic Community Center, Library,

& City Hall. . . .$233,000

Quincy Valley Historical Society & Museum - Comm

Heritage Barn. . . .$41,000

The NW Railway Museum - Puget Sound Electric Railway

Interurban. . . .$229,000

The Cutter Theatre - 1912 Metaline Falls School

Re-Roofing. . . .$26,000

Delridge Neighborhoods Dev Assoc - Structural

improvements. . . .$299,000

Seattle City Light - Continue Georgetown Steam

Plan. . . .$773,000

Skagit County Historical Society - Skagit City

School Rehab. . . .$22,000

Mount Baker Theatre - Mount Baker Theatre

Preservation. . . .$1,000,000

North Bay Historical Society - Sargent Oyster House

Restoration. . . .$160,000

City of Lynnwood - Heritage Park Water Tower Phase II

Renovation. . . .$124,000

Town of Waverly - Restoration of Prairie View

Schoolhouse. . . .$55,000

City of Lacey - Renovating Lacey warehouse for

new museum. . . .$979,000

Northwest Schooner Society - Restoration 1906 Keepers

Quarters. . . .$82,000

Sammamish Heritage Society - Reard House Phase III:

Reconstruct. . . .$123,000

Cheney Depot Society - Cheney Depot Relocation &

Rehabilitation. . . .$367,000

The 5th Ave Theatre Assoc - Theatre Upgrade:

Auditorium. . . .$560,000

Highline Historical Society - Phase 3: Highline Heritage

Museum. . . .$71,000

University Place Historical Society - Curran House

History Museum. . . .$41,000

Coupeville Maritime Heritage Foundation - Preserv of

vessel Suva. . . .$71,000

((Fort Worden Public Development Authority - Sage Arts &

Ed Ctr. . . .$560,000))

South Pierce County Historical Society - Eatonville

Tofu House. . . .$15,000

City of Everett - Van Valley Home lead Abatement &

Pres. . . .$67,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($9,737,000))

$9,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,737,000))

$9,177,000

Sec. 5018. 2019 c 413 s 5098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation: 2019-21 (40000086)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,545,000))

$2,249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,543,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($11,088,000))

$11,792,000

Sec. 5019. 2019 c 413 s 5109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

It is the intent of the legislature that all remaining work on this project be completed by June 30, 2023.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,847,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,416,000

Sec. 5020. 2019 c 413 s 5122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,902,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,642,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$36,642,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,234,000

Sec. 5021. 2019 c 413 s 5103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($19,287,000))

$19,196,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,240,000))

$20,149,000

Sec. 5022. 2019 c 413 s 5126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,616,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$211,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,827,000))

$39,967,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$29,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,875,000

(End of part)

PART 6

2017-2019 BIENNIUM PROVISIONS

Sec. 6001. 2019 c 413 s 6006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $11,000,000 of the state building construction account, is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that advance clean and renewable energy technologies, and transmission and distribution control systems; that support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and that increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(6) $7,900,000 of the state building construction account and $3,100,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to demonstrate new approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a) Projects must be implemented by local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department of commerce must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects the department of transportation is developing and projects funded by the Volkswagen consent decree, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems.

(b) Priorities must be given to eligible technologies that reduce the top two hundred hours of demand and the demand side.

(c) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(i) Electric vehicle and transportation system charging and open source control infrastructure, including inductive charging systems;

(ii) Electric vehicle sharing in low-income, multi-unit housing communities in urban areas;

(iii) Grid-related vehicle electrification, connecting vehicle fleets to grid operations, including school and transit buses;

(iv) Electric vehicle fleet management tools with open source software;

(v) Maritime electrification, such as electric ferries, water taxis, and shore power infrastructure.

(7)(a) $8,600,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies, as needed to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program unless the organization prefers to compete for the grants. If the organization prefers to receive grants from the program they may not participate in the consultant process determining how the grant process is structured. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects, including but not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) $750,000 of this subsection (7) is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental program.

(8) $8,000,000 of the state taxable construction account is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in advanced materials at the proposed science laboratories infrastructure facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. These state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as match to the federal funding. The instruments will support researchers at the bioproducts sciences and engineering laboratory, the joint center for deployment research in earth abundant materials, the center for advanced materials and clean energy technology, and other energy and materials collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(9) $1,600,000 of the state building construction account and $2,400,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds for the deployment of solar projects located in Washington state.

(a) Priority must be given to distribution side projects that reduce peak electricity demand.

(b) Projects must be capable of generating more than one hundred kilowatts of direct current generating capacity.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, grants shall not exceed $200,000 per megawatt of direct current generating capacity and total grant funds per project shall not exceed $1,000,000 per applicant. Applicants may not use other state grants.

(d) At least 35 percent of the total allocation of a project must be for community solar projects that provide solar electricity to low-income households, low-income tribal housing programs, affordable housing providers, and nonprofit organizations providing services to low-income communities. The provisions of (c) of this subsection do not apply to projects funded under this subsection (9)(d).

(e) Priority must be given to major components made in Washington.

(f) The department must attempt to prioritize an equitable geographic distribution and a diversity of project sizes.

(10) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for the first phase of a project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of seven hundred fifty thousand tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create aluminum manufacturing jobs located in Whatcom county.

(11) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the public utility district no. 1 of Klickitat county for the remediation, survey, and evaluation of a closed-loop pump storage hydropower project at the John Day pool.

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,600,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$46,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$246,100,000

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2019 c 413 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((forty-eight million six hundred eighteen thousand two hundred eighteen dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred six million nine hundred two thousand nine hundred ninety-six dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred thirty-three million two hundred fifty-nine thousand five hundred seventy-three dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium))forty-three million three hundred fourteen thousand six hundred forty-two dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, three hundred million four hundred twenty-two thousand three hundred forty-three dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium, and four hundred seventeen million four hundred fifty-five thousand six hundred sixty dollars for the 2023-2025 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2019 c 413 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $103,143,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the King county secure community transition center.

(6) Department of fish and wildlife: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,099,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase automated salmon marking trailers.

(7) Department of natural resources: Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to remodel spaces within agency-owned commercial buildings that will benefit the common school trust.

(8) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $9,950,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a consolidated academic support services facility. Debt service for this facility may not be paid from additional student fees.

(9) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College for up to $27,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student recreation center.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College Puyallup for up to $2,831,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and construct parking.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student activity center on the Clarkston campus.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $4,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Wells Hall replacement project.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build additional instructional and lab classroom space.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase one or more properties adjacent to the campus.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(10) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for roof replacement projects.

Sec. 7003. 2019 c 413 s 7003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of (($5,000,000, or)) $10,000,000 ((for higher education institutions)). "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.

(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.

(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management may make an exception to some or all of the predesign requirements in this section ((after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comment by the legislature regarding the proposed exception)). The office of financial management shall report any exception to the fiscal committees of the legislature and include: (a) A description of the major capital project for which the predesign waiver is made; (b) an explanation of the reason for the waiver; and (c) a rough order of magnitude cost estimate for the project's design and construction.

(5) In deliberations related to submitting an exception under this section, the office of financial management shall consider the following factors:

(a) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding the site of the project;

(b) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding whether the project will involve renovation, new construction, or both;

(c) Whether, within six years of submitting the request for funding, the agency has completed, or initiated the construction of, a substantially similar project;

(d) Whether there is any anticipated change to the project's program or the services to be delivered at the facility;

(e) Whether the requesting agency indicates that the project may not require some or all of the predesign requirements in this section due to a lack of complexity; and

(f) Whether any other factors related to project complexity or risk, as determined by the office of financial management, could reduce the need for, or scope of, a predesign.

(6) If under this section some or all predesign requirements are waived, the office of financial management may instead propose a professional project cost estimate instead of a request for predesign funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. If Substitute House Bill No. 2936 (predesign) is not enacted by June 30, 2020, section 7003 of this act is null and void.

Sec. 7005. RCW 43.19.501 and 2018 c 2 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county. ((For the 2015-2017 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for studies related to real estate.))

During the ((2017-2019))2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The department of natural resources after consultation with the department of social and health services may enter into long-term, revenue generating opportunities for underutilized portions of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center bounded by 15th Ave NE and NE 150th Street to benefit the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory trust. Long-term, revenue generating opportunities may include, but are not limited to, land leases, land sales, and land swaps. It is the intent of the legislature that any revenue obtained from these opportunities be utilized by the department of social and health services for services benefiting those with developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services and the department of natural resources must amend their lease if necessary to conform with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. A new section is added to 2019 c 413 (uncodified) to read as follows:

In order to accelerate the reduction of embodied carbon and improve the environmental performance of construction materials, agencies shall, whenever possible, review and consider embodied carbon reported in environmental product declarations when evaluating proposed structural materials for construction projects.

Sec. 7008. 2019 c 413 s 7038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON TRANSFER TO SEATTLE.
By June 30, 2020, the University of Washington must transfer the deed of the property and general purpose facility, King County parcel numbers 308500-2100, 713830-0015, and 713880-0025, located ((at))near 2901 27th Avenue South, Seattle, to the city of Seattle for the purposes of developing affordable housing, including supportive housing, for households at or below ((eighty))sixty percent of the area median income and ((providing health care services in partnership with a public hospital system))for other potential educational, research, and clinical uses by the university, including an early learning facility. ((The University of Washington may reserve easements in the transferred property at no cost to the university.))If the university constructs and occupies space for its potential uses on the transferred property, then such space must be occupied at no base rent paid by the university. The transfer shall count toward the ((obligation))commitment to build affordable housing under the university's institutional campus master plan agreement. The city shall seek to maximize the affordable housing development potential of the property consistent with transit-oriented development principles. Liabilities existing on the property at the time of transfer will transfer with the property. When the deed is transferred to the city, any existing leases of the property expire, except those leases that the university and city have agreed to extend beyond the transfer date. The transfer must be at no cost to the city. The transfer must provide that the property reverts to the University of Washington if within twenty years the city sells the property to any entity other than a nonprofit corporation or a unit of state or local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---