BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.41.520 and 2019 c 399 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((By September 1, 2019, every))Every hospital must submit to the department its policies related to access to care regarding:

(a) Admission;

(b) End-of-life care and the death with dignity act, chapter 70.245 RCW;

(c) Nondiscrimination; and

(((c)))(d) Reproductive health care.

(2) The department shall post a copy of the policies received under subsection (1) of this section on its web site.

(3) If a hospital makes changes to any of the policies listed under subsection (1) of this section, it must submit a copy of the changed policy to the department within thirty days after the hospital approves the changes.

(4) A hospital must post a copy of the policies provided to the department under subsection (1) of this section and the form required under subsection (5) of this section to the hospital's own web site in a location where the policies are readily accessible to the public without a required login or other restriction.

(5) ((By September 1, 2019, the))The department shall, in consultation with stakeholders including a hospital association and patient advocacy groups, develop ((a))two simple and clear forms to be submitted by hospitals along with the policies required in subsection (1) of this section. ((The))One form must provide the public with specific information about which reproductive health care services are and are not generally available at each hospital. The other form must provide the public with specific information about which end-of-life services are and are not generally available at each hospital. Each form must include contact information for the hospital in case patients have specific questions about services available at the hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

By August 1, 2020, the department of health shall develop the form required in RCW 70.41.520(5) related to end-of-life care and the death with dignity act, chapter 70.245 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2020.

--- END ---