BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.32.121 and 2004 c 271 s 168 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State representative, ((one hundred words;)) state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words; president and vice president, United States senator, United States representative, and governor, three hundred words.

(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not exceed two hundred fifty words in length.

(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed seventy-five words in length.

(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

--- END ---