BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning the school year of 2020-21, each school district shall:

(a) Maintain and make available to school employees and volunteers a bleeding control kit located on each school campus for use in the event of a traumatic injury involving blood loss. The bleeding control kit must be stored in an easily accessible area of each school campus.

(b) Require that each school has a minimum of two employees per school who have completed the training developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in subsection (4) of this section. If a school has more than one thousand students, it must have one trained employee per five hundred students.

(c) Require each school to inspect and inventory each bleeding control kit annually and after each use to ensure the materials, supplies, and equipment contained in the kit are not expired or missing, and that any expired or missing materials, supplies, and equipment are replaced as necessary.

(2) Each bleeding control kit must include:

(a) A tourniquet endorsed by or approved for use in battlefield trauma care by the armed forces of the United States;

(b) A compression bandage;

(c) A bleeding control bandage;

(d) Latex-free gloves;

(e) Permanent markers;

(f) Scissors; and

(g) Instructional documents developed by the United States department of homeland security, the American college of surgeons, or similar organization detailing methods to prevent blood loss following a traumatic event.

(3) In addition to the items listed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district may include other medical materials and equipment that:

(a) Are approved by local law enforcement or first responders;

(b) Can adequately treat a traumatic injury; and

(c) Can be stored in a readily available kit.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and provide training for the use of bleeding control kits. The office may satisfy the training requirements by using trainings and online trainings produced by the United States department of homeland security, the American college of surgeons, or similar organizations. The training must include:

(a) The proper application of pressure to stop bleeding;

(b) The application of dressings and bandages;

(c) Other pressure techniques to control bleeding; and

(d) The correct application of tourniquets.

--- END ---