BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that there is evidence of a significant association between youth exposure to marijuana advertising and a higher probability of youth marijuana use and stronger intentions of youth to use marijuana. Studies showing this significant association are described in the following articles:

(a) Elizabeth J. D'Amico, et al., Gateway to curiosity: Medical marijuana ads and intention and use during middle school, 29 Psychology of Addictive Behaviors 613 (2015); and

(b) Elizabeth J. D'Amico, et al., Planting the seed for marijuana use: Changes in exposure to medical marijuana advertising and subsequent marijuana use, cognitions, and consequences over seven years, 188 Drug & Alcohol Dependence 385 (2018).

(2) The legislature finds that the state has a substantial interest in preventing youth and persons under age twenty-one from consuming marijuana. This substantial interest was recognized by the King county superior court in the final order granting petitioner's request for relief from agency action in the case Plausible Products, LLC d/b/a Hashtag Cannabis v. Washington State Liquor and Cannabis Board, Case #19-2-03293-6 SEA (Order Filed November 18, 2019). Despite recognizing this substantial state interest, the court ruled that several specific provisions of the marijuana advertising restrictions for on-premises signs are unconstitutional in light of other permissible forms of marijuana advertising under the regulatory framework, such as billboards, which expose potential underage consumers to marijuana advertising. The court also declined to recognize a substantial state interest in maintaining an orderly marketplace to avoid federal intervention, as a justification for the advertising restrictions.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to enact provisions reducing youth exposure to marijuana advertising by prohibiting the use of billboards for advertising marijuana. While doing so, the legislature also intends to provide more flexibility for the use of signs and advertisements by marijuana licensees at their licensed premises.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.369 and 2017 c 317 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No licensed marijuana producer, processor, researcher, or retailer may place or maintain, or cause to be placed or maintained, any sign or other advertisement for a marijuana business or marijuana product, including useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused product, in any form or through any medium whatsoever within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a school grounds, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older.

(2) ((Except for the use of billboards as authorized under this section, licensed))Licensed marijuana retailers may not display any signage outside of the licensed premises((, other than two signs identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business or trade name, stating the location of the business, and identifying the nature of the business. Each sign must be no larger than one thousand six hundred square inches and be permanently affixed to a building or other structure))that is appealing to youth or violates requirements of this section or board rules adopted under this section. The location and content of ((the)) retail marijuana signs ((authorized under this subsection)) are subject to all other requirements and restrictions established in this section for indoor signs, outdoor signs, and other marijuana-related advertising methods.

(3) A marijuana licensee may not utilize transit advertisements for the purpose of advertising its business or product line. "Transit advertisements" means advertising on or within private or public vehicles and all advertisements placed at, on, or within any bus stop, taxi stand, transportation waiting area, train station, airport, or any similar transit-related location.

(4) A marijuana licensee may not engage in advertising or other marketing practice that specifically targets persons residing outside of the state of Washington.

(5) All signs((, billboards,)) or other print advertising for marijuana businesses or marijuana products must contain text stating that marijuana products may be purchased or possessed only by persons twenty-one years of age or older.

(6) A marijuana licensee may not:

(a) Take any action, directly or indirectly, to target youth in the advertising, promotion, or marketing of marijuana and marijuana products, or take any action the primary purpose of which is to initiate, maintain, or increase the incidence of youth use of marijuana or marijuana products;

(b) Use objects such as toys or inflatables, movie or cartoon characters, or any other depiction or image likely to be appealing to youth, where such objects, images, or depictions indicate an intent to cause youth to become interested in the purchase or consumption of marijuana products; or

(c) Use or employ a commercial mascot outside of, and in proximity to, a licensed marijuana business. A "commercial mascot" means live human being, animal, or mechanical device used for attracting the attention of motorists and passersby so as to make them aware of marijuana products or the presence of a marijuana business. Commercial mascots include, but are not limited to, inflatable tube displays, persons in costume, or wearing, holding, or spinning a sign with a marijuana-related commercial message or image, where the intent is to draw attention to a marijuana business or its products.

(7) A marijuana licensee that engages in outdoor advertising is subject to the advertising requirements and restrictions set forth in this subsection (7) and elsewhere in this chapter.

(a) ((All outdoor))Outdoor advertising signs((, including billboards, are limited to text that identifies the retail outlet by the licensee's business or trade name, states the location of the business, and identifies the type or nature of the business. Such signs)) may not contain any depictions ((of marijuana plants, marijuana products,)) or images that might be appealing to children. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board is granted rule-making authority subject to subsection (10)(c) of this section to regulate the text and images that are permissible on outdoor advertising to ensure the text and images of signs and other outdoor advertisements are not appealing to children or persons under twenty-one years of age. Such rule making must be consistent with other administrative rules generally applicable to the advertising of marijuana businesses and products.

(b) Outdoor advertising is prohibited:

(i) On signs and placards in arenas, stadiums, shopping malls, fairs that receive state allocations, farmers markets, and video game arcades, whether any of the foregoing are open air or enclosed, but not including any such sign or placard located in an adult only facility; and

(ii) ((Billboards that are visible from any street, road, highway, right-of-way, or public parking area are prohibited, except as provided in (c) of this subsection.))On any billboard in this state.

(c) ((Licensed retail outlets may use a billboard or outdoor sign solely for the purpose of identifying the name of the business, the nature of the business, and providing the public with directional information to the licensed retail outlet. Billboard advertising is subject to the same requirements and restrictions as set forth in (a) of this subsection.

(d))) Advertising signs within the premises of a retail marijuana business outlet that are visible to the public from outside the premises must meet the signage regulations and requirements applicable to outdoor signs as set forth in this section.

(((e)))(d) The restrictions and regulations applicable to outdoor advertising under this section are not applicable to:

(i) An advertisement inside a licensed retail establishment that sells marijuana products that is not placed on the inside surface of a window facing outward; or

(ii) An outdoor advertisement at the site of an event to be held at an adult only facility that is placed at such site during the period the facility or enclosed area constitutes an adult only facility, but in no event more than fourteen days before the event, and that does not advertise any marijuana product other than by using a brand name to identify the event.

(8) Merchandising within a retail outlet is not advertising for the purposes of this section.

(9) This section does not apply to a noncommercial message.

(10)(a) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must:

(i) Adopt rules implementing this section and specifically including provisions regulating the ((billboards and)) outdoor signs authorized under this section to ensure signs are not appealing to children or persons under twenty-one years of age; and

(ii) Fine a licensee one thousand dollars for each violation of this section until the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board adopts rules prescribing penalties for violations of this section. The rules must establish escalating penalties including fines and up to suspension or revocation of a marijuana license for subsequent violations.

(b) Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into the dedicated marijuana account created under RCW 69.50.530.

(c) The rule-making authority of the board related to regulating on-premises signs and on-premises advertisements of marijuana licensees is limited to rules designed to prevent such signs and advertisements from being appealing to children and persons under twenty-one years of age. Nothing in this section or chapter authorizes the board to limit the number or size of on-premises signs or advertisements used by a marijuana licensee at their licensed location.

(11) A city, town, or county may adopt rules of outdoor advertising by licensed marijuana retailers that are more restrictive than the advertising restrictions imposed under this chapter. Enforcement of restrictions to advertising by a city, town, or county is the responsibility of the city, town, or county.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.345 and 2019 c 393 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the increased production space, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may reopen the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) Determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(a) Population distribution;

(b) Security and safety issues;

(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) ((Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within Washington state;

(b))) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(((c)))(b) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in the advertising; and

(((d)))(c) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical marijuana endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with standards adopted by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, and prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.345 and 2019 c 393 s 2 and 2019 c 277 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board, subject to the provisions of this chapter, must adopt rules that establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the following:

(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing application, reinstatement, and renewal fees.

(a) Application forms for marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients.

(b) The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on July 24, 2015, and increase the percentage of production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to plants determined by the department under RCW 69.50.375 to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, or THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the increased production space, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board may reopen the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow plants for marijuana retailers holding medical marijuana endorsements. Priority in licensing must be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an application pending on July 24, 2015, but who are not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the limits on the amount of square feet permitted to be in production to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(2) Determining, in consultation with the office of financial management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed in each county, taking into consideration:

(a) Population distribution;

(b) Security and safety issues;

(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients. The ((state liquor and cannabis)) board must reconsider and increase the maximum number of retail outlets it established before July 24, 2015, and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical needs of qualifying patients and designated providers. After January 1, 2017, any reconsideration of the maximum number of retail outlets needed to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients must consider information contained in the medical marijuana authorization database established in RCW 69.51A.230;

(3) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(4) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without violating Washington state law;

(5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington state law;

(6) In making the determinations required by this section, the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board shall take into consideration:

(a) Security and safety issues;

(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and

(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market prices;

(7) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling requirements;

(8) In consultation with the department of agriculture and the department, establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, CBD concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate by the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board;

(9) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration:

(a) ((Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within Washington state;

(b))) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to the advertising;

(((c)))(b) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in the advertising; and

(((d)))(c) Ensuring that retail outlets with medical marijuana endorsements may advertise themselves as medical retail outlets;

(10) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;

(11) In consultation with the department and the department of agriculture, prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;

(12) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing, confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this chapter or the rules of the ((state liquor and cannabis)) board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---