BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.360 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2021, as a condition of certification renewal, a medical assistant-certified shall complete continuing education requirements established by the secretary in rule. When adopting continuing education rules under this section, the secretary shall consider continuing education requirements imposed by national credentialing organizations. A medical assistant-certified who obtains a national credential by passing the examination required under RCW 18.360.040(1)(a) meets the continuing education requirement established in this section by completing the continuing education necessary to maintain his or her national credential.

--- END ---