BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Fire trailer" means a commercial trailer that is used only for wildfire response as required by state and federal regulations, is only transported between storage and job sites, and is equipped with a water tank designed for firefighting purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A fire trailer may be issued a permanent license plate and registration. To be eligible to receive a permanent license plate and registration, the registered owner of the fire trailer must:

(a) Apply for a permanent registration with the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director; and

(b) Pay the initial commercial trailer registration fee required under RCW 46.17.350(1)(c) in addition to any other fees and taxes due by law.

(2) A fire trailer with a permanent registration under this section is exempt from annual registration renewal under RCW 46.16A.110.

(3) The permanent registration under this section expires when the fire trailer changes ownership, is permanently removed from the state, or is otherwise disposed of.

(4) The permanent license plate and registration authorized in subsection (1) of this section may not be issued to fire trailers that haul logs.

(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect October 1, 2020.

--- END ---