BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that worker mobility is a vital part of a sustainable economy and ensuring quality of life for the citizens of Washington state.

(2) However, the legislature acknowledges that many licensed professions have differing requirements between states which an individual must fulfill before being allowed to practice that profession. This reality prevents certain individuals from continuing work in their profession, upon moving to Washington state, until they complete often costly, time consuming, and redundant application requirements.

(3) Furthermore, the legislature acknowledges the undue burden and disincentive this can cause relocating families, driving away individuals looking to move to the state and work in professions in need of talent.

(4) It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to direct the department of licensing to expedite the licensing application process for all individuals moving from out of state if, in the opinion of the department, the requirements for licensure, certification, registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state are substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section, "department" means the department of licensing.

(2) By January 1, 2021, the department must establish procedures to expedite the issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit to perform professional services regulated by the department to a person who is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit in another state to perform such professional services in that state.

(3) The procedure must include a process for issuing the person a license, certificate, registration, or permit, if, in the opinion of the department, the requirements for licensure, certification, registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state are substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.

(4) The department must develop a method and adopt rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section to perform services regulated in Washington by issuing the person a temporary license, certificate, registration, or permit for a limited period of time to allow the person to perform regulated services while completing any specific additional requirements in Washington that are not related to training or practice standards of the profession that were not required in the other state in which the person is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit. Nothing in this section requires the department to issue a temporary license, certificate, registration, or permit if the standards of the other state are substantially unequal to Washington standards.

(5) An applicant must state in the application that he or she:

(a) Has requested verification from the other state or states that the person is currently licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit; and

(b) Is not subject to any disciplinary sanctions, terms, conditions, or restrictions by the regulatory body of the other state or states.

(6) If the department finds reasonable cause to believe that an applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements under subsection (5)(a) or (b) of this section, the department may take action to suspend or revoke the license, certificate, registration, or permit.

(7) This section does not apply when there is a reciprocity licensing agreement with a national organization in place to facilitate reciprocal professional licensing of an individual licensed in another state.

"NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) For the purposes of this chapter, "department" means the department of licensing.

(2) By January 1, 2021, the department must establish procedures to expedite the issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit to perform professional services regulated by the department to a person who is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit in another state to perform such professional services in that state.

(3) The procedure must include a process for issuing the person a license, certificate, registration, or permit, if, in the opinion of the department, the requirements for licensure, certification, registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state are substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.

(4) The department must develop a method and adopt rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section to perform services regulated in Washington by issuing the person a temporary license, certificate, registration, or permit for a limited period of time to allow the person to perform regulated services while completing any specific additional requirements in Washington that are not related to training or practice standards of the profession that were not required in the other state in which the person is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit. Nothing in this chapter requires the department to issue a temporary license, certificate, registration, or permit if the standards of the other state are substantially unequal to Washington standards.

(5) An applicant must state in the application that he or she:

(a) Has requested verification from the other state or states that the person is currently licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit; and

(b) Is not subject to any disciplinary sanctions, terms, conditions, or restrictions by the regulatory body of the other state or states.

(6) If the department finds reasonable cause to believe that an applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements under subsection (5)(a) or (b) of this section, the department may take action to suspend or revoke the license, certificate, registration, or permit.

(7) This chapter does not apply when there is a reciprocity licensing agreement with a national organization in place to facilitate reciprocal professional licensing of an individual licensed in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 3 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---