BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.13.170 and 2011 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the department must recommend to the governor a list of all forest riparian easement applications to be funded under RCW 76.13.120. The governor must determine the number of applications to receive funding and then submit the list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The list must include, but not be limited to, the date of the forestry riparian easement application, the type of qualifying timber, estimates of the value of the easement, aerial photograph maps of the application area, and an estimate of administrative costs for purchase of easements.

(2) The governor or the legislature may remove an application from the list if there is evidence that the applicant is a nonqualifying landowner for a forestry riparian easement.

(3) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the legislature shall appropriate moneys in the omnibus capital appropriations act to fund all forest riparian easements recommended to the governor under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---