BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.04.126 and 2015 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Collector vehicle" means any motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220. A collector vehicle shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or for routine transportation of persons or property.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.1261 and 2010 c 161 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

"Collector vehicle license plate" means a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle that is ((more than))at least thirty years old and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.04.199 and 2017 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Horseless carriage license plate" is a special license plate that may be assigned to a motor vehicle ((that is at least forty years old))manufactured or built before January 1, 1916, and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.255.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.18.220 and 2015 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector vehicle license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle or travel trailer as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; ((and))

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(((1)(f)))(5), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law; and

(c) Submit a certification as prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.

(2) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate may:

(a) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department; or

(b) For vehicles manufactured and with a model year before January 1, 1989, provide an actual Washington state issued license plate designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.

(3) Collector vehicle license plates:

(a) ((Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle or travel trailer;

(b))) Are ((not)) required to be renewed every five years; and

(((c)))(b) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle or travel trailer.

(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, ((and)) occasional pleasure driving, and use as necessary for operation and maintenance of the vehicle. A collector vehicle shall not be used for business or commercial purposes or for routine transportation of persons or property.

(5) When applying for an initial or renewal registration of a collector vehicle, the registered owner(s) must submit a completed certification form created by the department.

(6) Collector vehicle license plates under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

(((6)))(7) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license plate under subsection (2)(b) of this section is subject to a traffic infraction and fine in an amount equal to the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.16A.200(7)(b). Additionally, the person must pay for the cost of a collector vehicle license plate as listed in RCW 46.17.220(((1)(f)))(5), unless already paid.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.18.255 and 2011 c 171 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a horseless carriage license plate for a motor vehicle that ((is at least forty years old))was manufactured or built before January 1, 1916. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the horseless carriage license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(((1)(i)))(11), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.

(2) Horseless carriage license plates:

(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;

(b) Are not required to be renewed;

(c) Are not transferable to any other motor vehicle; and

(d) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.16A.070 and 2011 c 171 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may:

(a) Refuse to issue or may cancel a registration certificate at any time when the department determines that an applicant for registration is not entitled to a registration certificate. Notice of cancellation may be accomplished by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address in department records for the registered or legal owner or owners, and completing an affidavit of first-class mail. It is unlawful for any person to remove, drive, or operate the vehicle until a proper registration certificate has been issued. A person removing, driving, or operating a vehicle after the refusal to issue or cancellation of the registration is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(b) Refuse to issue or renew a collector vehicle license plate and may cancel a registration certificate of a collector vehicle if the registered owner or applicant does not meet the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.220.

(2)(a) The suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal by the director of a registration certificate provided under this chapter is conclusive unless the person whose registration or certificate is suspended, revoked, canceled, or refused appeals to the superior court of Thurston county or the person's county of residence.

(b) Notice of appeal must be filed within ten days after receipt of the notice of suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal. Upon the filing of the notice of appeal, the court shall issue an order to the director to show cause why the registration should not be granted or reinstated and return the order not less than ten days after the date of service to the director. Service must be in the same manner as prescribed for the service of a summons and complaint in other civil actions.

(c) Upon the hearing on the order to show cause, the court shall hear evidence concerning matters with reference to the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal of the registration and shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act applies to all collector vehicle registrations issued before the effective date of this section, in addition to applying to all new collector vehicle registrations. The department shall notify all current collector vehicle plate holders of the new registration requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect January 1, 2021.

--- END ---