BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.020 and 2017 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context otherwise requires.

(1) "Accredited school" means a school or course of instruction which is:

(a) Approved by the state superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, or the state board for community and technical colleges; or

(b) Regulated or licensed as to course content by any agency of the state or under any occupational licensing act of the state, or recognized by the apprenticeship council under an agreement registered with the apprenticeship council pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW.

(2) "Average monthly wage" means the average annual wage as determined under RCW 50.04.355 as now or hereafter amended divided by twelve.

(3) "Beneficiary" means a husband, wife, registered domestic partner, or child of a victim in whom shall vest a right to receive payment under this chapter, except that a husband or wife of an injured victim, living separate and apart in a state of abandonment, regardless of the party responsible therefor, for more than one year at the time of the injury or subsequently, shall not be a beneficiary. A spouse who has lived separate and apart from the other spouse for the period of two years and who has not, during that time, received or attempted by process of law to collect funds for maintenance, shall be deemed living in a state of abandonment.

(4) "Child" means every natural born child, posthumous child, stepchild, child legally adopted prior to the injury, child born after the injury where conception occurred prior to the injury, and dependent child in the legal custody and control of the victim, all while under the age of eighteen years, or under the age of twenty-three years while permanently enrolled as a full-time student in an accredited school, and over the age of eighteen years if the child is a dependent as a result of a ((physical, mental, or sensory handicap))disability.

(5) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items must be used.

(6) "Criminal act" means an act committed or attempted in this state which is: (a) Punishable as a federal offense that is comparable to a felony or gross misdemeanor in this state; (b) punishable as a felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this state; (c) an act committed outside the state of Washington against a resident of the state of Washington which would be compensable had it occurred inside this state and the crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime victims' compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as set forth in the Washington compensation law; or (d) trafficking as defined in RCW 9A.40.100. A "criminal act" does not include the following:

(i) The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or aircraft in violation of law unless:

(A) The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;

(B) The operation thereof was part of the commission of another nonvehicular criminal act as defined in this section;

(C) The death or injury was the result of the operation of a motor vehicle after July 24, 1983, and one of the following applies:

(I) A preponderance of the evidence establishes that the death was the result of vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520;

(II) The victim submits a copy of a certificate of probable cause filed by the prosecutor stating that a vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522 occurred;

(III) Charges have been filed against the defendant for vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;

(IV) A conviction of vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522 has been obtained; or

(V) In cases where a probable criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular assault or, in cases where the perpetrator of the vehicular assault is unascertainable because he or she left the scene of the accident in violation of RCW 46.52.020 or, because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the perpetrator is incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the department may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that a vehicular assault had been committed and authorize benefits;

(D) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW 46.61.502; or

(E) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW 46.61.655(7)(a), failure to secure a load in the first degree;

(ii) Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence of any such prosecution is admissible in any claim or proceeding under this chapter as evidence of the noncriminal character of the acts giving rise to such claim or proceeding, except as provided for in (d)(i)(C) of this subsection;

(iii) Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from acts which are the basis for a claim or proceeding under this chapter is admissible in such claim or proceeding for the limited purpose of proving the criminal character of the acts; and

(iv) Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility of the perpetrator, would constitute criminal conduct are deemed to be criminal conduct within the meaning of this chapter.

(7) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(8) "Financial support for lost wages" means a partial replacement of lost wages due to a temporary or permanent total disability.

(9) "Gainfully employed" means engaging on a regular and continuous basis in a lawful activity from which a person derives a livelihood.

(10) "Injury" means a sudden and tangible happening, of a traumatic nature, producing an immediate or prompt result, and occurring from without, and such physical conditions as result therefrom.

(11) "Invalid" means one who is physically or mentally incapacitated from earning wages.

(12) "Permanent total disability" means loss of both legs, or arms, or one leg and one arm, total loss of eyesight, paralysis, or other condition permanently incapacitating the victim from performing any work at any gainful occupation.

(13) "Private insurance" means any source of recompense provided by contract available as a result of the claimed injury or death at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time thereafter.

(14) "Public insurance" means any source of recompense provided by statute, state or federal, available as a result of the claimed injury or death at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time thereafter.

(15) "Temporary total disability" means any condition that temporarily incapacitates a victim from performing any type of gainful employment as certified by the victim's attending physician.

(16) "Victim" means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as a proximate result of a criminal act of another person, the victim's own good faith and reasonable effort to prevent a criminal act, or his or her good faith effort to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. For the purposes of receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter, "victim" is interchangeable with "employee" or "worker" as defined in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.59.040 and 1985 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not be construed as preventing or restricting the practice, services, or activities of:

(1) A person licensed in this state under any other law from engaging in the profession or occupation for which the person is licensed;

(2) A person employed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant by the government of the United States, if the person provides occupational therapy solely under the directions or control of the organization by which the person is employed;

(3) A person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational therapy in an accredited or approved educational program if the activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study, if the person is designated by a title which clearly indicated the person's status as a student or trainee;

(4) A person fulfilling the supervised fieldwork experience requirements of RCW 18.59.050, if the activities and services constitute a part of the experience necessary to meet the requirements of RCW 18.59.050;

(5) A person performing occupational therapy services in the state, if the services are performed for no more than ninety working days and if:

(a) The person is licensed under the laws of another state which has licensure requirements at least as stringent as the requirements of this chapter, as determined by the board; or

(b) The person has met commonly accepted standards for the practice of occupational therapy as specifically defined by the board;

(6) A person employed by or supervised by an occupational therapist as an occupational therapy aide;

(7) A person with a limited permit. A limited permit may be granted to persons who have completed the education and experience requirements of this chapter, or education and experience requirements which the board deems equivalent to those specified as requirements for licensure. The limited permit allows the applicant to practice in association with an occupational therapist. The limited permit is valid until the results of the next examination have been made public. One extension of this permit may be granted if the applicant has failed the examination, but during this period the person shall be under the direct supervision of an occupational therapist;

(8) Any persons who teach daily living skills, develop prevocational skills, and play and avocational capabilities, or adapt equipment or environments for ((the handicapped))individuals with disabilities, or who do specific activities to enhance cognitive, perceptual motor, sensory integrative and psychomotor skills, but who do not hold themselves out to the public by any title, initials, or description of services as being engaged in the practice of occupational therapy; or

(9) Any person who designs, fabricates, or applies orthotic or prosthetic devices which are prescribed by a health care professional authorized by the laws of the state of Washington to prescribe the device or to direct the design, fabrication or application of the device.

Sec. 3. RCW 20.01.330 and 2011 c 336 s 584 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may refuse to grant a license or renew a license and may revoke or suspend a license or issue a conditional or probationary order if he or she is satisfied after a hearing, as herein provided, of the existence of any of the following facts, which are hereby declared to be a violation of this chapter:

(1) That fraudulent charges or returns have been made by the applicant, or licensee, for the handling, sale or storage of, or for rendering of any service in connection with the handling, sale or storage of any agricultural product.

(2) That the applicant, or licensee, has failed or refused to render a true account of sales, or to make a settlement thereon, or to pay for agricultural products received, within the time and in the manner required by this chapter.

(3) That the applicant, or licensee, has made any false statement as to the condition, quality, or quantity of agricultural products received, handled, sold, or stored by him or her.

(4) That the applicant, or licensee, directly or indirectly has purchased for his or her own account agricultural products received by him or her upon consignment without prior authority from the consignor together with the price fixed by consignor or without promptly notifying the consignor of such purchase. This shall not prevent any commission merchant from taking to account of sales, in order to close the day's business, miscellaneous lots or parcels of agricultural products remaining unsold, if such commission merchant shall forthwith enter such transaction on his or her account of sales.

(5) That the applicant, or licensee, has intentionally made any false or misleading statement as to the conditions of the market for any agricultural products.

(6) That the applicant, or licensee, has made fictitious sales or has been guilty of collusion to defraud the consignor.

(7) That a commission merchant to whom any consignment is made has reconsigned such consignment to another commission merchant and has received, collected, or charged by such means more than one commission for making the sale thereof, for the consignor, unless by written consent of such consignor.

(8) That the licensee was guilty of fraud or deception in the procurement of such license.

(9) That the licensee or applicant has failed or refused to file with the director a schedule of his or her charges for services in connection with agricultural products handled on account of or as an agent of another, or that the applicant, or licensee, has indulged in any unfair practice.

(10) That the licensee has rejected, without reasonable cause, or has failed or refused to accept, without reasonable cause, any agricultural product bought or contracted to be bought from a consignor by such licensee; or failed or refused, without reasonable cause, to furnish or provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other service contracted to be done by licensee in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or other handling of said agricultural products bought or handled or contracted to be bought or handled; or has used any other device to avoid acceptance or unreasonably to defer acceptance of agricultural products bought or handled or contracted to be bought or handled.

(11) That the licensee has otherwise violated any provision of this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

(12) That the licensee has knowingly employed an agent, as defined in this chapter, without causing said agent to comply with the licensing requirements of this chapter applicable to agents.

(13) That the applicant or licensee has, in the handling of any agricultural products, been guilty of fraud, deceit, or negligence.

(14) That the licensee has failed or refused, upon demand, to permit the director or his or her agents to make the investigations, examination, or audits, as provided in this chapter, or that the licensee has removed or sequestered any books, records, or papers necessary to any such investigations, examination, or audits, or has otherwise obstructed the same.

(15) That the licensee, without reasonable cause, has failed or refused to execute or carry out a lawful contract with a consignor.

(16) That the licensee has failed or refused to keep and maintain the records as required by this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

(17) That the licensee has attempted payment by a check the licensee knows not to be backed by sufficient funds to cover such check.

(18) That the licensee has been guilty of fraud or deception in his or her dealings with purchasers including misrepresentation of goods as to grade, quality, weights, quantity, or any other essential fact in connection therewith.

(19) That the licensee has permitted a person to in fact operate his or her own separate business under cover of the licensee's license and bond.

(20) That a commission merchant or dealer has failed to furnish additional bond coverage within fifteen days of when it was requested in writing by the director.

(21) That the licensee has discriminated in the licensee's dealings with consignors on the basis of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.33.350 and 1994 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person, firm, society, association, corporation, or state agency receiving, securing a home for, or otherwise caring for a minor child shall transmit to the prospective adopting parent prior to placement and shall make available to all persons with whom a child has been placed by adoption a complete medical report containing all known and available information concerning the ((mental, physical, and sensory handicaps))disabilities of the child.

(2) The report shall not reveal the identity of the birth parent of the child except as authorized under this chapter but shall include any known or available mental or physical health history of the birth parent that needs to be known by the adoptive parent to facilitate proper health care for the child or that will assist the adoptive parent in maximizing the developmental potential of the child.

(3) Where known or available, the information provided shall include:

(a) A review of the birth family's and the child's previous medical history, including the child's x-rays, examinations, hospitalizations, and immunizations. After July 1, 1992, medical histories shall be given on a standardized reporting form developed by the department;

(b) A physical exam of the child by a licensed physician with appropriate laboratory tests and x-rays;

(c) A referral to a specialist if indicated; and

(d) A written copy of the evaluation with recommendations to the adoptive family receiving the report.

(4) Entities and persons obligated to provide information under this section shall make reasonable efforts to locate records and information concerning the child's ((mental, physical, and sensory handicaps))disabilities. The entities or persons providing the information have no duty, beyond providing the information, to explain or interpret the records or information regarding the child's present or future health.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.40.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this chapter is to assure the right of every ((physically, mentally or sensory handicapped)) child with disabilities to parental love and care as long as possible, to provide for adequate custody of a ((handicapped)) child with a disability who has lost parental care, and to make available to the ((handicapped)) child with a disability the services of the state through its various departments and agencies.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.40.020 and 1955 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

So long as the parents of a ((handicapped)) child with a disability are able to assume parental responsibility for such child, their parental responsibility may not be removed or denied, and commitment by the state or any officer or official thereof shall never be a requirement for the admission of such child to any state school, or institution, or to the common schools.

Sec. 7. RCW 26.40.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The parents or parent of any child who is temporarily or permanently delayed in normal educational processes and/or normal social adjustment by reason of physical, sensory or mental ((handicap))disability, or by reason of social or emotional maladjustment, or by reason of other ((handicap))disability, may petition the superior court for the county in which such child resides for an order for the commitment of such child to custody as provided in RCW 26.40.040, as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 8. RCW 26.44.015 and 2005 c 512 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not be construed to authorize interference with child-raising practices, including reasonable parental discipline, which are not injurious to the child's health, welfare, or safety.

(2) Nothing in this chapter may be used to prohibit the reasonable use of corporal punishment as a means of discipline.

(3) No parent or guardian may be deemed abusive or neglectful solely by reason of the parent's or child's blindness, deafness, developmental disability, or other ((handicap))disability.

Sec. 9. RCW 27.04.045 and 2006 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for the following functions:

(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in such standards;

(2) Managing and administering the state library;

(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development of library services;

(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in the cost-effective purchase of information resources;

(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter;

(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In agreements for services between the library and other state agencies, the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;

(7) Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to effectively provide library and information services to members of the legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection with their official duties;

(8) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and circulation;

(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public information and services, including providing, or providing for, a service that identifies, describes, and provides location information for government information through electronic means, and that assists government agencies in making their information more readily available to the public;

(10) Collecting and distributing copies of state publications, as defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency for distribution. The state library shall maintain the state publications distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW to provide copies of materials that are not available in electronic format to state depository libraries;

(11) Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with RCW 27.12.305;

(12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their information needs;

(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and staff of state-supported residential institutions;

(14) Providing for library and information services to persons throughout the state who are blind and/or physically ((handicapped))disabled;

(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the establishment and development of library services;

(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library facilities and services throughout the state;

(17) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information, reference, and referral resource for all libraries in the state. The state library may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge the state library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by the state library as a recovery of costs; and

(18) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms thereof grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the purpose of qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is authorized to make applications and reports required by the grantor.

Sec. 10. RCW 28B.07.010 and 1983 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the state has a vital interest in ensuring that higher education institutions are maintained in the state in sufficient numbers and located in such locations, as to be accessible to as many citizens as possible. Adequate educational opportunities are essential to the economic, intellectual, and social well-being of the state and its people. Washington's independently-governed private nonprofit higher education institutions are a necessary part of the state's higher educational resources. They provide educational diversity and choice for all residents of the communities in which they are located, communities which may not otherwise be served directly by a public baccalaureate-granting college or university.

The legislature further finds that some of the factors that contribute to educational costs are beyond the control of these higher education institutions and their governing boards. The factors include the need to modify facilities to render the facilities accessible to ((the handicapped or disabled))individuals with disabilities, the necessity of modernizing structures to keep them safe and efficient, and the demands of energy conservation and resource utilization. Many of these needs are associated with the public functions these institutions perform and the requirements of the state and federal governments. Compounding the problem is the fact that the cost of these renovations are borne entirely by the institutions.

Because these institutions serve an important public purpose addressing both the needs of individuals and the needs of the state, and because the performance of that public function can be facilitated at no expense or liability to the state, the legislature declares it to be the public policy of the state of Washington to enable the building, providing, and utilization of modern, well-equipped, efficient, and reasonably priced higher educational facilities, as well as the improvement, expansion, and modernization of such facilities, in a manner that will minimize the capital cost of construction, financing, and use of such facilities. The intention of this policy is to improve and ensure the quality and range of educational services available to the citizens of this state. The intent of the legislature is to accomplish these and related purposes, and this chapter shall be liberally construed in order to further these goals.

Sec. 11. RCW 35.58.240 and 1981 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan transportation, it shall have the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare, adopt, and carry out a general comprehensive plan for public transportation service which will best serve the residents of the metropolitan area and to amend said plan from time to time to meet changed conditions and requirements.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of metropolitan transportation facilities and properties within or without the metropolitan area, including systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways, tramways, buses, or any other means of local transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and vehicular access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such systems and facilities. Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city may be acquired or used by the metropolitan municipal corporation only with the consent of the city council of the city owning such facilities. Cities are hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to metropolitan corporations or to contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the city council of such city and the metropolitan council, without submitting the matter to the voters of such city.

((The facilities and properties of a metropolitan public transportation system whose vehicles will operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired, developed and operated without the corridor and design hearings which are required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit facilities operating on a separate right-of-way.))

(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens, ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students. Classes of service and fares will be maintained in the several parts of the metropolitan area at such levels as will provide, insofar as reasonably practicable, that the portion of any annual transit operating deficit of the metropolitan municipal corporation attributable to the operation of all routes, taken as a whole, which are located within the central city is approximately in proportion to the portion of total taxes collected by or on behalf of the metropolitan municipal corporation for transit purposes within the central city, and that the portion of such annual transit operating deficit attributable to the operation of all routes, taken as a whole, which are located outside the central city, is approximately in proportion to the portion of such taxes collected outside the central city.

In the event any metropolitan municipal corporation shall extend its metropolitan transportation function to any area or service already offered by any company holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040, it shall by purchase or condemnation acquire at the fair market value, from the person holding the existing certificate for providing the services, that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the services within the area of public operation.

Sec. 12. RCW 35.68.075 and 1989 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The standard for construction on any county road, or city or town street, for which curbs in combination with sidewalks, paths, or other pedestrian access ways are to be constructed, shall be not less than two ramps per lineal block on or near the crosswalks at intersections. Such ramps shall be at least thirty-six inches wide and so constructed as to allow reasonable access to the crosswalk for ((physically handicapped)) persons with physical disabilities, without uniquely endangering blind persons.

(2) Standards set for curb ramping under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any curb existing upon enactment of this section but shall apply to all new curb construction and to all replacement curbs constructed at any point in a block which gives reasonable access to a crosswalk.

(3) Upon September 21, 1977, every ramp thereafter constructed under subsection (1) of this section, which serves one end of a crosswalk, shall be matched by another ramp at the other end of the crosswalk. However, no ramp shall be required at the other end of the crosswalk if there is no curb nor sidewalk at the other end of the crosswalk. Nor shall any matching ramp constructed pursuant to this subsection require a subsequent matching ramp.

Sec. 13. RCW 35.86A.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 204 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is hereby determined and declared:

(1) The free circulation of traffic of all kinds through our cities is necessary to the health, safety and general welfare of the public, whether residing in, traveling to or through the cities of this state;

(2) The most efficient use of the street and highway system requires availability of strategically located parking for vehicles in localities where large numbers of persons congregate;

(3) An expanding suburban population has increased demands for further concentration of uses in central metropolitan areas, necessitating an increasing investment in streets and highways;

(4) On-street parking is now inadequate, and becomes increasingly an inefficient and uneconomical method for temporary storage of vehicles in commercial, industrial and high-density residential areas, causing such immediate adverse consequences as the following, among others:

(a) Serious traffic congestion from on-street parking, which interferes with use of streets for travel, disrupts public surface transportation at peak hours, impedes rapid and effective fighting of fires and disposition of police forces, slows emergency vehicles, and inflicts hardship upon ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities and others dependent upon private vehicles for transportation;

(b) On-street parking absorbs right-of-way useful and usable for travel;

(c) On-street parking reduces the space available for truck and passenger loading for the abutting properties, hinders ready access, and impedes cleaning of streets;

(d) Inability to temporarily store automobiles has discouraged the public from travel to and within our cities, from congregating at public events, and from using public facilities.

(5) Insufficient off-street parking has had long-range results, as the following, among others:

(a) Metropolitan street and highway systems have lost efficiency and the free circulation of traffic and persons has been impaired;

(b) The growth and development of metropolitan areas has been retarded;

(c) Business, industry, and housing has become unnecessarily and uneconomically dispersed;

(d) Limited and valuable land area is under used.

All of which cause loss of payrolls, business and productivity, and property values, with resulting impairment of the public health, safety and welfare, the utility of our streets and highways, and tax revenues;

(6) Establishment of public off-street parking facilities will promote the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, by:

(a) Expediting the movement of the public, and of goods in metropolitan areas, alleviating traffic congestion, and preserving the large investment in streets and highways;

(b) Permitting a greater use of public facilities, congregation of the public, and more intensive development of private property within the community;

(7) Establishment of public off-street parking is a necessary ancillary to and extension of an efficient street and highway system in metropolitan areas, as much so as a station or terminal is to a railroad or urban transit line;

(8) Public off-street parking facilities, open to the public and owned by a city or town, are and remain a public use and a public function, irrespective of whether:

(a) Parking fees are charged to users;

(b) The management or operation of one or more parking facilities is conducted by a public agency, or under contract or lease by private enterprise; or

(c) A portion of the facilities is used for commercial, store or automobile accessory purposes;

(9) Public parking facilities under the control of a parking commission are appropriately treated differently from other parking facilities of a city.

Sec. 14. RCW 35.86A.070 and 1980 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The parking commission is authorized and empowered, in the name of the municipality by resolution to:

(1) Own and acquire property and property rights by purchase, gift, devise, or lease for the construction, maintenance, or operation of off-street parking facilities, or for effectuating the purpose of this chapter; and accept grants-in-aid, including compliance with conditions attached thereto;

(2) Construct, maintain, and operate off-street parking facilities located on land dedicated for park or civic center purposes, or on other municipally-owned land where the primary purpose of such off-street parking facility is to provide parking for persons who use such park or civic center facilities, and undertake research, and prepare plans incidental thereto subject to applicable statutes and charter provisions for municipal purchases, expenditures, and improvements; and in addition may own other off-street parking facilities and operate them in accordance with RCW 35.86A.120: PROVIDED, That the provisions of chapter 35.86 RCW as now or hereafter amended shall not apply to such construction, operation or maintenance;

(3) Establish and collect parking fees, require that receipts be provided for parking fees, make exemption for ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, lease space for commercial, store, advertising or automobile accessory purposes, and regulate prices and service charges, for use of and within and the aerial space over parking facilities under its control;

(4) Subject to applicable city civil service provisions, provide for the appointment, removal and control of officers and employees, and prescribe their duties and compensation, and to control all equipment and property under the commission's jurisdiction;

(5) Contract with private persons and organizations for the management and/or operation of parking facilities under its control, and services related thereto, including leasing of such facilities or portions thereof;

(6) Cause construction of parking facilities as a condition of an operating agreement or lease, derived through competitive bidding, or in the manner authorized by chapter 35.42 RCW;

(7) Execute and accept instruments, including deeds, necessary or convenient for the carrying on of its business; acquire rights to develop parking facilities over or under city property; and to contract to operate and manage parking facilities under the jurisdiction of other city departments or divisions and of other public bodies;

(8) Determine the need for and recommend to the city council:

(a) The establishment of local improvement districts to pay the cost of parking facilities or any part thereof;

(b) The issuance of bonds or other financing by the city for construction of parking facilities;

(c) The acquisition of property and property rights by condemnation from the public, or in street areas;

(9) Transfer its control of property to the city and liquidate its affairs, so long as such transfer does not contravene any covenant or agreement made with the holders of bonds or other creditors; and

(10) Require payment of the excise tax hereinafter provided.

Parking fees for parking facilities under the control of the parking commission shall be maintained commensurate with and neither higher nor lower than prevailing rates for parking charged by commercial operators in the general area.

Sec. 15. RCW 35.92.060 and 1995 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A city or town may also construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable, electric, and other railways, automobiles, motor cars, motor buses, auto trucks, and any and all other forms or methods of transportation of freight or passengers within the corporate limits of the city or town, and a first-class city may also construct, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable, electric, and other railways beyond those corporate limits only within the boundaries of the county in which the city is located and of any adjoining county, for the transportation of freight and passengers above, upon, or underneath the ground. It may also fix, alter, regulate, and control the fares and rates to be charged therefor; and fares or rates may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens, ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students. Without the payment of any license fee or tax, or the filing of a bond with, or the securing of a permit from, the state, or any department thereof, the city or town may engage in, carry on, and operate the business of transporting and carrying passengers or freight for hire by any method or combination of methods that the legislative authority of any city or town may by ordinance provide, with full authority to regulate and control the use and operation of vehicles or other agencies of transportation used for such business.

Sec. 16. RCW 35.95A.050 and 2002 c 248 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Every authority has the following powers:

(1) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of public monorail transportation facilities, including passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and other facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and vehicular access to and from public monorail transportation facilities, together with all lands, rights-of-way, and property within or outside the authority area, and together with equipment and accessories necessary or appropriate for these facilities, except that property, including but not limited to other types of public transportation facilities, that is owned by any city, county, county transportation authority, public transportation benefit area, metropolitan municipal corporation, or regional transit authority may be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent of the public entity owning the property. The entities are authorized to convey or lease property to an authority or to contract for their joint use on terms fixed by agreement between the entity and the authority;

(2) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service. Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens and ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities;

(3) To contract with the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal corporation, and other country, city, other political subdivision or governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving any gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of public monorail transportation facilities as follows:

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, and in addition to any other authority provided by law, the governing body of a city transportation authority may contract with one or more vendors for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance, or other service related to the development of a monorail public transportation system including, but not limited to, monorail trains, operating systems and control equipment, guideways, and pylons, together with the necessary passenger stations, terminals, parking facilities, and other related facilities necessary and appropriate for passenger and vehicular access to and from the monorail train.

(b) If the governing body of the city transportation authority decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications or proposals for services from qualified vendors, the authority must publish notice of its requirements and request submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must be published in the official newspaper of the city creating the authority at least once a week for two weeks, not less than sixty days before the final date for the submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must state in summary form: (i) The general scope and nature of the design, construction, operation, maintenance, or other services being sought related to the development of the proposed monorail, tram, or trolley public transportation system; (ii) the name and address of a representative of the city transportation authority who can provide further details; (iii) the final date for the submission of qualifications statements or proposals; (iv) an estimated schedule for the consideration of qualifications statements or proposals, the selection of vendors, and the negotiation of a contract or contracts for services; (v) the location of which a copy of any requests for qualifications statements or requests for proposals will be made available; and (vi) the criteria established by the governing body of the authority to select a vendor or vendors, which may include, but is not limited to, the vendor's prior experience, including design, construction, operation, or maintenance of other similar public transportation facilities, respondent's management capabilities, proposed project schedule, availability and financial resources, costs of the services to be provided, nature of facility design proposed by the vendors, system reliability, performance standards required for the facilities, compatibility with existing public transportation facilities operated by the authority or any other public body or other providers of similar services to the public, project performance guarantees, penalties, and other enforcement provisions, environmental protection measures to be used by the vendor, consistency with the applicable regional transportation plans, and the proposed allocation of project risks.

(c) If the governing body of the city transportation authority decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications statements or proposals submitted by vendors, it may designate a representative to evaluate the vendors who submitted qualifications statements or proposals and conduct discussions regarding qualifications or proposals with one or more vendors. The governing body or its representative may request submission of qualifications statements and may later request more detailed proposals from one or more vendors who have submitted qualifications statements, or may request detailed proposals without having first received and evaluated qualifications statements. The governing body or its representative will evaluate the qualifications or proposals, as applicable. If two or more vendors submit qualifications or proposals that meet the criteria established by the governing body of the authority, discussions and interviews must be held with at least two vendors. Any revisions to a request for qualifications or request for proposals must be made available to all vendors then under consideration by the governing body of the authority and must be made available to any other person who has requested receipt of that information.

(d) Based on the criteria established by the governing body of the authority, the representative will recommend to the governing body a vendor or vendors that are initially determined to be the best qualified to provide one or more of the design, construction, operation or maintenance, or other service related to the development of the proposed monorail public transportation system.

(e) The governing body of the authority or its representative may attempt to negotiate a contract with the vendor or vendors selected for one or more of the design, construction, operation or maintenance, or other service related to the development of the proposed monorail public transportation system on terms that the governing body of the authority determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest of the authority. If the governing body, or its representative, is unable to negotiate a contract with any one or more of the vendors first selected on terms that it determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest of the authority, negotiations with any one or more of the vendors must be terminated or suspended and another qualified vendor or vendors may be selected in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section. If the governing body decides to continue the process of selection, negotiations will continue with a qualified vendor or vendors in accordance with this section at the sole discretion of the governing body of the authority until an agreement is reached with one or more qualified vendors, or the process is terminated by the governing body. The process may be repeated until an agreement is reached.

(f) Prior to entering into a contract with a vendor, the governing body of the authority must make written findings, after holding a public hearing on the proposal, that it is in the public interest to enter into the contract, that the contract is financially sound, and that it is advantageous for the governing body of the authority to use this method for awarding contracts for one or more of the design, construction, or operation or maintenance of the proposed monorail public transportation system as compared to all other methods of awarding such contracts.

(g) Each contract must include a project performance bond or bonds or other security by the vendor.

(h) The provisions of chapters 39.12 and 39.19 RCW apply to a contract entered into under this section as if the public transportation systems and facilities were owned by a public body.

(i) The vendor selection process permitted by this section is supplemental to and is not construed as a repeal of or limitation on any other authority granted by law.

(j) Contracts for the construction of facilities, other than contracts for facilities to be provided by the selected vendor, with an estimated cost greater than two hundred thousand dollars must be awarded after a competitive bid process consistent with chapter 39.04 RCW or awarded through an alternative public works contracting procedure consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW;

(4) To contract with the United States or any of its agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, other political subdivision or governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands, and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, designing, constructing, operating any public transportation facility, or performing any service related to transportation which the authority is authorized to operate or perform, on terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties;

(5) To acquire any existing public transportation facility by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any acquisition from a county, city, or other political subdivision of the state, the authority will receive credit from the county or city or other political subdivision for any federal assistance and state matching assistance used by the county or city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of the public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority must assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of the public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently operate the public transportation facility must be appointed to comparable positions to those which they held at the time of the transfer, and no employee or retired or pensioned employee of the public transportation facility will be placed in any worse position with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation, or other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the authority must engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed representatives of any employee labor organization having existing contracts with the acquired facility and may enter into labor contracts with the employee labor organization;

(6) To contract for, participate in, and support research, demonstration, testing, and development of public monorail transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives, and have all powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and regulations which may be adopted under state and federal law, and to take all actions necessary to meet the requirements of those laws. The authority has, in addition to these powers, the authority to prepare, adopt, and carry out a comprehensive public monorail plan and to make other plans and studies and to perform programs as the authority deems necessary to implement and comply with those laws;

(7) To establish local improvement districts within the authority area to finance public monorail transportation facilities, to levy special assessments on property specially benefited by those facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be repaid by the collection of local improvement assessments. The method of establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters relating to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection, and bonds are as provided in the statutes governing local improvement districts of cities and towns. The duties devolving upon the city treasurer in those statutes are imposed on the treasurer of the authority;

(8) To exercise all other powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its responsibilities, including without limitation the power to sue and be sued, to own, construct, purchase, lease, add to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to enter into contracts, and to employ the persons as the authority deems appropriate. An authority may also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority.

Sec. 17. RCW 36.57.040 and 1982 c 10 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Every county transportation authority created to perform the function of public transportation pursuant to RCW 36.57.020 shall have the following powers:

(1) To prepare, adopt, carry out, and amend a general comprehensive plan for public transportation service.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of any transportation facilities and properties, including terminal and parking facilities, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such systems and facilities.

(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to senior citizens, ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students.

(4) If a county transit authority extends its transportation function to any area in which service is already offered by any company holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040, to acquire by purchase or condemnation at the fair market value, from the person holding the existing certificate for providing the services, that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the services within the area of public operation, or to contract with such person or corporation to continue to operate such service or any part thereof for time and upon such terms and conditions as provided by contract.

(5)(a) To contract with the United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, special district, or governmental agency and any private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of transportation facilities and ambulance services: PROVIDED, That before the authority enters into any such contract for the provision of ambulance service, it shall submit to the voters a proposition authorizing such contracting authority, and a majority of those voting thereon shall have approved the proposition; and

(b) To contract with any governmental agency or with any private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands, and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any service related to transportation which the county is authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties: PROVIDED, That before any contract for the lease or operation of any transportation facilities shall be let to any private person, firm, or corporation, competitive bids shall first be called for and contracts awarded in accord with the procedures established in accord with RCW 36.32.240, 36.32.250, and 36.32.270.

(6) In addition to all other powers and duties, an authority shall have the power to own, construct, purchase, lease, add to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority. An authority may sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any authority real or personal property no longer necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority. An authority may enter into contracts to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 18. RCW 36.57A.090 and 1981 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A public transportation benefit area authority shall have the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare, adopt, and carry out a general comprehensive plan for public transportation service which will best serve the residents of the public transportation benefit area and to amend said plan from time to time to meet changed conditions and requirements.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of transportation facilities and properties within or without the public transportation benefit area or the state, including systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways, tramways, buses, or any other means of local transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and vehicular access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such systems and facilities. Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city may be acquired or used by the public transportation benefit area authority only with the consent of the city council of the city owning such facilities. Cities are hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to a public transportation benefit area authority or to contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the city council of such city and the public transportation benefit area authority, without submitting the matter to the voters of such city.

((The facilities and properties of a public transportation benefit area system whose vehicles will operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired, developed, and operated without the corridor and design hearings which are required by RCW 35.58.273, as now or hereafter amended, for mass transit facilities operating on a separate right-of-way.))

(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens, ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students.

In the event any person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040 has operated under such certificate for a continuous period of one year prior to the date of certification and is offering service within the public transportation benefit area on the date of the certification by the county canvassing board that a majority of votes cast authorize a tax to be levied and collected by the public transportation benefit area authority, such authority may by purchase or condemnation acquire at the fair market value, from the person holding the existing certificate for providing the services, that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the services within the area of public operation. The person holding such existing certificate may require the public transportation benefit area authority to initiate such purchase of those assets of such person, existing as of the date of the county canvassing board certification, within sixty days after the date of such certification.

Sec. 19. RCW 39.23.005 and 1975 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage municipalities to purchase products and/or services manufactured or provided by sheltered workshops and programs of the department of social and health services which operate facilities serving ((the handicapped))persons with disabilities and disadvantaged individuals.

Sec. 20. RCW 41.05.095 and 2015 c 116 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any plan offered to employees under this chapter must offer each employee the option of covering any dependent of the employee under the age of twenty-six.

(2) Coverage must terminate upon attainment of age twenty-six except in the case of a child who is and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of a developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (b) chiefly dependent upon the employee for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished by the employee within sixty days of the child's attainment of age twenty-six and subsequently as may be required by the authority, but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child's attainment of age twenty-six.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.20A.635 and 2009 c 549 s 5079 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of the secretary of social and health services and he or she shall have the power to establish and administer a program of services for children ((who are crippled))with disabilities or who are suffering from physical conditions which lead to ((crippling))disabilities, which shall provide for developing, extending, and improving services for locating such children, and for providing for medical, surgical, corrective, and other services and care, and facilities for diagnosis, hospitalization, and aftercare; to supervise the administration of those services, included in the program, which are not administered directly by it; to extend and improve any such services, including those in existence on April 1, 1941; to cooperate with medical, health, nursing, and welfare groups and organizations, and with any agency of the state charged with the administration of laws providing for vocational rehabilitation of ((physically handicapped)) children with physical disabilities; to cooperate with the federal government, through its appropriate agency or instrumentality in developing, extending, and improving such services; and to receive and expend all funds made available to the department by the federal government, the state or its political subdivisions or from other sources, for such purposes.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.24.090 and 2009 c 549 s 5109 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person taking any written examination prescribed or authorized by law, for a license or permit to practice any trade, occupation, or profession, who, because of any ((handicap))disability, is unable to write the examination himself or herself, may dictate it to and have it written or typed by another, to the same effect as though the examination were written out by himself or herself. Any expense connected therewith shall be borne by the person taking the examination.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.31.512 and 1989 c 430 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The child care facility fund committee shall award loan guarantees, loans or grants to those persons, businesses, or organizations meeting the minimum standards set forth in this chapter who will best serve the intent of the chapter to increase the availability of high quality, affordable child care in Washington state. The committee shall promulgate rules regarding the application for and disbursement of loan guarantees, loans, or grants from the fund, including loan terms and repayment procedures. At a minimum, such rules shall require an applicant to submit a plan which includes a detailed description of:

(1) The need for a new or improved child care facility in the area served by the applicant;

(2) The steps the applicant will take to serve a reasonable number of ((handicapped)) children ((as defined in chapter 72.40 RCW))with disabilities, sick children, infants, children requiring nighttime or weekend care, or children whose costs of care are subsidized by government;

(3) Why financial assistance from the state is needed to start or improve the child care facility;

(4) How the guaranteed loan, loan, or grant will be used, and how such uses will meet the described need;

(5) The child care services to be available at the facility and the capacity of the applicant to provide those services; and

(6) The financial status of the applicant, including other resources available to the applicant which will ensure the continued viability of the facility and the availability of its described services.

Recipients shall annually for two years following the receipt of the loan guarantee, loan, or grant, submit to the child care facility fund committee a report on the facility and how it is meeting the child care needs for which it was intended.

Sec. 24. RCW 43.63A.670 and 1993 c 478 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The trend toward smaller household sizes will continue into the foreseeable future;

(b) Many of these households are in housing units that contain more bedrooms than occupants;

(c) There are older homeowners on relatively low, fixed income who are experiencing difficulties maintaining their homes; and

(d) There are single parents, recently widowed persons, people in the midst of divorce or separation, and ((handicapped))persons with disabilities that are faced with displacement due to the high cost of housing.

(2) The legislature declares that the purpose of RCW 43.63A.680 is to develop a pilot program designed to:

(a) Provide home-matching services that can enable people to continue living in their homes while promoting continuity of home ownership and community stability; and

(b) Counter the problem of displacement among people on relatively low, fixed incomes by linking people offering living space with people seeking housing.

Sec. 25. RCW 43.180.070 and 1999 c 372 s 11 and 1999 c 131 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The commission shall adopt a general plan of housing finance objectives to be implemented by the commission during the period of the plan. The commission may exercise the powers authorized under this chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the plan, the commission shall consider and set objectives for:

(1) The use of funds for single-family and multifamily housing;

(2) The use of funds for new construction, rehabilitation, including refinancing of existing debt, and home purchases;

(3) The housing needs of low-income and moderate-income persons and families, and of elderly or ((mentally or physically handicapped)) persons with disabilities;

(4) The use of funds in coordination with federal, state, and local housing programs for low-income persons;

(5) The use of funds in urban, rural, suburban, and special areas of the state;

(6) The use of financing assistance to stabilize and upgrade declining urban neighborhoods;

(7) The use of financing assistance for economically depressed areas, areas of minority concentration, reservations, and in mortgage-deficient areas;

(8) The geographical distribution of bond proceeds so that the benefits of the housing programs provided under this chapter will be available to address demand on a fair basis throughout the state;

(9) The use of financing assistance for implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency measures in dwellings.

The plan shall include an estimate of the amount of bonds the commission will issue during the term of the plan and how bond proceeds will be expended.

The plan shall be adopted by resolution of the commission following at least one public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be made by mailing to the clerk of the governing body of each county and by publication in the Washington State Register no more than forty and no less than twenty days prior to the hearing. A draft of the plan shall be made available not less than thirty days prior to any such public hearing. At least every two years, the commission shall report to the legislature regarding implementation of the plan.

The commission may periodically update the plan.

The commission shall adopt rules designed to result in the use of bond proceeds in a manner consistent with the plan. The commission may periodically update its rules.

This section is designed to deal only with the use of bond proceeds and nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the commission's authority to issue bonds.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.216.720 and 1988 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that a severe shortage of child care exists to the detriment of all families and employers throughout the state. Many workers are unable to enter or remain in the workforce due to a shortage of child care resources. The high costs of starting a child care business create a barrier to the creation of new slots, especially for children with special needs.

(2) A child care expansion grant fund is created in the custody of the secretary of the department of social and health services. Grants shall be awarded on a one-time only basis to persons, organizations, or schools needing assistance to start a child care center or mini-center as defined by the department by rule, or to existing licensed child care providers, including family home providers, for the purpose of making capital improvements in order to accommodate ((handicapped)) children ((as defined under chapter 72.40 RCW))with disabilities, sick children, or infant care, or children needing nighttime care. No grant may exceed ten thousand dollars. Start-up costs shall not include operational costs after the first three months of business.

(3) Child care expansion grants shall be awarded on the basis of need for the proposed services in the community, within appropriated funds.

(4) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW setting forth criteria, application procedures, and methods to assure compliance with the purposes described in this section.

Sec. 27. RCW 43.220.070 and 2011 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, conservation corps members must be unemployed or underemployed residents of the state between eighteen and twenty-five years of age at the time of enrollment who are citizens or lawful permanent residents of the United States.

(b) The age requirements may be waived for corps leaders, veterans, specialists with special leadership or occupational skills, and participants with a ((sensory or mental handicap))disability.

(2) The recruitment of conservation corps members is the primary responsibility of the department. However, to the degree practicable, recruitment activities must be coordinated with the following entities:

(a) The department of natural resources;

(b) The department of fish and wildlife;

(c) The state parks and recreation commission;

(d) The Washington department of veterans affairs;

(e) The employment security department;

(f) Community and technical colleges; and

(g) Any other interested postsecondary educational institutions.

(3) Recruitment efforts must be targeted to, but not limited to, residents of the state who meet the participation eligibility requirements provided in this section and are either:

(a) A student enrolled at a community or technical college, private career college, or a four-year college or university;

(b) A minority or disadvantaged youth residing in an urban or rural area of the state; or

(c) Military veterans.

(4) Corps members shall not be considered state employees. Other provisions of law relating to civil service, hours of work, rate of compensation, sick leave, unemployment compensation, state retirement plans, and vacation leave do not apply to the Washington conservation corps except for the crew supervisors, who shall be project employees, and the administrative and supervisory personnel.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, participation as a corps member is for an initial period of three months. The enrollment period may be extended for additional three-month periods by mutual agreement of the department and the corps member, not to exceed two years.

(6)(a) Corps members are to be available at all times for emergency response services coordinated through the department or other public agency. Duties may include sandbagging and flood cleanup, oil spill response, wildfire suppression, search and rescue, and other functions in response to emergencies.

(b) Corps members may be assigned to longer-term specialized crews not subject to the temporal limitations of service otherwise imposed by this section when longer-term commitments satisfy the specialized needs of the department, an agency partner, or other service contractee.

Sec. 28. RCW 46.72.010 and 1996 c 87 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this chapter:

(1) The term "for hire vehicle" includes all vehicles used for the transportation of passengers for compensation, except auto stages, school buses operating exclusively under a contract to a school district, ride-sharing vehicles under chapter 46.74 RCW, limousine carriers licensed under chapter 46.72A RCW, vehicles used by nonprofit transportation providers for ((elderly or handicapped)) persons who are aging or persons with a disability and their attendants under chapter 81.66 RCW, vehicles used by auto transportation companies licensed under chapter 81.68 RCW, vehicles used to provide courtesy transportation at no charge to and from parking lots, hotels, and rental offices, and vehicles used by charter party carriers of passengers and excursion service carriers licensed under chapter 81.70 RCW;

(2) The term "for hire operator" means and includes any person, concern, or entity engaged in the transportation of passengers for compensation in for hire vehicles.

Sec. 29. RCW 47.04.170 and 1985 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of transportation is authorized to enter into and perform agreements with federal agencies as may be necessary to secure federal grants, loans, or other assistance on its own behalf or on behalf of other public or private recipients for:

(1) Public transportation purposes, including but not limited to, bus transportation, specialized transportation services for ((the elderly and handicapped))individuals who are aging or persons with a disability, and ride-sharing activities; and

(2) Rail transportation.

Sec. 30. RCW 48.20.420 and 1985 c 264 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Any disability insurance contract providing health care services, delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August 11, 1969, which provides that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the contract, shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the subscriber within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the insurer but not more frequently than annually after the two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 31. RCW 48.21.150 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract, providing health care services, delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August 11, 1969, which provides that coverage of a dependent child of an employee or other member of the covered group shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the contract shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (2) chiefly dependent upon the employee or member for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the employee or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the insurer, but not more frequently than annually after the two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 32. RCW 48.30.300 and 2006 c 4 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any provision contained in Title 48 RCW to the contrary:

A person or entity engaged in the business of insurance in this state may not refuse to issue any contract of insurance or cancel or decline to renew such contract because of the sex, marital status, or sexual orientation as defined in RCW 49.60.040, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability of the insured or prospective insured. The amount of benefits payable, or any term, rate, condition, or type of coverage may not be restricted, modified, excluded, increased, or reduced on the basis of the sex, marital status, or sexual orientation, or be restricted, modified, excluded, or reduced on the basis of the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability of the insured or prospective insured. This subsection does not prohibit fair discrimination on the basis of sex, or marital status, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability when bona fide statistical differences in risk or exposure have been substantiated.

Sec. 33. RCW 48.30.320 and 1979 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every authorized insurer, upon canceling, denying, or refusing to renew any individual life, individual disability, homeowner, dwelling fire, or private passenger automobile insurance policy, shall, upon written request, directly notify in writing the applicant or insured, as the case may be, of the reasons for the action by the insurer. Any benefits, terms, rates, or conditions of such an insurance contract which are restricted, excluded, modified, increased, or reduced because of the presence of a ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability shall, upon written request, be set forth in writing and supplied to the insured. The written communications required by this section shall be phrased in simple language which is readily understandable to a person of average intelligence, education, and reading ability.

Sec. 34. RCW 48.41.140 and 2011 c 314 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Coverage shall provide that health insurance benefits are applicable to children of the person in whose name the policy is issued including adopted and newly born natural children. Coverage shall also include necessary care and treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities. If payment of a specific premium is required to provide coverage for the child, the policy may require that notification of the birth or adoption of a child and payment of the required premium must be furnished to the pool within thirty-one days after the date of birth or adoption in order to have the coverage continued beyond the thirty-one day period. For purposes of this subsection, a child is deemed to be adopted, and benefits are payable, when the child is physically placed for purposes of adoption under the laws of this state with the person in whose name the policy is issued; and, when the person in whose name the policy is issued assumes financial responsibility for the medical expenses of the child. For purposes of this subsection, "newly born" means, and benefits are payable, from the moment of birth.

(2) A pool policy shall provide that coverage of a dependent((,)) person shall terminate when the person becomes twenty-six years of age: PROVIDED, That coverage of such person shall not terminate at age twenty-six while he or she is and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (b) chiefly dependent upon the person in whose name the policy is issued for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the pool by the policyholder within thirty-one days of the dependent's attainment of age twenty-six and subsequently as may be required by the pool but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the dependent's attainment of age twenty-six.

Sec. 35. RCW 48.44.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

An individual health care service plan contract, delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August 11, 1969, which provides that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the contract shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the health care service plan corporation by the subscriber within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the corporation but not more frequently than annually after the two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 36. RCW 48.44.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

A group health care service plan contract, delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August 11, 1969, which provides that coverage of a dependent child of an employee or other member of the covered group shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the contract shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)) and (2) chiefly dependent upon the employee or member for support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the health care service plan corporation by the employee or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the corporation, but not more frequently than annually after the two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 37. RCW 48.44.220 and 1983 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

No health care service contractor shall deny coverage to any person solely on account of race, religion, national origin, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting a health care service contractor's authority to deny or otherwise limit coverage to a person when the person because of a medical condition does not meet the essential eligibility requirements established by the health care service contractor for purposes of determining coverage for any person.

No health care service contractor shall refuse to provide reimbursement or indemnity to any person for covered health care services for reasons that the health care services were provided by a holder of a license under chapter 18.22 RCW.

Sec. 38. RCW 48.46.320 and 1985 c 320 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any health maintenance agreement which provides that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children specified in the agreement shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both: (1) Incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental or physical disability ((or physical handicap)); and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and maintenance, if proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the health maintenance organization by the enrolled participant within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as required by the health maintenance organization but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 39. RCW 48.46.370 and 1983 c 106 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

No health maintenance organization may deny coverage to a person solely on account of the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability. Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting a health maintenance organization's authority to deny or otherwise limit coverage to a person when the person because of a medical condition does not meet the essential eligibility requirements established by the health maintenance organization for purposes of determining coverage for any person.

Sec. 40. RCW 49.12.110 and 1994 c 164 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

For any occupation in which a minimum wage has been established, the director may issue to an employer, a special certificate or permit for an employee ((who is physically or mentally handicapped))with a disability to such a degree that he or she is unable to obtain employment in the competitive labor market, or to a trainee or learner not otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the apprenticeship council, a special certificate or permit authorizing the employment of such employee for a wage less than the legal minimum wage; and the director shall fix the minimum wage for said person, such special certificate or permit to be issued only in such cases as the director may decide the same is applied for in good faith and that such certificate or permit shall be in force for such length of time as the director shall decide and determine is proper.

Sec. 41. RCW 49.74.005 and 1985 c 365 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, age, sex, marital status, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability is contrary to the findings of the legislature and public policy. The legislature finds and declares that racial minorities, women, persons in protected age groups, persons with disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and ((disabled)) veterans with disabilities are underrepresented in Washington state government employment.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for enforcement measures for affirmative action within Washington state government employment and institutions of higher education in order to eliminate such underrepresentation.

Sec. 42. RCW 50.12.210 and 1987 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the state of Washington that persons with ((physical, mental, or sensory handicaps))disabilities shall be given equal opportunities in employment. The legislature recognizes that ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities have faced unfair discrimination in employment.

For these reasons, the state employment service division of the employment security department shall give particular and special attention service to those persons with ((physical, mental, or sensory handicaps))disabilities which substantially limit one or more of their major life functions as defined under P.L. 93-112 and rules promulgated thereunder. Particular and special attention service shall include but not be limited to particular and special attention in counseling, referral, notification of job listings in advance of other persons, and other services of the employment service division.

Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to affect the veteran's preference or any other requirement of the United States department of labor.

The employment security department shall report to the house and senate commerce and labor committees by December 1, 1987, on its accomplishments under this section and on its future plans for implementation of this section. The department shall report to the above mentioned committees every odd-numbered year thereafter on its actions under this section.

The employment security department shall establish rules to implement this section.

Sec. 43. RCW 51.08.030 and 1986 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Child" means every natural born child, posthumous child, stepchild, child legally adopted prior to the injury, child born after the injury where conception occurred prior to the injury, and dependent child in the legal custody and control of the worker, all while under the age of eighteen years, or under the age of twenty-three years while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited school, and over the age of eighteen years if the child is a dependent as a result of a ((physical, mental, or sensory handicap))disability.

Sec. 44. RCW 57.08.014 and 1999 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the authority of a district to establish classifications for rates and charges and impose such rates and charges, a district may adjust or delay those rates and charges for low-income persons or classes of low-income persons, including but not limited to, low-income ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities and low-income senior citizens. Other financial assistance available to low-income persons shall be considered in determining charges and rates under this section. Notification of special rates or charges established under this section shall be provided to all persons served by the district annually and upon initiating service. Information on cost shifts caused by establishment of the special rates or charges shall be included in the notification. Any reduction in charges and rates granted to low-income persons in one part of a service area shall be uniformly extended to low-income persons in all other parts of the service area.

Sec. 45. RCW 66.24.425 and 2001 c 199 s 3 and 2001 c 198 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may, in its discretion, issue a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to a business which qualifies as a "restaurant" as that term is defined in RCW 66.24.410 in all respects except that the business does not serve the general public but, through membership qualification, selectively restricts admission to the business. For purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all licenses issued under this section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and qualifications in this title, or in rules adopted by the board, as are applicable to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses generally except that no service to the general public may be required.

(2) No license shall be issued under this section to a business:

(a) Which shall not have been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application; or

(b) Which denies membership or admission to any person because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any ((sensory, mental, or physical handicap))disability.

(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license issued under this section that allows up to forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members. These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the endorsement is an annual fee of nine hundred dollars. Upon the board's request, the holder of the endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the following information at least seventy-two hours before the event: The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.

(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this ((chapter [section]))section is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 46. RCW 70.82.010 and 1974 ex.s. c 91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is hereby declared to be of vital concern to the state of Washington that all persons who are bona fide residents of the state of Washington and who are afflicted with cerebral palsy in any degree be provided with facilities and a program of service for medical care, education, treatment and training to enable them to become normal individuals. In order to effectively accomplish such purpose the department of social and health services, hereinafter called the department, is authorized and instructed and it shall be its duty to establish and administer facilities and a program of service for the discovery, care, education, hospitalization, treatment and training of educable persons afflicted with cerebral palsy, and to provide in connection therewith nursing, medical, surgical and corrective care, together with academic, occupational and related training. Such program shall extend to developing, extending and improving service for the discovery of such persons and for diagnostication and hospitalization and shall include cooperation with other agencies of the state charged with the administration of laws providing for any type of service or aid to ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and with the United States government through any appropriate agency or instrumentality in developing, extending and improving such service, program and facilities. Such facilities shall include field clinics, diagnosis and observation centers, boarding schools, special classes in day schools, research facilities and such other facilities as shall be required to render appropriate aid to such persons. Existing facilities, buildings, hospitals and equipment belonging to or operated by the state of Washington shall be made available for these purposes when use therefor does not conflict with the primary use of such existing facilities. Existing buildings, facilities and equipment belonging to private persons, firms or corporations or to the United States government may be acquired or leased.

Sec. 47. RCW 70.82.030 and 2012 c 117 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

Any resident of this state who is educable but ((so severely handicapped)), as the result of cerebral palsy,((that he or she)) is unable to take advantage of the regular system of free education of this state may be admitted to or be eligible for any service and facilities provided hereunder, provided such resident has lived in this state continuously for more than one year before his or her application for such admission or eligibility.

Sec. 48. RCW 70.84.010 and 1980 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature declares:

(1) It is the policy of this state to encourage and enable the blind, ((the visually handicapped))persons with disabilities, the hearing impaired, and ((the otherwise physically disabled))other persons with disabilities to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state, and to engage in remunerative employment.

(2) As citizens, the blind, ((the visually handicapped))persons with visual disabilities, the hearing impaired, and ((the otherwise physically disabled))other persons with disabilities have the same rights as the able-bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places.

(3) The blind, ((the visually handicapped))persons with visual disabilities, the hearing impaired, and ((the otherwise physically disabled))other persons with disabilities are entitled to full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges on common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motor buses, streetcars, boats, and all other public conveyances, as well as in hotels, lodging places, places of public resort, accommodation, assemblage or amusement, and all other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

Sec. 49. RCW 70.84.080 and 1980 c 109 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In accordance with the policy set forth in RCW 70.84.010, the blind, ((the visually handicapped))persons with visual disabilities, the hearing impaired, and ((the otherwise physically disabled))other persons with disabilities shall be employed in the state service, in the service of the political subdivisions of the state, in the public schools, and in all other employment supported in whole or in part by public funds on the same terms and conditions as the able-bodied, unless it is shown that the particular disability prevents the performance of the work involved.

Sec. 50. RCW 71.34.020 and 2019 c 446 s 24, 2019 c 444 s 17, 2019 c 381 s 2, and 2019 c 325 s 2001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(9) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(11) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(12) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(18) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(19)(a).

(19) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(20) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(21) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(22) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a ((handicap))disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(23) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(24) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(25) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(26) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(27)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to ((RCW 9A.72.085))chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(28) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(29) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(30) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(31) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(32) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(33) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(34) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(35) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(36) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(37) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(38) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(39) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(40) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(41) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW, or a person certified as a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional trainee under RCW 18.205.095 working under the direct supervision of a certified ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional.

Sec. 51. RCW 71A.10.040 and 1988 c 176 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons are protected from discrimination because of a developmental disability as well as other mental or physical ((handicaps))disabilities by the law against discrimination, chapter 49.60 RCW, by other state and federal statutes, rules, and regulations, and by local ordinances, when the persons ((qualify as handicapped))have a qualifying disability under those statutes, rules, regulations, and ordinances.

Sec. 52. RCW 71A.12.010 and 1988 c 176 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be the policy of the state to authorize the secretary to develop and coordinate state services for persons with developmental disabilities; to encourage research and staff training for state and local personnel working with persons with developmental disabilities; and to cooperate with communities to encourage the establishment and development of services to persons with developmental disabilities through locally administered and locally controlled programs.

The complexities of developmental disabilities require the services of many state departments as well as those of the community. Services should be planned and provided as a part of a continuum. A pattern of facilities and services should be established, within appropriations designated for this purpose, which is sufficiently complete to meet the needs of each person with a developmental disability regardless of age or degree of ((handicap))disability, and at each stage of the person's development.

Sec. 53. RCW 71A.12.020 and 1988 c 176 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent that state, federal, or other funds designated for services to persons with developmental disabilities are available, the secretary shall provide every eligible person with habilitative services suited to the person's needs, regardless of age or degree of developmental disability.

(2) The secretary shall provide persons who receive services with the opportunity for integration with ((nonhandicapped))persons without disabilities and ((less handicapped)) persons with less acute disabilities to the greatest extent possible.

(3) The secretary shall establish minimum standards for habilitative services. Consumers, advocates, service providers, appropriate professionals, and local government agencies shall be involved in the development of the standards.

Sec. 54. RCW 72.05.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purposes of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210 are: To provide for every child with behavior problems, ((mentally and physically handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and hearing and visually impaired children, within the purview of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210, as now or hereafter amended, such care, guidance and instruction, control and treatment as will best serve the welfare of the child or person and society; to insure nonpolitical and qualified operation, supervision, management, and control of the Green Hill school, the Naselle Youth Camp, Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, Fircrest school, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers hereafter established; and to provide for the persons committed or admitted to those schools that type of care, instruction, and treatment most likely to accomplish their rehabilitation and restoration to normal citizenship.

(2) To further such purposes, Green Hill School, Echo Glen, Naselle Youth Camp, and such other juvenile rehabilitation facilities, as may hereafter be established, are placed under the department of children, youth, and families; Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, Fircrest school, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers, hereafter established, are placed under the department of social and health services.

Sec. 55. RCW 72.05.130 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall establish, maintain, operate and administer a comprehensive program for the custody, care, education, treatment, instruction, guidance, control, and rehabilitation of all persons who may be committed or admitted to institutions, schools, or other facilities, placed under the control of each, except for the programs of education provided pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.050 which shall be established, operated, and administered by the school district conducting the program, and in order to accomplish these purposes, the powers and duties of the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families for the institutions placed under the respective department shall include the following:

(1) The assembling, analyzing, tabulating, and reproduction in report form, of statistics and other data with respect to children with behavior problems in the state of Washington, including, but not limited to, the extent, kind, and causes of such behavior problems in the different areas and population centers of the state. Such reports shall not be open to public inspection, but shall be open to the inspection of the governor and to the superior court judges of the state of Washington.

(2) The establishment and supervision of diagnostic facilities and services in connection with the custody, care, and treatment of ((mentally and physically handicapped))persons with disabilities, and behavior problem children who may be committed or admitted to any of the institutions, schools, or facilities controlled and operated by the department, or who may be referred for such diagnosis and treatment by any superior court of this state. Such diagnostic services may be established in connection with, or apart from, any other state institution under the supervision and direction of the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families. Such diagnostic services shall be available to the superior courts of the state for persons referred for such services by them prior to commitment, or admission to, any school, institution, or other facility. Such diagnostic services shall also be available to other departments of the state. When the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families determines it necessary, the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may create waiting lists and set priorities for use of diagnostic services for juvenile offenders on the basis of those most severely in need.

(3) The supervision of all persons committed or admitted to any institution, school, or other facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, and the transfer of such persons from any such institution, school, or facility to any other such school, institution, or facility: PROVIDED, That where a person has been committed to a minimum security institution, school, or facility by any of the superior courts of this state, a transfer to a close security institution shall be made only with the consent and approval of such court.

(4) The supervision of parole, discharge, or other release, and the post-institutional placement of all persons committed to Green Hill school, or such as may be assigned, paroled, or transferred therefrom to other facilities operated by the department. Green Hill school is hereby designated as a "close security" institution to which shall be given the custody of children with the most serious behavior problems.

Sec. 56. RCW 72.60.235 and 1991 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of corrections shall develop, in accordance with RCW 72.09.010, a site-specific implementation plan for prison industries space at Clallam Bay corrections center, McNeil Island corrections center, and the one thousand twenty-four bed medium security prison as appropriated for and authorized by the legislature.

(2) Each implementation plan shall include, but not be limited to, sufficient space and design elements that try to achieve a target of twenty-five percent of the total inmates in class I employment programs and twenty-five percent of the total inmates in class II employment programs or as much of the target as possible without jeopardizing the efficient and necessary day-to-day operation of the prison. The implementation plan shall also include educational opportunities and employment, wage, and other incentives. The department shall include in the implementation plans an incentive program based on wages, and the opportunity to contribute all or a portion of their wages towards an array of incentives. The funds recovered from the sale, lease, or rental of incentives should be considered as a possible source of revenue to cover the capitalized cost of the additional space necessary to accommodate the increased class I and class II industries programs.

(3) The incentive program shall be developed so that inmates can earn higher wages based on performance and production. Only those inmates employed in class I and class II jobs may participate in the incentive program. The department shall develop special program criteria for inmates with physical or mental ((handicaps))disabilities so that they can participate in the incentive program.

(4) The department shall propose rules specifying that inmate wages, other than the amount an inmate owes for taxes, legal financial obligations, and to the victim restitution fund, shall be returned to the department to pay for the cost of prison operations, including room and board.

(5) The plan shall identify actual or potential legal or operational obstacles, or both, in implementing the components of the plan as specified in this section, and recommend strategies to remove the obstacles.

(6) The department shall submit the plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the governor by October 1, 1991.

Sec. 57. RCW 72.64.150 and 1991 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Interstate Forest Fire Suppression Compact as set forth in this section is hereby enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this state with any and all other states legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows:

INTERSTATE FOREST FIRE SUPPRESSION

COMPACT

ARTICLE I—Purpose

The purpose of this compact is to provide for the development and execution of programs to facilitate the use of offenders in the forest fire suppression efforts of the party states for the ultimate protection of life, property, and natural resources in the party states. The purpose of this compact is also to, in emergent situations, allow a sending state to cross state lines with an inmate when, due to weather or road conditions, it is necessary to cross state lines to facilitate the transport of an inmate.

ARTICLE II—Definitions

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Sending state" means a state party to this compact from which a fire suppression unit is traveling.

(b) "Receiving state" means a state party to this compact to which a fire suppression unit is traveling.

(c) "Inmate" means a male or female offender who is under sentence to or confined in a prison or other correctional institution.

(d) "Institution" means any prison, reformatory, honor camp, or other correctional facility, except facilities for ((the mentally ill or mentally handicapped))persons suffering from mental illness or persons with disabilities, in which inmates may lawfully be confined.

(e) "Fire suppression unit" means a group of inmates selected by the sending states, corrections personnel, and any other persons deemed necessary for the transportation, supervision, care, security, and discipline of inmates to be used in forest fire suppression efforts in the receiving state.

(f) "Forest fire" means any fire burning in any land designated by a party state or federal land management agencies as forestland.

ARTICLE III—Contracts

Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the assistance of one or more fire suppression units in forest fire suppression efforts. Any such contract shall provide for matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities, and rights of the sending and receiving state.

The terms and provisions of this compact shall be part of any contract entered into by the authority of, or pursuant to, this compact. Nothing in any such contract may be inconsistent with this compact.

ARTICLE IV—Procedures and Rights

(a) Each party state shall appoint a liaison for the coordination and deployment of the fire suppression units of each party state.

(b) Whenever the duly constituted judicial or administrative authorities in a state party to this compact that has entered into a contract pursuant to this compact decides that the assistance of a fire suppression unit of a party state is required for forest fire suppression efforts, such authorities may request the assistance of one or more fire suppression units of any state party to this compact through an appointed liaison.

(c) Inmates who are members of a fire suppression unit shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state, and at all times shall be under the ultimate custody of corrections officers duly accredited by the sending state.

(d) The receiving state shall make adequate arrangements for the confinement of inmates who are members of a fire suppression unit of a sending state in the event corrections officers duly accredited by the sending state make a discretionary determination that an inmate requires institutional confinement.

(e) Cooperative efforts shall be made by corrections officers and personnel of the receiving state located at a fire camp with the corrections officers and other personnel of the sending state in the establishment and maintenance of fire suppression unit base camps.

(f) All inmates who are members of a fire suppression unit of a sending state shall be cared for and treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state.

(g) Further, in emergent situations a sending state shall be granted authority and all the protections of this compact to cross state lines with an inmate when, due to weather or road conditions, it is necessary to facilitate the transport of an inmate.

ARTICLE V—Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving

State; Extradition

(a) If while located within the territory of a receiving state there occurs against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is suspected of committing within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment, or detention for such offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference.

(b) An inmate member of a fire suppression unit of the sending state who is deemed to have escaped by a duly accredited corrections officer of a sending state shall be under the jurisdiction of both the sending state and the receiving state. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and guards of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee.

ARTICLE VI—Entry into Force

This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two states from among the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington.

ARTICLE VII—Withdrawal and Termination

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it has enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states.

ARTICLE VIII—Other Arrangements Unaffected

Nothing contained in this compact may be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement that a party state may have with a nonparty state for the confinement, rehabilitation, or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements.

ARTICLE IX—Construction and Severability

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Sec. 58. RCW 72.70.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

The Western Interstate Corrections Compact as contained herein is hereby enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this state with any and all other states legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows:

WESTERN INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS

COMPACT

ARTICLE I—Purpose and Policy

The party states, desiring by common action to improve their institutional facilities and provide programs of sufficiently high quality for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such facilities and programs on a basis of cooperation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of such offenders and of society. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the development and execution of such programs of cooperation for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of offenders.

ARTICLE II—Definitions

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "State" means a state of the United States, or, subject to the limitation contained in Article VII, Guam.

(b) "Sending state" means a state party to this compact in which conviction was had.

(c) "Receiving state" means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction was had.

(d) "Inmate" means a male or female offender who is under sentence to or confined in a prison or other correctional institution.

(e) "Institution" means any prison, reformatory or other correctional facility except facilities for ((the mentally ill or mentally handicapped))persons suffering from mental illness or persons with disabilities in which inmates may lawfully be confined.

ARTICLE III—Contracts

(a) Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states. Any such contract shall provide for:

1. Its duration.

2. Payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and any participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance.

3. Participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on account thereof; and the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting therefrom.

4. Delivery and retaking of inmates.

5. Such other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities and rights of the sending and receiving states.

(b) Prior to the construction or completion of construction of any institution or addition thereto by a party state, any other party state or states may contract therewith for the enlargement of the planned capacity of the institution or addition thereto, or for the inclusion therein of particular equipment or structures, and for the reservation of a specific percentum of the capacity of the institution to be kept available for use by inmates of the sending state or states so contracting. Any sending state so contracting may, to the extent that ((monies [moneys]))moneys are legally available therefor, pay to the receiving state, a reasonable sum as consideration for such enlargement of capacity, or provision of equipment or structures, and reservation of capacity. Such payment may be in a lump sum or in installments as provided in the contract.

(c) The terms and provisions of this compact shall be a part of any contract entered into by the authority of or pursuant thereto, and nothing in any such contract shall be inconsistent therewith.

ARTICLE IV—Procedures and Rights

(a) Whenever the duly constituted judicial or administrative authorities in a state party to this compact, and which has entered into a contract pursuant to Article III, shall decide that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary in order to provide adequate quarters and care or desirable in order to provide an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, said officials may direct that the confinement be within an institution within the territory of said other party state, the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

(b) The appropriate officials of any state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to any institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its inmates as may be confined in the institution.

(c) Inmates confined in an institution pursuant to the terms of this compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed therefrom for transfer to a prison or other institution within the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state; provided that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be required pursuant to the terms of any contract entered into under the terms of Article III.

(d) Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions pursuant to this compact including a conduct record of each inmate and certify said record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have the benefit of his or her record in determining and altering the disposition of said inmate in accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state.

(e) All inmates who may be confined in an institution pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be cared for and treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution. The fact of confinement in a receiving state shall not deprive any inmate so confined of any legal rights which said inmate would have had if confined in an appropriate institution of the sending state.

(f) Any hearing or hearings to which an inmate confined pursuant to this compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state, or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. In the event such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. Said record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state. Costs of records made pursuant to this subdivision shall be borne by the sending state.

(g) Any inmate confined pursuant to this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, shall agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory.

(h) Any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact shall have any and all rights to participate in and derive any benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations or have such obligations modified or his status changed on account of any action or proceeding in which he could have participated if confined in any appropriate institution of the sending state located within such state.

(i) The parent, guardian, trustee, or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for, advise, or otherwise function with respect to any inmate shall not be deprived of or restricted in his exercise of any power in respect of any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact.

ARTICLE V—Acts Not Reviewable In Receiving

State; Extradition

(a) Any decision of the sending state in respect of any matter over which it retains jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is suspected of having committed within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment or detention for such offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference.

(b) An inmate who escapes from an institution in which he is confined pursuant to this compact shall be deemed a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated. In the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition proceedings shall be that of the sending state, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee.

ARTICLE VI—Federal Aid

Any state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with an institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or any contract pursuant thereto and any inmate in a receiving state pursuant to this compact may participate in any such federally aided program or activity for which the sending and receiving states have made contractual provision; provided that if such program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required therefor.

ARTICLE VII—Entry Into Force

This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two contiguous states from among the states of Alaska, Arizona, California, Colorado, Hawaii, Idaho, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington and Wyoming. For the purposes of this article, Alaska and Hawaii shall be deemed contiguous to each other; to any and all of the states of California, Oregon and Washington; and to Guam. Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states, or any other state contiguous to at least one party state upon similar action by such state. Guam may become party to this compact by taking action similar to that provided for joinder by any other eligible party state and upon the consent of Congress to such joinder. For the purposes of this article, Guam shall be deemed contiguous to Alaska, Hawaii, California, Oregon and Washington.

ARTICLE VIII—Withdrawal and Termination

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it shall have enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states. An actual withdrawal shall not take effect until two years after the notices provided in said statute have been sent. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact.

ARTICLE IX—Other Arrangements Unaffected

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a non-party state for the confinement, rehabilitation or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements.

ARTICLE X—Construction and Severability

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Sec. 59. RCW 74.04.515 and 1998 c 79 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

In administering the food stamp or benefits program, there shall be no discrimination against any applicant or recipient by reason of age, sex, ((handicap))disability, religious creed, political beliefs, race, color, or national origin.

Sec. 60. RCW 74.12.290 and 1979 c 141 s 352 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of social and health services shall, during the initial and any subsequent determination of eligibility, evaluate the suitability of the home in which the dependent child lives, consideration to be given to physical care and supervision provided in the home; social, educational, and the moral atmosphere of the home as compared with the standards of the community; the child's physical and mental health and emotional security, special needs occasioned by the child's physical ((handicaps))disabilities or illnesses, if any; the extent to which desirable factors outweigh the undesirable in the home; and the apparent possibility for improving undesirable conditions in the home.

Sec. 61. RCW 74.13.031 and 2019 c 172 s 8 and 2019 c 46 s 5045 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.

(2) Within available resources, the department shall recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling groups, ((handicapped and emotionally disturbed))children with disabilities or behavioral health conditions, teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and the department shall annually report to the governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in: (a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b) reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."

(3) The department shall investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(4) As provided in RCW 26.44.030(((11))), the department may respond to a report of child abuse or neglect by using the family assessment response.

(5) The department shall offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are in conflict.

(6) The department shall monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. Under this section children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers shall receive a private and individual face-to-face visit each month. The department shall randomly select no less than ten percent of the caregivers currently providing care to receive one unannounced face-to-face visit in the caregiver's home per year. No caregiver will receive an unannounced visit through the random selection process for two consecutive years. If the caseworker makes a good faith effort to conduct the unannounced visit to a caregiver and is unable to do so, that month's visit to that caregiver need not be unannounced. The department is encouraged to group monthly visits to caregivers by geographic area so that in the event an unannounced visit cannot be completed, the caseworker may complete other required monthly visits. The department shall use a method of random selection that does not cause a fiscal impact to the department.

The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children and caregivers to whom it is providing child welfare services.

(7) The department shall have authority to accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental, and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children, and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their placement for adoption.

(8) The department shall have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential centers.

(9) The department shall have authority to purchase care for children.

(10) The department shall establish a children's services advisory committee which shall assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member shall represent the adoption community.

(11)(a) The department shall provide continued extended foster care services to nonminor dependents who are:

(i) Enrolled in a secondary education program or a secondary education equivalency program;

(ii) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary academic or postsecondary vocational education program;

(iii) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote employment or remove barriers to employment;

(iv) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or

(v) Not able to engage in any of the activities described in (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection due to a documented medical condition.

(b) To be eligible for extended foster care services, the nonminor dependent must have been dependent at the time that he or she reached age eighteen years. If the dependency case of the nonminor dependent was dismissed pursuant to RCW 13.34.267, he or she may receive extended foster care services pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement under RCW 74.13.336 or pursuant to an order of dependency issued by the court under RCW 13.34.268. A nonminor dependent whose dependency case was dismissed by the court may request extended foster care services before reaching age twenty-one years. Eligible nonminor dependents may unenroll and reenroll in extended foster care through a voluntary placement agreement an unlimited number of times between ages eighteen and twenty-one.

(c) The department shall develop and implement rules regarding youth eligibility requirements.

(d) The department shall make efforts to ensure that extended foster care services maximize medicaid reimbursements. This must include the department ensuring that health and mental health extended foster care providers participate in medicaid, unless the condition of the extended foster care youth requires specialty care that is not available among participating medicaid providers or there are no participating medicaid providers in the area. The department shall coordinate other services to maximize federal resources and the most cost-efficient delivery of services to extended foster care youth.

(e) The department shall allow a youth who has received extended foster care services, but lost his or her eligibility, to reenter the extended foster care program an unlimited number of times through a voluntary placement agreement when he or she meets the eligibility criteria again.

(12) The department shall have authority to provide adoption support benefits, or relative guardianship subsidies on behalf of youth ages eighteen to twenty-one years who achieved permanency through adoption or a relative guardianship at age sixteen or older and who meet the criteria described in subsection (11) of this section.

(13) The department shall refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child, including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the division of child support unless required by federal law.

(14) The department shall have authority within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state juvenile court order. The purchase of such care is exempt from the requirements of chapter 74.13B RCW and may be purchased from the federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency, and shall be subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.

Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through 13.32A.200, 43.185C.295, 74.13.035, and 74.13.036, or of this section all services to be provided by the department under subsections (4), (7), and (8) of this section, subject to the limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.

(15) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall provide preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.

(16) The department shall have authority to provide independent living services to youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age, and have not attained twenty-three years of age, who are or have been in the department's care and custody, or who are or were nonminor dependents.

(17) The department shall consult at least quarterly with foster parents, including members of the foster parent association of Washington state, for the purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 regarding the recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates, providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and statewide levels.

(18)(a) The department shall, within current funding levels, place on its public web site a document listing the duties and responsibilities the department has to a child subject to a dependency petition including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Reasonable efforts, including the provision of services, toward reunification of the child with his or her family;

(ii) Sibling visits subject to the restrictions in RCW 13.34.136(2)(b)(ii);

(iii) Parent-child visits;

(iv) Statutory preference for placement with a relative or other suitable person, if appropriate; and

(v) Statutory preference for an out-of-home placement that allows the child to remain in the same school or school district, if practical and in the child's best interests.

(b) The document must be prepared in conjunction with a community-based organization and must be updated as needed.

(19)(a) The department shall have the authority to purchase legal representation for parents or kinship caregivers, or both, of children who are at risk of being dependent, or who are dependent, to establish or modify a parenting plan under RCW 13.34.155 or chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or secure orders establishing other relevant civil legal relationships authorized by law, when it is necessary for the child's safety, permanence, or well-being. The department's purchase of legal representation for kinship caregivers must be within the department's appropriations. This subsection does not create an entitlement to legal representation purchased by the department and does not create judicial authority to order the department to purchase legal representation for a parent or kinship caregiver. Such determinations are solely within the department's discretion. The term "kinship caregiver" as used in this section means a caregiver who meets the definition of "kin" in RCW 74.13.600(1), unless the child is an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040 and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903. For an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040 and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903, the term "kinship caregiver" as used in this section means a caregiver who is an "extended family member" as defined in RCW 13.38.040(8).

(b) The department is encouraged to work with the office of public defense parent representation program and the office of civil legal aid to develop a cost-effective system for providing effective civil legal representation for parents and kinship caregivers if it exercises its authority under this subsection.

Sec. 62. RCW 74.13.310 and 2018 c 284 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

Adequate foster parent training has been identified as directly associated with increasing the length of time foster parents are willing to provide foster care and reducing the number of placement disruptions for children. Placement disruptions can be harmful to children by denying them consistent and nurturing support. Foster parents have expressed the desire to receive training in addition to the foster parent training currently offered. Foster parents who care for more demanding children, such as children with severe ((emotional, mental, or physical handicaps))disabilities, would especially benefit from additional training. The department shall develop additional training for foster parents that focuses on skills to assist foster parents in caring for ((emotionally, mentally, or physically handicapped)) children with disabilities.

Sec. 63. RCW 74.13A.020 and 2009 c 520 s 66 and 2009 c 491 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue rules and regulations to assist in the administration of the program of adoption support authorized by RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080.

(2) Disbursements from the appropriations available from the general fund shall be made pursuant to such rules and regulations and pursuant to agreements conforming thereto to be made by the secretary with parents for the purpose of supporting the adoption of children in, or likely to be placed in, foster homes or child caring institutions who are found by the secretary to be difficult to place in adoption because of physical or other reasons; including, but not limited to, ((physical or mental handicap))disabilities, emotional disturbance, ethnic background, language, race, color, age, or sibling grouping.

(3) Such agreements shall meet the following criteria:

(a) The child whose adoption is to be supported pursuant to such agreement shall be or have been a child hard to place in adoption.

(b) Such agreement must relate to a child who was or is residing in a foster home or child-caring institution or a child who, in the judgment of the secretary, is both eligible for, and likely to be placed in, either a foster home or a child-caring institution.

(c) Such agreement shall provide that adoption support shall not continue beyond the time that the adopted child reaches eighteen years of age, becomes emancipated, dies, or otherwise ceases to need support. If the secretary finds that continuing dependency of such child after such child reaches eighteen years of age warrants the continuation of support pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080 the secretary may do so, subject to all the provisions of RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, including annual review of the amount of such support.

(d) Any prospective parent who is to be a party to such agreement shall be a person who has the character, judgment, sense of responsibility, and disposition which make him or her suitable as an adoptive parent of such child.

(4) At least six months before an adoption is finalized under chapter 26.33 RCW and RCW ((74.13.100 through 74.13.145))74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, the department must provide to the prospective adoptive parent, in writing, information describing the limits of the adoption support program including the following information:

(a) The limits on monthly cash payments to adoptive families;

(b) The limits on the availability of children's mental health services and the funds with which to pay for these services;

(c) The process for accessing mental health services for children receiving adoption support services;

(d) The limits on the one-time cash payments to adoptive families for expenses related to their adopted children; and

(e) That payment for residential or group care is not available for adopted children under the adoption support program.

Sec. 64. RCW 74.13A.085 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish, within funds appropriated for the purpose, a reconsideration program to provide medical and counseling services through the adoption support program for children of families who apply for services after the adoption is final. Families requesting services through the program shall provide any information requested by the department for the purpose of processing the family's application for services.

(2) A child meeting the eligibility criteria for registration with the program is one who:

(a) Was residing in a preadoptive placement funded by the department or in foster care funded by the department immediately prior to the adoptive placement;

(b) Had a ((physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance))disability or behavioral health condition that existed and was documented prior to the adoption or was at high risk of future ((physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance))disability or behavioral health condition as a result of conditions exposed to prior to the adoption; and

(c) Resides in the state of Washington with an adoptive parent who lacks the necessary financial means to care for the child's special need.

(3) If a family is accepted for registration and meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section, the department may enter into an agreement for services. Prior to entering into an agreement for services through the program, the medical needs of the child must be reviewed and approved by the department.

(4) Any services provided pursuant to an agreement between a family and the department shall be met from the department's medical program. Such services shall be limited to:

(a) Services provided after finalization of an agreement between a family and the department pursuant to this section;

(b) Services not covered by the family's insurance or other available assistance; and

(c) Services related to the eligible child's identified ((physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance))disability or behavioral health condition that existed prior to the adoption.

(5) Any payment by the department for services provided pursuant to an agreement shall be made directly to the physician or provider of services according to the department's established procedures.

(6) The total costs payable by the department for services provided pursuant to an agreement shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars per child.

Sec. 65. RCW 74.18.045 and 2003 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The director shall provide access to a telephonic reading service for blind persons and ((disabled)) persons with disabilities.

(b) The director shall establish criteria for eligibility for blind persons and ((disabled)) persons with disabilities who may receive the telephonic reading services. The criteria may be based upon the eligibility criteria for persons who receive services established by the national library service for the blind and ((physically handicapped))print disabled of the library of congress.

(2) The director may enter into contracts or other agreements that he or she determines to be appropriate to provide telephonic reading services pursuant to this section.

(3) The director may expand the type and scope of materials available on the telephonic reading service in order to meet the local, regional, or foreign language needs of blind or visually impaired residents of this state. The director may also expand the scope of services and availability of telephonic reading services by current methods and technologies that may be developed. The director may inform current and potential patrons of the availability of telephonic reading services through appropriate means, including, but not limited to, direct mailings, direct telephonic contact, and public service announcements.

(4) The director may expend moneys from the business enterprises revolving account accrued from vending machine sales in state and local government buildings, as well as donations and grants, for the purpose of supporting the cost of activities described in this section.

Sec. 66. RCW 74.26.010 and 1980 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In recognition of the fact that there is a small population of children with multiple disabilities and specific and continuing medical needs now being served in high-daily-cost hospitals that could be more appropriately and cost-efficiently served in alternative residential alternatives, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a controlled program to develop and review an alternative service delivery system for certain ((multiply handicapped)) children with multiple disabilities who have continuing intensive medical needs but who are not required to continue in residence in a hospital setting.

Sec. 67. RCW 79.105.210 and 2005 c 155 s 143 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The management of state-owned aquatic lands shall preserve and enhance water-dependent uses. Water-dependent uses shall be favored over other uses in state-owned aquatic land planning and in resolving conflicts between competing lease applications. In cases of conflict between water-dependent uses, priority shall be given to uses which enhance renewable resources, waterborne commerce, and the navigational and biological capacity of the waters, and to statewide interests as distinguished from local interests.

(2) Nonwater-dependent use of state-owned aquatic lands is a low-priority use providing minimal public benefits and shall not be permitted to expand or be established in new areas except in exceptional circumstances where it is compatible with water-dependent uses occurring in or planned for the area.

(3) The department shall consider the natural values of state-owned aquatic lands as wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, representative ecosystem, or spawning area prior to issuing any initial lease or authorizing any change in use. The department may withhold from leasing lands which it finds to have significant natural values, or may provide within any lease for the protection of such values.

(4) The power to lease state-owned aquatic lands is vested in the department, which has the authority to make leases upon terms, conditions, and length of time in conformance with the state Constitution and chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW.

(5) State-owned aquatic lands shall not be leased to persons or organizations which discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, age, or ((physical or mental handicap))disability.

Sec. 68. RCW 82.04.385 and 1988 c 176 s 915 and 1988 c 13 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not apply to income received from the department of social and health services for the cost of care, maintenance, support, and training of persons with developmental disabilities at nonprofit group training homes as defined by chapter 71A.22 RCW or to the business activities of nonprofit organizations from the operation of sheltered workshops. For the purposes of this section, "the operation of sheltered workshops" means performance of business activities of any kind on or off the premises of such nonprofit organizations which are performed for the primary purpose of (1) providing gainful employment or rehabilitation services to ((the handicapped))persons with disabilities as an interim step in the rehabilitation process for those who cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market or during such time as employment opportunities for them in the competitive labor market do not exist; or (2) providing evaluation and work adjustment services for ((handicapped individuals))persons with disabilities.

Sec. 69. RCW 82.80.030 and 2005 c 336 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative authority of a county, city, or district may fix and impose a parking tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking business within its respective jurisdiction. A city or county may impose the tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by the district, and a district may impose the tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by a city or county. The jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of this section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county. The jurisdiction of a city or district includes only the area within its boundaries.

(2) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a city, a county in its unincorporated area, or a district may fix and impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial parking business.

The city, county, or district may provide that:

(a) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;

(b) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease of nonresidential space;

(c) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility and remitted to the city, county, or district;

(d) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the parking charge;

(e) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the facility, the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and

(f) Tax exempt carpools, vehicles with ((handicapped decals))a disabled parking placard, or government vehicles are exempt from the tax.

(3) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor vehicles.

(4) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.

(5) The county, city, or district levying the tax provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses, collection, and enforcement.

(6) The proceeds of the commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by a city or county under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be used for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070 or for transportation improvements in accordance with chapter 36.73 RCW. The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a district must be used as provided in chapter 36.120 RCW.

Sec. 70. RCW 84.36.350 and 1999 c 358 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following property shall be exempt from taxation:

(a) Real or personal property owned and used by a nonprofit corporation in connection with the operation of a sheltered workshop for ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and used primarily in connection with the manufacturing and the handling, sale or distribution of goods constructed, processed, or repaired in such workshops or centers; and

(b) Inventory owned by a sheltered workshop for sale or lease by the sheltered workshop or to be furnished under a contract of service, including raw materials, work in process, and finished products.

(2) Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, "sheltered workshop" means a rehabilitation facility, or that part of a rehabilitation facility operated by a nonprofit corporation, where any manufacture or handiwork is carried on and operated for the primary purpose of: (a) Providing gainful employment or rehabilitation services to ((the handicapped))persons with disabilities as an interim step in the rehabilitation process for those who cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market or during such time as employment opportunities for them in the competitive labor market do not exist; or (b) providing evaluation and work adjustment services for ((handicapped individuals))persons with disabilities.

--- END ---