BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An active duty military spouse may engage in the practice of a profession regulated by the department of licensing without obtaining a Washington state certificate, registration, license, or permit if the spouse is:

(a) Stationed in Washington;

(b) Certified, registered, or licensed, or has a permit to perform such professional services in another state;

(c) In good standing in the state of licensure; and

(d) Not subject to any pending investigation, charges, or disciplinary action by the regulatory body of another state.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Military spouse" means any person married to an active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and merchant marines.

(b) "Active duty" means military service under official orders of ninety days or more.

--- END ---