BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.020 and 1973 c 1 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All statements and reports filed under this chapter shall be public records of the agency where they are filed, and shall be available for public inspection and copying during normal business hours at the expense of the person requesting copies, provided that the charge for such copies shall not exceed actual cost to the agency.

(2) Statements of financial affairs filed by a professional staff member of the legislature pursuant to RCW 42.17A.700 are subject to public disclosure upon request, but the commission may not post on any web site any statements of financial affairs filed by a professional staff member of the legislature. This subsection applies to statements filed both before and after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---