BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

REPEAL OF SELECTED STATUTORY COMMITTEES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.657.130 (Education accountability system oversight committee—Membership—Duties—Reports) and 2013 c 159 s 13;

(2) RCW 28B.95.170 (Legislative advisory committee) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 12 s 6;

(3) RCW 44.55.010 (Findings—Intent) and 2003 c 404 s 1;

(4) RCW 44.55.020 (Committee membership) and 2003 c 404 s 2;

(5) RCW 44.55.030 (Chair—Officers—Rules) and 2003 c 404 s 3;

(6) RCW 44.55.040 (Powers, duties) and 2003 c 404 s 4;

(7) RCW 44.55.050 (Staff support) and 2003 c 404 s 5;

(8) RCW 44.55.060 (Compensation) and 2003 c 404 s 6;

(9) RCW 44.68.020 (Committee created—Members, terms, vacancies, officers, rules) and 1993 c 332 s 1 & 1986 c 61 s 2; and

(10) RCW 44.68.035 (Administration) and 2001 c 259 s 16.

PART II

RELATED AMENDMENTS

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.175.075 and 2018 c 58 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a state-level ((building bridges work group that includes))advisory committee to be known as the graduation: a team effort partnership advisory committee. The advisory committee shall include K-12 and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint representatives to the ((work group))advisory committee: The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the department of children, youth, and families, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the department of health, the community mobilization office, and the children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the department of social and health services. The ((work group should))advisory committee shall also consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and organizations: A statewide organization representing career and technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the educational service districts; the area workforce development councils; parent and educator associations; educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; office of the education ombuds; local school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to special education students; community organizations serving youth; federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives; and the minority commissions.

(2) To assist and enhance the work of the ((building bridges)) programs established in RCW 28A.175.025, the ((state-level work group))advisory committee shall:

(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and local level;

(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each partner agency or organization across the state including performance measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and

(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.

(3)(((a))) The ((work group))advisory committee shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.

(((b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:

(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the percentage of students graduating from high school;

(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be reengaged in education and be college and work ready;

(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium; and

(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused school improvement technical assistance for school districts in significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.))

(4) State agencies in the ((building bridges work group))advisory committee shall work together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:

(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of program eligibility and funding criteria;

(b) Providing joint funding;

(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on sharing records and data;

(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that provide knowledge and training on:

(i) Research-based and promising practices;

(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable youth; and

(iii) Cultural competence.

(((5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:

(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support coordinated planning and evaluation;

(b) The creation of a performance-based management system, including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability for the dropout issue;

(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems;

(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping for services that would:

(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout early warning and intervention data system;

(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services, including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment and referral processes; and

(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;

(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high school graduation rate; and

(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for vulnerable youth.))

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.657.100 and 2013 c 159 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress made by all school districts designated as required action districts.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the state board of education that a school district be released from the designation as a required action district after the district implements a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction using the criteria adopted under RCW 28A.657.020 including progress in closing the educational opportunity gap; and no longer has a school within the district identified as persistently lowest-achieving. The state board shall release a school district from the designation as a required action district upon confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.

(3) If the state board of education determines that the required action district has not met the requirements for release after at least three years of implementing a required action plan, the board may recommend that the district remain in required action and submit a new or revised plan under the process in RCW 28A.657.050, or the board may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process as provided in RCW 28A.657.105. If the required action district received a federal school improvement grant for the same persistently lowest-achieving school in 2010 or 2011, the board may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process after one year of implementing a required action plan under this chapter if the district is not making progress. ((Before making a determination of whether to recommend that a school district that is not making progress remain in required action or be assigned to level two of the required action process, the state board of education must submit its findings to the education accountability system oversight committee under RCW 28A.657.130 and provide an opportunity for the oversight committee to review and comment.))

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.15.067 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 36 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year and through the 2014-15 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and technical colleges.

(3)(a) In the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years, tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates at community and technical colleges excluding applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, shall be five percent less than the 2014-15 academic year tuition operating fee.

(b) Beginning in the 2017-18 academic year, tuition))Tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates at ((community and technical colleges))institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, excluding applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, may increase by no more than the average annual percentage growth rate in the median hourly wage for Washington for the previous fourteen years as the wage is determined by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(((4)))(3) The governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.

(((5)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students, including summer school students and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students; however, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, reductions or increases in tuition must be uniform among resident undergraduate students.

(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with student undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th. Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the state board for community and technical college system shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(6)(a) In the 2015-16 academic year, full-time tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates for state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030 shall be five percent less than the 2014-15 academic year tuition operating fee.

(b) Beginning with the 2016-17 academic year, full-time tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates for:

(i) State universities shall be fifteen percent less than the 2014-15 academic year tuition operating fee; and

(ii) Regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030 shall be twenty percent less than the 2014-15 academic year tuition operating fee.

(c) Beginning with the 2017-18 academic year, full-time tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates in (b) of this subsection may increase by no more than the average annual percentage growth rate in the median hourly wage for Washington for the previous fourteen years as the wage is determined by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(7)))(4) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.

(((8)))(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

(((9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:

(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program; and

(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program.

(10)))(6) As a result of any changes in tuition under section 3, chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall not reduce resident undergraduate enrollment below the 2014-15 academic year levels.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.15.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 814 are each amended to read as follows:

The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees and boards as set forth in this section.

(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and committees:

(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;

(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW 28B.07.030;

(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;

(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;

(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;

(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;

(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;

(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and

(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.

(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:

(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;

(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;

(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;

(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;

(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;

(f) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;

(g) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;

(h) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;

(i) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;

(j) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;

(k) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;

(l) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;

(m) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;

(n) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;

(o) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;

(p) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;

(q) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;

(r) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;

(s) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW 43.163.020;

(t) ((Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;

(u))) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;

(((v)))(u) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW 44.39.015;

(((w)))(v) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, RCW 44.48.010;

(((x) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW 47.06B.020;

(y)))(w) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;

(((z)))(x) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;

(((aa)))(y) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW 73.04.150;

(((bb)))(z) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought, RCW 90.86.020; and

(((cc)))(aa) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001((; and

(dd) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy, RCW 44.55.020)).

Sec. 6. RCW 43.216.572 and 2016 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of implementing this chapter, the governor shall appoint a state ((birth-to-three)) interagency coordinating council for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families and ensure that state agencies involved in the provision of, or payment for, early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families shall coordinate and collaborate in the planning and delivery of such services.

No state or local agency currently providing early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities may use funds appropriated for early intervention services for infants and toddlers with disabilities to supplant funds from other sources.

All state and local agencies shall ensure that the implementation of this chapter will not cause any interruption in existing early intervention services for infants and toddlers with disabilities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the restriction or reduction of eligibility under Title V of the Social Security Act, P.L. 90-248, relating to maternal and child health or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, P.L. 89-97, relating to medicaid for infants and toddlers with disabilities.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.216.574 and 2016 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state ((birth-to-three)) interagency coordinating council for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families shall identify and work with county early childhood interagency coordinating councils to coordinate and enhance existing early intervention services and assist each community to meet the needs of infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families.

Sec. 8. RCW 44.04.325 and 2008 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A legislative oral history committee is created, which shall consist of the following individuals:

(a) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the two largest caucuses of the house, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(b) Four members of the senate, two from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(c) The chief clerk of the house of representatives; and

(d) The secretary of the senate.

(2) Ex officio members may be appointed by a majority vote of the committee's members appointed under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The chair of the committee shall be elected by a majority vote of the committee members appointed under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the office of the secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

Sec. 9. RCW 44.68.010 and 2007 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Administrative committee" means the joint legislative systems administrative committee created under RCW 44.68.030.

(2) "Center" means the legislative service center established under RCW 44.68.060.

(3) "Coordinator" means the legislative systems coordinator employed under RCW 44.68.040.

(((4) "Systems committee" means the joint legislative systems committee created under RCW 44.68.020.))

Sec. 10. RCW 44.68.040 and 2007 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) The ((systems committee, after consultation with the)) administrative committee((,)) shall employ a legislative systems coordinator. The coordinator shall serve at the pleasure of the ((systems))administrative committee, which shall fix the coordinator's salary.

(2)(a) The coordinator shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the center, and shall assist the administrative committee in managing the information processing and communications systems of the legislature as directed by the administrative committee;

(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the coordinator shall employ or engage and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(c) The coordinator shall enter into contracts for: (i) The sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii) the distribution of legislative information.

Sec. 11. RCW 44.68.050 and 2007 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative committee shall, ((subject to the approval of the systems committee and)) subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) Adopt policies, procedures, and standards regarding the information processing and communications systems of the legislature;

(2) Establish appropriate charges for services, equipment, and publications provided by the legislative information processing and communications systems, applicable to legislative and nonlegislative users as determined by the administrative committee;

(3) Adopt a compensation plan for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

(4) Approve strategic and tactical information technology plans and provide guidance in operational matters required to carry out (a) the purposes of this chapter; and (b) the distribution of legislative information((;

(5) Generally assist the systems committee in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, as directed by the systems committee)).

Sec. 12. RCW 44.68.060 and 2007 c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative committee((, subject to the approval of the systems committee,)) shall establish a legislative service center. The center shall provide automatic data processing services, equipment, training, and support to the legislature and legislative agencies. The center may also, by agreement, provide services to agencies of the judicial and executive branches of state government and other governmental entities, and provide public access to legislative information. All operations of the center shall be subject to the general supervision of the administrative committee in accordance with the policies, procedures, and standards established under RCW 44.68.050.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (3) of this section, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of information placed or maintained in the center shall rest solely with the originator and shall be made in accordance with any law regulating the disclosure of such information. The originator is the person who directly places information in the center.

(3) When utilizing the center to carry out the bill drafting functions required under RCW 1.08.027, the code reviser shall be considered the originator as defined in ((RCW 44.68.060))this section. However, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of drafts placed or maintained in the center shall be made by the person requesting the code reviser's services and the code reviser, acting as the originator, shall comply with and carry out such determinations as directed by that person. A measure once introduced shall not be considered a draft under this subsection.

Sec. 13. RCW 44.68.065 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative service center, under the direction of ((the joint legislative systems committee and)) the joint legislative systems administrative committee, shall:

(1) Develop a legislative information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.105.341;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the legislative information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the legislative information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the consolidated technology services agency.

Sec. 14. RCW 44.68.085 and 2007 c 18 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the coordinator. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated by law for the ((systems committee,)) administrative committee((,)) and center: PROVIDED, That the senate, house of representatives, and code reviser may authorize the ((systems committee,)) administrative committee((,)) and center to draw on funds appropriated by the legislature for related information technology expenses. The senate and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for legislative expenses to the ((systems committee,)) administrative committee((,)) and center, in addition to charges made under RCW 44.68.050(2).

Sec. 15. RCW 44.68.090 and 1986 c 61 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Members ((of the systems committee and)) of the administrative committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120 or 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as appropriate, while attending meetings of their respective committees or on other official business authorized by their respective committees.

Sec. 16. RCW 44.68.100 and 1996 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature and legislative agencies through the ((joint legislative systems))administrative committee, shall:

(1) Continue to plan for and implement processes for making legislative information available electronically;

(2) Promote and facilitate electronic access to the public of legislative information and services;

(3) Establish technical standards for such services;

(4) Consider electronic public access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of information systems;

(5) Develop processes to determine which legislative information the public most wants and needs;

(6) Increase capabilities to receive information electronically from the public and transmit forms, applications and other communications and transactions electronically;

(7) Use technologies that allow continuous access twenty-four hours a day, seven days per week, involve little or no cost to access, and are capable of being used by persons without extensive technology ability; and

(8) Consider and incorporate wherever possible ease of access to electronic technologies by persons with disabilities.

Sec. 17. RCW 44.68.105 and 2007 c 18 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((systems committee,)) administrative committee((,)) and center are hereby expressly exempted from the provisions of chapter 43.105 RCW.

PART III

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---