BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.70.442 and 2019 c 444 s 13 and 2019 c 358 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(ii) A substance use disorder professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;

(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;

(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and

(viii) A social worker associate—advanced or social worker associate—independent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection((, a)):

(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the second training for a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical must be either: (A) An advanced training focused on suicide management, suicide care protocols, or effective treatments; or (B) a training in a treatment modality shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal, including dialectical behavior therapy, collaborative assessment and management of suicide risk, or cognitive behavior therapy-suicide prevention. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's second training prior to July 1, 2021, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection. This subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(a)(ii) is not reasonably available.

(b)(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical exempt from his or her first training under (b)(i) of this subsection must comply with the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection for his or her first training after initial licensure. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's first training after initial licensure, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection (2)(b)(ii). This subsection (2)(b)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(b)(ii) is not reasonably available.

(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.

(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.

(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.

(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:

(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;

(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;

(v) An osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW;

(vi) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;

(vii) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);

(viii) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(ix) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;

(x) A dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;

(xi) A dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(xii) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; ((and))

(xiii) An optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(xiv) An acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; and

(xv) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (((xii)))(xiv) of this subsection.

(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.

(iii) A licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist, or a person holding a retired active license as a dentist shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2020, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between July 23, 2017, and August 1, 2020, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iii), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(iv) A licensed optometrist or a licensed acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or a person holding a retired active license as an optometrist or an acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2021, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between the effective date of this section and August 1, 2021, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iv), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).

(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.

(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management. Beginning July 1, 2021, for purposes of subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the model list must include advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal.

(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.

(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists or dentists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:

(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and

(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:

(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;

(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and

(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.

(e) By January 1, 2021, the department shall adopt minimum standards for advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal. Beginning July 1, 2021, all such training on the model list must meet the minimum standards. When adopting the minimum standards, the department must consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations.

(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.

(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

(10) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.

(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.

(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter 71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board, in consultation with the University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence and affected professional associations, shall develop a suicide prevention training program for veterinarians and veterinary technicians by June 30, 2022. The program must:

(a) Recognize that veterinarians treat animal patients and have limited interaction with animal patient owners;

(b) Focus on mental health and well-being;

(c) Include general content on suicide risk, prevention, and resourcing, and specific content on imminent harm by lethal means; and

(d) Be three hours in length.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2022, all veterinarians and veterinary technicians shall complete the training program developed by the board. The training must be completed during the first full continuing education reporting period after July 1, 2022, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. The board may exempt any veterinarian or veterinary technician who completed training substantially equivalent to the training developed under subsection (1) of this section in the three years prior to July 1, 2022.

(3) The hours spent completing training under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education requirements for veterinarians and veterinary technicians.

(4) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of a veterinarian or veterinary technician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence, in coordination with associations representing the construction industry, shall develop:

(a) An online, interactive training module in suicide prevention; and

(b) A series of modules intended to be delivered by the construction industry that complement the online training module, which must include training on available resources, lethal means safety, screening tools, men's mental health, and a refresher on the online training.

(2) The University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence shall complete the modules developed under subsection (1) of this section by July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1, 2020.

--- END ---