BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.645 and 2019 c 314 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization of at least one federal food and drug administration approved product for the treatment of opioid use disorder in the drug classes opioid agonists, opioid antagonists, and opioid partial agonists.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2021, all contracts with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan must require that a managed health care system provide coverage with preferred status and without prior authorization for federal food and drug administration approved products for the treatment of opioid use disorder that are in the form of implantable devices and long acting injections, if such approved products exist, for each of the following drug classes: Opioid agonists, opioid antagonists, and opioid partial agonists.

--- END ---