BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) By December 1, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of health must collaborate to submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report of findings related to statewide implementation of RCW 28A.210.383, authorizing prescriptions for, and use of, school supplies of epinephrine autoinjectors.

(b) In preparing the report, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of health must:

(i) Analyze information about the schools that maintain a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors under RCW 28A.210.383;

(ii) Examine the barriers and challenges licensed health professionals with the authority to prescribe epinephrine autoinjectors experience in prescribing this medication under a standing order;

(iii) Review whether and to what extent the requirement under RCW 28A.210.320 that a student with a life-threatening allergic reaction present a medication or treatment order addressing the medical services that may be required to be performed at the school reduces the need for and use of a school supply of epinephrine autoinjectors;

(iv) Determine the number of unused epinephrine autoinjectors discarded by schools, and returned to students' families, at the end of the 2020-21 school year;

(v) Complete an inventory of the number and categories of school district staff provided with training on identifying and responding to life-threatening allergies between September 1, 2017, and September 1, 2020; and

(vi) Investigate any other implementation issues raised by school nurses, students who have life-threatening allergic reactions, and students' families during meetings held by the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of soliciting feedback on these issues.

(2) When collecting and analyzing information as required under subsection (1) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of health must collect information from multiple sources, and disaggregate information during analysis, such that information can be separated by school geography, student enrollment, school socioeconomic status, and other student demographics.

(3) This section expires August 31, 2021.

--- END ---