BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.053 and 2019 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of a minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4)(a) Any person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she sells a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a misdemeanor.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under eighteen years of age who ((finances, attempts to finance, develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, or possesses a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4)))possesses an image as defined in this section of himself or herself.

(7) This section does not apply to a person under eighteen years of age who disseminates or exchanges an image as defined in this section of himself or herself with no more than one other person.

(8) A person under eighteen years of age who disseminates or exchanges an image as defined in this section of himself or herself with more than one other person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(9) A person under eighteen years of age who possesses, distributes, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, sells, develops, duplicates, publishes, or prints a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e) and (g) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(10) A person under eighteen years of age who possesses, distributes, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, sells, develops, duplicates, publishes, or prints a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4)(f) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(11) For purposes of this section, "image" means a photograph, moving picture, or other depiction of the unclothed breast, unclothed genitals, or unclothed pubic area or buttocks.

(12) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this section, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.68A.060 and 2019 c 128 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Sending or bringing into the state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of sending or bringing into the state one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) ((This section does not apply to a))A minor who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, visual or printed matter depicting any minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) ((This section does not apply to a))A person under thirteen years of age who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for distribution, visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.68A.070 and 2019 c 128 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly possesses a visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person commits the crime of possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly possesses any visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this subsection, each incident of possession of one or more depictions or images of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

(3) ((This section does not apply to a))A minor(('s))in possession of visual or printed matter depicting any minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(4) ((This section does not apply to a))A person under thirteen years of age in possession of visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.68A.075 and 2019 c 128 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e) is guilty of viewing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree, a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a person who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g) is guilty of viewing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree, a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of determining whether a person intentionally viewed over the internet a visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the trier of fact shall consider the title, text, and content of the visual or printed matter, as well as the internet history, search terms, thumbnail images, downloading activity, expert computer forensic testimony, number of visual or printed matter depicting minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct, defendant's access to and control over the electronic device and its contents upon which the visual or printed matter was found, or any other relevant evidence. The state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the viewing was initiated by the user of the computer where the viewing occurred.

(4) For the purposes of this section, each separate internet session of intentionally viewing over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct constitutes a separate offense.

(5) ((This section does not apply to a))A minor who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting a minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(6) ((This section does not apply to a))A person under thirteen years of age who intentionally views over the internet visual or printed matter depicting himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---