BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2021, the maximum amount a health carrier or pharmacy benefit manager may require a person to pay at the point of sale for a covered prescription medication is the lesser of:

(a) The applicable cost sharing for the prescription medication; or

(b) The amount the person would pay for the prescription medication if the person purchased the prescription medication without using a health plan.

(2) For purposes of this section, "pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.340.010.

--- END ---