BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall consult with the appropriate federal regulators and tribal comanagers to ensure that hatcheries in Grays Harbor, Pacific, Mason, and Wahkiakum counties each produce an annual number of fish that is equal to or greater than the annual average number of fish the hatchery produced over the past twenty years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the southwest Washington salmon restoration act.

--- END ---