BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.30.583 and 2018 c 255 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To assist the department in developing and providing the report to the legislature required in RCW 43.30.582, the commissioner must appoint a marbled murrelet advisory committee.

(2) The marbled murrelet advisory committee may include one or more representatives from the following categories:

(a) State trust lands beneficiaries;

(b) Impacted state forestlands beneficiaries, including counties;

(c) Junior taxing districts;

(d) Environmental organizations;

(e) Local governments or an association representing local governments;

(f) Milling interests or an association representing milling interests;

(g) Private forestland owners or a statewide association representing private forestland owners; and

(h) Local public interest groups.

(3) The advisory committee required under this section may consult with relevant state and federal agencies and tribes.

(4) Prior to any meeting of the advisory committee, the department shall provide a minimum of seventy-two hours advance notice of the meeting in the manner and form prescribed in RCW 42.30.080 (2) and (3).

Sec. 2. 2018 c 255 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Sections 2 and 3, chapter 255, Laws of 2018 and section 1 of this act expire at the end of the calendar year following the issuance by the United States fish and wildlife service of an incidental take permit on the long-term conservation strategy for the marbled murrelet under the state trust lands habitat conservation plan and subsequent adoption by the board of natural resources.

(2) The department of natural resources must notify the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the office of the code reviser when the conditional expiration date of sections ((1 and 2))2 and 3, chapter 255, Laws of 2018 and section 1 of this act is satisfied.

--- END ---