BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to affirm that every Washingtonian has the right and obligation to participate in the federal decennial census freely and without fear of fraud, intimidation, or harm, and to inform the public of these rights.

(2) The legislature affirms the rights of Washingtonians to all of the following, to be known as the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities:

(a) To participate in the federal decennial census free of threat or intimidation;

(b) To the confidentiality of the information provided in the census form, as provided by federal law;

(c) To respond to the census by means made available to the respondent, either by phone, by mail, online, or in person;

(d) To request language assistance in accordance with federal law; and

(e) To verify the identity of a census worker.

(3) The secretary of state shall translate the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities into languages other than English, consistent with the federal voting rights act of 1965, 52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503.

(4) The office of financial management shall make the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities available on its internet web site and available for inclusion on city and county census internet web sites and census questionnaire assistance center internet web sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9A.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of impersonating a census taker if the person falsely represents that he or she is a census taker with the intent to:

(a) Interfere with the operation of the census;

(b) Obtain information; or

(c) Obtain consent to enter a private dwelling.

(2) Impersonating a census taker is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---