BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

ACT NAME AND LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the voting opportunities through education act or the VOTE act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature finds that robust participation by young voters in Washington state elections is critical to ensuring lifelong civic engagement. Research has shown that voting is a habitual behavior and that people who vote in the first three elections when they are eligible will likely vote for life. However, this is also the period of time when they are likely to face unique barriers to participate in the democratic process, including regularly changing their address, becoming eligible shortly after an election, and exclusion from certain voter registration policies.

The legislature also finds that the period prior to election day is the most critical time to ensure ballot access for young voters. States with early voting have higher participation rates than states that do not and the use of early voting sites on college campuses helped produce record levels of participation for young voters in 2016 and 2018.

The legislature finds that students that have more opportunities to be registered and vote are more likely to participate. Limiting statutory voter registration opportunities on college campuses to days well in advance of election day is inconsistent with implementation of same-day voter registration. Making automatic voter registration unavailable to those registering for the first time denies young voters the same benefits as every other voter.

PART II

PERSONS ALLOWED TO VOTE IN PRIMARIES

Sec. 3. RCW 29A.08.210 and 2018 c 109 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application providing the following information concerning his or her qualifications as a voter in this state:

(1) The former address of the applicant if previously registered to vote;

(2) The applicant's full name;

(3) The applicant's date of birth;

(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;

(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;

(6) The sex of the applicant;

(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number, Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's social security number if he or she does not have a Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification card;

(8) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that he or she is an overseas voter;

(9) A check box allowing the applicant to acknowledge that he or she is at least ((eighteen))sixteen years old ((or is at least sixteen years old and will vote only after he or she reaches the age of eighteen));

(10) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the applicant's attention, stating that ((the)):

(a) The applicant must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote; and

(b) The applicant may register to vote if the applicant is at least sixteen years old and may vote if the applicant will be at least eighteen years old by the next general election, or is at least eighteen years old for special elections;

(11) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;

(12) The following warning:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."

(13) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the applicant's signature; and

(14) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.

This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to be prescribed by the secretary of state.

Sec. 4. RCW 29A.08.230 and 2013 c 11 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true. I am a citizen of the United States, I will have lived at this address in Washington for at least thirty days immediately before the next election at which I vote, I ((will be))am at least ((eighteen))sixteen years old ((when I vote)), I am not disqualified from voting due to a court order, and I am not under department of corrections supervision for a Washington felony conviction."

Sec. 5. RCW 29A.08.330 and 2019 c 391 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by the secretary of state.

(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including information about age and citizenship requirements for voter registration.

(3) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the service agent shall ask the following:

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"

(b) "Are you at least ((eighteen))sixteen years old ((or are you at least sixteen years old and will you vote only after you turn eighteen))?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to sign up to vote, register to vote, or update a voter registration. If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide the applicant with a voter registration application.

(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may, in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture simultaneously the information required for voter registration during a person's computerized application process.

(5) Each designated agency shall transmit the applications to the secretary of state or appropriate county auditor within three business days and must be received by the election official by the required voter registration deadline.

(6) Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.08.810 and 2011 c 10 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Registration of a person as a voter is presumptive evidence of his or her right to vote. A challenge to the person's right to vote must be based on personal knowledge of one of the following:

(a) The challenged voter has been convicted of a felony and the voter's civil rights have not been restored;

(b) The challenged voter has been judicially declared ineligible to vote due to mental incompetency;

(c) The challenged voter does not live at the residential address provided, in which case the challenger must either:

(i) Provide the challenged voter's actual residence on the challenge form; or

(ii) Submit evidence that he or she exercised due diligence to verify that the challenged voter does not reside at the address provided and to attempt to contact the challenged voter to learn the challenged voter's actual residence, including that the challenger personally:

(A) Sent a letter with return service requested to the challenged voter's residential address provided, and to the challenged voter's mailing address, if provided;

(B) Visited the residential address provided and contacted persons at the address to determine whether the voter resides at the address and, if not, obtained and submitted with the challenge form a signed affidavit subject to the penalties of perjury from a person who owns or manages property, resides, or is employed at the address provided, that to his or her personal knowledge the challenged voter does not reside at the address as provided on the voter registration;

(C) Searched local telephone directories, including online directories, to determine whether the voter maintains a telephone listing at any address in the county;

(D) Searched county auditor property records to determine whether the challenged voter owns any property in the county; and

(E) Searched the statewide voter registration database to determine if the voter is registered at any other address in the state;

(d) The challenged voter will not be eighteen years of age by the next general election; or

(e) The challenged voter is not a citizen of the United States.

(2) A person's right to vote may be challenged by another registered voter or the county prosecuting attorney.

(3) The challenger must file a signed affidavit subject to the penalties of perjury swearing that, to his or her personal knowledge and belief, having exercised due diligence to personally verify the evidence presented, the challenged voter either is not qualified to vote or does not reside at the address given on his or her voter registration record based on one of the reasons allowed in subsection (1) of this section. The challenger must provide the factual basis for the challenge, including any information required by subsection (1)(c) of this section, in the signed affidavit. The challenge may not be based on unsupported allegations or allegations by anonymous third parties. All documents pertaining to the challenge are public records.

(4) Challenges based on a felony conviction under RCW 29A.08.520 must be heard according to RCW 29A.08.520 and rules adopted by the secretary of state.

PART III

AUTOMATIC VOTER SIGN-UP TO REGISTER

Sec. 7. RCW 29A.08.355 and 2018 c 110 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of licensing ((shall implement an automatic voter registration system so that))must allow a person age eighteen years or older ((who))to be registered to vote or update voter registration information by automated process at the time of registration, renewal, or change of address if:

(a) The person meets requirements for voter registration ((and));

(b) The person has received or is renewing an enhanced driver's license or identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 or is changing the address for an existing enhanced driver's license or identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205 ((may be registered to vote or update voter registration information at the time of registration, renewal, or change of address, by automated process if the)); and

(c) The department of licensing record associated with the applicant contains ((the)):

(i) The data required to determine whether the applicant meets requirements for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.010((, other));

(ii) Other information as required by the secretary of state((, and includes a)); and

(iii) A signature image.

(2) The department of licensing must allow a person sixteen or seventeen years of age to be signed up to register to vote by automated process at the time of registration, renewal, or change of address if:

(a) The person meets requirements to sign up to register to vote;

(b) The person has received or is renewing an enhanced driver's license or identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 or is changing the address for an existing enhanced driver's license or identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205; and

(c) The department of licensing record associated with the applicant contains:

(i) The data required to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.210, other than age;

(ii) Other information as required by the secretary of state; and

(iii) A signature image.

(3) The person must be informed that his or her record will be used for voter registration and offered an opportunity to decline to register.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.20.155 and 2018 c 109 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"

(2) "Are you at least ((eighteen))sixteen years old ((or are you at least sixteen years old and will you vote only after you turn eighteen))?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the agent shall then submit the registration, sign up form, or update. If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit an application. Information that is otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots.

(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by electronic commerce.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.230.094 and 2018 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning with or before the 2020-21 school year, each school district that operates a high school must provide a mandatory one-half credit stand-alone course in civics for each high school student. Except as provided by (c) of this subsection, civics content and instruction embedded in other social studies courses do not satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

(b) Credit awarded to students who complete the civics course must be applied to course credit requirements in social studies that are required for high school graduation.

(c) Civics content and instruction required by this section may be embedded in social studies courses that offer students the opportunity to earn both high school and postsecondary credit.

(2) The content of the civics course must include, but is not limited to:

(a) Federal, state, tribal, and local government organization and procedures;

(b) Rights and responsibilities of citizens addressed in the Washington state and United States Constitutions;

(c) Current issues addressed at each level of government;

(d) Electoral issues, including elections, ballot measures, initiatives, and referenda;

(e) The study and completion of the civics component of the federally administered naturalization test required of persons seeking to become naturalized United States citizens; and

(f) The importance in a free society of living the basic values and character traits specified in RCW 28A.150.211.

(3) By September 1, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the Washington state association of county auditors and the league of women voters, shall identify and make available civics materials and resources for use in courses under this section. The materials and resources must be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

PART IV

STUDENT ENGAGEMENT CENTERS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each county auditor shall open a voting center each primary, special election, and general election. The voting center must be open during business hours during the voting period, which begins eighteen days before, and ends at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the primary, special election, or general election.

(b) Each county auditor shall register voters in person at each of the following locations in the county:

(i) At the county auditor's office; and

(ii) At the division of elections, if located in a separate city from the county auditor's office.

(2) For each presidential general election, each county auditor shall register voters in person at a voting center in each city in the county with a population of one hundred thousand or greater, which does not have a voting center as required in subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section. A voting center opened pursuant to this subsection (2) is not required to be open on the Sunday before the presidential election.

(3) Voting centers must be located in public buildings or buildings that are leased by a public entity including, but not limited to, libraries.

(4)(a) Each public university campus described in chapter 28B.45 RCW with an enrollment of five thousand students or greater shall open a student engagement center on its campus. The student engagement center may be open during business hours beginning eight days before, and ending at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the general election. The student engagement center must provide ballots.

(b) Upon request of the student government organization to the administration and the county auditor, the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and excluding university campuses described in chapter 28B.45 RCW shall open a student engagement center on its campus. The student engagement center may be open during business hours beginning eight days before, and ending at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the general election. The student engagement center must allow voters to register in person pursuant to RCW 29A.08.140(1)(b) and provide voter registration materials and ballots.

(c) Each institution shall contract with the county auditor for the operation of a student engagement center under this subsection.

(d) Any institution of higher education operating a voting center on its campus under this subsection is designated as a voter empowerment campus.

Sec. 11. RCW 29A.40.160 and 2019 c 6 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Each county auditor shall open a voting center each primary, special election, and general election. The voting center shall be open during business hours during the voting period, which begins eighteen days before, and ends at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the primary, special election, or general election.

(2) Each county auditor shall register voters in person at each of the following locations in the county:

(a) At the county auditor's office;

(b) At the division of elections, if located in a separate city from the county auditor's office; and

(c) For each presidential general election, at a voting center in each city in the county with a population of one hundred thousand or greater, which does not have a voting center as required in (a) or (b) of this subsection. A voting center opened pursuant to this subsection (2) is not required to be open on the Sunday before the presidential election.

(3) Voting centers shall be located in public buildings or buildings that are leased by a public entity including, but not limited to, libraries.

(4))) Each voting center, and at least one of the other locations designated by the county auditor to allow voters to register in person pursuant to RCW 29A.08.140(1)(b), must provide voter registration materials, ballots, provisional ballots, disability access voting units, sample ballots, instructions on how to properly vote the ballot, a ballot drop box, and voters' pamphlets, if a voters' pamphlet has been published.

(((5)))(2) Each voting center must be accessible to persons with disabilities. Each state agency and entity of local government shall permit the use of any of its accessible facilities as voting centers when requested by a county auditor.

(((6)))(3) Each voting center must provide at least one voting unit certified by the secretary of state that provides access to individuals who are blind or visually impaired, enabling them to vote with privacy and independence.

(((7)))(4) No person may interfere with a voter attempting to vote in a voting center. Interfering with a voter attempting to vote is a violation of RCW 29A.84.510.

(((8)))(5) Before opening the voting center, the voting equipment shall be inspected to determine if it has been properly prepared for voting. If the voting equipment is capable of direct tabulation of each voter's choices, the county auditor shall verify that no votes have been registered for any issue or office, and that the device has been sealed with a unique numbered seal at the time of final preparation and logic and accuracy testing. A log must be made of all device numbers and seal numbers.

(((9)))(6) The county auditor shall require any person desiring to vote at a voting center to either sign a ballot declaration or provide identification.

(a) The signature on the declaration must be compared to the signature on the voter registration record before the ballot may be counted. If the voter registered using a mark, or can no longer sign his or her name, the election officers shall require the voter to be identified by another registered voter.

(b) The identification must be valid photo identification, such as a driver's license, state identification card, student identification card, tribal identification card, or employer identification card. A tribal identification card is not required to include a residential address or an expiration date to be considered valid under this section. Any individual who desires to vote in person but cannot provide identification shall be issued a provisional ballot, which shall be accepted if the signature on the declaration matches the signature on the voter's registration record.

(((10)))(7) Provisional ballots must be accompanied by a declaration and security envelope, as required by RCW 29A.40.091, and space for the voter's name, date of birth, current and former registered address, reason for the provisional ballot, and disposition of the provisional ballot. The voter shall vote and return the provisional ballot at the voting center. The voter must be provided information on how to ascertain whether the provisional ballot was counted and, if applicable, the reason why the vote was not counted.

(((11)))(8) Any voter may take printed or written material into the voting device to assist in casting his or her vote. The voter shall not use this material to electioneer and shall remove it when he or she leaves the voting center.

(((12)))(9) If any voter states that he or she is unable to cast his or her votes due to a disability, the voter may designate a person of his or her choice, or two election officers, to enter the voting booth and record the votes as he or she directs.

(((13)))(10) No voter is entitled to vote more than once at a primary, special election, or general election. If a voter incorrectly marks a ballot, he or she may be issued a replacement ballot.

(((14)))(11) A voter who has already returned a ballot but requests to vote at a voting center shall be issued a provisional ballot. The canvassing board shall not count the provisional ballot if it finds that the voter has also voted a regular ballot in that primary, special election, or general election.

(((15)))(12) Any voter who is inside or in line at the voting center at 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election must be allowed to vote.

(((16)))(13) For each primary, special election, and general election, the county auditor may provide election services at locations in addition to the voting center. The county auditor has discretion to establish which services will be provided at the additional locations, and which days and hours the locations will be open.

PART V

VOTERS' PAMPHLETS

Sec. 12. RCW 29A.32.031 and 2013 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The voters' pamphlet published or distributed under RCW 29A.32.010 must contain:

(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;

(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, from candidates for the office of president and vice president of the United States, United States senator, United States representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit campaign contact information and a photograph not more than five years old in a format that the secretary of state determines to be suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;

(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this section must appear;

(4) Contact information for the public disclosure commission established under RCW 42.17A.100, including the following statement: "For a list of the people and organizations that donated to state and local candidates and ballot measure campaigns, visit www.pdc.wa.gov." The statement must be placed in a prominent position, such as on the cover or on the first two pages of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state may substitute such language as is necessary for accuracy and clarity and consistent with the intent of this section;

(5) Contact information for major political parties;

(6) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080; ((and))

(7) A list of all voter empowerment campuses as designated under section 10(4) of this act; and

(8) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed informative to the voters.

Sec. 13. RCW 29A.32.241 and 2016 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters' pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the date of the election or primary;

(b) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the pamphlet;

(c) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain a ballot;

(d) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before inclusion in the pamphlet;

(e) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280; ((and))

(f) A list of all voter empowerment campuses in the county as designated under section 10(4) of this act; and

(g) For partisan primary elections, information on how to vote the applicable ballot format and an explanation that minor political party candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the general election ballot.

(2) The county auditor's name may not appear in the local voters' pamphlet in his or her official capacity if the county auditor is a candidate for office during the same year. His or her name may only be included as part of the information normally included for candidates.

PART VI

HARMONIZING PROVISIONS

Sec. 14. RCW 29A.04.061 and 2003 c 111 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

"Elector" means any person who possesses all of the qualifications to vote under Article VI of the state Constitution, including persons who are seventeen years of age at the primary election or presidential primary election but who will be eighteen years of age by the general election.

Sec. 15. RCW 29A.08.110 and 2019 c 391 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For persons registering under RCW 29A.08.120, 29A.08.123, 29A.08.170, 29A.08.330, 29A.08.340, 29A.08.362, and 29A.08.365, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of ((the)):

(a) The original date of receipt((, or when));

(b) When the person will be at least eighteen years old by the next election; or

(c) When the person will be at least seventeen years old by the next primary election or presidential primary election and eighteen years old by the general election, whichever is applicable.

(2) As soon as practicable, the auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. The secretary of state shall, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.611, establish procedures to enable new or updated voter registrations to be recorded on an expedited basis. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes. Within sixty days after the receipt of an application or transfer, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class nonforwardable mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.

(((2)))(3) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

(((3)))(4) Once a future voter is no longer in pending status, as described in RCW 29A.08.615, his or her application to sign up to register to vote is no longer pending and is subject to this section.

Sec. 16. RCW 29A.08.170 and 2018 c 109 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may sign up to register to vote if he or she is sixteen or seventeen years of age, as part of the future voter program.

(2) A person who signs up to register to vote may not vote until reaching eighteen years of age((, and his or her name))unless the person is seventeen years of age at the primary election or presidential primary election and will be eighteen years of age by the general election. A person who signs up to register to vote may not be added to the statewide voter registration database list of voters until such time as he or she will be ((eighteen years of age by))eligible to vote in the next election.

Sec. 17. RCW 29A.08.172 and 2018 c 109 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained sixteen years of age may sign up to register to vote, as part of the future voter program, by submitting a voter registration application by mail.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register by mail, the person must provide a signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote in a special or general election until his or her eighteenth birthday.

Sec. 18. RCW 29A.08.174 and 2018 c 109 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained sixteen years of age and has a valid Washington state driver's license or identicard may sign up to register to vote as part of the future voter program, by submitting a voter registration application electronically on the secretary of state's web site.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register electronically, the applicant must affirmatively assent to the use of his or her driver's license or identicard signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote in a special or general election until his or her eighteenth birthday, and will only vote in a primary election or presidential primary election if he or she will be eighteen years of age by the general election.

(5) For each electronic registration application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or identicard signature from the department of licensing.

(6) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter preregistration applications submitted electronically.

Sec. 19. RCW 29A.08.359 and 2019 c 391 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For persons age eighteen years and older registering under RCW 29A.08.355(1), an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 and other information as required by the secretary of state. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the original date of issuance or renewal or date of change of address of an enhanced driver's license or identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 or change of address for an existing enhanced driver's license or identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205.

(b) For persons sixteen or seventeen years of age registering under RCW 29A.08.355(2), an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 and other information as required by the secretary of state. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the date set forth in RCW 29A.08.110(1).

(c) The information must be transmitted in an expedited manner and must be received by an election official by the required voter registration deadline. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes. Within sixty days after the receipt of an application or transfer, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class nonforwardable mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The United States postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.

(((b)))(d) An auditor may use other means to communicate with potential and registered voters such as, but not limited to, email, phone, or text messaging. The alternate form of communication must not be in lieu of the first-class mail requirements. The auditor shall act in compliance with all voter notification processes established in federal law.

(2) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice must require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant must be registered to vote. The applicant must not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

(3) If the prospective registration applicant declines to register to vote or the information provided by the department of licensing does not indicate citizenship, the information must not be included on the list of registered voters.

(4) The department of licensing is prohibited from sharing data files used by the secretary of state to certify voters registered through the automated process outlined in RCW 29A.08.355 with any federal agency, or state agency other than the secretary of state. Personal information supplied for the purposes of obtaining a driver's license or identicard is exempt from public inspection pursuant to RCW 42.56.230.

Sec. 20. RCW 29A.84.140 and 2018 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who knows that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who registers to vote is guilty of a class C felony. This section does not apply to persons age sixteen or seventeen signing up to register to vote as authorized under RCW 29A.08.170 or 29A.08.355(2).

Sec. 21. RCW 46.20.156 and 2018 c 110 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

For persons eighteen years of age or older who meet requirements for voter registration and persons sixteen or seventeen years of age who meet requirements to sign up to register to vote, who have been issued or are renewing an enhanced driver's license or identicard under RCW 46.20.202 or applying for a change of address for an existing enhanced driver's license or identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205, and have not declined to register to vote, the department shall produce and transmit to the secretary of state the following information from the records of each individual: The name, address, date of birth, gender of the applicant, the driver's license number, signature image, and the date on which the application was submitted. The department and the secretary of state shall process information as an automated application on a daily basis.

PART VII

OTHER PROVISIONS

Sec. 22. RCW 29A.08.140 and 2019 c 391 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application that is received by an election official no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "received" means: (i) Being physically received by an election official by the close of business of the required deadline; or (ii) for applications received online or electronically, by midnight, of the required deadline; or

(b) Register in person at ((the))a county auditor's office, the division of elections if in a separate city from the county auditor's office, a voting center, a student engagement center, or other location designated by the county auditor ((in his or her county of residence)) no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election.

(2) (([(a)]))(a) In order to change a residence address for voting in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration by:

(((a) [(i)]))(i) Submitting an address change using a registration application or making notification via any non-in-person method that is received by election officials no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(((b) [(ii)]))(ii) Appearing in person, at ((the))a county auditor's office, the division of elections if in a separate city from the county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor ((in his or her county of residence)), no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general election.

(((c) [(b)]))(b) A registered voter who fails to update his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

(3) To register or update a voting address in person at ((the))a county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor, a person must appear in person at ((the))a county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor ((in the county in which the person resides)) at a time when the facility is open and complete the voter registration application by providing the information required by RCW 29A.08.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. Sections 3 through 6 and 22 of this act take effect January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. Sections 7 and 8 of this act take effect September 1, 2020.

--- END ---