BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by an independent health care provider as compensation for health care services provided under medicaid.

(2) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, an independent health care provider may deduct from the measure of tax the amount that would have otherwise been received from donated health care services.

(3) For purposes of this section, "independent health care provider" means a health care provider who is not employed by a hospital or by an entity affiliated with a hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---