BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions, the commission must establish a scenic bikeways program for the designation and promotion of bicycle routes of notable scenic, recreational, cultural, or historic value.

(2)(a) Any person may propose the designation of a scenic bikeway route by the commission. Prior to the designation of a scenic bike route by the commission, the commission must provide an opportunity for public comment.

(b) When proposing routes for commission approval, proponents are encouraged to:

(i) Consider the criteria under this section by which the commission will review and approve scenic bikeway designations, including the criteria specified in subsections (4) and (5) of this section; and

(ii) Locate routes in such a way as to encourage local economic development in proximity to designated scenic bikeways, including opportunities for bicycle repairs, food, lodging, camping, recreation, and other tourist activities.

(3)(a) Scenic bikeways may be comprised of bicycle paths, multiple-use trails, highways, or trail facilities managed by the commission.

(b)(i) Scenic bikeways may be located over public lands with the consent of each federal, state, or local governmental entity that has jurisdiction over the public lands or through which a proposed route passes.

(ii) Scenic bikeways may be located over privately owned lands with the consent of the private landowner.

(4) Prior to designating a scenic bikeway, the commission must review the proposed designation in consultation with the department of transportation and confirm the designated bicycle route:

(a) Is of notable scenic, recreational, cultural, or historic value, or some combination thereof;

(b) Is consented to as required under subsection (3) of this section; and

(c) To the extent feasible and consistent with the goals of this section:

(i) Is not located on heavily trafficked roads when less-trafficked roads are available as a suitable alternative;

(ii) Is not located on highways without shoulders or bike lanes when highways with shoulders or bike lanes are available as a suitable alternative;

(iii) Avoids complex intersections or other locations that would reduce the ease of use of the scenic bikeway by users;

(iv) Is colocated with locally developed bicycle-supportive infrastructure, including bike lanes, multiuse trails, greenways, or other designated bicycle routes; and

(v) Is designed to minimize adverse effects on adjacent landowners.

(5) To the extent that funds available for the development of scenic bikeways limit the number of designated scenic bikeways that the commission is able to approve and implement each biennium, the commission must give priority to the designation and implementation of scenic bikeways that will add variety to the geographic location, topography, route length and difficulty, and cultural, historic, scenic, and recreational value of the statewide scenic bikeway system or that will complete existing bicycling networks.

(6) The commission must periodically review designated scenic bikeways to ensure that routes continue to meet the criteria of subsection (4) of this section. Upon review, the commission may alter the route or revoke the designation of a scenic bikeway.

(7)(a) In consultation with the department of transportation, the commission must develop signage to be placed along the routes of each designated scenic bikeway.

(b) On the commission's web site, the commission must promote the use of designated scenic bikeways.

(c) The commission may develop promotional materials, including maps or telecommunications applications for purposes of facilitating public use of designed scenic bikeways. Promotional materials created by the commission must indicate whether the bikeway is paved or gravel and any other conditions of the bikeway that affect the safety of users. Consistent with the standards of RCW 79A.05.087, the commission may encourage local economic development in proximity to designated scenic bikeways in the promotional materials by noting opportunities for bicycle repair, food, lodging, camping, recreation, and other tourist activities.

(d) The commission must evaluate each designated scenic bikeway to determine whether the bikeway, or a portion thereof, is suitable for the use of electric bicycles and tricycles. If the commission determines that a designated scenic bikeway, or a portion thereof, is suitable for the use of electric bicycles and tricycles, the commission must allow their use on those bikeways or portions of bikeways.

(8) A recreational access pass issued under chapter 79A.80 RCW is not required in order to use a designated scenic bikeway, except that the access pass requirements of chapter 79A.80 RCW apply to motor vehicles used to park or operate on any portion of a scenic bikeway located on a recreational site or lands, as that term is defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

(9) The designation of a facility or roadway as a scenic bikeway by the commission does not change the liability of the commission or any other state or local government entity with respect to unintentional injury sustained by a user of a scenic bikeway. Nothing in this subsection applies or limits the applicability of the provisions of RCW 4.24.210 to roads or facilities designated as scenic bikeways.

(10) Nothing in this section authorizes the commission to acquire property or property rights solely for purposes of development of a scenic bikeway.

(11) The commission may enter into sponsorship agreements with nonprofit entities or private businesses or entities for sponsorship signs to be displayed on designated scenic bikeways or portions of designated scenic bikeways. The commission may establish the cost for entering into a sponsor agreement. Sponsorship agreements must comply with (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(a) Space for a sponsorship sign may be provided by the commission on a designated scenic bikeway.

(b) Signage erected pursuant to a sponsorship agreement must be consistent with criteria established by the commission relating to size, materials, colors, wording, and location.

(c) The nonprofit entity or private business or entity must pay all costs of a display, including development, construction, installation, operation, maintenance, and removal costs.

(d) Proceeds from the sponsorship agreements must be used to fund commission activities related to the scenic bikeways program. Any surplus funds resulting from sponsorship agreements must be deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship account under RCW 79A.05.215.

(12) The commission may adopt rules to administer the scenic bikeways program.

--- END ---