BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 74.26.010 (Legislative intent) and 1980 c 106 s 1;

(2) RCW 74.26.020 (Eligibility criteria) and 1980 c 106 s 2;

(3) RCW 74.26.030 (Program plan for services—Local agency support) and 1980 c 106 s 3;

(4) RCW 74.26.040 (Administrative responsibility—Regulations) and 1980 c 106 s 4;

(5) RCW 74.26.050 (Contracts for services—Supervision) and 1980 c 106 s 5; and

(6) RCW 74.26.060 (Program costs—Liability of insurers) and 1980 c 106 s 6.

--- END ---