BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of ecology shall convene a work group of affected entities to study the design and use of the state water trust, water banking and water transfers, and tools to protect instream water rights from neighboring states and make recommendations on policy improvements. The department of ecology shall invite representatives to serve on the work group from organizations including, but not limited to:

(a) Federally recognized Indian tribes;

(b) Local governments;

(c) Environmental advocacy organizations;

(d) The farming industry in Washington;

(e) Business interests; and

(f) Entities that have been directly involved with the establishment of water banks.

(2) In addition to an invitation to participate on the work group, the department of ecology shall also consult with affected tribal governments upon request.

(3) By August 1, 2020, the department of ecology shall present findings and policy recommendations to the joint legislative task force on water resource mitigation and the governor's office.

--- END ---