BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for all taxes paid during the calendar year on interest received by financial institutions for loans issued for affordable housing projects.

(2) A person claiming the credit under this section is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second calendar year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(3) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2020.

--- END ---