BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A work group is established to create a family engagement framework for early learning through high school.

(2) At a minimum, the work group must review family engagement policies and practices in Washington and in other states, with a focus on identifying best practices that can be adopted throughout Washington.

(3)(a) The members of the work group must represent the following groups: The department of children, youth, and families; the office of the superintendent of public instruction; the state board of education; parents of children in the state early childhood education and assistance program or the federal head start program; parents of students in elementary or secondary school; parents of students who are English learners, with at least one parent with a student in preschool and at least one parent with a student in elementary or secondary school; parents of students who are in special education; parents of students in foster care; the office of the education ombuds; the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; the state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state commission on Hispanic affairs; the state commission on African American affairs; the governor's office of Indian affairs; the Washington state school directors' association; a state organization of school principals; a state organization of teachers; early childhood teachers; elementary and postsecondary teachers; and a state organization representing school counselors.

(b) The members of the work group must elect cochairs. One of the cochairs must be a parent and the other cochair must represent a state agency.

(4) The work group must meet monthly.

(5) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families.

(6) Members are not entitled to be reimbursed for meal or travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) By November 1, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a summary of the activities of the work group and its recommendations for a family engagement framework for early learning through high school.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2022.

--- END ---