BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that:

(a) Insulin is a life-saving drug and is critical to the management of diabetes as it helps patients control their blood sugar levels;

(b) According to Yale researchers, one-quarter of patients with Type 1 or 2 diabetes have reported using less insulin than prescribed due to the high cost of insulin;

(c) The first insulin patent in the United States was awarded in 1923 and the first synthetic insulin arrived on the market in 1978; and

(d) The price and utilization of insulin has steadily increased, making it one of the costliest prescription drugs in the state. According to the Washington all-payer claims database, the allowable costs before rebates for health carriers in the state have increased eighty-seven percent since 2014, and per member out-of-pocket costs have increased an average of eighteen percent over the same time period.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to review, consider, and pursue several strategies with the goal of reducing the cost of insulin in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The total cost of insulin work group is established. The work group membership must consist of the insurance commissioner or designee and the following members appointed by the governor:

(a) A representative from the prescription drug purchasing consortium described in RCW 70.14.060;

(b) A representative from the pharmacy quality assurance commission;

(c) A representative from an association representing independent pharmacies;

(d) A representative from an association representing chain pharmacies;

(e) A representative from each health carrier offering at least one health plan in a commercial market in the state;

(f) A representative from each health carrier offering at least one health plan to state or public school employees in the state;

(g) A representative from an association representing health carriers;

(h) A representative from the public employees' benefits board or the school employees' benefits board;

(i) A representative from the health care authority;

(j) A representative from a pharmacy benefit manager that contracts with state purchasers;

(k) A representative from a drug distributor or wholesaler that distributes or sells insulin in the state;

(l) A representative from a state agency that purchases health care services and drugs for a selected population; and

(m) A representative from the attorney general's office with expertise in prescription drug purchasing.

(2) The work group must review and design strategies to reduce the cost of and total expenditures on insulin in this state. Strategies the work group must consider include, but are not limited to, a state agency becoming a licensed drug wholesaler, a state agency becoming a registered pharmacy benefit manager, and a state agency purchasing prescription drugs on behalf of the state directly from other states or in coordination with other states.

(3) Staff support for the work group shall be provided by the health care authority.

(4) By December 1, 2020, the work group must submit a preliminary report detailing strategies to reduce the cost of and total expenditures on insulin for patients, health carriers, payers, and the state. The work group must submit a final report by July 1, 2021, to the governor and the legislature. The final report must include any statutory changes necessary to implement the strategies.

(5) This section expires December 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to implement strategies recommended by the total cost of insulin work group established in section 2 of this act, the health care authority may:

(a) Become or designate a state agency that shall become a drug wholesaler licensed under RCW 18.64.046;

(b) Become or designate a state agency that shall become a pharmacy benefit manager registered under RCW 19.340.030; or

(c) Purchase prescription drugs on behalf of the state directly from other states or in coordination with other states.

(2) In addition to the authorities granted in subsection (1) of this section, if the total cost of insulin work group established in section 2 of this act determines that all or a portion of the strategies may be implemented without statutory changes, the health care authority and the prescription drug purchasing consortium described in RCW 70.14.060 shall begin implementation without further legislative direction.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.14.060 and 2009 c 560 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The administrator of the state health care authority shall, directly or by contract, adopt policies necessary for establishment of a prescription drug purchasing consortium. The consortium's purchasing activities shall be based upon the evidence-based prescription drug program established under RCW 70.14.050. State purchased health care programs as defined in RCW 41.05.011 shall purchase prescription drugs through the consortium for those prescription drugs that are purchased directly by the state and those that are purchased through reimbursement of pharmacies, unless exempted under ((this section))(b) of this subsection. The administrator shall not require any supplemental rebate offered to the ((department of social and health services))health care authority by a pharmaceutical manufacturer for prescription drugs purchased for medical assistance program clients under chapter 74.09 RCW be extended to any other state purchased health care program, or to any other individuals or entities participating in the consortium. The administrator shall explore joint purchasing opportunities with other states.

(b) State purchased health care programs are exempt from the requirements of this section if they can demonstrate to the administrator of the state health care authority that, as a result of the availability of federal programs or other purchasing arrangements, their other purchasing mechanisms will result in greater discounts and aggregate cost savings than would be realized through participation in the consortium.

(2) Participation in the purchasing consortium shall be offered as an option beginning January 1, 2006. Participation in the consortium is purely voluntary for units of local government, private entities, labor organizations, health carriers as provided in RCW 48.43.005, state purchased health care services from or through health carriers as provided in RCW 48.43.005, and for individuals who lack or are underinsured for prescription drug coverage. The administrator may set reasonable fees, including enrollment fees, to cover administrative costs attributable to participation in the prescription drug consortium.

(3) ((This section does not apply to state purchased health care services that are purchased from or through health carriers as defined in RCW 48.43.005, or group model health maintenance organizations that are accredited by the national committee for quality assurance.

(4))) The state health care authority is authorized to adopt rules implementing chapter 129, Laws of 2005.

(((5) State purchased health care programs are exempt from the requirements of this section if they can demonstrate to the administrator that, as a result of the availability of federal programs or other purchasing arrangements, their other purchasing mechanisms will result in greater discounts and aggregate cost savings than would be realized through participation in the consortium.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, a health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes must cap the total amount that an enrollee is required to pay for a covered insulin drug at an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per thirty-day supply of the drug. Prescription insulin drugs must be covered without being subject to a deductible, and any cost sharing paid by an enrollee must be applied toward the enrollee's deductible obligation.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service removes insulin from the list of preventive care services which can be covered by a qualifying health plan for a health savings account before the deductible is satisfied, for a health plan that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the carrier must establish the plan's cost sharing for the coverage of prescription insulin for diabetes at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions from his or her health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations. The office of the insurance commissioner must provide written notice of the change in internal revenue service guidance to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, a health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is issued or renewed by the board on or after January 1, 2021, that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes must cap the total amount that an enrollee is required to pay for a covered insulin drug at an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per thirty-day supply of the drug. Prescription insulin drugs must be covered without being subject to a deductible, and any cost sharing paid by an enrollee must be applied toward the enrollee's deductible obligation.

(2) If the federal internal revenue service removes insulin from the list of preventive care services which can be covered by a qualifying health plan for a health savings account before the deductible is satisfied, for a health plan that provides coverage for prescription insulin drugs for the treatment of diabetes and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the carrier must establish the plan's cost sharing for the coverage of prescription insulin for diabetes at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions from his or her health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations. The office of the insurance commissioner must provide written notice of the change in internal revenue service guidance to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office.

(3) The authority must monitor the wholesale acquisition cost of all insulin products sold in the state.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2023.

Sec. 7. RCW 48.20.391 and 1997 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All disability insurance contracts providing health care services, delivered or issued for delivery in this state and issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For disability insurance contracts that include pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all disability insurance contracts providing health care services, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the insurer from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the insurer or an insuring entity under contract with the insurer.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 5 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The insurer need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plan that provides benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan, as required by RCW 48.20.028.

Sec. 8. RCW 48.21.143 and 2004 c 244 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts providing health care services, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts providing health care services, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the insurer from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the insurer or an insuring entity under contract with the insurer.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 5 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The insurer need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plan that provides benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

Sec. 9. RCW 48.44.315 and 2004 c 244 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All health benefit plans offered by health care service contractors, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the health care services contractor from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the health care services contractor or an insuring entity under contract with the health care services contractor.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 5 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The health care service contractor need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

Sec. 10. RCW 48.46.272 and 2004 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that diabetes imposes a significant health risk and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted standards of care for diabetes, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the short and long-term complications of diabetes and its attendant costs.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Person with diabetes" means a person diagnosed by a health care provider as having insulin using diabetes, noninsulin using diabetes, or elevated blood glucose levels induced by pregnancy; and

(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance organizations, issued or renewed after January 1, 1998, shall provide benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons with diabetes:

(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not limited to insulin, syringes, injection aids, blood glucose monitors, test strips for blood glucose monitors, visual reading and urine test strips, insulin pumps and accessories to the pumps, insulin infusion devices, prescriptive oral agents for controlling blood sugar levels, foot care appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes, and glucagon emergency kits; and

(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy, as ordered by the health care provider. Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education may be provided only by health care providers with expertise in diabetes. Nothing in this section prevents the health maintenance organization from restricting patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed participating provider agreements with the health maintenance organization or an insuring entity under contract with the health maintenance organization.

(3) ((Coverage))Except as provided in section 5 of this act, coverage required under this section may be subject to customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar services or supplies within a policy.

(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to this section.

(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her designee, subject to any referral and formulary requirements.

(6) The health maintenance organization need not include the coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this section.

(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the basic health plan.

--- END ---