BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09A.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 119 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The authority shall provide routine and periodic computerized information to))Health insurers ((regarding client eligibility and coverage information. Health insurers))shall share all beneficiary eligibility and coverage information with the authority for the purpose of identifying joint beneficiaries. The authority shall use this information to identify joint beneficiaries. ((Identification of joint beneficiaries shall be transmitted to the authority.)) The authority shall use this information to improve accuracy and currency of health insurance coverage and to promote improved coordination of benefits.

(2) To the maximum extent possible, necessary data elements and a compatible database shall be developed by affected health insurers and the authority. The authority shall establish a representative group of health insurers and state agency representatives to develop necessary technical and file specifications to promote a standardized database. The database shall include elements essential to the authority and its population's health insurance coverage information.

(3) If the state and health insurers enter into other agreements regarding the use of common computer standards, the database identified in this section shall be replaced by the new common computer standards.

(4) The information provided will be of sufficient detail to promote reliable and accurate benefit coordination and identification of individuals who are also eligible for authority programs.

(5) The frequency of updates will be mutually agreed to by each health insurer and the authority based on frequency of change and operational limitations. ((In no event shall the computerized data be provided less than semiannually.))

(6) The health insurers and the authority shall safeguard and properly use the information to protect records as provided by law, including but not limited to chapters 42.48, 74.09, 74.04, 70.02, and 42.56 RCW, and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a and 42 C.F.R. Sec. 43 et seq. The purpose of this exchange of information is to improve coordination and administration of benefits and ensure that medical insurance benefits are properly utilized.

(7) The authority shall target implementation of this section to those health insurers with the highest probability of joint beneficiaries.

--- END ---