BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The staff within the center for the improvement of student learning, established in RCW 28A.300.130 within the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must create a plan for the development of a statewide multitiered system of supports infrastructure that assists public schools in developing local integrated student supports that provide all students with equitable access to a high-quality public education.

(2) The plan must include, at a minimum the following elements:

(a) Advance the purposes of the Washington integrated student supports protocol described in RCW 28A.300.139;

(b) Identify and define essential components of a multitiered system of supports;

(c) Identify and define essential components of a continuum of integrated student supports;

(d) Define the role of and set expectations for the office of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service districts, school districts, and public schools in the development and implementation of the infrastructure and the delivery of student supports;

(e) Specify a timeline for the implementation of elements of the infrastructure;

(f) Contain a proposal for the development and implementation of a data system for the collection and management of system and student data; and

(g) Recommend a continuous improvement process that includes professional learning, coaching, and periodic performance evaluations practices.

(3) Before constructing the preliminary plan, staff within the center must:

(a) Review the features of integrated systems of student support and multitiered systems of student support and the policies and practices established in other states to promote these systems; and

(b) Examine the intersectionality between the infrastructure plan created under this section and other student support policies and programs that exist in Washington.

(4) Staff within the center must receive and consider public feedback on the preliminary plan before drafting the final plan.

(5) The center must submit to the superintendent of public instruction and the appropriate committees of the legislature a preliminary plan by November 1, 2020, and a final plan by November 1, 2021. Both plans must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(6) This section expires November 1, 2022.

--- END ---