BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of crime victims advocacy shall administer a competitive grant program for community sexual assault programs, as defined in RCW 70.125.030, to provide group counseling in common schools, as defined in RCW 28A.150.020, for youth survivors of sexual assault.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to administer the grant program, including for the application review and selection process, disbursement of the grant awards to selected applicants, and tracking compliance and proper use of funds. To qualify for a grant under this section, an applicant must: Be a community sexual assault program accredited and contracted through the office of crime victims advocacy; have prior experience providing group counseling to youth; and have established or be willing to establish committed partnerships with one or more common schools. Grant funds must be used for providing group counseling in one or more common schools for youth survivors of sexual assault. The office of crime victims advocacy shall award grants on an annual basis.

(3) Grant awards under this section are supplemental to other funding provided to a community sexual assault program through other programs administered by the office of crime victims advocacy including, but not limited to, funding governed by the formula under RCW 43.280.020(3).

(4) The office of crime victims advocacy shall submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the grant program, including a summary of selected grant recipients, schools served, and services provided, by December 1st of each year.

--- END ---