BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall allow a person age sixty-five or over to harvest either an antlerless mule deer or antlerless white-tailed deer during the modern firearm general white-tailed buck season in all game management units east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

--- END ---