BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of health shall establish a work group on school-based health centers. The department shall appoint to the work group one representative of each of the following:

(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(b) The department of health;

(c) The health care authority;

(d) The department of children, youth, and families;

(e) The Washington health benefit exchange;

(f) The office of the insurance commissioner;

(g) Tribal educational and health agencies;

(h) The Washington school-based health alliance;

(i) The Washington association for community health;

(j) The Washington chapter of the American academy of pediatrics;

(k) The Washington state school directors' association;

(l) The Washington association of school administrators;

(m) The Washington education association;

(n) The school nurse organization of Washington;

(o) The Washington school counselor association;

(p) The Washington association of school social workers;

(q) The Washington state association of school psychologists;

(r) The Washington association of educational service districts;

(s) Kaiser Permanente thriving schools;

(t) The Washington state hospital association;

(u) Accountable communities of health;

(v) Medicaid managed care organizations;

(w) Private health insurers;

(x) Local health jurisdictions;

(y) Communities in schools;

(z) The Washington state parent teacher association; and

(aa) A school district risk management pool.

(2) The work group shall:

(a) Assess different models currently used for establishing, operating, and funding school-based health centers; and

(b) Make recommendations for:

(i) A statewide definition and model options for school-based health centers;

(ii) Ways to address barriers to replication and sustainability statewide for school-based health centers; and

(iii) Statewide funding for school-based health centers.

(3) The work group must meet at least four times and report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2020.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2021.

--- END ---