BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, public schools must annually report information about each diagnosed concussion sustained by a student during athletic and other activities using a procedure developed by the department of health under section 2 of this act.

(2) At a minimum, the following information must be reported: Student's grade and gender, whether the student had a previous concussion, the event date and location of the diagnosed concussion, the type and level of activity that the student was participating in at the time of the event, whether it was a practice or competition, any known cause of the event, when during the activity the injury occurred, whether protective equipment was worn on the injured student's head at the time of the event, the type of surface on which the event occurred, who initially examined the student at the time of the event, whether the student was removed from the activity at the time of the event, and follow-up information related to whether the student was given a written authorization to return to the activity by the end of the season in which the event occurred and the amount of time before the student was authorized to return to the learning environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must develop a procedure to, beginning in the 2020-21 school year, collect the information related to the diagnosed concussions of students as described in section 1 of this act.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2021, by October 1st annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall report a summary of the diagnosed concussion information received in the prior school year to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The report must include rates, patterns, trends, and other relevant information.

--- END ---