BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the caseload forecast council is charged with forecasting the entitlement caseloads for the state of Washington. The council adopts official and courtesy forecasts which help identify the number of people who are eligible for certain services that are necessary in supporting our state's most vulnerable citizens. These services include public assistance programs, state corrections, early childhood education and assistance, public schools, long-term care, medicaid, and foster care. The majority of the services the state provides for individuals with development disabilities are neither caseload forecasted nor entitlements. The legislature intends to significantly reduce the number of eligible individuals who are waiting to receive services by forecasting developmental disability services as entitlements.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2019 c 406 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, developmental disabilities, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college grant program under RCW 28B.92.200 and 28B.92.205 and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and

(d) The number of children who are eligible, as defined in RCW 43.216.505, to participate in, and the number of children actually served by, the early childhood education and assistance program.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(10) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of youth expected to receive behavioral rehabilitation services while involved in the foster care system and the number of screened in reports of child abuse or neglect.

(11) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2020, a client with a qualifying developmental disability who is not receiving a paid service shall receive case resource management services. The department shall provide one case resource manager for every five hundred clients receiving no paid services. The case resource manager's duties include, but are not limited to:

(a) Contacting and responding to the client to discuss the client's service needs;

(b) Explaining to the client the service options available through the department or other community resources; and

(c) Assisting the client with accessing services.

(2) In the event the caseload of those not receiving a paid service decreases to the point that there are additional case resource managers beyond the number required to maintain a caseload of five hundred clients for each case resource manager, the department shall transfer these additional case resource managers to provide other case management services within the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2020, an eligible person is entitled to the medicaid state plan or waiver services provided under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW 71A.18.020 (Services provided if funds available) and 1988 c 176 s 601 are each repealed.

--- END ---