BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) By December 1, 2020, the department of health shall submit to the legislature a report that summarizes the available treatments for pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and the treatments' effectiveness. The report must include:

(a) A description of the disease and its symptoms; and

(b) A summary of the effectiveness of treating pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections using any standard, experimental, or emerging therapies, including:

(i) Antibiotics;

(ii) Plasma exchanges;

(iii) Intravenous immunoglobulin; and

(iv) Tonsillectomy.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2021.

--- END ---