BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

By July 1, 2021, the board, in consultation with the department, shall adopt rules to establish supervision and delegation requirements for a naturopath licensed under this chapter to supervise and delegate to a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW to deliver colon hydrotherapy in a manner that is consistent with all current standards for public safety.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.360.010 and 2017 c 336 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administer" means the retrieval of medication, and its application to a patient, as authorized in RCW 18.360.050.

(2) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of practice of the health care provider and the training and experience of the medical assistant.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Forensic phlebotomist" means a police officer, law enforcement officer, or employee of a correctional facility or detention facility, who is certified under this chapter and meets any additional training and proficiency standards of his or her employer to collect a venous blood sample for forensic testing pursuant to a search warrant, a waiver of the warrant requirement, or exigent circumstances.

(5) "Health care practitioner" means:

(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;

(b) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or

(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, or an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW.

(6) "Medical assistant-certified" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.

(7) "Medical assistant-hemodialysis technician" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs hemodialysis and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.

(8) "Medical assistant-phlebotomist" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs capillary, venous, and arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.

(9) "Medical assistant-registered" means a person registered under RCW 18.360.040 who, pursuant to an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice, assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(11) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is physically present and is immediately available in the facility. The health care practitioner does not need to be present during procedures to withdraw blood, but must be immediately available. A supervising naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW does not need to be physically present during the performance of colon hydrotherapy by a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist but must be available within a reasonable period of time in person, by telephone, or through telemedicine.

(12) "Medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs colon hydrotherapy upon delegation from and supervision by a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW.

(13) "Colon hydrotherapy" means the performance of enemas or colonic irrigation.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.360.020 and 2017 c 336 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 18.360.090:

(1) No person may practice as a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, medical assistant-phlebotomist, ((or)) forensic phlebotomist, or medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist, unless he or she is certified under RCW 18.360.040.

(2) No person may practice as a medical assistant-registered unless he or she is registered under RCW 18.360.040.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.360.030 and 2019 c 55 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall adopt rules specifying the minimum qualifications for a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, medical assistant-phlebotomist, ((and)) forensic phlebotomist, and medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist.

(a) The qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician must be equivalent to the qualifications for hemodialysis technicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.135 RCW as of January 1, 2012.

(b) The qualifications for a forensic phlebotomist must include training consistent with the occupational safety and health administration guidelines and must include between twenty and thirty hours of work in a clinical setting with the completion of more than one hundred successful venipunctures. The secretary may not require more than forty hours of classroom training for initial training, which may include online preclass homework.

(c) The qualifications for a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist must be developed in consultation with the board of naturopathy and include training and competency requirements.

(2) The secretary shall adopt rules that establish the minimum requirements necessary for a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice to endorse a medical assistant as qualified to perform the duties authorized by this chapter and be able to file an attestation of that endorsement with the department.

(3) The Washington medical commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, the podiatric medical board, the nursing care quality assurance commission, the board of naturopathy, and the optometry board shall each review and identify other specialty assistive personnel not included in this chapter and the tasks they perform. The department of health shall compile the information from each disciplining authority listed in this subsection and submit the compiled information to the legislature no later than December 15, 2012.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.360.040 and 2017 c 336 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-certified to any person who has satisfactorily completed a medical assistant training program approved by the secretary, passed an examination approved by the secretary, and met any additional qualifications established under RCW 18.360.030.

(b) The secretary shall issue an interim certification to any person who has met all of the qualifications in (a) of this subsection, except for the passage of the examination. A person holding an interim permit possesses the full scope of practice of a medical assistant-certified. The interim permit expires upon passage of the examination or after one year, whichever occurs first, and may not be renewed.

(2) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician to any person who meets the qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician established under RCW 18.360.030.

(3) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-phlebotomist to any person who meets the qualifications for a medical assistant-phlebotomist established under RCW 18.360.030.

(4) The secretary shall issue a certification as a forensic phlebotomist to any person who meets the qualifications for a forensic phlebotomist established under RCW 18.360.030.

(5) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist to any person who meets the training and competency requirements established under RCW 18.360.030.

(6)(a) The secretary shall issue a registration as a medical assistant-registered to any person who has a current endorsement from a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.

(b) In order to be endorsed under this subsection (((5)))(6), a person must:

(i) Be endorsed by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice that meets the qualifications established under RCW 18.360.030; and

(ii) Have a current attestation of his or her endorsement to perform specific medical tasks signed by a supervising health care practitioner filed with the department. A medical assistant-registered may only perform the medical tasks listed in his or her current attestation of endorsement.

(c) A registration based on an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice is not transferable to another health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.

(d) An applicant for registration as a medical assistant-registered who applies to the department within seven days of employment by the endorsing health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice may work as a medical assistant-registered for up to sixty days while the application is processed. The applicant must stop working on the sixtieth day of employment if the registration has not been granted for any reason.

(((6)))(7) A certification issued under subsections (1) through (3) and (5) of this section is transferable between different practice settings. A certification under subsection (4) of this section is transferable between law enforcement agencies.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.360.050 and 2014 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A medical assistant-certified may perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:

(a) Fundamental procedures:

(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;

(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;

(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and

(iv) Practicing standard precautions.

(b) Clinical procedures:

(i) Performing aseptic procedures in a setting other than a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;

(ii) Preparing of and assisting in sterile procedures in a setting other than a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW;

(iii) Taking vital signs;

(iv) Preparing patients for examination;

(v) Capillary blood withdrawal, venipuncture, and intradermal, subcutaneous, and intramuscular injections; and

(vi) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.

(c) Specimen collection:

(i) Capillary puncture and venipuncture;

(ii) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and

(iii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and fecal specimens.

(d) Diagnostic testing:

(i) Electrocardiography;

(ii) Respiratory testing; and

(iii)(A) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under this subsection (1)(d) based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program; and

(B) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-certified meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.

(e) Patient care:

(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;

(ii) Obtaining vital signs;

(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;

(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;

(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office surgeries;

(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and

(vii) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a health care practitioner.

(f)(i) Administering medications. A medical assistant-certified may only administer medications if the drugs are:

(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage calculated and verified by a health care practitioner. For purposes of this section, a combination or multidose vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;

(B) Limited to legend drugs, vaccines, and Schedule III-V controlled substances as authorized by a health care practitioner under the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by the secretary under (f)(ii) of this subsection; and

(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care practitioner.

(ii) A medical assistant-certified may not administer experimental drugs or chemotherapy agents. The secretary may, by rule, further limit the drugs that may be administered under this subsection (1)(f). The rules adopted under this subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.

(g) Intravenous injections. A medical assistant-certified may administer intravenous injections for diagnostic or therapeutic agents under the direct visual supervision of a health care practitioner if the medical assistant-certified meets minimum standards established by the secretary in rule. The minimum standards must be substantially similar to the qualifications for category D and F health care assistants as they exist on July 1, 2013.

(h) Urethral catheterization when appropriately trained.

(2) A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may perform hemodialysis when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner. A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may also administer drugs and oxygen to a patient when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.

(3) A medical assistant-phlebotomist may perform:

(a) Capillary, venous, or arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary;

(b) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under this section based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program;

(c) Moderate and high complexity tests if the medical assistant-phlebotomist meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing; and

(d) Electrocardiograms.

(4) A medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist may perform colon hydrotherapy upon delegation from and supervision by a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW.

(5) A medical assistant-registered may perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:

(a) Fundamental procedures:

(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;

(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;

(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and

(iv) Practicing standard precautions.

(b) Clinical procedures:

(i) Preparing for sterile procedures;

(ii) Taking vital signs;

(iii) Preparing patients for examination; and

(iv) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.

(c) Specimen collection:

(i) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and

(ii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and fecal specimens.

(d) Patient care:

(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;

(ii) Obtaining vital signs;

(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;

(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;

(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office surgeries utilizing no more than local anesthetic. The department may, by rule, prohibit duties authorized under this subsection (((4)))(5)(d)(v) if performance of those duties by a medical assistant-registered would pose an unreasonable risk to patient safety;

(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and

(vii) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a health care practitioner.

(e)(i) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under subsection (1)(d) of this section based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program.

(ii) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-registered meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.

(f) Administering eye drops, topical ointments, and vaccines, including combination or multidose vaccines.

(g) Urethral catheterization when appropriately trained.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.360.060 and 2013 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Prior to delegation of any of the functions in RCW 18.360.050 other than the functions of a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist, a health care practitioner shall determine to the best of his or her ability each of the following:

(((a)))(i) That the task is within that health care practitioner's scope of licensure or authority;

(((b)))(ii) That the task is indicated for the patient;

(((c)))(iii) The appropriate level of supervision;

(((d)))(iv) That no law prohibits the delegation;

(((e)))(v) That the person to whom the task will be delegated is competent to perform that task; and

(((f)))(vi) That the task itself is one that should be appropriately delegated when considering the following factors:

(((i)))(A) That the task can be performed without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;

(((ii)))(B) That results of the task are reasonably predictable;

(((iii)))(C) That the task can be performed without a need for complex observations or critical decisions;

(((iv)))(D) That the task can be performed without repeated clinical assessments; and

(((v)(A)))(E)(I) For a medical assistant other than a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, would not present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient; and

(((B)))(II) For a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, is not likely to present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient.

(((2)))(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of protocols that do not involve clinical judgment and do not involve the administration of medications, other than vaccines.

(2)(a) A naturopath may delegate the application of colon hydrotherapy to a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist if:

(i) The supervising naturopath conducts a patient evaluation and diagnosis prior to referring a patient to the medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist for the application of colon hydrotherapy and adopts a plan for patient monitoring;

(ii) The medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist has liability coverage for the colon hydrotherapy; and

(iii) The medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist has a written emergency protocol to address urgent needs that may occur as a result of the colon hydrotherapy.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (2), colon hydrotherapy may be performed by a medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist at a facility other than the supervising naturopath's office.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.360.090 and 2012 c 153 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter prohibits or affects:

(1) A person licensed under this title performing services within his or her scope of practice;

(2) A person performing functions in the discharge of official duties on behalf of the United States government including, but not limited to, the armed forces, coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs;

(3) A person trained by a federally approved end-stage renal disease facility who performs end-stage renal dialysis in the home setting;

(4) A person registered or certified under this chapter from performing blood-drawing procedures in the residences of research study participants when the procedures have been authorized by the institutional review board of a comprehensive cancer center or nonprofit degree-granting institution of higher education and are conducted under the general supervision of a physician; ((or))

(5) A person participating in an externship as part of an approved medical assistant training program under the direct supervision of an on-site health care provider; or

(6) A person practicing colon hydrotherapy for compensation if he or she was practicing colon hydrotherapy for compensation on the effective date of this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.130.040 and 2019 c 444 s 11, 2019 c 308 s 18, and 2019 c 55 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(iv) Massage therapists and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vi) Acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;

(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates—advanced, and social work associates—independent clinical under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xiv) Substance use disorder professionals, substance use disorder professional trainees, or co-occurring disorder specialists certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xvii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;

(xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;

(xix) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;

(xx) Animal massage therapists certified under chapter 18.240 RCW;

(xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;

(xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW;

(xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW;

(xxiv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, medical assistant-colon hydrotherapist, forensic phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW; and

(xxvi) Behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, and behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW, licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;

(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The Washington medical commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;

(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW;

(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW; and

(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses. The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to conditions.

(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 8 of this act expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 2, 3, 5 through 7, and 9 of this act take effect July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1, 4, and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---