BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The attorney general shall convene an advisory council to advise the legislature on how to use penalties received by the state as a result of litigation in which the state is a party against an opioid manufacturer or distributor relating to acts or omissions by the manufacturer or distributor that contributed to increased rates of opioid addiction in Washington.

(2) The advisory council must consist of one member appointed by the attorney general to represent each of the following:

(a) The pharmacy quality assurance commission;

(b) A statewide organization representing physicians;

(c) Substance use disorder professionals, opioid treatment programs, or sober living programs;

(d) A statewide organization representing providers of addiction medicine. The member appointed under this subsection (2)(d) must be an addiction psychiatrist;

(e) Providers of alternative pain management therapies, including acupuncture, chiropractic, or massage therapy;

(f) Nonprofit organizations conducting initiatives to address the opioid epidemic;

(g) A statewide organization representing ambulances. The member appointed under this subsection (2)(g) must be an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or a paramedic;

(h) State courts. The member appointed under this subsection (2)(h) must be a judge or a law enforcement officer;

(i) Individuals in opioid addiction recovery;

(j) Individuals suffering from chronic pain, intractable pain, or rare diseases or conditions;

(k) Individuals with mental illness;

(l) A statewide organization representing hospitals;

(m) Local health jurisdictions;

(n) Behavioral health administrative services organizations;

(o) A statewide organization representing nurses;

(p) Children of addicted parents;

(q) Boys and girls clubs;

(r) The association of Washington cities;

(s) The Washington state association of counties;

(t) A statewide substance abuse prevention organization; and

(u) Any other individuals or groups affected directly or indirectly by the opioid epidemic.

(3) In addition to the members appointed under subsection (2) of this section, the attorney general shall invite two tribal members to participate as voting members.

(4) The department of labor and industries, the department of health, the health care authority, and the department of corrections shall each appoint one nonvoting member to the advisory council.

(5) The attorney general shall convene the advisory council within thirty days of penalties being received by the state as a result of litigation in which the state is a party against an opioid manufacturer or distributor relating to acts or omissions by the manufacturer or distributor that contributed to increased rates of opioid addiction in Washington.

(6) The advisory council shall submit to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature recommendations on how the penalties received can best be utilized to prevent opioid addiction and treat victims of opioid addiction.

--- END ---