BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington residents suffering from chronic pain are unable to obtain necessary prescription medications at effective doses to treat their pain because previous opioid-related laws and rules have created a chilling effect among health care practitioners. These health care practitioners are afraid of facing discipline, losing their license to practice, and of possible civil liability if they prescribe high doses of opioids to patients with chronic pain.

Therefore, the legislature intends to end the chilling effect created by these laws to allow patients in Washington with chronic pain to receive prescription medications at levels that effectively treat their pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.22 RCW to read as follows:

No podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the board or department for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and board rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW to read as follows:

No dentist licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the commission or department of health for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and commission rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

No osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the board or department for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and board rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW to read as follows:

No osteopathic physician's assistant licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the board or department of health for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and board rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

No physician licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the commission or department of health for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and commission rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

No physician assistant licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the commission or department for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and commission rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

No advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to civil liability or disciplinary action by the commission or department for prescribing opioid drugs in excess or in violation of department and commission rules to a patient with chronic pain who has requested such a prescription and has provided written informed consent.

--- END ---