BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

All residents of the state who are legally entitled to possess firearms under state and federal law have the right to possess the following specifically identified firearms, as well as any other firearm that is permitted to be possessed under federal law:

(1) AK-47 in all forms;

(2) AK-74 in all forms;

(3) Algimec AGM-1 type semi-auto;

(4) American Arms Spectre da Semiautomatic carbine;

(5) AR15, M16, or M4 in all forms;

(6) AR 180 type semi-auto;

(7) Argentine L.S.R. semi-auto;

(8) Australian Automatic;

(9) Auto-Ordnance Thompson M1 and 1927 Semi-Automatics;

(10) Barrett .50 cal light semi-auto;

(11) Barrett .50 cal M87;

(12) Barrett .50 cal M107A1;

(13) Barrett REC7;

(14) Beretta AR70/S70 type semi-auto;

(15) Bushmaster Carbon 15;

(16) Bushmaster ACR;

(17) Bushmaster XM-15;

(18) Bushmaster MOE;

(19) Calico models M100 and M900;

(20) CETME Sporter;

(21) CIS SR 88 type semi-auto;

(22) Colt CAR 15;

(23) Daewoo K-1;

(24) Daewoo K-2;

(25) Dragunov Semi-Auto;

(26) Fabrique Nationale FAL in all forms;

(27) Fabrique Nationale F2000;

(28) Fabrique Nationale L1A1 Sporter;

(29) Fabrique Nationale M249S;

(30) Fabrique Nationale PS90;

(31) Fabrique Nationale SCAR;

(32) FAMAS .223 Semi-Auto;

(33) Galil;

(34) Heckler & Koch G3 in all forms;

(35) Heckler & Koch HK-41/91;

(36) Heckler & Koch HK-43/93;

(37) Heckler & Koch HK94A2/3;

(38) Heckler & Koch MP-5 in all forms;

(39) Heckler & Koch PSG-1;

(40) Heckler & Koch SL8;

(41) Heckler & Koch UMP;

(42) Manchester Arms Commando MK-45;

(43) Manchester Arms MK-9;

(44) SAR-4800;

(45) SIG AMT SG510 in all forms;

(46) SIG SG550 in all forms;

(47) SKS;

(48) Spectre M4;

(49) Springfield Armory BM-59;

(50) Springfield Armory G3;

(51) Springfield Armory SAR-8;

(52) Springfield Armory SAR-48;

(53) Springfield Armory SAR-3;

(54) Springfield Armory M-21 Sniper;

(55) Springfield Armory M1A;

(56) Smith & Wesson M&P 15;

(57) Sterling Mk 1;

(58) Sterling Mk 6/7;

(59) Steyr AUG;

(60) TNW M230;

(61) FAMAS F11; and

(62) Uzi 9mm carbine/rifle.

--- END ---