BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.800 and 2019 c 245 s 1 and 2019 c 46 s 5006 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any court when entering an order authorized under chapter 7.92 RCW, RCW 7.90.090, 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26B.020, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26A.470 shall, upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence, that a party has: Used, displayed, or threatened to use a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a felony, or is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040:

(a) Require that the party immediately surrender all firearms and other dangerous weapons;

(b) Require that the party immediately surrender any concealed pistol license issued under RCW 9.41.070;

(c) Prohibit the party from accessing, obtaining, or possessing any firearms or other dangerous weapons;

(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed pistol license.

(2) Any court when entering an order authorized under chapter 7.92 RCW, RCW 7.90.090, 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26B.020, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26A.470 may, upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence but not by clear and convincing evidence, that a party has: Used, displayed, or threatened to use a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a felony, or is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040:

(a) Require that the party immediately surrender all firearms and other dangerous weapons;

(b) Require that the party immediately surrender a concealed pistol license issued under RCW 9.41.070;

(c) Prohibit the party from accessing, obtaining, or possessing any firearms or other dangerous weapons;

(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed pistol license.

(3) During any period of time that the person is subject to a court order issued under chapter 7.90, 7.92, 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26A, 26.26B, or 26.50 RCW that:

(a) Was issued after a hearing of which the person received actual notice, and at which the person had an opportunity to participate;

(b) Restrains the person from harassing, stalking, or threatening an intimate partner of the person or child of the intimate partner or person, or engaging in other conduct that would place an intimate partner in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the partner or child; and

(c)(i) Includes a finding that the person represents a credible threat to the physical safety of the intimate partner or child; and

(ii) By its terms, explicitly prohibits the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the intimate partner or child that would reasonably be expected to cause bodily injury, the court shall:

(A) Require that the party immediately surrender all firearms and other dangerous weapons;

(B) Require that the party immediately surrender a concealed pistol license issued under RCW 9.41.070;

(C) Prohibit the party from accessing, obtaining, or possessing any firearms or other dangerous weapons; and

(D) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed pistol license.

(4) The court may order temporary surrender of all firearms and other dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, without notice to the other party if it finds, on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence, that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for response has elapsed.

(5) In addition to the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section, the court may enter an order requiring a party to comply with the provisions in subsection (1) of this section if it finds that the possession of a firearm or other dangerous weapon by any party presents a serious and imminent threat to public health or safety, or to the health or safety of any individual.

(6) The requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (5) of this section may be for a period of time less than the duration of the order.

(7) The court may require the party to surrender all firearms and other dangerous weapons in his or her immediate possession or control or subject to his or her immediate possession or control, and any concealed pistol license issued under RCW 9.41.070, to the local law enforcement agency. Law enforcement officers shall use law enforcement databases to assist in locating the respondent in situations where the protected person does not know where the respondent lives or where there is evidence that the respondent is trying to evade service.

(8) If the court enters a protection order, restraining order, or no-contact order that includes an order to surrender firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license under this section, the order must be served by a law enforcement officer. However, the order must be personally served upon the respondent or defendant if the order is entered in open court in the presence of the respondent or defendant. The respondent or defendant shall acknowledge receipt and service. If the respondent or defendant refuses service, an agent of the court may indicate on the record that the respondent or defendant refused service. The court shall enter the service and receipt into the record. A copy of the order and service shall be immediately transmitted to law enforcement.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.99.040 and 2019 c 367 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court in domestic violence actions:

(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;

(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;

(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location; and

(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.

(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release may prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim. The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether that person should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may issue, by telephone, a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having contact with the victim or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location.

(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and shall order the defendant to surrender, and prohibit the person from possessing, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license as required in RCW 9.41.800.

(c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible, and shall state that it may be extended as provided in subsection (3) of this section. By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts shall develop a pattern form for all no-contact orders issued under this chapter. A no-contact order issued under this chapter must substantially comply with the pattern form developed by the administrative office of the courts.

(3)(a) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a no-contact order shall be issued or extended. So long as the court finds probable cause, the court may issue or extend a no-contact order even if the defendant fails to appear at arraignment. The no-contact order shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed.

(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider all information documented in the incident report, declaration in support of probable cause, or other summary documentation of the police incident report concerning the person's possession of and access to firearms and whether law enforcement took temporary custody of firearms at the time of the arrest. The court may as a condition of release prohibit the defendant from possessing or accessing firearms and order the defendant to immediately surrender all firearms and any concealed pistol license to a law enforcement agency upon release.

(c) If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring as defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the electronic monitoring.

(4)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection (2), (3), or (7) of this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony. You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order."

(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.

(5) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if charges are not filed.

(6) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

(7) All courts shall develop policies and procedures by January 1, 2011, to grant victims a process to modify or rescind a no-contact order issued under this chapter. The administrative office of the courts shall develop a model policy to assist the courts in implementing the requirements of this subsection.

--- END ---