BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21G RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state of Washington declares that a climate emergency threatens our state, region, nation, civilization, humanity, and the natural world. Devastating effects of this emergency already impact the state and will only intensify without swift intervention, including:

(a) More intense and more frequent wildfires;

(b) Glacier loss;

(c) Flooding;

(d) Drought;

(e) Ocean acidification;

(f) Dwindling fish runs;

(g) Insect die-off;

(h) Orca and other species on the brink of extinction;

(i) Increased health impacts due to poor air quality;

(j) Extreme temperatures;

(k) Food insecurity;

(l) Water-borne illness; and

(m) The economic burdens associated with these impacts.

(2) In recognition that a climate emergency exists, and is, at root, caused by the consumption of fossil fuel energy, the governor may declare an energy emergency and use the powers specified in RCW 43.21G.040 (5) and (6) for purposes of limiting greenhouse gas emissions and building resiliency to the effects of climate change.

(3) The powers granted in this section are not subject to cessation or time limitations specified in RCW 43.21G.040 (2), (3), or (4).

(4) In the event of a declaration of an energy emergency, any proposed use of the powers specified in RCW 43.21G.040 (5) and (6) by the governor must be announced by the governor by December 1st of a calendar year. The governor does not have the authority to implement the proposed uses of the powers until the adjournment of the regular legislative session immediately following the announcement, in order to allow an opportunity for the legislature to add to, limit, or otherwise amend the proposals specified in the announcement.

--- END ---