BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.43.035 and 2019 c 442 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may adopt and amend bylaws establishing its organization and method of operation, including but not limited to meetings, maintenance of books and records, publication of reports, code of ethics, and rosters, and adoption and use of a seal.

(2) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business of the board.

(3) The ((governor))board shall appoint ((an executive))its director ((of the board. The executive director)), who must hold a valid Washington license as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.

(4) The board may employ such persons as are necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

(5) It may adopt rules reasonably necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The board shall submit to the governor periodic reports as may be required. A roster, showing the names and places of business of all registered professional engineers and land surveyors may be published for distribution, upon request, to professional engineers and land surveyors registered under this chapter and to the public.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.43.200 and 2019 c 442 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of licensing, through an interagency agreement with the board, must provide specified ((administrative staff support and associated)) technical services((, materials, and equipment)) to the board. The initial interagency agreement must be for a term of three years and may be renewed by mutual agreement between the department of licensing and the board.

--- END ---