BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The aviation division director or the aviation division director's designee shall act as the unpiloted aircraft system coordinator. As the senior state aviation official, the duties of the unpiloted aircraft system coordinator include:

(a) Assisting with unpiloted aircraft system training, certification, and continuing education for state agencies;

(b) Coordinating with local governments on state and federal unpiloted aircraft system policies, rule making, and regulations;

(c) Acting as a state level coordinator for unpiloted aircraft system operations during a governor declaration of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.210;

(d) Coordinating with the federal aviation administration and state agencies on unpiloted aircraft system safety and accident trends;

(e) Identifying and disseminating information on unpiloted aircraft system training sites;

(f) Establishing and maintaining an unpiloted aircraft system coordination web site for state and local governments;

(g) Assisting with the advancement of unpiloted aircraft systems across the state in coordination with the department of commerce and the aerospace industry;

(h) Acting as the principle advisor to the secretary on unpiloted aircraft system matters;

(i) Undertaking other unpiloted aircraft system coordination duties that are deemed appropriate by the aviation division director and the unpiloted aircraft system coordinator including, but not limited to, overseeing unpiloted aircraft system symposiums or other events for state agencies and other stakeholder groups.

(2) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.68.020 and 1993 c 208 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Aeronautics" means the science and art of flight and including, but not limited to, transportation by aircraft; the operation, construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, aircraft power plants and accessories, including the repair, packing, and maintenance of parachutes; the design, establishment, construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or air navigation facilities; and instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining thereto.

(2) "Aircraft" means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.

(3) "Airport" means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use, for the landing and take-off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or right-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.

(4) "Department" means the state department of transportation.

(5) "Secretary" means the state secretary of transportation.

(6) "State" or "this state" means the state of Washington.

(7) "Air navigation facility" means any facility, other than one owned or operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking-off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities.

(8) "Operation of aircraft" or "operate aircraft" means the use, navigation, or piloting of aircraft in the airspace over this state or upon any airport within this state.

(9) "Airman or airwoman" means any individual who engages, as the person in command, or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew in the navigation of aircraft while under way, and any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft engines, airframes, propellers, or appliances, and any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher or air-traffic control tower operator; but does not include any individual employed outside the United States, or any individual employed by a manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft engines, airframes, propellers, or appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic in connection therewith, or any individual performing inspection or mechanical duties in connection with aircraft owned or operated by the person.

(10) "Aeronautics instructor" means any individual who for hire or reward engages in giving instruction or offering to give instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, but excludes any instructor in a public school, university, or institution of higher learning duly accredited and approved for carrying on collegiate work, who instructs in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, while in the performance of his or her duties at such school, university, or institution.

(11) "Air school" means any person who advertises, represents, or holds out as giving or offering to give instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics whether for or without hire or reward; but excludes any public school, university, or institution of higher learning duly accredited and approved for carrying on collegiate work.

(12) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

(13) "Municipal" means pertaining to a municipality, and "municipality" means any county, city, town, authority, district, or other political subdivision or public corporation of this state.

(14) "Airport hazard" means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land, which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off.

(15) "State airway" means a route in the navigable airspace over and above the lands or waters of this state, designated by the department as a route suitable for air navigation.

(16) "Aviation division" means the aeronautics division of the department.

(17) "Unpiloted aircraft system" means an aircraft operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft. An unpiloted aircraft system must meet the same criteria and standards established by the federal aviation administration for an unmanned aircraft system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2021.

--- END ---