BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.34.070 and 2005 c 333 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state historical society is designated a trustee for the state whose powers and duties include but are not limited to the following:

(a) To collect, catalog, preserve, and interpret objects, manuscripts, sites, photographs, and other materials illustrative of the cultural, artistic, and natural history of this state;

(b) To operate state museums and assist and encourage cultural and historical studies and museum interpretive efforts throughout the state, including those sponsored by local historical organizations, and city, county, and state agencies;

(c) To engage in cultural, artistic, and educational activities, including classes, exhibits, seminars, workshops, and conferences if these activities are related to the basic purpose of the society;

(d) To plan for and conduct celebrations of significant events in the history of the state of Washington and to give assistance to and coordinate with state agencies, local governments, and local historical organizations in planning and conducting celebrations;

(e) To create one or more classes of membership in the society;

(f) To engage in the sale of various articles which are related to the basic purpose of the society;

(g) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of increasing the self-support of the society;

(h) To accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income therefrom except as limited by the donor's terms. The governing boards of the state historical societies shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises;

(i) To accept on loan or lend objects of historical interest, and sell, exchange, divest itself of, or refuse to accept, items which do not enhance the collection; ((and))

(j) To charge general or special admission fees to its museums or exhibits and to waive or decrease such fees as it finds appropriate; and

(k) To strengthen cultural and historical organizations statewide by providing grants at the discretion of the society in support of organizational capacity building, public programming, educational programming, outreach, collections management, and exhibitions as funding allows.

(2) All objects, sites, manuscripts, photographs, and all property, including real property, now held or hereafter acquired by the state historical societies shall be held by the societies in trust for the use and benefit of the people of Washington state.

(3) Each historical society is authorized to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the policies and purposes of this section.

--- END ---