BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills was implemented in 2012 to measure the typical skills and characteristics of kindergarten-ready children. The legislature finds that parents, guardians, and caregivers are critical in the development process of young children and need information about what these standards are in order to help their child be prepared to enter the K-12 education system. Therefore, the legislature intends to direct public agencies to publicize guidelines and to develop and make available a guide specifically designed to help parents understand the elements of child development and kindergarten-readiness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2020, the superintendent of public instruction must develop a guide for parents and caregivers outlining ways they can help their child to become socially, emotionally, physically, and cognitively prepared for kindergarten. The superintendent must review the parent guide annually and update the guidelines as needed.

(2) By July 15th of each year, the superintendent of public instruction must make the current parent guide available on its public web site in the top ten languages spoken by families enrolled in the kindergarten through twelfth grade school system. The superintendent must create an electronic brochure of the parent guide that includes the web site address where the public can access the guide in each of the top ten languages. The superintendent must provide the electronic brochure at no cost to state agencies that provide or contract for direct services for parents, caregivers of dependent children in out-of-home care, and guardians of three and four-year olds, including:

(a) The department of children, youth, and families;

(b) The department of social and health services;

(c) The department of health; and

(d) The health care authority.

(3) For purposes of this section, "out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must annually provide the parent guide developed under section 2 of this act to all known:

(a) Parents, caregivers of dependent children in out-of-home care, and guardians of three and four-year old children served by the department and the department's contractors; and

(b) Family day care providers and child day care centers licensed to serve three and four-year old children.

(2) For purposes of this section, "out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must annually provide the parent guide developed under section 2 of this act to all known parents, caregivers of dependent children in out-of-home care, and guardians of three and four-year old children eligible for and receiving public assistance, as defined in RCW 74.04.005.

(2) For purposes of this section, "out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must annually include the parent guide developed under section 2 of this act in the child profile health promotion materials that are sent to households that include three or four-year old children.

(2) For purposes of this section, "out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority must annually provide the parent guide developed under section 2 of this act to all known parents, caregivers of dependent children in out-of-home care, and guardians of three and four-year old children enrolled in the apple health for kids program.

(2) For purposes of this section, "out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.34.030.

--- END ---