BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2019 c 415 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2019-20 school year and the 2020-21 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

Staff Type

2019-20

School Year

2020-21

School Year

Certificated Instructional

$66,520

$67,917

Certificated Administrative

$98,741

$100,815

Classified

$47,720

$48,722

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((December 10, 2018))January 23, 2020, at 8:24 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 23.16 percent for school year 2019-20 and 23.16 percent for school year 2020-21 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 20.83 percent for school year 2019-20 and 20.83 percent for the 2020-21 school year for classified staff.

(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).

--- END ---