BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.09.2856 and 2019 c 410 s 4 and 2019 c 387 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning with the 2019-20 school year, to))To ensure that school district local revenues are used solely for purposes of enriching the state's statutory program of basic education, the state auditor's regular financial audits of school districts must include a review of the expenditure of school district local revenues for compliance with RCW 28A.150.276, including the spending plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.505.240 and its implementation, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200. The audit must also include a review of the expenditure schedule and supporting documentation required by RCW 28A.320.330(1)(c).

(2) If an audit under subsection (1) of this section results in findings that a school district has failed to comply with these requirements, then within ninety days of completing the audit the auditor must report the findings to the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, and the education and operating budget committees of the legislature. ((If the superintendent of public instruction receives a report of findings from the state auditor that an expenditure of a school district is out of compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.276, and the finding is not resolved in the subsequent audit, the maximum taxes levied for collection by the school district under RCW 84.52.0531 in the following calendar year shall be reduced by the expenditure amount identified by the state auditor.))

(3) The use of the state allocation provided for professional learning under RCW 28A.150.415 must be audited as part of the regular financial audits of school districts by the state auditor's office to ensure compliance with the limitations and conditions of RCW 28A.150.415.

(4)(a) The state auditor must conduct a financial or accountability audit of each school district by June 1, 2020, for the 2018-19 school year to include a review of the following:

(i) Special education revenues and the sources of those revenues, by school district; and

(ii) Special education expenditures and the object of those expenditures, by school district.

(b) Special education data reported for each school district through the audits under this subsection must be compiled and submitted to the education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2020.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.09.2856 and 2019 c 410 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning with the 2019-20 school year, to))To ensure that school district local revenues are used solely for purposes of enriching the state's statutory program of basic education, the state auditor's regular financial audits of school districts must include a review of the expenditure of school district local revenues for compliance with RCW 28A.150.276, including the spending plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.505.240 and its implementation, and any supplemental contracts entered into under RCW 28A.400.200. The audit must also include a review of the expenditure schedule and supporting documentation required by RCW 28A.320.330(1)(c).

(2) If an audit under subsection (1) of this section results in findings that a school district has failed to comply with these requirements, then within ninety days of completing the audit the auditor must report the findings to the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, and the education and operating budget committees of the legislature. ((If the superintendent of public instruction receives a report of findings from the state auditor that an expenditure of a school district is out of compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.276, and the finding is not resolved in the subsequent audit, the maximum taxes levied for collection by the school district under RCW 84.52.0531 in the following calendar year shall be reduced by the expenditure amount identified by the state auditor.))

(3) The use of the state allocation provided for professional learning under RCW 28A.150.415 must be audited as part of the regular financial audits of school districts by the state auditor's office to ensure compliance with the limitations and conditions of RCW 28A.150.415.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.52.0531 and 2019 c 410 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2020, the maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for enrichment levies under RCW 84.52.053 is equal to the lesser of two dollars and fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the school district or the maximum per-pupil limit. ((This maximum dollar amount shall be reduced accordingly as provided under RCW 43.09.2856(2).))

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) For the purpose of this section, "inflation" means, for any school year, the rate of the yearly increase of the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index for all urban consumers, Seattle area, using the official current base compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(b) "Maximum per-pupil limit" means:

(i) Two thousand five hundred dollars, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with fewer than forty thousand annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year; or

(ii) Three thousand dollars, as increased by inflation beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, multiplied by the number of average annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year, for school districts with forty thousand or more annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year.

(c) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(3) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the enrollments of the nonhigh students attending the high school shall only be counted by the nonhigh school districts for purposes of funding under this section.

(4) For school districts participating in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080, enrollments of students attending the academy shall be adjusted so that each participant district receives its proportional share of student enrollments for purposes of funding under this section.

(5) Beginning with propositions for enrichment levies for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a district must receive approval of an enrichment levy expenditure plan under RCW 28A.505.240 before submission of the proposition to the voters.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(7) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2018, enrichment levy revenues must be deposited in a separate subfund of the school district's general fund pursuant to RCW 28A.320.330, and for the 2018-19 school year are subject to the restrictions of RCW 28A.150.276 and the audit requirements of RCW 43.09.2856.

(8) Funds collected from levies for transportation vehicles, construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities as established in RCW 84.52.053 are not subject to the levy limitations in subsections (1) through (5) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act expires December 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act takes effect December 1, 2021.

--- END ---