BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that manufacturing jobs are important to all regions of Washington because of their above-average wages and strong benefits. Manufacturing industries employ more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand people in Washington. Manufacturers help drive Washington's economy, producing more than fifty-eight billion dollars in goods annually and accounting for nearly twelve percent of the gross state product. More than eighty percent of Washington exports are manufactured goods. The legislature finds that due to a complex variety of factors from global competition, automation, regulatory factors, and productivity gains, this sector of the economy has had output growth without experiencing the desired employment growth during this cycle of economic growth for the country and our state. The legislature intends to investigate these factors and discuss with private sector partners the full spectrum of policy levers that could improve and sustain long-term job growth and regulatory certainty for this critical sector of our economy. Therefore, the legislature intends that the department of commerce complete a study, in consultation with in-state manufacturing partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, in consultation with the leaders of the economic development committees of the legislature, is directed to complete a study of public policies that would foster growth of all subsectors of manufacturing and growth in manufacturing jobs throughout all of Washington's thirty-nine counties. The study shall include a comprehensive assessment of policy recommendations that will lead to improvement in regulatory conditions, infrastructure, and workforce development resources that support the growth and sustainability of the manufacturing sector. By December 31, 2020, the department must complete the study and recommend policies that will facilitate the development of manufacturing in all of Washington state's counties.

(2) The department shall meet regularly with an advisory committee convened by a statewide manufacturing association to assist in the scoping of the study and evaluation of policy recommendations. The department shall solicit information and analysis from other state agencies that have a regulatory and tax impact on the manufacturing industry. The advisory group shall be allowed to offer a report as an appendix to the official study and the department's policy recommendations. The advisory group shall include, but not be limited to, members from each of the following industry subsectors:

(a) Aerospace manufacturing;

(b) Food manufacturing;

(c) Beverage manufacturing;

(d) Wood product manufacturing;

(e) Primary metal manufacturing;

(f) Machinery manufacturing;

(g) Computer and electronic product manufacturing;

(h) Furniture and related product manufacturing;

(i) Transportation equipment manufacturing;

(j) Chemical manufacturing;

(k) Plastics and rubber products manufacturing;

(l) Paper manufacturing;

(m) Printing and related support activities;

(n) Maritime manufacturing; and

(o) Clean energy manufacturing.

--- END ---