BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.34.010 and 2019 c 381 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of this chapter to assure that minors in need of mental health care and treatment receive an appropriate continuum of culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and involuntary treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the authority and the department that provide mental health services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver those services.

It is also the purpose of this chapter to protect the rights of adolescents to confidentiality and to independently seek services for mental health and substance use disorders. Mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professionals shall guard against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty, enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional judgment, and encourage the use of voluntary services. Mental health and ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professionals shall, whenever clinically appropriate, offer less restrictive alternatives to inpatient treatment. Additionally, all mental health care and treatment providers shall assure that minors' parents are given an opportunity to participate in the treatment decisions for their minor children. The mental health care and treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer services that involve minors' parents or family.

It is also the purpose of this chapter to assure the ability of parents to exercise reasonable, compassionate care and control of their minor children when there is a medical necessity for treatment and without the requirement of filing a petition under this chapter, including the ability to request and receive medically necessary treatment for their adolescent children without the consent of the adolescent.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.34.020 and 2019 c 446 s 24, 2019 c 444 s 17, 2019 c 381 s 2, and 2019 c 325 s 2001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(9) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(11) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(12) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(16)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

(17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(18) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(19)(a).

(19) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(20) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(21) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(22) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a handicap, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(23) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(24) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(25) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(26) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(27)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to ((RCW 9A.72.085))chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(28) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(29) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(30) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(31) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(32) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(33) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(34) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(35) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(36) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(37) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(38) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(39) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(40) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(41) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW, or a person certified as a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional trainee under RCW 18.205.095 working under the direct supervision of a certified ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.34.610 and 2019 c 381 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall assure that, for any adolescent admitted to inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.600, a review is conducted by a physician or other mental health professional who is employed by the authority, or an agency under contract with the authority, and who neither has a financial interest in continued inpatient treatment of the adolescent nor is affiliated with the facility providing the treatment. ((The))

(a) For adolescents receiving inpatient treatment, the physician or other mental health professional shall conduct the review not less than seven nor more than fourteen days following the date the adolescent was brought to the facility under RCW 71.34.600 to determine whether it is a medical necessity to continue the adolescent's treatment on an inpatient basis.

(b) For adolescents receiving inpatient treatment in a residential treatment facility, the physician or other mental health professional shall conduct an additional medical necessity review every thirty days after the initial review while the adolescent remains in treatment under RCW 71.34.600.

(2) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section, the authority shall consider the opinion of the treatment provider, the safety of the adolescent, and the likelihood the adolescent's mental health will deteriorate if released from inpatient treatment. The authority shall consult with the parent in advance of making its determination.

(3) If, after any review conducted by the authority under this section, the authority determines it is no longer a medical necessity for an adolescent to receive inpatient treatment, the authority shall immediately notify the parents and the facility. The facility shall release the adolescent to the parents within twenty-four hours of receiving notice. If the professional person in charge and the parent believe that it is a medical necessity for the adolescent to remain in inpatient treatment, the adolescent shall be released to the parent on the second judicial day following the authority's determination in order to allow the parent time to file an at-risk youth petition under chapter 13.32A RCW. If the authority determines it is a medical necessity for the adolescent to receive outpatient treatment and the adolescent declines to obtain such treatment, such refusal shall be grounds for the parent to file an at-risk youth petition.

(4) If the evaluation conducted under RCW 71.34.600 is done by the authority, the reviews required by subsection (1) of this section shall be done by contract with an independent agency.

(5) The authority may, subject to available funds, contract with other governmental agencies to conduct the reviews under this section. The authority may seek reimbursement from the parents, their insurance, or medicaid for the expense of any review conducted by an agency under contract.

(6) In addition to the review required under this section, the authority may periodically determine and redetermine the medical necessity of treatment for purposes of payment with public funds.

(7) The authority shall communicate review findings under this section with the appropriate medicaid managed care organization contracted by the authority.

(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a managed care organization from conducting medical necessity reviews according to appropriate guidelines based on the level of care being referred to and consistent with the billing guide from the authority.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.34.630 and 2019 c 381 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the adolescent is receiving inpatient treatment in a hospital setting and is not released as a result of the petition filed under RCW 71.34.620, he or she shall be released not later than thirty days following the later of: (((1)))(a) The date of the authority's determination under RCW 71.34.610(2); or (((2)))(b) the filing of a petition for judicial review under RCW 71.34.620, unless a professional person or the designated crisis responder initiates proceedings under this chapter.

(2) If the adolescent receiving treatment in a residential treatment facility is not released as a result of the petition filed under RCW 71.34.620, he or she may remain in a residential treatment facility so long as it continues to be a medical necessity for the adolescent to receive such treatment.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.34.730 and 2019 c 446 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The professional person in charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where a minor has been admitted involuntarily for the initial seventy-two hour treatment period under this chapter may petition to have a minor committed to an evaluation and treatment facility or, in the case of a minor with a substance use disorder, to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for fourteen-day diagnosis, evaluation, and treatment.

If the professional person in charge of the facility does not petition to have the minor committed, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the treatment and evaluation facility's report.

(2) A petition for commitment of a minor under this section shall be filed with the superior court in the county where the minor is residing or being detained.

(a) A petition for a fourteen-day commitment shall be signed by:

(i) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(ii) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.

(b) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. The person signing the petition must have examined the minor, and the petition must contain the following:

(i) The name and address of the petitioner;

(ii) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for fourteen-day commitment;

(iii) The name, telephone number, and address if known of every person believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the minor;

(iv) A statement that the petitioner has examined the minor and finds that the minor's condition meets required criteria for fourteen-day commitment and the supporting facts therefor;

(v) A statement that the minor has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment but has been unwilling or unable to consent to necessary treatment;

(vi) If the petition is for mental health treatment, a statement that the minor has been advised of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed;

(vii) A statement recommending the appropriate facility or facilities to provide the necessary treatment; and

(viii) A statement concerning whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(c) A copy of the petition shall be personally delivered to the minor by the petitioner or petitioner's designee. A copy of the petition shall be sent to the minor's attorney and the minor's parent.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.34.750 and 2019 c 446 s 39 and 2019 c 325 s 2008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist, a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment:

(a) The court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(i) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(ii) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(iii) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(b) If commitment is for a substance use disorder, the court must find that there is an available approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the director for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.34.750 and 2019 c 446 s 40 and 2019 c 325 s 2009 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.

(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;

(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;

(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;

(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and

(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.

(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or two physician assistants, one of whom must be supervised by a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician assistant, or a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician assistant, and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist, a physician assistant supervised by a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.

(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.

(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of the minor or the minor's attorney for not more than ten days. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.

(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment, the court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:

(a) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;

(b) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and

(c) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.

(7) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the director for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.

If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.

(8) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least five days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

The authority shall develop and operate a data collection and tracking system for adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670. In implementing this data collection and tracking system, the authority shall, in collaboration with the department of health, collect information from facilities serving adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670 including, if possible, the following information:

(1) The names of facilities serving adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670;

(2) The number of adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670 who are defined as dependent children under chapter 13.34 RCW;

(3) Demographic information about the adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670;

(4) The diagnosis upon entry for adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670;

(5) Length of stay for adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670; and

(6) Information related to the discharge summary for adolescents receiving family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.

--- END ---