BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A Travis alert pilot program is created. By July 31, 2020, the Washington state military department, in coordination with local jurisdictions, shall initiate a pilot program to assess the benefits and availability of making medical or disability information available to first responders in advance of arrival at an emergency. As part of the pilot program, the Washington state military department shall work with two jurisdictions, one east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, capable of providing first responders with medical or disability information previously submitted. The pilot program shall include an outreach campaign of no longer than one month in each of the jurisdictions. By January 1, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the Washington state military department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the results of the pilot program.

(2) This section expires January 31, 2021.

--- END ---