BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that congressionally chartered veterans service organizations provide valuable support to veterans and their families, who have selflessly and bravely served our country. The legislature further finds that these organizations are at a distinct economic disadvantage in comparison to other membership-based organizations because membership requires qualifying military service and the organizations often rely heavily on their elderly and disabled veteran member-patrons economically. Therefore, the legislature intends to find ways to support veterans service organizations and the valuable services they provide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall study and make recommendations on ways to strengthen the financial viability of congressionally chartered veterans service organizations. The department must review the availability of state and local programs, including tax incentives, to veterans service organizations and recommend best practices to increase participation. The department shall submit, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a report of recommendations to the joint committee on veterans' and military affairs and other appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2021.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2021.

--- END ---