BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 236, Laws of 2012 and RCW 41.26.030(14)(c), any person employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by King county public hospital district No. 2, EvergreenHealth, as an emergency medical technician that met the requirements of RCW 18.71.200 or 18.73.030(12), and whose duties included providing emergency medical services as defined in RCW 18.73.030 within the boundaries of a county whose population on the effective date of this section exceeds two million residents, shall receive credit for service performed prior to January 1, 2003.

(2)(a) The department of retirement systems shall treat the county as the employer for purposes of this section. This employer classification:

(i) Is solely for the purpose of streamlining reporting service and compensation credit and paying contributions for periods of service covered by this section; and

(ii) Does not mean that the county is the employee's employer for any other purpose.

(b) All employee and employer contributions required for past periods of service established under this section shall be paid by the employer identified for purposes of this section.

(i) Employee contributions shall be calculated by the department equal to the contributions that would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(ii) Employer contributions shall be calculated by the department equal to the contributions that would have been paid by the employer and the state had the employee been reported in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

--- END ---