BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) No later than July 1, 2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make available on its web site an online training program on the physical training of youth athletes. The training program must, at a minimum, contain information on the following:

(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries;

(ii) First aid techniques;

(iii) The developmental stages of youth athletes and the unique training needs and risks associated with each stage;

(iv) Warning signs of eating disorders, suicide risk, and substance abuse; and

(v) Any other information the office of the superintendent of public instruction deems necessary to promote the physical health of youth athletes.

(b) When developing the training, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must consult with the following:

(i) The department of health;

(ii) The Washington interscholastic activities association; and

(iii) Experts on the physical training of youth athletes.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2022, prior to coaching an interscholastic athletic activity, at least one member of the coaching staff of each activity shall complete the online training program developed under this section. The member of the coaching staff shall provide a certificate showing completion of the training to the school.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.250.050 and 2019 c 358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter may prohibit, restrict, or require licensure of:

(1) Any person licensed, certified, or registered in this state and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States as an athletic trainer while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) Any person pursuing a supervised course of study in an accredited athletic training educational program, if the person is designated by a title that clearly indicates a student or trainee status;

(4) An athletic trainer from another state for purposes of continuing education, consulting, or performing athletic training services while accompanying his or her group, individual, or representatives into Washington state on a temporary basis for no more than ninety days in a calendar year;

(5) Any elementary, secondary, or postsecondary school teacher, educator, or coach who does not represent themselves to the public as an athletic trainer; or

(6) A personal or fitness trainer employed by an athletic club or fitness center and not ((representing)):

(a) Providing fitness services or advice to individuals under the age of eighteen; or

(b) Representing themselves as an athletic trainer or performing the duties of an athletic trainer provided under RCW 18.250.010(4)(a) (ii) through (vi).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022.

--- END ---