BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

Until gray wolves are not listed as endangered, threatened, or sensitive under state law, the department shall prioritize the use of radio collars as a tool to monitor gray wolves and reduce conflicts with livestock. The department shall prioritize efforts to collar gray wolves within packs with known depredations of livestock at any point during the previous three years. The department must make multiple attempts each year to collar one or more wolves within each pack with known depredations of livestock in addition to placing collars in other packs.

--- END ---