BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall conduct outreach and coordinate with local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of expanding critical incident stress management programs to law enforcement personnel statewide. The association shall conduct an inventory of the current critical incident stress management programs in the state, including an assessment of underserved agencies and regions. The association shall coordinate with law enforcement agencies, law enforcement organizations, and community partners to provide greater access to critical incident stress management programs, including peer support group counselors under RCW 5.60.060, and may further assist agencies with establishing interagency and regional service agreements to facilitate expansion of these programs.

(2) The association shall submit a preliminary report by July 1, 2021, and submit a final report, including a summary of the inventory and efforts to expand programs, by July 1, 2022, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise. "Association" means the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

--- END ---