BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.531 and 2013 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) State agency worksites are subject to the same requirements under this section and RCW 70.94.534 as private employers.

(2) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of a jurisdiction's commute trip reduction plan, each major employer in that jurisdiction shall perform a baseline measurement consistent with the rules established by the department of transportation under RCW 70.94.537. Not more than ninety days after receiving the results of the baseline measurement, each major employer shall develop a commute trip reduction program and shall submit a description of that program to the jurisdiction for review. The program shall be implemented not more than ninety days after approval by the jurisdiction.

(3) A commute trip reduction program of a major employer shall consist of, at a minimum (a) designation of a transportation coordinator and the display of the name, location, and telephone number of the coordinator in a prominent manner at each affected worksite; (b) regular distribution of information to employees regarding alternatives to single-occupant vehicle commuting; (c) a regular review of employee commuting and reporting of progress toward meeting the single-occupant vehicle reduction goals to the county, city, or town consistent with the method established in the commute trip reduction plan and the rules established by the department of transportation under RCW 70.94.537; and (d) implementation of a set of measures designed to achieve the applicable commute trip reduction goals adopted by the jurisdiction. Such measures may include but are not limited to:

(i) Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges, or both, for high occupancy vehicles and motorcycles;

(ii) Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant vehicles;

(iii) Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate employee ride sharing for commute trips;

(iv) Provision of subsidies for transit fares;

(v) Provision of vans for van pools;

(vi) Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;

(vii) Permitting the use of the employer's vehicles for car pooling or van pooling;

(viii) Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees' use of transit, car pools, or van pools;

(ix) Cooperation with transportation providers to provide additional regular or express service to the worksite;

(x) Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for transit, car pool, and van pool users;

(xi) Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing areas, and showers for employees who bicycle or walk to work;

(xii) Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate for employees who do not use the parking facility;

(xiii) Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part or full time at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their homes;

(xiv) Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such as compressed workweek schedules which reduce commuting; and

(xv) Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the use of high occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and emergency taxi services.

(4)(a) Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, that have a campus located in a county with a population of more than one million five hundred thousand with a combined total of more than fifty thousand students and employees must provide all employees at every campus with a transit pass, at no cost to the employees, that allows such employees to travel by transit, at no cost to the employees, to or from the campus where a particular employee is employed.

(b) Every institution of higher education providing transit passes pursuant to (a) of this subsection must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2020, regarding the process and costs associated with providing transit passes to its employees. The report must also detail, for each of the following wage ranges, the total cost associated with providing transit passes to all employees making:

(i) Less than fifty thousand dollars per year;

(ii) Fifty thousand to seventy-five thousand dollars per year;

(iii) More than seventy-five thousand to one hundred thousand dollars per year; and

(iv) More than one hundred thousand dollars per year.

(c) Nothing contained in this subsection (4) may be construed to alter the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired.

(5) Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing transportation management associations or other transportation-related associations authorized by RCW 35.87A.010 to assist members in developing and implementing commute trip reduction programs.

(((5)))(6) Employers shall make a good faith effort towards achievement of the goals identified in RCW 70.94.527(4)(d).

--- END ---