BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department may erect and maintain auto mall directional signs on any state highway right-of-way if the following criteria are met:

(i) There must be at least two or more commercial uses engaged in the sale and service of new vehicles, and the following activities may also be included at the auto mall: (A) Quick service lube and oil centers; (B) financing of motor vehicles; (C) parts sales; (D) motor vehicle insurance; (E) motor vehicle repair and detailing; (F) motor vehicle registration and title services; or (G) fleet sales;

(ii) The auto mall must incorporate at least twenty acres in aggregate;

(iii) The auto mall must be located within one and one-half miles of the state highway;

(iv) Sufficient space must be available for installation of the directional signs as specified in the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices."

(b) The department may also erect and maintain supplemental follow-through directional signs to be installed at key decision points to direct motorists to the auto mall if it is not clearly visible from the point of exit from the state highway.

(2) The department shall collect from the vehicle dealers that comprise the auto mall a reasonable fee based upon the cost of erection and maintenance of the directional signs.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "auto mall" includes any auto park, auto complex, auto row, and auto center.

--- END ---