BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The registered owner of a hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle that is required to pay the fee established in RCW 46.17.324(2) and has been driven fewer than six thousand miles in a registration year based on the odometer reading may be eligible for a low mileage hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle registration renewal rebate.

(b) To be eligible for the low mileage hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle registration renewal rebate, the registered owner of a hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle shall provide to the department the odometer reading of the vehicle as of the first day of the registration year in a form and manner specified by the department.

(c) Upon vehicle registration renewal, the department shall determine the mileage increase for the vehicle over the course of the previous registration year based upon the new reading of the odometer. If the mileage increase is less than six thousand miles, the department shall rebate thirty dollars of the registration renewal fee of the fee established in RCW 46.17.324(2) paid for the previous registration year.

(2) The department must provide information about the rebate program to hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle owners.

(3) The department must adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.324 and 2019 c 287 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

To realize the environmental benefits of electrification of the transportation system it is necessary to support the adoption of electric vehicles and other electric technology in the state by incentivizing the purchase of these vehicles, building out the charging infrastructure, developing greener transit options, and supporting clean alternative fuel infrastructure. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to support these activities through the imposition of new transportation electrification fees in this section.

(1) A vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, is subject to an annual seventy-five dollar transportation electrification fee to be collected by the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. For administrative efficiencies, the transportation electrification fee must be collected at the same time as vehicle registration renewals and may only be collected for vehicles that are renewing an annual vehicle registration.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2019, in lieu of the fee in subsection (1) of this section for a hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle that is not required to pay the fees established in RCW 46.17.323 (1) and (4), the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director must require that the applicant for the annual vehicle registration renewal of such hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle pay a seventy-five dollar hybrid vehicle transportation electrification fee, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent must also implement the hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle rebate program established under section 1 of this act.

(3) The fees required under this section must be deposited in the electric vehicle account created in RCW 82.44.200, until July 1, 2025, when the fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle account.

(4) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than thirty-five miles per hour.

--- END ---