BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall establish procedures for the issuance of special training certificates to employers to pay new employees wages at a rate of ten dollars and fifty cents per hour, or the minimum wage rate required under federal law, whichever is greater, during a training period. The following restrictions apply to the use of the training certificates:

(1) Only employee positions paid on an hourly basis are eligible for the special training certificate;

(2) The training period may not exceed the first one hundred days of employment; and

(3) Employers may only use the special training certificate once per employee.

--- END ---