BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2009 c 415 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An overseas or service voter may receive a ballot by fax,
e-mail, or other electronic means. An overseas or service voter may
return a voted ballot by fax or e-mail if the voter's signature on the
declaration accompanies the ballot.
(2) An overseas or service voter may request to receive all future
ballots by fax, e-mail, or other available means either in place of or
in addition to receiving them through the postal mail.
(3) The ((information on the envelopes or)) instructions for
overseas voters and service voters must explain that:
(((1))) (a) Return postage is free if the ballot is mailed through
the United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy;
(((2))) (b) The date of the signature is considered the date of
mailing;
(((3))) (c) The envelope must be signed ((by)) no later than
election day;
(((4))) (d) If the voter is not already registered to vote, the
signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of voter
registration;
(((5))) (e) A voter may ((fax a voted ballot and the accompanying
envelope if the voter agrees to waive secrecy. The ballot will be
counted if the original documents are received before certification of
the election)) receive a ballot by fax, e-mail, or other electronic
means, and how a voter may return a ballot by fax or e-mail; and
(((6) A voter may obtain a ballot via electronic mail, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return by mail. In order to facilitate
the electronic acquisition of ballots by overseas and service voters,
the ballot instructions shall include the web site of the office of the
secretary of state)) (f) A voter may request to receive all future
ballots by fax, e-mail, or other available electronic means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An overseas or service voter may register to vote, request a
ballot, or transmit a ballot using forms and methods available through
the United States department of defense and United States election
assistance commission.

--- END ---