BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Sexual abuse is one of the most
difficult crimes to detect and prosecute, in large part because there
often are no witnesses except the victim. Under the Sixth Amendment,
a defendant generally has the right to demand the physical presence at
trial of accusatory witnesses. Courts have held that this right is not
absolute and where the reliability of the testimony is otherwise
ensured, the defendant's right may be outweighed if necessary to
further an important public policy. Courts have held that a state's
interest in the physical and psychological well-being of victims and
witnesses may be sufficiently important to outweigh, at least in some
cases, a defendant's right to face his or her accusers in court.
(2) A defendant also has a right to represent himself or herself in
criminal proceedings. The right to appear pro se exists to affirm the
dignity and autonomy of the accused and to allow the presentation of
what may be the accused's best possible defense. Courts have held that
the right to self-representation is not infringed when the defendant
has a fair chance to present the case in his or her own way and to make
his or her voice heard. However, the right to self-representation is
not an absolute right. Courts are entitled to control the mode of
witness interrogation so as to more effectively ascertain the truth and
to protect the witness from harassment or undue embarrassment to the
extent the defendant's rights are not violated.
(3) The legislature declares that the state has a compelling
interest in the physical and psychological well-being of victims of sex
offenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to
adopt rules by July 31, 2011, that reduce the risk of trauma to victims
testifying as witnesses in criminal proceedings involving sex offenses
when the defendant is acting pro se.
(2) At a minimum the rules should:
(a) Provide that when a defendant has waived his or her right to
counsel and is representing himself or herself in a criminal trial, the
court may, upon a motion by the prosecuting attorney, by the request of
a victim, or by its own initiative, place restrictions on the manner
and means by which a defendant questions a victim;
(b) Apply when:
(i) The proceeding is a criminal prosecution for a sex offense, as
defined in this chapter, allegedly committed by the defendant or
committed at the direction of the defendant against the victim;
(ii) The victim's testimony will describe a sexual act or attempted
sexual act performed on the victim by the defendant or performed on the
victim by another person at the defendant's direction; and
(iii) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing
conducted outside the presence of the jury, that requiring the victim
to be questioned directly by the defendant will cause the victim to
suffer serious emotional or mental distress that will prevent the
victim from reasonably communicating at the trial;
(c) Require the court to enter its findings in writing;
(d) Permit the court or other individual approved by the court to
conduct the questioning of the victim on behalf of the defendant,
subject to court procedures and the rules of evidence;
(e) Require that if the court or other individual approved by the
court conducts the questioning of the victim, the court allow the
defendant to prepare the questions to be asked and prepare any follow-up questions;
(f) Require the court to explain to the jury that although the
court or other individual approved by the court is conducting the
questioning of the victim, the defendant is continuing to represent
himself or herself and that the defendant composed the questions. The
court shall further instruct the jury not to consider the court
procedure for questioning the victim, nor to draw any inference from
the procedure, when evaluating the facts of the case and the charges
presented against the defendant; and
(g) Provide that if the defendant directly questions the victim,
the court may impose reasonable procedures upon the parties for
conducting the questioning to avoid trauma to the victim. Reasonable
procedures may include, but are not limited to:
(i) Prohibiting the defendant from approaching the victim during
the defendant's questioning; and
(ii) Permitting questioning by the defendant of the victim using
remote audio-video means.
(3) Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court to
exercise reasonable control over the mode and order of interrogating
witnesses and presenting evidence in any proceeding and to maintain
order in the court room.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---