BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.260.020 and 2009 c 565 s 18 and 2009 c 501 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automatic commercial ice cube machine" means a factory-made
assembly, not necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a
condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit
with means for making and harvesting ice cubes. It may also include
integrated components for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(2) "Bottle-type water dispenser" means a water dispenser that uses
a bottle or reservoir as the source of potable water.
(3) "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means a heated, fully
enclosed compartment, with one or more solid or partial glass doors,
that is designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has been
cooked in a separate appliance. "Commercial hot food holding cabinet"
does not include heated glass merchandising cabinets, drawer warmers,
or cook and hold appliances.
(4)(a) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (i)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (ii) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(b) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (i)
Products with 85 cubic feet or more of internal volume; (ii) walk-in
refrigerators or freezers; (iii) consumer products that are federally
regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (iv) products
without doors; or (v) freezers specifically designed for ice cream.
(5) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing,
regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services
rendered.
(6) "Cook and hold appliance" means a multiple mode appliance
intended for cooking food that may be used to hold the temperature of
the food that has been cooked in the same appliance.
(7) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(8) "Drawer warmer" means an appliance that consists of one or more
heated drawers and that is designed to hold hot food that has been
cooked in a separate appliance at a specified temperature.
(9) "Heated glass merchandising cabinet" means an appliance with a
heated cabinet constructed of glass or clear plastic doors which, with
seventy percent or more clear area, is designed to display and maintain
the temperature of hot food that has been cooked in a separate
appliance.
(10) "Hot water dispenser" means a small electric water heater that
has a measured storage volume of no greater than one gallon.
(11) "Mini-tank electric water heater" means a small electric water
heater that has a measured storage volume of more than one gallon and
a rated storage volume of less than twenty gallons.
(12) "Pass-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on both the front and rear of the
unit.
(13) "Point-of-use water dispenser" means a water dispenser that
uses a pressurized water utility connection as the source of potable
water.
(14) "Pool heater" means an appliance designed for heating
nonpotable water contained at atmospheric pressure for swimming pools,
spas, hot tubs, and similar applications.
(15) "Portable electric spa" means a factory-built electric spa or
hot tub, supplied with equipment for heating and circulating water.
(16) "Reach-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or freezer
with hinged or sliding doors or lids, but does not include roll-in or
roll-through cabinets or pass-through cabinets.
(17) "Residential pool pump" means a pump used to circulate and
filter pool water in order to maintain clarity and sanitation.
(18)(a) "Roll-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors that allow wheeled racks of
product to be rolled into the unit.
(b) "Roll-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on two sides of the cabinet that
allow wheeled racks of product to be rolled through the unit.
(19) "Showerhead" means a device through which water is discharged
for a shower bath.
(20) "Showerhead tub spout diverter combination" means a group of
plumbing fittings sold as a matched set and consisting of a control
valve, a tub spout diverter, and a showerhead.
(21) "State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp" means a lamp
that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service
applications, has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to
direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, a rated voltage or voltage
range that lies at least partially within 115 to 130 volts, and falls
into one of the following categories:
(a) A bulged reflector or elliptical reflector bulb shape and which
has a diameter which equals or exceeds 2.25 inches; or
(b) A reflector, parabolic aluminized reflector, or similar bulb
shape and which has a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.
(22) "Tub spout diverter" means a device designed to stop the flow
of water into a bathtub and to divert it so that the water discharges
through a showerhead.
(23) "Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual"
means refrigerators designed and sold for the cooling and storage of
wine by an individual.
(24) "Audio standby-passive mode" means the appliance is connected
to a power source, produces neither sound nor performs any mechanical
function (e.g., playing, recording), but may be switched into another
mode with the remote control unit or an internal signal.
(25)(a) "Class A external power supply" means an external power
supply circuit that is used to convert household electric current into
DC current or lower voltage AC current to operate a consumer product
and that:
(i) Is designed to convert line voltage AC input into lower voltage
AC or DC output;
(ii) Is able to convert to only one AC or DC output voltage at a
time;
(iii) Is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use
product that constitutes the primary load;
(iv) Is contained in a separate physical enclosure from the end-use
product;
(v) Is connected to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male/female electrical connection, cable, cord, or wiring;
(vi) Has nameplate output power that is less than or equal to two
hundred fifty watts; and
(vii) Is a federally regulated external power supply.
(b) The term "class A external power supply" does not include a
device that requires federal food and drug administration listing and
approval as a medical device in accordance with section 513 of the
federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. 360c), or a device that
powers the charger of a detachable battery pack or charges the battery
of a product that is fully or primarily motor operated.
(26) "Compact audio product" means an integrated audio system
encased in a single housing that includes an amplifier and radio tuner,
attachable or separable speakers, and can reproduce audio from one or
more of the following media: Magnetic tape, CD, DVD, or flash memory.
"Compact audio product" does not include products that can be
independently powered by internal batteries or that have a powered
external satellite antenna, or that can provide a video output signal.
(27) "Digital versatile disc (DVD)" means a laser-encoded plastic
medium capable of storing a large amount of digital audio, video, and
computer data.
(28) "Digital versatile disc player" or "DVD player" means a
commercially available electronic product encased in a single housing
that includes an integral power supply and for which the sole purpose
is the decoding of digitized video signals on a DVD.
(29) "Digital versatile disc (DVD) recorder" or "DVD recorder"
means a commercially available electronic product encased in a single
housing that includes an integral power supply and for which the sole
purpose is the production or recording of digitized video signals on a
DVD. "DVD recorder" does not include models that have an electronic
programming guide function.
(30)(a) "State-regulated external power supply" means a single-voltage external AC to DC or AC to AC power supply that:
(i) Is designed to convert line voltage AC input into lower voltage
DC or AC output;
(ii) Is able to convert to only one DC or AC output voltage at a
time;
(iii) Is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use
product that constitutes the primary load;
(iv) Is contained within a separate physical enclosure from the
end-use product;
(v) Is connected to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male/female electrical connection, cable, cord, or other wiring;
(vi) Does not have batteries or battery packs that physically
attach directly (including those that are removable) to the power
supply unit;
(vii) Does not have a battery chemistry or type selector switch and
an indicator light; or, does not have a battery chemistry or type
selector switch and a state of charge meter; and
(viii) Has a nameplate output power less than or equal to two
hundred fifty watts.
(b) "State-regulated external power supply" does not include a
device that is a "class A external power supply" that is federally
regulated.
(31) "Video standby-passive mode" means the appliance is connected
to a power source, does not perform any mechanical function (e.g.,
playing, recording), does not produce video or audio output signals,
but may be switched into another mode with the remote control unit or
an internal signal.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.030 and 2009 c 501 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products
sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state:
(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines;
(b) Commercial refrigerators and freezers;
(c) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps;
(d) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(e) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(f) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(g) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(h) Tub spout diverters; ((and))
(i) Commercial hot food holding cabinets;
(j) Compact audio products, digital versatile disc players, and
digital versatile disc recorders; and
(k) State-regulated external power supplies, which are single
voltage external AC to DC or AC to AC power supplies included with
other retail products, and single voltage external AC to DC or AC to AC
power supplies sold separately, excluding power supplies that are
classified as devices for human use under the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act and require the United States food and drug administration
listing and approval as a medical device.
(2) This chapter applies equally to products whether they are sold,
offered for sale, or installed as stand-alone products or as components
of other products.
(3) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) New products manufactured in the state and sold outside the
state;
(b) New products manufactured outside the state and sold at
wholesale inside the state for final retail sale and installation
outside the state;
(c) Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of
construction; or
(d) Products designed expressly for installation and use in
recreational vehicles.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.260.040 and 2009 c 501 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The minimum efficiency standards specified in this section apply to
the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with the ARI 810-2003 test
method as published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration
institute. Ice- making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube
machines that are not split system ice makers or self-contained models
as defined in ARI 810-2003.
(2)(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V+ 2.04

Transparent 0.12V+ 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V+ 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V+ 1.38

Transparent 0.75V+ 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers
with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh kilowatt hours
V total volume (ft3)
AV adjusted volume [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)]+ refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees Fahrenheit and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of
38 degrees Fahrenheit within 12 hours or less. Daily energy
consumption shall be measured in accordance with the American national
standards institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38+ 2

Freezer 0+ 2

(3)(a) The lamp electrical power input of state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp
efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector
lamps specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6295(i)(l)(A)-(B).
(b) The following types of incandescent lamps are exempt from these
requirements:
(i) Lamps rated at fifty watts or less of the following types: BR
30, ER 30, BR 40, and ER 40;
(ii) Lamps rated at sixty-five watts of the following types: BR
30, BR 40, and ER 40; and
(iii) R 20 lamps of forty-five watts or less.
(4)(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual
must meet requirements specified in the California Code of Regulations,
Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(b) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual shall
be tested in accordance with the method specified in the California
Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26,
2009.
(5)(a) The standby energy consumption of bottle-type water
dispensers, and point-of-use water dispensers, dispensing both hot and
cold water, manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall not exceed
1.2 kWh/day.
(b) The test method for water dispensers shall be the environmental
protection agency energy star program requirements for bottled water
coolers version 1.1.
(6)(a) The standby energy consumption of hot water dispensers and
mini-tank electric water heaters manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, shall be not greater than 35 watts.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any water heater:
(i) That is within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6292(a)(4) or
6311(1);
(ii) That has a rated storage volume of less than 20 gallons; and
(iii) For which there is no federal test method applicable to that
type of water heater.
(c) Hot water dispensers shall be tested in accordance with the
method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20,
section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(d) Mini-tank electric water heaters shall be tested in accordance
with the method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title
20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(7) The following standards are established for pool heaters,
residential pool pumps, and portable electric spas:
(a) Natural gas pool heaters shall not be equipped with constant
burning pilots.
(b) Residential pool pump motors manufactured on or after January
1, 2010, must meet requirements specified in the California Code of
Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(c) Portable electric spas manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, must meet requirements specified in the California Code of
Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(d) Portable electric spas must be tested in accordance with the
method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20,
section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(8)(a) The leakage rate of tub spout diverters shall be no greater
than the applicable requirements shown in the following table:

Maximum Leakage Rate

Appliance Testing Conditions Effective January 1, 2009

When new 0.01 gpm

Tub spout diverters After 15,000 cycles of diverting 0.05 gpm

(b) Showerhead tub spout diverter combinations shall meet both the
federal standard for showerheads established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec.
6291 et seq. and the standard for tub spout diverters specified in this
section.
(9)(a) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall be no greater than 40
watts per cubic foot of measured interior volume.
(b) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
shall be determined using ANSI/ASTM F2140-01 standard test method for
the performance of hot food holding cabinets (test for idle energy rate
dry test). Commercial hot food holding cabinet interior volume shall
be calculated using straight line segments following the gross interior
dimensions of the appliance and using the following equation: Interior
height x interior width x interior depth. Interior volume shall not
account for racks, air plenums, or other interior parts.
(10) The following standards are established for consumer audio and
video equipment:
(a) The maximum power usage of compact audio products manufactured
on or after January 1, 2012, may not exceed two watts in audio standby-passive mode for those products without a permanently illuminated clock
display and four watts in audio standby-passive mode for those products
with a permanently illuminated clock display.
(b) The maximum power usage of digital versatile disc players and
digital versatile disc recorders manufactured on or after January 1,
2012, may not exceed three watts in video standby-passive mode.
(c) Compact audio products, digital versatile disc players, and
digital versatile disc recorders must be tested in accordance with the
international electrotechnical commission (IEC) 62087:2002(E) -"Methods of Measurement for the Power Consumption of Audio, Video, and
Related Equipment."
(11)(a) State-regulated external power supplies manufactured on or
after January 1, 2012, must meet the standards in the following table:

Nameplate Output Minimum Efficiency in Active Mode

<1 Watt 0.5 * Nameplate Output

≥ 1 and ≤ 51 Watts 0.09 * Ln(Nameplate Output) + 0.5

> 51 Watts 0.85

Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode

Any Output 0.5 Watts

Where Ln(Nameplate Output)=Natural Logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in Watts;

(b) State-regulated external power supplies must be tested in
accordance with the United States environmental protection agency's
energy star program, "Test Method for Calculating the Energy Efficiency
of Single-Voltage External AC-DC and AC-AC Power Supplies" as it
existed on August 11, 2004, provided that the test voltage specified in
section 4(d) of the test method must be only one hundred fifteen (115)
volts, 60 Hz.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.260.050 and 2009 c 501 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new commercial refrigerator or freezer or state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp manufactured on or after January 1, 2007,
may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040. No new automatic commercial ice cube machine
manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be sold or offered for
sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new commercial refrigerator or
freezer or state-regulated incandescent reflector lamp manufactured on
or after January 1, 2007, may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. On or after January
1, 2009, no new automatic commercial ice cube machine manufactured on
or after January 1, 2008, may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(3) Standards for state-regulated incandescent reflector lamps are
effective on the dates specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be sold or offered in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(5) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be installed for compensation in the state on or after
January 1, 2011, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(6)(a) No new compact audio products, digital versatile disc
players, or digital versatile disc recorders, if manufactured on or
after January 1, 2012, may be sold or offered for sale in the state
unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(b) No new compact audio products, digital versatile disc players,
or digital versatile disc recorders, if manufactured on or after
January 1, 2012, may be installed for compensation in the state on or
after January 1, 2013, unless the efficiency of the new product meets
or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(7)(a) No new state-regulated external power supply, if
manufactured on or after January 1, 2012, may be sold or offered for
sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(b) No new state-regulated external power supply, if manufactured
on or after January 1, 2012, may be installed for compensation in the
state on or after January 1, 2013, unless the efficiency of the new
product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW
19.260.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---