BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that basic
education instruction in public schools in Washington state should
include not only instruction in core academic skills, but also core
social emotional learning skills. Students with strong social
emotional learning skills do better in school. They are able to manage
their emotions and behavior, form and maintain healthy relationships,
and make positive and ethical decisions. Healthy relationships are key
to learning and essential for students' future success in the workplace
and in the community. These students have significantly better
attendance records, their classroom behavior is more constructive and
less often disruptive, they like school more, and they have better
grade point averages. They are also less likely to be suspended or
disciplined. The overall result is a more effective and successful
classroom experience for all students.
(2) Therefore schools should be encouraged and supported wherever
possible to incorporate social emotional learning skills into basic
education instruction through appropriate learning standards,
research-based curriculum and programs, classroom-based assessment, and
professional development for educators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To the extent funds are available in the
account created under section 3 of this act, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall promote and encourage
incorporation of social emotional learning into basic education
instruction in public schools. Activities may include:
(a) Disseminating information about promising curricula and model
programs in social emotional learning;
(b) Providing guidelines for how school districts can incorporate
culturally responsive social emotional learning into basic education
instruction at all grade levels;
(c) Referring school districts to high quality professional
development opportunities;
(d) Providing grants to school districts to implement research-based curricula, professional development, and instruction in social
emotional learning; and
(e) Disseminating information on how schools can develop
partnerships with after-school programs to support students' social
emotional learning.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "social emotional learning"
includes age-appropriate culturally responsive behavioral and emotional
management, relationship skills, conflict resolution, interpersonal
communication, cooperation, decision making, and planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The social emotional learning public-private
partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The purpose of the account is to support the activities of the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and school districts under
section 2 of this act. Revenues to the account include any
appropriations made by the legislature for the purposes of section 2 of
this act, federal funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or
foundations, and other sources. Only the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW.

--- END ---