BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.250 and 2007 c 379 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who:
(a) Manufactures, sells, or disposes of or possesses any instrument
or weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand club, or metal
knuckles, or spring blade knife, or any knife the blade of which is
automatically released by a spring mechanism or other mechanical
device, or any knife having a blade which opens, or falls, or is
ejected into position by the force of gravity, or by an outward,
downward, or centrifugal thrust or movement;
(b) Furtively carries with intent to conceal any ((dagger, dirk))
knife having a blade longer than three and one-half inches, pistol, or
other dangerous weapon; or
(c) Uses any contrivance or device for suppressing the noise of any
firearm,
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The possession of a spring blade knife by a law enforcement
officer while the officer:
(i) Is on official duty; or
(ii) Is transporting the knife to or from the place where the knife
is stored when the officer is not on official duty; or
(b) The storage of a spring blade knife by a law enforcement
officer.

--- END ---