BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.03.305 and 2008 c 6 s 204 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a commission to be known as the Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials, to consist of
((sixteen)) members appointed by the governor as provided in this
section.
(1) ((Nine of the sixteen commission members shall be selected by
lot by the secretary of state from among those registered voters
eligible to vote at the time persons are selected for appointment to
full terms on the commission under subsection (3) of this section. One
member shall be selected from each congressional district.)) One
registered voter from each congressional district shall be selected by
the secretary of state from among those registered voters eligible to
vote at the time persons are selected for appointment to serve on the
commission. The secretary shall establish policies and procedures for
conducting the selection by lot. The policies and procedures shall
include, but not be limited to, those for notifying persons selected
and for providing a new selection from a congressional district if a
person selected from the district declines appointment to the
commission or if, following the person's appointment, the person's
position on the commission becomes vacant before the end of the
person's term of office.
(2) ((The remaining seven of the sixteen)) Seven commission
members, all residents of this state, shall be selected jointly by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate. The persons selected under this subsection shall have had
experience in the field of personnel management. Of these seven
members, one shall be selected from each of the following five sectors
in this state: Private institutions of higher education; business;
professional personnel management; legal profession; and organized
labor. Of the two remaining members, one shall be a person recommended
to the speaker and the president by the chair of the Washington
personnel resources board and one shall be a person recommended by
majority vote of the presidents of the state's four-year institutions
of higher education.
(3) The secretary of state shall forward the names of persons
selected under subsection (1) of this section and the speaker of the
house of representatives and president of the senate shall forward the
names of persons selected under subsection (2) of this section to the
governor who shall appoint these persons to the commission. Except
((as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the names of persons
selected for appointment to the commission shall be forwarded to the
governor not later than February 15, 1987, and not later than the
fifteenth day of February every four years through 1999. The terms of
the members selected in 1999 shall terminate July 1, 2002, and the
names of persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than July 1, 2002. Of the sixteen
names forwarded to the governor in 2002, the governor shall by lot
select four of the persons selected under subsection (1) of this
section and four of the persons selected under subsection (2) of this
section to serve two-year terms, with the rest of the members serving
four-year terms. Thereafter, except)) as provided in subsection (6) of
this section, all members shall serve four-year terms and the names of
((eight)) the persons selected for appointment to the commission shall
be forwarded to the governor not later than the first day of July every
two years.
(4) No person may be appointed to more than two terms. No member
of the commission may be removed by the governor during his or her term
of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office or for a disqualifying change of
residence.
The unexcused absence of any person who is a member of the
commission from two consecutive meetings of the commission shall
constitute the relinquishment of that person's membership on the
commission. Such a relinquishment creates a vacancy in that person's
position on the commission. A member's absence may be excused by the
chair of the commission upon the member's written request if the chair
believes there is just cause for the absence. Such a request must be
received by the chair before the meeting for which the absence is to be
excused. A member's absence from a meeting of the commission may also
be excused during the meeting for which the member is absent by the
affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission present
at the meeting.
(5) No state official, public employee, or lobbyist, or immediate
family member of the official, employee, or lobbyist, subject to the
registration requirements of chapter 42.17 or 42.17A RCW is eligible
for membership on the commission.
As used in this subsection the phrase "immediate family" means the
parents, spouse or domestic partner, siblings, children, or dependent
relative of the official((, employee,)) or lobbyist whether or not
living in the household of the official((, employee,)) or lobbyist; and
the parents, spouse or domestic partner, siblings, children, or
dependent relative of the employee living in the household of the
employee.
(6)(a) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a
successor shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term.
The selection and appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of
the date the position becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same
manner as originally provided.
(b) Initial members appointed from congressional districts created
after the effective date of this section shall be selected and
appointed in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section.
The selection and appointment must be concluded within ninety days of
the date the district is created. The term of an initial member
appointed under this subsection terminates July 1st of an even-numbered
year so that at no point may the terms of more than one-half plus one
of the members selected under subsection (1) of this section terminate
in the same year.

--- END ---