BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Before the department seeks or dedicates funding to develop a new
habitat conservation plan under the endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., or to develop a major amendment to an existing
habitat conservation plan, the department must inform the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding the proposed timeline and
budget and solicit the recommendations of the committees regarding
public process and notification. The information provided by the
department must include an economic analysis comparing the decision to
enter into a habitat conservation plan with the decision to not enter
into a habitat conservation plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "PART 5" to read as follows:
Before the department seeks or dedicates funding to develop a new
habitat conservation plan under the endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., or to develop a major amendment to an existing
habitat conservation plan, the department must inform the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding the proposed timeline and
budget and solicit the recommendations of the committees regarding
public process and notification. The information provided by the
department must include an economic analysis comparing the decision to
enter into a habitat conservation plan with the decision to not enter
into a habitat conservation plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
Before the department seeks or dedicates funding to develop a new
habitat conservation plan under the endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., or to develop a major amendment to an existing
habitat conservation plan, the department must inform the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding the proposed timeline and
budget and solicit the recommendations of the committees regarding
public process and notification. The information provided by the
department must include an economic analysis comparing the decision to
enter into a habitat conservation plan with the decision to not enter
into a habitat conservation plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Before the commission seeks or dedicates funding to develop a new
habitat conservation plan under the endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., or to develop a major amendment to an existing
habitat conservation plan, the commission must inform the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding the proposed timeline and
budget and solicit the recommendations of the committees regarding
public process and notification. The information provided by the
commission must include an economic analysis comparing the decision to
enter into a habitat conservation plan with the decision to not enter
into a habitat conservation plan.

--- END ---