BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.680 and 2009 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Alternatives to total confinement are available for offenders with
sentences of one year or less. These alternatives include the
following sentence conditions that the court may order as substitutes
for total confinement:
(1) One day of partial confinement may be substituted for ((one))
up to two days of total confinement;
(2) In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses
only, ((eight)) five hours of community restitution may be substituted
for one day of total confinement, with a maximum conversion limit of
((two)) three hundred ((forty)) hours or ((thirty)) sixty days.
Community restitution hours must be completed within the period of
community supervision or a time period specified by the court, which
shall not exceed twenty-four months, pursuant to a schedule determined
by the department; and
(3) For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, the
court may credit time served by the offender before the sentencing in
an available county supervised community option and may authorize
county jails to convert jail confinement to an available county
supervised community option, may authorize the time spent in the
community option to be reduced by earned release credit consistent with
local correctional facility standards, and may require the offender to
perform affirmative conduct pursuant to RCW 9.94A.607.
For sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the
court shall consider and give priority to available alternatives to
total confinement and shall state its reasons in writing on the
judgment and sentence form if the alternatives are not used.

--- END ---