BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.63.030 and 2009 c 549 s 2114 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ordinance, resolution, or act creating the commission shall set
forth the number of members to be appointed, not more than one-third of
which number may be ex officio members by virtue of office held in any
municipality. The term of office for ex officio members shall
correspond to their respective tenures. The term of office for the
first appointive members appointed to such commission shall be
designated from one to six years in such manner as to provide that the
fewest possible terms will expire in any one year. Thereafter the term
of office for each appointive member shall be either four or six years,
as determined by legislative action of the council.
Vacancies occurring otherwise than through the expiration of terms
shall be filled for the unexpired term. Members may be removed, after
public hearing, by the appointing official, with the approval of his or
her council or board, for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance
in office.
The members shall be selected without respect to political
affiliations and they shall serve without compensation.

--- END ---