BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town that is considering a proposal to rezone private
property must ensure that, prior to any hearing at which the rezone
will be considered, written notice of the proposal is provided to the
owners of the real property for which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city that is considering a proposal to rezone private property
must ensure that, prior to any hearing at which the rezone will be
considered, written notice of the proposal is provided to the owners of
the real property for which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that is considering a proposal to rezone private
property must ensure that, prior to any hearing at which the rezone
will be considered, written notice of the proposal is provided to the
owners of the real property for which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Any county, city, or town that is considering a proposal to rezone
private property must ensure that, prior to any hearing at which the
rezone will be considered, written notice of the proposal is provided
to the owners of the real property for which the rezone would apply.

--- END ---