BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
mutual responsibility is required by both bicyclists and motorists to
reduce accidents and conflicts between them. This act is intended to
clarify such mutual responsibilities so that bicyclists and motorists
may be better informed as to safe practices that will help reduce
accidents and conflicts between bicyclists and motorists.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.755 and 2000 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person riding a bicycle upon a roadway shall be granted
all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable
to the driver of a vehicle by this chapter, except as to special
regulations in RCW 46.61.750 through 46.61.780 and except as to those
provisions of this chapter which by their nature can have no
application.
(2) Every person riding a bicycle upon a sidewalk ((or)),
crosswalk, or multiuse trail must be granted all of the rights and is
subject to all of the duties applicable to a pedestrian by this
chapter. Every person riding a bicycle shall yield the right-of-way to
a pedestrian on a sidewalk, crosswalk, or multiuse trail or path;
however, the pedestrian is not relieved of the obligation to exercise
due care.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.770 and 1982 c 55 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person operating a bicycle upon a roadway at a rate of
speed less than the legal and normal flow of traffic at the particular
time and place shall, when traffic is present, ride as near to the
right side of the right through lane as is judged reasonably safe by
the bicyclist except as may be appropriate while preparing to make or
((while)) making turning movements, ((or while)) transiting a
roundabout, overtaking and passing another bicycle or vehicle
proceeding in the same direction, or riding two or more bicycles
abreast.
(2) Subject to the exception in subsection (1) of this section, a
person operating a bicycle upon a roadway at speeds less than the legal
and normal flow of traffic shall, when traffic is present, make use of
a paved shoulder of the roadway or any specially designated bicycle
lane, if such a lane exists, and such use is reasonably judged safe by
the bicyclist.
(3) Subject to the exception in subsection (1) of this section, a
person operating a bicycle upon a roadway or highway ((other than)),
excluding a limited-access highway, ((which roadway or highway)) that
carries traffic in one direction only and has two or more marked
traffic lanes((,)) may ride in the left through lane, and when so
doing, shall ride as near to the left side of the left through lane and
as the bicyclist reasonably judges is safe.
((A person operating a bicycle upon a roadway may use the shoulder
of the roadway or any specially designated bicycle lane if such
exists.)) (4) When a bicyclist is being overtaken on the left and the
lane, including any attached shoulder or bicycle lane, is wide enough
for the vehicle to pass the bicyclist at a safe distance, the bicyclist
shall ride as far to the right as reasonably judged safe by the
bicyclist to facilitate the overtaking.
(5) When a bicyclist is being overtaken on the right and the lane,
including any attached shoulder or bicycle lane, is wide enough for the
vehicle to pass the bicyclist at a safe distance, the bicyclist shall
ride as far to the left as reasonably judged safe by the bicyclist to
facilitate the overtaking.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "safe" includes a reasonable
space of pavement on either side of the bicyclist, a position so as to
be seen and safe from opening vehicle doors and to avoid being passed
at less than a safe distance, and a surface that is free from hazards,
pavement defects, and objects or materials, whether fixed or moveable,
that may obstruct travel, cause a collision or fall, or damage the
bicycle.
(((2))) (7) Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway shall not ride
more than two abreast except when passing other bicycles or riding on
paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Notwithstanding the provisions of this
chapter including, but not limited to, the provisions on rights-of-way,
every driver of a motor vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid
colliding with any bicyclist and shall when necessary to avoid an
imminent or likely collision give warning by sounding the horn or an
appropriate verbal warning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The driver of a motor vehicle
approaching a bicyclist or pedestrian that is on a roadway, shoulder,
or bicycle lane shall pass at a safe distance to clearly avoid coming
into contact with the bicyclist or pedestrian, and shall not again
drive to the side of the roadway occupied by the bicyclist or
pedestrian until safely clear of the overtaken bicyclist or pedestrian.
(2) A safe distance, with respect to passing bicyclists and
pedestrians, is as follows:
(a) When the motor vehicle speed is less than thirty-five miles per
hour, the driver of the motor vehicle shall maintain a minimum of three
feet lateral separation between the closest part of the motor vehicle
and the closest part of the bicycle or pedestrian.
(b) When the motor vehicle speed is thirty-five miles per hour or
more, the driver of the motor vehicle shall maintain a minimum of five
feet lateral separation between the closest part of the motor vehicle
and the closest part of the bicycle or pedestrian to the extent that it
is reasonably feasible and safe; however, the minimum distance of
lateral separation must not be less than three feet.
(c) For the purpose of determining the distance of lateral
separation, a mirror, trailer, or any object connected to or extended
from a motor vehicle or bicycle is considered part of the motor vehicle
or bicycle.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.110 and 2005 c 396 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of
vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those
limitations, exceptions and special rules hereinafter stated:
(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking other traffic proceeding in
the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance
and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely
clear of the overtaken traffic.
(2) The driver of a vehicle approaching a pedestrian or bicycle
that is on the roadway or on the right-hand shoulder or bicycle lane of
the roadway shall pass to the left at a safe distance, as defined in
section 5(2) of this act, to clearly avoid coming into contact with the
pedestrian or bicyclist, and shall not again drive to the right side of
the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken pedestrian or
bicyclist.
(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted,
overtaken traffic shall give way to the right in favor of an overtaking
vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase speed until completely
passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.61.100 and 2007 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) When overtaking and passing a pedestrian or bicyclist in
compliance with section 5 of this act;
(d) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement of traffic under the rules applicable thereon;
(((d))) (e) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic;
or
(((e))) (f) Upon a highway having three lanes or less, when
approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, tow truck or
other vehicle providing roadside assistance while operating warning
lights with three hundred sixty degree visibility, or police vehicle as
described under RCW 46.61.212(((2))) (1)(d)(ii).
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high
occupancy vehicle lane. A high occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. The department of
transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, shall
adopt rules specifying (a) those circumstances where it is permissible
for other vehicles to use the left lane in case of emergency or to
facilitate the orderly flow of traffic, and (b) those segments of
limited access roadway to be exempt from this subsection due to the
operational characteristics of the roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following sections are codified or
recodified in chapter 46.61 RCW under the subheading "bicyclist and
motorist mutual responsibilities":
(1) RCW 46.61.755;
(2) RCW 46.61.770;
(3) Section 4 of this act; and
(4) Section 5 of this act.

--- END ---