BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.400 and 2010 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges are,
subject to subsection (2) of this section, authorized and empowered:
(((1))) (a) To assist the faculties and such other employees as any
such board may designate in the purchase of old age annuities or
retirement income plans under such rules as any such board may
prescribe. County agricultural agents, home demonstration agents, 4-H
club agents, and assistant county agricultural agents paid jointly by
the Washington State University and the several counties shall be
deemed to be full time employees of the Washington State University for
the purposes hereof;
(((2))) (b) To provide, under such rules and regulations as any
such board may prescribe for the faculty members or other employees
under its supervision, for the retirement of any such faculty member or
other employee on account of age or condition of health, retirement on
account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth birthday:
PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other employee may elect to
retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by federal social
security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment
authorized by (c) of this subsection (((3) of this section)) and paid
as a result of retirement earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an
actuarially reduced rate;
(((3))) (c) To pay to any such retired person or to his or her
designated beneficiary(s), each year after his or her retirement, a
supplemental amount which, when added to the amount of such annuity or
retirement income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW
28B.10.415, received by the retired person or the retired person's
designated beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent
of the average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her
highest two consecutive years of full time service under an annuity or
retirement income plan established pursuant to (a) of this subsection
(((1) of this section)) at an institution of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if such retired person prior to retirement
elected a supplemental payment survivors option, any such supplemental
payments to such retired person or the retired person's designated
beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan
authorized by this section dies, or has died before retirement but
after becoming eligible for retirement on account of age, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be entitled to receive the supplemental
payment authorized by this subsection to which such designated
beneficiary(s) would have been entitled had said deceased faculty
member or other employee retired on the date of death after electing a
supplemental payment survivors option: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the
purpose of this subsection, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be
(((a))) (i) the surviving spouse of the retiree; or, (((b))) (ii) with
the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person or
persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life and
shall have been nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the retiree's institution of higher education;
(((4))) (2) The higher education coordinating board is also
authorized and empowered as described in this section, subject to the
following: The board shall only offer participation in a purchased
annuity or retirement income plan authorized under this section to
employees who have previously contributed premiums to a similar
qualified plan, and the board is prohibited from offering or funding
such a plan authorized under this section for the benefit of any
retiree who is receiving or accruing a retirement allowance from a
public employees' retirement system under Title 41 RCW or chapter 43.43
RCW.
(3) Prior to the offer of participation in a purchased annuity or
retirement income plan made upon rehiring any former employee, the
president of each institution of higher education, or the chief
executive officer of the state board for community and technical
colleges or the higher education coordinating board shall submit a
signed affidavit to their respective boards, the higher education and
coordinating board, and the department of retirement systems that the
prospective employee is returning after a break from employment or any
other compensated arrangement with the employer of no less than nine
months, and that at no time before the prior termination from
employment was any oral or written agreement reached with any officer
of the institution to return to employment following a break in
employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.037 and 2007 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer, other than
the employer from which the retiree was last retired from, sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(c)(i) If a retiree enters employment with the same employer from
which the retiree last retired from sooner than nine calendar months
after his or her accrual date, it is presumed that the retiree did not
separate from service and was never eligible for retirement benefits.
(ii) Upon discovery of the reemployment of a retiree under (c)(i)
of this subsection, the department shall immediately commence
collection of any benefits paid during the period as overpayments and
investigate the circumstances of the separation from service and
reemployment.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a retiree from
plan 1 who enters employment with an employer, other than the employer
from which the retiree was last retired from, at least one calendar
month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer,
other than the employer from which the retiree was last retired from,
at least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the employer has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree into
the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the select committee on pension
policy, the legislative evaluation and accountability program, the
legislative systems committee, and the statute law committee; or
according to rules adopted for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members
for a local government employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) For purposes of this section, employment includes positions
covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions
of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(6) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

--- END ---