BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.185.030 and 2009 c 380 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Local school districts may establish and operate, either separately
or jointly, programs for highly capable students. Such authority shall
include the right to employ and pay special instructors and to operate
such programs jointly with a public institution of higher education.
Local school districts which establish and operate programs for highly
capable students shall adopt identification procedures and provide
educational opportunities as follows, to the extent that funds are
available:
(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction, school districts shall implement procedures for
nomination, assessment and selection of their most highly capable
students. Nominations shall be based upon data from teachers, other
staff, parents, students, and members of the community. Assessment
shall be based upon a review of each student's capability as shown by
multiple criteria intended to reveal, from a wide variety of sources
and data, each student's unique needs and capabilities. Selection
shall be made by a broadly based committee of professionals, after
consideration of the results of the multiple criteria assessment.
(2) When a student, who is a child of a military family in
transition, has been assessed or enrolled as highly capable by a
sending school, the receiving school shall initially honor placement of
the student into a like program.
(a) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(b) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments to
determine appropriate placement and continued enrollment in the
program.
(3) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational
opportunity which takes into account each student's unique needs and
capabilities and the limits of the resources and program options
available to the district, including those options which can be
developed or provided by using funds allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for that purpose.
(4) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.210.360 and 2004 c 138 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Consistent with the essential academic learning requirements
for health and fitness, including nutrition, the Washington state
school directors association, with the assistance of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of health, and the
Washington alliance for health, physical education, recreation and
dance, shall convene an advisory committee to develop a model policy
regarding access to nutritious foods, opportunities for developmentally
appropriate exercise, and accurate information related to these topics.
The policy shall address the nutritional content of foods and
beverages, including fluoridated bottled water, sold or provided
throughout the school day or sold in competition with the federal
school breakfast and lunch program and the availability and quality of
health, nutrition, and physical education and fitness curriculum. The
model policy should include the development of a physical education and
fitness curriculum for students. For middle school students, physical
education and fitness curriculum means a daily period of physical
activity, a minimum of twenty minutes of which is aerobic activity in
the student's target heart rate zone, which includes instruction and
practice in basic movement and fine motor skills, progressive physical
fitness, athletic conditioning, and nutrition and wellness instruction
through age-appropriate activities.
(2) The school directors association shall submit the model policy
and recommendations on the related issues, along with a recommendation
for local adoption, to the governor and the legislature and shall post
the model policy on its web site by January 1, 2005.
(3))) Each district's board of directors shall ((establish its
own)) maintain a policy ((by August 1, 2005)) regarding access to
nutritious foods and opportunities for developmentally appropriate
exercise.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.210.370 and 2005 c 462 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of
the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school
districts providing for the in-service training for school staff on
symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with asthma and on the
additional observations that may be needed in different situations that
may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events.
The in-service training shall be offered online to the extent possible
and no more than once every three years. The policy shall include the
standards and skills that must be in place for in-service training of
school staff.
(2) All school districts shall adopt policies regarding asthma
rescue procedures for each school within the district.
(3) All school districts must require that each public elementary
school and secondary school grant to any student in the school
authorization for the self-administration of medication to treat that
student's asthma or anaphylaxis, if:
(a) A health care practitioner prescribed the medication for use by
the student during school hours and instructed the student in the
correct and responsible use of the medication;
(b) The student has demonstrated to the health care practitioner,
or the practitioner's designee, and a professional registered nurse at
the school, the skill level necessary to use the medication and any
device that is necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;
(c) The health care practitioner formulates a written treatment
plan for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes of the student and for
medication use by the student during school hours; and
(d) The student's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to
the school any written documentation required by the school, including
the treatment plan formulated under (c) of this subsection and other
documents related to liability.
(4) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section
must allow the student involved to possess and use his or her
medication:
(a) While in school;
(b) While at a school-sponsored activity, such as a sporting event;
and
(c) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(5) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Must be effective only for the same school and school year for
which it is granted; and
(b) Must be renewed by the parent or guardian each subsequent
school year in accordance with this subsection.
(6) School districts must require that backup medication, if
provided by a student's parent or guardian, be kept at a student's
school in a location to which the student has immediate access in the
event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(7) School districts must require that information described in
subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this section be kept on file at the
student's school in a location easily accessible in the event of an
asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a cause of action or in any
other way increases or diminishes the liability of any person under any
other law.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.210.380 and 2008 c 173 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of health, shall develop anaphylactic
policy guidelines for schools to prevent anaphylaxis and deal with
medical emergencies resulting from it. The policy guidelines shall be
developed with input from pediatricians, school nurses, other health
care providers, parents of children with life-threatening allergies,
school administrators, teachers, and food service directors.
The policy guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A procedure for each school to follow to develop a treatment
plan including the responsibilities ((for [of])) of school nurses and
other appropriate school personnel responsible for responding to a
student who may be experiencing anaphylaxis;
(b) The content of a training course for appropriate school
personnel for preventing and responding to a student who may be
experiencing anaphylaxis. The training shall be offered online to the
extent possible and no more than once every three years;
(c) A procedure for the development of an individualized emergency
health care plan for children with food or other allergies that could
result in anaphylaxis;
(d) A communication plan for the school to follow to gather and
disseminate information on students with food or other allergies who
may experience anaphylaxis;
(e) Strategies for reduction of the risk of exposure to
anaphylactic causative agents including food and other allergens.
(2) For the purpose of this section "anaphylaxis" means a severe
allergic and life-threatening reaction that is a collection of
symptoms, which may include breathing difficulties and a drop in blood
pressure or shock.
(3)(((a) By October 15, 2008, the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to the select interim legislative task force
on comprehensive school health reform created in section 6, chapter 5,
Laws of 2007, on the following:
(i) The implementation within school districts of the 2008
guidelines for care of students with life-threatening food allergies
developed by the superintendent pursuant to section 501, chapter 522,
Laws of 2007, including a review of policies developed by the school
districts, the training provided to school personnel, and plans for
follow-up monitoring of policy implementation; and
(ii) Recommendations on requirements for effectively implementing
the school anaphylactic policy guidelines developed under this section.
(b) By March 31, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report policy guidelines to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to school districts for the districts to use to develop
and adopt their policies.
(4))) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall use the
guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop
and adopt a school district policy for each school in the district to
follow to assist schools to prevent anaphylaxis.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.215.010 and 2006 c 263 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of any school district shall have the power
to establish and maintain preschools and to provide before-and-after-school and vacation care in connection with the common schools of said
district located at such points as the board shall deem most suitable
for the convenience of the public, for the care and instruction of
infants and children residing in said district. The board shall
establish such courses, activities, and rules((, and regulations))
governing preschools and before-and-after-school care as it may deem
best: PROVIDED, That these courses and activities shall meet the
minimum standard for such preschools as established by the United
States department of health, education and welfare, or its successor
agency((, and the superintendent of public instruction)). Except as
otherwise provided by state or federal law, the board of directors may
fix a reasonable charge for the care and instruction of children
attending such schools. The board may, if necessary, supplement such
funds as are received for the superintendent of public instruction or
any agency of the federal government, by an appropriation from the
general school fund of the district.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2009 c 556 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that
students have an opportunity to learn the essential academic learning
requirements in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.
Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and
social studies skills. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school
districts shall annually submit an implementation verification report
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction may not require school
districts to use a classroom-based assessment in social studies, the
arts, and health and fitness to meet the requirements of this section
and shall clearly communicate to districts their option to use other
strategies chosen by the district.
(2) Beginning with the ((2008-09)) 2013-14 school year, school
districts shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade, seventh
or eighth grade, and the eleventh or twelfth grade to each complete at
least one classroom-based assessment in civics. ((Beginning with the
2010-11 school year, school districts shall require students in the
fourth or fifth grade to complete at least one classroom-based
assessment in civics.)) The civics assessment may be selected from a
list of classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the ((2008-09))
2013-14 school year, school districts shall annually submit
implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based
assessments in civics.
(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report
only the information necessary to comply with this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2009 c 578 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety
for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and
procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The
legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans
to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal
assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a
position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting
from natural disasters or man-made disasters.
(2) Within existing resources, the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide guidance to school districts in developing
safe school plans for each school. Schools and school districts
((shall)) may consider the guidance provided by the superintendent of
public instruction((, including the comprehensive school safety
checklist and the model comprehensive safe school plans that include
prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis response, and postcrisis
recovery,)) when developing their own individual ((comprehensive)) safe
school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no later than
September 1, 2008, and ((implement a safe school plan consistent with
the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060. The
plan shall:
(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;
(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;
(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with
students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;
(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency
management division of the state military department in collaboration
with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public
instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory
committee;
(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident
command system;
(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may
be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide
emergency; and
(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement
agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and
county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and
participate in safety-related drills.
(3) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall
annually:
(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local
emergency response agencies;
(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;
(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to
reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:
(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national
incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or
are certified on the incident command system; and
(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation,
to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems,
parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation
agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and
(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency
supplies and notification and alert procedures.
(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall
annually record and report on the information and activities required
in subsection (3) of this section to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency
management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one
tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale
exercises within a four-year period.
(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill
each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less
than one drill using the school mapping information system, one drill
for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, and six drills for fire
evacuation in accordance with the state fire code. Schools should
consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local
events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This
subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for
comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.
(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for
federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington emergency management division of the state military
department.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are
not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other
components of a comprehensive safe school plan)) maintain a safe school
plan that meets federal requirements for school emergency planning.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.320.128 and 2002 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By September 1, 2003,)) Each school district board of
directors shall ((adopt)) have a policy that addresses ((the following
issues:
(a))) procedures for providing notice of threats of violence or
harm to the student or school employee who is the subject of the
threat. The policy shall define "threats of violence or harm."((;
(b) Procedures for disclosing information that is provided to the
school administrators about a student's conduct, including but not
limited to the student's prior disciplinary records, official juvenile
court records, and history of violence, to classroom teachers, school
staff, and school security who, in the judgment of the principal,
should be notified; and
(c) Procedures for determining whether or not any threats or
conduct established in the policy may be grounds for suspension or
expulsion of the student.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
educators and representatives of law enforcement, classified staff, and
organizations with expertise in violence prevention and intervention,
shall adopt a model policy that includes the issues listed in
subsection (1) of this section by January 1, 2003. The model policy
shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.
The school districts, in drafting their own policies, shall review the
model policy.
(3))) (2) School districts, school district boards of directors,
school officials, and school employees providing notice in good faith
as required and consistent with the board's policies adopted under this
section are immune from any liability arising out of such notification.
(((4))) (3) A person who intentionally and in bad faith or
maliciously, knowingly makes a false notification of a threat under
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.89.080 and 2003 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing
rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or
receiving benefits or to be served or to receive benefits from any
storm water control facility or contributing to an increase of surface
water runoff. In fixing rates and charges, the county legislative
authority may in its discretion consider:
(a) Services furnished or to be furnished;
(b) Benefits received or to be received;
(c) The character and use of land or its water runoff
characteristics;
(d) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user;
(e) Income level of persons served or provided benefits under this
chapter, including senior citizens and ((disabled persons)) individuals
with disabilities; or
(f) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(2) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm water
control facilities shall be reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any
new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes a permissive
rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems shall be
properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the building.
The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of ten
percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(3) Rates and charges authorized under this section may not be
imposed on lands taxed as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW or as
timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW. Rates and charges authorized
under this section also may not be imposed on school districts.
(4) The service charges and rates collected shall be deposited in
a special fund or funds in the county treasury to be used only for the
purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and expense of
maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or any
part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing,
acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such
facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of
any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such
purpose.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.220.010 and 1977 c 76 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter ((76, Laws of 1977)) to provide
the students of the state with an improved quality traffic safety
education program and to develop in the youth of this state a knowledge
of the motor vehicle laws, an acceptance of personal responsibility on
the public highways, an understanding of the causes and consequences of
traffic accidents, and to provide training in the skills necessary for
the safe operation of motor vehicles((;)). It is further the purpose
of this chapter to provide financial assistance to the various school
districts while permitting them to achieve economies through options in
the choice of course content and methods of instructions ((by adopting
in whole or with modifications, a program prepared by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction,)) and keeping to a minimum the
amount of estimating, bookkeeping and reporting required of said school
districts for financial reimbursement for such traffic safety education
programs.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220
RCW shall have the following meaning:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" ((shall)) means the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Traffic safety education course" ((shall)) means ((an
accredited)) a course of instruction in traffic safety education
approved by the local school district board of directors which shall
consist of two phases, classroom instruction, and laboratory
experience. "Laboratory experience" shall include on-street, driving
range, or simulator experience or some combination thereof. Each phase
((shall meet basic course requirements which shall be established by
the superintendent of public instruction and each part of said course))
shall be taught by a qualified teacher of traffic safety education.
Any portions of the course may be taught after regular school hours or
on Saturdays as well as on regular school days or as a summer school
course, at the option of the local school districts.
(3) "Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" ((shall)) means
an instructor certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW
((and certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to teach
either the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course, or both, under regulations promulgated by the
superintendent: PROVIDED, That the laboratory experience phase of the
traffic safety education course may be taught by instructors
certificated under rules promulgated by the superintendent of public
instruction, exclusive of any requirement that the instructor be
certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW.
Professional)) who has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction
in the training of drivers approved by the department of licensing or
an instructor((s)) certificated under the provisions of chapter 46.82
RCW((, and participating in this program, shall be subject to
reasonable qualification requirements jointly adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction and the director of licensing.
(4) "Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the
superintendent of public instruction that must be satisfactorily
accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the
traffic safety education course)).

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.220.030 and 2000 c 115 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to
establish a section of traffic safety education, and through such
section shall: Define a "realistic level of effort" required to
provide an effective traffic safety education course, establish a level
of driving competency required of each student to successfully complete
the course, and ensure that an effective statewide program is
implemented and sustained, administer, supervise, and develop the
traffic safety education program and shall assist local school
districts in the conduct of their traffic safety education programs.
The superintendent shall adopt necessary rules and regulations
governing the operation and scope of the traffic safety education
program; and each school district shall submit a report to the
superintendent on the condition of its traffic safety education
program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall monitor the quality
of the program and carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2))) The board of directors of any school district maintaining a
secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive,
may establish and maintain a traffic safety education course. If a
school district elects to offer a traffic safety education course and
has within its boundaries a private accredited secondary school which
includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, at least one class in
traffic safety education shall be given at times other than regular
school hours if there is sufficient demand therefor.
(((3))) (2) The board of directors of a school district, or
combination of school districts, may contract with any drivers' school
licensed under the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the
((laboratory phase of the)) traffic safety education course.
Instructors provided by any such contracting drivers' school must be
properly qualified teachers of traffic safety education under the
((joint qualification)) requirements adopted by the ((superintendent of
public instruction and the)) director of licensing.
(((4) The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number
of hours of continuing traffic safety education for traffic safety
education instructors. The superintendent may phase in the requirement
over not more than five years.))

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.220.040 and 2000 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds
appropriated for traffic safety education.
(((a))) (2) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil
reimbursement amount for the traffic safety education course to be
funded by the state. Each school district offering an approved
standard traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or granted
an amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated.
(((b) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements
to school districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied
the continuing education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(4).
(2))) (3) The board of directors of any school district or
combination of school districts may establish a traffic safety
education fee, which fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by
any duly enrolled student in any such school district prior to or while
enrolled in a traffic safety education course. Traffic safety
education fees collected by a school district shall be deposited with
the county treasurer to the credit of such school district, to be used
to pay costs of the traffic safety education course.

Sec. 14 RCW 46.20.055 and 2010 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of twenty dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program ((offered,))
approved((, and accredited)) by ((the superintendent of public
instruction)) a local school district board of directors or offered by
a driver training school licensed and inspected by the department of
licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit;
(b) The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.20.070 and 2005 c 314 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Agricultural driving permit authorized. The director may issue
a juvenile agricultural driving permit to a person under the age of
eighteen years if:
(a) The application is signed by the applicant and the applicant's
father, mother, or legal guardian;
(b) The applicant has passed the driving examination required by
RCW 46.20.120;
(c) The department has investigated the applicant's need for the
permit and determined that the need justifies issuance;
(d) The department has determined the applicant is capable of
operating a motor vehicle without endangering himself or herself or
other persons and property; and
(e) The applicant has paid a fee of twenty dollars.
The permit must contain a photograph of the person.
(2) Effect of agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit
authorizes the holder to:
(i) Drive a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state in
connection with farm work. The holder may drive only within a
restricted farming locality described on the permit; and
(ii) Participate in the classroom portion of a traffic safety
education course ((authorized)) approved under RCW ((28A.220.030))
28A.220.020 or the classroom portion of a traffic safety education
course offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by
the department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the
community where the holder resides.
(b) The director may transfer the permit from one farming locality
to another. A transfer is not a renewal of the permit.
(3) Term and renewal of agricultural driving permit. An
agricultural driving permit expires one year from the date of issue.
(a) A person under the age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew
the permit by paying a fee of fifteen dollars.
(b) A person applying to renew an agricultural driving permit must
submit the application to the department in person.
(c) An agricultural driving permit is invalidated when a permittee
attains age eighteen. In order to drive a motor vehicle on a highway
he or she must obtain a motor vehicle driver's license under this
chapter.
(4) Suspension, revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole
discretion to suspend, revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural
driving permit if:
(a) The permittee has been found to have committed an offense that
requires mandatory suspension or revocation of a driver's license; or
(b) The director is satisfied that the permittee has violated the
permit's restrictions.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.20.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Application. The application of a person under the age of
eighteen years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must
be signed by a parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the
person under the age of eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian,
then the application must be signed by the minor's employer.
(2) Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the
age of eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet
the traffic safety education requirements of this subsection.
(a) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's
license the applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety
education course as defined in RCW 28A.220.020 for a course offered by
a school district, or as defined by the department of licensing for a
course offered by a driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82
RCW. The course offered by a school district or an approved private
school must meet the standards established by the ((office of the state
superintendent of public instruction)) school district or private
school board of directors. The course offered by a driver training
school must meet the standards established by the department of
licensing. The traffic safety education course may be provided by:
(i) A recognized secondary school; or
(ii) A driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW that
is annually approved by the department of licensing.
(b) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a
motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must successfully complete a
motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards established
by the department of licensing.
(c) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement for a driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the
department's satisfaction that:
(i) He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety
education course;
(ii) A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle;
and
(iii) He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such
a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons or property.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) ((in
concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).
(d) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement if the applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or
motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that he or she has had
education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.210.255 (Provision of health services in public and
private schools -- Employee job description) and 2003 c 172 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.210.365 (Food choice, physical activity, childhood
fitness -- Minimum standards -- District waiver or exemption policy) and
2007 c 5 s 5;
(3) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use of left-hand lane)
and 1986 c 93 s 4;
(4) RCW 28A.220.060 (Information on effects of alcohol and drug
use) and 1991 c 217 s 2;
(5) RCW 28A.220.070 (Rules) and 2000 c 115 s 11;
(6) RCW 28A.220.080 (Information on motorcycle awareness) and 2007
c 97 s 4 & 2004 c 126 s 1;
(7) RCW 28A.220.085 (Information on driving safely among bicyclists
and pedestrians) and 2008 c 125 s 4;
(8) RCW 28A.230.040 (Physical education in grades one through
eight) and 2006 c 263 s 415, 1984 c 52 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.05.030; and
(9) RCW 28A.230.150 (Temperance and Good Citizenship Day -- Aids in
programming) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.090.

--- END ---