BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.1 RCW 35A.12.010 and 2009 c 549 s 3005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The government of any noncharter code city or charter code city
electing to adopt the mayor-council plan of government authorized by
this chapter shall be vested in an elected mayor and an elected
council. The council of a noncharter code city having less than
twenty-five hundred inhabitants shall consist of five members; when
there are twenty-five hundred or more inhabitants, the council shall
consist of seven members. A city with a population of less than
twenty-five hundred at the time of reclassification as an optional
municipal code city may choose to maintain a seven-member council. The
decision concerning the number of councilmembers shall be made by the
council and be incorporated as a section of the ordinance adopting for
the city the classification of noncharter code city. If the population
of a city after having become a code city decreases from twenty-five
hundred or more to less than twenty-five hundred, it shall continue to
have a seven-member council. If, after a city has become a mayor-council code city, its population increases to twenty-five hundred or
more inhabitants, the number of council offices in such city may
increase from five to seven members upon the affirmative vote of a
majority of the existing council to increase the number of council
offices in the city. When the population of a mayor-council code city
having five council offices increases to five thousand or more
inhabitants, the number of council offices in the city shall increase
from five to seven members. In the event of an increase in the number
of council offices, the city council shall, by majority vote, pursuant
to RCW 35A.12.050, appoint two persons to serve in these offices until
the next municipal general election, at which election one person shall
be elected for a two-year term and one person shall be elected for a
four-year term. The number of inhabitants shall be determined by the
most recent official state or federal census or determination by the
state office of financial management. A charter adopted under the
provisions of this title, incorporating the mayor-council plan of
government set forth in this chapter, may provide for an uneven number
of councilmembers not exceeding eleven. For the purposes of
determining population under this section, cities may include or
exclude the population of any state correctional facility located
within the city.
A noncharter code city of less than five thousand inhabitants which
has elected the mayor-council plan of government and which has seven
council offices may establish a five-member council in accordance with
the following procedure. At least six months prior to a municipal
general election, the city council shall adopt an ordinance providing
for reduction in the number of council offices to five. The ordinance
shall specify which two council offices, the terms of which expire at
the next general election, are to be terminated. The ordinance shall
provide for the renumbering of council positions and shall also provide
for a two-year extension of the term of office of a retained council
office, if necessary, in order to comply with RCW 35A.12.040.
However, a noncharter code city that has retained its old mayor-council plan of government, as provided in RCW 35A.02.130, is subject
to the laws applicable to that old plan of government.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.13.010 and 2009 c 549 s 3016 are each amended to
read as follows:
The councilmembers shall be the only elective officers of a code
city electing to adopt the council-manager plan of government
authorized by this chapter, except where statutes provide for an
elective municipal judge. The council shall appoint an officer whose
title shall be "city manager" who shall be the chief executive officer
and head of the administrative branch of the city government. The city
manager shall be responsible to the council for the proper
administration of all affairs of the code city. The council of a
noncharter code city having less than twenty-five hundred inhabitants
shall consist of five members; when there are twenty-five hundred or
more inhabitants the council shall consist of seven members: PROVIDED,
That if the population of a city after having become a code city
decreases from twenty-five hundred or more to less than twenty-five
hundred, it shall continue to have a seven member council. If, after
a city has become a council-manager code city its population increases
to twenty-five hundred or more inhabitants, the number of council
offices in such city may increase from five to seven members upon the
affirmative vote of a majority of the existing council to increase the
number of council offices in the city. When the population of a
council-manager code city having five council offices increases to five
thousand or more inhabitants, the number of council offices in the city
shall increase from five to seven members. In the event of an increase
in the number of council offices, the city council shall, by majority
vote, pursuant to RCW 35A.13.020, appoint two persons to serve in these
offices until the next municipal general election, at which election
one person shall be elected for a two-year term and one person shall be
elected for a four-year term. The number of inhabitants shall be
determined by the most recent official state or federal census or
determination by the state office of financial management. A charter
adopted under the provisions of this title, incorporating the council-manager plan of government set forth in this chapter may provide for an
uneven number of councilmembers not exceeding eleven.
A noncharter code city of less than five thousand inhabitants which
has elected the council-manager plan of government and which has seven
council offices may establish a five-member council in accordance with
the following procedure. At least six months prior to a municipal
general election, the city council shall adopt an ordinance providing
for reduction in the number of council offices to five. The ordinance
shall specify which two council offices, the terms of which expire at
the next general election, are to be terminated. The ordinance shall
provide for the renumbering of council positions and shall also provide
for a two-year extension of the term of office of a retained council
office, if necessary, in order to comply with RCW 35A.12.040.
However, a noncharter code city that has retained its old council-manager plan of government, as provided in RCW 35A.02.130, is subject
to the laws applicable to that old plan of government.
For the purposes of determining population under this section,
cities may include or exclude the population of any state correctional
facility located within the city.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.26.345 and 2005 c 83 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All cities and towns with a population of less than five thousand
are eligible to receive money from the small city pavement and sidewalk
account created under RCW 47.26.340 for maintenance, repair, and
resurfacing of city and town streets. For the purposes of determining
population under this section, cities may include or exclude the
population of any state correctional facility located within the city.
The board shall determine the allocation of money based on:
(1) The amount of available funds within the small city pavement
and sidewalk account;
(2) Whether the city or town meets one or more of the following
criteria:
(a) The city or town has identified a street in a six-year
transportation improvement plan, as defined by RCW 35.77.010, or a
project identified through the use of a pavement management system;
(b) The city or town has provided pavement rating information on
the proposed street improvement or street network improvement;
(c) The city or town has provided sidewalk information on the
proposed sidewalk system improvement;
(d) The city or town has provided information, where available, on
traffic conditions for truck routes, bus routes, and traffic volumes;
(e) The city or town has the ability to provide a local match as
demonstrated by one or more of the following:
(i) A funding match based upon a city's assessed valuation;
(ii) Community involvement and support, including volunteer
participation, such as landscaping and maintaining landscaping along
the street or sidewalk system; or
(iii) Partnership efforts with federal or other state programs,
including the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce mainstreet program.

--- END ---