BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of social and health services has become so large that it:
(a) Is difficult to administer; (b) needs to better focus on critical
functions, such as protecting children and other vulnerable persons;
(c) needs to improve the delivery of the services and programs it is
responsible for; and (d) is difficult to measure the performance of the
agency in meeting its goals and responsibilities.
(2) The legislature finds that these problems are most visible in
the delivery of children's services, a functional area that the
legislature continues to address in a series of reform directives,
including the implementation of performance-based contracts and
redesigning the delivery of child welfare services as a result of
legislation passed in 2009. The legislature also notes that the
experience of best and promising practices strongly points to the
importance of delivering social services on an integrated, coordinated
basis and that modern information technologies and organizational
strategies suggest that smaller functional units can perform better
than large traditional hierarchical organizations. The legislature
finds that although the effectiveness of the department of social and
health services has continued to improve in recent years, further rapid
and substantial improvement must be achieved. Two principal factors in
this subsection compel this judgment.
(a) Cost control. The department now absorbs about one-third of
the state's operating budget, a share of state resources that has grown
over the past decade despite a stated policy of investing in evidence-based and promising practices, each chosen to reduce net taxpayer
costs. Further, both the number and proportion of the state's citizens
receiving services from the department has continued to grow, in part
because the state is now experiencing a historically severe recession.
The legislature assumes that economic recovery will be very slow and
that the concomitant demand for services will remain high while
revenues remain extremely constrained.
(b) Outcomes. Without exception, none of the department's major
programs is achieving completely satisfactory outcomes despite a stated
policy of employing only evidence-based and promising practices, each
chosen to deliver measurable improvement in program effectiveness and
to reduce gradually the dependency of the state's citizens on social
and health services toward a reasonable, safety net minimum. Noting
again that resources are expected to be severely limited for the
foreseeable future, the legislature finds that immediate gains in
program effectiveness are needed to achieve improvement in outcomes.
(3) Therefore, the legislature finds that the state's overall
delivery of health and human services through the department of social
and health services and allied agencies must be restructured to respond
to the current recession, to achieve cost-effectiveness of operations,
and to organize the delivery of health and human services through an
integrated services model which includes relevant agencies and
organizations including those at the local service delivery level.

PART I
RESTRUCTURING OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of social and health services is renamed the
social and health care authority. The authority is restructured and,
except as otherwise provided in this section, its powers, duties, and
functions are transferred to the new departments of mental health and
chemical dependency services, long-term care and rehabilitative
services, and children and family services as determined by the
realignment team established under section 507 of this act. All
references to the secretary or the department of social and health
services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean
the director of the social and health care authority or the director of
the appropriate department, or the social and health care authority or
the appropriate department, created under this act.
(b) The social and health care authority shall retain
responsibilities described in section 102 of this act.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to functions transferred under
this section shall be delivered to the custody of the realignment team
created under section 507 of this act to be transferred to the
appropriate department created under this act. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of social and health services in
carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be
made available to the realignment team to be transferred to the
appropriate department. All funds, credits, or other assets held by
the department of social and health services in connection with the
powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the
appropriate department by the realignment team.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the appropriate department by the
realignment team.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the realignment team established
under section 507 of this act to be transferred to the appropriate
department. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to their respective departments
to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without
any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and
functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
appropriate department created under this act. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the appropriate department.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
The social and health care authority has the following
responsibilities that were previously the responsibility of the
department of social and health services.
(1) Economic services activities. The social and health care
authority shall make eligibility determinations for assistance
programs; coordinate child support recovery and enforcement activities;
manage federal and state food assistance programs; administer federal
and state cash assistance programs for needy families and individuals;
and administer payment programs that provide child care services.
(2) State health care purchasing functions. The social and health
care authority shall administer the medical assistance, medical care
services, and children's health programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, the
basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW, and health benefit programs
for public employees under chapter 41.05 RCW; coordinate the purchase
of health care services under the programs that it administers using
cost control and service delivery strategies; and establish common
billing, purchasing, and auditing practices, including the development
of practices related to pharmacy audits and billing in consultation
with the Washington state pharmacy association and other interested
parties.
(3) Systems oversight functions. The social and health care
authority has oversight responsibility for the new departments of
mental health and chemical dependency services, children and family
services, and long-term care and rehabilitative services pertaining to
systems oversight, including performance and quality management;
performance and financial audits; investigations and enforcement; and
client advocacy. The authority must ensure that quality management
plans, including Washington state quality award assessments, are put in
place by the new departments.

PART II
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of mental health and chemical
dependency services. The department is vested with all powers and
duties transferred to it under this chapter, section 507 of this act,
and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of mental health and chemical
dependency services.
(2) "Director" means the director of mental health and chemical
dependency services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in sections 101 and 102 of this
act, to place the internal affairs of the department under the control
of the director in order that the director may institute therein the
flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the
general administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of mental health and
chemical dependency services to the director, the director's personal
secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and assistant
directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART III
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of children and family
services. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter, section 507 of this act, and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of children and family
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of children and family services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in sections 101 and 102 of this
act, to place the internal affairs of the department under the control
of the director in order that the director may institute therein the
flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the
general administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of children and
family services to the director, the director's personal secretary, the
deputy director, all division directors and assistant directors, and
one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF LONG-TERM CARE AND REHABILITATIVE SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of long-term care and
rehabilitative services. The department is vested with all powers and
duties transferred to it under this chapter, section 507 of this act,
and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of long-term care and
rehabilitative services.
(2) "Director" means the director of long-term care and
rehabilitative services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible, except as provided in sections 101 and 102 of this
act, to place the internal affairs of the department under the control
of the director in order that the director may institute therein the
flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the
general administration of the department. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 The director shall appoint a deputy
director and such assistant directors as may be needed to administer
the department. The deputy director shall have charge and general
supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the
director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of director, shall
continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and
qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of long-term care and
rehabilitative services to the director, the director's personal
secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and assistant
directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 501 RCW 43.17.010 and 2009 c 565 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the ((department of)) social and health ((services)) care
authority, (2) the department of ecology, (3) the department of labor
and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5) the department
of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7) the
department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration,
(9) the department of commerce, (10) the department of veterans
affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department of
retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
(16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the
department of early learning, ((and)) (18) the Puget Sound partnership,
and (19) the department of children and family services, which shall be
charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such
laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such
duties, as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 502 RCW 43.17.020 and 2009 c 565 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The ((secretary)) director of the social and health
((services)) care authority, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5)
the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation,
(7) the director of licensing, (8) the director of general
administration, (9) the director of commerce, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of
retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the
secretary of health, (15) the director of financial institutions, (16)
the director of the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, (17) the director of early learning, ((and)) (18) the
executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, and (19) the
director of children and family services.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 503 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the director of the state system of community and technical colleges,
the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive
director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation
and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the
director of revenue, the ((secretary)) director of the social and
health ((services)) care authority, the chief of the Washington state
patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, ((and)) each district and
each campus president of each state community college, and the director
of children and family services;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public
disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines
hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western
Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 504 RCW 43.17.010 and 2011 c ... s 501 (section 501 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the social and health care authority, (2) the department
of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4) the
department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife, (6)
the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing, (8)
the department of general administration, (9) the department of
commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department
of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the
department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the
department of financial institutions, (16) the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the department of early
learning, (18) the Puget Sound partnership, ((and)) (19) the department
of children and family services, (20) the department of mental health
and chemical dependency services, and (21) the department of long-term
care and rehabilitative services, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 505 RCW 43.17.020 and 2011 c ... s 502 (section 502 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The director of the social and health care authority,
(2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries,
(4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife,
(6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8)
the director of general administration, (9) the director of commerce,
(10) the director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue,
(12) the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of
corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15) the director of
financial institutions, (16) the director of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the director of early
learning, (18) the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership,
((and)) (19) the director of children and family services, (20) the
director of mental health and chemical dependency services, and (21)
the director of long-term care and rehabilitative services.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 506 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2011 c ... s 503 (section 503 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department
of information services, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound
partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
director of the social and health care authority, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax
appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, each district and
each campus president of each state community college, ((and)) the
director of children and family services, the director of mental health
and chemical dependency services, and the director of long-term care
and rehabilitative services;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 (1) A realignment team shall be formed by
July 1, 2011, to direct the details of administration of this act. The
governor shall appoint representatives from the office of financial
management, the divisions of the department of social and health
services, and other agency representatives as warranted. Leadership
from each of the two major caucuses in the house of representatives and
the senate shall appoint a member to the realignment team.
(2) The realignment team shall determine which functions of the
department of social and health services shall be transferred into the
new departments under this act after the effective date of this
section. The realignment team may propose an alternative structural
plan if it finds that such a change would be more efficient and
effective.
(3) The realignment team shall fully involve the office of the
state auditor and relevant stakeholders, including local government and
community service providers. The realignment team shall consult
regularly with the chairs and ranking minority members, or their
designees of the relevant policy and fiscal committees in the house of
representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 (1) The realignment team created in
section 507 of this act shall, by December 1, 2011, submit a plan and
necessary implementing legislation to the legislature for the
restructuring of the department of social and health services. The
plan shall be designed so that the department of children and family
services will be operating by July 1, 2012, and the department of
mental health and chemical dependency services and the department of
long-term care and rehabilitative services, or similar structure will
be operating by July 1, 2013.
(2) The plan shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements:
(a) Strategies for dividing the functions and responsibilities of
the department into the appropriate new agencies including a strategic
plan for each new agency created in this act that includes
implementation steps, performance measures, evaluation measures, and
methods for functional collaboration among programs and agencies;
(b) Recommendations for changes in existing programs and functions
of the department of social and health services; and
(c) Implementation steps necessary to bring about operation of the
new agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 Sections 201 through 207 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 Sections 301 through 307 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 Sections 401 through 407 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 Section 507 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 Sections 101, 102, 301 through 308, and
501 through 503 of this act take effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 Sections 201 through 208, 401 through 408,
and 504 through 506 of this act take effect July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---