BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.81.080 and 2002 c 218 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A municipality shall have the right to acquire by condemnation, in
accordance with the procedure provided for condemnation by such
municipality for other purposes, any interest in real property, which
it may deem necessary for a community renewal project under this
chapter after the adoption by the local governing body of a resolution
declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein
is necessary for such purpose. Condemnation for community renewal of
blighted areas is declared to be a public use, and property already
devoted to any other public use or acquired by the owner or a
predecessor in interest by eminent domain may be condemned for the
purposes of this chapter: PROVIDED, That unless the real property
which is subject of the condemnation poses an identifiable threat to
public health, safety, or welfare by reason of the insanitary, unsafe,
or substandard condition of the premises or the unlawful use thereof,
any municipality condemning real property under this chapter shall have
a public purpose as enumerated in RCW 8.12.030 for the real property
being acquired. Whenever a municipality seeks to condemn real property
because it poses an identifiable threat to public health, safety, or
welfare by reason of the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard condition
of the premises or the unlawful use thereof, the municipality shall
comply with the requirements of section 2 of this act.
The award of compensation for real property taken for such a
project shall not be increased by reason of any increase in the value
of the real property caused by the assembly, clearance, or
reconstruction, or proposed assembly, clearance, or reconstruction in
the project area. No allowance shall be made for the improvements
begun on real property after notice to the owner of such property of
the institution of proceedings to condemn such property. Evidence
shall be admissible bearing upon the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard
condition of the premises, or the unlawful use thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.81 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within one hundred twenty days of the adoption of an ordinance
under RCW 35.81.050(1), or within one hundred twenty days of the
effective date of this section, the owner or owners in whole or part of
any real property subject to an action by a municipality to condemn
property because it poses an identifiable threat to public health,
safety, or welfare by reason of the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard
condition of the premises or the unlawful use thereof may file an
appeal in the superior court of the county in which the real property
is located to determine whether the real property poses an identifiable
threat to public health, safety, or welfare by reason of the
insanitary, unsafe, or substandard condition of the premises or the
unlawful use thereof, or to give the owner or owners a reasonable
opportunity to remove any threat to public health, safety, or welfare
by reason of the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard condition of the
premises or the unlawful use thereof.
(2) In any appeal filed under subsection (1) of this section, the
municipality has the burden of showing that its finding that real
property which is subject of the condemnation poses an identifiable
threat to public health, safety, or welfare was supported by
substantial evidence at the time the ordinance was adopted.
(3) If the court determines that the condition of the real property
does not constitute a threat to public health, safety, or welfare, or
that it has been repaired so as to eliminate the threat to public
health, safety, or welfare, the court shall enter an order that the
real property is not subject to condemnation by reason of a threat to
public health, safety, or welfare.
(4) Where the municipality meets its evidentiary burden of showing
that substantial evidence supports the finding that the real property
which is subject of the condemnation poses an identifiable threat to
public health, safety, or welfare, the court shall make detailed
findings of all physical conditions of the property which directly
contribute to the threat to public health, safety, or welfare.
However, if the court determines that the real property can be
reasonably and timely repaired to eliminate the threat to public
health, safety, or welfare, the court shall give the owner or owners of
the real property a reasonable, identified period of time to cure and
correct those detailed physical conditions of the property which
directly contribute to the threat to public health, safety, or welfare,
provided that the owner or owners can satisfactorily show the court
that the owner or owners can address any immediate health and safety
concerns.
(5) During the period of time the court grants the owner or owners
of the real property to cure and correct the detailed physical
conditions of the property, any action by the municipality on the
condemnation is stayed. The municipality is not liable for any
injuries, losses, or damages resulting from the condition of the
property occurring during the stay, or resulting from the delay in or
failure to cure, correct, or abate any known or unknown condition on
the property.
(6) If the owner or owners cannot correct the threat to public
health, safety, or welfare within the time provided by the court, the
municipality is entitled to pursue the condemnation in the normal
course.

--- END ---