BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vehicle must be
submitted by the owner or the owner's representative to the department,
participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by
the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must
contain:
(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle
identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, when required;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
title, including a quick title service fee under section 2 of this act;
and
(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of title printed at the time of application.
(6) The quick title process authorized under this section may not
be used to obtain the first title issued to a vehicle previously
designated as a salvage vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.514.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
under the subchapter heading "certificate of title fees" to read as
follows:
Before accepting an application for a quick title of a vehicle
under section 1 of this act, the department, participating county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall
require the applicant to pay a seventy-five dollar quick title service
fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The quick
title service fee must be distributed under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The quick title service fee imposed under section 2 of this act
must be distributed as follows:
(a) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.
(b) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other
agent or subagent appointed by the director thirty-seven dollars and
fifty cents must be deposited to the motor vehicle fund established
under RCW 46.68.070. The remainder must be retained by the county
treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county
auditor.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" has the same
meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
under the subchapter heading "certificates of title" to read as
follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vessel must be made by
the owner or the owner's representative to the department,
participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by
the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must
contain:
(a) A description of the vessel, including make, model, hull
identification number, series, and body;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vessel and, if the vessel is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
title, including a quick title service fee under RCW 88.02.640(1); and
(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of title printed at the time of application.

Sec. 5 RCW 88.02.640 and 2010 c 161 s 1028 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge the following vessel fees:

FEE AMOUNT AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit $5.00 RCW 88.02.800(2) General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and
invasive species removal Subsection (3) of this
section Subsections (3) and (4) of
this section Subsection (3) of this
section

(c) Duplicate registration $1.25 RCW 88.02.590(1)(c) General fund

(d) Filing RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.68.440

(e) License plate
technology RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.68.400

(f) License service RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.68.220

(g) Nonresident vessel
permit $25.00 RCW 88.02.620(3) Subsection (6) of this
section

(h) Quick title service $75.00 Section 4 of this act Subsection (7) of this
section

(i) Registration $10.50 RCW 88.02.560(2) General fund

(((i))) (j) Replacement
decal $1.25 RCW 88.02.595(1)(c) General fund

(((j))) (k) Title application $5.00 RCW 88.02.515 General fund

(((k))) (l) Transfer $1.00 RCW 88.02.560(7) General fund

(((l))) (m) Vessel visitor
permit $30.00 RCW 88.02.610(3) General fund

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in
subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of
registration fees at the time application for registration is made.
(3)(a) Until June 30, 2012, the derelict vessel and invasive
species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five
dollars and must be distributed as follows:
(i) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(ii) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;
(iii) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive
species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and
(iv) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100.
(b) On and after June 30, 2012, the derelict vessel and invasive
species removal fee is two dollars and must be deposited into the
derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100. If the
department of natural resources indicates that the balance of the
derelict vessel removal account, not including any transfer or
appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited into the
account collected under subsection (5) of this section reaches one
million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two
dollar derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee must be
suspended for the following fiscal year.
(4) Until January 1, 2014, an annual derelict vessel removal
surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration.
The surcharge:
(a) Is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
accumulated in Washington state waters that pose a threat to the health
and safety of the people and to the environment;
(b) Is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are less
than seventy-five feet in length; and
(c) Must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100.
(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be
paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing
the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining
from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties
by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW
88.02.655.
(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed
as follows:
(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the vessel visitor permit;
(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state
treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.655; and
(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are
in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and
registration of vessels.
(7)(a) The seventy-five dollar quick title service fee must be
distributed as follows:
(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or
other agent appointed by the director thirty-seven dollars and fifty
cents must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be
retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees
collected by the county auditor.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same
meaning as in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.17.040 and 2010 c 161 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
A subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee
of:
(1) ((Ten)) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title,
with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and
preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the
certificate of title application or transfer; ((and))
(2) ((Four)) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a
transit permit, or any other service under this section; and
(3) Beginning January 1, 2013, twenty-five dollars for a vehicle or
vessel quick title transaction with or without registration renewal,
provided that the county auditor or other agent is also providing quick
title services in the county in which the subagent is located and the
county auditor or other agent has selected the subagent to perform
quick title services. The twenty-five dollar fee is not in addition to
the fee in subsection (1) of this section, but is in addition to the
fee in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of licensing and
participating county auditors and other agents must provide a report to
the senate and house of representatives transportation committees by
January 1, 2012, identifying any implementation issues and
recommendations to improve the process for offering vehicle and vessel
quick titles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to quick title transactions
processed on and after January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Except for section 7 of this act, this act
takes effect January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 7 of this act takes effect August
1, 2011.

--- END ---