BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.65.280 and 2010 c 8 s 6075 are each amended to read
as follows:
The powers and duties of the board shall be:
(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as it deems advisable;
(2) To advise and counsel the director with respect to the
administration and conduct of such marketing agreement or order;
(3) To recommend to the director administrative rules and orders
and amendments thereto for the exercise of his or her powers in
connection with such agreement or order;
(4) To advise the director upon any and all assessments provided
pursuant to the terms of such agreement or order and upon the
collection, deposit, withdrawal, disbursement and paying out of all
moneys;
(5) To assist the director in the collection of such necessary
information and data as the director may deem necessary in the proper
administration of this chapter;
(6) To administer the order or agreement as its administrative
board if the director designates it so to do in such order or
agreement;
(7) To work cooperatively with other local, state, and federal
agencies; universities; and national organizations for the purposes
provided in the board's marketing order or agreement;
(8) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement.
Personal service contracts must comply with chapter 39.29 RCW;
(9) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests,
contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public
agencies to carry out the purposes provided in the board's marketing
order or agreement;
(10) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal
counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of a board. The retention
of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of the
attorney general;
(11) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the
purpose of supporting activities of the board authorized by the
marketing order or agreement;
(12) To enter into contracts or agreements for research in the
production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, use, or
distribution of an affected commodity;
(13) To participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution,
sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized
under RCW ((42.17.190)) 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(14) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected
producers that may be compiled from information used to collect
assessments under the marketing order or agreement, and data on the
value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;
(15) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who
handle the affected commodity within the affected area and data on the
amount and value of the commodity handled for a minimum three-year
period by each person; and
(16) To perform such other duties as the director may prescribe in
the marketing agreement or order.
Any agreement or order under which the commodity board administers
the order or agreement shall (if so requested by the affected producers
within the affected area in the proposal or promulgation hearing)
contain provisions whereby the director reserves the power to approve
or disapprove every order, rule or directive issued by the board, in
which event such approval or disapproval shall be based on whether or
not the director believes the board's action has been carried out in
conformance with the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.66.140 and 2003 c 396 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every commodity commission shall have such powers and duties in
accordance with provisions of this chapter as may be provided in the
marketing order and shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as determined
advisable;
(2) To adopt, rescind and amend rules and regulations reasonably
necessary for the administration and operation of the commission and
the enforcement of its duties under the marketing order;
(3) To administer, enforce, direct and control the provisions of
the marketing order and of this chapter relating thereto;
(4) To employ and discharge at its discretion such administrators
and additional personnel, attorneys, advertising and research agencies
and other persons and firms that it may deem appropriate and pay
compensation to the same;
(5) To acquire personal property and purchase or lease office space
and other necessary real property and transfer and convey the same;
(6) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions, including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction or civil
recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
governmental authorities necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter and of the marketing order;
(7) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements,
which records shall be open to inspection and audit by the state
auditor or private auditor designated by the state auditor at least
every five years;
(8) Borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(9) Make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;
(10) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and
leadership programs as each commission deems expedient;
(11) To work cooperatively with other local, state, and federal
agencies; universities; and national organizations for the purposes
provided in the commission's marketing order;
(12) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes provided in the commission's marketing order.
Personal service contracts must comply with chapter 39.29 RCW;
(13) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests,
contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public
agencies to carry out the purposes provided in the commission's
marketing order;
(14) To enter into contracts or agreements for research in the
production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, use, or
distribution of an affected commodity;
(15) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal
counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of a commission. The
retention of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of
the attorney general;
(16) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the
purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized by the
marketing order;
(17) To participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution,
sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized
under RCW ((42.17.190)) 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(18) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected
producers that may be compiled from information used to collect
assessments under the provisions of the marketing order and data on the
value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;
(19) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who
handle the affected commodity within the affected area and data on the
amount and value of the commodity handled for a minimum three-year
period by each person;
(20) To request records and audit the records of producers or
handlers of the affected commodity during normal business hours to
determine whether the appropriate assessment has been paid;
(21) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or
patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded
research related to the affected commodity; and
(22) Such other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.89.070 and 2009 c 373 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such
events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW ((42.17.190)) 42.17A.635, including the reporting
of those activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter;
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer;
(17) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or
private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission
and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of
the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.115.140 and 2009 c 33 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission is an agency of the Washington state government
subject to oversight by the director. In exercising its powers and
duties, the commission shall carry out the following purposes:
(a) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and
sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or
larger markets for wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(b) To engage in cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign
marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(c) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more
efficient methods of production, irrigation, processing,
transportation, handling, and marketing of wheat and barley grown in
Washington;
(d) To adopt rules to provide for improving standards and grades by
defining, establishing, and providing labeling requirements with
respect to wheat and barely grown in Washington;
(e) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair
trade practices relating to wheat and barley grown in Washington;
(f) To provide information or communicate on matters pertaining to
the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, or
uses of wheat and barley grown in Washington to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency;
(g) To provide marketing information and services for producers of
wheat and barley in Washington;
(h) To provide information and services for meeting resource
conservation objectives of producers of wheat and barley in Washington;
(i) To provide for education and training related to wheat and
barley grown in Washington; and
(j) To assist and cooperate with the department or any local,
state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of
exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect the production or
trade of wheat and barley grown in Washington.
(2) The commission has the following powers and duties:
(a) To collect the assessments of producers as provided in this
chapter and to expend the same in accordance with this chapter;
(b) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected
producers that may be compiled from information used to collect
assessments authorized under this chapter and data on the value of each
producer's production for a minimum three-year period;
(c) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who
handle wheat or barley within the affected area and data on the amount
and value of the wheat and barley handled for a minimum three-year
period by each person;
(d) To request records and audit the records of producers or
handlers of wheat or barley during normal business hours to determine
whether the appropriate assessment has been paid;
(e) To fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific
research relating to wheat or barley, including but not limited to
research to find more efficient methods of irrigation, production,
processing, handling, transportation, and marketing of wheat or barley,
or regarding pests, pesticides, food safety, irrigation,
transportation, and environmental stewardship related to wheat or
barley;
(f) To work cooperatively with local, state, and federal agencies,
universities, and national organizations for the purposes provided in
this chapter;
(g) To establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money
when the foundation benefits the wheat or barley industry in Washington
and implements the purposes provided in this chapter;
(h) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or
patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded
research related to wheat or barley;
(i) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes and powers provided in this chapter, including
specifically contracts or agreements for research described in (e) of
this subsection. Personal service contracts must comply with chapter
39.29 RCW;
(j) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction or civil
recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
governmental authorities;
(k) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal
counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The
retention of a private attorney is subject to review and approval by
the office of the attorney general;
(l) To elect a chair and other officers as determined advisable;
(m) To employ and discharge at its discretion administrators and
additional personnel, advertising and research agencies, and other
persons and firms as appropriate and pay compensation;
(n) To acquire personal property and purchase or lease office space
and other necessary real property and transfer and convey that real
property;
(o) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements
by commodity, which records must be open to inspection and audit by the
state auditor or private auditor designated by the state auditor at
least every five years;
(p) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(q) To make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;
(r) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and
leadership programs as the commission deems expedient;
(s) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests,
contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public
agencies to carry out the purposes provided in this chapter;
(t) To apply for and administer federal market access programs or
similar programs or projects and provide matching funds as may be
necessary;
(u) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the
purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized in this
chapter;
(v) To participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution,
sale, or use of wheat or barley; or the regulation of the manufacture,
distribution, sale, or use of any pesticide, as defined in chapter
15.58 RCW, or any agricultural chemical which is of use or potential
use in producing wheat or barley. This participation may include
activities authorized under RCW ((42.17.190)) 42.17A.635, including the
reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;
(w) To speak on behalf of the Washington state government on a
nonexclusive basis regarding issues related to wheat and barley,
including but not limited to trade negotiations and market access
negotiations and to fund industry organizations engaging in those
activities;
(x) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules and regulations reasonably
necessary for the administration and operation of the commission and
the enforcement of its duties under this chapter;
(y) To administer, enforce, direct, and control the provisions of
this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter; and
(z) Other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.25.210 and 2008 c 134 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. If the commission intends to
conduct a pilot project, it must provide a notice in writing to the
secretary by June 1, 2008. If the commission chooses to conduct a
pilot project, the pilot project shall begin on July 1, 2008, and
conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 ((and 42.17.370)); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to chiropractors licensed under this chapter;
and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.79.390, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.32.765 and 2008 c 134 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. If the commission intends to
conduct a pilot project, it must provide a notice in writing to the
secretary by June 1, 2008. If the commission chooses to conduct a
pilot project, the pilot project shall begin on July 1, 2008, and
conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 ((and 42.17.370)); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to its professions, dentists licensed under this
chapter and expanded function dental auxiliaries and dental assistants
regulated under chapter 18.260 RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.79.390, and 18.25.210, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.71.430 and 2008 c 134 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 ((and 42.17.370)); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to its professions, physicians regulated under
this chapter and physician assistants regulated under chapter 18.71A
RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.79.390, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.79.390 and 2008 c 134 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 ((and 42.17.370)); and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to advanced registered nurses, registered
nurses, and licensed practical nurses regulated under this chapter; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium, the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.09.020 and 2007 c 471 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) A "bona fide officer or employee" of a charitable organization
is one (a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such
organization; (b) who does not act in the manner of an independent
contractor in his or her relation with the organization; and (c) whose
compensation is not computed on funds raised or to be raised.
(2) "Charitable organization" means any entity that solicits or
collects contributions from the general public where the contribution
is or is purported to be used to support a charitable purpose, but does
not include any commercial fund-raiser, commercial fund-raising entity,
commercial coventurer, or any fund-raising counsel, as defined in this
section. Churches and their integrated auxiliaries are not charitable
organizations, but are subject to RCW 19.09.100 (12), (15), and (18).
(3) "Charitable purpose" means any religious, charitable,
scientific, testing for public safety, literary, or educational purpose
or any other purpose that is beneficial to the community, including
environmental, humanitarian, patriotic, or civic purposes, the support
of national or international amateur sports competition, the prevention
of cruelty to children or animals, the advancement of social welfare,
or the benefit of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, and other
persons who protect public safety. The term "charitable" is used in
its generally accepted legal sense and includes relief of the poor, the
distressed, or the underprivileged; advancement of religion;
advancement of education or science; erecting or maintaining public
buildings, monuments, or works; lessening the burdens of government;
lessening neighborhood tensions; eliminating prejudice and
discrimination; defending human and civil rights secured by law; and
combating community deterioration and juvenile delinquency.
(4) "Commercial coventurer" means any individual or corporation,
partnership, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or any other legal entity,
that:
(a) Is regularly and primarily engaged in making sales of goods or
services for profit directly to the general public;
(b) Is not otherwise regularly or primarily engaged in making
charitable solicitations in this state or otherwise raising funds in
this state for one or more charitable organizations;
(c) Represents to prospective purchasers that, if they purchase a
good or service from the commercial coventurer, a portion of the sales
price or a sum of money or some other specified thing of value will be
donated to a named charitable organization; and
(d) Does not ask purchasers to make checks or other instruments
payable to a named charitable organization or any entity other than the
commercial coventurer itself under its regular commercial name.
(5) "Commercial fund-raiser" or "commercial fund-raising entity"
means any entity that for compensation or other consideration within
this state directly or indirectly solicits or receives contributions
for or on behalf of any charitable organization or charitable purpose,
or that is engaged in the business of or is held out to persons in this
state as independently engaged in the business of soliciting or
receiving contributions for such purposes. However, a commercial
coventurer, fund-raising counsel, or consultant is not a commercial
fund-raiser or commercial fund-raising entity.
(6) "Compensation" means salaries, wages, fees, commissions, or any
other remuneration or valuable consideration.
(7) "Contribution" means the payment, donation, promise, or grant,
for consideration or otherwise, of any money or property of any kind or
value which contribution is wholly or partly induced by a solicitation.
Reference to dollar amounts of "contributions" or "solicitations" in
this chapter means in the case of payments or promises to pay for
merchandise or rights of any description, the value of the total amount
paid or promised to be paid for such merchandise or rights.
(8) "Cost of solicitation" means and includes all direct and
indirect costs, expenditures, debts, obligations, salaries, wages,
commissions, fees, or other money or thing of value paid or incurred in
making a solicitation.
(9) "Entity" means an individual, organization, group, association,
partnership, corporation, agency or unit of state government, or any
combination thereof.
(10) "Fund-raising counsel" or "consultant" means any entity or
individual who is retained by a charitable organization, for a fixed
fee or rate, that is not computed on a percentage of funds raised, or
to be raised, under a written agreement only to plan, advise, consult,
or prepare materials for a solicitation of contributions in this state,
but who does not manage, conduct, or carry on a fund-raising campaign
and who does not solicit contributions or employ, procure, or engage
any compensated person to solicit contributions, and who does not at
any time have custody or control of contributions. A volunteer,
employee, or salaried officer of a charitable organization maintaining
a permanent establishment or office in this state is not a fund-raising
counsel. An attorney, investment counselor, or banker who advises an
individual, corporation, or association to make a charitable
contribution is not a fund-raising counsel as a result of the advice.
(11) "General public" or "public" means any individual located in
Washington state without a membership or other official relationship
with a charitable organization before a solicitation by the charitable
organization.
(12) "Membership" means that for the payment of fees, dues,
assessments, etc., an organization provides services and confers a bona
fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor, or other direct
benefit, in addition to the right to vote, elect officers, or hold
office. The term "membership" does not include those persons who are
granted a membership upon making a contribution as the result of
solicitation.
(13) "Other employee" of a charitable organization means any person
(a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such organization;
(b) who does not act in the manner of any independent contractor in his
or her relation with the organization; and (c) who is not engaged in
the business of or held out to persons in this state as independently
engaged in the business of soliciting contributions for charitable
purposes or religious activities.
(14) "Political organization" means those organizations whose
activities are subject to chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW or the federal
elections campaign act of 1971, as amended.
(15) "Religious organization" means those entities that are not
churches or integrated auxiliaries and includes nondenominational
ministries, interdenominational and ecumenical organizations, mission
organizations, speakers' organizations, faith-based social agencies,
and other entities whose principal purpose is the study, practice, or
advancement of religion.
(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of state.
(17) "Signed" means hand-written, or, if the secretary adopts rules
facilitating electronic filing that pertain to this chapter, in the
manner prescribed by those rules.
(18)(a) "Solicitation" means any oral or written request for a
contribution, including the solicitor's offer or attempt to sell any
property, rights, services, or other thing in connection with which:
(i) Any appeal is made for any charitable purpose;
(ii) The name of any charitable organization is used as an
inducement for consummating the sale; or
(iii) Any statement is made that implies that the whole or any part
of the proceeds from the sale will be applied toward any charitable
purpose or donated to any charitable organization.
(b) The solicitation shall be deemed completed when made, whether
or not the person making it receives any contribution or makes any
sale.
(c) "Solicitation" does not include bingo activities, raffles, and
amusement games conducted under chapter 9.46 RCW and applicable rules
of the Washington state gambling commission.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.34.240 and 2005 c 274 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By accepting a certificate issued by a licensed certification
authority, the subscriber identified in the certificate assumes a duty
to exercise reasonable care to retain control of the private key and
prevent its disclosure to a person not authorized to create the
subscriber's digital signature. The subscriber is released from this
duty if the certificate expires or is revoked.
(2) A private key is the personal property of the subscriber who
rightfully holds it.
(3) A private key in the possession of a state agency or local
agency, as those terms are defined by RCW ((42.17.020)) 42.17A.005, is
exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.15.610 and 2009 c 179 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to or affect any
student fee or charge which the students voluntarily maintain upon
themselves for student purposes only. Students are authorized to
create or increase voluntary student fees for each academic year when
passed by a majority vote of the student government or its equivalent,
or referendum presented to the student body or such other process that
has been adopted under this section. Notwithstanding RCW ((42.17.190))
42.17A.635 (2) and (3), voluntary student fees imposed under this
section and services and activities fees may be used for lobbying by a
student government association or its equivalent and may also be used
to support a statewide or national student organization or its
equivalent that may engage in lobbying.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.133.030 and 2003 c 19 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The students with dependents grant account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the program shall be
deposited into the account. Only the higher education coordinating
board, or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the account.
Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The board may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments
from private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the educational
assistance grant program. The executive director, or the executive
director's designee, may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income
from the private sources according to their terms unless the receipt of
the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW ((42.17.710)) 42.17A.560.
(3) The earnings on the account shall be used solely for the
purposes in RCW 28B.133.010, except when the terms of a conditional
gift of private moneys in the account require that a portion of
earnings on such moneys be reinvested in the account.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2009 c 415 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet published or distributed under RCW 29A.32.010
must contain:
(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the
people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, from
candidates for the office of president and vice president of the United
States, United States senator, United States representative, governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state
auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, superintendent
of public instruction, insurance commissioner, state senator, state
representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit
campaign contact information and a photograph not more than five years
old in a format that the secretary of state determines to be suitable
for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) Contact information for the public disclosure commission
established under RCW ((42.17.350)) 42.17A.100;
(5) Contact information for major political parties;
(6) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080; and
(7) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.84.250 and 2003 c 111 s 2113 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who:
(1) For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or
declines to sign any initiative or referendum petition; or
(2) Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring
signatures on an initiative or referendum petition if any part of the
consideration is based upon the number of signatures solicited or
procured, or offers to provide or agrees to receive such consideration
any of which is based on the number of signatures solicited or
procured; or
(3) Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to
induce him or her to sign or not to sign or to vote for or against any
initiative or referendum measure; or
(4) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any
voter to sign or not to sign an initiative or referendum petition or
with the right to vote for or against an initiative or referendum
measure by threats, intimidation, or any other corrupt means or
practice; or
(5) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away,
directly or indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed
by or received from any person, firm, association, or corporation whose
residence or principal office is, or the majority of whose members or
stockholders have their residence outside, the state of Washington, for
any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures
upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the purpose of aiding
in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum measure.
This subsection does not apply to or prohibit any activity that is
properly reported in accordance with the applicable provisions of
chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW.
A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.02.130 and 2005 c 274 s 263 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city or town officially shall become incorporated at a date
from one hundred eighty days to three hundred sixty days after the date
of the election on the question of incorporation. An interim period
shall exist between the time the newly elected officials have been
elected and qualified and this official date of incorporation. During
this interim period, the newly elected officials are authorized to
adopt ordinances and resolutions which shall become effective on or
after the official date of incorporation, and to enter into contracts
and agreements to facilitate the transition to becoming a city or town
and to ensure a continuation of governmental services after the
official date of incorporation. Periods of time that would be required
to elapse between the enactment and effective date of such ordinances,
including but not limited to times for publication or for filing
referendums, shall commence upon the date of such enactment as though
the city or town were officially incorporated.
During this interim period, the city or town governing body may
adopt rules establishing policies and procedures under the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and may use these rules
and procedures in making determinations under the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
During this interim period, the newly formed city or town and its
governing body shall be subject to the following as though the city or
town were officially incorporated: RCW 4.24.470 relating to immunity;
chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW relating to open government; chapter 42.56
RCW relating to public records; chapter 40.14 RCW relating to the
preservation and disposition of public records; chapters 42.20 and
42.23 RCW relating to ethics and conflicts of interest; chapters 42.30
and 42.32 RCW relating to open public meetings and minutes; RCW
35.22.288, 35.23.221, 35.27.300, 35A.12.160, as appropriate, and
chapter 35A.65 RCW relating to the publication of notices and
ordinances; RCW 35.21.875 and 35A.21.230 relating to the designation of
an official newspaper; RCW 36.16.138 relating to liability insurance;
RCW 35.22.620, 35.23.352, and 35A.40.210, as appropriate, and statutes
referenced therein relating to public contracts and bidding; and
chapter 39.34 RCW relating to interlocal cooperation. Tax anticipation
or revenue anticipation notes or warrants and other short-term
obligations may be issued and funds may be borrowed on the security of
these instruments during this interim period, as provided in chapter
39.50 RCW. Funds also may be borrowed from federal, state, and other
governmental agencies in the same manner as if the city or town were
officially incorporated.
RCW 84.52.020 and 84.52.070 shall apply to the extent that they may
be applicable, and the governing body of such city or town may take
appropriate action by ordinance during the interim period to adopt the
property tax levy for its first full calendar year following the
interim period.
The governing body of the new city or town may acquire needed
facilities, supplies, equipment, insurance, and staff during this
interim period as if the city or town were in existence. An interim
city manager or administrator, who shall have such administrative
powers and duties as are delegated by the governing body, may be
appointed to serve only until the official date of incorporation.
After the official date of incorporation the governing body of such a
new city organized under the council manager form of government may
extend the appointment of such an interim manager or administrator with
such limited powers as the governing body determines, for up to ninety
days. This governing body may submit ballot propositions to the voters
of the city or town to authorize taxes to be collected on or after the
official date of incorporation, or authorize an annexation of the city
or town by a fire protection district or library district to be
effective immediately upon the effective date of the incorporation as
a city or town.
The boundaries of a newly incorporated city or town shall be deemed
to be established for purposes of RCW 84.09.030 on the date that the
results of the initial election on the question of incorporation are
certified or the first day of January following the date of this
election if the newly incorporated city or town does not impose
property taxes in the same year that the voters approve the
incorporation.
The newly elected officials shall take office immediately upon
their election and qualification with limited powers during this
interim period as provided in this section. They shall acquire their
full powers as of the official date of incorporation and shall continue
in office until their successors are elected and qualified at the next
general municipal election after the official date of incorporation:
PROVIDED, That if the date of the next general municipal election is
less than twelve months after the date of the first election of
councilmembers, those initially elected councilmembers shall serve
until their successors are elected and qualified at the next following
general municipal election as provided in RCW 29A.20.040. For purposes
of this section, the general municipal election shall be the date on
which city and town general elections are held throughout the state of
Washington, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.330.
In any newly incorporated city that has adopted the council-manager
form of government, the term of office of the mayor, during the interim
period only, shall be set by the council, and thereafter shall be as
provided by law.
The official date of incorporation shall be on a date from one
hundred eighty to three hundred sixty days after the date of the
election on the question of incorporation, as specified in a resolution
adopted by the governing body during this interim period. A copy of
the resolution shall be filed with the county legislative authority of
the county in which all or the major portion of the newly incorporated
city or town is located. If the governing body fails to adopt such a
resolution, the official date of incorporation shall be three hundred
sixty days after the date of the election on the question of
incorporation. The county legislative authority of the county in which
all or the major portion of the newly incorporated city or town is
located shall file a notice with the county assessor that the city or
town has been authorized to be incorporated immediately after the
favorable results of the election on the question of incorporation have
been certified. The county legislative authority shall file a notice
with the secretary of state that the city or town is incorporated as of
the official date of incorporation.

Sec. 16 RCW 35.21.759 and 2005 c 274 s 265 are each amended to
read as follows:
A public corporation, commission, or authority created under this
chapter, and officers and multimember governing body thereof, are
subject to general laws regulating local governments, multimember
governing bodies, and local governmental officials, including, but not
limited to, the requirement to be audited by the state auditor and
various accounting requirements provided under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
open public record requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW, the prohibition
on using its facilities for campaign purposes under RCW ((42.17.130))
42.17A.555, the open public meetings law of chapter 42.30 RCW, the code
of ethics for municipal officers under chapter 42.23 RCW, and the local
government whistleblower law under chapter 42.41 RCW.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2010 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, regional transit authority
facilities as defined in RCW 81.112.020, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW ((42.17.020))
42.17A.005, corporation, partnership, association, and limited
liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

Sec. 18 RCW 40.14.070 and 2005 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) County, municipal, and other local government agencies may
request authority to destroy noncurrent public records having no
further administrative or legal value by submitting to the division of
archives and records management lists of such records on forms prepared
by the division. The archivist, a representative appointed by the
state auditor, and a representative appointed by the attorney general
shall constitute a committee, known as the local records committee,
which shall review such lists and which may veto the destruction of any
or all items contained therein.
(b) A local government agency, as an alternative to submitting
lists, may elect to establish a records control program based on
recurring disposition schedules recommended by the agency to the local
records committee. The schedules are to be submitted on forms provided
by the division of archives and records management to the local records
committee, which may either veto, approve, or amend the schedule.
Approval of such schedule or amended schedule shall be by unanimous
vote of the local records committee. Upon such approval, the schedule
shall constitute authority for the local government agency to destroy
the records listed thereon, after the required retention period, on a
recurring basis until the schedule is either amended or revised by the
committee.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, no public records shall
be destroyed until approved for destruction by the local records
committee. Official public records shall not be destroyed unless:
(i) The records are six or more years old;
(ii) The department of origin of the records has made a
satisfactory showing to the state records committee that the retention
of the records for a minimum of six years is both unnecessary and
uneconomical, particularly where lesser federal retention periods for
records generated by the state under federal programs have been
established; or
(iii) The originals of official public records less than six years
old have been copied or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic,
microfilm, miniature photographic, or other process approved by the
state archivist which accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium
for so reproducing the original.
An automatic reduction of retention periods from seven to six years
for official public records on record retention schedules existing on
June 10, 1982, shall not be made, but the same shall be reviewed
individually by the local records committee for approval or disapproval
of the change to a retention period of six years.
The state archivist may furnish appropriate information,
suggestions, and guidelines to local government agencies for their
assistance in the preparation of lists and schedules or any other
matter relating to the retention, preservation, or destruction of
records under this chapter. The local records committee may adopt
appropriate regulations establishing procedures to be followed in such
matters.
Records of county, municipal, or other local government agencies,
designated by the archivist as of primarily historical interest, may be
transferred to a recognized depository agency.
(b)(i) Records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenders contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses
as defined in RCW 71.09.020 that are not required in the current
operation of the law enforcement agency or for pending judicial
proceedings shall, following the expiration of the applicable schedule
of the law enforcement agency's retention of the records, be
transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
for permanent electronic retention and retrieval. Upon electronic
retention of any document, the association shall be permitted to
destroy the paper copy of the document.
(ii) Any sealed record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and
retrieval, including records sealed after transfer, shall be
electronically retained in such a way that the record is clearly marked
as sealed.
(iii) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall be permitted to destroy both the paper copy and electronic record
of any offender verified as deceased.
(c) Any record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to (b) of this subsection shall be
deemed to no longer constitute a public record pursuant to RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.56.010 and shall be exempt from public disclosure.
Such records shall be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies as
defined in RCW 10.97.030 for the purpose of determining if a sex
offender met the criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in
chapter 71.09 RCW and the end-of-sentence review committee as defined
by RCW 72.09.345 for the purpose of fulfilling its duties under RCW
71.09.025 and 9.95.420.
Electronic records marked as sealed shall only be accessible by
criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030 who would
otherwise have access to a sealed paper copy of the document, the end-of-sentence review committee as defined by RCW 72.09.345 for the
purpose of fulfilling its duties under RCW 71.09.025 and 9.95.420, and
the system administrator for the purposes of system administration and
maintenance.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, county, municipal, and
other local government agencies may, as an alternative to destroying
noncurrent public records having no further administrative or legal
value, donate the public records to the state library, local library,
historical society, genealogical society, or similar society or
organization.
Public records may not be donated under this subsection unless:
(a) The records are seventy years old or more;
(b) The local records committee has approved the destruction of the
public records; and
(c) The state archivist has determined that the public records have
no historic interest.

Sec. 19 RCW 42.17A.005 and 2010 c 204 s 101 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency before its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political
party by the secretary of state;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(8) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(9) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(10) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17A.100.
(11) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17A.710,
"compensation" does not include per diem allowances or other payments
made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official
business of the governmental entity.
(12) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(13)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which
the individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(13)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as
long as he or she has no authority to authorize expenditures or make
decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(14) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association, or credit union doing business in this state.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters. An election in which the qualifications for
voting include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI,
section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington
shall not be considered an election for purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of January after the date of the last previous general election for the
office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the
next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st
after the special election.
(19)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable,
or satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(((a))) (i) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or
judicial office either by specifically naming the candidate, or
identifying the candidate without using the candidate's name;
(((b))) (ii) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected,
distributed, or otherwise published within sixty days before any
election for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is
seeking election; and
(((c))) (iii) Either alone, or in combination with one or more
communications identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the
sixty days before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand
dollars or more.
(((20))) (b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(((a))) (i) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by
a candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(((b))) (ii) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(((c))) (iii) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a
regularly scheduled news medium that is:
(((i))) (A) Of primary interest to the general public;
(((ii))) (B) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium; and
(((iii))) (C) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(((d))) (iv) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(((e))) (v) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar
works (((i))) (A) written by a candidate when the candidate entered
into a contract for such publications or media at least twelve months
before becoming a candidate, or (((ii))) (B) written about a candidate;
(((f))) (vi) Public service announcements;
(((g))) (vii) A mailed internal political communication primarily
limited to the members of or contributors to a political party
organization or political committee, or to the officers, management
staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to
the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(((h))) (viii) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized
committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(((i))) (ix) Any other communication exempted by the commission
through rule consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(((21))) (20) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution,
subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or
anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure.
"Expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer
of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property,
facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting,
benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting
in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of
this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises
to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made. "Expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((22))) (21) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17A.235(2).
(((23))) (22) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
or local office. It does not include a primary.
(((24))) (23) "Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.
(((25))) (24) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic
partner, dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living
in the household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary"
in this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or
domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the
individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person
and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of
any such person.
(((26))) (25) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(((27))) (26) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of eight hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under eight hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is eight hundred dollars or more.
(((28))) (27)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family,
or an association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((29))) (28) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((30))) (29) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of
the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the
state senate.
(((31))) (30) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((32))) (31) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((33))) (32) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((34))) (33) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried
out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise
of personal judgment or discretion.
(((35))) (34) "Participate" means that, with respect to a
particular election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((36))) (35) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((37))) (36) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((38))) (37) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((39))) (38) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means
the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under
chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((40))) (39) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((41))) (40) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.
(((42))) (41) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((43))) (42) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications,
independent expenditures, or political advertising" means the person
paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure,
or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or
is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the
payment is the sponsor.
(((44))) (43) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((45))) (44) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((46))) (45) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of
a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.
(((47))) (46) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the
individuals appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant
to RCW 42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.

Sec. 20 RCW 42.17A.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 4 and 2010 c 204
s 303 are each reenacted to read as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to
carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall
be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign
finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise
take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take
effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that
year;
(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits
established by the department of personnel under RCW 43.03.028, the
executive director's compensation. The executive director shall
perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may
prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter
efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its
authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate
authority to determine whether an actual violation of this chapter has
occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;
(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its
judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including
reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying,
financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this
chapter;
(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate, audits and field
investigations;
(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to
determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions
to be considered, and the results thereof;
(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records
relevant to any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any
other proceeding under this chapter;
(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;
(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of
obligations to comply with the election campaign provisions of this
chapter, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures
in connection with any election campaign of more than five thousand
dollars;
(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping
accounts of, and reporting on a quarterly basis, costs incurred by
state agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and
political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing
legislative information. For the purposes of this subsection,
"legislative information" means books, pamphlets, reports, and other
materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a
substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination
of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules,
accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and
recommendations concerning those agencies; and
(10) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of
reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile
or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is
contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 21 RCW 42.17A.125 and 2010 c 204 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each even-numbered calendar year, the
commission shall increase or decrease the dollar amounts in RCW
42.17A.005(((28))) (26), 42.17A.405, 42.17A.410, 42.17A.445(3),
42.17A.475, and 42.17A.630(1) based on changes in economic conditions
as reflected in the inflationary index recommended by the office of
financial management. The new dollar amounts established by the
commission under this section shall be rounded off to amounts as judged
most convenient for public understanding and so as to be within ten
percent of the target amount equal to the base amount provided in this
chapter multiplied by the increase in the inflationary index since July
2008.
(2) The commission may revise, at least once every five years but
no more often than every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds
and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions shall be only
for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by an
inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management.
The revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period
commencing with the month of December preceding the last revision and
concluding with the month of December preceding the month the revision
is adopted. As to each of the three general categories of this
chapter, reports of campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and
reports of the financial affairs of elected and appointed officials,
the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds within each category.
The revisions authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic
changes from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the
respective code or threshold.
(3) Revisions made in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 22 RCW 42.17A.225 and 2010 c 205 s 4 and 2010 c 204 s 406
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the provisions of this section, a continuing
political committee shall file and report on the same conditions and at
the same times as any other committee in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 42.17A.205, 42.17A.210, and 42.17A.220.
(2) A continuing political committee shall file with the commission
a report on the tenth day of each month detailing expenditures made and
contributions received for the preceding calendar month. This report
need only be filed if either the total contributions received or total
expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred
dollars. ((The report must be filed with the commission and the
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the committee
maintains its office or headquarters. If the committee does not have
an office or headquarters, the report must be filed in the county where
the committee treasurer resides. However, if the committee files with
the commission electronically, it need not also file with the county
auditor or elections officer.)) The report shall be on a form supplied
by the commission and shall include the following information:
(a) The information required by RCW 42.17A.240;
(b) Each expenditure made to retire previously accumulated debts of
the committee identified by recipient, amount, and date of payments;
(c) Other information the commission shall prescribe by rule.
(3) If a continuing political committee makes a contribution in
support of or in opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition within
sixty days before the date that the candidate or ballot proposition
will be voted upon, the committee shall report pursuant to RCW
42.17A.235.
(4) A continuing political committee shall file reports as required
by this chapter until it is dissolved, at which time a final report
shall be filed. Upon submitting a final report, the duties of the
treasurer shall cease and there shall be no obligation to make any
further reports.
(5) The treasurer shall maintain books of account, current within
five business days, that accurately reflect all contributions and
expenditures. During the eight days immediately preceding the date of
any election that the committee has received any contributions or made
any expenditures, the books of account shall be kept current within one
business day and shall be open for public inspection in the same manner
as provided for candidates and other political committees in RCW
42.17A.235(((5))) (4).
(6) All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified
as correct by the treasurer.
(7) The treasurer shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts,
and all other financial records of the campaign or political committee
for not less than five calendar years following the year during which
the transaction occurred.

Sec. 23 RCW 42.17A.235 and 2010 c 205 s 6 and 2010 c 204 s 408
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the information required under RCW 42.17A.205
and 42.17A.210, on the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate
or political committee must file with the commission a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) Each treasurer shall file with the commission a report
containing the information required by RCW 42.17A.240 at the following
intervals:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held;
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section only if the committee has
received a contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding
calendar month and either the total contributions received or total
expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred
dollars.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of one
business day before the date of the report. The report filed seven
days before the election shall report all contributions received and
expenditures made as of the end of one business day before the date of
the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made from the closing date
of the last report filed through the last day of the month preceding
the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date of the special election, or for the period beginning
the first day of the fifth month before the date of the general
election, and ending on the date of that special or general election,
each Monday the treasurer shall file with the commission a report of
each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar days. The
report shall contain the name of each person contributing the funds and
the amount contributed by each person. However, persons who contribute
no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate are not required to
be identified in the report. A copy of the report shall be retained by
the treasurer for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by
a deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for
his or her records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the
treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17A.205,
the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any day from the eighth day immediately before the election through
the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate
or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for
an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days.
The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such
inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that
is requested for the inspection.
(5) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection by appointment, pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section, at the principal headquarters or, if
there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects or in the
case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function and
has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there is no obligation to make any further reports.

Sec. 24 RCW 42.17A.255 and 2010 c 205 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section the term "independent
expenditure" means any expenditure that is made in support of or in
opposition to any candidate or ballot proposition and is not otherwise
required to be reported pursuant to RCW ((42.17.060, 42.17.080, or
42.17.090)) 42.17A.220, 42.17A.235, and 42.17A.240. "Independent
expenditure" does not include: An internal political communication
primarily limited to the contributors to a political party organization
or political action committee, or the officers, management staff, and
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members of
a labor organization or other membership organization; or the rendering
of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer
campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by
volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally
paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this
section, means services or labor for which the individual is not
compensated by any person.
(2) Within five days after the date of making an independent
expenditure that by itself or when added to all other such independent
expenditures made during the same election campaign by the same person
equals one hundred dollars or more, or within five days after the date
of making an independent expenditure for which no reasonable estimate
of monetary value is practicable, whichever occurs first, the person
who made the independent expenditure shall file with the commission an
initial report of all independent expenditures made during the campaign
prior to and including such date.
(3) At the following intervals each person who is required to file
an initial report pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall file
with the commission a further report of the independent expenditures
made since the date of the last report:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day preceding the date
on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed pursuant to this section. However, the further
reports required by this subsection (3) shall only be filed if the
reporting person has made an independent expenditure since the date of
the last previous report filed.
The report filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3)
shall be the final report, and upon submitting such final report the
duties of the reporting person shall cease, and there shall be no
obligation to make any further reports.
(4) All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified
as correct by the reporting person.
(5) Each report required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section
shall disclose for the period beginning at the end of the period for
the last previous report filed or, in the case of an initial report,
beginning at the time of the first independent expenditure, and ending
not more than one business day before the date the report is due:
(a) The name and address of the person filing the report;
(b) The name and address of each person to whom an independent
expenditure was made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty
dollars, and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure.
If no reasonable estimate of the monetary value of a particular
independent expenditure is practicable, it is sufficient to report
instead a precise description of services, property, or rights
furnished through the expenditure and where appropriate to attach a
copy of the item produced or distributed by the expenditure;
(c) The total sum of all independent expenditures made during the
campaign to date; and
(d) Such other information as shall be required by the commission
by rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 25 RCW 42.17A.415 and 2006 c 348 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contributions to candidates for state office made and received
before December 3, 1992, are considered to be contributions under RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790. Monetary contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations and that have not been spent by the recipient
of the contribution by December 3, 1992, must be disposed of in
accordance with RCW ((42.17.095)) 42.17A.430.
(2) Contributions to other candidates subject to the contribution
limits of this chapter made and received before June 7, 2006, are
considered to be contributions under RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790.
Contributions that exceed the contribution limitations and that have
not been spent by the recipient of the contribution by June 7, 2006,
must be disposed of in accordance with RCW ((42.17.095)) 42.17A.430
except for subsections (6) and (7) of that section.

Sec. 26 RCW 42.17A.770 and 2007 c 455 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW ((42.17.400(4)(a)(iv)))
42.17A.765(4)(a)(iv), any action brought under the provisions of this
chapter must be commenced within five years after the date when the
violation occurred.

Sec. 27 RCW 42.36.040 and 1982 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to declaring as a candidate for public office or while
campaigning for public office as defined by RCW ((42.17.020 (5) and
(25))) 42.17A.005 no public discussion or expression of an opinion by
a person subsequently elected to a public office, on any pending or
proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a violation of the appearance
of fairness doctrine.

Sec. 28 RCW 42.52.010 and 2005 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(4) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(5) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(6) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general
public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.
(7) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more
persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(8) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the
legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.
(9) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.17A.005.
(10) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A
RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(11) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state
officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state
employee's official role.
(12) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope
of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.
(13) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not
operated for profit.
(15) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial
branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue
permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified
persons.
(16) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving
the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through
subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct
state action in respect of such transaction.
(17) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(18) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office
of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court,
judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members
of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective
offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive
officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or
committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(19) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an
agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(20) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional
universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any
research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute and the Washington Technology Center.
(21) "University research employee" means a state officer or state
employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state
officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer,
approved consulting activities related to research and technology
transfer, or other incidental activities.
(22) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(23)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination,
contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer,
state employee, or former state officer or state employee in question
believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 29 RCW 42.52.150 and 2006 c 5 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than
those specified in subsections (2) and (5) of this section, with an
aggregate value in excess of fifty dollars from a single source in a
calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources with a value in
excess of fifty dollars. For purposes of this section, "single source"
means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, whether acting directly
or through any agent or other intermediary, and "single gift" includes
any event, item, or group of items used in conjunction with each other
or any trip including transportation, lodging, and attendant costs, not
excluded from the definition of gift under RCW 42.52.010. The value of
gifts given to an officer's or employee's family member or guest shall
be attributed to the official or employee for the purpose of
determining whether the limit has been exceeded, unless an independent
business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and
the family member or guest.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
following items are presumed not to influence under RCW 42.52.140, and
may be accepted without regard to the limit established by subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;
(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account
created in RCW ((44.04.270)) 43.15.050;
(h) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as
provided for in RCW 43.330.090;
(i) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national
legislative association, 2006 official conference of the national
lieutenant governors' association, or host committee for the purpose of
hosting an official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW
42.52.820 and section 2, chapter 5, Laws of 2006. Anything solicited
or accepted may only be received by the national association or host
committee and may not be commingled with any funds or accounts that are
the property of any person;
(j) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(k) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state or a
foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature.
(3) The presumption in subsection (2) of this section is rebuttable
and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving
and acceptance of the item.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, a
state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of an agency
that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in those
regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or seek,
directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person
regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or
services to the agency:
(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in RCW
42.52.010 except:
(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;
(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a
bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade,
or charitable association or institution; and
(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.
(5) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the form
of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary course of
meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related to the
performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and beverage
that exceed fifty dollars on a single occasion shall be reported as
provided in chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW.

Sec. 30 RCW 42.52.180 and 2010 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) The maintenance of official legislative web sites throughout
the year, regardless of pending elections. The web sites may contain
any discretionary material which was also specifically prepared for the
legislator in the course of his or her duties as a legislator,
including newsletters and press releases. The official legislative web
sites of legislators seeking reelection shall not be altered between
June 30th and November 15th of the election year. The web site shall
not be used for campaign purposes;
(d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; and
(e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW ((42.17.130)) 42.17A.555.

Sec. 31 RCW 42.52.185 and 2008 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the
year before a general election for a state legislator's election to
office and continuing through November 30th immediately after the
general election, the legislator may not mail, either by regular mail
or electronic mail, to a constituent at public expense a letter,
newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature, except as follows:
(a) The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to
constituents. All newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must
be identical as to their content but not as to the constituent name or
address. One such mailing may be mailed no later than thirty days
after the start of a regular legislative session, except that a
legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a
vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to
send out the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no later
than sixty days after the end of a regular legislative session.
(b) The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an
individual constituent who has contacted the legislator regarding the
subject matter of the letter during the legislator's current term of
office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds a governmental office
with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter; or (iii) an
individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to
be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to:
(A) An international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the
Pulitzer prize; (B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an
Eagle Scout award; and (D) a Medal of Honor.
(c) In those cases where constituents have specifically indicated
that they would like to be contacted to receive regular or periodic
updates on legislative matters, legislators may provide such updates by
electronic mail throughout the legislative session and up until thirty
days from the conclusion of a legislative session.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator"
means a legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.17A.005, for any public office.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities
of a public office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW
42.52.180.
(4) The house of representatives and senate shall specifically
limit expenditures per member for the total cost of mailings. Those
costs include, but are not limited to, production costs, printing
costs, and postage costs. The limits imposed under this subsection
apply only to the total expenditures on mailings per member and not to
any categorical cost within the total.
(5) For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the
legislative district represented by the legislator are not considered
to be constituents, but students, military personnel, or others
temporarily employed outside of the district who normally reside in the
district are considered to be constituents.

Sec. 32 RCW 42.52.380 and 1997 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No member of the executive ethics board may (a) hold or
campaign for partisan elective office other than the position of
precinct committeeperson, or any full-time nonpartisan office; (b) be
an officer of any political party or political committee as defined in
chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW other than the position of precinct
committeeperson; (c) permit his or her name to be used, or make
contributions, in support of or in opposition to any state candidate or
state ballot measure; or (d) lobby or control, direct, or assist a
lobbyist except that such member may appear before any committee of the
legislature on matters pertaining to this chapter.
(2) No citizen member of the legislative ethics board may (a) hold
or campaign for partisan elective office other than the position of
precinct committeeperson, or any full-time nonpartisan office; (b) be
an officer of any political party or political committee as defined in
chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW, other than the position of precinct
committeeperson; (c) permit his or her name to be used, or make
contributions, in support of or in opposition to any legislative
candidate, any legislative caucus campaign committee that supports or
opposes legislative candidates, or any political action committee that
supports or opposes legislative candidates; or (d) engage in lobbying
in the legislative branch under circumstances not exempt, under RCW
((42.17.160)) 42.17A.610, from lobbyist registration and reporting.
(3) No citizen member of the legislative ethics board may hold or
campaign for a seat in the state house of representatives or the state
senate within two years of serving on the board if the citizen member
opposes an incumbent who has been the respondent in a complaint before
the board.

Sec. 33 RCW 42.52.560 and 2006 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state employee from
distributing communications from an employee organization or charitable
organization to other state employees if the communications do not
support or oppose a ballot proposition or candidate for federal, state,
or local public office. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize any lobbying activity with public funds beyond the activity
permitted by RCW ((42.17.190)) 42.17A.635.
(2) "Employee organization," for purposes of this section, means
any organization, union, or association in which employees participate
and that exists for the purpose of collective bargaining with employers
or for the purpose of opposing collective bargaining or certification
of a union.

Sec. 34 RCW 43.03.305 and 2008 c 6 s 204 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a commission to be known as the Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials, to consist of
sixteen members appointed by the governor as provided in this section.
(1) Nine of the sixteen commission members shall be selected by lot
by the secretary of state from among those registered voters eligible
to vote at the time persons are selected for appointment to full terms
on the commission under subsection (3) of this section. One member
shall be selected from each congressional district. The secretary
shall establish policies and procedures for conducting the selection by
lot. The policies and procedures shall include, but not be limited to,
those for notifying persons selected and for providing a new selection
from a congressional district if a person selected from the district
declines appointment to the commission or if, following the person's
appointment, the person's position on the commission becomes vacant
before the end of the person's term of office.
(2) The remaining seven of the sixteen commission members, all
residents of this state, shall be selected jointly by the speaker of
the house of representatives and the president of the senate. The
persons selected under this subsection shall have had experience in the
field of personnel management. Of these seven members, one shall be
selected from each of the following five sectors in this state:
Private institutions of higher education; business; professional
personnel management; legal profession; and organized labor. Of the
two remaining members, one shall be a person recommended to the speaker
and the president by the chair of the Washington personnel resources
board and one shall be a person recommended by majority vote of the
presidents of the state's four-year institutions of higher education.
(3) The secretary of state shall forward the names of persons
selected under subsection (1) of this section and the speaker of the
house of representatives and president of the senate shall forward the
names of persons selected under subsection (2) of this section to the
governor who shall appoint these persons to the commission. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, the names of persons
selected for appointment to the commission shall be forwarded to the
governor not later than February 15, 1987, and not later than the
fifteenth day of February every four years through 1999. The terms of
the members selected in 1999 shall terminate July 1, 2002, and the
names of persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than July 1, 2002. Of the sixteen
names forwarded to the governor in 2002, the governor shall by lot
select four of the persons selected under subsection (1) of this
section and four of the persons selected under subsection (2) of this
section to serve two-year terms, with the rest of the members serving
four-year terms. Thereafter, except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section, all members shall serve four-year terms and the names of
eight persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than the first day of July every
two years.
(4) No person may be appointed to more than two terms. No member
of the commission may be removed by the governor during his or her term
of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office or for a disqualifying change of
residence.
The unexcused absence of any person who is a member of the
commission from two consecutive meetings of the commission shall
constitute the relinquishment of that person's membership on the
commission. Such a relinquishment creates a vacancy in that person's
position on the commission. A member's absence may be excused by the
chair of the commission upon the member's written request if the chair
believes there is just cause for the absence. Such a request must be
received by the chair before the meeting for which the absence is to be
excused. A member's absence from a meeting of the commission may also
be excused during the meeting for which the member is absent by the
affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission present
at the meeting.
(5) No state official, public employee, or lobbyist, or immediate
family member of the official, employee, or lobbyist, subject to the
registration requirements of chapter ((42.17)) 42.17A RCW is eligible
for membership on the commission.
As used in this subsection the phrase "immediate family" means the
parents, spouse or domestic partner, siblings, children, or dependent
relative of the official, employee, or lobbyist whether or not living
in the household of the official, employee, or lobbyist.
(6) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a successor
shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term. The
selection and appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of the
date the position becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same
manner as originally provided.

Sec. 35 RCW 43.17.320 and 1993 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of RCW 43.17.320 through 43.17.340, "state agency"
means:
(1) Any agency for which the executive officer is listed in RCW
((42.17.2401(1))) 42.17A.705(1); and
(2) The office of the secretary of state; the office of the state
treasurer; the office of the state auditor; the department of natural
resources; the office of the insurance commissioner; and the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 36 RCW 43.52A.030 and 1984 c 34 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governor, with the consent of the senate, shall appoint two
residents of Washington state to the council pursuant to the act.
These persons shall undertake the functions and duties of members of
the council as specified in the act and in appropriate state law. Upon
appointment by the governor to the council, the nominee shall make
available to the senate such disclosure information as is requested for
the confirmation process, including that required in RCW ((42.17.241))
42.17A.710.

Sec. 37 RCW 43.60A.175 and 2006 c 343 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the defenders'
fund and the competitive grant program and spend gifts, grants, or
endowments or income from the public or private sources according to
their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments
violates RCW ((42.17.710)) 42.17A.560.
(2) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW 43.60A.160 through
43.60A.185.
(3) The department may perform all acts and functions as necessary
or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied
under chapter 343, Laws of 2006.

Sec. 38 RCW 43.105.260 and 1996 c 171 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Local government" means every county, city, town, and every
other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation.
(2) "Public record" means as defined in RCW ((42.17.020)) 42.56.010
and chapter 40.14 RCW, and includes legislative records and court
records that are available for public inspection.
(3) "State agency" includes every state office, department,
division, bureau, board, and commission of the state, and each state
elected official who is a member of the executive department.

Sec. 39 RCW 43.105.310 and 1996 c 171 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
State agencies and local governments that collect and enter
information concerning individuals into electronic records and
information systems that will be widely accessible by the public under
RCW ((42.17.020)) 42.56.010 shall ensure the accuracy of this
information to the extent possible. To the extent possible,
information must be collected directly from, and with the consent of,
the individual who is the subject of the data. Agencies shall
establish procedures for correcting inaccurate information, including
establishing mechanisms for individuals to review information about
themselves and recommend changes in information they believe to be
inaccurate. The inclusion of personal information in electronic public
records that is widely available to the public should include
information on the date when the database was created or most recently
updated. If personally identifiable information is included in
electronic public records that are made widely available to the public,
agencies must follow retention and archival schedules in accordance
with chapter 40.14 RCW, retaining personally identifiable information
only as long as needed to carry out the purpose for which it was
collected.

Sec. 40 RCW 43.167.020 and 2009 c 516 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A community preservation and development authority shall have
the power to:
(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or
private entities;
(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and
employees as may be necessary to implement the purposes and duties of
an authority;
(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals,
associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;
(d) Buy, own, lease, and sell real and personal property;
(e) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;
(f) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;
(g) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission; and
(h) Lend its funds, property, credit, or services for corporate
purposes.
(2) A community preservation and development authority has no power
of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special assessments.
(3) A community preservation and development authority that accepts
public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:
(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as
appropriate, of the state Constitution, and to RCW ((42.17.128))
42.17A.550; and
(b) May not use the funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot
proposition, political party, or political committee.

Sec. 41 RCW 44.05.020 and 1983 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.
(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal
law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each
year ending in zero.
(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the
Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to RCW ((42.17.150))
42.17A.600.
(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional
redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 42 RCW 44.05.080 and 2005 c 274 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission
shall:
(1) Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of Article II, section
43 of the state Constitution and of this chapter, which rules shall
provide that three voting members of the commission constitute a quorum
to do business, and that the votes of three of the voting members are
required for any official action of the commission;
(2) Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting
data and maps from the United States Bureau of the Census;
(3) Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public
records as specified in chapters 40.14 and 42.56 RCW;
(4) Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act,
chapter 42.30 RCW;
(5) Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.32.030;
(6) Be subject to the provisions of RCW ((42.17.240)) 42.17A.700;
(7) Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be
made available to the public at the time the plan is published. The
report will include but will not be limited to: (a) The population and
percentage deviation from the average district population for every
district; (b) an explanation of the criteria used in developing the
plan with a justification of any deviation in a district from the
average district population; (c) a map of all the districts; and (d)
the estimated cost incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct
boundaries.

Sec. 43 RCW 44.05.110 and 1983 c 16 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Following the period provided by RCW 44.05.100(1) for the
commission's adoption of a plan, the commission shall take all
necessary steps to conclude its business and cease operations. The
commission shall prepare a financial statement disclosing all
expenditures made by the commission. The official record shall contain
all relevant information developed by the commission pursuant to
carrying out its duties under this chapter, maps, data collected,
minutes of meetings, written communications, and other information of
a similar nature. Once the commission ceases to exist, the chief
election officer shall be the custodian of the official record for
purposes of reprecincting and election administration. The chief
election officer shall provide for the permanent preservation of this
official record pursuant to chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW and Title 40
RCW. Once the commission ceases to exist any budget surplus shall
revert to the state general fund.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 44.05.120 for a reconvened
commission, the commission shall cease to exist on July 1st of each
year ending in two unless the supreme court extends the commission's
term.

Sec. 44 RCW 46.20.075 and 2010 c 223 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license; and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.17A.005. For the remaining period of the intermediate
license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying
more than three passengers who are under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder
is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age.
(4) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a moving
motor vehicle while using a wireless communications device unless the
holder is using the device to report illegal activity, summon medical
or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person or property.
(5) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed under this section.
(6) Except for a violation of subsection (4) of this section,
enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(8) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an accident involving only one motor
vehicle;
(b) Has not been involved in an accident where he or she was cited
in connection with the accident or was found to have caused the
accident;
(c) Has not been involved in an accident where no one was cited or
was found to have caused the accident; and
(d) Has not been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

Sec. 45 RCW 47.06B.020 and 2009 c 515 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agency council on coordinated transportation is created.
The purpose of the council is to advance and improve accessibility to
and coordination of special needs transportation services statewide.
The council is composed of fourteen voting members and four nonvoting,
legislative members.
(2) The fourteen voting members are the superintendent of public
instruction or a designee, the secretary of transportation or a
designee, the secretary of the department of social and health services
or a designee, and eleven members appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) One representative from the office of the governor;
(b) Three persons who are consumers of special needs transportation
services, which must include:
(i) One person designated by the executive director of the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment; and
(ii) One person who is designated by the executive director of the
developmental disabilities council;
(c) One representative from the Washington association of pupil
transportation;
(d) One representative from the Washington state transit
association;
(e) One of the following:
(i) A representative from the community transportation association
of the Northwest; or
(ii) A representative from the community action council
association;
(f) One person who represents regional transportation planning
organizations and metropolitan planning organizations;
(g) One representative of brokers who provide nonemergency,
medically necessary trips to persons with special transportation needs
under the medicaid program administered by the department of social and
health services;
(h) One representative from the Washington state department of
veterans affairs; and
(i) One representative of the state association of counties.
(3) The four nonvoting members are legislators as follows:
(a) Two members from the house of representatives, one from each of
the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, including at least one member from the house
transportation policy and budget committee or the house appropriations
committee; and
(b) Two members from the senate, one from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate, including at least
one member from the senate transportation committee or the senate ways
and means committee.
(4) Gubernatorial appointees of the council will serve two-year
terms. Members may not receive compensation for their service on the
council, but will be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in performing their duties as members as set forth in RCW
43.03.220.
(5) The council shall vote on an annual basis to elect one of its
voting members to serve as chair. The position of chair must rotate
among the represented agencies, associations, and interest groups at
least every two years. If the position of chair is vacated for any
reason, the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee
shall serve as acting chair until the next regular meeting of the
council, at which time the members will elect a chair.
(6) The council shall periodically assess its membership to ensure
that there exists a balanced representation of persons with special
transportation needs and providers of special transportation needs
services. Recommendations for modifying the membership of the council
must be included in the council's biennial report to the legislature as
provided in RCW 47.06B.050.
(7) The department of transportation shall provide necessary staff
support for the council.
(8) The council may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the council and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW ((42.17.710)) 42.17A.560.
(9) The meetings of the council must be open to the public, with
the agenda published in advance, and minutes kept and made available to
the public. The public notice of the meetings must indicate that
accommodations for persons with disabilities will be made available
upon request.
(10) All meetings of the council must be held in locations that are
readily accessible to public transportation, and must be scheduled for
times when public transportation is available.
(11) The council shall make an effort to include presentations by
and work sessions including persons with special transportation needs.

Sec. 46 RCW 50.38.015 and 1993 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Labor market information" means the body of information
generated from measurement and evaluation of the socioeconomic factors
and variables influencing the employment process in the state and
specific labor market areas. These socioeconomic factors and variables
affect labor demand and supply relationships and include:
(a) Labor force information, which includes but is not limited to
employment, unemployment, labor force participation, labor turnover and
mobility, average hours and earnings, and changes and characteristics
of the population and labor force within specific labor market areas
and the state;
(b) Occupational information, which includes but is not limited to
occupational supply and demand estimates and projections,
characteristics of occupations, wage levels, job duties, training and
education requirements, conditions of employment, unionization,
retirement practices, and training opportunities;
(c) Economic information, which includes but is not limited to
number of business starts and stops by industry and labor market area,
information on employment growth and decline by industry and labor
market area, employer establishment data, and number of labor-management disputes by industry and labor market area; and
(d) Program information, which includes but is not limited to
program participant or student information gathered in cooperation with
other state and local agencies along with related labor market
information to evaluate the effectiveness, efficiency, and impact of
state and local employment, training, education, and job creation
efforts in support of planning, management, implementation, and
evaluation.
(2) "Labor market area" means an economically integrated geographic
area within which individuals can reside and find employment within a
reasonable distance or can readily change employment without changing
their place of residence. Such areas shall be identified in accordance
with criteria used by the bureau of labor statistics of the department
of labor in defining such areas or similar criteria established by the
governor. The area generally takes the name of its community. The
boundaries depend primarily on economic and geographic factors.
Washington state is divided into labor market areas, which usually
include a county or a group of contiguous counties.
(3) "Labor market analysis" means the measurement and evaluation of
economic forces as they relate to the employment process in the local
labor market area. Variables affecting labor market relationships
include, but are not limited to, such factors as labor force changes
and characteristics, population changes and characteristics, industrial
structure and development, technological developments, shifts in
consumer demand, volume and extent of unionization and trade disputes,
recruitment practices, wage levels, conditions of employment, and
training opportunities.
(4) "Public records" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.56.010.
(5) "Department" means the employment security department.

Sec. 47 RCW 68.52.220 and 2007 c 469 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The affairs of the district shall be managed by a board of cemetery
district commissioners composed of three members. The board may
provide, by resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment of
compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate of up to ninety
dollars for each day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at
official meetings of the district commission, or in performance of
other official services or duties on behalf of the district. However,
the compensation for each commissioner must not exceed eight thousand
six hundred forty dollars per year.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any
time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which
the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made. The board shall fix
the compensation to be paid the secretary and other employees of the
district. Cemetery district commissioners and candidates for cemetery
district commissioner are exempt from the requirements of chapter
((42.17)) 42.17A RCW.
The initial cemetery district commissioners shall assume office
immediately upon their election and qualification. Staggering of terms
of office shall be accomplished as follows: (1) The person elected
receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year
term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a
five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (2) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number
of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election
is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the
election is held in an even-numbered year; and (3) the other person who
is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the
election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office
if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial
commissioners shall assume office immediately after they are elected
and qualified but their terms of office shall be calculated from the
first day of January after the election.
Thereafter, commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of
office. Commissioners shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified and assume office as provided in RCW 29A.20.040.
The polling places for a cemetery district election may be located
inside or outside the boundaries of the district, as determined by the
auditor of the county in which the cemetery district is located, and no
such election shall be held irregular or void on that account.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 48 RCW 79A.25.830 and 2007 c 241 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
The recreation and conservation funding board or office may receive
gifts, grants, or endowments from public and private sources that are
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit
of the purposes of RCW 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 and spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources
according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or
endowments violates RCW ((42.17.710)) 42.17A.560.

Sec. 49 RCW 82.08.02525 and 2009 c 535 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
public records by state and local agencies, as the terms are defined in
RCW ((42.17.020)) 42.56.010, that are copied or transferred
electronically under a request for the record for which no fee is
charged other than a statutorily set fee or a fee to reimburse the
agency for its actual costs directly incident to the copying. A
request for a record includes a request for a document not available to
the public but available to those persons who by law are allowed access
to the document, such as requests for fire reports, law enforcement
reports, taxpayer information, and academic transcripts.

Sec. 50 RCW 82.12.02525 and 2009 c 535 s 609 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of public records sold by state and local agencies, as the terms are
defined in RCW ((42.17.020)) 42.56.010, including public records
transferred electronically that are obtained under a request for the
record for which no fee is charged other than a statutorily set fee or
a fee to reimburse the agency for its actual costs directly incident to
the copying. A request for a record includes a request for a document
not available to the public but available to those persons who by law
are allowed access to the document, such as requests for fire reports,
law enforcement reports, taxpayer information, and academic
transcripts.

Sec. 51 RCW 47.06B.901 and 2009 c 515 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2012:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 2009 c 515 § 3, 2007 c 421 § 1, 1999 c 385
§ 1, & 1998 c 173 § 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 § 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.020 and section 45 of this act, 2009 c 515 § 4, 2007
c 421 § 2, & 1998 c 173 § 2;
(4) RCW 47.06B.030 and ((2009 c 515 § 5,)) 2007 c 421 § 3, 1999 c
385 § 5, & 1998 c 173 § 3;
(5) RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c 421 § 4 & 1999 c 385 § 6;
(6) RCW 47.06B.050 and 2009 c 515 § 8 & 2007 c 421 § 6;
(7) RCW 47.06B.060;
(8) ((Section 2 of this act;
(9) Section 6 of this act;
(10) Section 7 of this act;
(11))) RCW 47.06B.070;
(((12))) (9) RCW 47.06B.075; and
(((13))) (10) RCW 47.06B.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 Section 82, chapter 11, Laws of 2000;
section 60, chapter 241, Laws of 2007; and section 48 of this act
expire one year after RCW 82.14.0494 expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---