BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.60.010 and 2007 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means either: (a) A user of a net
metering system located on the premises of a customer-generator; or (b)
a customer of an electric utility with an assigned fraction of a
community net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Meter aggregation" means the administrative combination of
readings from and billing for all meters, regardless of the rate class,
on premises owned or leased by a customer-generator located within the
service territory of a single electric utility.
(8) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(9) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator over the applicable billing period.
(10) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell, a facility that
produces electricity and used and useful thermal energy from a common
fuel source, or a facility for the production of electrical energy that
generates renewable energy, and that:
(a) Has an electrical generating capacity of not more than one
hundred ninety-nine kilowatts;
(b) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(c) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(d) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(11) "Premises" means any residential property, commercial real
estate, or lands, owned or leased by a customer-generator within the
service area of a single electric utility.
(12) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(13) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(14) "Renewable energy" means ((energy generated by a facility that
uses water, wind, solar energy, or biogas from animal waste as a fuel))
electrical energy derived from a "renewable resource" as defined in RCW
19.285.030.
(15) "Community net metering" means measuring the difference
between the electricity supplied by an electric utility and that
generated by a customer-generator's assigned fraction over the
applicable billing period.
(16) "Community net metering aggregator" means an entity that:
(a) Is responsible for professionally managing the community net
metering system for the life of the project;
(b) Acts as the sole point of contact with the electric utility,
responsible for maintaining and communicating to the electric utility
a list of assigned fractions and an operating fraction of the
electrical output of a net metering system; and
(c) Registers the net metering system with the western renewable
energy generation information system and accounts for all renewable
energy credit transactions on that system.
(17) "Assigned fraction" means the percentage of all kilowatt-hours
generated by a net metering system as contracted for by a
customer-generator with a community net metering aggregator.
(18) "Operating fraction" means the percentage of all kilowatt-hours generated by a net metering system that is:
(a) Specified by the community net metering aggregator;
(b) Not assigned to a customer-generator for community net
metering; and
(c) Sold by the community net metering aggregator to the electric
utility under terms as determined through negotiations between the
community net metering aggregator and the electric utility.
(19) "Distribution system" means all of the distribution lines,
substations, switches, and other distribution hardware contiguously
connected at voltages below ninety kilovolts that are:
(a) Owned and operated by a single utility; or
(b) Owned and operated by two or more utilities with adjoining
distribution systems agreeing to combine their distribution systems for
the purpose of virtual net metering.
(20) "Full requirements customer" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 19.280.020.
(21) "Aggregate assigned fraction" means the total percentage of
the output of a net metering system assigned to customer-generators for
community net metering. The sum of the aggregate assigned fraction and
the operating fraction must equal one hundred percent.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.020 and 2007 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An electric utility:
(a) ((Shall)) Must offer to make net metering and community net
metering available to eligible customers-generators on a first-come,
first-served basis until the cumulative generating capacity of net
metering systems equals 0.25 percent of the utility's peak demand
during 1996. On January 1, 2014, the cumulative generating capacity
available to net metering systems will equal 0.5 percent of the
utility's peak demand during 1996. Not less than one-half of the
utility's 1996 peak demand available for net metering systems ((shall))
may be reserved for the cumulative generating capacity attributable to
net metering systems that generate renewable energy;
(b) ((Shall)) Must allow net metering systems to be interconnected
using a standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(i) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(ii) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(c) ((Shall)) Must charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly
fee that is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the
same rate class, but ((shall)) may not charge the customer-generator
any additional standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or
charge unless the commission, in the case of an electrical company, or
the appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric
utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and opportunity for
comment that:
(i) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(ii) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base;
(d) May require customer-generators participating in meter
aggregation or community net metering to have their meters read on the
same billing cycle.
(2)(a) If a production meter ((and)), software, associated
interconnection equipment, or distribution system upgrade is required
by the electric utility to provide meter aggregation under RCW
80.60.030(4), or to provide net metering of systems larger than one
hundred ninety-nine kilowatts, the customer-generator is responsible
for the purchase of the production meter ((and)), software, associated
interconnection equipment, and distribution system upgrade.
(b) If any requirements to provide meter aggregation in addition to
the requirements of (a) of this subsection are imposed by the
Bonneville power administration, the customer-generator is responsible
for any such requirements.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.030 and 2007 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility ((shall)) must measure the net electricity
produced or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with
normal metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
((shall)) must be billed for the net electricity supplied by the
electric utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) ((Shall)) Must be billed for the appropriate customer charges
for that billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) ((Shall)) Must be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours
generated during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit
appearing on the bill for the following billing period.
(4) If a customer-generator requests, an electric utility ((shall))
must provide meter aggregation.
(a) For customer-generators participating in meter aggregation,
kilowatt-hours credits earned by a net metering system during the
billing period first ((shall)) must be used to offset electricity
supplied by the electric utility.
(b) Not more than a total of ((one hundred kilowatts shall)) five
megawatts may be aggregated among all customer-generators participating
in a ((generating facility)) net metering system under this subsection.
(c) Excess kilowatt-hours credits earned by the net metering
system, during the same billing period, ((shall)) must be credited
equally by the electric utility to remaining meters located on all
premises of a customer-generator at the designated rate of each meter.
(d) Meters so aggregated ((shall)) may not change rate classes due
to meter aggregation under this section.
(5) On April 30th of each calendar year, any remaining unused
kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous year ((shall))
must be granted to the electric utility, without any compensation to
the customer-generator, unless the electric utility establishes:
(a) A date other than April 30th that is more appropriate for the
seasonal output of a specific net metering system; or
(b) A program for rolling over all or part of a
customer-generator's kilowatt-hour credit to the subsequent year.
(6) All renewable energy credits produced as a result of the
generation of electricity from a net metering system are the property
of the electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For community net metering, kilowatt-hour credits generated by
the net metering system, during the same billing period must be
credited to participating customer-generators in proportion to each
customer-generator's assigned fraction.
(2) On April 30th of each calendar year, any remaining unused
kilowatt-hour credit accumulated by a customer-generator during the
previous year must be granted to the electric utility, without any
compensation to the customer-generator, unless:
(a) The utility establishes a date other than April 30th that is
more appropriate for the seasonal output of a specific net metering
system; or
(b) The utility establishes a program for rolling over all or part
of a customer-generator's kilowatt-hour credit to the subsequent year.
(3)(a) If a production meter, project specific software, associated
interconnection equipment, or distribution system upgrade is required
by the electric utility to connect a community net metering system, the
community net metering system aggregator is responsible for the
purchase of the production meter, project specific software, associated
interconnection equipment, or distribution system upgrade required. If
an electric utility chooses to update its billing software to
accommodate meter aggregation, the customer-generator of the connected
community net metering system is not responsible for the costs of such
billing software update.
(b) If any requirements to connect a community net metering system
in addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection are imposed
by the Bonneville power administration, the community net metering
system aggregator is responsible for any such requirements.
(4) A community net metering aggregator may choose to retain an
operating fraction of the electrical output of a community net metering
system and sell the electricity to the electric utility, under terms
negotiated with the electric utility, in order to provide operating
income to maintain the community net metering system.
(5) A net metering aggregator must submit an updated list of
assigned fractions and operating fractions to the electric utility no
more than once per quarter by a date determined by the electric
utility. A net metering aggregator must provide information to the
electric utility demonstrating that the sum of assigned fractions and
operating fraction equals one hundred percent.
(6) A community net metering system may not have assigned fractions
smaller than:
(a) One-tenth of one percent (1/1000) and on average produce no
less than one thousand kilowatt-hours annually for utilities with more
than twenty-five thousand ratepayers;
(b) One percent (1/100) and on average produce no less than two
thousand kilowatt-hours annually for utilities with less than
twenty-five thousand ratepayers; or
(c) A size limit set at an electric utility's discretion that is
less than required of the electric utility under (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(7) All renewable energy credits generated by a community net
metering system are the property of the electric utility.
(8) An electric utility must provide to prospective community net
metering aggregators and customer-generators sufficient information to
determine the boundaries of a distribution system.
(9) An electric utility may negotiate a power purchase agreement
for an operating fraction with the community net metering aggregator of
the community net metering system using rates, tariffs, contracts, and
conditions as would otherwise apply to the utility buying power from a
comparable renewable energy generator. An electric utility must treat
an operating fraction in a similar manner as it would a qualifying
small power production facility under 18 C.F.R. 292.204 of the federal
regulations for the federal public utility regulatory policies act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---