BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.004 and 2009 c 502 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Military duties potentially impacting parenting functions"
means those obligations imposed, voluntarily or involuntarily, on a
parent serving in the armed forces that may interfere with that
parent's abilities to perform his or her parenting functions under a
temporary or permanent parenting plan or other temporary or permanent
court order designating residential time with a child. Military duties
potentially impacting parenting functions include, but are not limited
to:
(a) "Deployment," which means the temporary transfer of a service
member serving in an active-duty status to another location in support
of a military operation, to include any tour of duty classified by the
member's branch of the armed forces as "remote" or "unaccompanied";
(b) "Activation" or "mobilization," which means the call-up of a
national guard or reserve service member to extended active-duty
status. For purposes of this definition, "mobilization" does not
include national guard or reserve annual training, inactive duty days,
or drill weekends; or
(c) "Temporary duty," which means the transfer of a service member
from one military base or the service member's home to a different
location, usually another base, for a limited period of time to
accomplish training or to assist in the performance of a noncombat
mission.
(2) "Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions
include:
(a) Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing
relationship with the child;
(b) Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding,
clothing, physical care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day
care, and engaging in other activities which are appropriate to the
developmental level of the child and that are within the social and
economic circumstances of the particular family;
(c) Attending to adequate education for the child, including
remedial or other education essential to the best interests of the
child;
(d) Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate
interpersonal relationships;
(e) Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social
and economic circumstances; and
(f) Providing for the financial support of the child.
(3) "Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the
child, including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is
incorporated in any final decree or decree of modification in an action
for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of
invalidity, or legal separation.
(4) "Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the
child pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of
marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity, or legal
separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A military parent seeking to establish a temporary or permanent
parenting plan or other court order designating residential time or
visitation rights may request the court to delegate the military
parent's residential time or visitation rights, or a portion thereof,
as provided under RCW 26.09.260 (11) and (12), when the military parent
is or will be:
(1) Under temporary duty, deployment, activation, or mobilization
orders that involve moving a substantial distance away from the
military parent's residence or would otherwise have a material effect
on the military parent's ability to exercise residential time or
visitation rights; or
(2) Under temporary duty that involves being more than one night
away from the military parent's residence at the time he or she is
scheduled to have residential time or visitation.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.260 and 2009 c 502 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (6), (8),
and (10) of this section, the court shall not modify a prior custody
decree or a parenting plan unless it finds, upon the basis of facts
that have arisen since the prior decree or plan or that were unknown to
the court at the time of the prior decree or plan, that a substantial
change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the nonmoving
party and that the modification is in the best interest of the child
and is necessary to serve the best interests of the child. The effect
of a parent's military duties potentially impacting parenting functions
shall not, by itself, be a substantial change of circumstances
justifying a permanent modification of a prior decree or plan.
(2) In applying these standards, the court shall retain the
residential schedule established by the decree or parenting plan
unless:
(a) The parents agree to the modification;
(b) The child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner
with the consent of the other parent in substantial deviation from the
parenting plan;
(c) The child's present environment is detrimental to the child's
physical, mental, or emotional health and the harm likely to be caused
by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantage of a change
to the child; or
(d) The court has found the nonmoving parent in contempt of court
at least twice within three years because the parent failed to comply
with the residential time provisions in the court-ordered parenting
plan, or the parent has been convicted of custodial interference in the
first or second degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
(3) A conviction of custodial interference in the first or second
degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall constitute a substantial
change of circumstances for the purposes of this section.
(4) The court may reduce or restrict contact between the child and
the parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the time
if it finds that the reduction or restriction would serve and protect
the best interests of the child using the criteria in RCW 26.09.191.
(5) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change in
circumstances of either parent or of the child, and without
consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this
section, if the proposed modification is only a minor modification in
the residential schedule that does not change the residence the child
is scheduled to reside in the majority of the time and:
(a) Does not exceed twenty-four full days in a calendar year; or
(b) Is based on a change of residence of the parent with whom the
child does not reside the majority of the time or an involuntary change
in work schedule by a parent which makes the residential schedule in
the parenting plan impractical to follow; or
(c) Does not result in a schedule that exceeds ninety overnights
per year in total, if the court finds that, at the time the petition
for modification is filed, the decree of dissolution or parenting plan
does not provide reasonable time with the parent with whom the child
does not reside a majority of the time, and further, the court finds
that it is in the best interests of the child to increase residential
time with the parent in excess of the residential time period in (a) of
this subsection. However, any motion under this subsection (5)(c) is
subject to the factors established in subsection (2) of this section if
the party bringing the petition has previously been granted a
modification under this same subsection within twenty-four months of
the current motion. Relief granted under this section shall not be the
sole basis for adjusting or modifying child support.
(6) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan pursuant to a proceeding to permit or restrain a
relocation of the child. The person objecting to the relocation of the
child or the relocating person's proposed revised residential schedule
may file a petition to modify the parenting plan, including a change of
the residence in which the child resides the majority of the time,
without a showing of adequate cause other than the proposed relocation
itself. A hearing to determine adequate cause for modification shall
not be required so long as the request for relocation of the child is
being pursued. In making a determination of a modification pursuant to
relocation of the child, the court shall first determine whether to
permit or restrain the relocation of the child using the procedures and
standards provided in RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560. Following that
determination, the court shall determine what modification pursuant to
relocation should be made, if any, to the parenting plan or custody
order or visitation order.
(7) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time and whose residential time with the child is subject to
limitations pursuant to RCW 26.09.191 (2) or (3) may not seek expansion
of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section unless that
parent demonstrates a substantial change in circumstances specifically
related to the basis for the limitation.
(8)(a) If a parent with whom the child does not reside a majority
of the time voluntarily fails to exercise residential time for an
extended period, that is, one year or longer, the court upon proper
motion may make adjustments to the parenting plan in keeping with the
best interests of the minor child.
(b) For the purposes of determining whether the parent has failed
to exercise residential time for one year or longer, the court may not
count any time periods during which the parent did not exercise
residential time due to the effect of the parent's military duties
potentially impacting parenting functions.
(9) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time who is required by the existing parenting plan to complete
evaluations, treatment, parenting, or other classes may not seek
expansion of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section
unless that parent has fully complied with such requirements.
(10) The court may order adjustments to any of the nonresidential
aspects of a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change of
circumstances of either parent or of a child, and the adjustment is in
the best interest of the child. Adjustments ordered under this section
may be made without consideration of the factors set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(11) If the parent with whom the child resides a majority of the
time receives ((temporary duty, deployment, activation, or mobilization
orders from the military that involve moving a substantial distance
away from the parent's residence or otherwise would have a material
effect on the parent's ability to exercise parenting functions and
primary placement responsibilities)) or will receive temporary duty,
deployment, activation, or mobilization orders that involve moving a
substantial distance away from the military parent's residence or
otherwise have a material effect on the military parent's ability to
exercise residential time or visitation rights, or receives or will
receive temporary duty that involves being more than one night away
from the military parent's residence at the time he or she is scheduled
to have residential time or visitation, then:
(a) Any temporary custody order for the child during the parent's
absence shall end no later than ten days after the returning parent
provides notice to the temporary custodian, but shall not impair the
discretion of the court to conduct an expedited or emergency hearing
for resolution of the child's residential placement upon return of the
parent and within ten days of the filing of a motion alleging an
immediate danger of irreparable harm to the child. If a motion
alleging immediate danger has not been filed, the motion for an order
restoring the previous residential schedule shall be granted; and
(b) The temporary duty, activation, mobilization, or deployment and
the temporary disruption to the child's schedule shall not be a factor
in a determination of change of circumstances if a motion is filed to
transfer residential placement from the parent who is a military
service member.
(12) ((If a parent receives military temporary duty, deployment,
activation, or mobilization orders that involve moving a substantial
distance away from the military parent's residence or otherwise have a
material effect on the military parent's ability to exercise
residential time or visitation rights, at)) (a) A parent seeking to
modify a parenting plan or court order designating residential time or
visitation rights may request the court to delegate the parent's
residential time or visitation rights, or a portion thereof, pursuant
to (b) of this subsection when the parent:
(i) Receives or will receive temporary duty, deployment,
activation, or mobilization orders that involve moving a substantial
distance away from the military parent's residence or otherwise have a
material effect on the military parent's ability to exercise
residential time or visitation rights; or
(ii) Receives or will receive temporary duty that involves being
more than one night away from the military parent's residence at the
time he or she is scheduled to have residential time or visitation.
(b) Pursuant to (a) of this subsection and upon the request of the
military parent, the court may delegate the military parent's
residential time or visitation rights, or a portion thereof, to a
child's family member, including a stepparent, or another person other
than a parent, with a close and substantial relationship to the minor
child for the duration of the military parent's absence, if delegating
residential time or visitation rights is in the child's best interest.
The court may not permit the delegation of residential time or
visitation rights to a person who would be subject to limitations on
residential time under RCW 26.09.191.
(c) If the parties have a parenting plan, the parties shall attempt
to resolve disputes regarding delegation of residential time or
visitation rights through the dispute resolution process specified in
their parenting plan, unless excused by the court for good cause shown.
((Such))
(d) A court-ordered temporary delegation of a military parent's
residential time or visitation rights does not create separate rights
to residential time or visitation for a person other than a parent.
(13) If the court finds that a motion to modify a prior decree or
parenting plan has been brought in bad faith, the court shall assess
the attorney's fees and court costs of the nonmoving parent against the
moving party.

--- END ---