BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.02.060 and 2009 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall
adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.
(2) The articles of incorporation or bylaws must either specify the
number of directors or specify the process by which the number of
directors will be fixed, unless the articles of incorporation dispense
with a board of directors pursuant to RCW 23B.08.010.
(3) Unless its articles of incorporation or its bylaws provide
otherwise, a corporation is governed by the following provisions:
(a) The board of directors may approve the issuance of some or all
of the shares of any or all of the corporation's classes or series
without certificates under RCW 23B.06.260;
(b) A corporation that is not a public company shall hold a special
meeting of shareholders if the holders of at least ten percent of the
votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the
meeting demand a meeting under RCW 23B.07.020;
(c) A director need not be a resident of this state or a
shareholder of the corporation under RCW 23B.08.020;
(d) The board of directors may fix the compensation of directors
under RCW 23B.08.110;
(e) Members of the board of directors may participate in a meeting
of the board by means of a conference telephone or similar
communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200;
(f) Corporate action permitted or required by this title to be
approved at a board of directors' meeting may be approved without a
meeting if the corporate action is approved by all members of the board
under RCW 23B.08.210;
(g) Regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without
notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting under RCW
23B.08.220;
(h) Special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by
at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting,
and the notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting
under RCW 23B.08.220;
(i) A quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the
number of directors under RCW 23B.08.240;
(j) If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative
vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of
directors under RCW 23B.08.240;
(k) A board of directors may create one or more committees and
appoint members of the board of directors to serve on them under RCW
23B.08.250; and
(l) Unless approved by shareholders, a corporation may indemnify,
or make advances to, a director only for reasonable expenses incurred
in the defense of any proceeding to which the director was a party
because of being a director to the extent such action is consistent
with RCW 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.580 under RCW 23B.08.590.
(4) The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision((, not in
conflict with law or the articles of incorporation,)) for managing the
business and regulating the affairs of the corporation((, including but
not limited to the following:
(a) A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of
the corporation's shares under RCW 23B.06.270;
(b) Shareholders may participate in a meeting of shareholders by
any means of communication by which all persons participating in the
meeting can hear each other under RCW 23B.07.080; and
(c) A quorum of the board of directors may consist of as few as
one-third of the number of directors under RCW 23B.08.240)) to the
extent the provision does not infringe upon or limit the exclusive
authority of the board of directors under RCW 23B.08.010(2)(b) or
otherwise conflict with this title or any other law, the articles of
incorporation, or a shareholders' agreement authorized by RCW
23B.07.320.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.08.010 and 1989 c 165 s 80 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,)) Each
corporation must have a board of directors((.
(2) All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the
authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed
under the direction of, its board of directors, subject to any
limitation set forth in the articles of incorporation.
(3))), except that a corporation may dispense with or limit the
authority of its board of directors by describing in its articles of
incorporation, or in a shareholders' agreement authorized by RCW
23B.07.320, who will perform some or all of the duties of the board of
directors.
(2) Subject to any limitation set forth in this title, the articles
of incorporation, or a shareholders' agreement authorized by RCW
23B.07.320:
(a) All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the
authority of the corporation's board of directors; and
(b) The business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed
under the direction of its board of directors, which shall have
exclusive authority as to substantive decisions concerning management
of the corporation's business.

Sec. 3 RCW 23B.10.200 and 2009 c 189 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors, subject to the limitations
set forth in RCW 23B.02.060(4), may amend or repeal the corporation's
bylaws, or adopt new bylaws, ((unless)) except to the extent that:
(a) This power is reserved exclusively to the shareholders pursuant
to the articles of incorporation((,)) or a shareholders' agreement
authorized by RCW 23B.07.320, or pursuant to RCW 23B.10.205, ((or, if
applicable, RCW)) 23B.10.210, or any other provision of this title
((reserve this power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or
part)); or
(b) The shareholders, in amending ((or)), repealing, or adopting a
particular bylaw under subsection (2) of this section, provide
expressly that the board of directors may not amend or repeal that
bylaw.
(2) A corporation's shareholders, subject to the limitations set
forth in RCW 23B.02.060(4), may amend or repeal the corporation's
bylaws, or adopt new bylaws, even though the bylaws may also be amended
or repealed, or new bylaws may also be adopted, by its board of
directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 23B.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A corporation may agree to submit a corporate action to a vote of
its shareholders whether or not the board of directors determines at
any time subsequent to approving such a corporate action that it no
longer recommends the corporate action.

Sec. 5 RCW 23B.10.030 and 2003 c 35 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose one or more
amendments to the articles of incorporation for submission to the
shareholders.
(2) For the amendment to be adopted:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the amendment to the
shareholders unless (i) the board of directors determines that because
of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make
no recommendation ((and)) or (ii) section 4 of this act applies, and in
either case the board of directors communicates the basis for ((its
determination)) so proceeding to the shareholders ((with the
amendment)); and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment must approve
the amendment as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed amendment on any basis, including the affirmative vote of
holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
amendment.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice of meeting must also state that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the
proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the
amendment.
(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the amendment to be
adopted must be approved by two-thirds, or, in the case of a public
company, a majority, of the voting group comprising all the votes
entitled to be cast on the proposed amendment, and of each other voting
group entitled under RCW 23B.10.040 or the articles of incorporation to
vote separately on the proposed amendment. The articles of
incorporation may require a greater vote than that provided for in this
subsection. The articles of incorporation of a corporation other than
a public company may require a lesser vote than that provided for in
this subsection, or may require a lesser vote by separate voting
groups, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all
the votes entitled to be cast on the proposed amendment and of each
other voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposed
amendment. Separate voting by additional voting groups is required on
a proposed amendment under the circumstances described in RCW
23B.10.040.

Sec. 6 RCW 23B.11.030 and 2009 c 189 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After adopting a plan of merger or share exchange, the board of
directors of each corporation party to the merger, and the board of
directors of the corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share
exchange, shall submit the plan of merger, except as provided in
subsection (7) of this section, or share exchange for approval by its
shareholders.
(2) For a plan of merger or share exchange to be approved:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the plan of merger or
share exchange to the shareholders((,)) unless (i) the board of
directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other
special circumstances it should make no recommendation ((and)) or (ii)
section 4 of this act applies, and in either case the board of
directors communicates the basis for ((its determination)) so
proceeding to the shareholders ((with the plan)); and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the plan, except
as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed plan of merger or share exchange on any basis, including the
affirmative vote of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by
any group of shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or
the articles of incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the
proposed plan of merger or share exchange.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger
or share exchange and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or
summary of the plan.
(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the plan of merger
must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the
votes entitled to be cast on the plan, and of each other voting group
entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to vote
separately on the plan, unless shareholder approval is not required
under subsection (7) of this section. The articles of incorporation
may require a greater or lesser vote than that provided in this
subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so
long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes
entitled to be cast on the plan of merger and of each other voting
group entitled to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by
additional voting groups is required on a plan of merger under the
circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035.
(6) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the plan of share
exchange must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising
all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan, and of each other voting
group entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to
vote separately on the plan. The articles of incorporation may require
a greater or lesser vote than that provided in this subsection, or a
greater or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the
required vote is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to
be cast on the plan of share exchange and of each other voting group
entitled to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by additional
voting groups is required on a plan of share exchange under the
circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035.
(7) Approval by the shareholders of the surviving corporation on a
plan of merger is not required if:
(a) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation will
not differ, except for amendments enumerated in RCW 23B.10.020, from
its articles of incorporation before the merger;
(b) Each shareholder of the surviving corporation whose shares were
outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger will
hold the same number of shares, with identical designations,
preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the
merger;
(c) The number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the
merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the
merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the
merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the
merger, will not exceed the total number of voting shares of the
surviving corporation authorized by its articles of incorporation
immediately before the merger; and
(d) The number of participating shares outstanding immediately
after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as
a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued
pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued
pursuant to the merger, will not exceed the total number of
participating shares authorized by its articles of incorporation
immediately before the merger.
(8) As used in subsection (7) of this section:
(a) "Participating shares" means shares that entitle their holders
to participate without limitation in distributions.
(b) "Voting shares" means shares that entitle their holders to vote
unconditionally in elections of directors.
(9) After a merger or share exchange is approved, and at any time
before articles of merger or share exchange are filed, the planned
merger or share exchange may be abandoned, subject to any contractual
rights, without further shareholder approval, in accordance with the
procedure set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if none
is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

Sec. 7 RCW 23B.12.020 and 2009 c 189 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose
of all, or substantially all, of its property, otherwise than in the
usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions and
for the consideration determined by the corporation's board of
directors, if the board of directors proposes and its shareholders
approve the proposed transaction.
(2) For a transaction to be approved:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the proposed transaction
to the shareholders unless (i) the board of directors determines that
because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it
should make no recommendation ((and)) or (ii) section 4 of this act
applies, and in either case the board of directors communicates the
basis for ((its determination)) so proceeding to the shareholders
((with the submission of the proposed transaction)); and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the transaction.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed transaction on any basis, including the affirmative vote of
holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
transaction.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the
property of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a
description of the transaction.
(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the transaction must
be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes
entitled to be cast on the transaction, and of each other voting group
entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote separately on the
transaction. The articles of incorporation may require a greater or
lesser vote than provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser
vote by any separate voting groups provided for in the articles of
incorporation, so long as the required vote is not less than a majority
of all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction and of each
other voting group entitled to vote separately on the transaction.
(6) After a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of property
is approved, the transaction may be abandoned, subject to any
contractual rights, without further shareholder approval, in a manner
determined by the board of directors.
(7) A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by
RCW 23B.06.400 and not by this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 23B.14.020 and 2009 c 189 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for
submission to the shareholders.
(2) For a proposal to dissolve to be approved:
(a) The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the
shareholders unless (i) the board of directors determines that because
of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make
no recommendation ((and)) or (ii) section 4 of this act applies, and in
either case the board of directors communicates the basis for ((its
determination)) so proceeding to the shareholders; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to
dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposal for dissolution on any basis, including the affirmative vote
of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
dissolution.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed dissolution either (a) by giving
notice of a shareholders' meeting in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050 and
stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to
consider dissolving the corporation, or (b) in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 23B.07.040 for approving the proposed dissolution
without a meeting.
(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the proposed
dissolution must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group
comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposed
dissolution, and of each other voting group entitled under the articles
of incorporation to vote separately on the proposed dissolution. The
articles of incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote than
provided in this subsection, or a greater or lesser vote by any
separate voting groups provided for in the articles of incorporation,
so long as the required vote is not less than a majority of all the
votes entitled to be cast on the proposed dissolution and of each other
voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposed dissolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 23B.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The right of a director, officer, employee, or agent to
indemnification or to advancement of expenses arising under a provision
in the articles of incorporation or a bylaw shall not be eliminated or
impaired by an amendment to or repeal of that provision after the
occurrence of the act or omission that is the subject of the proceeding
for which indemnification or advancement of expenses under that
provision is sought, unless the provision in effect at the time of such
an act or omission explicitly authorizes the elimination or impairment
of the right after such an action or omission has occurred.

--- END ---