BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.020 and 1997 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any suitable person over the age of eighteen years, or any
parent under the age of eighteen years or, if the petition is for
appointment of a professional guardian, any individual or guardianship
service that meets any certification requirements established by the
administrator for the courts, may, if not otherwise disqualified, be
appointed guardian or limited guardian of the person and/or the estate
of an incapacitated person. A financial institution subject to the
jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions and authorized
to exercise trust powers, and a federally chartered financial
institution when authorized to do so, may act as a guardian of the
estate of an incapacitated person without having to meet the
certification requirements established by the administrator for the
courts. No person is qualified to serve as a guardian who is
(a) under eighteen years of age except as otherwise provided
herein;
(b) of unsound mind;
(c) convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor involving moral
turpitude;
(d) a nonresident of this state who has not appointed a resident
agent to accept service of process in all actions or proceedings with
respect to the estate and caused such appointment to be filed with the
court;
(e) a corporation not authorized to act as a fiduciary, guardian,
or limited guardian in the state;
(f) a person whom the court finds unsuitable.
(2) The professional guardian certification requirements required
under this section shall not apply to a testamentary guardian appointed
under RCW 11.88.080.
(3) If a guardian or limited guardian is not a certified
professional guardian or financial institution authorized under this
section, the guardian or limited guardian shall complete any
standardized training for lay guardians made available by the
administrative office of the courts and the superior court where the
petition is filed unless granted a waiver by the court under RCW
11.92.043.
(a) If a petitioner requests the appointment of a specific
individual to act as a guardian or limited guardian, the petition for
guardianship or limited guardianship shall include evidence of the
successful completion of the required training by the proposed guardian
or limited guardian. The superior court may defer the completion of
the training requirement to a date no later than ninety days after
appointment if the petitioner requests expedited appointment due to
emergent circumstances.
(b) If no person is identified to be appointed guardian or limited
guardian at the time the petition is filed, then the court shall
require the completion of the required training by a date no later than
ninety days after the appointment.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.88.030 and 2009 c 521 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or entity may petition for the appointment of a
qualified person, ((trust company, national bank, or nonprofit
corporation)) certified professional guardian, or financial institution
authorized in RCW 11.88.020 as the guardian or limited guardian of an
incapacitated person. No liability for filing a petition for
guardianship or limited guardianship shall attach to a petitioner
acting in good faith and upon reasonable basis. A petition for
guardianship or limited guardianship shall state:
(a) The name, age, residence, and post office address of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(b) The nature of the alleged incapacity in accordance with RCW
11.88.010;
(c) The approximate value and description of property, including
any compensation, pension, insurance, or allowance, to which the
alleged incapacitated person may be entitled;
(d) Whether there is, in any state, a guardian or limited guardian,
or pending guardianship action for the person or estate of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(e) The residence and post office address of the person whom
petitioner asks to be appointed guardian or limited guardian;
(f) The names and addresses, and nature of the relationship, so far
as known or can be reasonably ascertained, of the persons most closely
related by blood, marriage, or state registered domestic partnership to
the alleged incapacitated person;
(g) The name and address of the person or facility having the care
and custody of the alleged incapacitated person;
(h) The reason why the appointment of a guardian or limited
guardian is sought and the interest of the petitioner in the
appointment, and whether the appointment is sought as guardian or
limited guardian of the person, the estate, or both;
(i) A description of any alternate arrangements previously made by
the alleged incapacitated person, such as trusts or powers of attorney,
including identifying any guardianship nominations contained in a power
of attorney, and why a guardianship is nevertheless necessary;
(j) The nature and degree of the alleged incapacity and the
specific areas of protection and assistance requested and the
limitation of rights requested to be included in the court's order of
appointment;
(k) The requested term of the limited guardianship to be included
in the court's order of appointment; and
(l) Whether the petitioner is proposing a specific individual to
act as guardian ad litem and, if so, the individual's knowledge of or
relationship to any of the parties, and why the individual is proposed.
The petition shall include evidence of successful completion of any
training required under RCW 11.88.020 by the proposed guardian or
limited guardian unless the petitioner requests expedited appointment
due to emergent circumstances.
(2)(a) The attorney general may petition for the appointment of a
guardian or limited guardian in any case in which there is cause to
believe that a guardianship is necessary and no private party is able
and willing to petition.
(b) Prepayment of a filing fee shall not be required in any
guardianship or limited guardianship brought by the attorney general.
Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered from the estate of the
incapacitated person at the hearing on the merits of the petition,
unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a
hardship upon the incapacitated person, in which case the filing shall
be waived.
(3) No filing fee shall be charged by the court for filing either
a petition for guardianship or a petition for limited guardianship if
the petition alleges that the alleged incapacitated person has total
assets of a value of less than three thousand dollars.
(4)(a) Notice that a guardianship proceeding has been commenced
shall be personally served upon the alleged incapacitated person and
the guardian ad litem along with a copy of the petition for appointment
of a guardian. Such notice shall be served not more than five court
days after the petition has been filed.
(b) Notice under this subsection shall include a clear and easily
readable statement of the legal rights of the alleged incapacitated
person that could be restricted or transferred to a guardian by a
guardianship order as well as the right to counsel of choice and to a
jury trial on the issue of incapacity. Such notice shall be in
substantially the following form and shall be in capital letters,
double-spaced, and in a type size not smaller than ten-point type:

IMPORTANT NOTICE PLEASE READ CAREFULLY

A PETITION TO HAVE A GUARDIAN APPOINTED FOR YOU HAS BEEN FILED IN THE
. . . . . . COUNTY SUPERIOR COURT BY . . . . . . IF A GUARDIAN IS
APPOINTED, YOU COULD LOSE ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:
(1) TO MARRY, DIVORCE, OR ENTER INTO OR END A STATE REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP;
(2) TO VOTE OR HOLD AN ELECTED OFFICE;
(3) TO ENTER INTO A CONTRACT OR MAKE OR REVOKE A WILL;
(4) TO APPOINT SOMEONE TO ACT ON YOUR BEHALF;
(5) TO SUE AND BE SUED OTHER THAN THROUGH A GUARDIAN;
(6) TO POSSESS A LICENSE TO DRIVE;
(7) TO BUY, SELL, OWN, MORTGAGE, OR LEASE PROPERTY;
(8) TO CONSENT TO OR REFUSE MEDICAL TREATMENT;
(9) TO DECIDE WHO SHALL PROVIDE CARE AND ASSISTANCE;
(10) TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING SOCIAL ASPECTS OF YOUR LIFE.

UNDER THE LAW, YOU HAVE CERTAIN RIGHTS.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE REPRESENTED BY A LAWYER OF YOUR OWN CHOOSING.
THE COURT WILL APPOINT A LAWYER TO REPRESENT YOU IF YOU ARE UNABLE TO
PAY OR PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN A SUBSTANTIAL HARDSHIP TO YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASK FOR A JURY TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED
A GUARDIAN TO HELP YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT IN COURT AND TESTIFY WHEN THE HEARING
IS HELD TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED A GUARDIAN. IF A GUARDIAN AD
LITEM IS APPOINTED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO REQUEST THE COURT TO REPLACE
THAT PERSON.

(5) All petitions filed under the provisions of this section shall
be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is requested by
a party or the guardian ad litem within such sixty day period and
granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted, the court
shall set a new hearing date.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.92.043 and 1991 c 289 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the guardian or limited guardian of the
person:
(1) To file within three months after appointment a personal care
plan for the incapacitated person which shall include (a) an assessment
of the incapacitated person's physical, mental, and emotional needs and
of such person's ability to perform or assist in activities of daily
living, and (b) the guardian's specific plan for meeting the identified
and emerging personal care needs of the incapacitated person.
(2) To file annually or, where a guardian of the estate has been
appointed, at the time an account is required to be filed under RCW
11.92.040, a report on the status of the incapacitated person, which
shall include:
(a) The address and name of the incapacitated person and all
residential changes during the period;
(b) The services or programs which the incapacitated person
receives;
(c) The medical status of the incapacitated person;
(d) The mental status of the incapacitated person;
(e) Changes in the functional abilities of the incapacitated
person;
(f) Activities of the guardian for the period;
(g) Any recommended changes in the scope of the authority of the
guardian;
(h) The identity of any professionals who have assisted the
incapacitated person during the period;
(i)(i) Evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's successful
completion of any standardized training for guardians or limited
guardians made available by the administrative office of the courts and
the superior court when the guardian or limited guardian: (A) Was
appointed prior to the effective date of this section; (B) is not a
certified professional guardian or financial institution authorized
under RCW 11.88.020; and (C) has not previously completed the
requirements of RCW 11.88.020(3).
(ii) The superior court may waive this requirement for good cause
or extend the time period for completion of the training requirement
for ninety days upon petition by the guardian or limited guardian; and
(j) Evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's successful
completion of any additional or updated training offered by the
administrative office of the courts and the superior court as is
required at the discretion of the superior court unless the guardian or
limited guardian is a certified professional guardian or financial
institution authorized under RCW 11.88.020.
(3) To report to the court within thirty days any substantial
change in the incapacitated person's condition, or any changes in
residence of the incapacitated person.
(4) Consistent with the powers granted by the court, to care for
and maintain the incapacitated person in the setting least restrictive
to the incapacitated person's freedom and appropriate to the
incapacitated person's personal care needs, assert the incapacitated
person's rights and best interests, and if the incapacitated person is
a minor or where otherwise appropriate, to see that the incapacitated
person receives appropriate training and education and that the
incapacitated person has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation,
or profession.
(5) Consistent with RCW 7.70.065, to provide timely, informed
consent for health care of the incapacitated person, except in the case
of a limited guardian where such power is not expressly provided for in
the order of appointment or subsequent modifying order as provided in
RCW 11.88.125 as now or hereafter amended, the standby guardian or
standby limited guardian may provide timely, informed consent to
necessary medical procedures if the guardian or limited guardian cannot
be located within four hours after the need for such consent arises.
No guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian may involuntarily
commit for mental health treatment, observation, or evaluation an
alleged incapacitated person who is unable or unwilling to give
informed consent to such commitment unless the procedures for
involuntary commitment set forth in chapter 71.05 or 72.23 RCW are
followed. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a
guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian to consent to:
(a) Therapy or other procedure which induces convulsion;
(b) Surgery solely for the purpose of psychosurgery;
(c) Other psychiatric or mental health procedures that restrict
physical freedom of movement, or the rights set forth in RCW
((71.05.370)) 71.05.217.
A guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian who believes
these procedures are necessary for the proper care and maintenance of
the incapacitated person shall petition the court for an order unless
the court has previously approved the procedure within the past thirty
days. The court may order the procedure only after an attorney is
appointed in accordance with RCW 11.88.045 if no attorney has
previously appeared, notice is given, and a hearing is held in
accordance with RCW 11.88.040.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.88.095 and 1995 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining the disposition of a petition for guardianship,
the court's order shall be based upon findings as to the capacities,
condition, and needs of the alleged incapacitated person, and shall not
be based solely upon agreements made by the parties.
(2) Every order appointing a full or limited guardian of the person
or estate shall include:
(a) Findings as to the capacities, condition, and needs of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(b) The amount of the bond, if any, or a bond review period;
(c) ((When the next report of the guardian is due;
(d))) The date the account or report shall be filed. The date of
filing an account or report shall be within ninety days after the
anniversary date of the appointment;
(d) A date for the court to review the account or report and enter
its order. The court shall conduct the review within one hundred
twenty days after the anniversary date of the appointment and follow
the provisions of RCW 11.92.050;
(e) A directive to the clerk of court to issue letters of
guardianship that expire thirty days after the date specified under (d)
of this subsection for the review, unless an earlier date is ordered;
(f) Whether the guardian ad litem shall continue acting as guardian
ad litem;
(((e))) (g) Whether a review hearing shall be required upon the
filing of the inventory;
(((f))) (h) Whether a review hearing is required upon filing the
initial personal care plan;
(i) The authority of the guardian, if any, for investment and
expenditure of the ward's estate; ((and
(g))) (j) Names and addresses of those persons described in RCW
11.88.090(5)(d), if any, whom the court believes should receive copies
of further pleadings filed by the guardian with respect to the
guardianship. The guardian, within ninety days from the date of the
appointment, shall, in writing, notify the persons identified by the
court of their right to request special notice of proceedings as
described in RCW 11.92.150; and
(k) A guardianship summary placed directly below the case caption
or on a separate cover page in the following form, or a substantially
similar form, containing the following information:

GUARDIANSHIP SUMMARY

Date Guardian Appointed: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Due Date for Report and
Accounting:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Next Hearing . . . . . . . . . . . .

New Letters Expire On: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Bond Amount: $ . . . . . . . . . . . .

Restricted Account
Agreements Required
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Due Date for Inventory: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Due Date for Care Plan: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Incapacitated Person
(IP) Guardian of: [ ] Estate [ ]
Person

Name: Name:

Address: Address:

Phone: Phone:

Facsimile: Facsimile:

Interested Parties Address Relation to IP

(3) If the court determines that a limited guardian should be
appointed, the order shall specifically set forth the limits by either
stating exceptions to the otherwise full authority of the guardian or
by stating the specific authority of the guardian.
(4) In determining the disposition of a petition for appointment of
a guardian or limited guardian of the estate only, the court shall
consider whether the alleged incapacitated person is capable of giving
informed medical consent or of making other personal decisions and, if
not, whether a guardian or limited guardian of the person of the
alleged incapacitated person should be appointed for that purpose.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered, any powers of attorney or durable
powers of attorney shall be revoked upon appointment of a guardian or
limited guardian of the estate.
If there is an existing medical power of attorney, the court must
make a specific finding of fact regarding the continued validity of
that medical power of attorney before appointing a guardian or limited
guardian for the person.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.88.125 and 2008 c 6 s 805 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The person appointed by the court as either guardian or limited
guardian of the person and/or estate of an incapacitated person((,))
shall file in writing with the court, within ninety days from the date
of appointment, a notice designating a standby limited guardian or
guardian to serve as limited guardian or guardian at the death or legal
incapacity of the court-appointed guardian or limited guardian. The
notice shall state the name, address, zip code, and telephone number of
the designated standby or limited guardian. Notice of the guardian's
designation of the standby guardian shall be given to the standby
guardian, the incapacitated person and his or her spouse or domestic
partner and adult children, any facility in which the incapacitated
person resides, and any person entitled to special notice under RCW
11.92.150 or any person entitled to receive pleadings pursuant to RCW
11.88.095(2)(((g))) (j). Such standby guardian or limited guardian
shall have all the powers, duties, and obligations of the regularly
appointed guardian or limited guardian and in addition shall, within a
period of thirty days from the death or adjudication of incapacity of
the regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian, file with the
superior court in the county in which the guardianship or limited
guardianship is then being administered, a petition for appointment of
a substitute guardian or limited guardian. Upon the court's
appointment of a new, substitute guardian or limited guardian, the
standby guardian or limited guardian shall make an accounting and
report to be approved by the court, and upon approval of the court, the
standby guardian or limited guardian shall be released from all duties
and obligations arising from or out of the guardianship or limited
guardianship.
(2) Letters of guardianship shall be issued to the standby guardian
or limited guardian upon filing an oath and posting a bond as required
by RCW 11.88.100 as now or hereafter amended. The oath may be filed
prior to the appointed guardian or limited guardian's death. Notice of
such appointment shall be provided to the standby guardian, the
incapacitated person, and any facility in which the incapacitated
person resides. The provisions of RCW 11.88.100 through 11.88.110 as
now or hereafter amended shall apply to standby guardians and limited
guardians.
(3) In addition to the powers of a standby limited guardian or
guardian as noted in subsection (1) of this section, the standby
limited guardian or guardian shall have the authority to provide
timely, informed consent to necessary medical procedures, as authorized
in RCW 11.92.040 as now or hereafter amended, if the guardian or
limited guardian cannot be located within four hours after the need for
such consent arises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 11.88 RCW
to read as follows:
A guardian or limited guardian may not act on behalf of the
incapacitated person without valid letters of guardianship. Upon
appointment and fulfilling all legal requirements to serve, as set
forth in the court's order, the clerk shall issue letters of
guardianship to a guardian or limited guardian appointed by the court
in the following form, or a substantially similar form:

Sec. 7 RCW 11.88.140 and 1991 c 289 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) TERMINATION WITHOUT COURT ORDER. A guardianship or limited
guardianship is terminated:
(a) Upon the attainment of full and legal age, as defined in RCW
26.28.010 as now or hereafter amended, of any person defined as an
incapacitated person pursuant to RCW 11.88.010 as now or hereafter
amended solely by reason of youth, RCW 26.28.020 to the contrary
notwithstanding, subject to subsection (2) of this section;
(b) By an adjudication of capacity or an adjudication of
termination of incapacity;
(c) By the death of the incapacitated person;
(d) By expiration of the term of limited guardianship specified in
the order appointing the limited guardian, unless prior to such
expiration a petition has been filed and served, as provided in RCW
11.88.040 as now or hereafter amended, seeking an extension of such
term.
(2) TERMINATION OF GUARDIANSHIP FOR A MINOR BY DECLARATION OF
COMPLETION. A guardianship for the benefit of a minor may be
terminated upon the minor's attainment of legal age, as defined in RCW
26.28.010 as now or hereafter amended, by the guardian filing a
declaration that states:
(a) The date the minor attained legal age;
(b) That the guardian has paid all of the minor's funds in the
guardian's possession to the minor, who has signed a receipt for the
funds, and that the receipt has been filed with the court;
(c) That the guardian has completed the administration of the
minor's estate and the guardianship is ready to be closed; and
(d) The amount of fees paid or to be paid to each of the following:
(i) The guardian, (ii) lawyer or lawyers, (iii) accountant or
accountants; and that the guardian believes the fees are reasonable and
does not intend to obtain court approval of the amount of the fees or
to submit a guardianship accounting to the court for approval. Subject
to the requirement of notice as provided in this section, unless the
minor petitions the court either for an order requiring the guardian to
obtain court approval of the amount of fees paid or to be paid to the
guardian, lawyers, or accountants, or for an order requiring an
accounting, or both, within thirty days from the filing of the
declaration of completion of guardianship, the guardian shall be
automatically discharged without further order of the court. The
guardian's powers will cease thirty days after filing the declaration
of completion of guardianship. The declaration of completion of
guardianship shall, at the time, be the equivalent of an entry of a
decree terminating the guardianship, distributing the assets, and
discharging the guardian for all legal intents and purposes.
Within five days of the date of filing the declaration of
completion of guardianship, the guardian or the guardian's lawyer shall
mail a copy of the declaration of completion to the minor together with
a notice that shall be substantially as follows:

CAPTION OF CASE NOTICE OF FILING A
DECLARATION OF
COMPLETION OF
GUARDIANSHIP

NOTICE IS GIVEN that the attached Declaration of
Completion of Guardianship was filed by the undersigned
in the above-entitled court on the . . . . . . day of . . . . . . ,
19. . . ; unless you file a petition in the above-entitled court
requesting the court to review the reasonableness of the
fees, or for an accounting, or both, and serve a copy of the
petition on the guardian or the guardian's lawyer, within
thirty days after the filing date, the amount of fees paid or
to be paid will be deemed reasonable, the acts of the
guardian will be deemed approved, the guardian will be
automatically discharged without further order of the court
and the Declaration of Completion of Guardianship will be
final and deemed the equivalent of an order terminating the
guardianship, discharging the guardian and decreeing the
distribution of the guardianship assets.

If you file and serve a petition within the period
specified, the undersigned will request the court to fix a
time and place for the hearing of your petition, and you will
be notified of the time and place of the hearing, by mail, or
by personal service, not less than ten days before the
hearing on the petition.

DATED this . . . . . . day of . . . . . . , 19. . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Guardian

If the minor, after reaching legal age, waives in writing the
notice required by this section, the guardian will be automatically
discharged without further order of the court and the declaration of
completion of guardianship will be effective as an order terminating
the guardianship without an accounting upon filing the declaration. If
the guardian has been required to furnish a bond, and a declaration of
completion of guardianship is filed according to this section, any bond
furnished by the guardian shall be automatically discharged upon the
discharge of the guardian.
(3) TERMINATION ON COURT ORDER. A guardianship or limited
guardianship may be terminated by court order after such notice as the
court may require if the guardianship or limited guardianship is no
longer necessary.
The guardian or limited guardian shall, within ((thirty)) ninety
days of the date of termination of the guardianship, unless the court
orders a different deadline for good cause, prepare and file with the
court a final verified account of administration. The final verified
account of administration shall contain the same information as
required for (a) an intermediate verified account of administration of
the estate under RCW 11.92.040(2) and (b) an intermediate personal care
status report under RCW 11.92.043(2).
(4) EFFECT OF TERMINATION. When a guardianship or limited
guardianship terminates other than by the death of the incapacitated
person, the powers of the guardian or limited guardian cease, except
that a guardian or limited guardian of the estate may make
disbursements for claims that are or may be allowed by the court, for
liabilities already properly incurred for the estate or for the
incapacitated person, and for expenses of administration. When a
guardianship or limited guardianship terminates by death of the
incapacitated person, the guardian or limited guardian of the estate
may proceed under RCW 11.88.150 as now or hereafter amended, but the
rights of all creditors against the incapacitated person's estate shall
be determined by the law of decedents' estates.

Sec. 8 RCW 11.92.053 and 1995 c 297 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within ninety days, unless the court orders a different deadline
for good cause, after the termination of a guardianship for any reason,
the guardian or limited guardian of the estate shall petition the court
for an order settling his or her account as filed in accordance with
RCW 11.92.040(2) with regard to any receipts, expenditures, and
investments made and acts done by the guardian to the date of the
termination. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a
date for the hearing of the petition after notice has been given in
accordance with RCW 11.88.040. Any person interested may file
objections to the petition or may appear at the time and place fixed
for the hearing thereof and present his or her objections thereto. The
court may take such testimony as it deems proper or necessary to
determine whether an order settling the account should be issued and
the transactions of the guardian be approved, and the court may appoint
a guardian ad litem to review the report.
At the hearing on the petition of the guardian or limited guardian,
if the court is satisfied that the actions of the guardian or limited
guardian have been proper, and that the guardian has in all respects
discharged his or her trust with relation to the receipts,
expenditures, investments, and acts, then, in such event, the court
shall enter an order approving the account, and the order shall be
final and binding upon the incapacitated person, subject only to the
right of appeal as upon a final order. However, within one year after
the incompetent attains his or her majority any such account may be
challenged by the incapacitated person on the ground of fraud.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.92.040 and 1991 c 289 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the guardian or limited guardian of an
estate:
(1) To file within three months after the guardian's appointment a
verified inventory of all the property of the incapacitated person
which comes into the guardian's possession or knowledge, including a
statement of all encumbrances, liens, and other secured charges on any
item;
(2) To file annually, within ninety days after the anniversary date
of the guardian's or limited guardian's appointment, and also within
((thirty)) ninety days after termination of the appointment, unless the
court for good cause orders a different deadline to file following
termination, a written verified account of the administration for court
approval, which account shall contain at least the following
information:
(a) Identification of property of the guardianship estate as of the
date of the last account or, in the case of the initial account, as of
the date of inventory;
(b) Identification of all additional property received into the
guardianship, including income by source;
(c) Identification of all expenditures made during the account
period by major categories;
(d) Any adjustments to the guardianship estate required to
establish its present fair market value, including gains or losses on
sale or other disposition and any mortgages, deeds of trust or other
encumbrances against the guardianship estate; and
(e) Identification of all property held in the guardianship estate
as of the date of account, the assessed value of any real property and
the guardian's estimate of the present fair market values of other
property (including the basis on which such estimate is made), and the
total net fair market value of the guardianship estate. In addition,
immediately following such statement of present fair market value, the
account shall set forth a statement of current amount of the guardian's
bond and any other court-ordered protection for the security of the
guardianship assets;
(3) The court in its discretion may allow reports at intervals of
up to thirty-six months for estates with assets (exclusive of real
property) having a value of not more than twice the homestead
exemption. All court orders approving accounts or reports shall direct
issuance of new guardianship letters and prominently identify new
expiration dates and must contain a guardianship summary as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. Notwithstanding contrary provisions of
this section, the guardian or limited guardian of an estate need not
file an annual report with the court if the funds of the guardianship
are held for the benefit of a minor in a blocked account unless the
guardian requests a withdrawal from such account, in which case the
guardian shall provide a written verified account of the administration
of the guardianship estate along with the guardian's petition for the
withdrawal. The guardian or limited guardian shall report any
substantial change in income or assets of the guardianship estate
within thirty days of the occurrence of the change. A hearing shall be
scheduled for court review and determination of provision for increased
bond or other provision in accordance with RCW 11.88.100;
(4) All court orders approving accounts or reports must contain a
guardianship summary placed directly below the case caption or on a
separate cover page in the following form, or a substantially similar
form, containing the following information:

GUARDIANSHIP SUMMARY

Date Guardian Appointed: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Due Date for Report and
Accounting:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Next Hearing: . . . . . . . . . . . .

New Letters Expire On: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Bond Amount: $ . . . . . . . . . . . .

Restricted Account
Agreements Required
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Incapacitated Person
(IP) Guardian of: [ ] Estate [ ] Person

Name: Name:

Address: Address:

Phone: Phone:

Facsimile: Facsimile:

Standby Guardian Address Relation to IP

Interested Parties Address Relation to IP

(5) To protect and preserve the guardianship estate, to apply it as
provided in this chapter, to account for it faithfully, to perform all
of the duties required by law, and at the termination of the
guardianship or limited guardianship, to deliver the assets of the
incapacitated person to the persons entitled thereto. Except as
provided to the contrary herein, the court may authorize a guardian or
limited guardian to do anything that a trustee can do under the
provisions of RCW 11.98.070 for a period not exceeding one year from
the date of the order or for a period corresponding to the interval in
which the guardian's or limited guardian's report is required to be
filed by the court pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,
whichever period is longer;
(((5))) (6) To invest and reinvest the property of the
incapacitated person in accordance with the rules applicable to
investment of trust estates by trustees as provided in chapter 11.100
RCW, except that:
(a) No investments shall be made without prior order of the court
in any property other than unconditional interest bearing obligations
of this state or of the United States and in obligations the interest
and principal of which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United
States, and in share accounts or deposits which are insured by an
agency of the United States government. Such prior order of the court
may authorize specific investments, or, in the discretion of the court,
may authorize the guardian or limited guardian to invest and reinvest
as provided in chapter 11.100 RCW without further order of the court;
(b) If it is for the best interests of the incapacitated person
that a specific property be used by the incapacitated person rather
than sold and the proceeds invested, the court may so order;
(((6))) (7) To apply to the court no later than the filing of the
inventory for an order authorizing disbursements on behalf of the
incapacitated person: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the guardian or limited
guardian of the estate, or the person, department, bureau, agency, or
charitable organization having the care and custody of an incapacitated
person, may apply to the court for an order directing the guardian or
limited guardian of the estate to pay to the person, department,
bureau, agency, or charitable organization having the care and custody
of an incapacitated person, or if the guardian or limited guardian of
the estate has the care and custody of the incapacitated person,
directing the guardian or limited guardian of the estate to apply an
amount weekly, monthly, quarterly, semi-annually, or annually, as the
court may direct, to be expended in the care, maintenance, and
education of the incapacitated person and of his or her dependents. In
proper cases, the court may order payment of amounts directly to the
incapacitated person for his or her maintenance or incidental expenses.
The amounts authorized under this section may be decreased or increased
from time to time by direction of the court. If payments are made to
another under an order of the court, the guardian or limited guardian
of the estate is not bound to see to the application thereof;
(8) To provide evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's
successful completion of any standardized training for guardians or
limited guardians made available by the administrative office of the
courts and the superior court when the guardian or limited guardian:
(a) Was appointed prior to the effective date of this section; (b) is
not a certified professional guardian or financial institution
authorized under RCW 11.88.020; and (c) has not previously completed
the requirements of RCW 11.88.020(3). The superior court may waive
this requirement for good cause or extend the time period for
completion of the training requirement for ninety days upon petition by
the guardian or limited guardian; and
(9) To provide evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's
successful completion of any additional or updated training offered by
the administrative office of the courts and the superior court as is
required at the discretion of the superior court unless the guardian or
limited guardian is a certified professional guardian or financial
institution authorized under RCW 11.88.020.

Sec. 10 RCW 11.92.050 and 1995 c 297 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of any intermediate guardianship or limited
guardianship account or report required by statute, or of any
intermediate account or report required by court rule or order, ((the
guardian or limited guardian may petition)) the court ((for)) shall
enter an order settling ((his or her)) the guardianship account or
report with regard to any receipts, expenditures, and investments made
and acts done by the guardian or limited guardian to the date of the
interim report. The order shall set the next review date within one
hundred twenty days of the anniversary date of the guardian's or
limited guardian's appointment. The order shall direct the clerk of
court to issue letters of guardianship that automatically expire thirty
days after the next review date, unless an earlier date is ordered.
(2) Upon such ((petition)) account or report being filed, the court
may in its discretion((, where the size or condition of the estate
warrants it,)) set a date for the hearing ((of the petition)) and
require the service of the ((petition)) guardian's report or account
and a notice of the hearing as provided in RCW 11.88.040 as now or
hereafter amended or as specified by the court; and, in the event a
hearing is ordered, the court may also appoint a guardian ad litem,
whose duty it shall be to investigate the account or report of the
guardian or limited guardian of the estate and to advise the court
thereon at the hearing, in writing.
(3) At the hearing on or upon the court's review of the account or
report of the guardian or limited guardian, if the court is satisfied
that the actions of the guardian or limited guardian have been proper,
and that the guardian or limited guardian has in all respects
discharged his or her trust with relation to the receipts,
expenditures, investments, and acts, then, in such event, the court
shall enter an order approving such account or report.
(4) If a guardian or limited guardian fails to file the account or
report or fails to appear at the hearing, the court shall enter an
order for one or more of the following actions:
(a) Directing the guardian or limited guardian to appear before the
court subject to contempt sanctions;
(b) Appointing a guardian ad litem;
(c) Removing the guardian or limited guardian and appointing a
successor;
(d) Completing any approved guardianship training made available to
the guardian by the court;
(e) Directing the clerk to extend the letters, for good cause
shown, for no more than ninety days, to permit the guardian to file his
or her account or report; or
(f) Providing other and further relief the court deems just and
equitable.
(5) If the court has appointed a guardian ad litem, the order shall
be final and binding upon the incapacitated person, subject only to the
right of appeal as upon a final order; provided that at the time of
final account of said guardian or limited guardian or within one year
after the incapacitated person attains his or her majority any such
interim account may be challenged by the incapacitated person on the
ground of fraud.
(((2))) (6) The procedure established in ((subsection (1) of)) this
section for financial accounts by guardians or limited guardians of the
estate shall apply to personal care reports filed by guardians or
limited guardians of the person under RCW 11.92.043.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.18.016 and 2009 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2)(a) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim
in any such action, a fee of thirty-six dollars must be paid.
(b) The party filing the first or initial petition for dissolution,
legal separation, or declaration concerning the validity of marriage
shall pay, at the time and in addition to the filing fee required under
RCW 36.18.020, a fee of thirty dollars. The clerk of the superior
court shall transmit monthly twenty-four dollars of the thirty-dollar
fee collected under this subsection to the state treasury for deposit
in the domestic violence prevention account. The remaining six dollars
shall be retained by the county for the purpose of supporting
community-based services within the county for victims of domestic
violence, except for five percent of the six dollars, which may be
retained by the court for administrative purposes.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of one
hundred twenty-five dollars for a jury of six, or two hundred fifty
dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(4) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of
record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the
first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or
portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For
authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two dollars for
each additional seal affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of
an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a
seal, a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged. When copying a
document without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee
of twenty-five cents per page must be charged. For copies made on a
compact disc, an additional fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc
must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For filing a supplemental proceeding, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged.
(8) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(9) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of five dollars.
(10) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(11) For clerk's services such as performing historical searches,
compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record
searches, the clerk may collect a fee not to exceed thirty dollars per
hour.
(12) For processing ex parte orders, the clerk may collect a fee of
thirty dollars.
(13) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each video tape or other electronic storage medium.
(14) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(15) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020
and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of two hundred dollars must be charged.
When the extension of judgment is at the request of the clerk, the two
hundred dollar charge may be imposed as court costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(16) A facilitator surcharge of up to twenty dollars must be
charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(17) For filing a water rights ((statement)) adjudication claim
under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) For filing a claim of frivolous lien under RCW 60.04.081, a
fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged.
(19) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged by the originating court in addition to the per page
charges in subsection (4) of this section.
(20) A service fee of five dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(21) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of
fifty cents per page must be charged.
(22) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(23) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090
must be charged.
(24) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority
of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(25) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee
may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability
not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of
local ordinance. This charge ((shall)) may be used solely to offset
the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.
(26) For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration
award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by
authority of local ordinance must be charged.
(27) A public agency may not charge a fee to a law enforcement
agency, for preparation, copying, or mailing of certified copies of the
judgment and sentence, information, affidavit of probable cause, and/or
the notice of requirement to register, of a sex offender convicted in
a Washington court, when such records are necessary for risk
assessment, preparation of a case for failure to register, or
maintenance of a sex offender's registration file.
(28) For the filing of a will or codicil under the provisions of
chapter 11.12 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(29) For the collection of unpaid legal financial obligations, the
clerk may impose an annual fee of up to one hundred dollars, pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.780.
(30) A surcharge of up to twenty dollars may be charged in
dissolution and legal separation actions as authorized by RCW
26.12.260.
(31) For the filing of accounts required under RCW 11.92.040, a fee
must be charged to the estate of the incapacitated person. The amount
of the fee is determined by the total net fair market value of the
guardianship estate identified pursuant to RCW 11.92.040(2)(e). If the
total fair market value of the guardianship estate is less than or
equal to three thousand dollars, a filing fee is not required. If the
superior court finds that payment of the filing fee would result in
substantial hardship upon the incapacitated person, the superior court
may waive or reduce the filing fee. The amount of the fee is as
follows:
(a) Twenty dollars for guardianship estates with a total net fair
market value greater than three thousand dollars but not exceeding one
hundred thousand dollars;
(b) Seventy-five dollars for guardianship estates with a total net
fair market value greater than one hundred thousand dollars but not
exceeding five hundred thousand dollars;
(c) One hundred fifty dollars for guardianship estates with a total
net fair market value greater than five hundred thousand dollars but
not exceeding one million dollars; or
(d) Two hundred fifty dollars for guardianship estates with a total
net fair market value greater than one million dollars.
(32) The revenue to counties from the fees established in this
section ((shall be)) is deemed to be complete reimbursement from the
state for the state's share of benefits paid to the superior court
judges of the state prior to July 24, 2005, and no claim ((shall)) may
lie against the state for such benefits.

--- END ---