BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature
prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by
general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails,
without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with RCW 90.03.250.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, and in addition
to RCW 90.14.140, water conservation practices by all water users are
encouraged and are considered a beneficial use of the water for
purposes of relinquishment.

--- END ---