BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.020 and 2010 c 106 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter. Parcels of land
described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection will, upon any
transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a surviving spouse or
surviving state registered domestic partner, be subject to the limits
of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of this subsection;
(d) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which meet one of
the following criteria:
(i) Has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent
to two hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter;
(ii) Has standing crops with an expectation of harvest within seven
years, except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, and a
demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to
one hundred dollars or more per acre in the current or previous
calendar year. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(d)(ii),
"standing crop" means Christmas trees, vineyards, fruit trees, or other
perennial crops that: (A) Are planted using agricultural methods
normally used in the commercial production of that particular crop; and
(B) typically do not produce harvestable quantities in the initial
years after planting; or
(iii) Has a standing crop of short rotation hardwoods with an
expectation of harvest within fifteen years and a demonstrable
investment in the production of those crops equivalent to one hundred
dollars or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year;
(e) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands ((shall))
also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands";
(f) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes; or
(g) Any land that is used primarily for equestrian related
activities for which a charge is made, including, but not limited to,
stabling, training, riding, clinics, schooling, shows, or grazing for
feed and that otherwise meet the requirements of (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
means the contract vendee.
(6)(a) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other
property held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road,
but otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, is considered
contiguous.
(b) Solely for purposes of this subsection (6), "same ownership"
means owned by the same person or persons, except that parcels owned by
different persons will be deemed held by the same ownership if the
parcels are:
(i) Managed as part of a single operation; and
(ii) Owned by:
(A) Members of the same immediate family;
(B) Legal entities that are wholly owned by members of the same
immediate family; or
(C) An individual who owns at least one of the parcels and/or a
legal entity or entities that own the other parcel or parcels if the
entity or entities are wholly owned by that individual, members of his
or her immediate family, or that individual and members of his or her
immediate family.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.33.035 and 2004 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are
grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as
irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all
unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for the exclusive
purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods.
(2) "Average rate of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation
as determined by the department averaged over the period of time as
provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). This rate ((shall)) must be
published in the state register by the department not later than
January 1st of each year for use in that assessment year.
(3) "Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total
amount of property taxes levied upon forest lands by all taxing
districts in the county other than the state, divided by the total
assessed value of all forest land in the county.
(4) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a timber growing and harvesting
operation, is considered contiguous. Solely for the purposes of this
subsection (4), "same ownership" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.34.020(6).
(5) "Forest land" is synonymous with "designated forest land" and
means any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres that
is or are devoted primarily to growing and harvesting timber.
Designated forest land means the land only and does not include a
residential homesite. The term includes land used for incidental uses
that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of timber but no
more than ten percent of the land may be used for such incidental uses.
It also includes the land on which appurtenances necessary for the
production, preparation, or sale of the timber products exist in
conjunction with land producing these products.
(((5))) (6) "Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course
of business the quantity of timber by species is first definitely
determined. The amount harvested ((shall)) must be determined by the
Scribner Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring practice adjusted
to arrive at substantially equivalent measurements, as approved by the
department.
(((6))) (7) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's
own land or from the land of another under a right or license granted
by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for
the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes
timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use. When the United
States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person
other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state,
including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a
possessory interest in the timber. The term "harvester" does not
include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or
mechanical services for a harvester.
(((7))) (8) "Harvesting and marketing costs" means only those costs
directly associated with harvesting the timber from the land and
delivering it to the buyer and may include the costs of disposing of
logging residues. Any other costs that are not directly and
exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber, such as
costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following
harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.
(((8))) (9) "Incidental use" means a use of designated forest land
that is compatible with its purpose for growing and harvesting timber.
An incidental use may include a gravel pit, a shed or land used to
store machinery or equipment used in conjunction with the timber
enterprise, and any other use that does not interfere with or indicate
that the forest land is no longer primarily being used to grow and
harvest timber.
(((9))) (10) "Local government" means any city, town, county,
water-sewer district, public utility district, port district,
irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary
or storm sewerage systems, domestic water supply or distribution
systems, or road construction or improvement purposes.
(((10))) (11) "Local improvement district" means any local
improvement district, utility local improvement district, local utility
district, road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a
local government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to the
districts.
(((11))) (12) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee
interest in land, except where land is subject to a real estate
contract "owner" means the contract vendee.
(((12))) (13) "Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use
of the land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the
land is evaluated any other use appears to be conflicting or
nonrelated.
(((13))) (14) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such
as but not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural
methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years.
(((14))) (15) "Small harvester" means every person who from his or
her own land or from the land of another under a right or license
granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with
others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or
takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an amount
not exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When the
United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the
small harvester is the first person other than the United States or any
instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber.
Small harvester does not include persons performing under contract the
necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and it does not
include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation hardwoods.
(((15))) (16) "Special benefit assessments" means special
assessments levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement
district or otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local
government to pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement
and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by
property by reason of that local improvement.
(((16))) (17) "Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate
stumpage value shown on tables prepared by the department under RCW
84.33.091((, provided that)). However, for timber harvested from
public land and sold under a competitive bidding process, stumpage
value ((shall)) means the actual amount paid to the seller in cash or
other consideration. The stumpage value of timber from public land
does not include harvesting and marketing costs if the timber from
public land is harvested by, or under contract for, the United States
or any instrumentality of the United States, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein. Whenever payment for the stumpage
includes considerations other than cash, the value ((shall be)) is the
fair market value of the other consideration. If the other
consideration is permanent roads, the value of the roads ((shall)) must
be the appraised value as appraised by the seller.
(((17))) (18) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on
privately or publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW
84.33.170 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.
(((18))) (19) "Timber assessed value" for a county means the sum
of: (a) The total stumpage value of timber harvested from publicly
owned land in the county multiplied by the public timber ratio, plus;
(b) the total stumpage value of timber harvested from privately owned
land in the county multiplied by the private timber ratio. The
numerator of the public timber ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the
county under RCW 84.33.051 on public timber harvests for the year of
the calculation. The numerator of the private timber ratio is the rate
of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 on private timber
harvests for the year of the calculation. The denominator of the
private timber ratio and the public timber ratio is the composite
property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of the
calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value. The
department ((shall)) must use the stumpage value of timber harvested
during the most recent four calendar quarters for which the information
is available. The department ((shall)) must calculate the timber
assessed value for each county before October 1st of each year.
(((19))) (20) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means
the timber assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The
numerator of the ratio is the total assessed value of forest land in
the taxing district. The denominator is the total assessed value of
forest land in the county. As used in this section, "assessed value of
forest land" means the assessed value of forest land for taxes due in
the year the timber assessed value for the county is calculated plus an
additional value for public forest land. The additional value for
public forest land is the product of the number of acres of public
forest land that are available for timber harvesting determined under
RCW 84.33.089 and the average assessed value per acre of private forest
land in the county.
(((20))) (21) "Timber management plan" means a plan prepared by a
trained forester, or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber
management practices, concerning the use of the land to grow and
harvest timber. Such a plan includes:
(a) A legal description of the forest land;
(b) A statement that the forest land is held in contiguous
ownership of twenty or more acres and is primarily devoted to and used
to grow and harvest timber;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the forest land or, if the
timber on the land has been harvested, the owner's plan to restock the
land with timber;
(d) A statement about whether the forest land is also used to graze
livestock;
(e) A statement about whether the land has been used in compliance
with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW; and
(f) If the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of
brush and noncommercial type timber, a description of the owner's plan
to restock the forest land within three years.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.33.078 and 2004 c 177 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the timber from public land is harvested by the state, its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein, the governmental unit, or governmental
units, that harvest or market the timber must provide the harvester
purchasing the timber with its harvesting and marketing costs as
defined in RCW 84.33.035(((7))).

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.333 and 2007 c 48 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax under this chapter, a person who is a small
harvester as defined in RCW 84.33.035(((14))) may deduct an amount not
to exceed one hundred thousand dollars per tax year from the gross
receipts or value of products proceeding or accruing from timber
harvested by that person. A deduction under this section may not
reduce the amount of tax due to less than zero.

--- END ---