BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall consist of a ((chairman)) chair and four other
members, each of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of
five years, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.
The terms shall expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies
in the membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the
governor with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability
of any member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person
to act in his or her stead during the continuance of such inability.
The members shall not be removable during their respective terms except
for cause determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The
governor in appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve
as ((chairman)) chair at the governor's pleasure. The appointed
((chairman)) chair shall serve as a fully participating board member
and as the director of the agency.
The members of the board and its officers and employees shall not
engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public
office without the prior approval of the executive ethics board
indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and
42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of appointment or employment or
during their incumbency, serve as the representative of any political
party on an executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as
an executive officer or employee of any political committee or
association. The members of the board shall each severally receive
salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, and in addition shall receive travel expenses incurred in
the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
The board may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor,
the compensation of and prescribe the duties of a senior administrative
officer and such officers, employees, and assistants as may be
necessary, and provide necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.
For the purposes of hearings set forth in RCW 9.95.011(3), this shall
include but not be limited to experts in adolescent psychosocial and
brain development.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.009 and 1990 c 3 s 707 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On July 1, 1986, the board of prison terms and paroles shall be
redesignated as the indeterminate sentence review board. The board's
membership shall be reduced as follows: On July 1, 1986, and on July
1st of each year until 1998, the number of board members shall be
reduced in a manner commensurate with the board's remaining workload as
determined by the office of financial management based upon its
population forecast for the indeterminate sentencing system and in
conjunction with the budget process. To meet the statutory obligations
of the indeterminate sentence review board, the number of board members
shall not be reduced to fewer than three members, although the office
of financial management may designate some or all members as part-time
members and specify the extent to which they shall be less than full-time members. Any reduction shall take place by the expiration, on
that date, of the term or terms having the least time left to serve.
(2) On August 1, 2011, the office of financial management shall
determine whether any changes in the membership of the board are
necessary based upon its population forecast of the population of
offenders who will be reviewed by the board pursuant to RCW
9.95.011(3).
(3)(a) After July 1, 1984, the board shall continue its functions
with respect to persons:
(i) Convicted of crimes committed prior to July 1, 1984, and
committed to the department of corrections; and
(ii) Sentenced in adult court to a term of life without parole for
a crime committed prior to his or her eighteenth birthday and committed
to the department of corrections.
(b) When making decisions on duration of confinement, including
those relating to persons committed under a mandatory life sentence,
and parole release under RCW 9.95.100 and 9.95.110, the board shall
consider the purposes, standards, and sentencing ranges adopted
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.850 and the minimum term recommendations of the
sentencing judge and prosecuting attorney where such recommendations
exist in the trial record, and shall attempt to make decisions
reasonably consistent with those ranges, standards, purposes, and
recommendations: PROVIDED, That the board and its successors shall
give adequate written reasons whenever a minimum term or parole release
decision is made which is outside the sentencing ranges adopted
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.850. In making such decisions, the board and its
successors shall consider the different charging and disposition
practices under the indeterminate sentencing system.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (((2)))
(3) of this section, the indeterminate sentence review board shall give
public safety considerations the highest priority when making all
discretionary decisions on the remaining indeterminate population
regarding the ability for parole, parole release, and conditions of
parole.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.011 and 2009 c 28 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the court commits a convicted person to the department of
corrections on or after July 1, 1986, for an offense committed before
July 1, 1984, the court shall, at the time of sentencing or revocation
of probation, fix the minimum term. The term so fixed shall not exceed
the maximum sentence provided by law for the offense of which the
person is convicted.
The court shall attempt to set the minimum term reasonably
consistent with the purposes, standards, and sentencing ranges adopted
under RCW 9.94A.850, but the court is subject to the same limitations
as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1) through
(4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent
as a minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.
Thereafter, the expiration of the minimum term set by the court
minus any time credits earned under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110
constitutes the parole eligibility review date, at which time the board
may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW 9.95.100 and
9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects the
board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by
the court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080,
9.95.100, 9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a person
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507, for a sex offense committed on or after
September 1, 2001, less any time credits permitted by statute, the
board shall review the person for conditional release to community
custody as provided in RCW 9.95.420. If the board does not release the
person, it shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an additional
five years. The board shall review the person again not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.
(b) If at the time a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for a sex
offense committed on or after September 1, 2001, arrives at a
department of corrections facility, the offender's minimum term has
expired or will expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's
arrival, then no later than one hundred twenty days after the
offender's arrival at a department of corrections facility, but after
the board receives the results from the end of sentence review process
and the recommendations for additional or modified conditions of
community custody from the department, the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in RCW
9.95.420. If the board does not release the person, it shall set a new
minimum term not to exceed an additional five years. The board shall
review the person again not less than ninety days prior to the
expiration of the new minimum term.
(c) In setting a new minimum term, the board may consider the
length of time necessary for the offender to complete treatment and
programming as well as other factors that relate to the offender's
release under RCW 9.95.420. The board's rules shall permit an offender
to petition for an earlier review if circumstances change or the board
receives new information that would warrant an earlier review.
(3) The board is authorized to review the sentences of persons
sentenced to life without parole for crimes committed prior to the
person's eighteenth birthday and set a release date pursuant to RCW
9.95.115(2).
(a) The board shall conduct a sentence review at least once within
the first fifteen years of his or her sentence. For persons identified
in this subsection who were sentenced on or before August 1, 2011, and
who have already served more than fifteen years, the board shall
conduct an initial sentence review no later than July 1, 2012, unless
he or she is released on other grounds prior to that date. If the
board does not set a release date upon its initial review, it shall
engage in another sentence review at least once in the three years
following its decision and at least once every three years thereafter
until the release of the offender.
(b) After the board's initial review and before the subsequent
review required under (a) of this subsection, the department of
corrections, on behalf of the offender, may petition the board for
review if circumstances change or the board receives new information
that would warrant an earlier review. The board may also set an
earlier date for review at the conclusion of a hearing in which it is
determined that a sentence should not be reduced.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.013 and 1989 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall apply all of the statutory requirements of RCW
9.95.009(((2))) (3), requiring decisions of the board to be reasonably
consistent with the ranges, standards, and purposes of the sentencing
reform act, chapter 9.94A RCW, and the minimum term recommendations of
the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney where such
recommendations exist in the trial record, to every person who, on July
23, 1989, is incarcerated and has been adjudged under the provisions of
RCW 9.92.090.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.017 and 2009 c 28 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall cause to be prepared criteria for duration of
confinement, release on parole, and length of parole for persons
committed to prison for crimes committed before July 1, 1984, and
persons committed to prison for life without the possibility of parole
for crimes committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday.
The proposed criteria should take into consideration RCW
9.95.009(((2))) (3). Before submission to the governor, the board
shall solicit comments and review on their proposed criteria for parole
release.
(2) Persons committed to the department of corrections and who are
under the authority of the board for crimes committed on or after
September 1, 2001, are subject to the provisions for duration of
confinement, release to community custody, and length of community
custody established in RCW 9.94A.507, 9.94A.704, 72.09.335, and
9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.115 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 332 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The indeterminate sentence review board is hereby granted
authority to parole any person sentenced to the custody of the
department of corrections, under a mandatory life sentence for a crime
committed before July 1, 1984, except those persons sentenced to life
without the possibility of parole. No such person shall be granted
parole unless the person has been continuously confined therein for a
period of twenty consecutive years less earned good time: PROVIDED,
That no such person shall be released under parole who is subject to
civil commitment as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09
RCW.
(2) The indeterminate sentence review board is hereby granted
authority to set a release date for a person in the custody of the
department of corrections who is sentenced to life without the
possibility of parole for a crime committed before the person's
eighteenth birthday. No such person shall be released who is subject
to civil commitment as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09
RCW.
(3) Once a release date has been set pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the indeterminate sentence review board is hereby granted
the authority to set a term of community custody for a period of time
up to the maximum sentence ordered by the court.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.116 and 1989 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall fix the duration of confinement for persons
committed to the custody of the department of corrections under a
mandatory life sentence for a crime or crimes committed before July 1,
1984. However, no duration of confinement shall be fixed for those
persons committed under a life sentence without the possibility of
parole.
The duration of confinement for persons covered by this section
shall be fixed no later than July 1, 1992, or within six months after
the admission or readmission of the convicted person to the custody of
the department of corrections, whichever is later.
(2) The board shall review the sentences of persons who were
sentenced as adults to a term of life without parole for a crime
committed prior to his or her eighteenth birthday.
(3) Prior to fixing a duration of confinement under this section,
the board shall request from the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney an updated statement in accordance with RCW 9.95.030. In
addition to the report and recommendations of the prosecuting attorney
and sentencing judge, the board shall also consider any victim impact
statement submitted by a victim, survivor, or a representative, and any
statement submitted by an investigative law enforcement officer. The
board shall provide the convicted person with copies of any new
statement and an opportunity to comment thereon prior to fixing the
duration of confinement.
(4) Victims shall have the option of having their statement to the
board videotaped so that their statements may be preserved for any
future hearings.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.95.120 and 2003 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this state
has reason to believe a person convicted of a crime committed before
July 1, 1984, or who is subject to review by the board under this act,
has breached a condition of his or her parole or violated the law of
any state where he or she may then be or the rules and regulations of
the board, any community corrections officer of this state may arrest
or cause the arrest and detention and suspension of parole of such
convicted person pending a determination by the board whether the
parole of such convicted person shall be revoked. All facts and
circumstances surrounding the violation by such convicted person shall
be reported to the board by the community corrections officer, with
recommendations. The board, after consultation with the secretary of
corrections, shall make all rules and regulations concerning procedural
matters, which shall include the time when state community corrections
officers shall file with the board reports required by this section,
procedures pertaining thereto and the filing of such information as may
be necessary to enable the board to perform its functions under this
section. On the basis of the report by the community corrections
officer, or at any time upon its own discretion, the board may revise
or modify the conditions of parole or order the suspension of parole by
the issuance of a written order bearing its seal, which order shall be
sufficient warrant for all peace officers to take into custody any
convicted person who may be on parole and retain such person in their
custody until arrangements can be made by the board for his or her
return to a state correctional institution for convicted felons. Any
such revision or modification of the conditions of parole or the order
suspending parole shall be personally served upon the parolee.
Any parolee arrested and detained in physical custody by the
authority of a state community corrections officer, or upon the written
order of the board, shall not be released from custody on bail or
personal recognizance, except upon approval of the board and the
issuance by the board of an order of reinstatement on parole on the
same or modified conditions of parole.
All chiefs of police, marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of
counties, and all police, prison, and peace officers and constables
shall execute any such order in the same manner as any ordinary
criminal process.
Whenever a paroled prisoner is accused of a violation of his or her
parole, other than the commission of, and conviction for, a felony or
misdemeanor under the laws of this state or the laws of any state where
he or she may then be, he or she shall be entitled to a fair and
impartial hearing of such charges within thirty days from the time that
he or she is served with charges of the violation of conditions of
parole after his or her arrest and detention. The hearing shall be
held before one or more members of the board at a place or places,
within this state, reasonably near the site of the alleged violation or
violations of parole.
In the event that the board suspends a parole by reason of an
alleged parole violation or in the event that a parole is suspended
pending the disposition of a new criminal charge, the board shall have
the power to nullify the order of suspension and reinstate the
individual to parole under previous conditions or any new conditions
that the board may determine advisable. Before the board shall nullify
an order of suspension and reinstate a parole they shall have
determined that the best interests of society and the individual shall
best be served by such reinstatement rather than a return to a
correctional institution.

Sec. 9 RCW 10.95.030 and 2010 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder
shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release
or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section
shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its
successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any
sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health
services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such
prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW
10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be
death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to death if
the person had an intellectual disability at the time the crime was
committed, under the definition of intellectual disability set forth in
(a) of this subsection. A diagnosis of intellectual disability shall
be documented by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist
designated by the court, who is an expert in the diagnosis and
evaluation of intellectual disabilities. The defense must establish an
intellectual disability by a preponderance of the evidence and the
court must make a finding as to the existence of an intellectual
disability.
(a) "Intellectual disability" means the individual has: (i)
Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii)
existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii)
both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and
deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental
period.
(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained
by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general
intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual
functioning.
(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning"
means intelligence quotient seventy or below.
(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with
which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and
social responsibility expected for his or her age.
(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between
conception and the eighteenth birthday.
(3) If the person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree
murder was under the age of eighteen at the time of the crime for which
he or she is convicted, the person may not be sentenced to death or to
a term of life without the possibility of parole. Rather, the court
shall sentence the person to a term within the standard range
established in RCW 9.94A.510 for offense seriousness level XV, unless
the court determines that a departure from the standard range is
appropriate pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.
(4) Where a person was sentenced prior to August 1, 2011, to life
without the possibility of parole for a crime committed before the age
of eighteen, the person shall be eligible for sentence review and a
determination of a release date as set forth in RCW 9.95.011(3).

Sec. 10 RCW 72.09.270 and 2008 c 231 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall develop an individual
reentry plan as defined in RCW 72.09.015 for every offender who is
committed to the jurisdiction of the department except:
(a) Offenders who are sentenced to life without the possibility of
release and who were age eighteen or older at the time of the crime for
which he or she is convicted, or offenders sentenced to death under
chapter 10.95 RCW; and
(b) Offenders who are subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1227.
(2) The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a
series of individual plans that combine to meet the requirements of
this section.
(3) In developing individual reentry plans, the department shall
assess:
(a) All offenders using standardized and comprehensive tools to
identify the criminogenic risks, programmatic needs, and educational
and vocational skill levels for each offender. The assessment tool
should take into account demographic biases, such as culture, age, and
gender, as well as the needs of the offender, including any learning
disabilities, substance abuse or mental health issues, and social or
behavior deficits; and
(b) Offenders convicted of a crime which occurred before the
offender was eighteen years old for additional life skills which should
be developed to prepare the offender for living on his or her own as an
adult in the community. Examples of these life skills include, but are
not limited to, managing a budget, opening and maintaining a bank
account, shopping for necessary items such as food and clothing, and
applying to rent living quarters.
(4)(a) The initial assessment shall be conducted as early as
sentencing, but, whenever possible, no later than forty-five days of
being sentenced to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections.
For offenders sentenced to life without the possibility of parole prior
to August 1, 2011, for a crime which occurred before the offender was
eighteen years old, the initial assessment shall be conducted no later
than December 31, 2011.
(b) The offender's individual reentry plan shall be developed as
soon as possible after the initial assessment is conducted, but,
whenever possible, no later than sixty days after completion of the
assessment, and shall be periodically reviewed and updated as
appropriate.
(5) The individual reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate to facilitate successful
reunification with the offender's children and family;
(b) An individualized portfolio for each offender that includes the
offender's education achievements, certifications, employment, work
experience, skills, and any training received prior to and during
incarceration; and
(c) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, family reunification, and other areas which
are needed to facilitate a successful reintegration into the community.
(6)(a) Prior to discharge of any offender, the department shall:
(i) Evaluate the offender's needs and, to the extent possible,
connect the offender with existing services and resources that meet
those needs; and
(ii) Connect the offender with a community justice center and/or
community transition coordination network in the area in which the
offender will be residing once released from the correctional system if
one exists.
(b) If the department recommends partial confinement in an
offender's individual reentry plan, the department shall maximize the
period of partial confinement for the offender as allowed pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.728 to facilitate the offender's transition to the community.
(7) The department shall establish mechanisms for sharing
information from individual reentry plans to those persons involved
with the offender's treatment, programming, and reentry, when deemed
appropriate. When feasible, this information shall be shared
electronically.
(8)(a) In determining the county of discharge for an offender
released to community custody, the department may not approve a
residence location that is not in the offender's county of origin
unless it is determined by the department that the offender's return to
his or her county of origin would be inappropriate considering any
court-ordered condition of the offender's sentence, victim safety
concerns, negative influences on the offender in the community, or the
location of family or other sponsoring persons or organizations that
will support the offender.
(b) If the offender is not returned to his or her county of origin,
the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county
in which the offender is placed with a written explanation.
(c) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the offender's first felony conviction in
Washington.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a vested right in programming,
education, or other services.

Sec. 11 RCW 72.09.460 and 2007 c 483 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that all inmates be required to
participate in department-approved education programs, work programs,
or both, unless exempted as specifically provided in this section.
Eligible inmates who refuse to participate in available education or
work programs available at no charge to the inmates shall lose
privileges according to the system established under RCW 72.09.130.
Eligible inmates who are required to contribute financially to an
education or work program and refuse to contribute shall be placed in
another work program. Refusal to contribute shall not result in a loss
of privileges.
(2) The legislature recognizes more inmates may agree to
participate in education and work programs than are available. The
department must make every effort to achieve maximum public benefit by
placing inmates in available and appropriate education and work
programs. In instances where more inmates agree to participate in
education and work programs than are available, priority shall be given
to inmates who were under eighteen years old at the time of the crime
for which they were convicted and who are within two years of the
sentencing review eligibility date set forth in RCW 9.95.011(3).
(3)(a) The department shall, to the extent possible and considering
all available funds, prioritize its resources to meet the following
goals for inmates in the order listed:
(i) Achievement of basic academic skills through obtaining a high
school diploma or its equivalent;
(ii) Achievement of vocational skills necessary for purposes of
work programs and for an inmate to qualify for work upon release;
(iii) Additional work and education programs necessary for
compliance with an offender's individual reentry plan under RCW
72.09.270 with the exception of postsecondary education degree programs
as provided in RCW 72.09.465; and
(iv) Other appropriate vocational, work, or education programs that
are not necessary for compliance with an offender's individual reentry
plan under RCW 72.09.270 with the exception of postsecondary education
degree programs as provided in RCW 72.09.465.
(b) If programming is provided pursuant to (a)(i) through (iii) of
this subsection, the department shall pay the cost of such programming,
including but not limited to books, materials, supplies, and postage
costs related to correspondence courses.
(c) If programming is provided pursuant to (a)(iv) of this
subsection, inmates shall be required to pay all or a portion of the
costs, including books, fees, and tuition, for participation in any
vocational, work, or education program as provided in department
policies. Department policies shall include a formula for determining
how much an offender shall be required to pay. The formula shall
include steps which correlate to an offender average monthly income or
average available balance in a personal inmate savings account and
which are correlated to a prorated portion or percent of the per credit
fee for tuition, books, or other ancillary costs. The formula shall be
reviewed every two years. A third party may pay directly to the
department all or a portion of costs and tuition for any programming
provided pursuant to (a)(iv) of this subsection on behalf of an inmate.
Such payments shall not be subject to any of the deductions as provided
in this chapter.
(d) The department may accept any and all donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services from any third
party, including but not limited to nonprofit entities, and may
receive, utilize, and dispose of same to complete the purposes of this
section.
(e) Any funds collected by the department under (c) and (d) of this
subsection and subsections (8) and (9) of this section shall be used
solely for the creation, maintenance, or expansion of inmate
educational and vocational programs.
(4) The department shall provide access to a program of education
to all offenders who are under the age of eighteen and who have not met
high school graduation or general equivalency diploma requirements in
accordance with chapter 28A.193 RCW. The program of education
established by the department and education provider under RCW
28A.193.020 for offenders under the age of eighteen must provide each
offender a choice of curriculum that will assist the inmate in
achieving a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma. The
program of education may include but not be limited to basic education,
prevocational training, work ethic skills, conflict resolution
counseling, substance abuse intervention, and anger management
counseling. The curriculum may balance these and other rehabilitation,
work, and training components.
(5)(a) In addition to the policies set forth in this section, the
department shall consider the following factors in establishing
criteria for assessing the inclusion of education and work programs in
an inmate's individual reentry plan and in placing inmates in education
and work programs:
(i) An inmate's release date and custody level. An inmate shall
not be precluded from participating in an education or work program
solely on the basis of his or her release date, except that inmates
with a release date of more than one hundred twenty months in the
future shall not comprise more than ten percent of inmates
participating in a new class I correctional industry not in existence
on June 10, 2004;
(ii) An inmate's education history and basic academic skills;
(iii) An inmate's work history and vocational or work skills;
(iv) An inmate's economic circumstances, including but not limited
to an inmate's family support obligations; and
(v) Where applicable, an inmate's prior performance in department-approved education or work programs;
(b) The department shall establish, and periodically review, inmate
behavior standards and program goals for all education and work
programs. Inmates shall be notified of applicable behavior standards
and program goals prior to placement in an education or work program
and shall be removed from the education or work program if they
consistently fail to meet the standards or goals.
(6) Eligible inmates who refuse to participate in available
education or work programs available at no charge to the inmates shall
lose privileges according to the system established under RCW
72.09.130. Eligible inmates who are required to contribute financially
to an education or work program and refuse to contribute shall be
placed in another work program. Refusal to contribute shall not result
in a loss of privileges.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, objective medical
standards to determine when an inmate is physically or mentally unable
to participate in available education or work programs. When the
department determines an inmate is permanently unable to participate in
any available education or work program due to a health condition, the
inmate is exempt from the requirement under subsection (1) of this
section. When the department determines an inmate is temporarily
unable to participate in an education or work program due to a medical
condition, the inmate is exempt from the requirement of subsection (1)
of this section for the period of time he or she is temporarily
disabled. The department shall periodically review the medical
condition of all inmates with temporary disabilities to ensure the
earliest possible entry or reentry by inmates into available
programming.
(8) The department shall establish policies requiring an offender
to pay all or a portion of the costs and tuition for any vocational
training or postsecondary education program if the offender previously
abandoned coursework related to education or vocational training
without excuse as defined in rule by the department. Department
policies shall include a formula for determining how much an offender
shall be required to pay. The formula shall include steps which
correlate to an offender average monthly income or average available
balance in a personal inmate savings account and which are correlated
to a prorated portion or percent of the per credit fee for tuition,
books, or other ancillary costs. The formula shall be reviewed every
two years. A third party may pay directly to the department all or a
portion of costs and tuition for any program on behalf of an inmate
under this subsection. Such payments shall not be subject to any of
the deductions as provided in this chapter.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, an inmate
sentenced to life without the possibility of release, sentenced to
death under chapter 10.95 RCW, or subject to the provisions of 8 U.S.C.
Sec. 1227:
(a) Shall not be required to participate in education programming
except as may be necessary for the maintenance of discipline and
security;
(b) May receive not more than one postsecondary academic degree in
a program offered by the department or its contracted providers;
(c) May participate in prevocational or vocational training that
may be necessary to participate in a work program;
(d) Shall be subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter
relating to inmate financial responsibility for programming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---