BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.24.155 and 2009 c 549 s 4038 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever anyone shall die within a county without making prior
plans for the disposition of his or her body and there is no other
person willing to provide for the disposition of the body, the county
coroner shall cause such body to be entrusted to a funeral home in the
county where the body is found. Except in counties where the county
coroner or medical examiner has established a preferred funeral home
using a qualified bidding process, disposition shall be on a rotation
basis, which shall treat equally all funeral homes or mortuaries
desiring to participate, such rotation to be established by the coroner
after consultation with representatives of the funeral homes or
mortuaries in the county or counties involved.

--- END ---