BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Urban main streets should be designed to
provide safe access to all users, including bicyclists, pedestrians,
motorists, and public transportation users. Context sensitive design
and engineering principles allow for flexible solutions depending on a
community's needs, and result in many positive outcomes for cities and
towns, including improving the health and safety of a community. It is
the intent of the legislature to encourage street designs that safely
meet the needs of all users and also protect and preserve a community's
environment and character.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a complete streets grant program
within the department's highways and local programs division, or its
successor. During program development, the department shall include,
at a minimum, local governments and other organizations or groups that
are interested in the complete streets grant program. The purpose of
the grant program is to encourage local governments to adopt urban
arterial retrofit street ordinances designed to provide safe access to
all users, including bicyclists, pedestrians, motorists, and public
transportation users, with the goals of:
(a) Promoting healthy communities by encouraging walking,
bicycling, and using public transportation;
(b) Improving safety by designing major arterials to include
features such as wider sidewalks, dedicated bicycle facilities,
medians, and pedestrian streetscape features, including trees where
appropriate.
(c) Protecting the environment and reducing congestion by providing
safe alternatives to single-occupancy driving; and
(d) Preserving community character by involving local citizens and
stakeholders to participate in planning and design decisions.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible project" means (i) a local government street retrofit
project that includes the addition of, or significant repair to,
facilities that provide street access with all users in mind, including
pedestrians, bicyclists, and public transportation users; or (ii) a
retrofit project on city streets that are part of a state highway that
include the addition of, or significant repair to, facilities that
provide street access with all users in mind, including pedestrians,
bicyclists, and public transportation users.
(b) "Local government" means incorporated cities and towns that
have adopted a jurisdiction-wide complete streets ordinance that plans
for the needs of all users and is consistent with sound engineering
principles.
(c) "Sound engineering principles" means peer-reviewed, context
sensitive solutions guides, reports, and publications, including the
2006 urban design principles and guidelines developed by the institute
of transportation engineers, titled "Context Sensitive Solutions in
Designing Major Urban Thoroughfares for Walkable Communities," as each
exists on the effective date of this section or a subsequent date as
may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes
of this section.
(3) In carrying out the purposes of this section, the department
may award funding, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose, only to eligible projects that are designed
consistent with sound engineering principles.
(4) The department must report annually to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects
funded by the program created under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The complete streets grant program account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Only the department may authorize expenditures from the
account. The department may use complete streets grant program funds
for city streets, and city streets that are part of a state highway.
Expenditures from the account may be used solely for the grants
provided under section 2 of this act.
(2) The department may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from private and other sources that are made, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the complete
streets grant program as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When constructing, retrofitting, or making major repairs to streets
described in RCW 47.24.010, the department must, for street projects
initially planned or scoped after July 1, 2011:
(1) Consult with local jurisdictions in the design and planning
phases. Consultation with local jurisdictions must include public
outreach and meetings with interested stakeholders in the predesign
phase for the purpose of clarifying community goals and priorities
through community design exercises prior to developing any designs or
visualizations; and
(2) Consider the needs of all users by applying context sensitive
design solutions consistent with peer-reviewed, context sensitive
solutions guides, reports, and publications, including the institute of
transportation engineers' 2006 principles and guidelines, titled
"Context Sensitive Solutions in Designing Major Urban Thoroughfares for
Walkable Communities," as each exists on the effective date of this
section or a subsequent date as may be provided by the department by
rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

--- END ---