BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96A.020 and 2001 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter the following words and phrases
shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.
(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances
of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological
withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment
of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.
(3) "Approved treatment program" means a discrete program of
chemical dependency treatment provided by a treatment program certified
by the department of social and health services as meeting standards
adopted under this chapter.
(4) "Chemical dependency" means:
(a) Alcoholism; (b) drug addiction; or (c) dependence on alcohol
and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.
(5) "Chemical dependency program" means expenditures and activities
of the department designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism
and other drug addiction, including reasonable administration and
overhead.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist"
means a person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug
addiction program coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to
perform the commitment duties described in RCW 70.96A.140 and qualified
to do so by meeting standards adopted by the department.
(8) "Director" means the person administering the chemical
dependency program within the department.
(9) "Drug addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of
drug addiction.
(10) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency
on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and
circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or
psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued,
and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic
functioning.
(11) "Emergency service patrol" means a patrol established under
RCW 70.96A.170.
(12) "Gravely disabled by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals"
or "gravely disabled" means that a person, as a result of the use of
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious
physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her
essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by a repeated and
escalating loss of cognition or volitional control over his or her
actions and is not receiving care as essential for his or her health or
safety.
(13) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility, or a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment
facility, or in confinement.
(14) "Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals"
means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of
serious harm to himself or herself, to any other person, or to
property.
(15) "Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged
incompetent by the superior court.
(16) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol
or other psychoactive chemicals.
(17) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of
Washington.
(18) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on one's self; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as
evidenced by behavior that has caused the harm or that places another
person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another
and has a history of one or more violent acts.
(19) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a
requested certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to:
(a) Diagnose, arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b)
prevent the worsening of chemical dependency conditions that endanger
life or cause suffering and pain, or result in illness or infirmity or
threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or cause physical deformity
or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative
available.
(20) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.
(21) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.
(22) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment.
(23) "Person" means an individual, including a minor.
(24) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means
a physician or chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the
department, who is empowered by a certified treatment program with
authority to make assessment, admission, continuing care, and discharge
decisions on behalf of the certified program.
(25) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(26) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency,
detoxification, residential, and outpatient services and care,
including diagnostic evaluation, chemical dependency education and
counseling, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service
care, vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which may be
extended to alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families,
persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons.
(27) "Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.
(28) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.
(29) "Health facility" means hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41
RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, community
mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, or
ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under
chapter 70.230 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.96A.090 and 2005 c 70 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing standards for
approved treatment programs, the process for the review and inspection
program applying to the department for certification as an approved
treatment program, and fixing the fees to be charged by the department
for the required inspections. The standards may concern the health
standards to be met and standards of services and treatment to be
afforded patients.
(2) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify
an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the
provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this
chapter. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(3) No treatment program may advertise or represent itself as an
approved treatment program if approval has not been granted, has been
denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.
(4) Certification as an approved treatment program is effective for
one calendar year from the date of issuance of the certificate. The
certification shall specify the types of services provided by the
approved treatment program that meet the standards adopted under this
chapter. Renewal of certification shall be made in accordance with
this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards
set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.
(5) Approved treatment programs shall not provide alcoholism or
other drug addiction treatment services for which the approved
treatment program has not been certified. Approved treatment programs
may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending,
if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.
(6) The department periodically shall inspect approved public and
private treatment programs at reasonable times and in a reasonable
manner.
(7) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a
current list of approved treatment programs.
(8) Each approved treatment program shall file with the department
on request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department
reasonably requires. An approved treatment program that without good
cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information
as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may be removed from
the list of approved treatment programs, and its certification revoked
or suspended.
(9) The department shall use the data provided in subsection (8) of
this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient
treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation shall be
done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the department
shall randomly select and review the information on individual children
who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose
of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into
treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and
the outcome of the child's treatment.
(10) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or
her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and
accounts of, any approved public or private treatment program refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the
department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of
this chapter.
(11)(a) All approved opiate substitution treatment programs that
provide services to women who are pregnant are required to disseminate
up-to-date and accurate health education information to all their
pregnant clients concerning the possible addiction and health risks
that their opiate substitution treatment may have on their baby. All
pregnant clients must also be advised of the risks to both them and
their baby associated with not remaining on the opiate substitute
program. The information must be provided to these clients both
verbally and in writing. The health education information provided to
the pregnant clients must include referral options for the addicted
baby.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that require all opiate
treatment programs to educate all pregnant women in their program on
the benefits and risks of methadone treatment to their fetus before
they are provided these medications, as part of their addiction
treatment. The department shall meet the requirements under this
subsection within the appropriations provided for opiate treatment
programs. The department, working with treatment providers and medical
experts, shall develop and disseminate the educational materials to all
certified opiate treatment programs.
(12) Unless operated within a health facility, as defined in RCW
70.96A.020, no treatment program licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW may
provide an individual with both the assessment and treatment for
chemical dependency.

--- END ---