BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.016 and 1999 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no private sale of real property where the
((appraised)) estimated value exceeds the sum of ((two thousand five
hundred)) five thousand dollars. Estimated value shall be determined
by the board of commissioners and based upon real estate appraiser and
broker advice as it considers appropriate. Subject to the provisions
of subsection (2) of this section, no real property of the district
shall be sold for less than ninety percent of the value thereof ((as
established by a written appraisal)). Where the estimated value of the
real property exceeds five thousand dollars, value shall be established
by a written broker price opinion made not more than six months prior
to the date of sale by three disinterested real estate brokers licensed
under the laws of the state or by one professionally designated real
estate appraiser((s)) as defined in ((RCW 74.46.020. The appraisal))
chapter 18.140 RCW. A broker price opinion shall be signed by the
broker and an appraisal must be signed by the appraiser((s)) and filed
with the secretary of the board of commissioners of the district, who
shall keep it at the office of the district open to public inspection.
Any notice of intention to sell real property of the district shall
recite the estimated value or, if an appraisal has been made, the
appraised value thereof.
(2) If no purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety
percent or more of its estimated or appraised value after one hundred
twenty days of offering the property for sale, the board of
commissioners of the district may adopt a resolution stating that the
district has been unable to sell the property at the ninety percent
amount. The district then may sell the property at the highest price
it can obtain at public auction. A notice of intention to sell at
public auction shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice
shall describe the property, state the time and place at which it will
be offered for sale and the terms of sale, and shall call for bids, fix
the conditions thereof, and reserve the right to reject any and all
bids for good cause.

--- END ---