BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.394 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1202 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to((:
(a))) amounts received by a ((nonprofit)) property management
company from the owner of a property for gross wages and benefits paid
directly to or on behalf of on-site personnel from property management
trust accounts that are required to be maintained under RCW
18.85.285((; or
(b) Amounts received by a property management company from a
housing authority for gross wages and benefits paid directly to or on
behalf of on-site personnel from property management trust accounts
that are required to be maintained under RCW 18.85.285)).
(2) ((The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a))) As used in this section, "on-site personnel" means a person
who meets all of the following conditions:
(((i) The person)) (a) Works primarily at the owner's property;
(((ii) the person's)) (b) Has duties that include leasing property
units, maintaining the property, collecting rents, or similar
activities; and
(((iii))) (c) Is under a written property management agreement
providing that:
(((A))) (i) The person's compensation is the ultimate obligation of
the property owner and not the property manager;
(((B))) (ii) The property manager is liable for payment only as
agent of the owner; and
(((C))) (iii) The property manager is the agent of the owner with
respect to the on-site personnel and that all actions, including, but
not limited to, hiring, firing, compensation, and conditions of
employment, taken by the property manager with respect to the on-site
personnel are subject to the approval of the property owner.
(((b) "Nonprofit property management company" means a property
management company that is exempt from tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)
of the federal internal revenue code, as it exists on January 1, 2010.
(c) "Housing authority" means a city or county housing authority
created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---