BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A landlord shall provide, upon the request of a tenant, a written
receipt for any payments made by the tenant in the form of cash or
money order. The receipt must be provided to the tenant within fifteen
business days of the request. A tenant may request any receipt for
sums paid within the previous twelve months.

--- END ---