BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.255 and 2004 c 266 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state or a county auditor shall accept and file in
his or her office electronic ((facsimile)) transmissions of the
following documents:
(1) Declarations of candidacy;
(2) County canvass reports;
(3) Voters' pamphlet statements;
(4) Arguments for and against ballot measures that will appear in
a voters' pamphlet;
(5) Requests for recounts;
(6) Certification of candidates and measures by the secretary of
state;
(7) Direction by the secretary of state for the conduct of a
((mandatory)) recount;
(8) Requests for ((absentee)) ballots;
(9) Any other election related document authorized by rule adopted
by the secretary of state under RCW ((29A.04.610)) 29A.04.611.
The acceptance by the secretary of state or the county auditor is
conditional upon the document being filed in a timely manner, being
legible, and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or
rules with respect to form and content.
((If the original copy of a document must be signed and a copy of
the document is filed by facsimile transmission under this section, the
original copy must be subsequently filed with the official with whom
the facsimile was filed. The original copy must be filed by a deadline
established by the secretary by rule.)) The secretary may by rule
require that the original of any document, a copy of which is filed by
((facsimile)) electronic transmission under this section, also be filed
by a deadline established by the secretary by rule.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.311 and 2006 c 344 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Nominating)) Primaries for general elections to be held in
November, and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held
on the ((third)) first Tuesday of the preceding August.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.321 and 2009 c 413 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, and district officers, and for the submission to the voters
of the state, county, city, town, or district of any measure for their
adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday of November, in the year in which they may be
called. A statewide general election shall be held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each year. However, the
statewide general election held in odd-numbered years shall be limited
to (a) city, town, and district general elections as provided for in
RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided by law; (b) the election of
federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms in the
membership of either branch of the Congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in
Article II, section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22,
and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and
RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county officers in any county
governed by a charter containing provisions calling for general county
elections at this time; and (e) the approval or rejection of state
measures, including proposed constitutional amendments, matters
pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention, initiative
measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate, referendum
bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for submission
to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may call a special county
election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor prior to the
proposed election date. A special election called by the county
legislative authority shall be held on one of the following dates as
decided by such governing body:
(a) The second Tuesday in February;
(b) The third Tuesday in April until January 1, 2013;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April on or after January 1, 2013;
(((c))) (d) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29A.04.311;
or
(((d))) (e) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) ((and (b))) through (c) of this section must be
presented to the county auditor at least ((forty-five)) forty-six days
prior to the election date. A resolution calling for a special
election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(((c) or)) (d) of this
section must be presented to the county auditor ((at least eighty-four
days prior to the election date)) no later than the Friday immediately
before the first day of regular candidate filing. A resolution calling
for a special election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(e) of this
section must be presented to the county auditor no later than the day
of the primary.
(4) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(((d))) (e) of this section, a special election to validate an excess
levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs
resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such
county special election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner
provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections
((except for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter
adopted under Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution)). This
section shall not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary
elections, or elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.04.330 and 2009 c 413 s 4, 2009 c 144 s 3, and
2009 c 413 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.235 and
nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540
RCW; and
(d) Special flood control districts consisting of three or more
counties.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor prior to the proposed
election date, may call a special election in such city, town, or
district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. Such a special election shall be
held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The second Tuesday in February;
(b) The third Tuesday in April until January 1, 2013;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April on or after January 1, 2013;
(((c))) (d) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW
29A.04.311; or
(((d))) (e) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) ((and (b))) through (c) of this section must be
presented to the county auditor at least ((forty-five)) forty-six days
prior to the election date. A resolution calling for a special
election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(((c) or)) (d) of this
section must be presented to the county auditor ((at least eighty-four
days prior to the election date)) no later than the Friday immediately
before the first day of regular candidate filing. A resolution calling
for a special election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(e) of this
section must be presented to the county auditor no later than the day
of the primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (((d))) (e) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue
may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(((c) and)) (d) and (e) of this section.
Such special election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in
the manner provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.16.040 and 2004 c 266 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct or whether the precinct is a vote by mail
precinct.
(1) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(5) of this section, no precinct ((boundaries)) changes may be
((changed)) made during the period starting ((on the thirtieth))
fourteen days prior to the first day for candidates to file for the
primary election and ending with the day of the general election.
(2) The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
(3) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting devices
are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered voters.
The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each polling place
is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of devices must be
adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(4) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more than
ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority shall
establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(5) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct boundaries
when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the city or
town, or whenever unincorporated territory is incorporated as a city or
town. The adjustment must be made as soon as possible after the
approval of the annexation or incorporation. The temporary adjustment
must be limited to the minimum changes necessary to accommodate the
addition of the territory to the city or town, or to establish the
eligible voters within the boundaries of the new city or town, and
remains in effect only until precinct boundary modifications reflecting
the annexation or incorporation are adopted by the county legislative
authority.
(6) In determining the number of active registered voters for the
purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under
RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted. Nothing in this subsection may be
construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.24.040 and 2006 c 344 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A candidate may file his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office by electronic means on a system specifically designed and
authorized by a filing officer to accept filings.
(1) Filings that are received electronically must capture all
information specified in RCW 29A.24.031 (1) through (4).
(2) Electronic filing may begin at 9:00 a.m. the first ((Monday in
June)) day of the filing period and continue through 4:00 p.m. the
((following Friday)) last day of the filing period.
(((3) In case of special filing periods established in this
chapter, electronic filings may be accepted beginning at 9:00 a.m. on
the first day of the special filing period through 4:00 p.m. the last
day of the special filing period.))

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.24.050 and 2006 c 344 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer ((no earlier than the first
Monday in June)) beginning the Monday two weeks before Memorial day and
((no later than)) ending the following Friday in the year in which the
office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.24.131 and 2004 c 271 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the ((Thursday)) Monday following
the last day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing,
with the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a
signed request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot.
There shall be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed
during special filing periods held under this title. ((The filing
officer may permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of
precinct committee officer at the request of the candidate at any time
if no absentee ballots have been issued for that office and the ballots
for that precinct have not been printed. The filing officer may permit
the withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of a city, town, or
special district at the request of the candidate at any time before a
primary if the primary ballots for that city, town, or special district
have not been ordered.)) No filing fee may be refunded to any
candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of the deadline for
withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable shall
be given to each candidate at the time he or she files.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.24.141 and 2004 c 271 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
A void in candidacy ((for a nonpartisan office)) occurs when an
election ((for such office, except for the short term,)) has been
scheduled and no valid declaration of candidacy has been filed for the
position or all persons filing such valid declarations of candidacy
have died or been disqualified.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.24.171 and 2006 c 344 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period
of three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed by the
election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and
notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and television in the
county and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by
law whenever before the eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired
term to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held;
or
(3) A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.)) If, prior
to the first day of the regular filing period, a vacancy occurs in an
office that is not scheduled to appear on the general election ballot,
leaving an unexpired term, filings for that office shall be accepted
during the regular filing period. The filing officer shall provide
notice of the vacancy and filing period to newspapers, radio, and
television in the county, and online. The position shall appear on the
primary and general election ballots unless no primary is required or
unless a candidate for superior court judge is entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29 of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.24.181 and 2006 c 344 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court or superintendent of public instruction))) If, prior to the day
of the primary, any of the following occur, filings shall be reopened
for a period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be
fixed by the ((election officer with whom such declarations of
candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio,
and television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law, when)) filing officer:
(1) A void in candidacy ((for such nonpartisan office)) occurs ((on
or after the eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the
eleventh Tuesday before an election)) following the regular filing
period and deadline to withdraw; or
(2) ((A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten-day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the eleventh Tuesday
before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.)) A vacancy occurs in an
office for which filings have not already been held, leaving an
unexpired term.
The filing officer shall provide notice of the vacancy and filing
period to newspapers, radio, and television in the county, and online.
The position shall appear on the general election ballots unless a
candidate for superior court judge is entitled to a certificate of
election pursuant to Article 4, section 29 of the state Constitution.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected. This section
does not apply to voids in candidacy in the office of precinct
committee officer, which are filled by appointment pursuant to RCW
29A.28.071.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.24.191 and 2006 c 344 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when((:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the
eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary
being an indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29A.24.181, a nominee for
judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the eleventh Tuesday
prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office)) a void in candidacy
occurs ((or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled
on or after the eleventh Tuesday prior to an election)) following the
special three day filing period required by RCW 29A.24.181.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.24.311 and 2004 c 271 s 117 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day ((before the primary or election)) ballots must be mailed
according to RCW 29A.40.070. Declarations of candidacy for write-in
candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same manner as
required of other candidates filing for the office as provided in RCW
29A.24.091.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by major
political parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.021 need only specify the name
of the candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to
be counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to
be counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.031. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.28.041 and 2006 c 344 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. Minor
political party candidates and independent candidates may be nominated
through the convention procedures provided in chapter 29A.20 RCW.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the ((special vacancy
election not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ,
fixing a date for the primary for nominating major political party
candidates for the special vacancy election not less than thirty days
before the day fixed for holding the special vacancy election, fixing
the dates for the special filing period, and designating the term or
part of the term for which the vacancy exists)) primary at least
seventy days after issuance of the writ, and fixing a date for the
election at least seventy days after the date of the primary. If the
vacancy is in the office of United States representative, the writ of
election shall specify the congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than ((six)) eight months before a
state general election and before the ((second Friday following the))
close of the filing period for that general election, the special
primary, special vacancy election, and minor party and independent
candidate nominating conventions must be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the ((second Friday following
the)) close of the filing period, a special filing period of three
normal business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof
given to all media, including press, radio, and television within the
area in which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that,
insofar as possible, all interested persons will be aware of such
filing period. ((The last day of the filing period shall not be later
than the sixth Tuesday before the primary at which major political
party candidates are to be nominated.)) The names of major political
party candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy during
this three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary ballot.
The requirements of RCW 29A.20.131 do not apply to a minor political
party or independent candidate convention held under this subsection.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the ((second Friday following
the)) close of the filing period, a special primary((, special)) and
vacancy election((, and the minor party and independent candidate
conventions)) to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2005 c 2 s 12 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((On or before the day following the last day allowed for
candidates to withdraw under RCW 29A.24.130)) Not later than the
Tuesday following the regular filing period, the secretary of state
shall certify to each county auditor a list of the candidates who have
filed declarations of candidacy in his or her office for the primary.
For each office, the certificate shall include the name of each
candidate, his or her address, and his or her party preference or
independent designation as shown on filed declarations.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.40.070 and 2006 c 344 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation ((under RCW 29A.68.011))
is pending, the county auditor ((shall have sufficient absentee ballots
available for absentee voters of that county, other than overseas
voters and service voters, at least twenty days before any primary,
general election, or special election. The county auditor)) must mail
((absentee)) ballots to each voter ((for whom the county auditor has
received a request nineteen days before the primary or election)) at
least eighteen days before ((the)) each primary or election, and as
soon as possible for all subsequent registration changes. ((For a
request for an absentee ballot received after the nineteenth day before
the primary or election, the county auditor shall make every effort to
mail ballots within one business day, and shall mail the ballots within
two business days)).
(2) ((At least thirty days before any primary, general election, or
special election, the county auditor shall mail ballots to all overseas
and service voters.)) Except where a recount or litigation is pending,
the county auditor must mail ballots to each service and overseas voter
at least thirty days before each special election and at least
forty-five days before each primary or general election. A request for
a ballot made by an overseas or service voter after that day must be
processed immediately.
(3) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each request for a replacement ballot.
(4) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots ((prescribed in subsection (1)
of this section were available and)) were mailed, or the reason and
date the ballots will be mailed if the ballots were not mailed timely.
(((4) If absentee ballots will not be available or mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall
immediately certify to the office of the secretary of state when
absentee ballots will be available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(5) If absentee ballots were not available or mailed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, for a reason other than a recount or
litigation, the county auditor, in consultation with the certification
and training program of the office of the secretary of state, shall
submit a report to the office of the secretary of state outlining why
the deadline was missed and what corrective actions will be taken in
future elections to ensure that absentee ballots are available and
mailed as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(6))) Failure to ((have absentee ballots available and mailed))
mail ballots as prescribed in ((subsection (1) of)) this section does
not by itself provide a basis for an election contest or other legal
challenge to the results of a primary, general election, or special
election.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2010 c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope in
which to return the security envelope, a declaration that the voter
must sign, and instructions on how to obtain information about the
election, how to mark the ballot, and how to return ((it)) the ballot
to the county auditor.
(2) The ((instructions that accompany a ballot for a partisan
primary must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot
style, as provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The voter's name and address
must be printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain
a declaration by the voter reciting his or her qualifications and
stating that he or she)) voter must swear under penalty of perjury that
he or she meets the qualifications to vote, and has not voted in any
other jurisdiction at this election((, together with a summary of the
penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter)).
The declaration must clearly inform the voter that it is illegal to
vote if he or she is not a United States citizen; it is illegal to vote
if he or she has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
voting rights restored; and((, except as otherwise provided by law,))
it is illegal to cast a ballot or sign a return envelope on behalf of
another voter. The ((return envelope must provide space for the))
voter ((to)) must indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and
((for the voter to)) sign the ((oath)) declaration. ((It)) The ballot
materials must also contain a space so that the voter may include a
telephone number. ((A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of
this chapter must be printed on the return envelope immediately
adjacent to the space for the voter's signature. The signature of the
voter on the return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements
regarding the qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the
ballot. The return envelope may provide secrecy for the voter's
signature and optional telephone number.))
(3) For overseas and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. Return
envelopes for overseas and service voters must enable the ballot to be
returned postage free if mailed through the United States postal
service, United States armed forces postal service, or the postal
service of a United States foreign embassy under 39 U.S.C. 3406.
(4) The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the
county auditor ((by whom it was issued)) no later than 8:00 p.m. the
day of the election or primary, or ((attach sufficient first-class
postage, if applicable, and)) mail the ballot to the ((appropriate))
county auditor with a postmark no later than the day of the election or
primary ((for which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward ballots, he or she must
include with the ballot a clear explanation of the qualifications
necessary to vote in that election and must also advise a voter with
questions about his or her eligibility to contact the county auditor.
This explanation may be provided on the ballot envelope, on an enclosed
insert, or printed directly on the ballot itself. If the information
is not included, the envelope must clearly indicate that the ballot is
not to be forwarded and that return postage is guaranteed)).

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2009 c 369 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) All received ((absentee)) return envelopes must be placed in
secure locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until
their subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the
county canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure
storage until ((after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election))
processing. ((Absentee ballots that are to be tabulated on an
electronic vote tallying system)) Ballots may be taken from the inner
envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) ((Before opening a returned absentee ballot,)) The canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark((,
statement,)) on the return envelope and signature on the ((return
envelope that contains the security envelope and absentee ballot))
declaration before processing the ballot. The ballot must either be
received no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election,
or must be postmarked no later than the day of the primary or election.
All personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive training on
statewide standards for signature verification. Personnel shall verify
that the voter's signature on the ((return envelope)) ballot
declaration is the same as the signature of that voter in the
registration files of the county. Verification may be conducted by an
automated verification system approved by the secretary of state. For
any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on
the ((return envelope)) ballot declaration and the signature of that
voter in the registration files due to the substitution of initials or
the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and
handwriting are clearly the same.
(4) ((For registered voters casting absentee ballots)) If the
postmark is missing or illegible, the date on the ((return envelope))
ballot declaration to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting, for that ((absentee)) ballot ((if
the postmark is missing or is illegible)). For overseas voters and
service voters, the date on the ((return envelope)) declaration to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of
voting, for that ((absentee)) ballot. Any overseas voter or service
voter may return the signed declaration and voted ballot by fax or
email by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.56.030 and 2006 c 344 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of any candidate for a major political party nomination
for president of the United States shall be printed on the presidential
preference primary ballot of a major political party only:
(1) By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's
sole discretion has determined that the candidate's candidacy is
generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(2) If members of the political party of the candidate have
presented a petition for nomination of the candidate that has attached
to the petition a sheet or sheets containing the signatures of at least
one thousand registered voters who declare themselves in the petition
as being affiliated with the same political party as the presidential
candidate. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of state not
later than ((sixty)) seventy-five days before the presidential
preference primary. The signature sheets shall also contain the
residence address and name or number of the precinct of each registered
voter whose signature appears thereon and shall be certified in the
manner prescribed in RCW 29A.72.230 and 29A.72.240.
The secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the
ballot unless the candidate, at least ((fifty-two)) sixty-seven days
before the presidential preference primary, executes and files with the
secretary of state an affidavit stating without qualification that he
or she is not now and will not become a candidate for the office of
president of the United States at the forthcoming presidential
election. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all
candidates who will appear on the presidential preference primary
ballot to the respective county auditors on or before the fourth
Tuesday in April of each presidential election year.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (((3))) (2) of this section,
((fifteen)) fourteen days after a primary or special election and
twenty-one days after a general election, the county canvassing board
shall complete the canvass and certify the results. The county
canvassing board must complete the canvass and certify the results of
the April 17, 2012, special election ten days after election day. Each
((absentee)) ballot that was returned before ((the closing of the
polls)) 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general election,
or primary, and each ((absentee)) ballot bearing a postmark on or
before the date of the ((primary or)) special election, general
election, or primary and received ((on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified)) no later than the day before
certification, must be included in the canvass report.
(2) ((At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(3))) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by RCW 29A.53.020, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and
certify the results.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Fifteen)) Fourteen days after a primary or special election
and twenty-one days after a general election, the county canvassing
board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each
((absentee)) ballot that was returned before ((the closing of the
polls)) 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general election,
or primary, and each ((absentee)) ballot bearing a postmark on or
before the date of the ((primary or)) special election, general
election, or primary and received ((on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified)) no later than the day before
certification, must be included in the canvass report.
(((2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.))

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.60.240 and 2003 c 111 s 1524 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall, as soon as possible but in any event
not later than ((the third Tuesday)) seventeen days following the
primary, canvass and certify the returns of all primary elections as to
candidates for state offices, United States senators and
representatives in Congress, and all other candidates whose district
extends beyond the limits of a single county.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.64.011 and 2004 c 271 s 177 are each amended to
read as follows:
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast in a primary who ((was not declared nominated)) did not qualify
for the general election may file a written application for a recount
of the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that primary for all
persons for whom votes were cast for ((nomination to)) that office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each
member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the
vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only
the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount must be filed within ((three)) two
business days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state
has declared the official results of the primary or election for the
office or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by
a vote tally system.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.64.030 and 2005 c 243 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
An application for a recount shall state the office for which a
recount is requested and whether the request is for all or only a
portion of the votes cast in that jurisdiction of that office. The
person filing an application for a manual recount shall, at the same
time, deposit with the county canvassing board or secretary of state,
in cash or by certified check, a sum equal to twenty-five cents for
each ballot cast in the jurisdiction or portion of the jurisdiction for
which the recount is requested as security for the payment of any costs
of conducting the recount. If the application is for a machine
recount, the deposit must be equal to fifteen cents for each ballot.
These charges shall be determined by the county canvassing board or
boards under RCW 29A.64.081.
The county canvassing board shall determine the date, time, and
place or places at which the recount will be conducted. Not less than
((two days)) one day before the date of the recount, the county auditor
shall ((mail a notice of the time and place of the recount to)) notify
the applicant or affected parties and, if the recount involves an
office, to any person for whom votes were cast for that office of the
date, time, and place of the recount. ((The county auditor shall also
notify the affected parties by either telephone, fax, e-mail, or other
electronic means at the time of mailing. At least three attempts must
be made over a two-day period to notify the affected parties or until
the affected parties have received the notification. Each attempt to
notify affected parties must request a return response indicating that
the notice has been received.)) Each person entitled to receive notice
of the recount may attend, witness the recount, and be accompanied by
counsel.
Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30
RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the
canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a
recount.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.68.011 and 2007 c 374 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or
judge of the superior court in the proper county shall, by order,
require any person charged with error, wrongful act, or neglect to
forthwith correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform
the duty and to do as the court orders or to show cause forthwith why
the error should not be corrected, the wrongful act desisted from, or
the duty or order not performed, whenever it is made to appear to such
justice or judge by affidavit of an elector that:
(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in
printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or
(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing
the ballots; or
(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully
placed upon the ballots; or
(4) A wrongful act other than as provided for in subsections (1)
and (3) of this section has been performed or is about to be performed
by any election officer; or
(5) Any neglect of duty on the part of an election officer other
than as provided for in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has
occurred or is about to occur; or
(6) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in the
official certification of the election.
An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) of this
section when relating to a primary election must be filed with the
appropriate court no later than ((the second Friday)) two days
following the closing of the filing period ((for nominations)) for such
office and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court not
later than five days after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an
elector under subsections (1) and (3) of this section when relating to
a general election must be filed with the appropriate court no later
than three days following the official certification of the primary
election returns and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the
court not later than five days after the filing thereof. An affidavit
of an elector under subsection (6) of this section shall be filed with
the appropriate court no later than ten days following the official
certification of the election as provided in RCW 29A.60.190,
29A.60.240, or 29A.60.250 or, in the case of a recount, ten days after
the official certification of the amended abstract as provided in RCW
29A.64.061.

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.76.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the responsibility of each county, municipal corporation,
and special purpose district with a governing body comprised of
internal director, council, or commissioner districts not based on
statutorily required land ownership criteria to periodically redistrict
its governmental unit, based on population information from the most
recent federal decennial census.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial
census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission
established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to
each municipal corporation, county, and district charged with
redistricting under this section.
(3) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal
decennial census data, the governing body of the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall prepare a plan for redistricting its internal
or director districts.
(4) The plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:
(a) Each internal director, council, or commissioner district shall
be as nearly equal in population as possible to each and every other
such district comprising the municipal corporation, county, or special
purpose district.
(b) Each district shall be as compact as possible.
(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.
(d) Population data may not be used for purposes of favoring or
disfavoring any racial group or political party.
(e) To the extent feasible and if not inconsistent with the basic
enabling legislation for the municipal corporation, county, or
district, the district boundaries shall coincide with existing
recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent possible,
preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.
(5) During the adoption of its plan, the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall ensure that full and reasonable public notice
of its actions is provided. The municipal corporation, county, or
district shall hold at least one public hearing on the redistricting
plan at least one week before adoption of the plan.
(6)(a) Any registered voter residing in an area affected by the
redistricting plan may request review of the adopted local plan by the
superior court of the county in which he or she resides, within
((forty-five)) fifteen days of the plan's adoption. Any request for
review must specify the reason or reasons alleged why the local plan is
not consistent with the applicable redistricting criteria. The
municipal corporation, county, or district may be joined as respondent.
The superior court shall thereupon review the challenged plan for
compliance with the applicable redistricting criteria set out in
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If the superior court finds the plan to be consistent with the
requirements of this section, the plan shall take effect immediately.
(c) If the superior court determines the plan does not meet the
requirements of this section, in whole or in part, it shall remand the
plan for further or corrective action within a specified and reasonable
time period.
(d) If the superior court finds that any request for review is
frivolous or has been filed solely for purposes of harassment or delay,
it may impose appropriate sanctions on the party requesting review,
including payment of attorneys' fees and costs to the respondent
municipal corporation, county, or district.

Sec. 27 RCW 42.12.040 and 2006 c 344 s 29 and 2005 c 2 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any
partisan county elective office before the ((eleventh Tuesday prior to
the primary for the next general election following the occurrence of
the vacancy,)) first day of the regular filing period, the position
shall be open for filing during the regular filing period and a
successor shall be qualified at the primary and elected ((to that
office)) at ((that)) the general election. If a vacancy occurs after
the first day of the regular filing period but before the day of the
primary, a successor shall be elected at the general election. Except
during the last year of the term of office, if such a vacancy occurs on
or after the ((eleventh Tuesday prior to)) day of the primary for that
general election, the election of the successor shall occur at the next
succeeding general election. The elected successor shall hold office
for the remainder of the unexpired term. This section shall not apply
to any vacancy occurring in a charter county that has charter
provisions inconsistent with this section.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in any legislative office or in any
partisan county office after the general election in a year that the
position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term,
the term of the successor who is of the same party as the incumbent may
commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW 29A.04.133 and
shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected.

Sec. 28 RCW 42.12.070 and 1994 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A vacancy on an elected nonpartisan governing body of a special
purpose district where property ownership is not a qualification to
vote, a town, or a city other than a first-class city or a charter code
city, shall be filled as follows unless the provisions of law relating
to the special district, town, or city provide otherwise:
(1) Where one position is vacant, the remaining members of the
governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacant
position.
(2) Where two or more positions are vacant and two or more members
of the governing body remain in office, the remaining members of the
governing body shall appoint a qualified person to fill one of the
vacant positions, the remaining members of the governing body and the
newly appointed person shall appoint another qualified person to fill
another vacant position, and so on until each of the vacant positions
is filled with each of the new appointees participating in each
appointment that is made after his or her appointment.
(3) If less than two members of a governing body remain in office,
the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the
largest geographic portion of the city, town, or special district is
located shall appoint a qualified person or persons to the governing
body until the governing body has two members.
(4) If a governing body fails to appoint a qualified person to fill
a vacancy within ninety days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the
authority of the governing body to fill the vacancy shall cease and the
county legislative authority of the county in which all or the largest
geographic portion of the city, town, or special district is located
shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy.
(5) If the county legislative authority of the county fails to
appoint a qualified person within one hundred eighty days of the
occurrence of the vacancy, the county legislative authority or the
remaining members of the governing body of the city, town, or special
district may petition the governor to appoint a qualified person to
fill the vacancy. The governor may appoint a qualified person to fill
the vacancy after being petitioned if at the time the governor fills
the vacancy the county legislative authority has not appointed a
qualified person to fill the vacancy.
(6) As provided in ((RCW 29.15.190 and 29.21.410)) chapter 29A.24
RCW, each person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person
is elected at the next election at which a member of the governing body
normally would be elected ((that occurs twenty-eight or more days after
the occurrence of the vacancy)). If needed, special filing periods
shall be authorized as provided in ((RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180))
chapter 29A.24 RCW for qualified persons to file for the vacant office.
A primary shall be held to ((nominate)) qualify candidates if
sufficient time exists to hold a primary and more than two candidates
file for the vacant office. Otherwise, a primary shall not be held and
the person receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected.
The person elected shall take office immediately and serve the
remainder of the unexpired term.
If an election for the position that became vacant would otherwise
have been held at this general election date, only one election to fill
the position shall be held and the person elected to fill the
succeeding term for that position shall take office immediately when
qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135)) 29A.04.133 and shall service
both the remainder of the unexpired term and the succeeding term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.310 (Primaries) and 2005 c 2 s 8, 2003 c 111 s 143,
1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29, 1965 ex.s. c 103 s 6, & 1965 c 9 s 29.13.070;
(2) RCW 29A.24.151 (Notice of void in candidacy) and 2004 c 271 s
163;
(3) RCW 29A.24.161 (Filings to fill void in candidacy--How made)
and 2004 c 271 s 164;
(4) RCW 29A.24.210 (Vacancy in partisan elective office -- Special
filing period) and 2005 c 2 s 10 & 2003 c 111 s 621;
(5) RCW 29A.24.211 (Vacancy in partisan elective office -- Special
filing period) and 2006 c 344 s 10 & 2004 c 271 s 116;
(6) RCW 29A.36.011 (Certifying primary candidates) and 2004 c 271
s 124; and
(7) RCW 29A.40.150 (Overseas, service voters) and 2009 c 415 s 12,
2006 c 206 s 7, 2005 c 245 s 1, 2003 c 111 s 1015, 1993 c 417 s 7, 1987
c 346 s 19, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Section 21 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Section 20 of this act expires July 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 With the exception of section 21, this act
takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---