BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
Washington Constitution establishes that the powers of government are
derived from the consent of the people and that government efforts are
to protect and maintain individual rights. The role of government is
to benefit the people and to do so in a way that is best suited to the
people, not the government. Over the years, this constitutional limit
has been diluted as agency powers have grown and more government
requirements have been placed on the people.
The legislature finds that the people have complained to its
representatives that state agencies exhibit an attitude not of service
to the people but are adversarial in situations where there are alleged
violations of environmental laws. The legislature further finds, in
enforcing environmental laws, the public benefit is greater if a
citizen corrects the action that leads to a violation rather than
merely receiving citations and being fined penalties. In many
instances where there are environmental concerns, individuals may be
unaware that their actions are harmful to the environment, and they may
not know how to rectify the problem when they receive a notice of
violation.
The legislature intends state agencies to provide warnings to
individuals that are in violation of laws and provide them with
information on how to voluntarily comply with laws and provide them
with the time to correct alleged violations before issuing fines or
penalties.
Agencies should establish a culture of working with people to
improve our environment instead of relying on the ability to issue
citations and penalize individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.210 and 2010 c 210 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, the attorney general or the attorney for the local
government shall bring such injunctive, declaratory, or other actions
as are necessary to ensure that no uses are made of the shorelines of
the state in conflict with the provisions and programs of this chapter,
and to otherwise enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Any person who shall fail to conform to the terms of a permit
issued under this chapter or who shall undertake development on the
shorelines of the state without first obtaining any permit required
under this chapter shall also be subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. Each permit violation
or each day of continued development without a required permit shall
constitute a separate violation.
(3)(a) Prior to a penalty being issued under this section, the
department or local government shall seek voluntary compliance actions
from the person identified under subsection (2) of this section and
work in good faith with any person who indicates an interest in
voluntary compliance. In seeking voluntary compliance actions under
this subsection, the department or local government shall provide the
person with educational information on methods of correcting the
alleged violation and technical assistance for expeditiously achieving
compliance with: (i) The terms of a permit issued under this chapter;
or (ii) requirements for undertaking development on the shorelines of
the state. If the provided information and assistance do not result in
a voluntary rectification of the violation, the department or local
government may impose a penalty upon the person in accordance with this
section.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (3) lessens or otherwise affects the
authority of a local government to take actions necessary to address an
immediate threat to human health or safety.
(4) The penalty provided for in this section shall be imposed by a
notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt
requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the same from
the department or local government, describing the violation with
reasonable particularity and ordering the act or acts constituting the
violation or violations to cease and desist or, in appropriate cases,
requiring necessary corrective action to be taken within a specific and
reasonable time.
(((4))) (5) The person incurring the penalty may appeal within
thirty days from the date of receipt of the penalty. The term "date of
receipt" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.21B.001. Any
penalty imposed pursuant to this section by the department shall be
subject to review by the shorelines hearings board. Any penalty
imposed pursuant to this section by local government shall be subject
to review by the local government legislative authority. Any penalty
jointly imposed by the department and local government shall be
appealed to the shorelines hearings board.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.220 and 1983 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to incurring civil liability under RCW 90.58.210, any
person found to have willfully engaged in activities on the shorelines
of the state in violation of the provisions of this chapter or any of
the master programs, rules, or regulations adopted pursuant thereto
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine
of not less than twenty-five nor more than one thousand dollars or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by
both such fine and imprisonment: PROVIDED, That the enforcing agency
first attempted to achieve voluntary compliance: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the fine for the third and all subsequent violations in any five-year period shall be not less than five hundred nor more than ten
thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That fines for violations of RCW
90.58.550, or any rule adopted thereunder, shall be determined under
RCW 90.58.560.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a penalty authorized in a local ordinance
adopted in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, counties
and cities must seek voluntary compliance actions from the alleged
violator and work in good faith with any person who indicates an
interest in voluntary compliance. In seeking voluntary compliance
actions, the county or city must provide the alleged violator with
educational information on methods of correcting the alleged violation
and technical assistance for expeditiously achieving compliance with
the local ordinance. If the provided information and assistance do not
result in a voluntary rectification of the violation, the county or
city, in accordance with the applicable local ordinance, may impose a
penalty upon the alleged violator.
(2) Nothing in this section lessens or otherwise affects the
authority of a county or city to take actions necessary to address an
immediate threat to human health or safety.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.48.144 and 1995 c 403 s 636 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, every person who:
(1) Violates the terms or conditions of a waste discharge permit
issued pursuant to RCW 90.48.180 or 90.48.260 through 90.48.262, or
(2) Conducts a commercial or industrial operation or other point
source discharge operation without a waste discharge permit as required
by RCW 90.48.160 or 90.48.260 through 90.48.262, or
(3) Violates the provisions of RCW 90.48.080, or other sections of
this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW or rules or orders adopted or issued
pursuant to either of those chapters, shall incur, in addition to any
other penalty as provided by law, a penalty in an amount of up to ten
thousand dollars a day for every such violation. Each and every such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be and be deemed to
be a separate and distinct violation. Every act of commission or
omission which procures, aids or abets in the violation shall be
considered a violation under the provisions of this section and subject
to the penalty herein provided for. The penalty amount shall be set in
consideration of the previous history of the violator and the severity
of the violation's impact on public health and/or the environment in
addition to other relevant factors. The penalty herein provided for
shall be imposed pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 6 of
this act and RCW 43.21B.300.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a penalty authorized under RCW 90.48.144, the
department must seek voluntary compliance actions from the alleged
violator and work in good faith with any person who indicates an
interest in voluntary compliance. In seeking voluntary compliance
actions, the department must provide the alleged violator with
educational information on methods of correcting the alleged violation
and technical assistance for expeditiously achieving compliance with:
(a) The provisions of this chapter; or (b) rules and orders adopted or
issued to implement the requirements of this chapter. If the provided
information and assistance do not result in a voluntary rectification
of the violation, the department may impose a penalty upon the alleged
violator.
(2) Nothing in this section lessens or otherwise affects the
authority of the department to take actions necessary to address an
immediate threat to human health or safety.
(3) If provisions in this section are determined to be in conflict
with federal law or program requirements for the national pollutant
discharge elimination system permit program, or in conflict with
federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation
of federal funds to the state for this program, the conflicting part of
this section shall be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2010 c 210 s 12 and 2010 c 84 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any civil
penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.95.315, 70.105.080,
70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310,
90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 90.76 RCW shall be imposed by a
notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt
requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty
from the department or the local air authority, describing the
violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties issued by local
air authorities, within thirty days after the notice is received, the
person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the authority for
the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the
application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon
whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The
authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in
such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and
shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of
extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or
factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(b) Prior to imposing a civil penalty under RCW 90.48.144, the
department of ecology must provide technical assistance as required
under section 6 of this act.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the
application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a
local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an
application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which
shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the
underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 All provisions of this act must be
administered and funded within existing resources.

--- END ---