BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.037 and 2007 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) A retiree
from plan 1, plan 2, or plan 3 who enters employment with an employer
at least one calendar month after his or her accrual date may continue
to receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without
a reduction of pension. For purposes of this section, employment
includes positions covered by annuity and retirement income plans
offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(((b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer
at least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the employer has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree into
the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the select committee on pension
policy, the legislative evaluation and accountability program, the
legislative systems committee, and the statute law committee; or
according to rules adopted for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members
for a local government employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.))
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.570 and 2007 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) ((Except under subsection (3) of this section, any)) A retired
teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any public
educational institution in Washington state at least one calendar month
after his or her accrual date shall cease to receive pension payments
while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service
for more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school year.
(3) ((Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters
service in any public educational institution in Washington state one
and one-half calendar months or more after his or her accrual date and:
(a) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the school board has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree
into the position;
(b) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of the school board or other highest decision-making
authority of the prospective employer;
(c) Whose employer retains records of the procedures followed and
the decisions made in hiring the retired teacher or retired
administrator and provides those records in the event of an audit; and
(d) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a school year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total limitation under this section applies prospectively
after July 22, 2007.
(4) When a retired teacher or administrator renders service beyond
eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the
employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the
entire duration of the member's employment during that fiscal year.
(5))) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary
with information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(((6))) (4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five
hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.35.060 and 2004 c 242 s 64 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in
RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter
or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a
position covered by an annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.35.030, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680.
However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before
the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the
retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of
the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.230 and 2004 c 242 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.35.060, no retiree under the
provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's
monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.35.010, 41.40.010, 41.37.010, or
41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by an annuity and retirement
income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.400, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in
the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to
this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official.
(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section,
his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon
reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed
pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.37.050 and 2005 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with
an employer as defined in this chapter sooner than one calendar month
after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement
allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight
hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each
month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer
for one full calendar month.
(b) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an
employer as defined in chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or a
position covered by an annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, sooner
than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's
monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half
percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction
will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.
(c) The benefit reduction provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per
month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied
to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-
seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, without suspension of his or her
benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under this
chapter, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes
a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of
membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive
membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire
if eligible in accordance with this chapter. However, if the right to
retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered
two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor
options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.

--- END ---