BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.390 and 1992 c 207 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or city governing body that adopts a moratorium,
interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official
control without holding a public hearing on the proposed moratorium,
interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official
control, shall hold a public hearing on the adopted moratorium, interim
zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official control
within at least sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the
governing body received a recommendation on the matter from the
planning commission or department. If the governing body does not
adopt findings of fact justifying its action before this hearing, then
the governing body shall do so immediately after this public hearing.
A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim
official control adopted under this section may be effective for not
longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one year if a
work plan is developed for related studies providing for such a longer
period. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or
interim official control may be renewed for one or more six-month
periods if a subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are
made prior to each renewal.
(2) This section does not apply to the designation of critical
areas, agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands,
under RCW 36.70A.170, and the conservation of these lands and
protection of these areas under RCW 36.70A.060, prior to such actions
being taken in a comprehensive plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.070 and
implementing development regulations adopted under RCW 36.70A.120, if
a public hearing is held on such proposed actions.
(3) Counties and cities, in exercising moratoria authority under
this section, may not adopt one or more consecutive moratoria during a
comprehensive plan amendment process to prevent lawful activities under
the comprehensive plan in anticipation of a change of law by those
amendments. This subsection does not apply to comprehensive plan
amendments that are in response to a court decision or a decision of
the growth management hearings board. Nothing in this subsection may
be construed to modify county and city moratoria powers conferred
outside this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.590 and 2009 c 444 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local governments may adopt moratoria or other interim official
controls as necessary and appropriate to implement this chapter.
(2)(a) A local government adopting a moratorium or control under
this section must:
(i) Hold a public hearing on the moratorium or control;
(ii) Adopt detailed findings of fact that include, but are not
limited to, justifications for the proposed or adopted actions and
explanations of the desired and likely outcomes;
(iii) Notify the department of the moratorium or control
immediately after its adoption. The notification must specify the
time, place, and date of any public hearing required by this
subsection;
(iv) Provide that all lawfully existing uses, structures, or other
development shall continue to be deemed lawful conforming uses and may
continue to be maintained, repaired, and redeveloped, so long as the
use is not expanded, under the terms of the land use and shoreline
rules and regulations in place at the time of the moratorium.
(b) The public hearing required by this section must be held within
sixty days of the adoption of the moratorium or control.
(3) A moratorium or control adopted under this section may be
effective for up to six months if a detailed work plan for remedying
the issues and circumstances necessitating the moratorium or control is
developed and made available for public review. A moratorium or
control may be renewed for two six-month periods if the local
government complies with subsection (2)(a) of this section before each
renewal. If a moratorium or control is in effect on the date a
proposed master program or amendment is submitted to the department,
the moratorium or control must remain in effect until the department's
final action under RCW 90.58.090; however, the moratorium expires six
months after the date of submittal if the department has not taken
final action.
(4) Local governments, in exercising moratoria authority under this
section, may not adopt one or more consecutive moratoria during a
shoreline master program amendment process to prevent lawful activities
under the master program in anticipation of a change of law by those
amendments. This subsection does not apply to shoreline master program
amendments that are in response to a court decision or a decision of
the shorelines hearings board.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to modify county and
city moratoria powers conferred outside this chapter.

--- END ---