BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.22.010 and 2009 c 493 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Extended benefit period" means a period which:
(a) Begins with the third week after a week for which there is an
"on" indicator; and
(b) Ends with the third week after the first week for which there
is an "off" indicator: PROVIDED, That no extended benefit period shall
last for a period of less than thirteen consecutive weeks, and further
that no extended benefit period may begin by reason of an "on"
indicator before the fourteenth week after the close of a prior
extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.
(2) There is an "on" indicator for this state for a week if the
commissioner determines, in accordance with the regulations of the
United States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of
such week and the immediately preceding twelve weeks:
(a) The rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally adjusted,
equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent of the average of such
rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each of the
preceding two calendar years and equaled or exceeded five percent; or
(b) For benefits for weeks of unemployment beginning after March 6,
1993:
(i) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted, as
determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds six
and one-half percent; and
(ii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (b)(i) of this
subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average
for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods ending in
the two preceding calendar years.
(c) This subsection applies as provided under the tax relief,
unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of 2010
(P.L. 111-312) as it existed on December 17, 2010, or such subsequent
date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the
purposes of this subsection:
(i) The average rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally
adjusted, equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent of the average
of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in all
of the preceding three calendar years and equaled or exceeded five
percent; or
(ii) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted,
as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds six
and one-half percent; and
(iii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (c)(ii) of this
subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average
for any of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the three
preceding calendar years.
(3) "High unemployment period" means any period of unemployment
beginning after March 6, 1993, during which an extended benefit period
would be in effect if:
(a) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted, as
determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds
eight percent; and
(b) The average rate of total unemployment in the state, seasonally
adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for
the three-month period referred to in (a) of this subsection, equals or
exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average for either or both of
the corresponding three-month periods ending in the two preceding
calendar years.
(c) This subsection applies as provided under the tax relief,
unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of 2010
(P.L. 111-312) as it existed on December 17, 2010, or such subsequent
date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the
purposes of this subsection.
(i) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted, as
determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds
eight percent; and
(ii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (a) of this
subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average
for any of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the three
preceding calendar years.
(4) There is an "off" indicator for this state for a week only if,
for the period consisting of such week and immediately preceding twelve
weeks, none of the options specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section result in an "on" indicator.
(5) "Regular benefits" means benefits payable to an individual
under this title or under any state law (including benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C.
chapter 85) other than extended benefits or additional benefits.
(6) "Extended benefits" means benefits payable for weeks of
unemployment beginning in an extended benefit period to an individual
under this title or under any state law (including benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C.
chapter 85) other than regular or additional benefits.
(7) "Additional benefits" are benefits totally financed by the
state and payable under this title to exhaustees by reason of
conditions of high unemployment or by reason of other special factors.
(8) "Eligibility period" of an individual means:
(a) The period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year
which begin in an extended benefit period that is in effect in this
state and, if his or her benefit year ends within such extended benefit
period, any weeks thereafter which begin in such period; or
(b) For an individual who is eligible for emergency unemployment
compensation during the extended benefit period beginning February 15,
2009, the period consisting of the week ending February 28, 2009,
((through the week ending May 29, 2010)) and applies as provided under
the tax relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job
creation act of 2010 (P.L. 111-312) as it existed on December 17, 2010,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this subsection.
(9) "Additional benefit eligibility period" of an individual means
the period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year which
begin in an additional benefit period that is in effect and, if his or
her benefit year ends within such additional benefit period, any weeks
thereafter which begin in such period.
(10) "Exhaustee" means an individual who, with respect to any week
of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:
(a) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits
that were payable to him or her under this title or any other state law
(including dependents' allowances and regular benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85)
in his or her current benefit year that includes such week; or
(b) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits
that were available to him or her under this title or any other state
law (including dependents' allowances and regular benefits available to
federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85)
in his or her current benefit year that includes such week, after the
cancellation of some or all of his or her wage credits or the total or
partial reduction of his or her rights to regular benefits: PROVIDED,
That, for the purposes of (a) and (b), an individual shall be deemed to
have received in his or her current benefit year all of the regular
benefits that were payable to him or her, or available to him or her,
as the case may be, even though:
(i) As a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages or
employment, or both, that were not included in the original monetary
determination with respect to his or her current benefit year, he or
she may subsequently be determined to be entitled to more regular
benefits; or
(ii) By reason of the seasonal provisions of another state law, he
or she is not entitled to regular benefits with respect to such week of
unemployment (although he or she may be entitled to regular benefits
with respect to future weeks of unemployment in the next season, as the
case may be, in his or her current benefit year), and he or she is
otherwise an exhaustee within the meaning of this section with respect
to his or her right to regular benefits under such state law seasonal
provisions during the season or off season in which that week of
unemployment occurs; or
(iii) Having established a benefit year, no regular benefits are
payable to him or her during such year because his or her wage credits
were canceled or his or her right to regular benefits was totally
reduced as the result of the application of a disqualification; or
(c) His or her benefit year having ended prior to such week, he or
she has insufficient wages or employment, or both, on the basis of
which he or she could establish in any state a new benefit year that
would include such week, or having established a new benefit year that
includes such week, he or she is precluded from receiving regular
benefits by reason of the provision in RCW 50.04.030 which meets the
requirement of section 3304(a)(7) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act,
or the similar provision in any other state law; and
(d)(i) Has no right for such week to unemployment benefits or
allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment
Insurance Act, the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, and such other federal
laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States
secretary of labor; and
(ii) Has not received and is not seeking for such week unemployment
benefits under the unemployment compensation law of Canada, unless the
appropriate agency finally determines that he or she is not entitled to
unemployment benefits under such law for such week.
(11) "State law" means the unemployment insurance law of any state,
approved by the United States secretary of labor under section 3304 of
the internal revenue code of 1954.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.22.155 and 2009 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) This section applies to claims with an effective date on or
after April 5, 2009.
(2) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are
available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits when:
(a) The individual is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW
50.04.075 and, after assessment of the individual's labor market,
occupation, or skills, is determined to need job-related training to
find suitable employment in the individual's labor market. The
assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skill sets must
be substantially based on declining occupation or skill sets and high-demand occupations identified in local labor market areas by the local
workforce development councils in cooperation with the employment
security department and its labor market information division; or
(b) For claims with an effective date on or after September 7,
2009, the individual:
(i) Earned an average hourly wage in the individual's base year
that is less than one hundred thirty percent of the state minimum
wage((,)) and, after assessment, it is determined that the individual's
earning potential will be enhanced through vocational training. The
individual's average hourly wage is calculated by dividing the total
wages paid by the total hours worked in the individual's base year;
(ii) Served in the United States military or the Washington
national guard during the twelve-month period prior to the application
date, was honorably discharged from military service or the Washington
national guard and, after assessment, is determined to need job-related
training to find suitable employment in the individual's labor market;
(iii) Is currently serving in the Washington national guard and,
after assessment, is determined to need job-related training to find
suitable employment in the individual's labor market; or
(iv) Is disabled due to an injury or illness and, after assessment,
is determined to be unable to return to his or her previous occupation
and to need job-related training to find suitable employment in the
individual's labor market.
(3)(a) The individual must develop an individual training program
that is submitted to the commissioner for approval within ninety days
after the individual is notified by the employment security department
of the requirements of this section;
(b) The individual must enter the approved training program by one
hundred twenty days after the date of the notification, unless the
employment security department determines that the training is not
available during the one hundred twenty days, in which case the
individual enters training as soon as it is available;
(c) The department may waive the deadlines established under this
subsection for reasons deemed by the commissioner to be good cause.
(4) The individual must be enrolled in training approved under this
section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational
institution, except that less than full-time training may be approved
when the individual has a physical, mental, or emotional disability
that precludes enrollment on a full-time basis.
(5) The individual must make satisfactory progress in the training
as defined by the commissioner and certified by the educational
institution.
(6) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this
section if he or she:
(a) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular
employer; or
(b) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the
date he or she is laid off.
(7) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as
defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational
institutions in other states.
(b) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities.
(c) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this
section.
(d) "Training program" means:
(i) An education program determined to be necessary as a
prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational
institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved
training program; or
(ii) A vocational training program at an educational institution
that:
(A) Is targeted to training for a high-demand occupation;
(B) Is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and
earning power; and
(C) Meets the criteria for performance developed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board for the purpose of
determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I
of P.L. 105-220.
"Training program" does not include any course of education
primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or
higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for
certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the
occupation.
(8) Benefits shall be paid as follows:
(a) The total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the
individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of
regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year.
(b) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular
weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be
paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits.
(c) Training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits
but not before any similar federally funded program.
(d) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years
beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim. However,
training benefits are not payable for weeks more than three years
beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim when
individuals are eligible for benefits in accordance with RCW
50.22.010(2)(c) or (3)(c).
(9) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting
regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for
training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year
ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the
individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will
have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new
claim.
(10) Individuals who receive training benefits under RCW 50.22.150
or this section are not eligible for training benefits under this
section for five years from the last receipt of training benefits.
(11) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment
allowance under chapter 2, Title II of the trade act of 1974, as
amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section
for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment
allowance.
(12) An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment
compensation under any federal law shall not be eligible to receive
benefits under this section for each week the individual receives such
compensation.
(13) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval
of training and the granting of training benefits.
(14) Each local workforce development council, in cooperation with
the employment security department and its labor market information
division, must identify occupations and skill sets that are declining
and high-demand occupations and skill sets. Each local workforce
development council shall update this information annually or more
frequently if needed.
(15) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.29.025 and 2010 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For contributions assessed for rate years 2005 through 2009,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection,
and the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least twelve months but less than fourteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent;
or
(II) At least fourteen months of unemployment benefits, the minimum
shall be five-tenths of one percent, except that, for employers in rate
class 1, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of one percent.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed six
percent through rate year 2007 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths
percent for rate years 2008 and 2009:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
December 31, 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate
the total social cost using the array calculation factor contributions
that would have been required to be paid by all employers in the
calculation period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the
relevant period. To calculate the flat social cost factor for rate
years 2010 and 2011, the forty-five dollar increase paid as part of an
individual's weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1201 shall
not be considered for purposes of calculating the total unemployment
benefits paid to claimants in the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) For rate years 2005, 2006, and 2007:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40; and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount, but not more than
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) For contributions assessed for rate years 2008 and 2009:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(C) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(I) .95 90

(II) .95 1.05 100

(III) 1.05 115

(2) For contributions assessed in rate year 2010 and thereafter,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection,
and the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.11

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.22

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.33

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.43

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.54

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.65

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.76

0.008750 0.010000 9 0.88

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.01

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.14

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.28

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.41

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.54

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.67

0.017500 0.018750 16 1.80

0.018750 0.020000 17 1.94

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.07

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.20

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.38

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.50

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.63

0.026250 0.027500 23 2.75

0.027500 0.028750 24 2.88

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.00

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.13

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.25

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.38

0.033750 0.035000 29 3.50

0.035000 0.036250 30 3.63

0.036250 0.037500 31 3.75

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.00

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.25

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.50

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.75

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.00

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.15

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.25

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.30

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year. For rate year
2011, the calculation may not result in a flat social cost factor that
is more than one and twenty-two one-hundredths percent.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least ten months but less than eleven months of unemployment
benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent; or
(II) At least eleven months but less than twelve months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(III) At least twelve months but less than thirteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be four-tenths of one percent;
or
(IV) At least thirteen months but less than fifteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be thirty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(V) At least fifteen months but less than seventeen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be twenty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(VI) At least seventeen months but less than eighteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one
percent; or
(VII) At least eighteen months of unemployment benefits, the
minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one percent through rate year
2011 and shall be zero thereafter.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six percent or, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is within "111," "112," "1141," "115,"
"3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed five and four-tenths percent:
(((A))) (I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(((B))) (II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(((C))) (III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(((D))) (IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(((E))) (V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(((F))) (VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(((G))) (VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(((H))) (VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(((I))) (IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(((J))) (X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(((K))) (XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(((L))) (XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For rate year 2011, the graduated social cost factor rate for
each employer in the array is the flat social cost factor multiplied by
the percentage specified as follows for the rate class to which the
employer has been assigned in (a)(ii) of this subsection, except that
the sum of an employer's array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate may not exceed six percent or, for
employers whose North American industry classification system code is
within "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or
"49312," may not exceed five and four-tenths percent:
(I) Rate class 1 - 40 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 44 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 48 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 52 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 56 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 60 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 64 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 68 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 72 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 76 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 80 percent;
(XII) Rate class 12 - 84 percent;
(XIII) Rate class 13 - 88 percent;
(XIV) Rate class 14 - 92 percent;
(XV) Rate class 15 - 96 percent;
(XVI) Rate class 16 - 100 percent;
(XVII) Rate class 17 - 104 percent;
(XVIII) Rate class 18 - 108 percent;
(XIX) Rate class 19 - 112 percent;
(XX) Rate class 20 - 116 percent; and
(XXI) Rate classes 21 through 40 - 120 percent.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) For rate years through 2010:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection.
(ii) For rate years 2011 and thereafter:
(A)(I) For an employer who does not enter into an approved agency-deferred payment contract as described in (c)(ii)(A)(II) or (III) of
this subsection, the array calculation factor rate shall be the rate it
would have been if the employer had not been delinquent in payment plus
an additional one percent or, if the employer is delinquent in payment
for a second or more consecutive year, an additional two percent;
(II) For an employer who enters an approved agency-deferred payment
contract by September 30th of the previous rate year, the array
calculation factor rate shall be the rate it would have been if the
employer had not been delinquent in payment;
(III) For an employer who enters an approved agency-deferred
payment contract after September 30th of the previous rate year, but
within thirty days of the date the department sent its first tax rate
notice, the array calculation factor rate shall be the rate it would
have been had the employer not been delinquent in payment plus an
additional one-half of one percent or, if the employer is delinquent in
payment for a second or more consecutive year, an additional one and
one-half percent;
(IV) For an employer who enters an approved agency-deferred payment
contract as described in (c)(ii)(A)(II) or (III) of this subsection,
but who fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the array calculation factor rate shall immediately revert to
the applicable array calculation factor rate under (c)(ii)(A)(I) of
this subsection; and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 for the relevant year under (b)(ii) (A)
or (B) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 for the relevant year
under (b)(ii) (A) or (B) of this subsection; and
(iii) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(A) .95 90

(B) .95 1.05 100

(C) 1.05 115

(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the North American
industry classification system code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---