BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.05.080 and 2005 c 274 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission
shall:
(1) Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of Article II, section
43 of the state Constitution and of this chapter, which rules shall
provide that three voting members of the commission constitute a quorum
to do business, and that the votes of three of the voting members are
required for any official action of the commission;
(2) Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting
data and maps from the United States Bureau of the Census;
(3) Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public
records as specified in chapters 40.14 and 42.56 RCW;
(4) Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act,
chapter 42.30 RCW;
(5) Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.32.030;
(6) Be subject to the provisions of RCW 42.17.240;
(7) Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be
made available to the public at the time the plan is published. The
report will include but will not be limited to: (a) The population and
percentage deviation from the average district population for every
district, as well as the population and percentage deviation from the
average house district population for every house district of a
legislative district; (b) an explanation of the criteria used in
developing the plan with a justification of any deviation in a district
from the average district population, as well as a justification of any
deviation in a house district of a legislative district from the
average house district population; (c) a map of all the districts that
includes the two house districts of each legislative district; and (d)
the estimated cost incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct
boundaries.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.05.090 and 1990 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the redistricting plan:
(1) Districts shall have a population as nearly equal as is
practicable, excluding nonresident military personnel, based on the
population reported in the federal decennial census. The two house
districts of each legislative district must have a population as nearly
equal as is practicable, excluding nonresident military personnel,
based on the population reported in the federal decennial census.
(2) To the extent consistent with subsection (1) of this section
the commission plan should, insofar as practical, accomplish the
following:
(a) District lines, and the lines of the two house districts of
each legislative district, should be drawn so as to coincide with the
boundaries of local political subdivisions and areas recognized as
communities of interest. The number of counties and municipalities
divided among more than one district or house district of a legislative
district should be as small as possible;
(b) Districts and the two house districts of each legislative
district should be composed of convenient, contiguous, and compact
territory. Land areas may be deemed contiguous if they share a common
land border or are connected by a ferry, highway, bridge, or tunnel.
Areas separated by geographical boundaries or artificial barriers that
prevent transportation within a district or house district should not
be deemed contiguous; and
(c) Whenever practicable, a precinct shall be wholly within a
single legislative district and a single house district of a
legislative district.
(3) The commission's plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court
under RCW 44.05.100(4) shall provide for forty-nine legislative
districts.
(4) The house of representatives shall consist of ninety-eight
members, ((two)) each of whom shall be elected from and run at large
within a separate house district. Each legislative district shall be
divided into two house districts, denoted as house district A and B,
with a single member of the house of representatives being elected from
each house district. The senate shall consist of forty-nine members,
one of whom shall be elected from each legislative district.
(5) The commission shall exercise its powers to provide fair and
effective representation and to encourage electoral competition. The
commission's plan shall not be drawn purposely to favor or discriminate
against any political party or group.

--- END ---