BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.010 and 2010 c 66 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a permanent fire brand or any artificial mark,
other than an individual identification symbol, approved by the
director to be used in conjunction with a brand or by itself.
(2) "Certificate of permit" means a form prescribed by and obtained
from the director that is completed by the owner or a person authorized
to act on behalf of the owner to show the ownership of livestock. It
is used to document ownership of livestock while in transit within the
state or on consignment to any public livestock market, special sale,
slaughter plant or certified feed lot. It does not evidence inspection
of livestock.
(3) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
duly authorized representative.
(5) "Horses" means horses, burros, and mules.
(6) "Individual identification certificate" means an inspection
certificate that authorizes the livestock owner to transport the animal
out of state multiple times within a set period of time.
(7) "Individual identification symbol" means a permanent mark
placed on a horse for the purpose of individually identifying and
registering the horse and which has been approved for use as such by
the director.
(8) "Inspection certificate" means a certificate issued by the
director or a veterinarian certified by the director documenting the
ownership of an animal based on an inspection of the animal. It
includes an individual identification certificate.
(9) "Livestock" includes, but is not limited to, ((horses,)) mules,
cattle, sheep, swine, and goats. However, "livestock" does not include
horses.
(10) "Livestock inspection" or "inspection" means the examination
of livestock or livestock hides for brands or any means of identifying
livestock or livestock hides including the examination of documents
providing evidence of ownership.
(11) "Microchipping" means the implantation of an identification
microchip or similar electronic identification device to establish the
identity of an individual animal:
(a) In the pipping muscle of a chick ratite or the implantation of
a microchip in the tail muscle of an otherwise unidentified adult
ratite;
(b) In the nuchal ligament of a horse unless otherwise specified by
rule of the director; and
(c) In locations of other livestock species as specified by rule of
the director when requested by an association of producers of that
species of livestock.
(12) "Person" means a natural person, individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, company, society, and association, and every
officer, agent or employee thereof. This term shall import either the
singular or the plural as the case may be.
(13) "Production record brand" means a number brand which shall be
used for production identification purposes only.
(14) "Ratite" means, but is not limited to, ostrich, emu, rhea, or
other flightless bird used for human consumption, whether live or
slaughtered.
(15) "Registering agency" means any person issuing an individual
identification symbol for the purpose of individually identifying and
registering a horse.
(16) "Self-inspection certificate" means a form prescribed by and
obtained from the director that was completed and signed by the buyer
and seller of livestock to document a change in ownership before June
10, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.57.160 and 2010 c 66 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of cattle ((or
horses)) or the furnishing of proof that cattle ((or horses)) passing
or being transported through the point have been inspected or
identified and are lawfully being transported;
(b) Providing for issuance of individual ((horse and)) cattle
identification certificates or other means of ((horse and)) cattle
identification; and
(c) Designating the documents that constitute other satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle ((and horses)). A bill of sale may not
be designated as documenting satisfactory proof of ownership ((for
cattle)).
(2) A self-inspection certificate may be accepted as satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle if the director determines that the self-inspection certificate, together with other available documentation,
sufficiently establishes ownership. Self-inspection certificates
completed after June 10, 2010, are not satisfactory proof of ownership
((for cattle)).

Sec. 3 RCW 16.57.220 and 2010 c 66 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in this
section, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and sixty cents
per head for cattle ((and three dollars and fifty cents for horses)) or
the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form
of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for
livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected
before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit
if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with
the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification
specified by the director by rule.
(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a
daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the
United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection
program is four dollars per head.
(5) ((When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or
more horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection
is two dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is
greater.
(6))) The fee for individual identification certificates is twenty
dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a lifetime
certificate or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
However, the fee for an annual certificate listing thirty or more
animals belonging to one person is five dollars per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall
not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.
(((7))) (6) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection
certificate by the director is five dollars. The minimum fee does not
apply to livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special
sale or inspected at a cattle processing plant.
(((8))) (7) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage
fee" means seventeen dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set
by the office of financial management.

Sec. 4 RCW 16.57.240 and 2010 c 66 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, and self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160 shall
show the owner, number, breed, sex, brand, or other method of
identification of the cattle ((or horses)) and any other necessary
information required by the director.
(2) The director may issue certificate of permit forms to any
person on payment of a fee established by rule.
(3) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or
other satisfactory proof of ownership shall be kept by the owner and/or
person in possession of any cattle and shall be furnished to the
director or any peace officer upon demand.
(4) A self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW
16.57.160 is not valid if proof of ownership had not been provided by
the seller to the buyer for cattle bearing brands not recorded to the
seller.

Sec. 5 RCW 16.57.245 and 2010 c 66 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director or any peace officer may stop vehicles carrying cattle
((or horses)) to determine if the ((livestock)) cattle being
transported are accompanied by a certificate of permit, inspection
certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of
RCW 16.57.010, or other satisfactory proof of ownership, as determined
by the director.

Sec. 6 RCW 16.57.260 and 2003 c 326 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided by rule adopted under this chapter, it is
unlawful for any person to remove or cause to be removed or accept for
removal from this state, any cattle ((or horses)) which are not
accompanied at all times by an inspection certificate ((on such cattle
or horses, except as provided by rule adopted under this chapter)).

Sec. 7 RCW 16.57.267 and 2003 c 326 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to fail to present ((an animal))
livestock for inspection at any mandatory inspection point designated
by the director by rule under this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 16.57.280 and 2010 c 66 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall knowingly have possession of any cattle ((or
horse)) marked with a recorded brand of another person unless the
cattle:
(a) ((Cattle or horse)) Lawfully bears the person's own healed
recorded brand;
(b) ((Cattle or horse)) Is accompanied by a certificate of permit
from the owner of the recorded brand;
(c) ((Cattle or horse)) Is accompanied by an inspection
certificate;
(d) ((Cattle)) Are accompanied by a self-inspection certificate
meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.010; or
(e) ((Horse is accompanied by a bill of sale from the previous
owner; or
(f) Cattle or horse is)) Are accompanied by other satisfactory
proof of ownership as designated in rule.
(2) A violation of this section constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 9 RCW 16.57.290 and 2010 c 66 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
All cattle ((and horses)) that are not accompanied by a certificate
of permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting
the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of
ownership when offered for sale and presented for inspection by the
director, shall be impounded. If theft is suspected, the director
shall immediately initiate an investigation. If theft is not
suspected, the animal shall be sold and the proceeds retained by the
director. Upon the sale of the cattle ((or horses)), the director
shall give the purchasers an inspection certificate for the cattle ((or
horses)) documenting their ownership.

Sec. 10 RCW 16.57.300 and 2003 c 326 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except under RCW 16.57.303, the proceeds from the sale of cattle
((and horses)) when impounded under RCW 16.57.290, after paying the
cost ((thereof)) of impoundment, shall be paid to the director, who
shall make a record showing the brand or marks or other method of
identification of the animals and the amount realized from the sale
((thereof)). However, the proceeds from a sale of the cattle ((or
horses)) at a licensed public livestock market shall be held by the
licensee for a reasonable period not to exceed thirty days to permit
the consignor to establish ownership or the right to sell the cattle
((or horses)). If the consignor fails to establish legal ownership or
the right to sell the cattle ((or horses)), the proceeds shall be paid
to the director to be disposed of as any other estray proceeds.

Sec. 11 RCW 16.57.400 and 2003 c 326 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Horses and)) Cattle may be identified by individual
identification certificates or other means of identification authorized
by the director. The certificates or other means of identification are
valid only for the use of the owner in whose name it is issued.
((Horses and)) Cattle identified pursuant to this section are only
subject to inspection when the animal is consigned for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
Any requirements of this chapter relating to brands, brand
inspection, or other ownership inspection requirements do not apply to
the ownership or movement of horses. The department may not require
the owner or possessor of a horse to present the horse for a brand
inspection upon movement, sale, importation into Washington,
exportation out of Washington, or under any other circumstances.

Sec. 13 RCW 16.57.015 and 2003 c 326 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall establish a livestock identification
advisory board. The board shall be composed of ((six)) five members
appointed by the director. One member shall represent each of the
following groups: Beef producers, public livestock market operators,
((horse owners,)) dairy farmers, cattle feeders, and meat processors.
As used in this subsection, "meat processor" means a person licensed to
operate a slaughtering establishment under chapter 16.49 RCW or the
federal meat inspection act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). In making
appointments, the director shall solicit nominations from organizations
representing these groups statewide. The board shall elect a member to
serve as chair of the board.
(2) The purpose of the board is to provide advice to the director
regarding livestock identification programs administered under this
chapter and regarding inspection fees and related licensing fees. The
director shall consult the board before adopting, amending, or
repealing a rule under this chapter or altering a fee under RCW
16.58.050, 16.65.030, 16.65.037, or 16.65.090. If the director
publishes in the state register a proposed rule to be adopted under the
authority of this chapter and the rule has not received the approval of
the advisory board, the director shall file with the board a written
statement setting forth the director's reasons for proposing the rule
without the board's approval.
(3) The members of the advisory board serve three-year terms.
However, the director shall by rule provide shorter initial terms for
some of the members of the board to stagger the expiration of the
initial terms. The members serve without compensation. The director
may authorize the expenses of a member to be reimbursed if the member
is selected to attend a regional or national conference or meeting
regarding livestock identification. Any such reimbursement shall be in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 14 RCW 9.16.010 and 1992 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person who shall willfully deface, obliterate, remove, or
alter any mark or brand placed by or with the authority of the owner
thereof on any shingle bolt, log or stick of timber, or on any ((horse,
mare, gelding,)) mule, cow, steer, bull, sheep, goat or hog, shall be
punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more
than five years, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or
by both fine and imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 16.57.410 (Horses -- Registering
agencies -- Permit required -- Fee -- Records -- Identification symbol
inspections -- Rules) and 2003 c 326 s 45, 1993 c 354 s 11, 1989 c 286 s
25, & 1981 c 296 s 35 are each repealed.

--- END ---