BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.201 and 2009 c 479 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving
written notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st
of any year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real
property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the
election, the county shall keep a record of all fines, forfeitures,
reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole or in part,
under this title for violations of law or rules adopted pursuant to
this title and shall monthly remit an amount equal to the amount
collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.
The election shall continue until the department is notified
differently prior to January 1st of any year.
(2) If deemed by a county legislative authority as beneficial for
the economic development of the county, the legislative authority may
elect to either reduce payments or excuse from payments under this
section all department-owned game land for which the department has an
active, utilized private grazing lease, while collecting payments for
all other department-owned game lands located in the county.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "game lands" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 77.12.203.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.203 and 2005 c 303 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the
contrary, the director shall pay by April 30th of each year on game
lands in each county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201,
an amount in lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on
similar parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or
the greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in
1984 plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds equal to
that which would be paid if such lands were privately owned. This
amount shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means
those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the department
and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All
lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or recreation
purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin shall be
considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) ((This section shall not apply to lands transferred after April
23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4))) The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that prior to the
effective date of this section, the department of fish and wildlife was
not required to make payments under RCW 77.12.203 for lands transferred
to the department from other state agencies after April 23, 1990. It
is the intent of section 2 of this act to repeal this provision and
require payments under RCW 77.12.203 for this grouping of lands
prospectively only. Nothing in this act may be interpreted to require
the department of fish and wildlife to make retroactive back payments
under RCW 77.12.203 for the period of time between April 23, 1990, and
the effective date of this section.

--- END ---