BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.140 and 2010 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall continue for the
duration provided in this section.
(1) For a person convicted in this state of a class A felony or an
offense listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5), or a person convicted in this state
of any sex offense or kidnapping offense who has one or more prior
convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the duty to
register shall continue indefinitely.
(2)(a) For a person convicted in this state of a class B felony
committed when the person was eighteen years of age or older who does
not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping
offense and whose current offense is not listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5),
the duty to register shall end fifteen years after the last date of
release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and
sentence, if the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the
community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during
that time period.
(b) For a person convicted of a class B felony committed when the
person was under the age of eighteen years, the duty to register shall
end five years after the last date of release from confinement, if any,
including full-time residential treatment, pursuant to the conviction,
or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent three
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
criminal offense during that time period.
(3)(a) For a person convicted in this state of a class C felony, a
violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation,
or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the person does not have
one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense
and the person's current offense is not listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5), the
duty to register shall end ten years after the last date of release
from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if
the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without
being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.
(b) For a person convicted of a class C felony or an attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, or a gross
misdemeanor committed when the person was under the age of eighteen
years, the duty to register shall end three years after the last date
of release from confinement, if any, including full-time residential
treatment, pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and
sentence, if the person has spent two consecutive years in the
community without being convicted of any new criminal offense during
that time period.
(4) For a person required to register for a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that was committed when the person was
eighteen years of age or older, the duty to register shall continue
indefinitely.
(5) Nothing in this section prevents a person from being relieved
of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.142 and 9A.44.143.
(6) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender
shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her
duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(7) For purposes of determining whether a person has been convicted
of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex offender or
kidnapping offender is not a sex or kidnapping offense.
(8) The provisions of this section and RCW 9A.44.141 through
9A.44.143 apply equally to a person who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.141 and 2010 c 267 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the request of a person who is listed in the Washington
state patrol central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders, the county sheriff shall investigate whether a person's duty
to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(a) Using available records, the county sheriff shall, within
thirty days of receiving the request by the person who is listed in the
Washington state patrol central registry of sex offenders and
kidnapping offenders, verify that the offender has spent the requisite
time in the community and has not been convicted of a disqualifying
offense.
(b) If the county sheriff determines the person's duty to register
has ended by operation of law, the county sheriff shall request the
Washington state patrol remove the person's name from the central
registry.
(c) If the Washington state patrol has not removed the person's
name from the central registry of sex offenders within thirty days of
the request of the county sheriff, the person requesting the removal
may petition the court for an order for removal.
(2) Nothing in this subsection prevents a county sheriff from
investigating, upon his or her own initiative, whether a person's duty
to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(3) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for removing or requesting the removal of a
person from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders or the failure to remove or request removal of a person
within the time frames provided in RCW 9A.44.140.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.44.145 and 2010 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state patrol shall notify:
(a) Registered sex and kidnapping offenders of any change to the
registration requirements; and
(b) No less than annually, an offender having a duty to register
under RCW 9A.44.143 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed
when the offender was a juvenile of their ability to petition for
relief from registration and the requirements for relief from
registration as a matter of law, as provided in RCW 9A.44.140.
(2) For economic efficiency, the state patrol may combine the
notices in this section into one notice.

--- END ---