BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to review the
original automated traffic safety camera pilot program to address
concerns raised by the public about abuses related to the use of
automated traffic safety cameras. The legislature is aware that public
outcry against abuses by manufacturers and jurisdictions has led to the
prohibition or significant restriction of the use of these devices in
fifteen states and many other cities. The public outcry has occurred
in states that do not have adequate regulation of automated traffic
safety cameras. The legislature intends to protect our citizens by
enacting responsible regulation for the use of automated traffic safety
cameras.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.170 and 2010 c 161 s 1127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the
restrictions described in this section ((and)), provisions for public
notice and signage, and a provision that indicates the maximum number
of cameras that may be installed. Cities and counties using automated
traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the
restrictions described in this section, but are not required to enact
an authorizing ordinance.
(b) A local legislative authority that adopts an ordinance allowing
for the use of automated traffic safety cameras must submit the
ordinance to the voters within its jurisdiction at the next general
election. The ordinance must be approved by the voters before
automated traffic safety cameras may be used within the jurisdiction.
(c) A local jurisdiction may not install more than the maximum
number of automated traffic safety cameras that is permitted by
ordinance unless the local legislative authority enacts an ordinance
that authorizes a specified number of additional automated traffic
safety cameras. The local legislative authority must submit the
ordinance authorizing the additional automated traffic safety cameras
to the voters within its jurisdiction at the next general election.
The ordinance must be approved by the voters before additional
automated traffic safety cameras may be used within the jurisdiction.
(d) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections, railroad crossings, and school speed zones
only.
(((c))) (e) When an automated traffic safety camera is used at a
two-arterial intersection, the minimum duration of the yellow change
interval for the stoplight must be a duration that is set in accordance
with the "Manual for Uniform Traffic Control Devices" issued by the
department of transportation plus one second.
(f) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, automated traffic safety
cameras may be used to detect speed violations for the purposes of
section 201(2), chapter 470, Laws of 2009 if the local legislative
authority first enacts an ordinance authorizing the use of cameras to
detect speed violations.
(((d))) (g) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures
of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction
is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(((e))) (h) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered
owner of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the
renter of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's
name and address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law
enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with
it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an
automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be
available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to
adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a
notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic
safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.
(((f))) (i) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(((g))) (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this
section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge
of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not
be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action
or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No
photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any
purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor
retained longer than necessary to enforce this section.
(((h))) (k) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera
is used must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that
clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where
traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera.
(((i))) (l) If a county or city has established an authorized
automated traffic safety camera program under this section, the
compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used
must be a fixed rate based only upon the value of the equipment and
services provided or rendered in support of the system, and may not be
based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the
revenue generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety
cameras under this section are traffic infractions. Infractions
detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not
part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and
46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated
traffic safety cameras under this section ((shall be processed in the
same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW
3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(3). However, the amount
of the fine issued for an infraction generated through the use of an
automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed the amount of a fine
issued for other parking infractions within the jurisdiction)) must not
be made available to the registered owner's insurance company or
employer.
(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) A notice of infraction is not valid under this section unless
all of the restrictions in this section have been met.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed
zone as detected by a speed measuring device. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, an automated traffic safety camera includes a camera
used to detect speed violations for the purposes of section 201(2),
chapter 470, Laws of 2009.
(((6))) (7) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, this section does
not apply to automated traffic safety cameras for the purposes of
section 218(2), chapter 470, Laws of 2009.

--- END ---