BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature intends to amend and
clarify the law on the medical use of cannabis so that:
(a) Qualifying patients and designated providers complying with the
terms of this act will no longer be subject to arrest or prosecution,
other criminal sanctions, or civil consequences based solely on their
medical use of cannabis;
(b) Qualifying patients will have access to an adequate, safe,
consistent, and secure source of medical quality cannabis; and
(c) Health care professionals may authorize the medical use of
cannabis in the manner provided by this act without fear of state
criminal or civil sanctions.
(2) This act is not intended to amend or supersede Washington state
law prohibiting the acquisition, possession, manufacture, sale, or use
of cannabis for nonmedical purposes.

Sec. 102 RCW 69.51A.005 and 2010 c 284 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((people of Washington state)) legislature finds that:
(a) There is medical evidence that some patients with terminal or
debilitating ((illnesses)) medical conditions may, under their health
care professional's care, ((may)) benefit from the medical use of
((marijuana)) cannabis. Some of the ((illnesses)) conditions for which
((marijuana)) cannabis appears to be beneficial include ((chemotherapy-related)), but are not limited to:
(i) Nausea ((and)), vomiting ((in cancer patients; AIDS wasting
syndrome)), and cachexia associated with cancer, HIV-positive status,
AIDS, hepatitis C, anorexia, and their treatments;
(ii) Severe muscle spasms associated with multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy, and other seizure and spasticity disorders; ((epilepsy;))
(iii) Acute or chronic glaucoma;
(iv) Crohn's disease; and
(v) Some forms of intractable pain.
((The people find that)) (b) Humanitarian compassion necessitates
that the decision to ((authorize the medical)) use ((of marijuana))
cannabis by patients with terminal or debilitating ((illnesses))
medical conditions is a personal, individual decision, based upon their
health care professional's professional medical judgment and
discretion.
(2) Therefore, the ((people of the state of Washington))
legislature intends that:
(a) Qualifying patients with terminal or debilitating ((illnesses))
medical conditions who, in the judgment of their health care
professionals, may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana))
cannabis, shall not be ((found guilty of a crime under state law for
their possession and limited use of marijuana)) arrested, prosecuted,
or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences under
state law based solely on their medical use of cannabis,
notwithstanding any other provision of law;
(b) Persons who act as designated providers to such patients shall
also not be ((found guilty of a crime under state law for)) arrested,
prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil
consequences under state law, notwithstanding any other provision of
law, based solely on their assisting with the medical use of
((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(c) Health care professionals shall also ((be excepted from
liability and prosecution)) not be arrested, prosecuted, or subject to
other criminal sanctions or civil consequences under state law for the
authorization of ((marijuana)) medical use ((to)) of cannabis by
qualifying patients for whom, in the health care professional's
professional judgment, the medical ((marijuana)) use of cannabis may
prove beneficial.

Sec. 103 RCW 69.51A.020 and 1999 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede Washington
state law prohibiting the acquisition, possession, manufacture, sale,
or use of ((marijuana)) cannabis for nonmedical purposes.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether
growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of
the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin. For the purposes of
this chapter, "cannabis" does not include the mature stalks of the
plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds
of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks, except the resin
extracted therefrom, fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the
plant which is incapable of germination. The term "cannabis" includes
cannabis products and useable cannabis.
(2) "Cannabis products" means products that contain cannabis or
cannabis extracts, have a measurable THC concentration greater than
three-tenths of one percent, and are intended for human consumption or
application, including, but not limited to, edible products, tinctures,
and lotions. The term "cannabis products" does not include useable
cannabis.
(3) "Designated provider" means a person who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Has been designated in ((writing)) a written document signed
and dated by a qualifying patient to serve as a designated provider
under this chapter; and
(c) Is ((prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the
personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is acting
as designated provider; and
(d) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.
(2))) in compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in RCW
69.51A.040.
A qualifying patient may be the designated provider for another
qualifying patient and be in possession of both patients' cannabis at
the same time.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture.
(5) "Dispense" means the selection, measuring, packaging, labeling,
delivery, or retail sale of cannabis by a licensed dispenser to a
qualifying patient or designated provider.
(6) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only,
means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians' assistant
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW.
(((3))) (7) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed,
or graphic matter (a) upon any cannabis intended for medical use, or
(b) accompanying such cannabis.
(8) "Licensed dispenser" means a nonprofit corporation organized
under chapter 24.03 RCW and licensed to dispense cannabis for medical
use to qualifying patients and designated providers by the department
of health in accordance with rules adopted by the department of health
pursuant to the terms of this chapter.
(9) "Licensed processor of cannabis products" means a person
licensed by the department of agriculture to manufacture, process,
handle, and label cannabis products for wholesale to licensed
dispensers.
(10) "Licensed producer" means a person licensed by the department
of agriculture to produce cannabis for medical use for wholesale to
licensed dispensers and licensed processors of cannabis products in
accordance with rules adopted by the department of agriculture pursuant
to the terms of this chapter.
(11) "Medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis" means the manufacture,
production, processing, possession, transportation, delivery,
dispensing, ingestion, application, or administration of ((marijuana,
as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q),)) cannabis for the exclusive benefit of
a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or her terminal or
debilitating ((illness)) medical condition.
(((4))) (12) "Nonresident" means a person who is temporarily in the
state but is not a Washington state resident.
(13) "Peace officer" means any law enforcement personnel as defined
in RCW 43.101.010.
(14) "Person" means an individual or an entity.
(15) "Plant" means an organism having at least three
distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three
centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation
consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at
least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the
same root ball or root system shall be considered part of the same
single plant.
(16) "Process" means to handle or process cannabis in preparation
for medical use.
(17) "Processing facility" means the premises and equipment where
cannabis products are manufactured, processed, handled, and labeled for
wholesale to licensed dispensers.
(18) "Produce" means to plant, grow, or harvest cannabis for
medical use.
(19) "Production facility" means the premises and equipment where
cannabis is planted, grown, harvested, processed, stored, handled,
packaged, or labeled by a licensed producer for wholesale, delivery, or
transportation to a licensed dispenser or licensed processor of
cannabis products, and all vehicles and equipment used to transport
cannabis from a licensed producer to a licensed dispenser or licensed
processor of cannabis products.
(20) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; premises where goods and services are offered
to the public for retail sale; public buildings, public meeting halls,
lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres,
stores, garages, and filling stations which are open to and are
generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to
have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, buses, ferries, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots,
stops, and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open
to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar
nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of access,
and which are generally used by the public.
(21) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a) Is a patient of a health care professional;
(b) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having
a terminal or debilitating medical condition;
(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such
diagnosis;
(d) Has been advised by that health care professional about the
risks and benefits of the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(e) Has been advised by that health care professional that ((they))
he or she may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis.
(((5))) (22) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(23) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or more of
the following industry-recognized features:
(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;
(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or
modification of information on the paper; or
(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit
valid documentation.
(((6))) (24) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain((, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications));
or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic((, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications)); or
(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms ((unrelieved by
standard treatments or medications)); or
(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain
((unrelieved by standard treatments or medications)); or
(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting,
((wasting)) cachexia, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms,
or spasticity((, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard
treatments or medications)); or
(g) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.
(((7))) (25) "THC concentration" means percent of
tetrahydrocannabinol content per weight or volume of useable cannabis
or cannabis product.
(26) "Useable cannabis" means dried flowers of the Cannabis plant
having a THC concentration greater than three-tenths of one percent.
Useable cannabis excludes stems, stalks, leaves, seeds, and roots. For
purposes of this subsection, "dried" means containing less than fifteen
percent moisture content by weight. The term "useable cannabis" does
not include cannabis products.
(27)(a) Until July 1, 2012, "valid documentation" means:
(((a))) (i) A statement signed and dated by a qualifying patient's
health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper, which
states that, in the health care professional's professional opinion,
the patient may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis;
((and
(b))) (ii) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's
license or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035; and
(iii) In the case of a designated provider, the signed and dated
document valid for one year from the date of signature executed by the
qualifying patient who has designated the provider; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, "valid documentation" means:
(i) An original statement signed and dated by a qualifying
patient's health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper
and valid for up to one year from the date of the health care
professional's signature, which states that, in the health care
professional's professional opinion, the patient may benefit from the
medical use of cannabis;
(ii) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035; and
(iii) In the case of a designated provider, the signed and dated
document valid for up to one year from the date of signature executed
by the qualifying patient who has designated the provider.

PART III
PROTECTIONS FOR HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS
Sec. 301 RCW 69.51A.030 and 2010 c 284 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A health care professional shall be excepted from the state's
criminal laws and shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied any
right or privilege, for)) The following acts do not constitute crimes
under state law or unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW, and
a health care professional may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted,
disciplined, or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil
consequences or liability under state law, or have real or personal
property searched, seized, or forfeited pursuant to state law,
notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) Advising a ((qualifying)) patient about the risks and benefits
of medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis or that the ((qualifying))
patient may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana where such use
is within a professional standard of care or in the individual health
care professional's medical judgment)) cannabis; or
(2) Providing a ((qualifying)) patient meeting the criteria
established under RCW 69.51A.010(21) with valid documentation, based
upon the health care professional's assessment of the ((qualifying))
patient's medical history and current medical condition, ((that the
medical use of marijuana may benefit a particular qualifying patient))
where such use is within a professional standard of care or in the
individual health care professional's medical judgment.

PART IV
PROTECTIONS FOR QUALIFYING PATIENTS AND DESIGNATED PROVIDERS
Sec. 401 RCW 69.51A.040 and 2007 c 371 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) If a law enforcement officer determines that marijuana is
being possessed lawfully under the medical marijuana law, the officer
may document the amount of marijuana, take a representative sample that
is large enough to test, but not seize the marijuana. A law
enforcement officer or agency shall not be held civilly liable for
failure to seize marijuana in this circumstance.
(2) If charged with a violation of state law relating to marijuana,
any qualifying patient who is engaged in the medical use of marijuana,
or any designated provider who assists a qualifying patient in the
medical use of marijuana, will be deemed to have established an
affirmative defense to such charges by proof of his or her compliance
with the requirements provided in this chapter. Any person meeting the
requirements appropriate to his or her status under this chapter shall
be considered to have engaged in activities permitted by this chapter
and shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, for such actions.
(3) A qualifying patient, if eighteen years of age or older, or a
designated provider shall:
(a) Meet all criteria for status as a qualifying patient or
designated provider;
(b) Possess no more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's
personal, medical use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply; and
(c) Present his or her valid documentation to any law enforcement
official who questions the patient or provider regarding his or her
medical use of marijuana.
(4) A qualifying patient, if under eighteen years of age at the
time he or she is alleged to have committed the offense, shall
demonstrate compliance with subsection (3)(a) and (c) of this section.
However, any possession under subsection (3)(b) of this section, as
well as any production, acquisition, and decision as to dosage and
frequency of use, shall be the responsibility of the parent or legal
guardian of the qualifying patient.)) The medical use of cannabis in
accordance with the terms and conditions of this chapter does not
constitute a crime and a qualifying patient or designated provider in
compliance with the terms and conditions of this chapter may not be
arrested, searched, prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions
or civil consequences under state law, or have real or personal
property searched, seized, or forfeited pursuant to state law, and
investigating peace officers and law enforcement agencies may not be
held civilly liable for failure to seize cannabis in this circumstance:
PROVIDED, That:
(1) The qualifying patient or designated provider possesses no more
than fifteen cannabis plants and no more than twenty-four ounces of
useable cannabis, no more cannabis product than reasonably could be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis, or
a combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that does not
exceed a combined total representing possession and processing of no
more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis, or if a person is
both a qualifying patient and a designated provider for another
qualifying patient, no more than twice these amounts, whether the
plants, useable cannabis, and cannabis product are possessed
individually or in combination between the qualifying patient and his
or her designated provider;
(2) The qualifying patient or designated provider presents his or
her valid documentation, or proof of registration with the department
of health, to any peace officer who questions the patient or provider
regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(3) The qualifying patient or designated provider keeps a copy of
his or her health care professional's authorizing statement and the
qualifying patient or designated provider's contact information posted
prominently next to any cannabis plants, cannabis products, or useable
cannabis located at his or her residence;
(4) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that
the designated provider has converted cannabis produced or obtained for
the qualifying patient for his or her own personal use or benefit; and
(5) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that
the designated provider has served as a designated provider to more
than one qualifying patient within a fifteen-day period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 (1) Qualifying patients may create and
participate in collective gardens for the purpose of producing,
processing, transporting, and delivering cannabis for medical use
subject to the following conditions:
(a) No more than twenty-five qualifying patients may participate in
a single collective garden at any time;
(b) A collective garden may contain no more than fifteen plants per
patient up to a total of ninety plants for six patients, and no more
than a total of ninety-nine plants if seven or more patients are
participating in the collective garden;
(c) No more than ninety-six ounces of useable cannabis may be on
the premises of a collective garden at any time;
(d) A copy of each qualifying patient's valid documentation,
including a copy of the patient's proof of identity, must be available
at all times on the premises of the collective garden; and
(e) No useable cannabis from the collective garden is delivered to
anyone other than one of the qualifying patients participating in the
collective garden.
(2) For purposes of this section, the creation of a "collective
garden" means qualifying patients sharing responsibility for acquiring
and supplying the resources required to produce and process cannabis
for medical use such as, for example, a location for a collective
garden; equipment, supplies, and labor necessary to plant, grow, and
harvest cannabis; cannabis plants, seeds, and cuttings; and equipment,
supplies, and labor necessary for proper construction, plumbing,
wiring, and ventilation of a garden of cannabis plants.
(3) A person who knowingly violates a provision of subsection (1)
of this section is not entitled to the protections of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) A qualifying patient may revoke his or
her designation of a specific provider and designate a different
provider at any time. A revocation of designation must be in writing,
signed and dated. The protections of this chapter cease to apply to a
person who has served as a designated provider to a qualifying patient
seventy-two hours after receipt of that patient's revocation of his or
her designation.
(2) A person may stop serving as a designated provider to a given
qualifying patient at any time. However, that person may not begin
serving as a designated provider to a different qualifying patient
until fifteen days have elapsed from the date the last qualifying
patient designated him or her to serve as a provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A qualifying patient or designated
provider in possession of cannabis plants, useable cannabis, or
cannabis product exceeding the limits set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1)
but otherwise in compliance with all other terms and conditions of this
chapter may establish an affirmative defense to charges of violations
of state law relating to cannabis through proof at trial, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the qualifying patient's necessary
medical use exceeds the amounts set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1). An
investigating peace officer may seize cannabis plants, useable
cannabis, or cannabis product exceeding the amounts set forth in RCW
69.51A.040(1): PROVIDED, That in the case of cannabis plants, the
qualifying patient or designated provider shall be allowed to select
the plants that will remain at the location. The officer and his or
her law enforcement agency may not be held civilly liable for failure
to seize cannabis in this circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 A qualifying patient or designated
provider who does not present his or her valid documentation, or proof
of registration with the department of health, to a peace officer who
questions the patient or provider regarding his or her medical use of
cannabis but is in compliance with all other terms and conditions of
this chapter may establish an affirmative defense to charges of
violations of state law relating to cannabis through proof at trial, by
a preponderance of the evidence, that he or she was a validly
authorized qualifying patient or designated provider at the time of the
officer's questioning. A qualifying patient or designated provider who
establishes an affirmative defense under the terms of this section may
also establish an affirmative defense under section 404 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 A nonresident who is duly authorized to
engage in the medical use of cannabis under the laws of another state
or territory of the United States may raise an affirmative defense to
charges of violations of Washington state law relating to cannabis,
provided that the nonresident:
(1) Possesses no more than fifteen cannabis plants and no more than
twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis, no more cannabis product than
reasonably could be produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of
useable cannabis, or a combination of useable cannabis and cannabis
product that does not exceed a combined total representing possession
and processing of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(2) Is in compliance with all provisions of this chapter other than
requirements relating to being a Washington resident or possessing
valid documentation issued by a licensed health care professional in
Washington; and
(3) Presents the documentation of authorization required under the
nonresident's authorizing state or territory's law and proof of
identity issued by the authorizing state or territory to any peace
officer who questions the nonresident regarding his or her medical use
of cannabis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 A qualifying patient's medical use of
cannabis as authorized by a health care professional may not be a sole
disqualifying factor in determining the patient's suitability for an
organ transplant, unless it is shown that this use poses a significant
risk of rejection or organ failure. This section does not preclude a
health care professional from requiring that a patient abstain from the
medical use of cannabis, for a period of time determined by the health
care professional, while waiting for a transplant organ or before the
patient undergoes an organ transplant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A qualifying patient or designated
provider may not have his or her parental rights or residential time
with a child restricted solely due to his or her medical use of
cannabis in compliance with the terms of this chapter absent written
findings supported by evidence that such use has resulted in a long-term impairment that interferes with the performance of parenting
functions as defined under RCW 26.09.004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 (1) A qualifying patient may not be
refused employment, discharged from employment, or discriminated
against in compensation or in other terms or conditions of employment
solely as a result of his or her off-site medical use of cannabis:
PROVIDED, That:
(a) The employer is not a federal contractor or grant recipient
under the drug-free workplace act (41 U.S.C. 701 et seq.);
(b) The particular employment does not involve:
(i) Public safety responsibilities;
(ii) Handling dangerous substances;
(iii) Hazardous physical activities;
(iv) Routine operation of motor vehicles, heavy equipment, or
portable power tools falling within the scope of chapter 296-807 WAC;
or
(v) Routine performance of other safety-sensitive activities; or
(c) The off-site medical use of cannabis by a particular employee
does not prevent the proper performance of his or her work.
(2) A qualifying patient deeming himself or herself injured by any
act in violation of this section is entitled to pursue the remedies and
enforcement procedures provided under chapter 49.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 A qualifying patient may not be refused or
evicted from housing solely as a result of his or her possession or use
of useable cannabis or cannabis products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 In imposing any criminal sentence,
deferred prosecution, stipulated order of continuance, deferred
disposition, or dispositional order, any court organized under the laws
of Washington state may permit the medical use of cannabis in
compliance with the terms of this chapter and exclude it as a possible
ground for finding that the offender has violated the conditions or
requirements of the sentence, deferred prosecution, stipulated order of
continuance, deferred disposition, or dispositional order. This
section does not require the accommodation of any on-site medical use
of cannabis in any correctional facility.

Sec. 412 RCW 69.51A.050 and 1999 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The lawful possession, delivery, dispensing, production, or
manufacture of ((medical marijuana)) cannabis for medical use as
authorized by this chapter shall not result in the forfeiture or
seizure of any real or personal property including, but not limited to,
cannabis intended for medical use, items used to facilitate the medical
use of cannabis or its production or dispensing for medical use, or
proceeds of sales of cannabis for medical use made by licensed
producers, licensed processors of cannabis products, or licensed
dispensers.
(2) No person shall be prosecuted for constructive possession,
conspiracy, or any other criminal offense solely for being in the
presence or vicinity of ((medical marijuana)) cannabis intended for
medical use or its use as authorized by this chapter.
(3) The state shall not be held liable for any deleterious outcomes
from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis by any qualifying
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 Nothing in this chapter or in the rules
adopted to implement it precludes a qualifying patient or designated
provider from engaging in the private, unlicensed, noncommercial
production, possession, transportation, delivery, or administration of
cannabis for medical use as authorized under RCW 69.51A.040.

PART V
LIMITATIONS ON PROTECTIONS FOR QUALIFYING
PATIENTS AND DESIGNATED PROVIDERS
Sec. 501 RCW 69.51A.060 and 2010 c 284 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((It shall be a misdemeanor to use or display medical marijuana
in a manner or place which is open to the view of the general public.))
It is unlawful to open a package containing cannabis or consume
cannabis in a public place in a manner that presents a reasonably
foreseeable risk that another person would see and be able to identify
the substance contained in the package or being consumed as cannabis.
A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a class
3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. This subsection does not
apply to licensed dispensers or their employees, members, officers, or
directors displaying cannabis to customers on their licensed premises
as long as such displays are not visible to members of the public
standing or passing outside the premises.
(2) Nothing in this chapter requires any health insurance provider
to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the medical use of
((marijuana)) cannabis.
(3) Nothing in this chapter requires any health care professional
to authorize the medical use of ((medical marijuana)) cannabis for a
patient.
(4) Nothing in this chapter requires any accommodation of any on-site medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis in any place of employment,
in any school bus or on any school grounds, in any youth center, in any
correctional facility, or smoking ((medical marijuana)) cannabis in any
public place as that term is defined in RCW 70.160.020.
(5) It is a class C felony to fraudulently produce any record
purporting to be, or tamper with the content of any record for the
purpose of having it accepted as, valid documentation under RCW
69.51A.010(((7))) (27)(a), or to backdate such documentation to a time
earlier than its actual date of execution.
(6) ((No person shall be entitled to claim the affirmative defense
provided in RCW 69.51A.040 for engaging)) The fact that a qualifying
patient has been authorized to engage in the medical use of ((marijuana
in a way that endangers the health or well-being of any person through
the use of a motorized vehicle on a street, road, or highway)) cannabis
does not constitute a defense against a charge of violating RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504.

PART VI
LICENSED PRODUCERS AND LICENSED PROCESSORS OF CANNABIS PRODUCTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A person may not act as a licensed
producer without a license for each production facility issued by the
department of agriculture. Provided they are acting in compliance with
the terms of this chapter and rules adopted to enforce and carry out
its purposes, licensed producers and their employees, members,
officers, and directors may manufacture, plant, cultivate, grow,
harvest, produce, prepare, propagate, process, package, repackage,
transport, transfer, deliver, label, relabel, wholesale, or possess
cannabis intended for medical use by qualifying patients, including
seeds, seedlings, cuttings, plants, and useable cannabis, and may not
be arrested, searched, prosecuted, or subject to other criminal
sanctions or civil consequences under state law, or have real or
personal property searched, seized, or forfeited pursuant to state law,
for such activities, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A person may not act as a licensed
processor without a license for each processing facility issued by the
department of agriculture. Provided they are acting in compliance with
the terms of this chapter and rules adopted to enforce and carry out
its purposes, licensed processors of cannabis products and their
employees, members, officers, and directors may possess useable
cannabis and manufacture, produce, prepare, process, package,
repackage, transport, transfer, deliver, label, relabel, wholesale, or
possess cannabis products intended for medical use by qualifying
patients, and may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted, or subject to
other criminal sanctions or civil consequences under state law, or have
real or personal property searched, seized, or forfeited pursuant to
state law, for such activities, notwithstanding any other provision of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 The director shall administer and carry
out the provisions of this chapter relating to licensed producers and
licensed processors of cannabis products, and rules adopted hereunder,
and he or she may:
(1) Inspect the production, processing, weighing, packaging,
labeling, storage, and shipping of cannabis produced and processed by
licensees;
(2) Inspect and grade cannabis produced and processed by licensees;
(3) Approve or disapprove the facilities, including scales, of all
licensed producers and licensed processors of cannabis products;
(4) Investigate all complaints of fraud in the operation of any
licensed producer, licensed processor of cannabis products, production
facility, or processing facility;
(5) Examine, inspect, and audit, during ordinary business hours,
any producer or processor licensed under this chapter, including all
production facilities, processing facilities, and all cannabis therein
and examine, inspect, audit, or record all books, documents, and
records;
(6) Administer oaths and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance
of witnesses, or the production of books, documents, and records
anywhere in the state pursuant to a hearing relative to the purposes
and provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees
for attendance and travel, as provided in chapter 2.40 RCW;
(7) Adopt rules establishing inspection standards and procedures
for cannabis intended for medical use;
(8) Adopt rules regarding the identification of cannabis intended
for medical use so that such cannabis may be readily identified if
stolen or removed in violation of the provisions of this chapter from
a production or processing facility, or if otherwise unlawfully
transported;
(9) Adopt all the necessary rules for carrying out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 The director is authorized to deny,
suspend, or revoke a producer's or processor's license after a hearing
in any case in which it is determined that there has been a violation
or refusal to comply with the requirements of this chapter or rules
adopted hereunder. All hearings for the denial, suspension, or
revocation of a producer's or processor's license are subject to
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, as enacted or
hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 (1) By July 1, 2012, taking into
consideration, but not being limited by, the security requirements
described in 21 C.F.R. Sec. 1301.71-1301.76, the director shall adopt
rules:
(a) Prescribing grades and standards which he or she deems suitable
for inspection of cannabis intended for medical use in the state of
Washington;
(b) Providing for inspection or grading and certification of grade,
grading factors, condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, or
other qualitative measurement of cannabis intended for medical use;
(c) Fixing the sizes, dimensions, and safety and security features
required of containers to be used for packing, handling, or storing
cannabis intended for medical use;
(d) Establishing labeling requirements for cannabis intended for
medical use including information on whether the cannabis was grown
using organic, inorganic, or synthetic fertilizers;
(e) Establishing requirements for the licensure of producers, and
processors of cannabis products, setting forth procedures to obtain
licenses, and determining expiration dates and renewal requirements;
(f) Providing for mandatory inspection of production and processing
facilities;
(g) Establishing requirements for transportation of cannabis
intended for medical use from production facilities to processing
facilities and licensed dispensers;
(h) Enforcing and carrying out the provisions of this section and
the rules adopted to carry out its purposes; and
(i) Establishing license application and renewal fees adequate to
recapture the cost to the state of implementing, maintaining, and
enforcing the provisions of this section and section 902 of this act
and the rules adopted to carry out their purposes. Such fees shall
reflect a range of classes of licenses, varying in proportion to
revenues received by the licensees.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
agricultural local fund created in RCW 43.23.230.
(3) During the rule-making process, the department of agriculture
shall consult with stakeholders and persons with relevant expertise, to
include but not be limited to qualifying patients, designated
providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement
agencies, and the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 (1) Each licensed producer and licensed
processor of cannabis products shall maintain complete records at all
times with respect to all cannabis produced, processed, weighed,
tested, stored, shipped, or sold. The director shall adopt rules
specifying the minimum recordkeeping requirements necessary to comply
with this section.
(2) The property, books, records, accounts, papers, and proceedings
of every licensed producer and licensed processor of cannabis products
shall be subject to inspection by the department of agriculture at any
time during ordinary business hours. Licensed producers and licensed
processors of cannabis products shall maintain adequate records and
systems for the filing and accounting of crop production, product
manufacturing and processing, records of weights and measurements,
product testing, receipts, canceled receipts, other documents, and
transactions necessary or common to the medical cannabis industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 Each licensed producer and licensed
processor of cannabis products shall report information to the
department of agriculture at such times and as may be reasonably
required by the director for the necessary enforcement and supervision
of a sound, reasonable, and efficient cannabis inspection program for
the protection of the health and welfare of qualifying patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 The production facilities of a licensed
producer, and processing facilities of a licensed processor of cannabis
products, shall be maintained in a manner that will provide a
reasonable means of ingress and egress to all areas and equipment, and
an adequate facility to complete the inspections shall be provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 (1) The department of agriculture may give
written notice to a licensed producer or processor of cannabis products
to submit to inspection, or furnish required reports, documents, or
other requested information, under such conditions and at such time as
the department of agriculture may deem necessary whenever a licensed
producer or processor of cannabis products fails to:
(a) Submit his or her books, papers, or property to lawful
inspection or audit;
(b) Submit required reports or documents to the department of
agriculture by their due date; or
(c) Furnish the department of agriculture with requested
information.
(2) If the licensed producer or processor of cannabis products
fails to comply with the terms of the notice within seventy-two hours
from the date of its issuance, or within such further time as the
department of agriculture may allow, the department of agriculture
shall levy a fine of five hundred dollars per day from the final date
for compliance allowed by this section or the department of
agriculture. In those cases where the failure to comply continues for
more than seven days or where the director determines the failure to
comply creates a threat to public health, public safety, or a
substantial risk of diversion of cannabis to unauthorized persons or
purposes, the department of agriculture may, in lieu of levying further
fines, petition the superior court of the county where the licensee's
principal place of business in Washington is located, as shown by the
license application, for an order:
(a) Authorizing the department of agriculture to seize and take
possession of all books, papers, cannabis, and property of all kinds
used in connection with the conduct or the operation of the licensed
producer or processor's business, and the books, papers, records, and
property that pertain specifically, exclusively, and directly to that
business; and
(b) Enjoining the licensed producer or processor from interfering
with the department of agriculture in the discharge of its duties as
required by this chapter.
(3) All necessary costs and expenses, including attorneys' fees,
incurred by the department of agriculture in carrying out the
provisions of this section may be recovered at the same time and as
part of the action filed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 Samples of cannabis drawn by department of
agriculture inspectors, unless returned by agreement to the producer or
applicant for a license to produce, or to the processor or applicant
for a license to process cannabis products, shall become the property
of the state and subject to disposition by the department of
agriculture. The department of agriculture must adopt rules relating
to sample retention and disposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 (1) A licensed producer may not sell or
deliver cannabis to any person other than a department of agriculture
inspector, licensed processor of cannabis products, licensed dispenser,
or law enforcement officer except as provided by court order.
Violation of this section is a class C felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) A licensed processor of cannabis products may not sell or
deliver cannabis to any person other than a department of agriculture
inspector, licensed dispenser, or law enforcement officer except as
provided by court order. Violation of this section is a class C felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

PART VII
LICENSED DISPENSERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A person may not act as a licensed
dispenser without a license for each place of business issued by the
department of health. Provided they are acting in compliance with the
terms of this chapter and rules adopted to enforce and carry out its
purposes, licensed dispensers and their employees, members, officers,
and directors may deliver, distribute, dispense, transfer, prepare,
package, repackage, label, relabel, sell at retail, or possess cannabis
intended for medical use by qualifying patients, including seeds,
seedlings, cuttings, plants, useable cannabis, and cannabis products,
and may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted, or subject to other
criminal sanctions or civil consequences under state law, or have real
or personal property searched, seized, or forfeited pursuant to state
law, for such activities, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 (1) By July 1, 2012, taking into
consideration the security requirements described in 21 C.F.R. 1301.71-1301.76, the secretary shall adopt rules:
(a) Establishing requirements for the licensure of dispensers of
cannabis for medical use, setting forth procedures to obtain licenses,
and determining expiration dates and renewal requirements;
(b) Providing for mandatory inspection of licensed dispensers'
locations;
(c) Establishing procedures governing the suspension and revocation
of licenses of dispensers;
(d) Establishing recordkeeping requirements for licensed
dispensers;
(e) Fixing the sizes and dimensions of containers to be used for
dispensing cannabis for medical use;
(f) Establishing safety standards for containers to be used for
dispensing cannabis for medical use;
(g) Establishing cannabis storage requirements, including security
requirements;
(h) Establishing cannabis labeling requirements, to include
information on whether the cannabis was grown using organic, inorganic,
or synthetic fertilizers;
(i) Establishing physical standards for cannabis dispensing
facilities;
(j) Establishing physical standards for sanitary conditions for
cannabis dispensing facilities;
(k) Establishing physical and sanitation standards for cannabis
dispensing equipment;
(l) Enforcing and carrying out the provisions of this section and
the rules adopted to carry out its purposes; and
(m) Establishing license application and renewal fees adequate to
recapture the cost to the state of implementing, maintaining, and
enforcing the provisions of this section and section 903 of this act
and the rules adopted to carry out their purposes, pursuant to the
secretary's authority under RCW 43.70.250. Such fees shall reflect a
range of classes of licenses, varying in proportion to revenues
received by the licensees.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
health professions account created in RCW 43.70.320.
(3) During the rule-making process, the department of health shall
consult with stakeholders and persons with relevant expertise, to
include but not be limited to qualifying patients, designated
providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement
agencies, and the department of agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of useable
cannabis or cannabis products intended for medical use that are
dispensed to qualifying patients or designated providers by dispensers
licensed under chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to carry out
its purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A licensed dispenser may not sell cannabis
received from any person other than a licensed producer or licensed
processor of cannabis products, or sell or deliver cannabis to any
person other than a qualifying patient, designated provider, or
licensed producer except as provided by court order. Violation of this
section is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS APPLYING TO ALL
LICENSED PRODUCERS, PROCESSORS, AND DISPENSERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 All weighing and measuring instruments and
devices used by licensed producers, processors of cannabis products,
and dispensers shall comply with the requirements set forth in chapter
19.94 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 (1) No licensed producer, processor of
cannabis products, or dispenser may advertise cannabis for sale to the
general public on broadcast television or radio or on a billboard in
any manner that promotes or tends to promote the use or abuse of
cannabis. For the purposes of this subsection, displaying cannabis,
including artistic depictions of cannabis, is considered to promote or
to tend to promote the use or abuse of cannabis.
(2) The department of agriculture may fine a licensed producer or
processor of cannabis products up to one thousand dollars for each
violation of subsection (1) of this section. Fines collected under
this subsection must be deposited into the agriculture local fund
created in RCW 43.23.230.
(3) The department of health may fine a licensed dispenser up to
one thousand dollars for each violation of subsection (1) of this
section. Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into
the health professions account created in RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 A prior conviction for a cannabis or
marijuana offense may not disqualify an applicant from receiving a
license to produce, process, or dispense cannabis for medical use,
provided the conviction did not include any sentencing enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 or analogous laws in other jurisdictions. Any
criminal conviction of a current licensee may be considered in
proceedings to suspend or revoke a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 A violation of any provision or section of
this chapter that relates to the licensing and regulation of producers,
processors, or dispensers, where no other penalty is provided for, and
the violation of any rule adopted under this chapter constitutes a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 (1) Every licensed producer or processor
of cannabis products who fails to comply with this chapter, or any rule
adopted under it, may be subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by
the director, in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for
every such violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct
offense.
(2) Every licensed dispenser who fails to comply with this chapter,
or any rule adopted under it, may be subjected to a civil penalty, as
determined by the secretary, in an amount of not more than one thousand
dollars for every such violation. Each violation shall be a separate
and distinct offense.
(3) Every person who, through an act of commission or omission,
procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have
violated this chapter and may be subject to the penalty provided for in
this section.

PART IX
SECURE REGISTRATION OF QUALIFYING PATIENTS, DESIGNATED PROVIDERS,
AND LICENSED PRODUCERS, PROCESSORS, AND DISPENSERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) By July 1, 2012, the department of
health shall adopt rules for the creation, implementation, maintenance,
and timely upgrading of a secure and confidential registration system
that allows:
(a) A peace officer to verify at any time whether a health care
professional has registered a person who has been contacted by that
peace officer and has provided that peace officer information necessary
to verify his or her registration as either a qualifying patient or a
designated provider; and
(b) A peace officer to verify at any time during ordinary business
hours of the department of health whether a health care professional
has registered a person as either a qualifying patient or a designated
provider, or an address as the primary residence of a qualifying
patient or designated provider.
(2) Law enforcement shall comply with Article I, section 7 of the
Washington state Constitution when accessing the registration system
for criminal investigations, which, at a minimum, requires an
articulated individualized suspicion of criminal activity.
(3) Registration in the system shall be optional for qualifying
patients and designated providers, not mandatory. Registrations are
valid for one year. The department of health must adopt rules
providing for registration renewals and for removing expired
registrations from the registry.
(4) Fees, including renewal fees, for qualifying patients and
designated providers participating in the registration system shall be
adequate to recapture the cost to the state of implementing,
maintaining, and enforcing the provisions of this section and the rules
adopted to carry out its purposes. Reduced fees shall be offered on an
income-based sliding scale.
(5) During the rule-making process, the department of health shall
consult with stakeholders and persons with relevant expertise, to
include but not be limited to qualifying patients, designated
providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement
agencies, and the University of Washington computer science and
engineering security and privacy research lab.
(6) The registration system shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registration system must be "nonreversible," pursuant to definitions
and standards set forth by the national institute of standards and
technology;
(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registration system must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data
external to the registration system;
(c) The registration system must incorporate current best
differential privacy practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of
registration system queries while minimizing the chances of identifying
the personally identifiable information included therein; and
(d) The registration system must be upgradable and updated in a
timely fashion to keep current with state of the art privacy and
security standards and practices.
(7) The registration system shall maintain a log of each
verification query submitted by a peace officer, including the peace
officer's name, agency, and identification number, for a period of no
less than three years from the date of the query. Personally
identifiable information of qualifying patients and designated
providers included in the log shall be confidential and exempt from
public disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW:
PROVIDED, That:
(a) The subject of a registration query may appear during ordinary
department of health business hours and inspect or copy log records
relating to him or her upon adequate proof of identity; or
(b) The subject of a registration query may submit a written
request to the department of health, along with adequate proof of
identity, for copies of log records relating to him or her.
(8) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
health professions account under RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 The department of agriculture shall, in
consultation with the department of health:
(1) Create and maintain a secure and confidential list of the
persons to whom it has issued a license to produce cannabis for medical
use or a license to process cannabis products that meets the
requirements set forth in section 901(6) of this act.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the list shall be
confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(b) Names and other personally identifiable information from the
list may be released only to:
(i) Authorized employees of the department of agriculture as
necessary to perform official duties of the department of agriculture;
or
(ii) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement
agencies, only as necessary to verify that a person is a licensed
producer or processor of cannabis products, or that a location is the
recorded address of a production or processing facility owned or
operated by a licensed producer or processor, and only after the
inquiring state or local law enforcement employee has provided adequate
identification;
(2) Develop a secure and confidential system by which authorized
employees of state and local law enforcement agencies may verify at all
times, after providing adequate identification, that a person is a
licensed producer or processor of cannabis products, or that a location
is the recorded address of a production or processing facility owned or
operated by a licensed producer or processor;
(3) Maintain a log of all requests by employees of state and local
law enforcement agencies, including the employee's name, agency, and
identification number, for information relating to whether a person is
a licensed producer or processor of cannabis products, or that a
location is the recorded address of a production or processing facility
owned or operated by a licensed producer or processor, and the
information supplied, for a period of no less than three years from the
date of the request. Personally identifiable information of licensed
producers and processors of cannabis products included in the log shall
be confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or
copying under chapter 42.56 RCW, provided that:
(a) The subject of a request for information may appear during
ordinary department of agriculture business hours and inspect or copy
log records relating to him or her upon adequate proof of identity; or
(b) The subject of a request for information may submit a written
request to the department of agriculture, along with adequate proof of
identity, for copies of log records relating to him or her;
(4)(a) Establish and collect reasonable fees for the dissemination
of information to employees of state and local law enforcement agencies
relating to whether a person is a licensed producer or processor of
cannabis products, or that a location is the recorded address of a
production or processing facility owned or operated by a licensed
producer or processor, and for the dissemination of log records
relating to such requests for information to the subjects of those
requests. Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
agricultural local fund created in RCW 43.23.230.
(b) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement agencies
who obtain personally identifiable information from the list as
authorized under this section may not release or use the information
for any purpose other than verification that a person is a licensed
producer or processor of cannabis products, or that a location is the
recorded address of a production or processing facility owned or
operated by a licensed producer or processor.
(5) This section does not prohibit a department of agriculture
employee from contacting state or local law enforcement for assistance
during an emergency or while performing his or her duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 The department of health shall:
(1) Create and maintain a secure and confidential list of the
persons to whom it has issued a license to dispense cannabis for
medical use that meets the requirements set forth in section 901(6) of
this act.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the list shall be
confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(b) Names and other personally identifiable information from the
list may be released only to:
(i) Authorized employees of the department of health as necessary
to perform official duties of the department of health; or
(ii) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement
agencies, only as necessary to verify that a person is a licensed
dispenser, or that a location is the recorded address of a licensed
dispenser, and only after the inquiring state or local law enforcement
employee has provided adequate identification;
(2) Develop a secure and confidential system by which authorized
employees of state and local law enforcement agencies may verify at all
times, after providing adequate identification, that a person is a
licensed dispenser, or that a location is the recorded address of a
licensed dispenser;
(3) Maintain a log of all requests by employees of state and local
law enforcement agencies, including the employee's name, agency, and
identification number, for information relating to whether a person is
a licensed dispenser, or that a location is the recorded address of a
licensed dispenser, and the information supplied, for a period of no
less than three years from the date of the request. Personally
identifiable information of licensed dispensers included in the log
shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or
copying under chapter 42.56 RCW: PROVIDED, That:
(a) The subject of a request for information may appear during
ordinary department of health business hours and inspect or copy log
records relating to him or her upon adequate proof of identity; or
(b) The subject of a request for information may submit a written
request to the department of health, along with adequate proof of
identity, for copies of log records relating to him or her;
(4)(a) Establish and collect reasonable fees for the dissemination
of information to employees of state and local law enforcement agencies
relating to whether a person is a licensed dispenser, or that a
location is the recorded address of a licensed dispenser, and for the
dissemination of log records relating to such requests for information
to the subjects of those requests. Fees collected under this section
must be deposited into the health professions account created in RCW
43.70.320.
(b) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement agencies
who obtain personally identifiable information from the list as
authorized under this section may not release or use the information
for any purpose other than verification that a person is a licensed
dispenser, or that a location is the recorded address of a licensed
dispenser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 (1) Before making a warrantless arrest or
warrantless search or seizure based on probable cause, a peace officer
investigating a cannabis-related incident shall ascertain whether the
person or location under investigation is registered with: The
department of health as a qualifying patient, designated provider,
licensed dispenser, or primary residence of a qualifying patient or
designated provider; or the department of agriculture as a licensed
producer, processor of cannabis products, production facility, or
processing facility. Registered persons may not be arrested or
searched, or have personal property searched or seized, and registered
locations may not be searched or seized, unless evidence exists of
conduct that would disqualify the person from the protections of this
chapter, or probable cause exists that another criminal offense has
been or is being committed.
(2) Before seeking a search warrant or arrest warrant, a peace
officer investigating a cannabis-related incident shall ascertain
whether the location or person under investigation is registered with:
The department of health as a qualifying patient, designated provider
or licensed dispenser, or primary residence of a qualifying patient or
designated provider; or the department of agriculture as a licensed
producer, processor of cannabis products, production facility, or
processing facility. If either department reports that the location or
person is registered, the peace officer may not seek a warrant, unless
evidence exists of conduct that would disqualify the location or person
from the protections of this chapter, or probable cause exists that
another criminal offense has been or is being committed. If the
officer seeks a warrant, the affidavit submitted in support of the
application for the warrant shall include that registration checks were
conducted with the appropriate department, and the results of such
checks.
(3) If a peace officer discovers cannabis at a location outside
ordinary business hours of the department of health, and no person is
present to provide information allowing the officer to ascertain
whether the location is the primary residence of a registered
qualifying patient or designated provider, the officer shall make
reasonable efforts to contact the occupant of the location before
seizing cannabis that falls within the limits described in RCW
69.51A.040. For the purposes of this section, reasonable efforts
include, at a minimum, attempting to contact the qualifying patient or
designated provider using the contact information required by RCW
69.51A.040(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 (1) Any person who discloses,
disseminates, or allows to be inspected or copied personally
identifiable information of a qualifying patient, designated provider,
licensed producer, licensed processor of cannabis products, or licensed
dispenser contained in a registry or licensing record, except as
authorized by this chapter, shall pay a civil penalty of five hundred
dollars to the subject of the record containing the personally
identifiable information. This penalty applies separately to each such
disclosure, dissemination, inspection, or copying of the record.
(2) Any peace officer who fails to comply with the requirements of
section 904 of this act shall pay a civil penalty of five hundred
dollars to any qualifying patient, designated provider, licensed
producer, licensed processor of cannabis products, or licensed
dispenser who is arrested or searched, or who has real or personal
property searched or seized, if such person was currently registered at
the time of the arrest, search, or seizure, no evidence existed at the
time of conduct that would disqualify the person from the protections
of this chapter, and no probable cause existed at the time that another
criminal offense had been or was being committed.
(3) A qualifying patient, designated provider, licensed producer,
licensed processor of cannabis products, or licensed dispenser deeming
himself or herself injured by any act subject to the penalties of this
section shall be entitled to bring a civil action to pursue the
remedies provided by this section. A plaintiff who prevails on a claim
brought under this section shall be entitled to recover reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs. A defendant who prevails is not allowed to
recover fees or costs unless the defendant proves, by a preponderance
of the evidence, that the plaintiff initiated the action in bad faith
or without any evidence whatsoever that would support a reasonable
belief that he or she was entitled to the remedies provided in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 A new section is added to chapter 42.56
RCW to read as follows:
Records containing names and other personally identifiable
information relating to qualifying patients, designated providers, and
persons licensed as producers or dispensers of cannabis for medical
use, or as processors of cannabis products, under chapter 69.51A RCW
and rules adopted to carry out its purposes are exempt from disclosure
under this chapter.

PART X
EVALUATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 (1) By July 1, 2014, the Washington state
institute for public policy shall, within available funds, conduct a
cost-benefit evaluation of the implementation of this act and the rules
adopted to carry out its purposes.
(2) The evaluation of the implementation of this act and the rules
adopted to carry out its purposes shall include, but not necessarily be
limited to, consideration of the following factors:
(a) Qualifying patients' access to an adequate source of cannabis
for medical use;
(b) Qualifying patients' access to a safe source of cannabis for
medical use;
(c) Qualifying patients' access to a consistent source of cannabis
for medical use;
(d) Qualifying patients' access to a secure source of cannabis for
medical use;
(e) Qualifying patients' and designated providers' contact with law
enforcement and involvement in the criminal justice system;
(f) Diversion of cannabis intended for medical use to nonmedical
uses; and
(g) Incidents of home invasion burglaries, robberies, and other
violent and property crimes associated with qualifying patients
accessing cannabis for medical use.
(3) For purposes of facilitating this evaluation, the departments
of health and agriculture will make available to the Washington state
institute for public policy requested data, and any other data either
department may consider relevant, from which all personally
identifiable information has been redacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20
RCW to read as follows:
The University of Washington may conduct scientific research on the
efficacy and safety of administering cannabis as part of medical
treatment. As part of this research, the University of Washington may
develop and conduct studies to ascertain the general medical safety and
efficacy of cannabis and may develop medical guidelines for the
appropriate administration and use of cannabis.

PART XI
CONSTRUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 The state of Washington fully occupies
and preempts the entire field of authorizing and regulating the
production, processing, dispensing, possession, and use of cannabis for
medical purposes. Cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities
may enact only those laws, ordinances, regulations, and rules relating
to the medical use of cannabis that are consistent with this chapter
and state administrative rules adopted pursuant to it. Local laws,
ordinances, regulations, and rules that are inconsistent with the
requirements of state law and regulations adopted pursuant to this
chapter may not be enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless
of the nature of the code, charter, or home rule status of the city,
town, county, or municipality. This section does not preempt
reasonable zoning requirements for licensed producers, licensed
processors of cannabis products, and licensed dispensers that are
adopted by cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities pursuant
to their authority and duties under chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 If any provision of this act or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act
that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

Sec. 1103 RCW 69.51A.900 and 1999 c 2 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state medical
use of ((marijuana)) cannabis act.

PART XII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201 (1) The legislature recognizes that there
are cannabis producers and cannabis dispensaries in operation as of the
effective date of this section that are unregulated by the state and
who produce and dispense cannabis for medical use by qualifying
patients. The legislature intends that these producers and
dispensaries become licensed in accordance with the requirements of
this chapter and that this licensing provides them with arrest
protection so long as they remain in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. The
legislature further recognizes that cannabis producers and cannabis
dispensaries in current operation are not able to become licensed until
the department of agriculture and the department of health adopt rules
and, consequently, it is likely they will remain unlicensed until at
least July 1, 2012. These producers and dispensary owners and
operators run the risk of arrest between the effective date of this
section and the time they become licensed. Therefore, the legislature
intends to provide them with an affirmative defense if they meet the
requirements of this section.
(2) If charged with a violation of state law relating to cannabis,
a producer of cannabis or a dispensary and its owners and operators
that are engaged in the production or dispensing of cannabis to a
qualifying patient or who assists a qualifying patient in the medical
use of cannabis is deemed to have established an affirmative defense to
such charges by proof of compliance with this section.
(3) In order to assert an affirmative defense under this section,
a cannabis producer or cannabis dispensary must:
(a) In the case of producers, solely provide cannabis to cannabis
dispensaries for the medical use of cannabis by qualified patients;
(b) In the case of dispensaries, solely provide cannabis to
qualified patients for their medical use;
(c) Be registered with the secretary of state as of January 1,
2011;
(d) File a letter of intent with the department of agriculture or
the department of health, as the case may be, asserting that the
producer or dispenser intends to become licensed in accordance with
this chapter and rules adopted by the appropriate department; and
(e) File a letter of intent with the city clerk if in an
incorporated area or to the county clerk if in an unincorporated area
stating they operate as a producer or dispensary and that they comply
with the provisions of this chapter and will comply with subsequent
department rule making.
(4) Upon receiving a letter of intent under subsection (3) of this
section, the department of agriculture, the department of health, and
the city clerk or county clerk must send a letter of acknowledgment to
the producer or dispenser. The producer and dispenser must display
this letter of acknowledgment in a prominent place in their facility.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202 RCW 69.51A.080 (Adoption of rules by the
department of health -- Sixty-day supply for qualifying patients) and
2007 c 371 s 8 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1203 Sections 402 through 411, 413, 601
through 611, 701, 702, 704, 801 through 805, 901 through 905, 1001,
1101, 1102, and 1201 of this act are each added to chapter 69.51A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1204 Section 1002 of this act takes effect
July 1, 2012.

--- END ---