BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.480 and 1996 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall drive any motor vehicle equipped with any
television viewer, screen, or other means of visually receiving a
television broadcast ((which is located in the motor vehicle at any
point forward of the back of the driver's seat, or which is)) when the
moving images are visible to the driver while operating the motor
vehicle on a public road. This subsection does not apply to law
enforcement vehicles communicating with mobile computer networks.
(2) No person shall operate any motor vehicle on a public highway
while wearing any headset or earphones connected to any electronic
device capable of receiving a radio broadcast or playing a sound
recording for the purpose of transmitting a sound to the human auditory
senses and which headset or earphones muffle or exclude other sounds.
This subsection does not apply to students and instructors
participating in a Washington state motorcycle safety program.
(3) This section does not apply to authorized emergency vehicles,
motorcyclists wearing a helmet with built-in headsets or earphones as
approved by the Washington state patrol, or motorists using hands-free,
wireless communications systems, as approved by the equipment section
of the Washington state patrol.

--- END ---