BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With the assistance of the department of fish and wildlife and
the state veterinarian, the department of health shall develop and
implement a program to detect, interdict, and assess the
epidemiological consequences of diseases that may afflict or may be
carried by wolves and the actual and potential impact of wolves' role
in such diseases upon human health in the state.
(2) The program required by this section must include:
(a) The compilation of a list of those infectious organisms that
may infect, afflict, or be carried by wolves, including but not limited
to:
(i) Rabies;
(ii) Brucellosis (Brucella canis);
(iii) Hydatid disease (Echinococcus granulosis, multiocularis);
(iv) Plague (Yersinia pestis);
(v) Contagious protozoans (Neospora sp., Toxocara sp., Sarcocystis
sp.);
(vi) Mange (Sarcoptes sp., Demodex sp., Cheyletiella sp.);
(vii) Tularemia (Francisella tularensis); and
(viii) Roundworms (Toxocara sp.);
(b) The compilation of a subset of the list provided in (a) of this
subsection of those infectious organisms that may infect or afflict
humans;
(c) The identification of high risk categories, vocations,
occupations, or recreations of people who are more likely to have been
exposed by wolves to any of the infectious organisms identified in (b)
of this subsection;
(d) The development of an outreach program to alert people
identified in (c) of this subsection to their potential exposure to the
diseases identified in (b) of this subsection;
(e) The development of a testing and data collection program to
test significant samples of people identified in (c) of this subsection
for diseases identified in (b) of this subsection to determine the
extent to which people of the state are exposed to dangerous diseases
or disease organisms because of the presence of wolves in the state;
(f) The development of public outreach programs to inform the
general public and people identified in (c) of this subsection of the
potential danger of diseases identified in (b) of this subsection, and
what a person may do to avoid becoming infected or to access medical
assessment of possible infection;
(g) The development of an outreach program to the state medical
community to inform practitioners of the potential for infection of
people by organisms identified in (b) of this subsection, symptoms to
watch for, methods of detection, methods of treatment, and reporting
requirements;
(h) The development of an outreach program to animal health
practitioners and monitors in the state to inform them of the potential
for infection of other animals, including livestock and pets, by
organisms identified in (b) of this subsection, symptoms to watch for,
methods of detection, methods of treatment, and reporting requirements;
(i) The development of standardized reporting requirements for the
medical community and the animal health community to ensure that data
about existence of infections of organisms identified in (b) of this
subsection are centrally reported and tracked; and
(j) The reporting of accomplishments and conclusions to the
legislature, in electronic form as required by RCW 43.01.036, and the
public every six months.
(3) The department of health must implement this section using
federal grant money or other sources of funding not supported by the
state general fund.

--- END ---