BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The United States has not dealt with Washington and other
western states in good faith concerning the reintroduction of wolves in
the western United States;
(2) Multiple promises by federal officials regarding deadlines for
wolf delisting and the shift of full wolf management and control to
western states have passed with no effective delisting or shifting of
full management authority to the state level;
(3) Wolves have had and are having an unacceptable negative impact
on game herds, hunting opportunities, livestock production, the health
and safety of people engaged in outdoor work and recreation in
Washington and other western states, and the Washington economy;
(4)(a) The United States lacks authority to impose wolves on
Washington and to enforce protected status for wolves in Washington;
(b) There is no commerce in wolves among the states, that wild
wolves are not bought or sold across state lines, that wild wolves are
not transported across state lines as commercial items, and that there
is no genuine commercial connection for wild wolves in interstate
commerce sufficient to justify authority for congress to authorize
imposition of wolves on Washington; and
(c) Article VI, clause 2, of the United States Constitution, known
as the supremacy clause, and Article I, section 8, clause 3, of the
United States Constitution, known as the commerce clause, have been
amended by the states by the 9th and 10th amendments to the United
States Constitution. It is a principle of jurisprudence that if
conflict exists between provisions of a coequal body of law, the most
recently enacted provision prevails as the most recent expression of
the enacting authority; and
(5) The United States is responsible for injuries caused by
federally released wolves in Washington, including but not limited to
the loss of game animals, livestock, or pets, other injuries to
animals, injuries to persons working or recreating in the state, and
economic injuries to the people of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purpose of this act is to:
(1) Prevent the decline of wild game animal populations in
Washington because of wolf predation and preserve the heritage of
harvesting those game animals for Washingtonians;
(2) Protect the stockgrowers of Washington from economic loss
because of wolf predation;
(3) Provide for the health and safety of people working outdoors or
engaged in outdoor recreation; and
(4) Assert the rights of Washington pursuant to the 9th and 10th
amendments to the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The state of Washington asserts the
following authorities:
(a) Rights retained by the people in the 9th amendment to the
United States Constitution; and
(b) Powers reserved to the states in the 10th amendment to the
United States Constitution.
(2) Washington challenges the authority of the United States and of
congress under the United States Constitution, including Article I,
section 8, clause 3, known as the commerce clause, to:
(a) Impose wolves on the people and lands of Washington;
(b) Protect wolves;
(c) Prevent, prohibit, or suppress any state management of wolves;
and
(d) Manage wildlife in general within the borders of Washington,
including on private and state lands and public lands managed by the
United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any gray wolf conservation or management
plan implemented by the state or in existence on the effective date of
this section is void. Any future management plans must be developed
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any cooperative agreement existing on
the effective date of this section between the state or any agency of
the state and the United States or any agency of the United States for
the conservation and management of the gray wolf in Washington is void.
(2) On passage and approval of this act, the secretary of state
shall send copies of this act indicating the effective date to the
secretary of the United States department of the interior, the director
of the United States fish and wildlife service, the secretary of the
United States department of agriculture, and the director of the
department of fish and wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any future cooperative agreement between
the state or any agency of the state and the United States or any
agency of the United States for the conservation and management of the
gray wolf in Washington is prohibited unless the conditions of the
Washington wolf management policy expressed in this chapter are met.
(2) Before any future cooperative agreement may be entered into,
the following officials shall certify in joint or separate written
statements that the conditions of the Washington wolf management policy
expressed in this chapter have been met:
(a) The speaker of the Washington state house of representatives;
(b) The president of the Washington state senate;
(c) The chair of the committee in the Washington state house of
representatives with jurisdiction over wildlife management issues;
(d) The chair of the committee in the Washington state senate with
jurisdiction over wildlife management issues;
(e) The state veterinarian;
(f) The director of the department of fish and wildlife; and
(g) The director of the department of agriculture.
(3) The signed, written statements required in subsection (2) of
this section must be sent to the secretary of state who shall confirm
that all of the officials listed in subsection (2) of this section are
in agreement that compliance with this chapter has been achieved.
(4) Compliance is certified and an agreement may be entered into
only if all officials listed in subsection (2) of this section submit
their written notice to the secretary of state within the same thirty-day period.
(5) Officials listed in subsection (2) of this section may withdraw
their certification of compliance by sending written notice to the
secretary of state at any time during the thirty-day period established
in subsection (4) of this section. A cooperative agreement may not be
entered into if any official withdraws certification during that
period.
(6) Upon receipt of certification from all officials listed in
subsection (2) of this section and after the thirty-day period in
subsection (4) of this section has expired, the secretary of state
shall within seven days:
(a) Confirm that certification of compliance with this chapter is
complete; and
(b) Publicly post and send written notice to the governor,
including copies of the written certification.
(7)(a) Certification of compliance with this chapter must be
withdrawn if, at any time, two officials listed in subsection (2) of
this section send written notice of their withdrawal of certification
to the secretary of state. If this occurs, any cooperative agreement
in effect upon receipt is void and the presence of wolves in Washington
is considered to be noncompliant with the Washington wolf policy
expressed in this chapter.
(b) The secretary of state shall send written notice of
noncompliance to the governor and the officials listed in subsection
(2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following conditions must be met before
the state or an agency of the state may enter into a gray wolf
cooperative conservation and management agreement with the United
States, an agency of the United States, or any other entity or adopt a
gray wolf management plan:
(1) The United States agrees in writing to accept all of the
following principles:
(a) Achieving a natural balance between nonhuman predators and prey
is not an acceptable goal or necessarily a desirable outcome;
(b) Introduction or enhancement of predator populations may not be
allowed to conflict with the heritage of and opportunity for hunting,
the safety of people engaged in outdoor recreation or work, and the
successful livelihood of people operating businesses on land where
predators range;
(c) All persons have a natural and undeniable right to defend
themselves and their property from immediate or apparent injury. This
right of self-defense of person and property applies to defense from
animals;
(d) Active predator control to protect game herds is engaging in
active wildlife management according to the needs and values of the
citizens of the state. These wildlife management activities may not be
impeded by federal agencies, federal regulations, or federal personnel;
(e) The state is eligible to recoup damages from the United States
for each game animal taken by wolves; and
(f) The United States court of federal claims is the proper venue
for damage claims arising under (e) of this subsection;
(2) The United States agrees in writing to unfettered state
management of wolves with no further assertion of federal authority;
(3) The United States accepts in writing that "breeding pair" is a
term or concept that may not be applied to quantification of gray wolf
recovery or maintenance; and
(4) The United States agrees in writing that a total of one hundred
fifty wolves present in Washington is sufficient to maintain a viable
wolf population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Until all of the provisions of the
Washington wolf policy expressed in this chapter are met, wolves are
unprotected in Washington wherever they are found on state or private
land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 To be in compliance with the Washington wolf
management policy expressed in this chapter, the wolf presence in
Washington must meet the following criteria:
(1) The gray wolf must be removed from the United States' list of
endangered or threatened wildlife and the state list of endangered
species;
(2) The statewide average for resident big game hunter success
rates has not declined in the three most recent calendar years below
the average of the ten most recent calendar years;
(3) Wolf populations are at or below one hundred fifty percent of
the target population of one hundred fifty wolves;
(4) Livestock predation by wolves, as determined by the county
commissioners of any county in which wolf predation is alleged to have
occurred, has not increased in the average of the three most recent
complete calendar years above the average for the most recent ten
calendar years; and
(5) Wolves present in the state are not afflicted with, carrying,
or transmitting infectious diseases or parasites transmissible to
humans or domestic or wild animals as determined by the state
veterinarian.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Issuing a citation or arresting a person
for taking a wolf on state or private property or possessing a wolf
carcass or any parts of a wolf taken on state or private property is
prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The office of financial management shall
reimburse reasonable costs and attorneys' fees to any Washington
resident accused by the United States of illegally taking a wolf on
state or private property if the taking occurs at a time when wolf
presence in Washington is not in compliance with the Washington wolf
management policy expressed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) At any time that the wolf presence in
Washington is not in compliance with the provisions of the Washington
wolf management policy expressed in this chapter, the department of
fish and wildlife may not expend any state resources, including money
and time, implementing or enforcing any wolf policies of the United
States.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife may expend state resources:
(a) For the enforcement of this chapter; and
(b) Specifically appropriated for the purpose of documenting and
quantifying compliance with sections 7 and 9 of this act.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife may expend any federal
moneys specifically earmarked and appropriated for wolf control in
Washington. Any expenditure of this money must be publicly posted on
a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Before any numbers used to determine
compliance with the Washington wolf management policy expressed in this
chapter may be accepted, including but not limited to numbers of
wolves, wolf packs, and game animals in Washington or regions of
Washington, hunter success numbers, and numbers of livestock animals
killed or injured by wolves, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall issue a report determining whether the methodologies
and procedures used by state agencies are reasonable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The attorney general shall file and
pursue claims against the United States for damages resulting from wolf
predation, including:
(a) Economic losses;
(b) Loss of big game animals, in accordance with section 7(1)(e) of
this act;
(c) Loss of livestock and pets; and
(d) Personal injury inflicted by a wolf on any person in
Washington.
(2) Claims must be filed in the United States court of federal
claims.
(3) Claims for reimbursement must include financial compensation
for all damages incurred since January 11, 2001.
(4) If the attorney general fails to file and pursue a claim within
ninety days of the effective date of this section, any resident or
organization of Washington may file a claim on behalf of the citizens
of Washington. In that event, the reasonable costs and attorneys' fees
incurred become an absolute claim against the office of financial
management and may be billed to and must be paid by the state on a
quarterly basis. If costs and attorneys' fees are recovered through
litigation, the state must be reimbursed for amounts paid, up to the
amounts recovered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Persons responsible for inflicting wolves
on Washington or preventing state management of wolves are civilly
liable for any damages related to the serious physical injury or death
of a human as the result of an attack by a wolf during any period of
noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter. This includes any
individual or group that is:
(1) Party to a lawsuit with the purpose of preventing or delaying
the implementation of state management of wolves during the pendency of
the lawsuit; or
(2) Found to have knowingly provided false or flawed data or is
found to have been grossly negligent in providing data regarding wolf
numbers, wolf distribution, wolf impacts on wildlife or livestock,
projected wolf impacts, or similar data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) If any person in Washington is killed
or suffers serious physical injury as the result of an attack by a wolf
during any period of noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter,
as determined by the county commissioners of the county where the
alleged attack occurred, the wolf or wolves involved in the attack are
considered likely to be infected with rabies and to infect other
animals and humans.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, any person may
kill any wolf by any means within one hundred miles of the alleged
attack.
(b) The killing of any wolf pursuant to this subsection must be
reported to the state veterinarian within twelve hours. That wolf must
be tested for rabies and other diseases. A complete necropsy report
must be publicly posted as soon as it becomes available.
(c) The provisions of this subsection remain in effect until the
county commissioners determine that all surviving wolves involved in
the attack are free of rabies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) When the United States fish and
wildlife service removes the Northern Rocky Mountain or gray wolf from
the United States' list of endangered or threatened wildlife and the
Washington state department of fish and wildlife removes the wolf from
the state list of endangered species pursuant to section 9(1) of this
act and when all other conditions of the Washington wolf management
policy expressed in this chapter are met, the department of fish and
wildlife shall manage the wolf as a species in need of management. The
fish and wildlife commission shall declare the wolf a big game animal,
a furbearer, or both, and may regulate the taking of a wolf as a big
game animal or furbearer.
(2) The Washington state department of fish and wildlife, or the
Washington state department of agriculture may control wolves for the
protection and safeguarding of livestock if the control action is
consistent with a wolf management plan approved by both the department
of fish and wildlife and the department of agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington wolf recovery act.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.36.030 and 2009 c 333 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to limitations and conditions established by the
commission, the owner, the owner's immediate family member, the owner's
documented employee, or a tenant of real property may trap, consistent
with RCW 77.15.194, or kill wildlife that is threatening human safety
or causing property damage on that property, without the licenses
required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from the director under
RCW 77.12.240.
(2) The commission shall establish the limitations and conditions
of this section by rule. The rules must include:
(a) Appropriate protection for threatened or endangered species;
(b) Instances when verbal or written permission is required to kill
wildlife;
(c) Species that may be killed under this section; and
(d) Requirements for the disposal of wildlife trapped or killed
under this section.
(3) In establishing the limitations and conditions of this section,
the commission shall take into consideration the recommendations of
((the)) a Washington ((state)) wolf ((conservation and)) management
plan developed under chapter 77.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 25 of this act) and in no instance may the commission limit in
any way the right of an individual to kill a wolf that is in the
process of attacking livestock, pets, or other personal property.

Sec. 20 RCW 77.12.020 and 2002 c 281 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall investigate the habits and distribution of
the various species of wildlife native to or adaptable to the habitats
of the state. Consistent with chapter 77.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 25 of this act), the commission shall determine
whether a species should be managed by the department and, if so,
classify it under this section.
(2)(a) Except for the gray wolf, the commission may classify by
rule wild animals as game animals and game animals as fur-bearing
animals.
(b) Consistent with section 17 of this act, the commission must
classify gray wolves as fur-bearing game animals.
(3) The commission may classify by rule wild birds as game birds or
predatory birds. All wild birds not otherwise classified are protected
wildlife.
(4) In addition to those species listed in RCW 77.08.020, the
commission may classify by rule as game fish other species of the class
Osteichthyes that are commonly found in fresh water except those
classified as food fish by the director.
(5) The director may recommend to the commission that a species of
wildlife should not be hunted or fished. Consistent with chapter
77.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of this act), the
commission may designate species of wildlife as protected.
(6) If the director determines that a species of wildlife is
seriously threatened with extinction in the state of Washington, the
director may request its designation as an endangered species.
Consistent with chapter 77.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
25 of this act), the commission may designate an endangered species.
(7) If the director determines that a species of the animal
kingdom, not native to Washington, is dangerous to the environment or
wildlife of the state, the director may request its designation as
deleterious exotic wildlife. The commission may designate deleterious
exotic wildlife.
(8) Upon recommendation by the director, the commission may
classify nonnative aquatic animal species according to the following
categories:
(a) Prohibited aquatic animal species: These species are
considered by the commission to have a high risk of becoming an
invasive species and may not be possessed, imported, purchased, sold,
propagated, transported, or released into state waters except as
provided in RCW 77.15.253;
(b) Regulated aquatic animal species: These species are considered
by the commission to have some beneficial use along with a moderate,
but manageable risk of becoming an invasive species, and may not be
released into state waters, except as provided in RCW 77.15.253. The
commission shall classify the following commercial aquaculture species
as regulated aquatic animal species, and allow their release into state
waters pursuant to rule of the commission: Pacific oyster (Crassostrea
gigas), kumamoto oyster (Crassostrea sikamea), European flat oyster
(Ostrea edulis), eastern oyster (Crassostrea virginica), manila clam
(Tapes philippinarum), blue mussel (Mytilus galloprovincialis), and
suminoe oyster (Crassostrea ariankenisis);
(c) Unregulated aquatic animal species: These species are
considered by the commission as having some beneficial use along with
a low risk of becoming an invasive species, and are not subject to
regulation under this title;
(d) Unlisted aquatic animal species: These species are not
designated as a prohibited aquatic animal species, regulated aquatic
animal species, or unregulated aquatic animal species by the
commission, and may not be released into state waters. Upon request,
the commission may determine the appropriate category for an unlisted
aquatic animal species and classify the species accordingly;
(e) This subsection (8) does not apply to the transportation or
release of nonnative aquatic animal species by ballast water or ballast
water discharge.
(9) Upon recommendation by the director, the commission may develop
a work plan to eradicate native aquatic species that threaten human
health. Priority shall be given to water bodies that the department of
health has classified as representing a threat to human health based on
the presence of a native aquatic species.

Sec. 21 RCW 77.15.120 and 2000 c 107 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as limited by section 10 of this act, a person is guilty
of unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the second degree
if the person hunts, fishes, possesses, maliciously harasses or kills
fish or wildlife, or maliciously destroys the nests or eggs of fish or
wildlife and the fish or wildlife is designated by the commission as
endangered, and the taking has not been authorized by rule of the
commission.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of endangered fish or
wildlife in the first degree if the person has been:
(a) Convicted under subsection (1) of this section or convicted of
any crime under this title involving the killing, possessing,
harassing, or harming of endangered fish or wildlife; and
(b) Within five years of the date of the prior conviction the
person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the second
degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the first
degree is a class C felony. The department shall revoke any licenses
or tags used in connection with the crime and order the person's
privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or obtain licenses under this title to
be suspended for two years.

Sec. 22 RCW 77.15.130 and 1998 c 190 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as limited by section 10 of this act, a person is guilty
of unlawful taking of protected fish or wildlife if:
(a) The person hunts, fishes, possesses, or maliciously kills
protected fish or wildlife, or the person possesses or maliciously
destroys the eggs or nests of protected fish or wildlife, and the
taking has not been authorized by rule of the commission; or
(b) The person violates any rule of the commission regarding the
taking, harming, harassment, possession, or transport of protected fish
or wildlife.
(2) Unlawful taking of protected fish or wildlife is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 23 RCW 77.15.170 and 1999 c 258 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the second
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife and the value of the fish, shellfish, or wildlife is greater
than twenty dollars but less than two hundred fifty dollars; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(2) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the first
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife having a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more or
wildlife classified as big game; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(3)(a) Waste of fish and wildlife in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(b) Waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any license
or tag used in the crime and shall order suspension of the person's
privileges to engage in the activity in which the person committed
waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree for a period of one
year.
(4) It is prima facie evidence of waste if a processor purchases or
engages a quantity of food fish, shellfish, or game fish that cannot be
processed within sixty hours after the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are taken from the water, unless the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are preserved in good marketable condition.
(5) Nothing in this section applies to the killing, possession, or
other taking of wolves except as otherwise provided in chapter 77.---
RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of this act).

Sec. 24 RCW 77.32.010 and 2009 c 564 s 956 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or chapter 77.---
RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of this act), a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---