BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature must approve or reject the
department of fish and wildlife's recommended final environmental
impact statement and the gray wolf conservation and management plan as
a whole. Legislative action must be in the form of a joint memorial.
(1) If the legislature rejects the department of fish and
wildlife's recommended final environmental impact statement and the
gray wolf conservation and management plan, the department must
reconvene the wolf working group and resubmit a new environmental
impact statement and gray wolf conservation and management plan to the
legislature the following legislative session.
(2) If the legislature approves the department of fish and
wildlife's recommended final environmental impact statement and the
gray wolf conservation and management plan, the department may send the
final environmental impact statement and the gray wolf conservation and
management plan to the Washington state fish and wildlife commission
for final review and decision.

--- END ---