BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The public interest will be best served if lands throughout the
state and their resources are subject to the coordinated management
efforts of the state and local governments;
(2) The federal government requires its agencies to coordinate and
provide meaningful involvement of state and local government officials
in the development and revisions of federal land use plans, guidelines,
and regulations as explained in 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1712 (c)(9);
(3) Many local governments have extensive plans for the lands
within their jurisdiction as required by various state laws, including
but not limited to Titles 35, 35A, and 36 RCW; and
(4) The citizens of Washington directly benefit when state agencies
coordinate their activities with local government officials regarding
land use administration, management, and planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall coordinate with all applicable affected
local government officials during the development, revision, and
implementation of any public land use plan under the control or
authority of the department.
(b) Implementation of this section requires the department to, at
a minimum:
(i) Keep itself apprised of all relevant local and tribal land use
plans and ordinances;
(ii) Ensure that consideration is given to local and tribal plans
that are germane in the development of land use activities for the
department and strive to make corresponding state policies, plans, or
actions consistent with local policies, plans, or actions;
(iii) Assist in resolving inconsistencies between department land
management and local and tribal plans and ordinances;
(iv) Provide for meaningful public involvement of other local
government officials, both elected and appointed, in the development of
land use programs, land use policies, land use rules, and land use
decisions for department lands; and
(v) Provide local government officials early notification of all
land use actions or plans of the department that will affect the unit
of local government directly or indirectly.
(2) If, after consulting with an affected local government, the
department finds that the statutory limitations of the department make
compliance with a particular locally adopted land use plan or ordinance
unlawful, the department shall report this finding to the appropriate
committees of the legislature along with specific information relating
to the statute or statutes limiting the department from complying with
local plans or ordinances.
(3) The director must make available a formal channel through which
local government officials may provide direct feedback and other
communications regarding proposed actions by the department relating to
the purchase and sale of land, the development or revision of land use
plans, land use guidelines, land use policies, and land use rules for
department lands within the local jurisdiction and with respect to
other land use matters as deemed relevant to a local official.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall coordinate with all applicable affected
local government officials during the development, revision, and
implementation of any public land use plan under the control or
authority of the department.
(b) Implementation of this section requires the department to, at
a minimum:
(i) Keep itself apprised of all relevant local and tribal land use
plans and ordinances;
(ii) Ensure that consideration is given to local and tribal plans
that are germane in the development of land use activities for the
department and strive to make corresponding state policies, plans, or
actions consistent with local policies, plans, or actions;
(iii) Assist in resolving inconsistencies between department land
management and local and tribal plans and ordinances;
(iv) Provide for meaningful public involvement of other local
government officials, both elected and appointed, in the development of
land use programs, land use policies, land use rules, and land use
decisions for public lands; and
(v) Provide local government officials early notification of all
land use actions or plans of the department that will affect the unit
of local government directly or indirectly.
(2) If, after consulting with an affected local government, the
department finds that the statutory limitations of the department make
compliance with a particular locally adopted land use plan or ordinance
unlawful, the department shall report this finding to the appropriate
committees of the legislature along with specific information relating
to the statute or statutes limiting the department from complying with
local plans or ordinances.
(3) The commissioner of public lands must make available a formal
channel through which local government officials may provide direct
feedback and other communications regarding proposed actions by the
department relating to the purchase and sale of land, the development
or revision of land use plans, land use guidelines, land use policies,
and land use rules for public lands within the local jurisdiction and
with respect to other land use matters as deemed relevant to a local
official.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall coordinate with all applicable affected
local government officials during the development, revision, and
implementation of any public land use plan under the control or
authority of the commission.
(b) Implementation of this section requires the commission to, at
a minimum:
(i) Keep itself apprised of all relevant local and tribal land use
plans and ordinances;
(ii) Ensure that consideration is given to local and tribal plans
that are germane in the development of land use activities for the
commission and strive to make corresponding commission policies, plans,
or actions consistent with local policies, plans, or actions;
(iii) Assist in resolving inconsistencies between commission land
management and local and tribal plans and ordinances;
(iv) Provide for meaningful public involvement of other local
government officials, both elected and appointed, in the development of
land use programs, land use policies, land use rules, and land use
decisions for commission lands; and
(v) Provide local government officials early notification of all
land use actions or plans of the commission that will affect the unit
of local government directly or indirectly.
(2) If, after consulting with an affected local government, the
commission finds that the statutory limitations of the commission make
compliance with a particular locally adopted land use plan or ordinance
unlawful, the commission shall report this finding to the appropriate
committees of the legislature along with specific information relating
to the statute or statutes limiting the commission from complying with
local plans or ordinances.
(3) The director must make available a formal channel through which
local government officials may provide direct feedback and other
communications regarding proposed actions by the commission relating to
the purchase and sale of land, the development or revision of land use
plans, land use guidelines, land use policies, and land use rules for
commission lands within the local jurisdiction and with respect to
other land use matters as deemed relevant to a local official.

--- END ---