BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an
adoptive parent may petition the court for refinalization of a foreign
adoption when all of the following are met:
(a) The adoption was finalized by an appropriate tribunal in a
foreign country in accord with the laws of that country;
(b) The adoptee was not brought into the United States until after
the adoption was finalized in the foreign country; and
(c) At least one of the adoptive parents is a resident of
Washington.
(2) A petition for refinalization of a foreign adoption may be
initiated under this section by filing with the court a petition for
refinalization of a foreign adoption. The petition must contain the
following information:
(a) A certified copy of the valid foreign adoption decree along
with a certified translation of the decree;
(b) Evidence as to the child's birth date and birth place provided
by the original birth certificate along with a certified translation of
the birth certificate, or by a certified copy, extract, or translation
of some other document that is essentially equivalent to the original
birth certificate. The records of the United States immigration and
naturalization service or of the United States department of state are
essentially equivalent to the birth certificate;
(c) Evidence showing that the child is either a permanent resident
or a naturalized citizen of the United States;
(d) An affidavit from the adoptive parent or attorney for the
adoptive parent indicating that the foreign adoption decree was issued
in accordance with the laws of the issuing jurisdiction and the adoptee
was not brought into the United States until the adoption was finalized
in the foreign country;
(e) The name and address of the adoption agency that handled the
adoption; and
(f) A statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian
child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903.
(3) The court shall review the petition, affidavit, decree, and
other documents. The court shall issue a decree refinalizing the
foreign adoption if the petition contains the required information
under subsection (2) of this section and the court finds that:
(a) The petition contains a verified statement or other evidence
that at least one of the adoptive parents is a United States citizen
and a state resident and that the child was not brought into the United
States until after the adoption was finalized in the foreign country;
(b) The original or certified copy of the valid foreign adoption
decree, along with a certified translation, is presented to the court;
and
(c) The adoptee is either a permanent resident or a naturalized
citizen of the United States.
(4)(a) An adoption decree issued under this section shall provide
the same information as required under RCW 26.33.250.
(b) An adoption decree issued under this section has the same legal
effect as any decree of adoption issued by the court.
(5) If the requirements under subsection (1) of this section are
not met or if the court does not enter a decree refinalizing the
foreign adoption under subsection (3) of this section, a person may
initiate adoption proceedings under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.33.150 and 1984 c 155 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adoption proceeding is initiated by filing with the court a
petition for adoption. The petition shall be filed by the prospective
adoptive parent.
(2) A petition for adoption shall contain the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the petitioner;
(b) The name, if any, gender, and place and date of birth, if
known, of the adoptee;
(c) A statement that the child is or is not an Indian child covered
by the Indian Child Welfare Act; and
(d) The name and address of the department or any agency, legal
guardian, or person having custody of the child.
(3) The written consent to adoption of any person, the department,
or agency which has been executed shall be filed with the petition.
(4) The petition shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the
petitioner. If the petitioner is married, the petitioner's spouse
shall join in the petition.
(5) If a preplacement report prepared pursuant to RCW 26.33.190 has
not been previously filed with the court, the preplacement report shall
be filed with the petition for adoption.
(6) An adoption proceeding to refinalize a foreign adoption may be
initiated under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.33.220 and 1984 c 155 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the reports required by RCW
26.33.190 are not required if the petitioner seeks to adopt the child
of the petitioner's spouse. The reports required by RCW 26.33.190 and
26.33.200 are not required if the adoptee is eighteen years of age or
older or if the petition is for a refinalization of a foreign adoption
under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---