BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state of
Washington currently contracts out part of its retail liquor sales by
allowing contract liquor stores to sell liquor. The legislature finds
that selective further contracting out of the state's retail liquor
sales will result in a system that is more efficient and cost-effective
for the state than the current hybrid system of state liquor stores and
contract liquor stores. In addition, the legislature finds that it is
in the best interests of the state to consider how to implement a full
contract liquor store system. Therefore, the legislature intends to
convert selected state liquor stores to contract liquor stores; convert
additional state liquor stores to contract liquor stores on a pilot
basis; monitor and evaluate the impact of the conversions; and
determine under what conditions a full contract liquor store system
would be more efficient and cost-effective for the state. In
converting state liquor stores to contract liquor stores, the
legislature intends that there be no revenue loss to the state.
Further, the legislature intends that this act constitutes a law
preventing the liquor control board from carrying out the terms of
leases for state liquor stores being converted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board must convert at least twenty state liquor stores to
contract liquor stores between September 1, 2011, and July 1, 2013.
The board must select stores for conversion under this subsection that
the board determines will result in the greatest efficiency and cost-effectiveness for the state.
(2) In addition to the conversion of state liquor stores in
subsection (1) of this section, the board must convert ten state liquor
stores to contract liquor stores on a pilot basis between September 1,
2011, and July 1, 2012. The board must select medium and high volume
stores for conversion under this subsection so as to best allow the
board to recommend under what conditions a full contract liquor store
system would be more efficient and cost-effective for the state.
(3) Nothing in this section affects the authority of the board to
relocate or close contract liquor stores.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The liquor control board must study the
contracting out the state's retail sale of liquor under section 2 of
this act. The study must include:
(a) An analysis of the revenue generating capacity for the state of
newly established contract stores compared to the converted state
liquor stores;
(b) A comparison between the newly established contract stores and
the state liquor stores of key performance indicators including, but
not limited to, inventory audit results, inventory turns, product
selection, square footage, and the impact on customer satisfaction,
including the impact on licensees of the board;
(c) An analysis of access to liquor by intoxicated and underage
persons; and
(d) An assessment of conditions under which a full contract liquor
store system would be more efficient and cost-effective for the state.
(2) The board must report its findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality, subject to section 2 of this act;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores. An
independently owned grocery store under sixty thousand square feet
holding a license under RCW 66.24.360 may apply for and receive a
contract liquor store appointment. Legislative approval is required to
increase the number of contract liquor stores. In addition, the board
may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures
liquor products other than wine under a license under this title, as a
contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor products of its
own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such contract liquor
stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the guidelines provided
by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor stores shall be
subject to such additional rules and regulations consistent with this
title as the board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
board shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken
language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served
and where there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct
being provoked by such language.

--- END ---