BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to establish
a training program for managers of manufactured housing communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on manufactured
housing community management training created in section 6 of this act.
(2) "Certificate of completed training" means a certificate issued
by a statewide association exclusively representing manufactured
housing communities that conducts manufactured housing community
management training under this chapter.
(3) "Manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as in RCW
59.20.030.
(4) "Manufactured housing community management" means those
actions, functions, or duties related to the management of a
manufactured housing community to include the collection of rent and
other charges, renting mobile home lots, and the implementation of
landlord duties and responsibilities under chapter 59.20 RCW.
(5) "Manufactured housing community manager" means a person who
performs manufactured housing community management, and is required to
be trained under this chapter to perform manufactured housing community
management services. "Manufactured housing community manager" includes
a resident owner of a manufactured housing community who performs
manufactured housing community management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any manager who lives in a manufactured
housing community and performs manufactured housing community
management must be trained and possess a certificate of completed
training.
(2) Any person engaged in the business of managing a manufactured
housing community, but is not living in a manufactured housing
community, must be trained and possess a certificate of completed
training.
(3) An owner living in the manufactured housing community, but not
performing manufactured housing community management, is not required
to be trained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A certificate of completed training must
be initially issued after the person required to be trained has
attended and completed an eight-hour training course for manufactured
housing community management as approved by the advisory council.
(2) Any person required to have a certificate of completed training
shall complete the training within six months of the person first
performing manufactured housing community management within a
manufactured housing community or within one year of becoming a manager
upon a determination of good cause by the chair of the advisory
council.
(3) A certificate of completed training is effective on the date of
the completion of the initial training course, and must be renewed
annually. A minimum of four hours of manufactured housing community
management training is required annually for renewal of a certificate
of completed training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Only statewide associations exclusively
representing manufactured housing communities shall conduct
manufactured housing community management training. These associations
may charge fees, including an application fee, to persons being trained
for the purposes of conducting manufactured housing community
management training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An advisory council on manufactured
housing community management training is created. The council must
consist of five members. Two members of the council must be residents
of manufactured housing communities or their designees. Two members
must be owners of manufactured housing communities or their designees.
The resident members of the council must be selected by statewide
associations exclusively representing manufactured housing community
tenants. The manufactured housing community members of the council
must be selected by statewide associations exclusively representing
manufactured housing communities. Members shall serve for terms of
four years. The office of the attorney general shall serve as a
nonvoting, advisory member of the council. The president of the senate
shall appoint one member from the senate to the council, and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from
the house of representatives to the council. Both legislative members
shall serve as nonvoting members except when the four voting members of
the council cannot agree on the approval of the development, renewal,
and revision of the curriculum for manufactured housing community
management training under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The
council shall select a chair from its members for a four-year term.
(2) Members of the advisory council shall serve without
compensation.
(3) The functions of the advisory council are to:
(a) Approve the development, renewal, and revisions of the
curriculum for manufactured housing community management training;
(b) Ensure that the initial eight-hour training curriculum has at
least one-half the class instruction on one or more provisions of
chapter 59.20 RCW and at least one-fourth the class instruction on a
combination of resident relations and communication skills; and
(c) Ensure that the annual four-hour requirement for continuing
training after the initial eight-hour training has at least one-half
the class instruction on one or more provisions of chapter 59.20 RCW
and at least one-fourth the class instruction on a combination of
resident relations and communication skills.
(4) The advisory council shall meet at the call of its chair or at
the request of a majority of its membership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A violation of this chapter is a class 1
civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No government agency, trade association,
instructor, or advisory council member is responsible for the conduct
of any person required to comply with this chapter. This section does
not create a cause of action against any government agency, trade
association, instructor, or advisory council member for a violation of
this chapter by any person required to comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012, or six months after approval of the initial curriculum for
manufactured housing community management training by the advisory
council on manufactured housing community management training under
section 6(3)(a) of this act, whichever occurs later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4 through 6 of this act take
effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---