BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the ferry system
is an important driver of the Washington state economy, supporting jobs
and businesses in communities around Puget Sound. The ferry system is
also an integral part of the state highway system and, as such,
benefits all citizens by connecting communities and markets around the
state.
The legislature further finds that funding for the ferry system
remains insufficient to provide adequate service in support of this
economic engine. Further, new funding sources will only be acceptable
when the state can show that the ferry system manages its costs
prudently, while delivering reliable, safe, and quality cross-sound
transportation services.
Therefore, the legislature intends to privatize management
functions of the ferry system, making the system contractually
accountable for efficient and quality service. In doing so, the
legislature intends to: Improve the management of ferry operations;
increase the accountability and transparency of ferry management and
operations; and realize cost savings in ferry management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:
(a) "Management" means a nonrepresented employee position at the
Washington state ferries that includes management responsibilities.
(b) "Performance criteria" means measurable standards included in
a contract for the private provision of ferry system management
functions to be used by the department to evaluate the sufficiency of
the services being provided by the contractor.
(2) Performance criteria may include, but not be limited to:
(a) Customer satisfaction;
(b) On-time performance;
(c) Fuel consumption improvements;
(d) Administrative cost per rider for both vehicle and passenger
and passenger-only vessels;
(e) Unit cost of services delivered;
(f) Incident and accident rates;
(g) Employee satisfaction;
(h) Performance metrics of state employees;
(i) Project delivery rate;
(j) Vessel performance;
(k) A preservation and capital asset audit as described in section
15, chapter 512, Laws of 2007.
(3) Based on the performance criteria under subsection (2) of this
section, contracts for ferry system management functions must provide
for incentive or retained payment arrangements as a means of ensuring
satisfactory performance of the contract and improved performance of
the ferry system over time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2012, the department must competitively contract
out ferry system management functions to a private management services
firm. The contract must include specific performance criteria and
measures to be achieved by the firm and must require that the firm
retain existing collective bargaining agreements between the state and
the employees' labor representatives. The contract must be for a
six-year period, with a ten-year extension option.
(2) The invitation for bid process for the contract may include a
preliminary request for qualifications to inform the most effective way
to contract for management functions.
(3) Consistent with RCW 41.06.142(3), the contract is not subject
to requirements for agencies purchasing services that have been
customarily and historically provided by state employees.
(4) By November 1, 2011, the department shall report to the
governor and the legislature on the management services to be
privatized, any statutory changes required, the efforts to ensure
competition for the contract, planned methods for contract management,
the provisions in the contract ensuring accountability to performance
criteria, and expected savings in staff and funding levels to the
omnibus transportation appropriations act. The report must also
include the competitive solicitation documents.

--- END ---