BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.86.030 and 2009 c 544 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Beginning October 1, 2012)) Subject to RCW 49.86.150, family
leave insurance benefits are payable to an individual during a period
in which the individual is unable to perform his or her regular or
customary work because he or she is on family leave if the individual:
(1) Files a claim for benefits in each week in which the individual
is on family leave, and as required by rules adopted by the director;
(2) Has been employed for at least six hundred eighty hours ((in
employment)) during the individual's qualifying year;
(3) Establishes an application year. An application year may not
be established if the qualifying year includes hours worked before
establishment of a previous application year;
(4) Consents to the disclosure of information or records deemed
private and confidential under chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure
of this information and these records by the employment security
department to the department is solely for purposes related to the
administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this information
or these records is subject to RCW 49.86.020(3);
(5) Discloses whether or not he or she owes child support
obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050; and
(6) Documents that he or she has provided the employer from whom
family leave is to be taken with written notice of the individual's
intention to take family leave in the same manner as an employee is
required to provide notice in RCW 49.78.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.86.190 and 2007 c 357 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
If necessary to ensure that money is available in the family leave
insurance account for the initial administration of the family leave
insurance program, the director of labor and industries may, from time
to time before July 1, ((2009)) 2014, lend funds from the supplemental
pension fund to the family leave insurance account. These loaned funds
may be expended solely for the initial administration of the program
under this chapter. The director of labor and industries shall repay
the supplemental pension fund, plus its proportionate share of earnings
from investment of moneys in the supplemental pension fund during the
loan period, from the family leave insurance account within two years
of the date of the loan. This section expires October 1, ((2011))
2016.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.86.210 and 2009 c 544 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning September 1, ((2013)) 2014, the department shall report
to the legislature by September 1st of each year on projected and
actual program participation, premium rates, fund balances, and
outreach efforts.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.86.150 and 2007 c 357 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Family leave insurance benefits are payable under this chapter
only to the extent that the director of the office of financial
management determines that moneys are deposited and available in the
family leave insurance account for the purpose of benefit payments, and
only to the extent provided in RCW 49.86.050 and 49.86.060. Neither
the state nor the department is liable for any amount in excess of
these limits.
(2) This chapter does not create a continuing entitlement or
contractual right. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and a benefit or other
right granted under this chapter exists subject to the legislature's
power to amend or repeal this chapter. There is no vested private
right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.

--- END ---