BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
No public funds may be used to provide remuneration for any
purchase of personal goods at a store located within a correctional
facility for or on behalf of any inmate who is a resident at the
facility whether such payment is a subsidy, direct payment, extension
of credit, or some other form of consideration for the purchase of
personal goods.

--- END ---