BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.052 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to
the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2) Make available information services to ((state)) public
agencies ((and local governments)) and public benefit nonprofit
corporations ((on a full cost-recovery basis)). For the purposes of
this section "public agency" means any agency of this state or another
state; any political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state or another state including, but not limited to, municipal
corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts,
and local service districts; any agency of the United States; and any
Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government and "public
benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state,
or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than
an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state. These
services may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training.
These services are for discretionary use by ((customers and
customers)) public agencies and public agencies may elect other
alternatives for service if those alternatives are more cost-effective
or provide better service. Agencies may be required to use the
backbone network portions of the telecommunications services during an
initial start-up period not to exceed three years;
(3) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
department to assure that the services component of the department, in
the aggregate, is self-supporting. The department shall consider the
total cost of ownership and the net cost to Washington taxpayers of
enabling the state to deliver services to state and local public
agencies.
(a) When providing information services to public agencies located
in the state, the department may elect to price services at rates below
full-cost recovery levels if the service offerings will provide overall
cost savings to Washington taxpayers in the aggregate over time.
However, the department may not price services to public agencies
located in Washington at rates above full-cost recovery levels.
(b) When providing information services to public agencies located
in another state, the department shall use best efforts to ensure that
the state is recovering all direct and indirect costs associated with
the provision of the service, plus some additional return.
(4) A billing rate plan shall be developed for a two-year period to
coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan shall be subject to
review at least annually by the office of financial management. The
rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each cost center and will
show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined by the
department and the office of financial management. The same rate
structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost center. The
rate plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office
of financial management. The services component shall not subsidize
the operations of the strategic planning and policy component;
(((4))) (5) With the advice of the information services board and
agencies, develop a state strategic information technology plan and
performance reports as required under RCW 43.105.160;
(((5))) (6) Develop plans for the department's achievement of
statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic
information technology plan required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans
shall address such services as telecommunications, central and
distributed computing, local area networks, office automation, and end
user computing. The department shall seek the advice of the board in
the development of these plans;
(((6))) (7) Under direction of the information services board and
in collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies
as may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(((7))) (8) Identify opportunities for the effective use of
information services and coordinate appropriate responses to those
opportunities;
(((8))) (9) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans,
information technology portfolios, or overall information processing
performance as requested by the board, agencies, the director of
financial management, or the legislature. Agencies may be required to
reimburse the department for agency-requested reviews;
(((9))) (10) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(((10))) (11) Assist the office of financial management with
budgetary and policy review of agency plans for information services;
(((11))) (12) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and
policy component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(((12))) (13) Be the lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for all state agencies and develop,
pursuant to board policies, standards and common specifications for
leased and purchased telecommunications equipment. The department
shall not evaluate the merits of school curriculum, higher education
course offerings, or other education and training programs proposed for
transmission and/or reception using video telecommunications resources.
Nothing in this section shall abrogate or abridge the legal
responsibilities of licensees of telecommunications facilities as
licensed by the federal communication commission on March 27, 1990; and
(((13))) (14) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---