BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.88.130 and 1999 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When sentencing or imposing conditions on a person convicted
of, or receiving a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for,
violating RCW 9A.88.030, 9A.88.110, or 9.68A.100, the court must impose
a requirement that the offender:
(((a))) (i) Not be subsequently arrested for prostitution,
patronizing a prostitute, or ((patronizing a juvenile prostitute))
commercial sexual abuse of a minor; and
(((b))) (ii) Remain outside ((the geographical area, prescribed by
the court, in which the person was arrested for violating RCW 9A.88.110
or 9.68A.100)) any areas designated under (b) of this subsection,
unless such a requirement would interfere with the person's legitimate
employment or residence or otherwise be infeasible.
(b) A person may be charged and subject to arrest if he or she has
been previously charged or convicted of any of the offenses listed in
this subsection and his or her sentence for the previous offense
requires the individual to stay out of an area designated by a local
governing authority as an area of increased prostitution activity.
Each local governing authority shall post signs at the boundaries of
each designated area of increased prostitution activity.
(2) ((This)) The requirements ((is)) in subsection (1) of this
section are in addition to the penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110,
9A.88.120, and 9.68A.100.
(3) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---