BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.060 and 2005 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall
decide in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining
representative, the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining. In determining, modifying, or combining the bargaining
unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the public employees; the history of collective
bargaining by the public employees and their bargaining
representatives; the extent of organization among the public employees;
and the desire of the public employees. The commission shall determine
the bargaining representative by: (a) Examination of organization
membership rolls; (b) comparison of signatures on organization
bargaining authorization cards; or (c) conducting an election
specifically therefor.
(2) For classified employees of school districts and educational
service districts:
(a) Appropriate bargaining units existing on July 24, 2005, may not
be divided into more than one unit without the agreement of the public
employer and the certified bargaining representative of the unit; and
(b) In making bargaining unit determinations under this section,
the commission must consider, in addition to the factors listed in
subsection (1) of this section, the avoidance of excessive
fragmentation.
(3) Bargaining units must be consolidated when the employer and the
certified exclusive bargaining representative of the units consider
whether the consolidation is appropriate under the factors listed in
subsection (1) of this section and agree to the consolidation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.140 and 1969 ex.s. c 215 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be an unfair labor practice for a public employer:
(1) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce public employees in the
exercise of their rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(2) To control, dominate, or interfere with a bargaining
representative;
(3) To discriminate against a public employee who has filed an
unfair labor practice charge;
(4) To refuse to engage in collective bargaining with the certified
exclusive bargaining representative; or
(5) To attempt to bargain directly with anyone not authorized to
bargain by the certified exclusive bargaining representative.

--- END ---