BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state legislature has
consistently provided national leadership on safe housing and support
to foster youth transitioning out of foster care. Since 2006, the
legislature has addressed the needs of foster youth aging out of care
with medicaid to twenty-one (2007), foster care to twenty-one (2006),
the independent youth housing program (2007), and Washington's
alignment with the federal fostering connections act (2009). As a
result of this national leadership to provide safe and basic housing to
youth aging out of foster care, the programs have demonstrated the
significant cost benefit to providing safe housing to our youth exiting
foster care.
The United States congress passed the fostering connections to
success and increasing adoptions act of 2008 in order to give states
another financial tool to continue to provide foster care services to
dependent youth who turn eighteen years old while in foster care.
However, substantially declining revenues have resulted in markedly
decreased funds for states to use to meet the federal requirements
necessary to help these youth. Current fiscal realities require that
the scope of programs must be narrowed.
The Washington state legislature intends to serve, within the
resources available, the maximum number of foster youth who are legally
dependent on the state and who reach the age of eighteen while still in
foster care. The legislature intends to provide these youth continued
foster care services to support basic and healthy transition into
adulthood. The legislature recognizes the extremely poor outcomes of
unsupported foster youth aging out of the foster care system and is
committed to ensuring that those foster youth who engage in positive,
age-appropriate activities receive support. It is the intent of the
legislature to fully engage in the fostering connections act by
providing support, including extended court supervision to foster youth
pursuing a high school diploma or GED to age twenty-one with the goal
of increasing support to all children up to age twenty-one who are
eligible under the federal fostering connections to success act as
resources become available.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.04.011 and 2010 c 150 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this title:
(1) "Adjudication" has the same meaning as "conviction" in RCW
9.94A.030, but only for the purposes of sentencing under chapter 9.94A
RCW;
(2) Except as specifically provided in RCW 13.40.020 and chapters
13.24 and 13.34 RCW, "juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years;
(3) "Juvenile offender" and "juvenile offense" have the meaning
ascribed in RCW 13.40.020;
(4) "Court" when used without further qualification means the
juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);
(5) "Parent" or "parents," except as used in chapter 13.34 RCW,
means that parent or parents who have the right of legal custody of the
child. "Parent" or "parents" as used in chapter 13.34 RCW, means the
biological or adoptive parents of a child unless the legal rights of
that person have been terminated by judicial proceedings;
(6) "Custodian" means that person who has the legal right to
custody of the child.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 13, 2010 c 272 s
10, and 2010 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to
forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities
despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If
the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in
attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the
child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three
months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there
is no expressed intent to abandon.
(2) "Child," ((and)) "juvenile," and "youth" means:
(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or
(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible
to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services
authorized under RCW 74.13.031.
(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that
begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the
home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of
placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child
returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or
guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed,
whichever occurs first.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation,
or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the
limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the
dependency.
(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:
(a) Has been abandoned;
(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a
person legally responsible for the care of the child; ((or))
(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately
caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which
constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological
or physical development; or
(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by
RCW 74.13.031.
(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another
neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary
to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require
treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual
disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains
age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue
indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the
individual.
(8) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including
a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the
legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The
term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed
pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.
(9) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to
represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this
chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding
under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by
the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform
substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem,
shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of
this chapter.
(10) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer
program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the
county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of
volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or
found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not
limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment,
and discharge of volunteers.
(11) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the
department or other supervising agencies to federal, state, local, or
private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications,
or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For
purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial
service or time-limited family reunification service as described in
RCW 13.34.025(2).
(12) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court
proceeding, is:
(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance:
Temporary assistance for needy families, disability lifeline benefits,
poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits
transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or
supplemental security income; or
(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or
(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or
(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter
before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to
pay any amount for the retention of counsel.
(13) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or
group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement
in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(14) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined
in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services,
including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child.
(15) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility
licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be
licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.
(16) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth sister,
adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as
defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe for an Indian
child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4).
(17) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant
to the disposition of the case and shall contain the following
information:
(a) A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that
intervention is designed to alleviate;
(b) A description of the specific services and activities, for both
the parents and child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm
to the child; the reasons why such services and activities are likely
to be useful; the availability of any proposed services; and the
agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be delivered.
The description shall identify the services chosen and approved by the
parent;
(c) If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons
why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a
description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the
child in the home; the in-home treatment programs that have been
considered and rejected; the preventive services, including housing
assistance, that have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety,
and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home;
and the parents' attitude toward placement of the child;
(d) A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a
result of removal;
(e) A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the
harm to the child that may result if separation occurs including an
assessment of the child's relationship and emotional bond with any
siblings, and the agency's plan to provide ongoing contact between the
child and the child's siblings if appropriate; and
(f) Behavior that will be expected before determination that
supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary.
(18) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe
located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a
performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services
as defined in RCW 74.13.020.
(19) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW
74.13.031.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.020 and 2010 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Case management" means the management of services delivered to
children and families in the child welfare system, including permanency
services, caseworker-child visits, family visits, the convening of
family group conferences, the development and revision of the case
plan, the coordination and monitoring of services needed by the child
and family, and the assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal
representation, including preparing court reports, attending judicial
hearings and permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is
progressing toward permanency within state and federal mandates,
including the Indian child welfare act.
(2) "Child" means:
(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or
(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to
receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW
74.13.031.
(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW
26.44.020.
(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including
voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and
adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for,
parental care and supervision for the purpose of:
(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of
problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect,
abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;
(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected
children;
(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and
assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with
services designed to resolve such conflicts;
(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the
strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;
(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in
foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or
facilities.
"Child welfare services" does not include child protection
services.
(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design
committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change
which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising
agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods
established in the contract.
(8) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided after the
shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care, as that
term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including the
recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the
recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption
process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter,
residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.
(9) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring of all
aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work
to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements
set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable
outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link the
performance of the contractor to the level and timing of reimbursement.
(10) "Permanency services" means long-term services provided to
secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being, including foster
care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and
preparation for independent living services.
(11) "Primary prevention services" means services which are
designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child and
family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce the
risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare services.
(12) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian
tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into
a performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare
services, as defined in this section.
(13) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide to foster
children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in
licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised
independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs;
independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or
treatment.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.031 and 2009 c 520 s 51, 2009 c 491 s 7, and
2009 c 235 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation
is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the
result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation
reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the
department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care
being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as
defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. The policy for monitoring
placements under this section shall require that children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers receive a
private and individual face-to-face visit each month.
(a) The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children
and caregivers required under this section unless the child's placement
is being supervised under a contract between the department and a
private agency accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, in which case the private agency shall, within existing
resources, conduct the monthly visits with the child and with the
child's caregiver according to the standards described in this
subsection and shall provide the department with a written report of
the visits within fifteen days of completing the visits.
(b) In cases where the monthly visits required under this
subsection are being conducted by a private agency, the department
shall conduct a face-to-face health and safety visit with the child at
least once every ninety days.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10) ((Have authority to)) Provide continued ((foster care or group
care as needed)) extended foster care services to youth ages eighteen
to twenty-one years to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(11)(((a) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
have authority to provide continued foster care or group care to youth
ages eighteen to twenty-one years who are:
(i) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary or vocational
educational program;
(ii) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote or
remove barriers to employment;
(iii) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or
(iv) Incapable of engaging on any of the activities described in
(a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection due to a medical condition that
is supported by regularly updated information.
(b) A youth who remains eligible for placement services or benefits
pursuant to department rules may continue to receive placement services
and benefits until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday.
(12) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,)) Have
authority to provide adoption support benefits, or ((subsidized))
relative guardianship ((benefits)) subsidies on behalf of youth ages
eighteen to twenty-one years who achieved permanency through adoption
or a ((subsidized)) relative guardianship at age sixteen or older and
who ((are engaged in one of the activities)) meet the criteria
described in subsection (((11))) (10) of this section.
(((13))) (12) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever
state or federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a
child, including a child with a developmental disability who is placed
as a result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(((14))) (13) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster
care services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the
custody of a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed
child-placing agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order,
or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be
subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of support
applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(((15))) (14) Within amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, provide preventive services to families with children that
prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(((16))) (15) Have authority to provide independent living services
to youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of
age, and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been
in foster care.
(((17))) (16) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents,
including members of the foster parent association of Washington state,
for the purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.145 and 2009 c 520 s 30, 2009 c 491 s 4, and
2009 c 477 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of a permanency planning hearing is to review the
permanency plan for the child, inquire into the welfare of the child
and progress of the case, and reach decisions regarding the permanent
placement of the child.
(a) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and
an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has
not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later
than twelve months following commencement of the current placement
episode.
(b) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency
guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and the child
is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning hearing shall
take place no later than twelve months, as provided in this section,
following the date of removal unless, prior to the hearing, the child
returns to the home of the dependency guardian or long-term care
provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order, or a permanent
custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed. Every effort
shall be made to provide stability in long-term placement, and to avoid
disruption of placement, unless the child is being returned home or it
is in the best interest of the child.
(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(2) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written
permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all
parties and their legal counsel, if any.
(3) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall conduct the
following inquiry:
(a) If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been
achieved prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
review the child's status to determine whether the placement and the
plan for the child's care remain appropriate.
(b) In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not
been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the
primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done
to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. The court shall
review the permanency plan prepared by the agency and make explicit
findings regarding each of the following:
(i) The continuing necessity for, and the safety and
appropriateness of, the placement;
(ii) The extent of compliance with the permanency plan by the
department or supervising agency and any other service providers, the
child's parents, the child, and the child's guardian, if any;
(iii) The extent of any efforts to involve appropriate service
providers in addition to department or supervising agency staff in
planning to meet the special needs of the child and the child's
parents;
(iv) The progress toward eliminating the causes for the child's
placement outside of his or her home and toward returning the child
safely to his or her home or obtaining a permanent placement for the
child;
(v) The date by which it is likely that the child will be returned
to his or her home or placed for adoption, with a guardian or in some
other alternative permanent placement; and
(vi) If the child has been placed outside of his or her home for
fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, not including any period
during which the child was a runaway from the out-of-home placement or
the first six months of any period during which the child was returned
to his or her home for a trial home visit, the appropriateness of the
permanency plan, whether reasonable efforts were made by the department
or supervising agency to achieve the goal of the permanency plan, and
the circumstances which prevent the child from any of the following:
(A) Being returned safely to his or her home;
(B) Having a petition for the involuntary termination of parental
rights filed on behalf of the child;
(C) Being placed for adoption;
(D) Being placed with a guardian;
(E) Being placed in the home of a fit and willing relative of the
child; or
(F) Being placed in some other alternative permanent placement,
including independent living or long-term foster care.
At this hearing, the court shall order the department or
supervising agency to file a petition seeking termination of parental
rights if the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen of the
last twenty-two months since the date the dependency petition was filed
unless the court makes a good cause exception as to why the filing of
a termination of parental rights petition is not appropriate. Any good
cause finding shall be reviewed at all subsequent hearings pertaining
to the child. For purposes of this section, "good cause exception"
includes but is not limited to the following: The child is being cared
for by a relative; the department has not provided to the child's
family such services as the court and the department have deemed
necessary for the child's safe return home; or the department has
documented in the case plan a compelling reason for determining that
filing a petition to terminate parental rights would not be in the
child's best interests.
(c)(i) If the permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the court shall make a finding that the provision of services to
assist the child in making a transition from foster care to independent
living will allow the child to manage his or her financial, personal,
social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs prior to approving
independent living as a permanency plan of care. The court will
inquire whether the child has been provided information about extended
foster care services.
(ii) The permanency plan shall also specifically identify the
services, including extended foster care services, where appropriate,
that will be provided to assist the child to make a successful
transition from foster care to independent living.
(iii) The department or supervising agency shall not discharge a
child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen
years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter
13.64 RCW.
(d) If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent or
relative for more than six months prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the court shall:
(i) Enter a finding regarding whether the foster parent or relative
was informed of the hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280,
13.34.215(((5)))(6), and 13.34.096; and
(ii) If the department or supervising agency is recommending a
placement other than the child's current placement with a foster
parent, relative, or other suitable person, enter a finding as to the
reasons for the recommendation for a change in placement.
(4) In all cases, at the permanency planning hearing, the court
shall:
(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the supervising agency
to be implemented; or
(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the
modified plan; and
(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that
a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or
(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited
specified time period while efforts are made to implement the
permanency plan.
(5) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court
shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with
this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(6) Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency
that has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition
for termination of parental rights.
(7) If the court orders the child returned home, casework
supervision by the department or supervising agency shall continue for
at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court shall determine the need for
continued intervention.
(8) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent legal
custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a permanency
plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the party pursuing
the permanent legal custody is the party identified in the permanency
plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the pendency of such
proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings and further
permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter. At the
conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody
proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship
or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be
dismissed.
(9) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall
not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a legal
guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of
subsection (8) of this section are met.
(10) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability
of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition for
termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any time
following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of such a
petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in
accordance with this chapter unless the department or supervising
agency requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or
unless the parties enter an agreed order terminating parental rights,
establishing guardianship, or otherwise resolving the matter.
(11) The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate
return of the child to the parent does not relieve the supervising
agency of its obligation to provide reasonable services, under this
chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to the parent,
including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court shall
consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance with RCW
13.34.130.
(12) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or
guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to facilitate the delivery of extended foster care
services, the court shall postpone for six months the dismissal of a
dependency proceeding for any child who is a dependent child in foster
care at the age of eighteen years. The six-month postponement under
this subsection is intended to allow a reasonable window of opportunity
for an eligible youth who reaches the age of eighteen to request
extended foster care services from the department or supervising
agency. At the end of the six-month period, the court shall dismiss
the dependency if the youth has not requested extended foster care
services from the department. Until the youth requests to participate
in the extended foster care program, the department is relieved of
supervisory responsibility for the youth.
(2) A youth receiving extended foster care services is a party to
the dependency proceeding. The youth's parent or guardian shall be
dismissed from the dependency proceeding when the youth reaches the age
of eighteen years.
(3) The court shall order a youth participating in extended foster
care services to be under the placement and care authority of the
department, subject to the youth's continuing agreement to participate
in extended foster care services.
(4) The court shall appoint counsel to represent the youth in
dependency proceedings.
(5) The case plan for and delivery of services to a youth receiving
extended foster care services is subject to the review requirements set
forth in RCW 13.34.138 and 13.34.145, and should be applied in a
developmentally appropriate manner, as they relate to youth age
eighteen to twenty-one years. Additionally, the court shall consider:
(a) Whether the youth is safe in his or her placement;
(b) Whether the youth continues to be eligible for extended foster
care services;
(c) Whether the current placement is developmentally appropriate
for the youth;
(d) The youth's development of independent living skills; and
(e) The youth's overall progress toward transitioning to full
independence and the projected date for achieving such transition.
(6) Prior to the hearing, the youth's attorney shall indicate
whether there are any contested issues and may provide additional
information necessary for the court's review.
(7) Upon the request of the youth, or when the youth is no longer
eligible to receive extended foster care services according to rules
adopted by the department, the court shall dismiss the dependency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the
department shall have authority to provide continued foster care or
group care to youth ages eighteen to twenty-one years who are:
(a) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary or vocational
educational program;
(b) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote or
remove barriers to employment;
(c) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or
(d) Incapable of engaging in any of the activities described in (a)
through (c) of this subsection due to a medical condition that is
supported by regularly updated information.
(2) A youth who remains eligible for placement services or benefits
under this section pursuant to department rules may, within amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, continue to receive placement
services and benefits until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first
birthday.

--- END ---