BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a number of
cities and counties in the state of Washington conduct traffic schools
or traffic safety courses for persons cited for traffic infractions or
traffic-related criminal offenses as a condition of a deferral,
sentence, or penalty. The legislature recognizes that since driver
education programs have only recently been required to provide
information about how to drive safely among bicyclists and pedestrians,
many licensed drivers do not have knowledge about such safe driving
practices. In order to increase such knowledge and to avoid
unnecessary injuries, fatalities, and conflicts, the legislature
believes that it is appropriate to include the bicycle and pedestrian
curriculum approved by the department of licensing for driver training
schools as part of the curriculum of such traffic schools and traffic
safety courses. Curriculum materials, which are donated by bicycle
organizations to the department of licensing without state expense, are
available from the department of licensing and are also available
electronically on the department's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.83 RCW
to read as follows:
Any jurisdiction conducting a traffic school or traffic safety
course in connection with a condition of a deferral, sentence, or
penalty for a traffic infraction or traffic-related criminal offense
listed under RCW 46.63.020 shall include, as part of its curriculum,
the curriculum for driving safely among bicyclists and pedestrians that
has been approved by the department of licensing for driver training
schools. This curriculum requirement does not require that more than
thirty minutes be devoted to the bicycle and pedestrian curriculum.

--- END ---