BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.50.010 and 1991 c 3 s 103 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person shall be regarded as practicing midwifery within the
meaning of this chapter who shall render medical aid for a fee or
compensation to a woman during prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum
stages or who shall advertise as a midwife by signs, printed cards, or
otherwise. Nothing shall be construed in this chapter to prohibit
gratuitous services. ((It shall be the duty of a midwife to consult
with a physician whenever there are significant deviations from normal
in either the mother or the infant.))

Sec. 2 RCW 18.50.108 and 1981 c 53 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every licensed midwife shall develop a written plan for
((consultation with other health care providers, emergency transfer,
transport of an infant to a newborn nursery or neonatal intensive care
nursery, and transport of a woman to an appropriate obstetrical
department or patient care area. The written plan shall be submitted
annually together with the license renewal fee to the department)) each
patient following the initial patient assessment and before the
commencement of a regular program of midwifery services. The written
plan shall describe the program of midwifery services to be provided;
any general risk factors associated with the services to be provided;
any specific risk factors pertaining to the individual health and
circumstances of the individual patient; a plan to be followed in the
event of an emergency, including a plan for transportation; and
individuals to contact in the event of an emergency. The patient and,
if applicable, the patient's spouse or partner shall be informed of the
contents of the plan and provided the opportunity to amend any portion
of the plan. Both the midwife and the patient shall acknowledge their
consent to the contents of the plan before the continuation of
midwifery services. The midwife must retain the written plans in the
patient's file for at least five years and make them available to the
department as necessary for credentialing and disciplinary purposes.
The department may adopt rules to implement the requirements of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---