BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2009 c 541 s 1 and 2009 c 479 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions for the student achievement program from
the general fund to each school district shall be based upon the
average number of full-time equivalent students in the school district
during the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure
that moneys generated by skill center students are returned to skill
centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation by the implicit price deflator as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics. However, for the ((2009-10 and
2010-11)) 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the amount allocated per
full-time equivalent student shall be as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act. ((For the 2011-12 school year and thereafter,
amounts allocated shall be further adjusted so that the allocations are
equal to what they would have been if allocations had not been reduced
for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years.)) These allocations per
full-time equivalent student shall be supported from the distributions
from the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and
the state general fund.
(3) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(((4) However, during the 2008-09 school year, the school district
annual amounts as defined in this section shall be distributed as
follows:
September: 9.0 percent;
October: 9.0 percent;
November: 5.5 percent;
December: 9.0 percent;
January: 9.0 percent;
February: 9.0 percent;
March: 9.0 percent;
April: 9.0 percent;
May: 5.5 percent;
June: 4.2 percent;
July: 11.8 percent; and
August: 10.0 percent.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---