BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2009 c 573 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the ((2009-10 and
2010-11)) 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, each school district shall
be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(((d) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to cost-of-living allocations required by (a) of this
subsection, school districts shall receive additional cost-of-living
allocations in equal increments such that by the end of the 2014-15
school year school district employee base salaries used with the
statewide salary allocation schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410
and any other state salary models used to recognize school district
personnel costs are, at a minimum, equal to what they would have been
if cost-of-living allocations had not been suspended during the 2009-10
or 2010-11 school years.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2009 c 573 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory
salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index.
(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each college district shall certify to the college board that it has
spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for academic employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the ((2009-2010 and 2010-2011)) 2011-2012 and 2012-2013 fiscal years, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.
(((e) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to cost-of-living allocations required by (a) of this
subsection, community and technical college districts shall receive
additional cost-of-living allocations in equal increments such that, by
the end of the 2014-15 academic year, average salaries of academic
employees of community and technical college districts will be, at a
minimum, equal to what salaries would have been if cost-of-living
allocations had not been suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school
years.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.468 and 2009 c 573 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided an
annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
For purposes of this section, "technical college" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. This section applies to only those
classified employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each technical college board of trustees shall receive a cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to increase classified employee salaries,
including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly
increase in the cost-of-living index.
(b) A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its
cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in
accordance with the technical college's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than
the end of the fiscal year, each technical college shall certify to the
college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for technical college classified employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the ((2009-2010 and 2010-2011))
2011-2012 and 2012-2013 fiscal years, the state shall fully fund the
cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.
(((e) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to cost-of-living allocations required by (a) of this
subsection, technical college districts shall receive additional cost-of-living allocations in equal increments such that, by the end of the
2014-15 academic year, average salaries of classified employees of
technical college districts will be, at a minimum, equal to what
salaries would have been if cost-of-living allocations had not been
suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school years.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2009 c 539 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation. For the
((2009-10 and 2010-11)) 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years the annual
bonus shall be subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for
this purpose. ((During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to annual adjustments for inflation, the bonus amount shall be
additionally increased such that, by the end of the 2014-15 school
year, national board bonus amounts are, at a minimum, equal to what
they would have been if annual adjustments for inflation had not been
suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school year.))
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in a school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.415.020 and 2007 c 319 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved in-service training attended the equivalent of a one credit
college quarter course on the salary schedule developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(2) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved continuing education earned, as continuing education is
defined by rule adopted by the professional educator standards board,
the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(3) Certificated personnel shall receive for each forty clock hours
of participation in an approved internship with a business, an
industry, or government, as an internship is defined by rule of the
professional educator standards board in accordance with RCW
28A.415.025, the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on
the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.
(4) An approved in-service training program shall be a program
approved by a school district board of directors, which meet standards
adopted by the professional educator standards board, and the
development of said program has been participated in by an in-service
training task force whose membership is the same as provided under RCW
28A.415.040, or a program offered by an education agency approved to
provide in-service for the purposes of continuing education as provided
for under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board,
or both.
(5) Clock hours eligible for application to the salary schedule
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
shall be those hours acquired after August 31, 1987. Clock hours
eligible for application to the salary schedule as described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be those hours acquired after
December 31, 1995.
(6) In-service training or continuing education in first peoples'
language, culture, or oral tribal traditions provided by a sovereign
tribal government participating in the Washington state first peoples'
language, culture, and oral tribal traditions teacher certification
program authorized under RCW 28A.410.045 shall be considered approved
in-service training or approved continuing education under this section
and RCW 28A.415.023.
(7) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, application of
credits or credit equivalents earned under this section after October
1, 2010, to the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee is subject to any conditions or
limitations contained in the omnibus operating appropriations act.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.415.023 and 2005 c 497 s 209 and 2005 c 393 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Credits earned by certificated instructional staff after
September 1, 1995, shall be eligible for application to the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee only if the course content:
(a) Is consistent with a school-based plan for mastery of student
learning goals as referenced in RCW 28A.655.110, the annual school
performance report, for the school in which the individual is assigned;
(b) Pertains to the individual's current assignment or expected
assignment for the subsequent school year;
(c) Is necessary to obtain an endorsement as prescribed by the
Washington professional educator standards board;
(d) Is specifically required to obtain advanced levels of
certification;
(e) Is included in a college or university degree program that
pertains to the individual's current assignment, or potential future
assignment, as a certified instructional staff; or
(f) Addresses research-based assessment and instructional
strategies for students with dyslexia, dysgraphia, and language
disabilities when addressing learning goal one under RCW 28A.150.210,
as applicable and appropriate for individual certificated instructional
staff.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "credits" mean college quarter
hour credits and equivalent credits for approved in-service, approved
continuing education, or approved internship hours computed in
accordance with RCW 28A.415.020.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules and
standards consistent with the limits established by this section for
certificated instructional staff.
(4) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, application of
credits or credit equivalents earned under this section after October
1, 2010, to the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee is subject to any conditions or
limitations contained in the omnibus operating appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---