BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.108.040 and 1995 c 353 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful to advertise the practice of massage using
the term massage or any other term that implies a massage technique or
method in any public or private publication or communication by a
person not licensed by the secretary as a massage practitioner ((or
without printing in display advertisement the license number of the
massage practitioner)).
(2) Any person who holds a license to practice as a massage
practitioner in this state may use the title "licensed massage
practitioner" and the abbreviation "L.M.P.". No other persons may
assume such title or use such abbreviation or any other word, letters,
signs, or figures to indicate that the person using the title is a
licensed massage practitioner.
(3) A massage practitioner's name and license number must
conspicuously appear on all of the massage practitioner's
advertisements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW
to read as follows:
A massage practitioner licensed under this chapter must
conspicuously display his or her license in his or her principal place
of business. If the massage practitioner does not have a principal
place of business or conducts business in any other location, he or she
must have a copy of his or her license available for inspection while
performing any activities related to massage therapy.

--- END ---