BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.220 and 2010 c 161 s 617 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor
or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector
vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle that is at least thirty years
old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector
vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector
vehicle license plate shall:
(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under
chapters ((46.16)) 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and
(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW
46.17.220(1)(d), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by
law.
(2) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate may:
(a) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the
department; or
(b) Provide a Washington state issued license plate designated for
general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.
(3) Collector vehicle license plates:
(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;
(b) ((Are not required to)) Must be renewed annually on the same
month and day in which the original collector vehicle registration was
issued; and
(c) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.
(4) ((A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be
used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades,
and occasional pleasure driving.
(5))) Collector vehicle license plates may be transferred from one
motor vehicle to another motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of
this section upon application to the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.
(5) The license plate number on the collector vehicle license plate
must be designated in the license plate number field on the vehicle
registration, and the vehicle registration must be in the vehicle at
all times. For duplicate license plate numbers, the department may add
a number or letter in the field to designate the vehicle in which the
license plate has been assigned. Law enforcement must be able to
access the vehicle data by the license plate number. The department
may adopt rules to designate the placement of the vehicle registration
tab on the license plate or vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.18.255 and 2010 c 161 s 623 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor
or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a horseless
carriage license plate for a motor vehicle that is at least forty years
old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector
vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the horseless
carriage license plate shall:
(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under
chapters ((46.16)) 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and
(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW
46.17.220(1)(i), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by
law.
(2) Horseless carriage license plates:
(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;
(b) ((Are not required to)) Must be renewed annually on the same
month and day in which the original horseless carriage registration was
issued;
(c) Are not transferrable to any other motor vehicle; and
(d) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.
(3) The license plate number on the horseless carriage license
plate must be designated in the license plate number field on the
vehicle registration, and the vehicle registration must be in the
vehicle at all times. For duplicate license plate numbers, the
department may add a number or letter in the field to designate the
vehicle in which the license plate has been assigned. Law enforcement
must be able to access the vehicle data by the license plate number.
The department may adopt rules to designate the placement of the
vehicle registration tab on the license plate or vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.220 and 2010 c 161 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW,
the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(b) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(c) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(d) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 ((N/A)) $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(f) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(g) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(h) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 (( N/A)) $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(j) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(k) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(l) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(m) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(n) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(o) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(p) Ski and ride Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(q) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(r) Washington lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(s) Washington state parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(t) Washington's national
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(u) Washington's wildlife
collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(v) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(w) Wild on Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after October 1, 2011.

--- END ---