BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.470 and 2009 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Air conditioning equipment," as used or referred to in this
section, means mechanical vapor compression refrigeration equipment
((which)) that is used to cool the driver's or passenger compartment of
any motor vehicle.
(2) ((Such)) Air conditioning equipment ((shall)) must be
manufactured, installed, and maintained with due regard for the safety
of the occupants of the vehicle and the public ((and shall)). Air
conditioning equipment may not contain any refrigerant ((which)) that
is toxic to persons or ((which)) that is flammable, unless the
refrigerant is ((included in the list published by the United States
environmental protection agency, as it exists on July 26, 2009, as a
safe alternative motor vehicle air conditioning substitute for
chlorofluorocarbon-12 under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7671k(c))) allowed under the
department of ecology's motor vehicle emission standards adopted under
RCW 70.120A.010.
(3) The state patrol may ((adopt and)) enforce safety requirements,
regulations, and specifications consistent with the requirements of
this section applicable to ((such)) air conditioning equipment which
((shall)) must correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the
current recommended practice or standard applicable to ((such)) air
conditioning equipment approved by the society of automotive engineers.
(4) ((No)) A person ((shall have for sale, offer for sale,)) may
not sell((,)) or equip ((any)), for use in this state, a new motor
vehicle with any ((such)) air conditioning equipment unless it complies
with the requirements of this section.
(5) ((No)) A person ((shall)) may not operate on any highway any
motor vehicle equipped with any air conditioning equipment unless
((said)) the equipment complies with the requirements of this section.

--- END ---