BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.200 and 2010 c 161 s 611 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature recognizes that the special license plate
review board established in RCW 46.16.705 reviews and approves
applications for special license plate series.
(2))) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the
((special license plate review board)) department:
(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates
unless otherwise specified;
(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the
department;
(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW; and
(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the ((special
license plate review board)) department.
(((3) The special license plate review board approves, and)) (2)
The department approves and shall issue((,)) the following special
license plates:

LICENSE PLATE DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

Armed forces collection Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty
military personnel, reservists, and members of the national
guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a
symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces
to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard,
and national guard.

Endangered wildlife Displays a symbol or artwork, approved by the special
license plate review board and the legislature.

Gonzaga University alumni association Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak Recognizes an organization that supports programs that
provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in
the line of duty.

Professional firefighters and paramedics Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who
are members of the Washington state council of
firefighters.

Share the road Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety
and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

Volunteer firefighters Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington lighthouses Recognizes an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental
education programs.

Washington state parks Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations
of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural,
cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and
supports priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wildlife collection Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets Recognizes an organization that assists local member
agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control
agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on
Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(((4))) (3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional
firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof
eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the
Washington state council of firefighters.
(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighter special license
plates must be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and must
have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire
service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service
between two and ten years after the license plates are issued, the
volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the
department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer
firefighter stays in service for at least ten years and then leaves,
the license plate will be retained by the former volunteer firefighter
and the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals.
A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of
license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant,
for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted
of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be
surrendered upon conviction.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.17.220 and 2010 c 161 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW,
the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(b) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(c) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(d) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(e) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(f) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(g) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(h) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(j) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(k) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(l) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(m) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(n) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(o) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(p) Ski and ride Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(q) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(r) Volunteer firefighters $28.00 $2.00 Section 3 of this act

(s) Washington lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((s))) (t) Washington state
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((t))) (u) Washington's
national parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((u))) (v) Washington's
wildlife collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((v))) (w) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((w))) (x) Wild on
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall collect special license plate fees under RCW
46.17.220(1)(r) and apply the fees towards administration and
collection expenses incurred by the department.

--- END ---