BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.08.010 and 2009 c 333 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title or
rules adopted under this title unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(2) "Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under subsections (3), (28), (40), (44), (58), and (59) of this
section, aquatic noxious weeds as defined under RCW 17.26.020(5)(c),
and aquatic nuisance species as defined under RCW 77.60.130(1).
(3) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed, partially
submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species that grows
in or near a body of water or wetland.
(4) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(5) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(6) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(7) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(8) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(9) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(10) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(11) "Contraband" means any property that is unlawful to produce or
possess.
(12) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(13) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(14) "Director" means the director of ((fish and wildlife)) the
department.
(15) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(16) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(17) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(18) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(19) "Fish broker" means a person whose business it is to bring a
seller of fish and shellfish and a purchaser of those fish and
shellfish together.
(20) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(21) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(26) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(27) "Illegal items" means those items unlawful to be possessed.
(28) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(29) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(30) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(31) "Money" means all currency, script, personal checks, money
orders, or other negotiable instruments.
(32) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(33) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(34) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(35) "Owner" means the person in whom is vested the ownership
dominion, or title of the property.
(36) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(37) "Personal property" or "property" includes both corporeal and
incorporeal personal property and includes, among other property,
contraband and money.
(38) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(39) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(40) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(41) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(42) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(43) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the boat, as
well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any auxiliary
equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(44) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(45) "Resident" means:
(a) A person who has maintained a permanent place of abode within
the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an application
for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue
residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state; and
(b) A person age eighteen or younger who does not qualify as a
resident under (a) of this subsection, but who has a parent that
qualifies as a resident under (a) of this subsection.
(46) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially harvested salmon,
crab, and sturgeon.
(47) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(48) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(49) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(50) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(51) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(52) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(53) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(54) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(55) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(56) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(57) "Unclaimed" means that no owner of the property has been
identified or has requested, in writing, the release of the property to
themselves nor has the owner of the property designated an individual
to receive the property or paid the required postage to effect delivery
of the property.
(58) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(59) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(60) "Wholesale fish dealer" means a person who, acting for
commercial purposes, takes possession or ownership of fish or shellfish
and sells, barters, or exchanges or attempts to sell, barter, or
exchange fish or shellfish that have been landed into the state of
Washington or entered the state of Washington in interstate or foreign
commerce.
(61) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals ((or)), moles, gophers, Eastern grey squirrels,
California ground squirrels, and old world rats and mice of the family
Muridae of the order Rodentia.
(62) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(63) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(64) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(65) "Animal problem" means a situation where a wild animal
threatens or damages either public or private property or resources,
threatens or injures livestock or any other domestic animal, or creates
a threat to public health and safety.
(66) "Body-gripping trap" means any trap, other than a net, that
grips an animal's body or body part, including leghold and foothold
traps, neck snares, and nonstrangling foot snares.
(67) "Mountain beaver" means the species Aplodontia rufa.
(68) "Prohibited trap" means:
(a) All body-gripping traps;
(b) Traps or other devices that use sodium fluoroacetate or sodium
cyanide as a killing agent; and
(c) Any other trap types prohibited from use in Washington by the
commission.
(69) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for
purposes of retail sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The commission has the authority to manage
the trapping of wild animals in Washington. This authority includes
the ability to establish trapping seasons, prohibit the use of any trap
type, establish prerequisites for the receipt of a trapping license,
establish requirements for commerce in raw fur, establish required
timelines for checking set traps, establish requirements for the
handling, holding, transport, dispatch, and release of captured
wildlife, and adopt any other rules deemed necessary by the commission
for the management of wild animal trapping consistent with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person must possess a department-issued Washington trapping license in order to lawfully trap wild
animals throughout the state. Prior to being issued a trapping
license, the person must satisfy the requirements of section 4 of this
act.
(2)(a) A Washington trapping license allows the holder to trap wild
animals and wild birds on his or her property, or on the property of
another, consistent with this title.
(b) A Washington trapping license is valid from the date of
issuance until the April 1st following the date of issuance.
(c) The fee for a Washington trapping license is as provided in RCW
77.65.450.
(3)(a) The holder of a trapping license under this section must
complete and submit to the department an accurate annual report of
catch as required by rule of the commission. The report must be
submitted to the department regardless of trapping success, and
indicate the number, general location, and species of all wild animals
captured that were not part of an animal problem controlled pursuant to
section 6 of this act.
(b) The holders of trapping licenses that fail to submit a report
of catch shall, in addition to the penalties provided for in RCW
77.15.280, have their trapping privileges suspended for one year.
(c) It is the responsibility of each trapping licensee to submit a
report of trapping results as required by rule of the commission.
(d) The department shall maintain and summarize all catch reports
received under this section, and shall present the summarized
information to the commission.
(4) All persons trapping with a license issued under this section
must comply with the provisions of this title and all rules adopted by
the commission under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Prior to being issued an initial
Washington trapping license under section 3 of this act, a person must
present the department with a certification of completion of a course
of instruction in safe, humane, and proper trapping techniques or pass
an examination to establish that the applicant has the requisite
knowledge.
(2) The department shall establish a program for training persons
in trapping techniques and responsibilities, including the use of
trapping devices designed to painlessly capture or instantly kill. The
department shall cooperate with Washington-based animal shelters,
humane organizations, wildlife rehabilitation centers and similar
entities providing animal care and rehabilitation services, hunter
education groups, and Washington-based trapping organizations in the
development and instruction of a curriculum for the training program.
Upon successful completion of the course, trainees must be given a
training certificate signed by an authorized instructor, which must be
accepted by the department as evidence of compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All individuals setting a trap for a
wild animal must attach to the chain of their traps or devices a
legible metal tag with either the department identification number of
the trapper or the name and address of the trapper in English letters
not less than one-eighth inch in height.
(2) No person may place a trap on private property without
permission of the owner, lessee, or tenant if:
(a) The land is improved and apparently used;
(b) The land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders or to indicate a property boundary line; or
(c) Notice that the land is used is given by posting in a
conspicuous manner.
(3) When a property owner, lessee, or tenant presents a trap
identification number to the department for a trap found upon the
property of the owner, lessee, or tenant and requests identification of
the trapper, the department shall provide the requestor with the name
and address of the trapper. Prior to disclosure of the trapper's name
and address, the department shall obtain the name and address of the
requesting individual in writing and after disclosing the trapper's
name and address to the requesting individual, the requesting
individual's name and address shall be disclosed in writing to the
trapper whose name and address was disclosed.
(4) A property owner, lessee, or tenant may remove any trap placed
on the owner's, lessee's, or tenant's posted or fenced property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, it is unlawful to use, attempt to use, or authorize the use of
any prohibited trap to capture any wild animal.
(2)(a) The department may authorize a public or private landowner,
tenant, or designee of the landowner or tenant to use specific types of
body-gripping traps identified by the commission under section 7 of
this act on his or her own property in order to address an animal
problem if:
(i) The individual operating the traps holds a valid trapping
license under section 3 of this act or has contracted with a trapper
licensed under section 3 of this act; and
(ii) The landowner or tenant has documented to the department that
a specific animal problem either exists or could potentially exist, and
that nonlethal methods for addressing the animal problem cannot be
reasonably and effectively applied.
(b) The owner or operator of commercial timber, as those terms are
defined in RCW 76.09.020, may use otherwise prohibited body-gripping
traps to capture mountain beavers. All individual mountain beavers
trapped under this section, and the approximate location of the
trapping, must be reported to the department on an annual basis.
(c) Department employees, or individuals working with the
permission of or under the supervision of department employees, may use
otherwise prohibited traps if the use of the traps is the only
practical means of protecting threatened or endangered species as
designated under RCW 77.08.010.
(d) The department may authorize the use of otherwise prohibited
traps to conduct legitimate wildlife research.
(e) The operators of public airports or the operators of private
airports open to the public may use otherwise prohibited body-gripping
traps, either on property controlled by the airport operator or on
property in the immediate vicinity of the airport, to capture any
wildlife not listed as threatened or endangered if the wildlife is
posing a threat to human health and safety. Animals trapped under this
section must be reported to the department on an annual basis.
(3) If the commission has not identified at least one specific type
of body-gripping trap for a particular animal problem in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section, the director may issue a special
permit to a public or private tenant or landowner for that animal
problem consistent with WAC 232-12-142, as it existed on January 1,
2011.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commission shall adopt and maintain a
list of body-gripping traps that may be lawfully used under section 6
of this act. The commission shall adopt specific trap types for
specific animal problems that are the most humane effective traps for
the targeted animal problem. The adoption of permissible trap types
under this section must be consistent with the established applicable
furbearer trapping best management practices either adopted by an
association that represent North America's fish and wildlife management
agencies or that is otherwise acknowledged in either academic
literature or international treaties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell,
barter, or otherwise exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or
otherwise exchange a wild animal, or the raw fur of a wild animal, that
has been trapped in this state with a prohibited trap, unless the wild
animal was trapped lawfully under section 6 of this act. Raw fur from
other sources may be bought, sold, or bartered consistent with any
rules adopted by the commission.
(2) The carcass of any animal captured in a prohibited trap may be
donated by the department to a public health or research institution.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A person is guilty of unlawful trapping
if the person:
(a) Sets out traps that are capable of taking wild animals, game
animals, or furbearing mammals and does not possess all licenses, tags,
or permits required under this title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including game
reserves, closed times, or any other rule governing the trapping of
wild animals that does not constitute a violation of section 6 of this
act; or
(c) Fails to identify the owner of the traps or devices consistent
with section 5 of this act.
(2) Unlawful trapping is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The director may revoke the trapping
license of a person placing unauthorized traps on private property.
Any unauthorized traps found on private property may be removed by the
department.
(2) The director shall revoke the trapping license of any person
convicted of a violation of section 6 of this act, and suspend the
violator's trapping privileges for five years following the revocation.
If a person is convicted of subsequent violations of section 6 of this
act, the director shall permanently suspend his or her trapping
privileges.
(3) A person who has his or her trapping privileges revoked under
this section must satisfy the trapping education requirements of
section 4 of this act no more than one year before a new trapping
license is granted.
(4) The suspensions and revocations outlined in this section are to
be applied in addition to any appropriate criminal penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Federal wildlife agencies and their
employees and agents, while acting lawfully within the scope of their
authority, are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) By vesting the authority to assess and
approve trap types with the fish and wildlife commission, the
legislature recognizes the specialized expertise of the fish and
wildlife commission in overseeing the management of problem wildlife.
Section 7 of this act is intended to create safeguards that ensure the
decision to allow a specific type of body-gripping trap in the state of
Washington will receive an elevated level of scrutiny that is in
balance with the gravity of the decision.
(2) To ensure that the safeguards created in section 7 of this act
are working to satisfy the goals of this act, the fish and wildlife
commission shall prepare a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.01.036. The
report must be completed prior to the commencement of the regularly
scheduled 2012 legislative session, and must assess the trap type
evaluation process created in this act in light of the legislature's
goals in adopting this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.65.450 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A state trapping license allows the holder to trap fur-bearing
animals throughout the state; however, a trapper may not place traps on
private property without permission of the owner, lessee, or tenant
where the land is improved and apparently used, or where the land is
fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude intruders or to
indicate a property boundary line, or where notice is given by posting
in a conspicuous manner. A state trapping license is void on April 1st
following the date of issuance.)) The fee for ((this)) a Washington
trapping license, as required in section 3 of this act, is thirty-six
dollars for residents sixteen years of age or older, fifteen dollars
for residents under sixteen years of age, and one hundred eighty
dollars for nonresidents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 2 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.15.190 (Unlawful trapping -- Penalty) and 1999 c 258 s 9
& 1998 c 190 s 34;
(2) RCW 77.15.191 (Revocation of trapper's license -- Placement of
unauthorized traps) and 2000 c 107 s 268 & 1987 c 372 s 4;
(3) RCW 77.15.192 (Definitions) and 2001 c 1 s 2;
(4) RCW 77.15.194 (Unlawful traps -- Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 374 &
2001 c 1 s 3;
(5) RCW 77.15.196 (Unlawful poison -- Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 375 &
2001 c 1 s 4;
(6) RCW 77.15.198 (Violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196--Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 376 & 2001 c 1 s 5;
(7) RCW 77.32.545 (Removal of trap -- Identification of traps--Disclosure of identities) and 1998 c 190 s 121, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 75,
1988 c 36 s 51, 1987 c 372 s 1, 1980 c 78 s 85, & 1955 c 36 s
77.16.170; and
(8) RCW 77.65.460 (Trapper's license -- Training program or
examination requisite for issuance to initial licensee) and 1987 c 506
s 82, 1981 c 310 s 24, 1980 c 78 s 114, & 1977 c 43 s 1.

--- END ---