BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that the purpose of
the public records act is to make public records available to the
people of this state so that they remain informed about the conduct and
performance of government. Although penalties may be assessed in favor
of a person who files a court action under the act, the payment of
penalties diverts funds provided by tax and fee payers from programs
and services that benefit all the people. The legislature finds that
some requesters do not inform an agency of a disagreement or possible
mistake in the production of records until after a court action is
filed, leaving the agency with no opportunity to correct an error and
thereby maximizing the agency's potential liability for penalties. In
order to ensure that public records are made available without an
unnecessary diversion of public funds, the legislature finds that an
agency should be given an opportunity to cure an error and provide the
public record that may have been previously withheld or not located.
This will strengthen the purpose of the act and reduce the loss of
public funds through the assessment of penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who may file an action under RCW 42.56.550, referred
to in this section as the "requester," may present a public records
claim to the agency that previously denied the request by following the
procedures in this section. A claim is deemed presented when the
completed claim is received by the agency after the agency has denied
the requester an opportunity to inspect or copy a public record and
before the date an action is filed by the requester under RCW
42.56.550.
(2) A public records claim shall be presented to the agency and
addressed to the public records officer. The claim shall be in
writing, state that it is a public records claim, and contain the
information listed in subsection (3) of this section. The attorney
general's office shall provide a claim form on its web site that
requesters may choose to use.
(3) The requester shall provide the following information on or
with the claim:
(a) The name of the agency to which the request for public records
was submitted, and any tracking number the agency assigned to the
request;
(b) A copy of the public records request at issue;
(c) The name of the requester;
(d) A mailing address and, at the option of the requester, an
electronic mail address to which the agency should send its response to
the claim;
(e) The date the claim was completed;
(f) A description or list that specifies which record or records,
or portions thereof, the requester asserts have been improperly
withheld, redacted, or otherwise denied, together with a brief
explanation as to why the record or records, or portions thereof,
should be produced;
(g) If the requester believes the agency has failed to produce
records or respond to a request, any other information the requester
can provide to assist the agency in identifying and locating the
requested records; and
(h) Any other information the requester wants the agency to
consider.
(4) The agency must send a response to the requester no later than
twenty-one calendar days after delivery of the public records claim to
the agency. The response must be sent by United States mail or, if the
requester has so requested, by electronic mail. A response is deemed
sent on the date it is deposited in the United States mail, first-class
postage prepaid. A response transmitted by electronic mail is deemed
to have been sent on the date indicated on the face of the electronic
mail.
(5) The agency may respond to the claim by:
(a) Granting all or part of the claim by producing some or all of
the records, or portions of records, that the requester asserted had
been withheld, redacted, or otherwise denied improperly or not
produced; and
(b) Rejecting all or part of the claim in writing, with or without
explanation. A failure to send a response within the time specified in
subsection (4) of this section is deemed to be a rejection of the
claim.
(6) The applicable period of limitations within which an action
must be commenced under this chapter shall be tolled during the twenty-one calendar day period. For the purposes of the applicable period of
limitations, an action commenced within seven court days after the
twenty-one calendar day period has elapsed is deemed to have been filed
timely.
(7) The presentation of a public records claim to the agency is not
a prerequisite for filing an action in court under RCW 42.56.550.
However, if a requester does not present a public records claim in
accordance with this section before the date an action is filed in
court, the agency has until thirty calendar days from the date of
service of the action on the agency to produce for inspection or
copying the records that previously had been denied.
(8) A penalty under RCW 42.56.550(4) shall not be awarded regarding
any record or portion thereof that the agency produces to the
requester:
(a) In response to a public records claim presented in accordance
with this section; or
(b) Within the time period provided in subsection (7) of this
section after the filing of an action in court under RCW 42.56.550, if
a public records claim was not presented before the date of the filing
of the action.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.550 and 2005 c 483 s 5 and 2005 c 274 s 288 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the motion of any person having been denied an opportunity
to inspect or copy a public record by an agency, the superior court in
the county in which a record is maintained may require the responsible
agency to show cause why it has refused to allow inspection or copying
of a specific public record or class of records. The burden of proof
shall be on the agency to establish that refusal to permit public
inspection and copying is in accordance with a statute that exempts or
prohibits disclosure in whole or in part of specific information or
records.
(2) Upon the motion of any person who believes that an agency has
not made a reasonable estimate of the time that the agency requires to
respond to a public record request, the superior court in the county in
which a record is maintained may require the responsible agency to show
that the estimate it provided is reasonable. The burden of proof shall
be on the agency to show that the estimate it provided is reasonable.
(3) Judicial review of all agency actions taken or challenged under
RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.520 shall be de novo. Courts shall take
into account the policy of this chapter that free and open examination
of public records is in the public interest, even though such
examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment to public
officials or others. Courts may examine any record in camera in any
proceeding brought under this section. The court may conduct a hearing
based solely on affidavits.
(4) Any person who prevails against an agency in any action in the
courts seeking the right to inspect or copy any public record or the
right to receive a response to a public record request within a
reasonable amount of time shall be awarded all costs, including
reasonable attorney fees, incurred in connection with such legal
action. In addition, it shall be within the discretion of the court to
award such person an amount not less than five dollars and not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day that he or she was denied the
right to inspect or copy said public record. However, a court shall
not award any penalty regarding any record or portion thereof that the
agency produces pursuant to section 2 of this act.
(5) For actions under this section against counties, the venue
provisions of RCW 36.01.050 apply.
(6) Actions under this section must be filed within one year of the
agency's claim of exemption or the last production of a record on a
partial or installment basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---