BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some small towns
lack access to high-speed internet services. This is often due to the
town's remote location and lack of existing telecommunications
infrastructure. Access to high-speed internet and wireless service is
an important element for ensuring economic vitality in all communities.
The legislature intends to authorize towns to provide high-speed
internet access when there is no other provider of such services
available in their town and surrounding community.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.27.370 and 2008 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council of said town shall have power:
(1) To pass ordinances not in conflict with the Constitution and
laws of this state, or of the United States;
(2) To purchase, lease or receive such real estate and personal
property as may be necessary or proper for municipal purposes, and to
control, dispose of and convey the same for the benefit of the town; to
acquire, own, and hold real estate for cemetery purposes either within
or without the corporate limits, to sell and dispose of such real
estate, to plat or replat such real estate into cemetery lots and to
sell and dispose of any and all lots therein, and to operate, improve
and maintain the same as a cemetery;
(3) To contract for supplying the town with water for municipal
purposes, or to acquire, construct, repair and manage pumps, aqueducts,
reservoirs, or other works necessary or proper for supplying water for
use of such town or its inhabitants, or for irrigating purposes
therein;
(4) To establish, build and repair bridges, to establish, lay out,
alter, widen, extend, keep open, improve, and repair streets,
sidewalks, alleys, squares and other public highways and places within
the town, and to drain, sprinkle and light the same; to remove all
obstructions therefrom; to establish the grades thereof; to grade,
pave, plank, macadamize, gravel and curb the same, in whole or in part,
and to construct gutters, culverts, sidewalks and crosswalks therein,
or on any part thereof; to cause to be planted, set out and cultivated
trees therein, and generally to manage and control all such highways
and places;
(5) To establish, construct and maintain drains and sewers, and
shall have power to compel all property owners on streets along which
sewers are constructed to make proper connections therewith, and to use
the same for proper purposes when such property is improved by the
erection thereon of a building or buildings; and in case the owners of
such improved property on such streets shall fail to make such
connections within the time fixed by such council, they may cause such
connections to be made, and to assess against the property in front of
which such connections are made the costs and expenses thereof;
(6) To provide fire engines and all other necessary or proper
apparatus for the prevention and extinguishment of fires;
(7) To impose and collect an annual license on every dog within the
limits of the town, to prohibit dogs running at large, and to provide
for the killing of all dogs found at large and not duly licensed;
(8) To levy and collect annually a property tax, for the payment of
current expenses and for the payment of indebtedness (if any
indebtedness exists) within the limits authorized by law;
(9) To license, for purposes of regulation and revenue, all and
every kind of business, authorized by law and transacted and carried on
in such town; and all shows, exhibitions and lawful games carried on
therein and within one mile of the corporate limits thereof; to fix the
rate of license tax upon the same, and to provide for the collection of
the same, by suit or otherwise; to regulate, restrain, or prohibit the
running at large of any and all domestic animals within the city
limits, or any part or parts thereof, and to regulate the keeping of
such animals within any part of the city; to establish, maintain and
regulate a common pound for estrays, and to appoint a poundkeeper, who
shall be paid out of the fines and fees imposed on, and collected from,
the owners of any impounded stock. A city may not require a business
to be licensed based solely upon registration under or compliance with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement;
(10) To improve the rivers and streams flowing through such town or
adjoining the same; to widen, straighten and deepen the channels
thereof, and to remove obstructions therefrom; to prevent the pollution
of streams or water running through such town, and for this purpose
shall have jurisdiction for two miles in either direction; to improve
the waterfront of the town, and to construct and maintain embankments
and other works to protect such town from overflow;
(11) To erect and maintain buildings for municipal purposes;
(12) To grant franchises or permits to use and occupy the surface,
the overhead and the underground of streets, alleys and other public
ways, under such terms and conditions as it shall deem fit, for any and
all purposes, including but not being limited to the construction,
maintenance and operation of railroads, street railways, transportation
systems, water, gas and steam systems, telephone and telegraph systems,
electric lines, signal systems, surface, aerial and underground
tramways;
(13) To punish the keepers and inmates and lessors of houses of ill
fame, and keepers and lessors of gambling houses and rooms and other
places where gambling is carried on or permitted, gamblers and keepers
of gambling tables;
(14) To impose fines, penalties and forfeitures for any and all
violations of ordinances, and for any breach or violation of any
ordinance, to fix the penalty by fine or imprisonment, or both; but no
such fine shall exceed five thousand dollars, nor the term of
imprisonment exceed one year, except that the punishment for any
criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in
state law for the same crime; or to provide that violations of
ordinances constitute a civil violation subject to a monetary penalty,
but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil violation;
(15) To operate ambulance service which may serve the town and
surrounding rural areas and, in the discretion of the council, to make
a charge for such service;
(16) Subject to the conditions in section 3 of this act, to
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license,
provide, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair, operate,
and maintain high-speed internet service or facilities for the
provision of high-speed internet service in circumstances where a
private provider does not offer such services;
(17) To make all such ordinances, bylaws, rules, regulations and
resolutions not inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the
state of Washington, as may be deemed expedient to maintain the peace,
good government and welfare of the town and its trade, commerce and
manufacturers, and to do and perform any and all other acts and things
necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, towns may
provide high-speed internet services as authorized in RCW 35.27.370(16)
after enacting an ordinance that establishes:
(a) There are no other high-speed internet service providers
available for the community;
(b) The proposed geographical area or areas that will be provided
service;
(c) The general business plan for providing high-speed internet
services, including the targeted users of the services, the type of
infrastructure, the technology or technologies to be used, and the
types of services that will be provided;
(d) The proposed funding source that will be used to pay for the
infrastructure, facilities, operations, and maintenance of any high-speed internet services and the estimated cost to the taxpayers; and
(e) The establishment of a separate account for any revenues and
expenditures for those services according to standards established by
the state auditor pursuant to the auditor's authority in chapter 43.09
RCW and consistent with the provisions of this title. Any revenues
received from the provision of high-speed internet service must be
dedicated to costs incurred to build and maintain any high-speed
internet facilities constructed, installed, or acquired to provide such
services, including payments on debt issued to finance such services,
until such time as any bonds or other financing instruments executed
after the effective date of this section and used to finance such high-speed internet facilities are discharged or retired.
(2) The ordinance is subject to referendum of the people if a
petition with the number of signatures of legal voters equal to or
exceeding four percent of the voters in the proposed high-speed
internet service area cast at the last regular gubernatorial election
is submitted to the county auditor's office no later than forty-five
days from the date the ordinance was passed.
(3) For purposes of RCW 35.27.370 and this section, high-speed
internet services means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using satellite, wireless, broadband, or any other mechanism
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies, but not to include
services commonly known as radio, television, or telephone services.
(4) The authority granted to a town under RCW 35.27.370(16) and
this section to provide high-speed internet service to consumers
expires one year after a determination by the department of information
services that high-speed internet service is offered in the town by a
private provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---