BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.110 and 2005 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Partisan office" means a public office for which a candidate may
indicate a political party preference on his or her declaration of
candidacy and have that preference appear on the primary and general
election ballot in conjunction with his or her name. The following are
partisan offices:
(1) United States senator and United States representative;
(2) All state offices, including legislative, except (a) judicial
offices and (b) the office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices ((and)); (b) the
office of the county auditor; and (c) those offices for which a county
home rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.121 and 2004 c 271 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The positions or offices on a primary consolidated ballot
shall be arranged in substantially the following order: United States
senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor;
secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public instruction;
insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative; county
officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of
appeals; judges of the superior court; ((and)) judges of the district
court; and the office of the county auditor. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary consolidated ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction shall be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(b)(i) The positions or offices on a primary party ballot must be
arranged in substantially the following order: United States senator;
United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary
of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; insurance commissioner; state senator;
state representative; and partisan county officers. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary party ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(ii) The positions or offices on a primary nonpartisan ballot must
be arranged in substantially the following order: Superintendent of
public instruction; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court
of appeals; judges of the superior court; ((and)) judges of the
district court; and the office of the county auditor. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary nonpartisan ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary consolidated ballot
except that state ballot issues must be placed before all offices. The
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. The
positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding local
units of government shall be established by the secretary of state by
rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the primary and election ballot. A candidate shall file
a written notice with the filing officer within three business days
after the close of the filing period designating the political party to
be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a)
The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political parties
or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has both filed a
declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a major
political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing
officer shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party
or independent convention only if all documentation required by chapter
29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

--- END ---