BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.154.010 and 1989 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that the practice by nonlawyers
of assisting persons ((regarding immigration matters)) in obtaining
benefits under the immigration laws of the United States substantially
affects the public interest. The practice((s)) of ((immigration
assistants have a significant impact on the residents of the state of
Washington)) nonlawyers providing immigration-related services for
compensation may impact the ability of their customers to reside and
work within the United States and to establish and maintain stable
families and business relationships. The legislature further finds and
declares that the previous scheme for regulating the behavior of
nonlawyers who provide immigration-related services is inadequate to
address the level of unfair and deceptive practices that exist in the
marketplace and often contributes to the unauthorized practice of law.
It is the intent of the legislature, through this act, to ((establish
rules of practice and conduct for immigration assistants to promote
honesty and fair dealing with residents and to preserve public
confidence)) end the practice of nonlawyers providing immigration
services that constitute the practice of law.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.154.020 and 1989 c 117 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Immigration assistant" means every person who, for
compensation or the expectation of compensation, gives nonlegal
assistance on an immigration matter. That assistance is limited to:
(a) Transcribing responses to a government agency form selected by
the customer which is related to an immigration matter, but does not
include advising a person as to his or her answers on those forms;
(b) Translating a person's answer to questions posed on those
forms;
(c) Securing for a person supporting documents currently in
existence, such as birth and marriage certificates, which may be needed
to submit with those forms;
(d) Making referrals to attorneys who could undertake legal
representation for a person in an immigration matter.
(2))) "Immigration matter" means any proceeding, filing, or action
affecting the nonimmigrant, immigrant, or citizenship status of any
person ((which arises)) arising under immigration and naturalization
law, executive order, or presidential proclamation, or ((which arises
under)) pursuant to any action of the United States citizenship and
immigration ((and naturalization)) services, the United States
department of labor, ((or)) the United States department of state, the
United States department of justice, the United States department of
homeland security, the board of immigration appeals, or any other
entity or agency having jurisdiction over immigration law.
(((3))) (2) "Compensation" means money, property, or anything else
of value.
(3) "Practice of law" means the application of legal principles and
judgment with regard to the circumstances or objectives of another
entity or person that requires the knowledge and skill of a person
trained in the law. This includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Giving advice or counsel to others as to their legal rights or
the legal rights or responsibilities of others for fees or other
consideration;
(b) Selecting, drafting, or completion of legal documents which
affect the legal rights of an entity or person;
(c) Representation of another entity or person in a court, or in a
formal proceeding or other formal dispute resolution process or in an
administrative adjudicative proceeding in which legal pleadings are
filed or a record review is established as the basis for judicial
review;
(d) Negotiation of legal rights or responsibilities on behalf of
another entity or person; and
(e) Any other acts that constitute the practice of law as
determined by the supreme court and other courts of this state, whether
by rule or decision.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.154.060 and 1989 c 117 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Immigration assistants shall offer or provide only nonlegal
assistance in an immigration matter as defined in RCW 19.154.020.)) (1)
Persons, other than those licensed to practice law in this state or
otherwise permitted to practice law or provide legal or other
immigration-related services under federal law in an immigration
matter, are prohibited from engaging in the practice of law in an
immigration matter for compensation.
(2) Persons, other than those licensed to practice law in this
state or otherwise permitted to practice law or provide legal or other
immigration-related services under federal law in an immigration
matter, are prohibited from engaging in the following acts or
practices, for compensation:
(a) Selecting or assisting another in selecting, or advising
another as to his or her answers on, a government agency form or
document in an immigration matter;
(b) Selecting or assisting another in selecting, or advising
another in selecting, a benefit, visa, or program to apply for in an
immigration matter;
(c) Soliciting to prepare documents for, or otherwise representing
the interests of, another in a judicial or administrative proceeding in
an immigration matter;
(d) Explaining, advising, or otherwise interpreting the meaning or
intent of a question on a government agency form in an immigration
matter;
(e) Charging a fee for obtaining or providing a paper or electronic
copy of a government agency form in an immigration matter;
(f) Charging a fee for referring another to an attorney licensed to
practice law;
(g) Drafting, writing, or otherwise creating documents to support
or establish a benefit for another in an immigration matter.
(3) Persons, other than those licensed to practice law in this
state or otherwise permitted to practice law or provide legal or other
immigration-related services under federal law in an immigration
matter, are prohibited from engaging in the following acts or
practices, regardless of whether compensation is sought:
(a) Representing, either orally or in any document, letterhead,
advertisement, stationery, business card, web site, or other comparable
written material, that he or she is a lawyer, notario publico, notario,
immigration assistant, immigration consultant, immigration specialist,
or using any other designation or title, in any language, that conveys
or implies that he or she possesses professional legal skills in the
area of immigration law;
(b) Representing, in any language, either orally or in any
document, letterhead, advertisement, stationery, business card, web
site, or other comparable written material, that he or she can or is
willing to provide services in an immigration matter, if such services
would constitute the practice of law.
(4) In addition to complying with the prohibitions of subsections
(1) through (3) of this section, persons licensed as a notary public
under chapter 42.44 RCW who are not licensed to practice law in this
state shall not use the term notario publico, notario, or any other
term, in any language, that conveys or implies that he or she possesses
professional skills in the areas of immigration law, when advertising
notary public services in the conduct of their business. A violation
of any provision of this chapter by a person licensed as a notary
public under chapter 42.44 RCW shall constitute unprofessional conduct
under the uniform regulation of business and professions act, chapter
18.235 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.154.090 and 1989 c 117 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares that any violation of this
chapter substantially affects the public interest and is an unfair and
deceptive act or practice and unfair method of competition in the
conduct of trade or commerce as set forth in RCW 19.86.020.
(2) In addition to all remedies available in chapter 19.86 RCW, a
person injured by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action
to recover the actual damages proximately caused by a violation of this
chapter, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.154.900 and 1989 c 117 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter shall be known and cited as the "immigration
((assistant practices)) services fraud prevention act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.154 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall apply to or regulate any business to
the extent such regulation is prohibited or preempted by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 19.154.030 (Exemptions) and 1989 c 117 s 3;
(2) RCW 19.154.040 (Registration required) and 1989 c 117 s 4;
(3) RCW 19.154.050 (Change of address) and 1989 c 117 s 5;
(4) RCW 19.154.070 (Written contract -- Requirements -- Right to
rescind) and 1989 c 117 s 7;
(5) RCW 19.154.080 (Prohibited activities) and 1989 c 117 s 8; and
(6) RCW 19.154.902 (Effective date -- 1989 c 117) and 1989 c 117 s
15.

--- END ---