BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license is
required to:
(a) Use spot shrimp pot gear to fish for spot shrimp;
(b) Possess spot shrimp; and
(c) Deliver spot shrimp.
(2) Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery licenses require
vessel designation under RCW 77.65.100.
(3) A violation of this section is punishable under RCW 77.15.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license:
(a) May only be issued to a natural person who held a coastal spot
shrimp experimental emerging commercial fishery license and coastal
spot shrimp fishery permit in 2010 or had the license transferred to
him or her, under RCW 77.65.020 and 77.65.040, by a person who held a
coastal spot shrimp experimental emerging commercial fishery license
and coastal spot shrimp fishery permit in 2010;
(b) Must be renewed annually by December 31st of the calendar year
to remain active; and
(c) Subject to the restrictions of subsection (7) of this section
and to RCW 77.65.020 and 77.65.040, is transferable to a natural person
beginning January 1, 2012.
(2) When a person fails to obtain a Washington-coastal spot shrimp
pot fishery license during the previous year because of a license
suspension, the person may qualify for a license by establishing that
the person held such a license during the last year in which the
license was not suspended.
(3) The annual fee for a Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery
license is as specified in RCW 77.65.220.
(4) Beginning in 2013, after taking into consideration the status
of the coastal spot shrimp population, the market for spot shrimp, and
the number of active fishers, both nontreaty and treaty, the director
may issue a Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license to a
natural person if the issuance would not raise the number of active
spot shrimp pot fishery licenses to more than eight.
(5) Beginning 2012, a Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery
license holder is prohibited from designating, on the Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license:
(a) A vessel whose surveyed length overall is more than ten feet
longer than the surveyed length overall of the vessel designated on the
licensee's coastal spot shrimp experimental emerging commercial fishery
license as of March 31, 2003; and
(b) A vessel whose surveyed length overall exceeds ninety feet.
(6) In the event the Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery
license is transferred by sale, lease, inheritance, or lottery, and
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the vessel length
restriction associated with that license must remain attached to the
license.
(7) A natural person may not own or hold an ownership interest in
more than one Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license at a
time.
(8) Only a person who owns or is designated as an operator of the
vessel designated on the license may hold a Washington-coastal spot
shrimp pot fishery license.
(9) Nothing in this section:
(a) Requires the commission to open a commercial coastal spot
shrimp fishery in any given year;
(b) Prohibits the commission from closing or limiting an opened
commercial coastal spot shrimp fishery for any reason; or
(c) Confers any right of compensation to the holder of a
Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery license if the license is
revoked, limited, or modified by the legislature.
(10) Issuance of a Washington-coastal spot shrimp pot fishery
license does not create, and may not be construed to create, any right,
title, or interest in the coastal spot shrimp resource.
(11) The legislature recognizes that Washington-coastal spot shrimp
pot fishery licenses may be revoked by future legislatures if the
fishery is found to have jeopardized the sustainability of the coastal
spot shrimp resource or the marine ecosystem.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.65.210 and 2007 c 442 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not use a commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or
shellfish taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters to a port in
the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As used in this
section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and
include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters. As used in this section, "food
fish" does not include salmon. As used in this section, "shellfish"
does not include ocean pink shrimp, coastal crab, coastal spot shrimp,
or fish or shellfish taken under an emerging commercial fisheries
license if taken from off-shore waters. The annual license fee for a
nonlimited entry delivery license is one hundred ten dollars for
residents and two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and an additional
thirty-five dollar surcharge for both residents and nonresidents to be
deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(2) Holders of the following licenses may deliver food fish or
shellfish taken in offshore waters without a nonlimited entry delivery
license: Salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.160((,)); salmon delivery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.170((,)); crab pot fishery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.220((,)); food fish trawl -- Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses, and
emerging commercial fishery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.200((,));
Dungeness crab -- coastal fishery licenses((,)); ocean pink shrimp
delivery licenses((,)); shrimp trawl -- Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses,
Washington coastal spot shrimp pot fishery licenses issued under
chapter 77.70 RCW; and emerging commercial fishery licenses issued
under RCW 77.65.220 ((may deliver food fish or shellfish taken in
offshore waters without a nonlimited entry delivery license)).
(3) A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of
food fish or shellfish from state waters.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.65.220 and 2000 c 107 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required
for shellfish fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. The
director may issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to
a person who meets the qualifications established in applicable
governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Burrowing shrimp $185 $295 Yes No

(b) Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(c) Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Puget Sound

(d) Dungeness crab-coastal (RCW
77.70.280) $295 $520 Yes Yes

(e) Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal, class B

(RCW 77.70.280)

(f) Dungeness crab- $130 $185 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.110)

(g) Emerging
commercial fishery
(RCW 77.70.160
and 77.65.400) $185 $295 Determined Determined

by rule by rule

(h) Geoduck (RCW $ 0 $ 0 Yes Yes

77.70.220)

(i) Hardshell clam $530 $985 Yes No

mechanical
harvester

(RCW 77.65.250)

(j) Oyster reserve $130 $185 No No

(RCW 77.65.260)

(k) Razor clam $130 $185 No No

(l) Sea cucumber dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.190)

(m) Sea urchin dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.150)

(n) Shellfish dive $130 $185 Yes No

(o) Shellfish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(p) Shrimp pot- $185 $295 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.410)

(q) Shrimp trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(r) Shrimp trawl- $185 $295 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.420)

(s) Spot shrimp-coastal $185 $295 Yes Yes

(t) Squid $185 $295 Yes No

(2) The director may by rule determine the species of shellfish
that may be taken with the commercial fishery licenses established in
this section, the gear that may be used with the licenses, and the
areas or waters in which the licenses may be used. Where a fishery
license has been established for a particular species, gear,
geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general fishery
license may not be used to take shellfish in that fishery.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.70.005 and 2009 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and
related rules adopted by the department unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Deliver" or "delivery" means arrival at a place or port, and
includes arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters.
(2) "Pacific sardine" and "pilchard" means the species Sardinops
sagax.
(3) "Spot shrimp" means the species Pandalus platyceros.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall provide a report to the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, regarding the coastal spot shrimp
fishery. The report must include any recommended changes to the
licensing program created in section 1 of this act deemed appropriate
by the director. The report must take into consideration the status of
the coastal spot shrimp population, the impact of the removal of
coastal spot shrimp to the marine ecosystem, and the market for coastal
spot shrimp.
(2) The report required by this section must be delivered by
January 7, 2016.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2016.

--- END ---