BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter authorizes a county, city, or state
agency to require the installation or use of a fire sprinkler system in
an agricultural structure.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the voluntary installation
and use of fire sprinkler systems in agricultural structures.

--- END ---