BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that having updated
school district policies and procedures is a step in the right
direction for preventing bullying, intimidation, and harassment, but
more steps are needed. An ongoing work group could help to maintain
focus and attention on antibullying and antiharassment, as well as
monitor progress. In addition, students' knowledge and understanding
of two key correlates of bullying and harassment, depression and youth
suicide, could be enhanced through instruction and assessments that
address mental health and suicide prevention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the education ombudsman shall convene an ongoing work group
on school bullying and harassment prevention to develop, recommend, and
implement strategies to improve school climate and create respectful
learning environments in all public schools in Washington. The
superintendent of public instruction or a designee shall serve as the
chair of the work group.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Consider whether additional disaggregated data should be
collected regarding incidents of bullying and harassment or
disciplinary actions and make recommendations to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for collection of such data;
(b) Examine possible procedures for anonymous reporting of
incidents of bullying and harassment;
(c) Identify curriculum and best practices for school districts to
improve school climate, create respectful learning environments, and
train staff and students in de-escalation and intervention techniques;
(d) Identify curriculum and best practices for incorporating
instruction about mental health, youth suicide prevention, and
prevention of bullying and harassment;
(e) Recommend best practices for informing parents about the
harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy and procedure
under RCW 28A.300.285 and involving parents in improving school
climate;
(f) Recommend training for district personnel who are designated as
the primary contact regarding the policy and procedure and for school
resource officers and other school security personnel;
(g) Recommend educator preparation and certification requirements
in harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention and de-escalation
and intervention techniques for teachers, educational staff associates,
and school administrators;
(h) Examine and recommend policies for discipline of students and
staff who harass, intimidate, or bully; and
(i) In collaboration with the state board for community and
technical colleges, examine and recommend policies to protect K-12
students attending community and technical colleges from harassment,
intimidation, and bullying.
(3) The work group must include:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate; and
(c) Representatives from the state board of education, the
Washington state parent teacher association, school directors, school
administrators, principals, teachers, school counselors, classified
school staff, youth, community organizations, and parents.
(4) The work group shall submit a biennial progress and status
report to the governor and the education committees of the legislature,
beginning December 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges shall compile and analyze policies and procedures
adopted by community and technical colleges regarding harassment,
intimidation, and bullying prevention.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall compile and
analyze policies and procedures adopted by four-year institutions of
higher education regarding harassment, intimidation, and bullying
prevention.
(3) Each board under this section shall submit a report with
recommendations for improvements in the policies and procedures to the
education and higher education committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2011.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2009 c 556 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that
students have an opportunity to learn the essential academic learning
requirements in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.
Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and
social studies skills. Health and fitness includes, but is not limited
to, mental health and suicide prevention education. Beginning with the
2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit an
implementation verification report to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may not require school districts to use a classroom-based
assessment in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet
the requirements of this section and shall clearly communicate to
districts their option to use other strategies chosen by the district.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and the eleventh or
twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment
in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school districts
shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to complete at
least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment
may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with
the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit
implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based
assessments in civics.
(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report
only the information necessary to comply with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---