BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Intent
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: (1) Small
businesses are critical to Washington's economic recovery and strength;
(2) many small businesses are experiencing financial hardship because
of the economic downturn in the state and nation; and (3) small
businesses start-up and expansion will have a favorable impact on
Washington's economy by creating jobs, expanding tax revenues, and
helping Washington compete in today's global marketplace. Therefore,
the legislature intends to provide support for the state's small
businesses.

Washington Small Business Taxpayer Information
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that taxes are one
of the most sensitive points of contact between citizens and their
government, and that there is a delicate balance between revenue
collection and taxpayers' rights and responsibilities.
(2) The legislature further finds that the Washington tax system is
based largely on voluntary compliance. The legislature also finds that
compliance is more likely to be achieved when the department provides
accurate tax information, instructions, and procedures to assist
taxpayers to voluntarily comply with applicable state excise tax laws.
(3) The legislature further finds that our excise tax system is
complicated and as a consequence, small businesses, often lacking
sophisticated tax advice, are especially at risk of making
unintentional mistakes with respect to their state tax obligations.
(4) The legislature therefore intends to require the department to
provide information about a business's industry specific tax
obligations at the time of tax registration and adhere to any specific
official written advice unless the department later modifies the advice
in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department must administer this chapter.
The department must adopt rules as may be necessary to fully implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Small business taxpayers of the state of
Washington have:
(1) The right to receive industry specific tax guidance by the
department at the time the taxpayer initially registers his or her
business with the state;
(2) The right to a written explanation of the basis for any tax
deficiency assessments, interest, and penalties at the time the
assessments are issued; and
(3) The right to rely on specific official written advice and
written tax reporting instructions from the department to that
taxpayer, and to have interest, penalties, and tax deficiency
assessments waived when the taxpayer has so relied to their proven
detriment unless the department provided later written tax reporting
instructions modifying the initial instructions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definition in this section applies throughout this
chapter.
"Small business taxpayer" means a taxpayer in its first year of
business operations or with fifty or fewer employees.

Online Business Portals
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning October 1, 2011, master and renewal applications
issued through the business license center must include a statement
referencing the online business portal maintained by the department of
commerce.
(2) The statement required under subsection (1) of this section
must be placed in a prominent location on at least one page of the
paper and electronic master and renewal applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning October 1, 2011, excise tax returns must include a
statement referencing the online business portal maintained by the
department of commerce.
(2) The statement required under subsection (1) of this section
must be placed in a prominent location on at least one page of the
paper and electronic tax return.

Office of Regulatory Assistance Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.401 (Office of regulatory assistance -- Termination)
and 2007 c 231 s 6, 2007 c 94 s 15, 2003 c 71 s 5, & 2002 c 153 s 13;
and
(2) RCW 43.131.402 (Office of regulatory assistance -- Repeal) and
2010 c 162 s 7.

Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---