BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate DUI courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "DUI court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism of impaired driving among nonviolent, alcohol abusing
offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by increasing their likelihood
for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic testing for alcohol
use and, if applicable, drug use; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
DUI court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its DUI court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for DUI court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for DUI court operations and associated
services. However, until June 30, 2014, no match is required for state
moneys expended for the administrative and overhead costs associated
with the operation of a DUI court established as of January 1, 2011.
(b) Any county that establishes a DUI court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The DUI court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from alcohol treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520, vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522, or
an equivalent out-of-state offense; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) That is vehicular homicide or vehicular assault;
(D) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(E) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.28.190 and 2005 c 504 s 502 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county that has established a DUI court, drug court, and a
mental health court under this chapter may combine the functions of
((both)) these courts into a single therapeutic court.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.5054 and 1995 c 398 s 15 and 1995 c 332 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 46.61.5051 through
46.61.5053 until September 1, 1995, and RCW 46.61.5055 thereafter, a
((one)) two hundred ((twenty-five)) dollar fee shall be assessed to a
person who is either convicted, sentenced to a lesser charge, or given
deferred prosecution, as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522. This fee is for the
purpose of funding the Washington state toxicology laboratory and the
Washington state patrol for grants and activities to increase the
conviction rate and decrease the incidence of persons driving under the
influence of alcohol or drugs.
(b) Upon a verified petition by the person assessed the fee, the
court may suspend payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that
the person does not have the ability to pay.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, the court shall
assess the ((one)) two hundred ((twenty-five)) dollar fee under (a) of
this subsection. Upon a verified petition by a minor assessed the fee,
the court may suspend payment of all or part of the fee if it finds
that the minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.
(2) The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
collected by the clerk of the court and, subject to subsection (4) of
this section, one hundred seventy-five dollars of the fee must be
distributed as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be subject to distribution under RCW
3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, or 10.82.070.
(b) The remainder of the fee shall be forwarded to the state
treasurer who shall, through June 30, 1997, deposit: Fifty percent in
the death investigations' account to be used solely for funding the
state toxicology laboratory blood or breath testing programs; and fifty
percent in the state patrol highway account to be used solely for
funding activities to increase the conviction rate and decrease the
incidence of persons driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs.
Effective July 1, 1997, the remainder of the fee shall be forwarded to
the state treasurer who shall deposit: Fifteen percent in the death
investigations' account to be used solely for funding the state
toxicology laboratory blood or breath testing programs; and eighty-five
percent in the state patrol highway account to be used solely for
funding activities to increase the conviction rate and decrease the
incidence of persons driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs.
(3) Twenty-five dollars of the fee assessed under subsection (1) of
this section must be distributed to the highway safety account to be
used solely for funding Washington traffic safety commission grants to
reduce statewide collisions caused by persons driving under the
influence of alcohol or drugs. Grants awarded under this subsection
may be for projects that encourage collaboration with other community,
governmental, and private organizations, and that utilize innovative
approaches based on best practices or proven strategies supported by
research or rigorous evaluation. Grants recipients may include, for
example:
(a) DUI courts; and
(b) Jurisdictions implementing the victim impact panel registries
under RCW 46.61.5152 and section 6 of this act.
(4) If the court has suspended payment of part of the fee pursuant
to subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section, amounts collected shall be
distributed proportionately.
(5) This section applies to any offense committed on or after July
1, 1993.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.5056 and 1995 c 332 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person subject to alcohol assessment and treatment under RCW
46.61.5055 shall be required by the court to complete a course in an
alcohol information school approved by the department of social and
health services or to complete more intensive treatment in a program
approved by the department of social and health services, as determined
by the court. The court shall notify the department of licensing
whenever it orders a person to complete a course or treatment program
under this section.
(2) A diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation shall be
prepared under the direction of the court by an alcoholism agency
approved by the department of social and health services or a qualified
probation department approved by the department of social and health
services. A copy of the report shall be forwarded to the court and the
department of licensing. Based on the diagnostic evaluation, the court
shall determine whether the person shall be required to complete a
course in an alcohol information school approved by the department of
social and health services or more intensive treatment in a program
approved by the department of social and health services.
(3) Standards for approval for alcohol treatment programs shall be
prescribed by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall periodically review the
costs of alcohol information schools and treatment programs.
(4) Any agency that provides treatment ordered under RCW
46.61.5055, shall immediately report to the appropriate probation
department where applicable, otherwise to the court, and to the
department of licensing any noncompliance by a person with the
conditions of his or her ordered treatment. The court shall notify the
department of licensing and the department of social and health
services of any failure by an agency to so report noncompliance. Any
agency with knowledge of noncompliance that fails to so report shall be
fined two hundred fifty dollars by the department of social and health
services. Upon three such failures by an agency within one year, the
department of social and health services shall revoke the agency's
approval under this section.
(5) The department of licensing and the department of social and
health services may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.5152 and 2006 c 73 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to penalties that may be imposed under RCW 46.61.5055,
the court may require a person who is convicted of a nonfelony
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or who enters a deferred
prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 based on a nonfelony violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, to attend an educational program, such
as a victim impact panel, focusing on the emotional, physical, and
financial suffering of victims who were injured by persons convicted of
driving while under the influence of intoxicants. The victim impact
panel program must meet the minimum standards established under section
6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington traffic safety commission may develop and
maintain a registry of qualified victim impact panels. When imposing
a requirement that an offender attend a victim impact panel under RCW
46.61.5152, the court may refer the offender to a victim impact panel
that is listed in the registry. The Washington traffic safety
commission may consult with victim impact panel organizations to
develop and maintain a registry.
(2) To be listed on the registry, the victim impact panel must meet
the following minimum standards:
(a) The victim impact panel must address the effects of driving
while impaired on individuals and families and address alternatives to
drinking and driving and drug use and driving;
(b) The victim impact panel should strive to have at least two
different speakers, one of whom is a victim survivor of an impaired
driving crash, to present their stories in person. A victim survivor
may be the panel facilitator. The victim impact panel should be a
minimum of sixty minutes of presentation, not including registration
and administration time.
(c) The victim impact panel shall have policies and procedures to
recruit, screen, train, and provide feedback and ongoing support to the
panelists. The panel shall take reasonable steps to verify the
authenticity of each panelist's story;
(d) The victim impact panel shall charge a reasonable fee to all
persons required to attend, unless otherwise ordered by the court;
(e) The victim impact panel shall have a policy to prohibit
admittance of anyone under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or anyone
whose actions or behavior are otherwise inappropriate. The victim
impact panel may institute additional admission requirements;
(f) The victim impact panel shall maintain attendance records for
at least five years;
(g) The victim impact panel shall make reasonable efforts to use a
facility that meets standards established by the Americans with
disabilities act;
(h) The victim impact panel may provide referral information to
other community services; and
(i) The victim impact panel shall have a designated facilitator who
is responsible for the compliance with these minimum standards and who
is responsible for maintaining appropriate records and communication
with the referring courts and probationary departments regarding
attendance or nonattendance.

--- END ---