BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.380 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 913 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that career and technical student
organizations help to prepare students to meet minimum college and
workforce requirements.
(2) Career and technical student organization activities are
integral to career and technical education if they:
(a) Provide instructional strategies used to develop, improve, and
expand occupational competencies that relate to a particular career and
technical subject matter;
(b) Are an extension of the classroom and laboratory instructional
program that enriches and enhances classroom learning; and
(c) Include curriculum-oriented activities to help students to gain
personal and leadership skills that maximize employability and the
ability to become productive citizens in the workforce, home, and
community.
(3) In order to receive state support, career and technical student
organizations must:
(a) Prepare students for career experiences beyond high school;
(b) Help students develop personal, leadership, technical, and
occupational skills;
(c) Be an integral component of career and technical education
instructional programs; and
(d) Directly help students achieve state learning goals, especially
goals three and four with respect to critical thinking, problem
solving, and decision-making skills. The superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain support for statewide coordination for
career and technical student organizations by providing program staff
support that is available to assist in meeting the needs of career and
technical student organizations and their members and students. The
superintendent may provide additional support to the organizations
through contracting with independent coordinators.
(((2))) (4) Career and technical student organizations eligible for
technical assistance and other support services under this section are
organizations recognized as career and technical student organizations
by:
(a) The United States department of education; or
(b) The superintendent of public instruction, if such recognition
is recommended by the Washington association for career and technical
education.
(((3))) (5) Career and technical student organizations eligible for
technical assistance and other support services under this section
include, but are not limited to: The national FFA organization;
family, career, and community leaders of America; skillsUSA;
distributive education clubs of America; future business leaders of
America; and the technology student association.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.531 and 2008 c 170 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to recognize and support the
work of community and technical colleges, high schools, and skill
centers in creating articulation and dual credit agreements for career
and technical education students, in part by codifying current
practice.
(2) Community and technical colleges shall create agreements with
high schools and skill centers to offer dual high school and college
credit for secondary career and technical courses. Agreements shall be
subject to approval by the chief instructional officer of the college
and the principal and the career and technical education director of
the high school or the executive director of the skill center.
(3) Community and technical colleges may create dual credit
agreements with high schools and skill centers that are located outside
the college district boundary or service area.
(4)(a) If a community or technical college has created an agreement
with a high school or skill center to offer college credit for a
secondary career and technical course, all community and technical
colleges shall accept the course for an equal amount of college credit.
(b) A college may not charge a student more than a standard
transcription fee to accept a course under (a) of this subsection for
college credit. If a high school or skill center believes that a
community or technical college is not following the requirements of
this subsection (4), the affected high school or skill center may
request assistance from the college board. The college board, after
consideration of the facts presented by the high school or skill center
and the college, may direct the college to follow the requirements of
this subsection (4).

--- END ---