BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.020 and 2001 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Unlawful harassment" means a knowing and willful course of
conduct directed at a specific person which seriously alarms, annoys,
harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and which serves no
legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of conduct shall be such as
would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional
distress, and shall actually cause substantial emotional distress to
the petitioner, or, when the course of conduct would cause a reasonable
parent to fear for the well-being of their child.
(2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a
series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct" includes, in addition to
any other form of communication, contact, or conduct, the sending of an
electronic communication. Constitutionally protected activity is not
included within the meaning of "course of conduct."
(3) "Global positioning system monitoring" and "GPS monitoring"
refer to an automated and time-correlated monitoring system that tracks
a person's geographic location by a device that uses the global
positioning system, and that provides a mechanism for a third party to
receive notification when the monitored person breaks a distance
restriction imposed by the court.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.14.080 and 2001 c 311 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing a petition for a civil antiharassment protection
order under this chapter, the petitioner may obtain an ex parte
temporary antiharassment protection order. An ex parte temporary
antiharassment protection order may be granted with or without notice
upon the filing of an affidavit which, to the satisfaction of the
court, shows reasonable proof of unlawful harassment of the petitioner
by the respondent and that great or irreparable harm will result to the
petitioner if the temporary antiharassment protection order is not
granted.
(2) An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order shall be
effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four
days if the court has permitted service by publication under RCW
10.14.085. The ex parte order may be reissued. A full hearing, as
provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later than fourteen days
from the issuance of the temporary order or not later than twenty-four
days if service by publication is permitted. Except as provided in RCW
10.14.070 and 10.14.085, the respondent shall be personally served with
a copy of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and
notice of the date set for the hearing. The ex parte order and notice
of hearing shall include at a minimum the date and time of the hearing
set by the court to determine if the temporary order should be made
effective for one year or more, and notice that if the respondent
should fail to appear or otherwise not respond, an order for protection
will be issued against the respondent pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter, for a minimum of one year from the date of the hearing.
The notice shall also include a brief statement of the provisions of
the ex parte order and notify the respondent that a copy of the ex
parte order and notice of hearing has been filed with the clerk of the
court.
(3) At the hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that unlawful harassment exists, a civil antiharassment
protection order shall issue prohibiting such unlawful harassment.
(4) An order issued under this chapter shall be effective for not
more than one year unless the court finds that the respondent is likely
to resume unlawful harassment of the petitioner when the order expires.
If so, the court may enter an order for a fixed time exceeding one year
or may enter a permanent antiharassment protection order. The court
shall not enter an order that is effective for more than one year if
the order restrains the respondent from contacting the respondent's
minor children. This limitation is not applicable to civil
antiharassment protection orders issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or
26.26 RCW. If the petitioner seeks relief for a period longer than one
year on behalf of the respondent's minor children, the court shall
advise the petitioner that the petitioner may apply for renewal of the
order as provided in this chapter or if appropriate may seek relief
pursuant to chapter 26.09 or 26.10 RCW.
(5) At any time within the three months before the expiration of
the order, the petitioner may apply for a renewal of the order by
filing a petition for renewal. The petition for renewal shall state
the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order.
Upon receipt of the petition for renewal, the court shall order a
hearing which shall be not later than fourteen days from the date of
the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085, personal service shall
be made upon the respondent not less than five days before the hearing.
If timely service cannot be made the court shall set a new hearing date
and shall either require additional attempts at obtaining personal
service or permit service by publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085.
If the court permits service by publication, the court shall set the
new hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of the
order. If the order expires because timely service cannot be made the
court shall grant an ex parte order of protection as provided in this
section. The court shall grant the petition for renewal unless the
respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the
respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order
expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed
time period or may enter a permanent order as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.
(6) The court, in granting an ex parte temporary antiharassment
protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order, shall have
broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper,
including an order:
(a) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to contact
the petitioner;
(b) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to keep the
petitioner under surveillance;
(c) Requiring the respondent to stay a stated distance from the
petitioner's residence and workplace; and
(d) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(7) If the court grants a civil antiharassment protection order
under this chapter, the court may, in addition to relief granted under
subsection (6) of this section:
(a) Require the respondent to participate in treatment or
counseling services; and
(b) Require the respondent to submit to global positioning system
monitoring if there is clear and convincing evidence that the
respondent poses a danger to the petitioner. The court shall consider,
but is not limited to considering, any of the following conduct as
evidence of posing a danger: Whether the respondent has previously
committed violent acts against the petitioner; whether the respondent
has threatened the petitioner with harm; whether the respondent has
threatened or is threatening suicide; whether the respondent has
visited the petitioner's residence against the petitioner's requests;
whether the respondent's violent or stalking behavior is escalating;
and whether the respondent has a history of violating protection
orders. The court may require the respondent to pay the costs of the
global positioning system monitoring unless the court finds that the
respondent is unable to pay the costs.
(8) A petitioner may not obtain an ex parte temporary
antiharassment protection order against a respondent if the petitioner
has previously obtained two such ex parte orders against the same
respondent but has failed to obtain the issuance of a civil
antiharassment protection order unless good cause for such failure can
be shown.
(((8))) (9) The court order shall specify the date an order issued
pursuant to subsections (4) and (5) of this section expires if any.
The court order shall also state whether the court issued the
protection order following personal service or service by publication
and whether the court has approved service by publication of an order
issued under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the court issues an order under this chapter and finds
that a respondent has engaged in unlawful harassment that constitutes
stalking, as defined in subsection (7) of this section, the court
shall, in addition to all other requirements of this chapter:
(a) Notify the respondent in writing that the order is issued based
on a finding that the respondent has engaged in stalking against the
petitioner; and
(b) Notify the respondent that a violation of the order may result
in an arrest under RCW 10.31.100.
(2) If the court finds that a respondent has engaged in unlawful
harassment that constitutes stalking under this section, the court may
incorporate its oral findings by reference into any written order.
(3) By December 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts
shall develop a pattern form for antiharassment protection orders based
on acts of stalking as provided in this section. The pattern form must
include:
(a) A conspicuous designation on its face for the courts and law
enforcement to distinguish the order as an antiharassment protection
order based on acts of stalking;
(b) Notice to the respondent that the order is issued based on a
finding that the respondent has engaged in stalking against the
petitioner;
(c) Notice, in a conspicuous location, of the criminal penalties
resulting from a violation of the order;
(d) Notice, in a conspicuous location, that violation of the order
will result in mandatory arrest under RCW 10.31.100; and
(e) Notice of the authority of the courts to issue, modify, and
terminate orders under this chapter.
(4) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a
master copy of the pattern form to all court clerks and shall
distribute a master copy of the pattern form to all superior, district,
and municipal courts. By January 1, 2012, a protection order based on
stalking as provided in this section must substantially comply with the
pattern form developed by the administrative office of the courts.
(5) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the
significant nonEnglish-speaking or limited English-speaking populations
in the state. The administrative office of the courts shall then
arrange for translation of the pattern form into the languages spoken
by those significant nonEnglish-speaking populations, and shall
distribute a master copy of the translated instructions to all court
clerks by March 1, 2012.
(6) The administrative office of the courts shall update the
pattern form when changes in the law make an update necessary.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Stalking" occurs if, under circumstances constituting unlawful
harassment as defined in this chapter, a respondent directly, or
indirectly through another person, knowingly:
(i) Makes a credible threat to the petitioner and, in connection
with such threat, repeatedly follows, approaches, contacts, or places
under surveillance the petitioner, a member of the petitioner's
immediate family, or someone with whom that petitioner has or has had
a continuing relationship; or
(ii) Makes a credible threat to the petitioner and, in connection
with such threat, repeatedly makes any form of communication to the
petitioner, a member of the petitioner's immediate family, or someone
with whom the petitioner has or has had a continuing relationship,
regardless of whether a conversation ensues.
(b) "Credible threat" means a threat, physical action, or repeated
conduct that would cause a reasonable person to be in fear for the
petitioner's safety or the safety of his or her immediate family or of
someone with whom the petitioner has or has had a continuing
relationship. Such threat need not be directly expressed if the
totality of the conduct would cause a reasonable person such fear.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.31.100 and 2010 c 274 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, chapter 10.14 RCW when based on acts of stalking
under section 3 of this act, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10,
26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has
violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or
threats of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the
grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location or, in the case of
an order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or
conditions upon the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was
part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) Unless an arrest is mandatory under subsection (2) of this
section, a police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (8) of this section if
the police officer acts in good faith and without malice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the first appearance before a judicial officer of a
defendant charged with violating an antiharassment protection order
under RCW 10.14.180 and when the antiharassment protection order is
based on stalking under section 3 of this act, the judicial officer
shall issue an order requiring the defendant to submit to global
positioning system monitoring for a fixed period of no fewer than
fourteen days immediately following the defendant's release from
custody, unless:
(a) The defendant is currently required to submit to global
positioning system monitoring pursuant to the antiharassment protection
order upon which the charge is based; or
(b) The county does not have global positioning system monitoring
services available through a county program or through a contract with
a private entity.
(2) An order issued under subsection (1) of this section must
specify who shall provide the global positioning system monitoring
services and the terms under which monitoring must be performed. The
order may include a requirement that the defendant pay the costs of the
global positioning system monitoring unless the judicial officer finds
that the person is unable to pay the costs. If the defendant is
acquitted or if all charges are dismissed, the county shall return the
payment to the defendant at the last known address listed in the
county's records.
(3) When the court issues an order under this section, the
prosecutor shall promptly contact the petitioner to the antiharassment
protection order underlying the charge to provide information regarding
the order issued under this section, the entity providing the global
positioning system monitoring services, and the terms of the
monitoring. The prosecutor should contact the petitioner through any
available means that is most likely to achieve notice.

--- END ---