BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In response to State v. Hall, 168 Wn.2d 726
(2010), the legislature intends to clarify that each instance of an
attempt to intimidate or tamper with a witness constitutes a separate
violation for purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under the
statutes governing tampering with a witness and intimidating a witness.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.72.110 and 1997 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of intimidating a witness if a person, by
use of a threat against a current or prospective witness, attempts to:
(a) Influence the testimony of that person;
(b) Induce that person to elude legal process summoning him or her
to testify;
(c) Induce that person to absent himself or herself from such
proceedings; or
(d) Induce that person not to report the information relevant to a
criminal investigation or the abuse or neglect of a minor child, not to
have the crime or the abuse or neglect of a minor child prosecuted, or
not to give truthful or complete information relevant to a criminal
investigation or the abuse or neglect of a minor child.
(2) A person also is guilty of intimidating a witness if the person
directs a threat to a former witness because of the witness's role in
an official proceeding.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Threat" means:
(i) To communicate, directly or indirectly, the intent immediately
to use force against any person who is present at the time; or
(ii) Threat as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(((25))) (27).
(b) "Current or prospective witness" means:
(i) A person endorsed as a witness in an official proceeding;
(ii) A person whom the actor believes may be called as a witness in
any official proceeding; or
(iii) A person whom the actor has reason to believe may have
information relevant to a criminal investigation or the abuse or
neglect of a minor child.
(c) "Former witness" means:
(i) A person who testified in an official proceeding;
(ii) A person who was endorsed as a witness in an official
proceeding;
(iii) A person whom the actor knew or believed may have been called
as a witness if a hearing or trial had been held; or
(iv) A person whom the actor knew or believed may have provided
information related to a criminal investigation or an investigation
into the abuse or neglect of a minor child.
(4) Intimidating a witness is a class B felony.
(5) For purposes of this section, each instance of an attempt to
intimidate a witness constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.72.120 and 1994 c 271 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of tampering with a witness if he or she
attempts to induce a witness or person he or she has reason to believe
is about to be called as a witness in any official proceeding or a
person whom he or she has reason to believe may have information
relevant to a criminal investigation or the abuse or neglect of a minor
child to:
(a) Testify falsely or, without right or privilege to do so, to
withhold any testimony; or
(b) Absent himself or herself from such proceedings; or
(c) Withhold from a law enforcement agency information which he or
she has relevant to a criminal investigation or the abuse or neglect of
a minor child to the agency.
(2) Tampering with a witness is a class C felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, each instance of an attempt to
tamper with a witness constitutes a separate offense.

--- END ---