BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a severe shortage
of primary health care providers exists in Washington, particularly in
rural and underserved areas of the state. The legislature further
finds that an over reliance on specialty health care at the expense of
primary care results in a health care system that is less efficient.
The legislature further finds that institutions of higher education
must produce more primary care providers. The legislature further
finds that the efficient use of clinical sites for rotations will
expand the supply of primary care providers. The legislature further
finds that expanding residency programs in community health centers
will increase residents' exposure to primary care practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.115
RCW to read as follows:
Any osteopathic or allopathic medical school receiving state funds
or authorized by the higher education coordinating board may not
prohibit a hospital or physician from entering into an agreement to
provide student clinical rotations to qualified osteopathic or
allopathic medical students.

--- END ---