BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.021 and 2007 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the second degree if he or
she, under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first degree:
(a) Intentionally assaults another and thereby recklessly inflicts
substantial bodily harm; or
(b) Intentionally and unlawfully causes substantial bodily harm to
an unborn quick child by intentionally and unlawfully inflicting any
injury upon the mother of such child; or
(c) Assaults another with a deadly weapon; or
(d) With intent to inflict bodily harm, administers to or causes to
be taken by another, poison or any other destructive or noxious
substance; or
(e) With intent to commit a felony, assaults another; or
(f) Knowingly inflicts bodily harm which by design causes such pain
or agony as to be the equivalent of that produced by torture; or
(g) Assaults another by strangulation or suffocation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, assault in the
second degree is a class B felony.
(b) Assault in the second degree with a finding of sexual
motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.04.110 and 2007 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title unless a different meaning plainly is required:
(1) "Acted" includes, where relevant, omitted to act;
(2) "Actor" includes, where relevant, a person failing to act;
(3) "Benefit" is any gain or advantage to the beneficiary,
including any gain or advantage to a third person pursuant to the
desire or consent of the beneficiary;
(4)(a) "Bodily injury," "physical injury," or "bodily harm" means
physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of physical
condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a
probability of death, or which causes significant serious permanent
disfigurement, or which causes a significant permanent loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily part or organ;
(5) "Building", in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes any
dwelling, fenced area, vehicle, railway car, cargo container, or any
other structure used for lodging of persons or for carrying on business
therein, or for the use, sale or deposit of goods; each unit of a
building consisting of two or more units separately secured or occupied
is a separate building;
(6) "Deadly weapon" means any explosive or loaded or unloaded
firearm, and shall include any other weapon, device, instrument,
article, or substance, including a "vehicle" as defined in this
section, which, under the circumstances in which it is used, attempted
to be used, or threatened to be used, is readily capable of causing
death or substantial bodily harm;
(7) "Dwelling" means any building or structure, though movable or
temporary, or a portion thereof, which is used or ordinarily used by a
person for lodging;
(8) "Government" includes any branch, subdivision, or agency of the
government of this state and any county, city, district, or other local
governmental unit;
(9) "Governmental function" includes any activity which a public
servant is legally authorized or permitted to undertake on behalf of a
government;
(10) "Indicted" and "indictment" include "informed against" and
"information", and "informed against" and "information" include
"indicted" and "indictment";
(11) "Judge" includes every judicial officer authorized alone or
with others, to hold or preside over a court;
(12) "Malice" and "maliciously" shall import an evil intent, wish,
or design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Malice may be
inferred from an act done in ((wilful)) willful disregard of the rights
of another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or
an act or omission of duty betraying a ((wilful)) willful disregard of
social duty;
(13) "Officer" and "public officer" means a person holding office
under a city, county, or state government, or the federal government
who performs a public function and in so doing is vested with the
exercise of some sovereign power of government, and includes all
assistants, deputies, clerks, and employees of any public officer and
all persons lawfully exercising or assuming to exercise any of the
powers or functions of a public officer;
(14) "Omission" means a failure to act;
(15) "Peace officer" means a duly appointed city, county, or state
law enforcement officer;
(16) "Pecuniary benefit" means any gain or advantage in the form of
money, property, commercial interest, or anything else the primary
significance of which is economic gain;
(17) "Person", "he", and "actor" include any natural person and,
where relevant, a corporation, joint stock association, or an
unincorporated association;
(18) "Place of work" includes but is not limited to all the lands
and other real property of a farm or ranch in the case of an actor who
owns, operates, or is employed to work on such a farm or ranch;
(19) "Prison" means any place designated by law for the keeping of
persons held in custody under process of law, or under lawful arrest,
including but not limited to any state correctional institution or any
county or city jail;
(20) "Prisoner" includes any person held in custody under process
of law, or under lawful arrest;
(21) "Projectile stun gun" means an electronic device that projects
wired probes attached to the device that emit an electrical charge and
that is designed and primarily employed to incapacitate a person or
animal;
(22) "Property" means anything of value, whether tangible or
intangible, real or personal;
(23) "Public servant" means any person other than a witness who
presently occupies the position of or has been elected, appointed, or
designated to become any officer or employee of government, including
a legislator, judge, judicial officer, juror, and any person
participating as an advisor, consultant, or otherwise in performing a
governmental function;
(24) "Signature" includes any memorandum, mark, or sign made with
intent to authenticate any instrument or writing, or the subscription
of any person thereto;
(25) "Statute" means the Constitution or an act of the legislature
or initiative or referendum of this state;
(26) "Strangulation" means to compress a person's neck, thereby
obstructing the person's blood flow or ability to breathe, or doing so
with the intent to obstruct the person's blood flow or ability to
breathe;
(27) "Suffocation" means to intentionally obstruct a person's
ability to breathe by blocking or impairing intake at the nose or
mouth, whether by smothering or other means;
(28) "Threat" means to communicate, directly or indirectly the
intent:
(a) To cause bodily injury in the future to the person threatened
or to any other person; or
(b) To cause physical damage to the property of a person other than
the actor; or
(c) To subject the person threatened or any other person to
physical confinement or restraint; or
(d) To accuse any person of a crime or cause criminal charges to be
instituted against any person; or
(e) To expose a secret or publicize an asserted fact, whether true
or false, tending to subject any person to hatred, contempt, or
ridicule; or
(f) To reveal any information sought to be concealed by the person
threatened; or
(g) To testify or provide information or withhold testimony or
information with respect to another's legal claim or defense; or
(h) To take wrongful action as an official against anyone or
anything, or wrongfully withhold official action, or cause such action
or withholding; or
(i) To bring about or continue a strike, boycott, or other similar
collective action to obtain property which is not demanded or received
for the benefit of the group which the actor purports to represent; or
(j) To do any other act which is intended to harm substantially the
person threatened or another with respect to his health, safety,
business, financial condition, or personal relationships;
(((28))) (29) "Vehicle" means a "motor vehicle" as defined in the
vehicle and traffic laws, any aircraft, or any vessel equipped for
propulsion by mechanical means or by sail;
(((29))) (30) Words in the present tense shall include the future
tense; and in the masculine shall include the feminine and neuter
genders; and in the singular shall include the plural; and in the
plural shall include the singular.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2010 c 274 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) Prior convictions for a repetitive domestic violence offense,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, shall not be included in the offender
score if, since the last date of release from confinement or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in
a conviction.
(g) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) or 9A.44.132, count priors as in
subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section;
however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex
offense conviction, excluding prior convictions for failure to register
as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) or 9A.44.132, which shall
count as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community custody, add one point. For purposes
of this subsection, community custody includes community placement or
postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.94B RCW.
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 conviction.
(21) If the present conviction is for a felony domestic violence
offense where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was plead
and proven, count priors as in subsections (7) through (20) of this
section; however, count points as follows:
(a) Count two points for each adult prior conviction where domestic
violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was plead and proven after August
1, 2011, for the following offenses: A violation of a no-contact order
that is a felony offense, a violation of a protection order that is a
felony offense, a felony domestic violence harassment offense, a felony
domestic violence stalking offense, a domestic violence Burglary 1
offense, a domestic violence Kidnapping 1 offense, a domestic violence
Kidnapping 2 offense, a domestic violence unlawful imprisonment
offense, a domestic violence Robbery 1 offense, a domestic violence
Robbery 2 offense, a domestic violence Assault 1 offense, a domestic
violence Assault 2 offense, a domestic violence Assault 3 offense, a
domestic violence Arson 1 offense, or a domestic violence Arson 2
offense; ((and))
(b) Count one point for each second and subsequent juvenile
conviction where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was
plead and proven after August 1, 2011, for the offenses listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(c) Count one point for each adult prior conviction for a
repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, where
domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, was plead and proven
after August 1, 2011.
(22) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Prior convictions that were
not counted in the offender score or included in criminal history under
repealed or previous versions of the sentencing reform act shall be
included in criminal history and shall count in the offender score if
the current version of the sentencing reform act requires including or
counting those convictions. Prior convictions that were not included
in criminal history or in the offender score shall be included upon any
resentencing to ensure imposition of an accurate sentence.

--- END ---