BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The adaptive management program
established under WAC 222-12-045 shall, under the direction of the
forest practices board and using legislative appropriations
specifically made for this purpose, prioritize the exploration of
alternative low-impact harvest options for small forest landowners, as
that term is defined in RCW 76.13.120. This effort must include the
consideration of methods to provide small forest landowners with access
to efficient, lower cost alternative plans as provided in RCW 76.09.368
and alternative restrictions for smaller harvest areas.
(2) The forest practices board shall assist the adaptive management
program with the requirements of this section through the provision of:
(a) Professional facilitation to the adaptive management process;
and
(b) Means for appropriate small forest landowner representation.
(3) In completing the requirements of this section, the forest
practices board and the adaptive management program must consult with
the small forest landowner office advisory committee created in RCW
76.13.110.
(4) The adaptive management program must, by no later than
September 1, 2012, provide to the forest practices board and to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, a written report describing
options for alternative low-impact harvests, alternative plan
processes, or alternative harvest restrictions.
(5) This section expires July 31, 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.368 and 2002 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that small forest landowners have
access to alternate plan processes or alternate harvest restrictions,
or both if necessary, that meet the public resource protection standard
set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3), but which also lowers the overall cost
of regulation to small forest landowners including, but not limited to,
timber value forgone, layout costs, and operating costs. The forest
practices board shall consult with the small forest landowner office
advisory committee in developing these alternate approaches. ((By July
1, 2003, the forest practices board shall provide the legislature with
a written report that describes the board's progress in developing
alternate plan processes or alternate harvest restrictions, or both if
necessary, that meet legislative intent.))
(2) As used in this section, "small forest landowner" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 76.13.120(2).

--- END ---