BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.633 and 2010 c 258 s 1 and 2010 c 224 s 12 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) An offender who violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence:
(i) May be sanctioned with up to sixty days' confinement for each
violation; and
(ii) Must serve a mandatory minimum term of forty-eight hours in
total confinement for each violation.
(b) In lieu of confinement under (a)(i) of this subsection, an
offender may be sanctioned with work release, home detention with
electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient
treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(2) If an offender was under community custody pursuant to one of
the following statutes, the offender may be sanctioned as follows:
(a) If the offender was transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728, the offender may
be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up to
the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period
actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(b) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.660, the offender may be
sanctioned in accordance with that section.
(c) If the offender was sentenced under the parenting sentencing
alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.655, the offender may be sanctioned in
accordance with that section.
(d) If the offender was sentenced under the special sex offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.670, the suspended sentence
may be revoked and the offender committed to serve the original
sentence of confinement.
(e) If the offender was sentenced to a work ethic camp pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.690, the offender may be reclassified to serve the unexpired
term of his or her sentence in total confinement.
(f) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the
offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(3) If a probationer is being supervised by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, the probationer may be
sanctioned pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The department
shall have authority to issue a warrant for the arrest of an offender
who violates a condition of community custody, as provided in RCW
9.94A.716. Any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737. The department shall provide a copy of the violation
hearing report to the sentencing court in a timely manner. Nothing in
this subsection is intended to limit the power of the sentencing court
to respond to a probationer's violation of conditions.
(4) The parole or probation of an offender who is charged with a
new felony offense may be suspended and the offender placed in total
confinement pending disposition of the new criminal charges if:
(a) The offender is on parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.110(1); or
(b) The offender is being supervised pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745 and
is on parole or probation pursuant to the laws of another state.

--- END ---