BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2010 c 254 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(((1))) Bail for the release of a person arrested and detained for
a class A or B felony offense must be determined on an individualized
basis by a judicial officer.
(((2) This section expires August 1, 2011.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is added to chapter
10.19 RCW.

--- END ---