BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.250 and 2010 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board for the state of Washington
is created. The board shall consist of seven members ((qualified by
experience or training in matters pertaining to land use law or land
use planning and who have experience in the practical application of
those matters. All seven board members shall be appointed by the
governor, two each residing respectively in the central Puget Sound,
eastern Washington, and western Washington regions, plus one board
member residing within the state of Washington. At least three members
of the board shall be admitted to practice law in this state, one each
residing respectively in the central Puget Sound, eastern Washington,
and western Washington regions. At least three members of the board
shall have been a city or county elected official, one each residing
respectively in the central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and
western Washington regions. After expiration of the terms of board
members on the previously existing three growth management hearings
boards, no more than four members of the seven-member board may be
members of the same major political party. No more than two members at
the time of their appointment or during their term may reside in the
same county)) representing specified areas. The members shall hold
seats for the represented areas as follows:
(a) Seat 1: Whatcom, Skagit, San Juan, Island, and Snohomish
counties;
(b) Seat 2: King, Pierce, Thurston, Kitsap, and Mason counties;
(c) Seat 3: Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor, Pacific, Lewis,
Wahkiakum, Cowlitz, and Clark counties;
(d) Seat 4: Okanogan, Chelan, Douglas, Adams, and Grant counties;
(e) Seat 5: Kittitas, Yakima, Benton, Klickitat, and Skamania
counties;
(f) Seat 6: Franklin, Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, Whitman,
and Asotin counties; and
(g) Seat 7: Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille, Lincoln, and Spokane
counties.
(2) Board members shall be appointed by the county commissioners
within the jurisdictional boundary of the seat they represent. The
county commissioners of the counties to be represented by the board
member shall convene in a joint public meeting to select the board
member. The appointment shall occur through a majority vote of the
county commissioners. Each county individually must have the quorum
required to pass an ordinance in the county in order for the
appointment vote to be official. Proxy voting is not allowed.
(((2))) (3) Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term
of six years and may not serve more than two terms. A vacancy shall be
filled ((by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of
the term in which the vacancy occurs. Members of the previously
existing three growth management hearings boards appointed before July
1, 2010, shall complete their staggered, six-year terms as members of
the growth management hearings board created under subsection (1) of
this section. The reduction from nine board members on the previously
existing three growth management hearings boards to seven total members
on the growth management hearings board shall be made through
attrition, voluntary resignation, or retirement)) in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.260 and 2010 c 211 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each petition for review that is filed with the growth
management hearings board shall be heard and decided by the full board
or a regional panel of growth management hearings board members.
Regional panels shall be constituted as follows:
(((a) Central Puget Sound region. A three-member central Puget
Sound panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties located within the region comprised of King, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Kitsap counties.
(b) Eastern Washington region. A three-member eastern Washington
panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and
are located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(c) Western Washington region. A three-member western Washington
panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, are
located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and are not
included in the central Puget Sound region. Skamania county, if it is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, may elect to be
included within either the western Washington region or the eastern
Washington region.
(2)(a) Each regional panel selected to hear and decide cases shall
consist of three board members, at least a majority of whom shall
reside within the region in which the case arose, unless such)) Three
members of the growth management hearings board with one member being
from the county where the matter in question occurred and one member
being from a county located on the same side of the state where the
matter occurred as determined by the crest of the Cascade mountain
range. The presiding officer shall be from the district where the
matter in question occurred unless there is a disqualification, then it
shall be a member from a district abutting the district where the
matter in question occurred.
(2) If members cannot sit on a particular case because of recusal
or disqualification, or unless the board administrative officer
determines that there is an emergency including, but not limited to,
the unavailability of a board member due to illness, absence, vacancy,
or significant workload imbalance((. The presiding officer of each
case shall reside within the region in which the case arose, unless the
board administrative officer determines that there is an emergency.
(b) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection (2)(b), each
regional panel must: (i) Include one member admitted to practice law
in this state; (ii) include one member who has been a city or county
elected official; and (iii) reflect the political composition of the
board. The requirements of this subsection (2)(b) may be waived by the
board administrative officer due to member unavailability, significant
workload imbalances, or other reasons)), the next available board
member must be chosen as follows in descending order: (a) A board
member from a district whose boundaries abut that of the district where
the matter in questioned occurred; (b) a board member from the same
side of the state as determined by the Cascade mountain range; or (c)
a board member chosen by the board administrative officer.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.270 and 2010 c 211 s 6 and 2010 c 210 s 16 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The growth management hearings board shall be governed by the
following rules on conduct and procedure:
(1) Any board member may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance,
and misfeasance in office, under specific written charges filed by the
governor. The governor shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and the chief justice of the supreme court. The chief
justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges
of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Removal of
any member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member
for reappointment.
(2) Each board member shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Each member shall receive an annual
salary to be determined by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040. The
principal office of the board shall be located in Olympia. Any
satellite offices of the board should be located within the
jurisdictional boundaries of the regions where the three growth
management hearings boards, in existence before July 1, 2010, were
located.
(3) Each board member shall not: (a) Be a candidate for or hold
any other public office or trust; (b) engage in any occupation or
business interfering with or inconsistent with his or her duty as a
board member; and (c) for a period of one year after the termination of
his or her board membership, act in a representative capacity before
the board on any matter.
(4) A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for adopting
rules necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties or transacting
other official business, and may act even though one position of the
board is vacant. ((One or more members may hold hearings and take
testimony to be reported for action by the board when authorized by
rule or order of the board.)) The board shall perform all the powers
and duties specified in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.
(5) ((The board may use one or more hearing examiners to assist the
board in its hearing function, to make conclusions of law and findings
of fact and, if requested by the board, to make recommendations to the
board for decisions in cases before the board. Such hearing examiners
must have demonstrated knowledge of land use planning and law. The
board shall specify in its rules of practice and procedure, as required
by subsection (7) of this section, the procedure and criteria to be
employed for designating hearing examiners as a presiding officer.
Hearing examiners used by the board shall meet the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section. The findings and conclusions of the
hearing examiner shall not become final until they have been formally
approved by the board. This authorization to use hearing examiners
does not waive the requirement of RCW 36.70A.300 that final orders be
issued within one hundred eighty days of board receipt of a petition.
(6))) The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written
decision in each case decided by it, and such findings and decision
shall be effective upon being signed by two or more members of the
regional panel deciding the particular case and upon being filed at the
board's principal office, and shall be open for public inspection at
all reasonable times.
(((7))) (6) All proceedings before the board((,)) or any of its
members((, or a hearing examiner appointed by the board)) shall be
conducted in accordance with such administrative rules of practice and
procedure as the board prescribes. The board shall develop and adopt
rules of practice and procedure, including rules regarding expeditious
and summary disposition of appeals and the assignment of cases to
regional panels. The board shall publish such rules and decisions it
renders and arrange for the reasonable distribution of the rules and
decisions. Except as it conflicts with specific provisions of this
chapter, the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and
specifically including the provisions of RCW 34.05.455 governing ex
parte communications, shall govern the practice and procedure of the
board.
(((8))) (7) A board member ((or hearing examiner)) is subject to
disqualification under chapter 34.05 RCW. The rules of practice of the
board shall establish procedures by which a party to a hearing
conducted before the board may file with the board a motion to
disqualify, with supporting affidavit, against a board member ((or
hearing examiner)) assigned to preside at the hearing.
Disqualification is to be determined by the board administrative
officer, not the board member being challenged. If the board
administrative officer is being challenged, the full board determines
the question of disqualification.
(((9) All members of the board shall meet on at least an annual
basis with the objective of sharing information that promotes the goals
and purposes of this chapter.
(10))) (8) The board shall annually elect one of its members to be
the board administrative officer. The duties and responsibilities of
the administrative officer include handling day-to-day administrative,
budget, and personnel matters on behalf of the board, together with
making case assignments to board members in accordance with the board's
rules of procedure in order to achieve a fair and balanced workload
among all board members. The administrative officer of the board may
carry a reduced caseload to allow time for performing the
administrative work functions.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2010 c 211 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That, except as provided otherwise by this subsection, a state
agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments
thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development
regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the board to hear
petitions alleging noncompliance with RCW 36.70A.5801; or
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) ((a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested)) any person who owns property within
the jurisdiction of the county or city that is the subject of the
matter on which a review is being requested and is impacted by the
ordinance, regulation, or policy in question; (c) a person who is
certified by the governor within sixty days of filing the request with
the board; or (d) a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) ((To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b)
of this section, a person must show that his or her participation
before the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue
as presented to the board.
(5))) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, the board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by the board must
be documented and filed with the office of financial management within
ten working days after adoption.
If adjusted by the board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as the "board adjusted
population projection." None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

--- END ---