BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.11 RCW
under the subchapter heading "part 1 sales procedures" to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall develop and the board shall implement a
plan to divest the state by December 31, 2021, of all state lands and
state forest lands that are not being actively used for forestry and
all lands under state title condemned under section 3 of this act.
(2) In implementing the divestiture plan required under this
section, the department shall ensure that the lands sold receive fair
market value from private sector purchasers under the provisions of
this chapter.
(3) Any trust beneficiary affected by the divestiture of state
lands or state forest lands under this section must be made whole by
the provisions of the divestiture plan. The final proceeds of land
sales conducted pursuant to the divestiture plan must be transmitted to
the state investment board created in chapter 43.33A RCW to be managed
in an investment trust for the affected beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
The state investment board must work closely with the board of
natural resources to implement the state land divestiture plan required
under section 1 of this act and ensure that revenue produced from the
ensuing land sales are accounted for and managed according to the
fiduciary duty of the state with regard to the trust beneficiaries that
are affected by the sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general is authorized and empowered to condemn
land owned by the federal government on the effective date of this
section that is forested or available for active forestry uses.
(2)(a) Land acquired by the state under this section must be made
available for sale to private landowners for active forestry uses under
section 1 of this act; and
(b) The acquisition and sale of land condemned under this section
are deemed to be for a state purpose and public use.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.11.010 and 2003 c 334 s 321 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, not more than one
hundred and sixty acres of any land granted to the state by the United
States shall be offered for sale in one parcel and no university lands
shall be offered for sale except by legislative directive or with the
consent of the board of regents of the University of Washington.
(2) Any land granted to the state by the United States may be sold
for any lawful purpose in such minimum acreage as may be fixed by the
department or the legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.11.090 and 2003 c 334 s 352 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 79.11.340, all sales of land under
this chapter shall be at public auction, to the highest bidder, on the
terms prescribed by law and as specified in the notice provided under
RCW 79.11.120, and no land shall be sold for less than its appraised
value.
(2) In implementing the divestiture plan required in section 1 of
this act, the board shall ensure that land sales are awarded to the
highest private sector bidder.

--- END ---