BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor ((shall)) must give notice of any change in the
true and fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and
any improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However: (a) No such notice ((shall)) may be mailed
during the period from January 15th to February 15th of each year((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); and (b) no notice need be sent with respect
to changes in valuation of forest land made pursuant to chapter 84.33
RCW.
(2) The notice ((shall)) must contain a statement of both the prior
and the new true and fair value, stating separately land and
improvement values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal
to the board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the
meetings of the board.
(3) The notice ((shall)) must be mailed by the assessor to the
taxpayer.
(4) The assessor must give notice of the true and fair value of
real property each year property is revalued under RCW 84.41.030
regardless of whether there has been a change in the value from the
prior year.
(5) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer ((shall)) must, upon written request of the assessor,
supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor
the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the
mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such
person ((shall)) must also receive a copy of the notice provided for in
this section. Willful failure to comply with such request within the
time limitation provided for ((herein shall)) in this section makes
such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five thousand
dollars. The penalties ((provided for herein shall be)) in this
section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered ((shall)) must be deposited in the county current expense
fund. The assessor ((shall)) must make the request provided for by
this section during the month of January.

--- END ---