BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in November 1979
the voters approved the establishment of annual regular sessions of the
legislature. The approved amendment to Article II, section 12 of the
state Constitution provides that the legislature shall convene on such
day and at such time as the legislature shall determine by statute.
The legislature has provided a day for convening by statute, the second
Monday of January each year, but rather than provide a time for
convening such session by statute, the legislature has relied on custom
and joint legislative rules to set the time as 12:00 p.m. Since the
Constitution specifically directs that the time as well as the day for
convening regular sessions shall be determined by statute, it is the
purpose of this act to add to the statute a regular session starting
time of 12:00 p.m.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.04.010 and 1980 c 87 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
Regular sessions of the legislature shall be held annually,
commencing at 12:00 p.m. on the second Monday of January.

--- END ---