BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2002 c 311 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the economic well-being and
stability of the fishing industry and the conservation of the food fish
resources of the state of Washington are best served by providing
managers with all available tools to stabilize and distribute the
commercial harvest of targeted Puget Sound salmon stocks. In recent
years, segments of the industry in cooperation with the department of
fish and wildlife have funded studies examining modification of harvest
practices and fishing gear, particularly purse seine gear, to minimize
or avoid impacts on nontargeted Puget Sound salmon stocks.
(2) The legislature finds that the new Pacific salmon treaty
agreement of 1999 will drastically reduce the commercial harvest of
Fraser river sockeye salmon while likely providing increased harvest
opportunities in areas of Puget Sound where only gill net gear is now
authorized. This exclusive limitation is contrary to the long-term
needs of the fishing industry and inconsistent with the legislature's
intent to stabilize harvest levels while selectively targeting healthy
salmon stocks.
(3) The legislature further finds that the economic well-being and
stability of the fishing industry and the conservation of the food fish
resources of the state of Washington are best served by allocating an
equal amount of time to gill net gear and purse seine gear to harvest
salmon in Puget Sound.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.50.010 and 2002 c 311 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for sockeye
salmon within the waters described in subsection (2) of this section
only during the period June 10th to July 25th and for other salmon only
from the second Monday of September through November 30th, except
during the hours between 4:00 p.m. of Friday and 4:00 p.m. of the
following Sunday.
(2) All waters east and south of a line commencing at a concrete
monument on Angeles Point in Clallam county near the mouth of the Elwha
River on which is inscribed "Angeles Point Monument" (latitude 48° 9'
3" north, longitude 123° 33' 01" west of Greenwich Meridian); thence
running east on a line 81° 30' true across the flashlight and bell buoy
off Partridge Point and thence continued to longitude 122° 40' west;
thence north to the southerly shore of Sinclair Island; thence along
the southerly shore of the island to the most easterly point of the
island; thence 46° true to Carter Point, the most southerly point of
Lummi Island; thence northwesterly along the westerly shore line of
Lummi Island to where the shore line intersects line of longitude 122°
40' west; thence north to the mainland, including: The southerly
portion of Hale Passage, Bellingham Bay, Padilla Bay, Fidalgo Bay,
Guemes Channel, Skagit Bay, Similk Bay, Saratoga Passage, Holmes
Harbor, Possession Sound, Admiralty Inlet, Hood Canal, Puget Sound, and
their inlets, passages, waters, waterways, and tributaries.
(3) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for salmon with
gill net, purse seine, and other lawful gear prior to the second Monday
in September within the waters of Hale Passage, Bellingham Bay, Samish
Bay, Padilla Bay, Fidalgo Bay, Guemes Channel, Skagit Bay, and Similk
Bay, to wit: Those waters northerly and easterly of a line commencing
at Stanwood, thence along the south shore of Skagit Bay to Rocky Point
on Camano Island; thence northerly to Polnell Point on Whidbey Island.
(4) Whenever the commission determines that a stock or run of
salmon cannot be harvested in the usual manner, and that the stock or
run of salmon may be in danger of being wasted and surplus to natural
or artificial spawning requirements, the commission may, consistent
with subsection (6) of this section, authorize units of gill net and
purse seine gear in any number or equivalents, by time and area, to
fully utilize the harvestable portions of these salmon runs for the
economic well being of the citizens of this state. Gill net and purse
seine gear other than emergency and test gear authorized by the
director shall not be used in Lake Washington.
(5) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for pink salmon
in each odd-numbered year from August 1st through September 1st in the
waters lying inside of a line commencing at the most easterly point of
Dungeness Spit and thence projected to Point Partridge on Whidbey
Island and a line commencing at Olele Point and thence projected
easterly to Bush Point on Whidbey Island.
(6)(a) Whenever the commission authorizes commercial fishing for
salmon with gill net or purse seine gear within the waters described by
this section, the commission shall adopt rules specifying weekly
fishing schedules for both gear types that provide:
(i) An equal amount of time opened during each week to take salmon
with both gill net and purse seine gear types; and
(ii) Alternate first day of the week openings to each gear type.
(b) Exceptions to this equal time provision may be made only when:
(i) Estimates obtained by direct, on-water sampling of each gear
type show a disproportionate amount of the bycatch mortality of
incidentally encountered fish or other species associated with fishing
by either gear type;
(ii) Economic analyses of Puget Sound commercial salmon
conclusively demonstrate that allocating a greater amount of time to
either gear type will improve the economic well-being and stability of
the fishing industry; or
(iii) The total allowable harvest, determined by the department on
the basis of either preseason forecast or in-season gathered
information, is insufficient to allow openings for both gill net and
purse seine gears.
(c) Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of the
commission under this section.

--- END ---