BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public utility districts may request voluntary donations from
their customers for the purpose of supporting hunger programs.
(2) Voluntary donations collected by public utility districts under
this section may be used by the public utility district to support the
maintenance and operation of hunger programs in the community.
(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes a public utility district
from requesting voluntary donations to support other programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Municipal utilities under this chapter may request voluntary
donations from their customers for the purpose of supporting hunger
programs.
(2) Voluntary donations collected by municipal utilities under this
section may be used by the municipal utility to support the maintenance
and operation of hunger programs in the community.
(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes a municipal utility from
requesting voluntary donations to support other programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter may
request voluntary donations from their customers for the purpose of
supporting hunger programs.
(2) Voluntary donations collected by code cities under this section
may be used by the code city to support the maintenance and operation
of hunger programs in the community.
(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes a code city providing utility
services from requesting voluntary donations to support other programs.

--- END ---