BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the department may accept, expend, and retain
gifts, grants, bequests, or contributions from public or private
sources to carry out the purposes and programs of the department.

--- END ---