BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) The market price of gold has increased significantly in recent
years and there has been a proliferation of pawnbrokers and secondhand
dealers, including temporary, transient secondhand businesses, engaging
in "cash for gold" type precious metal transactions. Frequently, these
"cash for gold" type operations are operated by persons desiring to
exploit unsuspecting consumers based on current market conditions;
(2) The increasing number of "cash for gold" type transactions in
communities and neighborhoods throughout Washington has been linked to
increased crimes involving the theft of gold and other precious metal
objects, including home burglaries, robberies, and other crimes,
resulting in depressed home values and other threats to the health,
safety, and welfare of Washington state residents; and
(3) With the growing number of precious metal transactions, there
is a corresponding significant increase in the number of "cash for
gold" type storefront businesses, including temporary, transient
secondhand businesses, in Washington state which may not be consistent
with the growth goals and quality of life sought by communities and
neighborhoods and the state as a whole.
Therefore, to better protect legitimate owners, consumers,
pawnbrokers, and secondhand dealers, the legislature intends to
establish and implement stricter standards relating to transactions
involving property consisting of gold and other precious metals.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.60.010 and 1995 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Melted metals" means metals derived from metal junk or
precious metals that have been reduced to a melted state from other
than ore or ingots which are produced from ore that has not previously
been processed.
(2) "Metal junk" means any metal that has previously been milled,
shaped, stamped, or forged and that is no longer useful in its original
form, except precious metals.
(3) "Nonmetal junk" means any nonmetal, commonly discarded item
that is worn out, or has outlasted its usefulness as intended in its
original form except nonmetal junk does not include an item made in a
former period which has enhanced value because of its age.
(4) "Pawnbroker" means every person engaged, in whole or in part,
in the business of loaning money on the security of pledges of personal
property, or deposits or conditional sales of personal property, or the
purchase or sale of personal property.
(5) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.
(6) "Secondhand dealer" means every person engaged in whole or in
part in the business of purchasing, selling, trading, consignment
selling, or otherwise transferring for value, secondhand property
including metal junk, melted metals, precious metals, whether or not
the person maintains a fixed place of business within the state, such
as temporary, transient secondhand businesses. Secondhand dealer also
includes persons or entities conducting business at flea markets or
swap meets, more than three times per year.
(7) "Secondhand property" means any item of personal property
offered for sale which is not new, including metals in any form, except
postage stamps, coins that are legal tender, bullion in the form of
fabricated hallmarked bars, used books, and clothing of a resale value
of seventy-five dollars or less, except furs.
(8) "Transaction" means a pledge, or the purchase of, or
consignment of, or the trade of any item of personal property by a
pawnbroker or a secondhand dealer from a member of the general public.
(9) "Loan period" means the period of time from the date the loan
is made until the date the loan is paid off, the loan is in default, or
the loan is refinanced and new loan documents are issued, including all
grace or extension periods.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.60.020 and 1991 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For any transaction involving property other than property
consisting of a precious metal, every pawnbroker and secondhand dealer
doing business in this state shall maintain wherever that business is
conducted a record in which shall be legibly written in the English
language, at the time of each transaction, the following information:
(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(b) The date of the transaction;
(c) The name of the person or employee or the identification number
of the person or employee conducting the transaction, as required by
the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement
officer;
(d) The name, date of birth, sex, height, weight, race, and address
and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(e) A complete description of the property pledged, bought, or
consigned, including the brand name, serial number, model number or
name, any initials or engraving, size, pattern, and color or stone or
stones, and in the case of firearms, the caliber, barrel length, type
of action, and whether it is a pistol, rifle, or shotgun;
(f) The price paid or the amount loaned;
(g) The type and identifying number of identification used by the
person with whom the transaction was made, which shall consist of a
valid drivers license or identification card issued by any state or two
pieces of identification issued by a governmental agency, one of which
shall be descriptive of the person identified. At all times, one piece
of current government issued picture identification will be required;
and
(h) The nature of the transaction, a number identifying the
transaction, the store identification as designated by the applicable
law enforcement agency, or the name and address of the business and the
name of the person or employee, conducting the transaction, and the
location of the property.
(2) ((This)) For any transaction involving property consisting of
a precious metal, every pawnbroker and secondhand dealer doing business
in this state shall maintain wherever that business is conducted a
record in which shall be legibly written in the English language, at
the time of each transaction, the following information:
(a) The signature and photo of the person with whom the transaction
is made. If the amount paid or loaned is greater than one hundred
dollars, then the signature, photo, and fingerprint of the person with
whom the transaction is made;
(b) The time and date of the transaction;
(c) The name of the person or employee or the identification number
of the person or employee conducting the transaction, as required by
the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement
officer. If the amount paid or loaned is greater than one hundred
dollars, then the name of the person or employee or the identification
number of the person or employee conducting the transaction;
(d) The name, date of birth, sex, height, weight, race, and
residential address and telephone number of the person with whom the
transaction is made;
(e) A complete description of the property pledged, bought, or
consigned, including the brand name, serial number, model number or
name, any initials or engraving, size, pattern, and color of stone or
stones, and in the case of firearms, the caliber, barrel length, type
of action, and whether it is a pistol, rifle, or shotgun;
(f) The price paid or the amount loaned. If the amount paid or
loaned is greater than one hundred dollars the amount may not be by
cash but must be by a written instruction to pay signed by the person
giving the instruction;
(g) The type and identifying number of identification used by the
person with whom the transaction was made, which shall consist of a
valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state or
two pieces of identification issued by a governmental agency, one of
which shall be descriptive of the person identified, and a full copy of
both sides of each piece of identification used by the person with whom
the transaction was made. At all times, one piece of current
government issued picture identification will be required; and
(h) The nature of the transaction, a number identifying the
transaction, the store identification as designated by the applicable
law enforcement agency, or the name and address of the business or
location, including the street address, and room number if appropriate,
and the name of the person or employee, conducting the transaction, and
the location of the property.
(3) The records required in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at
reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, be open to
the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state
or any of its political subdivisions, and shall be maintained wherever
that business is conducted for three years following the date of the
transaction.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.60.050 and 1991 c 323 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Property other than property consisting of a precious metal
bought or received in pledge by any pawnbroker shall not be removed
from that place of business, except when redeemed by, or returned to
the owner, within thirty days after the receipt of the property.
(2) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received in
pledge by any pawnbroker may not be removed from that place of
business, except when redeemed by, or returned to the owner, within
forty-five days after the receipt of the property.
(3) Property shall at all times during the ordinary hours of
business be open to inspection to any commissioned law enforcement
officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.60.055 and 1991 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Property other than property consisting of a precious metal
bought or received on consignment by any secondhand dealer with a
permanent place of business in the state shall not be removed from that
place of business except consigned property returned to the owner,
within thirty days after the receipt of the property.
(2) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received on
consignment by any secondhand dealer with a permanent place of business
in the state may not be removed from that place of business except
consigned property returned to the owner, within forty-five days after
the receipt of the property.
(3) Property shall at all times during the ordinary hours of
business be open to inspection to any commissioned law enforcement
officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.
(((2))) (4) Property other than property consisting of a precious
metal bought or received on consignment by any secondhand dealer
without a permanent place of business in the state, shall be held
within the city or county in which the property was received, except
consigned property returned to the owner, within thirty days after
receipt of the property.
(5) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received on
consignment by any secondhand dealer without a permanent place of
business in the state, must be held within the city or county in which
the property was received, except consigned property returned to the
owner, within forty-five days after receipt of the property.
(6) The property shall be available within the appropriate
jurisdiction for inspection at reasonable times by any commissioned law
enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law
enforcement officer has compiled and published a list of persons who
have been convicted of any crime involving theft, then a pawnbroker and
a secondhand dealer shall utilize such a list for any transaction
involving property other than property consisting of a precious metal
as required by the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law
enforcement officer.
(2) If the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law
enforcement officer has compiled and published a list of persons who
have been convicted of any crime involving theft, then a pawnbroker and
a secondhand dealer shall utilize such a list for any transaction
involving property consisting of a precious metal and may not engage in
any transaction with a person on the list.

Sec. 7 RCW 10.31.100 and 2010 c 274 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (((10))) (11) of this
section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was
part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 19.60.066
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(7) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(((7))) (8) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing any act of indecent
exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(((8))) (9) A police officer may arrest and take into custody,
pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a
person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe
that an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(((9))) (10) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(((10))) (11) A police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm
or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(((11))) (12) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2),
(3), (4), and (((6))) (7) of this section, nothing in this section
extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title
46 RCW.
(((12))) (13) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly
liable for making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (((8))) (9)
of this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.60.066 and 1991 c 355 s 21 and 1991 c 323 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW for:
(((1))) (a) Any person to remove, alter, or obliterate any
manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification
number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon an item of
personal property that was purchased, consigned, or received in pledge.
In addition an item shall not be accepted for pledge or a secondhand
purchase where the manufacturer's make, model, or serial number,
personal identification number, or identifying marks engraved or etched
upon an item of personal property has been removed, altered, or
obliterated;
(((2))) (b) Any person to knowingly make, cause, or allow to be
made any false entry or misstatement of any material matter in any
book, record, or writing required to be kept under this chapter;
(((3))) (c) Any pawnbroker or secondhand dealer to receive any
property from any person under the age of eighteen years, any person
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or any person
known to the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer as having been convicted
of burglary, robbery, theft, or possession of or receiving stolen
property within the past ten years whether the person is acting in his
or her own behalf or as the agent of another;
(((4))) (d) Any pawnbroker to engage in the business of cashing or
selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving
the same purpose unless the pawnbroker complies with the provisions of
chapter 31.45 RCW; or
(((5))) (e) Any person to violate knowingly any other provision of
this chapter.
(2) It is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW for any person
to commit a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this
section involving property consisting of a precious metal.

--- END ---