BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.082 and 2010 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) Any
person((, including unlicensed youth shelters or runaway and homeless
youth programs,)) who, without legal authorization, provides shelter to
a minor and who knows at the time of providing the shelter that the
minor is away from the parent's home without the permission of the
parent, or other lawfully prescribed residence, shall promptly report
the location of the child to the parent, the law enforcement agency of
the jurisdiction in which the person lives, or the department.
(((b)(i) If a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed
organization whose stated mission is to provide services to homeless or
runaway youth and their families, provides shelter to a minor and knows
at the time of providing the shelter that the minor is away from a
lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission, it
shall contact the youth's parent, preferably within twenty-four hours
but within no more than seventy-two hours following the time that the
youth is admitted to the shelter or other licensed organization's
program. The notification must include the whereabouts of the youth,
a description of the youth's physical and emotional condition, and the
circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter or
organization. If there are compelling reasons not to notify the
parent, the shelter or organization shall instead notify the
department.
(ii) At least once every eight hours after learning that a youth
receiving services or shelter under this section is away from home
without permission, the shelter or organization staff must consult the
information that the Washington state patrol makes publicly available
under RCW 43.43.510(2). If the youth is publicly listed as missing,
the shelter or organization shall immediately notify the department of
its contact with the youth listed as missing. The notification must
include a description of the youth's physical and emotional condition
and the circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter
or organization.
(c) Reports required under this section)) The report may be made by
telephone or any other reasonable means.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Shelter" means the person's home or any structure over which
the person has any control.
(b) "Promptly report" means to report within eight hours after the
person has knowledge that the minor is away from a lawfully prescribed
residence or home without parental permission.
(((c) "Compelling reasons" include, but are not limited to,
circumstances that indicate that notifying the parent or legal guardian
will subject the child to abuse or neglect as defined in chapter 26.44
RCW.))
(3) When the department receives a report under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall make a good faith attempt to notify the parent
that a report has been received and offer services designed to resolve
the conflict and accomplish a reunification of the family.
(((4) Nothing in this section prohibits any person from immediately
reporting the identity and location of any minor who is away from a
lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission more
promptly than required under this section.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2012.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.51.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 64 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department, after consultation with ((the nursing home advisory
council and)) the board of health, shall adopt, amend, and promulgate
such rules, regulations, and standards with respect to all nursing
homes to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to further the
accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe and
adequate medical and nursing care of individuals in nursing homes and
the sanitary, hygienic, and safe conditions of the nursing home in the
interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.67.020 and 2009 c 296 s 1 and 2006 c 112 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington customized employment training program is hereby
created to provide training assistance to employers locating or
expanding in the state.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program shall be
made to the board in a form and manner as specified by the board.
Successful applicants shall receive a training allowance from the board
to cover the costs of training at a qualified training institution.
Employers may not receive an allowance for training costs which exceed
the maximum annual training cost per employee, as established by the
board, and are not eligible to receive an allowance or allowances of
over five hundred thousand dollars per calendar year.
(b) Allowances shall be granted for applicants who meet the
following criteria:
(i) The employer must have entered into an agreement with a
qualified training institution to engage in customized training and the
employer must agree to: (A) Upon completion of the training, make a
payment to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030 in an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the
training allowance; and (B) over the subsequent eighteen months, make
monthly or quarterly payments, as specified in the agreement, to the
employment training finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030 in an
amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the training allowance.
During calendar years 2009 and 2010, participants may delay payments
due under this section for up to eighteen months. The payments into
the employment training finance account provided for in this section do
not constitute payment to the institution.
(ii) When hiring, the employer must make good faith efforts, as
determined by the board, to hire from trainees in the participant's
training program. The agreement with the qualified training
institution provided for in (b)(i) of this subsection shall specify
terms for reimbursement or additional payment to the employment
training finance account by the employer if the participant does not,
when hiring, make good faith efforts to hire from trainees in the
participant's training program.
(iii) The training allowance may not be used to train workers who
have been hired as a result of a strike or lockout.
(c) Preference shall be given to employers with fewer than fifty
employees.
(d) Preference shall be given to training that leads to
transferable skills that are interchangeable among different jobs,
employers, or workplaces.
(3) Qualified training institutions may enter into agreements with
four-year institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, in accordance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter
39.34 RCW.
(4) The board and qualified training institutions may solicit and
receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, from tribal, local, federal, or other governmental entities,
as well as private sources, for the purpose of providing training
allowances under chapter 112, Laws of 2006. All revenue thus solicited
and received shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account created in RCW 28B.67.030.
(5) Qualified training institutions must make good faith efforts to
develop training programs using trainers preferred by participants.
(6) For employers who (a) have requested training under the job
skills program created under chapter 28C.04 RCW but are not able to
participate in the job skills program because the funds have all been
committed, and (b) desire to become participants in the Washington
customized employment training program, the board shall ensure a
seamless process toward participation.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.21.217 and 2010 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to furnishing utility services, a city or town may
require a deposit to guarantee payment for services. However, failure
to require a deposit does not affect the validity of any lien
authorized by RCW 35.21.290 or 35.67.200. A city or town may determine
how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.
(2) A city or town may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicates of tenant utility service bills, or may notify
an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
city or town in writing that a property served by the city or town is
a residential rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate
mailing address, the city or town shall notify the owner or the owner's
designee of a residential tenant's delinquency at the same time and in
the same manner the city or town notifies the tenant of the tenant's
delinquency or by mail, and the city or town is prohibited from
collecting from the owner or the owner's designee any charges for
electric light or power services more than four months past due. When
a city or town provides a real property owner or the owner's designee
with duplicates of residential tenant utility service bills or notice
that a tenant's utility account is delinquent, the city or town shall
notify the tenant that it is providing the duplicate bills or
delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
(3) After August 1, 2010, if a city or town fails to notify the
owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a written request to do
so and after receiving the other information required by ((this))
subsection (2) of this section, the city or town shall have no lien
against the premises for the residential tenant's delinquent and unpaid
charges and is prohibited from collecting the tenant's delinquent and
unpaid charges for electric light or power services from the owner or
the owner's designee.
(4) When a utility account is in a tenant's name, the owner or the
owner's designee shall notify the city or town in writing within
fourteen days of the termination of the rental agreement and vacation
of the premises. If the owner or the owner's designee fails to provide
this notice, a city or town providing electric light or power services
is not limited to collecting only up to four months of a tenant's
delinquent charges from the owner or the owner's designee, provided
that the city or town has complied with the notification requirements
of subsection (((3))) (2) of this section.
(5)(a) If an occupied multiple residential rental unit receives
utility service through a single utility account, if the utility
account's billing address is not the same as the service address of a
residential rental property, or if the city or town has been notified
that a tenant resides at the service address, the city or town shall
make a good faith and reasonable effort to provide written notice to
the service address of pending disconnection of electric power and
light or water service for nonpayment at least seven calendar days
prior to disconnection. The purpose of this notice is to provide any
affected tenant an opportunity to resolve the delinquency with his or
her landlord or to arrange for continued service. If requested, a city
or town shall provide electric power and light or water services to an
affected tenant on the same terms and conditions as other residential
utility customers, without requiring that he or she pay delinquent
amounts for services billed directly to the property owner or a
previous tenant except as otherwise allowed by law and only where the
city or town offers the opportunity for the affected tenant to set up
a reasonable payment plan for the delinquent amounts legally due. If
a landlord fails to pay for electric power and light or water services,
any tenant who requests that the services be placed in his or her name
may deduct from the rent due all reasonable charges paid by the tenant
to the city or town for such services. A landlord may not take or
threaten to take reprisals or retaliatory action as defined in RCW
59.18.240 against a tenant who deducts from his or her rent payments
made to a city or town as provided in this subsection.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (5) affects the validity of any lien
authorized by RCW 35.21.290 or 35.67.200. Furthermore, a city or town
that provides electric power and light or water services to a
residential tenant in these circumstances shall retain the right to
collect from the property owner, previous tenant, or both, any
delinquent amounts due for service previously provided to the service
address if the city or town has complied with the notification
requirements of subsection (((3))) (2) of this section when applicable.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.350 and 2010 c 15 s 1 and 2010 c 8 s 9069 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The driver of any of the following vehicles must stop before
the stop line, if present, and otherwise within fifty feet but not less
than fifteen feet from the nearest rail at a railroad grade crossing
unless exempt under subsection (3) of this section:
(i) A school bus or private carrier bus carrying any school child
or other passenger;
(ii) A commercial motor vehicle transporting passengers;
(iii) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, used for transporting
any hazardous material as defined in the hazardous materials
regulations of the United States department of transportation in 49
C.F.R. Parts 107 through 180 as it existed on June 10, 2010, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the state patrol by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section. For the purposes of this
section, a cargo tank is any commercial motor vehicle designed to
transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank that is either
permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis;
(iv) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, transporting a
commodity under exemption in accordance with ((United States department
of transportation in)) 49 C.F.R. Part 107, Subpart B as it existed on
June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the state
patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section;
(v) A cargo tank transporting a commodity that at the time of
loading has a temperature above its flashpoint as determined by the
United States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 173.120 as
it existed on June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided
by the state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this
section; or
(vi) A commercial motor vehicle that is required to be marked or
placarded with any one of the following classifications by the United
States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Part 172 as it existed
on June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section:
(A) Division 1.1, Division 1.2, Division 1.3, or Division 1.4;
(B) Division 2.1, Division 2.2, Division 2.2 oxygen, Division 2.3
poison gas, or Division 2.3 chlorine;
(C) Division 4.1 or Division 4.3;
(D) Division 5.1 or Division 5.2;
(E) Division 6.1 poison;
(F) Class 3 combustible liquid or Class 3 flammable;
(G) Class 7;
(H) Class 8.
(b) While stopped, the driver must listen and look in both
directions along the track for any approaching train and for signals
indicating the approach of a train. The driver may not proceed until
he or she can do so safely.
(2) After stopping at a railroad grade crossing and upon proceeding
when it is safe to do so, the driver must cross only in a gear that
permits the vehicle to traverse the crossing without changing gears.
The driver may not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.
(3) This section does not apply at any railroad grade crossing
where:
(a) Traffic is controlled by a police officer or flagger.
(b) A functioning traffic control signal is transmitting a green
light.
(c) The tracks are used exclusively for a streetcar or industrial
switching purposes.
(d) The utilities and transportation commission has approved the
installation of an "exempt" sign in accordance with the procedures and
standards under RCW 81.53.060.
(e) The crossing is abandoned and is marked with a sign indicating
it is out-of-service.
(f) The state patrol has, by rule, identified a crossing where
stopping is not required.
(g) The superintendent of public instruction has, by rule,
identified a circumstance under which a school bus or private carrier
bus carrying any school child or other passenger is not required to
stop.
(4) For the purpose of this section, "commercial motor vehicle"
means: Any vehicle with a manufacturer's seating capacity for eight or
more passengers, including the driver, that transports passengers for
hire; any private carrier bus; any vehicle used to transport property
that has a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight
rating, gross vehicle weight, or gross combination weight of 4,536 kg
(10,001 pounds) or more; and any vehicle used in the transportation of
hazardous materials as defined in RCW 46.25.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.94.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6015 and 2010 1st
sp.s. c 35 s 406 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for itself if the aggregate principal
amount payable thereunder is greater than an amount to be established
from time to time by the state finance committee or participate in a
program providing for the issuance of certificates of participation,
including any contract for credit enhancement, without the prior
approval of the state finance committee. Except as provided in RCW
28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall approve the form of all
financing contracts or a standard format for all financing contracts.
The state finance committee also may:
(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into
master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or
more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state
board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of
higher learning; or to be acquired by an other agency;
(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of
participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other
agencies;
(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master
financing contracts; and
(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under
this chapter.
(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state
finance committee may consult with representatives from the department
of general administration, the office of financial management, and the
department of information services.
(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state
also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing
contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.
(4) Except for financing contracts for real property used for the
purposes described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for real property of the state without
prior approval of the legislature. For the purposes of this
requirement, a financing contract must be treated as used for real
property if it is being entered into by the state for the acquisition
of land; the acquisition of an existing building; the construction of
a new building; or a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or
rebuilding of an existing building. Prior approval of the legislature
is not required under this chapter for a financing contract entered
into by the state under this chapter for energy conservation
improvements to existing buildings where such improvements include:
(a) Fixtures and equipment that are not part of a major remodeling,
renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of the building, or (b) other
improvements to the building that are being performed for the primary
purpose of energy conservation. Such energy conservation improvements
must be determined eligible for financing under this chapter by the
office of financial management in accordance with financing guidelines
established by the state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal
property for the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf
of another agency without the approval of such a financing contract by
the governing body of the other agency.

--- END ---