BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some restaurants
allow patrons to bring bottles of wine to the restaurant so long as
restaurant personnel open and serve the beverage. In these cases, the
restaurants often charge a fee known as a corkage fee. The legislature
supports activities in the free market that facilitate local businesses
in selling their products. One of the methods restaurants and wineries
have found to be mutually beneficial is a waiver of corkage fees for
local businesses. The legislature intends to allow wineries and
restaurants the ability to make agreements as to whether to charge a
corkage fee without restriction or regulation under the tied-house
laws.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.28.295 and 2009 c 506 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 66.28.290 shall prohibit:
(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed
as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional
off-site retail only location.
(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to
reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is
not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a
licensed beer or wine distributor.
(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license
under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements
attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.
(4) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own
production under RCW 66.24.145.
(5) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property
on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller,
domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on
contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic
brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license.
(7) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24
RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from
holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the
premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(8) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery premises.
(9) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the
purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote Washington
wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property or leasing
all or any portion of such facility property to a retail licensee on
the facility property if the members of the board of directors or
officers of the board for the organization include officers, directors,
owners, or employees of a licensed domestic winery. Financing for the
construction of the facility must include both public and private
money.
(10) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or association
registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, or a local wine industry association registered under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code as
it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(11) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or
66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing and selling at
retail such person's own production or from exercising any other right
or privilege that attaches to such license.
(12) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product or from shipping their own product directly to
consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.
(13) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to RCW
66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.
(14) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product.
(15) A domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.400 from entering an arrangement to waive a corkage
fee.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.310 and 2010 c 290 s 3 and 2010 c 141 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal
value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not
limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils, coasters,
menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses, bottles or can
openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts, hats, visors,
and other similar items. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded
promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to
provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any
alcohol to the retailer.
(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of
this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is
otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may
file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board
may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the
circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded
promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result
in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result
in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise
inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the board may issue an
administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the
retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative violation
notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing to a special occasion licensee and a special occasion
licensee from receiving services for:
(a) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
(b) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event; or
(c) Pouring or dispensing of spirits by a licensed domestic
distiller or the accredited representative of a distiller,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed
under RCW 66.24.310.
(3) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits industry members from
performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building,
rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating
and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with board rules, or personal services as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to retailers when the personal services are (a)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar
informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or
beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a special
occasion license, a grocery store license with a tasting endorsement,
or a private club license. A domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder is not obligated to perform any such personal services,
and a retail licensee may not require a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to conduct any personal service as a condition for
selling any alcohol to the retail licensee, or as a condition for
including any product of the domestic winery or certificate of approval
holder in any tasting conducted by the licensee. Except as provided in
RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be borne, directly or
indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder or
any distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits wineries,
certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from identifying
the producers on private labels authorized under RCW 66.24.400,
66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(6) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports entertainment
facility license or an affiliated business for brand advertising at the
licensed facility or promoting events held at the sports entertainment
facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.
(7) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
or beer certificate of approval holder to grocery store licensees with
a tasting endorsement when the personal services are (a) conducted at
a licensed premises in conjunction with a tasting event, and (b)
intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or
experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal
services may include participation and pouring, bottle signing events,
and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic
brewery, microbrewery, or beer certificate of approval holder is not
obligated to perform any such personal services, and a grocery store
licensee may not require the performance of any personal service as a
condition for including any product in any tasting conducted by the
licensee.
(8) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an arrangement between a
domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or
66.24.400 to waive a corkage fee.

--- END ---