BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.36A.020 and 2005 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(3) "Naturopath" means an individual licensed under this chapter.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state naturopathic practice
advisory committee.
(5) "Educational program" means an accredited program preparing
persons for the practice of naturopathic medicine.
(6) "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and treatment
of disease or other human conditions through the use of foods, water,
herbs, roots, bark, or natural food elements.
(7) "Manual manipulation" or "mechanotherapy" means manipulation of
a part or the whole of the body by hand or by mechanical means.
(8) "Physical modalities" means use of physical, chemical,
electrical, and other ((noninvasive)) modalities that do not exceed
those used as of the effective date of this section in minor office
procedures or common diagnostic procedures, including but not limited
to heat, cold, air, light, water in any of its forms, sound, massage,
and therapeutic exercise.
(9) "Homeopathy" means a system of medicine based on the use of
infinitesimal doses of medicines capable of producing symptoms similar
to those of the disease treated, as listed in the homeopathic
pharmacopeia of the United States.
(10) "Naturopathic medicines" means vitamins; minerals; botanical
medicines; homeopathic medicines; hormones; and those legend drugs and
controlled substances consistent with naturopathic medical practice in
accordance with rules established by the secretary. Controlled
substances are limited to codeine and testosterone products that are
contained in Schedules III, IV, and V in chapter 69.50 RCW.
(11) "Hygiene and immunization" means the use of such preventative
techniques as personal hygiene, asepsis, public health, and
immunizations, to the extent allowed by rule.
(12) "Minor office procedures" means care and procedures incident
thereto of superficial lacerations, lesions, and abrasions, and the
removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures, not to
include the eye; and the use of antiseptics and topical or local
anesthetics in connection therewith. "Minor office procedures" also
includes intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal
injections of substances consistent with the practice of naturopathic
medicine and in accordance with rules established by the secretary.
(13) "Common diagnostic procedures" means the use of venipuncture
consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine, commonly used
diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice, health
history taking, physical examination, radiography, examination of body
orifices excluding endoscopy, laboratory medicine, and obtaining
samples of human tissues, but excluding incision or excision beyond
that which is authorized as a minor office procedure.
(14) "Suggestion" means techniques including but not limited to
counseling, biofeedback, and hypnosis.
(15) "Radiography" means the ordering, but not the interpretation,
of radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies and the taking and
interpretation of standard radiographs.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.36A.040 and 2005 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Naturopathic medicine is the practice by naturopaths of the art and
science of the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of disorders of the
body by stimulation or support, or both, of the natural processes of
the human body. A naturopath is responsible and accountable to the
consumer for the quality of naturopathic care rendered.
The practice of naturopathic medicine includes manual manipulation
(mechanotherapy), the prescription, administration, dispensing, and
use, except for the treatment of malignancies, of nutrition and food
science, physical modalities, minor office procedures, homeopathy,
naturopathic medicines, hygiene and immunization, ((nondrug))
contraceptive devices, common diagnostic procedures, and suggestion;
however, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit consultation and
treatment of a patient in concert with a practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. No person licensed under this chapter may
employ the term "chiropractic" to describe any services provided by a
naturopath under this chapter.

--- END ---