BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.010 and 2009 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued to
an individual under chapter 46.20 RCW that has been endorsed in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to authorize the
individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to ((the CMVSA)) 49 U.S.C.
Sec. 31309 to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related
to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle
drivers.
(5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit" means a permit issued
under RCW 46.25.060(5).
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle or combination
of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property
if the motor vehicle:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more
(26,001 pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit with a gross vehicle
weight rating of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or more); or
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more
(26,001 pounds or more); or
(c) Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver; or
(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous
materials as defined in this section; or
(e) Is a school bus regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a
determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the
law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized
administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or
court cost, entry into a deferred prosecution program under chapter
10.05 RCW, or violation of a condition of release without bail,
regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or
probated.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009,
including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R.
Sec. 40.3.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle.
The GVWR of a combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to
as the "gross combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power
unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit
cannot be determined, the actual gross weight will be used. If a
vehicle with a GVWR of less than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or
less) has been structurally modified to carry a heavier load, then the
actual gross weight capacity of the modified vehicle, as determined by
RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042, will be used as the GVWR.
(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been
designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be
placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. Part 172 or any quantity of a
material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. Part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a declaration by an authorized
enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local
jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor
carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Secs. 386.72,
392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American uniform
out-of-service criteria.
(16) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol
confirmation test that:
(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49
C.F.R. Part 40; and
(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under
circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49
C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive
alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.
(17) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(18) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;
(d) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic offense";
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(g) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(19) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
(20) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug
specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing
education requirements of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.281.
(21) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to transport
a liquid or gaseous material within a tank that is either permanently
or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. Tank vehicles
include, but are not limited to cargo tanks and portable tanks.
However, this definition does not include portable tanks having a rated
capacity under one thousand gallons.
(22) "Type of driving" means one of the following:
(a) "Nonexcepted interstate," which means the CDL holder or
applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, is
both subject to and meets the qualification requirements under 49
C.F.R. Part 391 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section, and is required to obtain
a medical examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it
existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date
as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the
purposes of this section;
(b) "Excepted interstate," which means the CDL holder or applicant
operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, but engages
exclusively in transportation or operations excepted under 49 C.F.R.
Secs. 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3, as they existed on the
effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this section, from all or parts of the qualification requirements of 49
C.F.R. Part 391 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section, and is therefore not
required to obtain a medical examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R.
Sec. 391.45 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section;
(c) "Nonexcepted intrastate," which means the CDL holder or
applicant operates only in intrastate commerce and is therefore subject
to state driver qualification requirements; or
(d) "Excepted intrastate," which means the CDL holder or applicant
operates in intrastate commerce, but engages exclusively in
transportation or operations excepted from all or parts of the state
driver qualification requirements.
(23) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia.
(((23))) (24) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test
result or validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the
authority of the federal department of health and human services that:
(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff
concentration established under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.87; and
(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical
review officer.
A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances
that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation
drug test under 49 C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a
report of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.080 and 2004 c 249 s 8 and 2004 c 187 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license must be marked "commercial
driver's license" or "CDL," and must be, to the maximum extent
practicable, tamperproof. It must include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
(a) The name and residence address of the person;
(b) The person's color photograph;
(c) A physical description of the person including sex, height,
weight, and eye color;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) The person's social security number or any number or identifier
deemed appropriate by the department;
(f) The person's signature;
(g) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that
the person is authorized to drive, together with any endorsements or
restrictions;
(h) The name of the state; and
(i) The dates between which the license is valid.
(2) Commercial driver's licenses may be issued with the
classifications, endorsements, and restrictions set forth in this
subsection. The holder of a valid commercial driver's license may
drive all vehicles in the class for which that license is issued and
all lesser classes of vehicles except motorcycles and vehicles that
require an endorsement, unless the proper endorsement appears on the
license.
(a) Licenses may be classified as follows:
(i) Class A is a combination of vehicles with a gross combined
weight rating (GCWR) of 26,001 pounds or more, if the GVWR of the
vehicle or vehicles being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds.
(ii) Class B is a single vehicle with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or
more, and any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of 10,000
pounds.
(iii) Class C is a single vehicle with a GVWR of less than 26,001
pounds or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a GVWR not in excess
of 10,000 pounds consisting of:
(A) Vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers,
including the driver; or
(B) Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials.
(b) The following endorsements and restrictions may be placed on a
license:
(i) "H" authorizes the driver to drive a vehicle transporting
hazardous materials.
(ii) "K" restricts the driver to vehicles not equipped with air
brakes.
(iii) "T" authorizes driving double and triple trailers.
(iv) "P1" authorizes driving all vehicles, other than school buses,
carrying passengers.
(v) "P2" authorizes driving vehicles with a GVWR of less than
26,001 pounds, other than school buses, carrying sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(vi) "N" authorizes driving tank vehicles.
(vii) "X" represents a combination of hazardous materials and tank
vehicle endorsements.
(viii) "S" authorizes driving school buses.
(ix) "V" means that the driver has been issued a medical variance.
The license may be issued with additional endorsements and
restrictions as established by rule of the director.
(3) All school bus drivers must have either a "P1" or "P2"
endorsement depending on the GVWR of the school bus being driven.
(4) Before issuing a commercial driver's license, the department
shall obtain driving record information:
(a) Through the commercial driver's license information system;
(b) Through the national driver register;
(c) From the current state of record; and
(d) From all states where the applicant was previously licensed
over the last ten years to drive any type of motor vehicle.
A check under (d) of this subsection need be done only once, either
at the time of application for a new commercial driver's license, or
upon application for a renewal of a commercial driver's license for the
first time after July 1, 2005, provided a notation is made on the
driver's record confirming that the driving record check has been made
and noting the date it was completed.
(5) Within ten days after issuing a commercial driver's license,
the department must notify the commercial driver's license information
system of ((that fact,)) the information required under 49 C.F.R. Sec.
383.73 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section and provide all
information required to ensure identification of the person.
(6) A commercial driver's license shall expire in the same manner
as provided in RCW 46.20.181.
(7) When applying for renewal of a commercial driver's license, the
applicant shall:
(a) Complete the application form required by RCW 46.25.070(1),
providing updated information and required certifications;
(b) Submit the application to the department in person; and
(c) If the applicant wishes to retain a hazardous materials
endorsement, take and pass the written test for a hazardous materials
endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person applying for a CDL must certify that he or she is
or expects to be engaged in one of the following types of driving:
(i) Nonexcepted interstate;
(ii) Excepted interstate;
(iii) Nonexcepted intrastate; or
(iv) Excepted intrastate.
(b) From January 30, 2012, to January 30, 2014, the department may
require that any person holding a CDL prior to the effective date of
this section must provide the department with the certification
required under (a) of this subsection. The CDL of a person failing to
submit the required certification is subject to downgrade under
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A CDL applicant or holder who certifies under subsection
(1)(a)(i) of this section that he or she is or expects to be engaged in
nonexcepted interstate commerce must provide a copy of a medical
examiner's certificate prepared by a medical examiner, as defined in 49
C.F.R. Sec. 390.5 as it existed on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section. Upon submission, a copy
of the medical examiner's certificate must be date-stamped by the
department. A CDL holder who certifies under subsection (1)(a)(i) of
this section must submit a copy of each subsequently issued medical
examiner's certificate.
(3) For each operator of a commercial motor vehicle required to
have a commercial driver's license, the department must meet the
following requirements:
(a)(i) The driver's self-certification of type of driving under
subsection (1) of this section must be maintained on the driver's
record and the CDLIS driver record;
(ii) The copy of a medical examiner's certificate, when submitted
under subsection (2) of this section, must by retained for three years
beyond the date the certificate was issued; and
(iii) When a medical examiner's certificate is submitted under
subsection (2) of this section, the information required under 49
C.F.R. Sec. 383.73(j)(1)(iii) as it existed on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section must
be posted to the CDLIS driver record within ten calendar days from the
date submitted. The indicator of medical certification status, such as
"certified" or "not-certified," must be maintained on the driver's
record.
(b) Within ten calendar days of the driver's medical certification
status expiring or a medical variance expiring or being rescinded, the
medical certification status of the driver must be updated to "not-certified."
(c) Within ten calendar days of receiving information from the
federal motor carrier safety administration regarding issuance or
renewal of a medical variance for a driver, the department must update
the CDLIS driver record to include the medical variance information.
(4)(a) If a driver's medical certification or medical variance
expires, or the federal motor carrier safety administration notifies
the department that a medical variance was removed or rescinded, the
department must:
(i) Notify the driver of his or her "not-certified" medical
certification status and that the CDL privilege will be removed from
the driver's license unless the driver submits a current medical
certificate or medical variance, or changes his or her self-certification to driving only in excepted or intrastate commerce; and
(ii) Initiate procedures for downgrading the license. The CDL
downgrade must be completed and recorded within sixty days of the
driver's medical certification status becoming "not-certified" to
operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(b) Beginning January 30, 2014, if a driver fails to provide the
department with the certification required in subsection (1) of this
section, or a current medical examiner's certificate if the driver
self-certifies under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section that he or
she is operating in nonexcepted interstate commerce as required in
subsection (2) of this section, the department must mark the CDLIS
driver record as "not-certified" and initiate a CDL downgrade in
accordance with (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) A driver whose CDL has been downgraded under this subsection
may restore the CDL privilege by providing the necessary certifications
or medical variance information to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 30, 2012.

--- END ---