BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.090 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed
that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually
violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general shall
present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed person
continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and
that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the
person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon
the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed
person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the
state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find
probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives
unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(3) If the secretary has not authorized the person to petition the
court pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and if the person and
the prosecuting agency have retained experts who agree that conditional
release to a secure community transition facility is in the best
interests of the person and conditions can be imposed that would
adequately protect the community, the person and the prosecuting agency
may jointly petition the court for a hearing.
(4)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to
have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state.
The department is responsible for the cost of one expert or
professional person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting
agency's behalf. The committed person shall also have the right to a
jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or
her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is
indigent and requests an appointment.
(b) Whenever any person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of
this subsection, the department is responsible for the cost of one
expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's
behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert
or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or
professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the
person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant
medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person
who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the
person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an
evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf.
Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional
expert services at his or her own expense.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall
otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(e) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a secure community transition facility
pursuant to a petition filed under subsection (3) of this section, the
court shall determine whether conditional release to a secure community
transition facility is in the best interests of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(((4))) (5)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's
condition has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only
when evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less
restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change
in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person
either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or
that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately
protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section may be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when
there is current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the
following and the evidence presents a change in condition since the
person's last commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section. As used in
this section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited
to, a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(((5))) (6) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly
committed pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the
person is unconditionally discharged.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.092 and 2009 c 409 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
the court may enter an order directing conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (((1))) (a) The
person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to
provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155
RCW; (((2))) (b) the treatment provider has presented a specific course
of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will
report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the
supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of
the special commitment center; (((3))) (c) housing exists in Washington
that is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and the person or
agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has
agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of
security required by the court, and immediately to report to the court,
the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the
superintendent of the special commitment center if the person leaves
the housing to which he or she has been assigned without authorization;
(((4))) (d) the person is willing to comply with the treatment provider
and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the
court; and (((5))) (e) the person will be under the supervision of the
department of corrections and is willing to comply with supervision
requirements imposed by the department of corrections.
(2) The court may enter an order directing conditional release to
a secure community transition facility pursuant to RCW 71.09.090(3)
when it finds that subsections (1)(a), (b), (d), and (e) of this
section are met.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.305 and 2002 c 68 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise ordered by the court:
(a) Residents of a secure community transition facility shall wear
electronic monitoring devices at all times. To the extent that
electronic monitoring devices that employ global positioning system
technology are available and funds for this purpose are appropriated by
the legislature, the department shall use these devices.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, at least one
staff member, or other court-authorized and department-approved person
must escort each resident when the resident leaves the secure community
transition facility for appointments, employment, or other approved
activities. Escorting persons must supervise the resident closely and
maintain close proximity to the resident. The escort must immediately
notify the department of any serious violation, as defined in RCW
71.09.325, by the resident and must immediately notify law enforcement
of any violation of law by the resident. The escort may not be a
relative of the resident or a person with whom the resident has, or has
had, a dating relationship as defined in RCW 26.50.010.
(c) A resident may leave the secure community transition facility
without an escort if:
(i) The resident has progressed in treatment to the point that a
significant change in routine will not cause the resident to regress to
the point that the resident presents a greater risk to the community;
(ii) The secretary has provided prior written approval for the
activity; and
(iii) The resident wears an electronic monitoring device at all
times.
(2) Staff members of the special commitment center and any other
total confinement facility and any secure community transition facility
must be trained in self-defense and appropriate crisis responses
including incident de-escalation. Prior to escorting a person outside
of a facility, staff members must also have training in the offense
pattern of the offender they are escorting.
(3) Any escort must carry a cellular telephone or a similar device
at all times when escorting a resident of a secure community transition
facility.
(4) The department shall require training in offender pattern,
self-defense, and incident response for all court-authorized escorts
who are not employed by the department or the department of
corrections.

--- END ---