BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the hydraulic
project approval process established in chapter 77.55 RCW is one of the
oldest environmental permitting processes currently in use at the state
level. In 1949, the time of the hydraulic code's initial inception,
the hydraulic project approval process was not only an essential and
critical tool necessary for the protection of fish life in Washington's
waterways, but in many cases it was the only such tool available for
the protection of the resource.
(2) The legislature further finds that, since 1949, many additional
federal, state, and local resource protection regulations have emerged
to complement the hydraulic project approval process. So complete is
the safety net of regulations affecting Washington waterways that, with
slightly different emphases within the existing authorities of other
regulatory programs, the hydraulic project approval process has grown
redundant and unnecessary.
(3) The legislature further finds that although the hydraulic
project approval process is the only permitting process that on its
face is specifically dedicated to protecting fish life, the importance
of the program is minimized by the protection of fish life that occurs
naturally as a result of the implementation of all of the other
environmental laws and regulations affecting activities located in or
near state waters. Even without the hydraulic project approval
process, fish life protection would be ensured based on the operation
of, to name only a few: The federal and state clean water act; the
endangered species act; chapter 77.57 RCW; the shoreline management
act; the growth management act and critical area ordinances; the forest
practices act and the forest and fish habitat conservation plan; the
state environmental policy act; local grading permits and other
regulatory authorities; state proprietary discretion in aquatic lands
permitting; watershed planning; salmon recovery programs; and the
general sense of duty to protect and restore the aquatic environment
that all Washingtonians feel is an important part of their natural
heritage and is inherent in state resource management.
(4) The legislature further finds that, according to a report by
the department of fish and wildlife, the administrative and technical
costs of the state's hydraulic project approval process is
approximately four million five hundred thousand dollars each fiscal
year. This amount is fully borne by the general fund, without
dedicated revenue, and takes financial resources away from other
important state programs where it could be used to promote economic
development, strengthen education investments, ensure the viability of
social safety nets, or to protect citizens through an enhanced
commitment to the criminal justice system; all of which are more vital
to the state's present and future than the continued implementation of
an antiquated and redundant permitting system.
(5) The legislature intends with this act to simply remove the
hydraulic project approval process responsibilities from the department
of fish and wildlife and rely on the government infrastructure and the
myriad other environmental programs to provide the vital role of
protecting fish life and habitat. This step would not only save the
state nearly nine million dollars in general fund moneys each biennium,
but it would also allow the department of fish and wildlife to free the
resources necessary to pursue its primary management responsibilities
under Title 77 RCW. This outcome is far more favorable as a public
policy than either continuing to rely on state taxpayers to fund the
hydraulic project approval program, charging a fee to applicants for an
antiquated and unnecessary program, or investing still more state money
into programmatic permits that offer little or no additional
protections to fish life yet maintain the misleading façade that the
contents of chapter 77.55 RCW are a wise investment for the people of
Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.328 and 2010 c 112 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice shall include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis shall be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (h) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(a), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (b) of this
subsection;
(b) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, and the office of the insurance commissioner((, and to
the legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife
implementing chapter 77.55 RCW)); and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards;
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents; or
(viii) Rules of the department of revenue that adopt a uniform
expiration date for reseller permits as authorized in RCW 82.32.780 and
82.32.783.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21K.010 and 2003 c 39 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "State, regional, or local agency" means an agency, board,
department, authority, or commission that administers environmental
laws.
(2) "Coordinating agency" means the state, regional, or local
agency with the primary regulatory responsibility for the proposed
environmental excellence program agreement. If multiple agencies have
jurisdiction to administer state environmental laws affected by an
environmental excellence agreement, the department of ecology shall
designate or act as the coordinating agency.
(3) "Director" means the individual or body of individuals in whom
the ultimate legal authority of an agency is vested by any provision of
law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a majority of those
individuals constitutes the director.
(4) "Environmental laws" means chapters 43.21A, 70.94, 70.95,
70.105, 70.119A, ((77.55,)) 90.48, 90.52, 90.58, 90.64, and 90.71 RCW,
and RCW 90.54.020(3)(b) and rules adopted under those chapters and
section. The term environmental laws as used in this chapter does not
include any provision of the Revised Code of Washington, or of any
municipal ordinance or enactment, that regulates the selection of a
location for a new facility.
(5) "Facility" means a site or activity that is regulated under any
of the provisions of the environmental laws.
(6) "Legal requirement" includes any provision of an environmental
law, rule, order, or permit.
(7) "Sponsor" means the owner or operator of a facility, including
a municipal corporation, subject to regulation under the environmental
laws of the state of Washington, or an authorized representative of the
owner or operator, that submits a proposal for an environmental
excellence program agreement.
(8) "Stakeholder" means a person who has a direct interest in the
proposed environmental excellence program agreement or who represents
a public interest in the proposed environmental excellence program
agreement. Stakeholders may include communities near the project,
local or state governments, permittees, businesses, environmental and
other public interest groups, employees or employee representatives, or
other persons.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.105D.090 and 2003 c 39 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person conducting a remedial action at a facility under a
consent decree, order, or agreed order, and the department when it
conducts a remedial action, are exempt from the procedural requirements
of chapters 70.94, 70.95, 70.105, ((77.55,)) 90.48, and 90.58 RCW, and
the procedural requirements of any laws requiring or authorizing local
government permits or approvals for the remedial action. The
department shall ensure compliance with the substantive provisions of
chapters 70.94, 70.95, 70.105, ((77.55,)) 90.48, and 90.58 RCW, and the
substantive provisions of any laws requiring or authorizing local
government permits of approvals. The department shall establish
procedures for ensuring that such remedial actions comply with the
substantive requirements adopted pursuant to such laws, and shall
consult with the state agencies and local governments charged with
implementing these laws. The procedures shall provide an opportunity
for comment by the public and by the state agencies and local
governments that would otherwise implement the laws referenced in this
section. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit implementing
agencies from charging a fee to the person conducting the remedial
action to defray the costs of services rendered relating to the
substantive requirements for the remedial action.
(2) An exemption in this section or in RCW 70.94.335, 70.95.270,
70.105.116, ((77.55.030,)) 90.48.039, and 90.58.355 shall not apply if
the department determines that the exemption would result in loss of
approval from a federal agency necessary for the state to administer
any federal law, including the federal resource conservation and
recovery act, the federal clean water act, the federal clean air act,
and the federal coastal zone management act. Such a determination by
the department shall not affect the applicability of the exemptions to
other statutes specified in this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.030 and 2008 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state
of Washington as an agency of state government consisting of members as
follows:
(a) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee;
(b) The director of the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce or the director's designee;
(c) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee;
(d) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(e) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the
director's designee;
(f) An elected member of a county legislative authority appointed
by the governor: PROVIDED, That such member's service on the board
shall be conditioned on the member's continued service as an elected
county official;
(g) One member representing a timber products union, appointed by
the governor from a list of three names submitted by a timber labor
coalition affiliated with a statewide labor organization that
represents a majority of the timber product unions in the state; and
(h) Six members of the general public appointed by the governor,
one of whom shall be a small forest landowner who actively manages his
or her land, and one of whom shall be an independent logging
contractor.
(2) ((The director of the department of fish and wildlife's service
on the board may be terminated two years after August 18, 1999, if the
legislature finds that after two years the department has not made
substantial progress toward integrating the laws, rules, and programs
governing forest practices, chapter 76.09 RCW, and the laws, rules, and
programs governing hydraulic projects, chapter 77.55 RCW. Such a
finding shall be based solely on whether the department of fish and
wildlife makes substantial progress as defined in this subsection, and
will not be based on other actions taken as a member of the board.
Substantial progress shall include recommendations to the legislature
for closer integration of the existing rule-making authorities of the
board and the department of fish and wildlife, and closer integration
of the forest practices and hydraulics permitting processes, including
exploring the potential for a consolidated permitting process. These
recommendations shall be designed to resolve problems currently
associated with the existing dual regulatory and permitting processes.
(3))) The members of the initial board appointed by the governor
shall be appointed so that the term of one member shall expire December
31, 1975, the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1976, the
term of one member shall expire December 31, 1977, the terms of two
members shall expire December 31, 1978, and the terms of two members
shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter, each member shall be
appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Each member of
the board shall continue in office until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified. The commissioner of public lands or the
commissioner's designee shall be the chair of the board.
(((4))) (3) The board shall meet at such times and places as shall
be designated by the chair or upon the written request of the majority
of the board. The principal office of the board shall be at the state
capital.
(((5))) (4) Members of the board, except public employees and
elected officials, shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250. Each member shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((6))) (5) The board may employ such clerical help and staff
pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW as is necessary to carry out its duties.

Sec. 6 RCW 89.08.470 and 2003 c 39 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) By January 1, 1996, the Washington conservation commission
shall develop, in consultation with other state agencies, tribes, and
local governments, a consolidated application process for permits for
a watershed restoration project developed by an agency or sponsored by
an agency on behalf of a volunteer organization. The consolidated
process shall include a single permit application form for use by all
responsible state and local agencies. The commission shall encourage
use of the consolidated permit application process by any federal
agency responsible for issuance of related permits. The permit
application forms to be consolidated shall include, at a minimum,
applications for: (((a))) (1) Approvals related to water quality
standards under chapter 90.48 RCW; (((b) hydraulic project approvals
under chapter 77.55 RCW;)) and (((c))) (2) section 401 water quality
certifications under 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 and chapter 90.48 RCW.
(((2) If a watershed restoration project is also a fish habitat
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW 77.55.290(1), the
project sponsor shall instead follow the permit review and approval
process established in RCW 77.55.290 with regard to state and local
government permitting requirements. The sponsor shall so notify state
and local permitting authorities.))

Sec. 7 RCW 90.48.310 and 2007 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
application of barley straw to waters of the state for the purposes of
water clarification does not require a state waste discharge permit as
long as the following provisions are met:
(a) The barley straw is applied at a rate of up to two hundred
twenty-five pounds per acre of surface water;
(b) Whole bales or tightly packed straw are not used. Straw must
be loosely packed in nylon or mesh bags;
(c) Bags of straw are placed where control is desired, such as
around docks and swim areas, and around inlets to aid in aeration or
mixing;
(d) The bags must be staked or anchored in place;
(e) Straw is placed in early spring, prior to the growth of algae;
and
(f) Bags are removed four to six months after placement and must
not be left in the water over winter.
(2) The placement of barley straw into waters of the state in any
other instance is not authorized absent a permit.
(((3) This section does not alter any permit requirement that may
exist under chapter 77.55 RCW.))

Sec. 8 RCW 90.58.147 and 2003 c 39 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A public or private project that is designed to improve
fish or wildlife habitat or fish passage shall be exempt from the
substantial development permit requirements of this chapter when all of
the following apply:
(((a))) (1) The project has been approved by the department of fish
and wildlife; and
(((b) The project has received hydraulic project approval by the
department of fish and wildlife pursuant to chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(c))) (2) The local government has determined that the project is
substantially consistent with the local shoreline master program. The
local government shall make such determination in a timely manner and
provide it by letter to the project proponent.
(((2) Fish habitat enhancement projects that conform to the
provisions of RCW 77.55.290 are determined to be consistent with local
shoreline master programs.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.55.011 (Definitions) and 2010 c 210 s 26, 2009 c 549 s
1028, & 2005 c 146 s 101;
(2) RCW 77.55.021 (Permit) and 2010 c 210 s 27, 2008 c 272 s 1, &
2005 c 146 s 201;
(3) RCW 77.55.031 (Driving across established ford) and 2005 c 146
s 301;
(4) RCW 77.55.041 (Derelict fishing, crab, and other shellfish
gear -- Removal) and 2010 c 193 s 10, 2005 c 146 s 302, & 2002 c 20 s 4;
(5) RCW 77.55.051 (Spartina/purple loosestrife -- Removal or control)
and 2005 c 146 s 303;
(6) RCW 77.55.061 (Hazardous substance remedial actions -- Procedural
requirements not applicable) and 1994 c 257 s 18;
(7) RCW 77.55.081 (Removal or control of aquatic noxious weeds--Rules -- Pamphlet) and 2005 c 146 s 401 & 1995 c 255 s 4;
(8) RCW 77.55.091 (Small scale prospecting and mining -- Rules) and
2005 c 146 s 402 & 1997 c 415 s 2;
(9) RCW 77.55.101 (Environmental excellence program agreements--Effect on chapter) and 1997 c 381 s 25;
(10) RCW 77.55.111 (Habitat incentives agreement) and 2005 c 146 s
403, 2001 c 253 s 54, & 1997 c 425 s 4;
(11) RCW 77.55.121 (Habitat incentives program -- Goal -- Requirements
of agreement -- Application evaluation factors) and 2005 c 146 s 404,
2000 c 107 s 229, & 1997 c 425 s 3;
(12) RCW 77.55.131 (Dike vegetation management guidelines--Memorandum of agreement) and 2005 c 146 s 405, 2000 c 107 s 18, 1993
sp.s. c 2 s 34, & 1991 c 322 s 19;
(13) RCW 77.55.141 (Marine beach front protective bulkheads or
rockwalls) and 2010 c 210 s 28, 2005 c 146 s 501, & 1991 c 279 s 1;
(14) RCW 77.55.151 (Marina or marine terminal) and 2005 c 146 s
502, 2002 c 368 s 7, & 1996 c 192 s 2;
(15) RCW 77.55.161 (Storm water discharges) and 2005 c 146 s 503 &
2002 c 368 s 4;
(16) RCW 77.55.171 (Watershed restoration projects -- Permit
processing) and 2005 c 146 s 504 & 1995 c 378 s 14;
(17) RCW 77.55.181 (Fish habitat enhancement project -- Permit review
and approval process) and 2010 c 210 s 29, 2005 c 146 s 505, 2001 c 253
s 55, & 1998 c 249 s 3;
(18) RCW 77.55.191 (Columbia river anadromous fish sanctuary--Restrictions) and 2005 c 146 s 506, 1998 c 190 s 89, 1995 1st sp.s. c
2 s 27, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 36, 1988 c 36 s 36, 1985 c 307 s 5, 1983 1st
ex.s. c 46 s 76, & 1961 c 4 s 1;
(19) RCW 77.55.201 (Landscape management plan) and 2005 c 146 s
507;
(20) RCW 77.55.211 (Informational brochure) and 2005 c 146 s 406,
1993 sp.s. c 2 s 28, & 1991 c 322 s 21;
(21) RCW 77.55.221 (Flood damage repair and reduction activities--Five-year maintenance permit agreements) and 2005 c 146 s 508;
(22) RCW 77.55.231 (Conditions imposed upon a permit -- Reasonably
related to project) and 2005 c 146 s 601 & 2002 c 368 s 5;
(23) RCW 77.55.241 (Off-site mitigation) and 2010 c 210 s 30, 2005
c 146 s 602, & 1996 c 276 s 1;
(24) RCW 77.55.251 (Mitigation plan review) and 2005 c 146 s 603,
2000 c 107 s 15, & 1997 c 424 s 6;
(25) RCW 77.55.261 (Placement of woody debris as condition of
permit) and 2005 c 146 s 604, 2000 c 107 s 17, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 33, &
1991 c 322 s 18;
(26) RCW 77.55.271 (Sediment dredging or capping actions -- Dredging
of existing channels and berthing areas -- Mitigation not required) and
1997 c 424 s 5;
(27) RCW 77.55.281 (Fishways on certain agricultural drainage
facilities) and 2005 c 146 s 605;
(28) RCW 77.55.291 (Civil penalty) and 2010 c 210 s 31, 2005 c 146
s 701, 2000 c 107 s 19, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 35, 1988 c 36 s 35, & 1986 c
173 s 6; and
(29) RCW 77.15.300 (Unlawful hydraulic project activities -- Penalty)
and 2000 c 107 s 239 & 1998 c 190 s 52.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 88.28.070 is decodified.

--- END ---