BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that with the
increasing ease of access to online information about individuals,
including in court files, and the increasing use of such information in
background checks for employment and housing and other purposes,
individuals are being unfairly deprived of employment and housing
opportunities and otherwise harmed by governmental records of cases
that either never resulted in convictions or are not now convictions,
are duplicative or could be misleading.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide clarity
in the information publicly disseminated by the courts and other
criminal justice agencies about individuals in order to protect
people's privacy. This intent is best served by having the courts and
other criminal justice agencies provide information to the public that
does not involve either an unfiled case or a case that resulted in an
exonerating disposition.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.97.030 and 1999 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, the definitions of terms in this
section shall apply.
(1) "Criminal history record information" means information
contained in records collected by criminal justice agencies, other than
courts, on individuals, consisting of identifiable descriptions and
notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other
formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom,
including acquittals by reason of insanity, dismissals based on lack of
competency, sentences, correctional supervision, and release.
The term includes information contained in records maintained by or
obtained from criminal justice agencies, other than courts, which
records provide individual identification of a person together with any
portion of the individual's record of involvement in the criminal
justice system as an alleged or convicted offender, except:
(a) Posters, announcements, or lists for identifying or
apprehending fugitives or wanted persons;
(b) Original records of entry maintained by criminal justice
agencies to the extent that such records are compiled and maintained
chronologically and are accessible only on a chronological basis;
(c) Court indices and records of public judicial proceedings, court
decisions, and opinions, and information disclosed during public
judicial proceedings;
(d) Records of traffic violations which are not punishable by a
maximum term of imprisonment of more than ninety days;
(e) Records of any traffic offenses as maintained by the department
of licensing for the purpose of regulating the issuance, suspension,
revocation, or renewal of drivers' or other operators' licenses and
pursuant to RCW 46.52.130;
(f) Records of any aviation violations or offenses as maintained by
the department of transportation for the purpose of regulating pilots
or other aviation operators, and pursuant to RCW 47.68.330;
(g) Announcements of executive clemency.
(2) "Nonconviction data" consists of all criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has not led to a conviction
or other disposition adverse to the subject, and for which proceedings
are no longer actively pending. There shall be a rebuttable
presumption that proceedings are no longer actively pending if more
than one year has elapsed since arrest, citation, charge, or service of
warrant and no disposition has been entered. Nonconviction data shall
also include all criminal history record information relating to a
conviction that has been vacated pursuant to RCW 9.94A.640 or 9.96.060.
(3) "Conviction record" means criminal history record information
relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or other
disposition adverse to the subject, unless that conviction has been
vacated pursuant to RCW 9.94A.640 or 9.96.060.
(4) "Conviction or other disposition adverse to the subject" means
any disposition of charges other than: (a) A decision not to
prosecute; (b) a dismissal; or (c) acquittal; with the following
exceptions, which shall be considered dispositions adverse to the
subject: An acquittal due to a finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity and a dismissal by reason of incompetency, pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW; and a dismissal entered after a period of probation,
suspension, or deferral of sentence.
(5) "Criminal justice agency" means: (a) A court; or (b) a
government agency which performs the administration of criminal justice
pursuant to a statute or executive order and which allocates a
substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal
justice.
(6) "The administration of criminal justice" means performance of
any of the following activities: Detection, apprehension, detention,
pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication,
correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or
criminal offenders. The term also includes criminal identification
activities and the collection, storage, dissemination of criminal
history record information, and the compensation of victims of crime.
(7) "Disposition" means the formal conclusion of a criminal
proceeding at whatever stage it occurs in the criminal justice system.
(8) "Dissemination" means disclosing criminal history record
information or disclosing the absence of criminal history record
information to any person or agency outside the agency possessing the
information, subject to the following exceptions:
(a) When criminal justice agencies jointly participate in the
maintenance of a single record keeping department as an alternative to
maintaining separate records, the furnishing of information by that
department to personnel of any participating agency is not a
dissemination;
(b) The furnishing of information by any criminal justice agency to
another for the purpose of processing a matter through the criminal
justice system, such as a police department providing information to a
prosecutor for use in preparing a charge, is not a dissemination;
(c) The reporting of an event to a record keeping agency for the
purpose of maintaining the record is not a dissemination.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.97.050 and 2005 c 421 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conviction records may be disseminated without restriction.
(2) Nonconviction data may not be disseminated except as provided
in this section or RCW 10.97.080, unless the individual identified in
the data has provided express written permission for dissemination.
(3) Any criminal history record information which pertains to an
incident that occurred within the last twelve months for which a person
is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including
the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final
discharge from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without
restriction with the exception of a record being disseminated in
response to a request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832. A
request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832 shall not contain
information for a person who, within the last twelve months, is
currently being processed by the criminal justice system unless it
pertains to information relating to a crime against a person as defined
in RCW 9.94A.411.
(((3))) (4) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
another criminal justice agency for any purpose associated with the
administration of criminal justice, or in connection with the
employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or
juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the
agency making the inquiry.
(((4))) (5) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or a court rule,
decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data
and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a
specific purpose.
(((5))) (6) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies
pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency to provide
services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of
the criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure
the confidentiality and security of the information consistent with
state law and any applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(((6))) (7) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies for
the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities
pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency. Such
agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit the
use of that information which identifies specific individuals to
research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions
giving notice to the person or organization to which the records are
disseminated that the use of information obtained therefrom and further
dissemination of such information are subject to the provisions of this
chapter and applicable federal statutes and regulations, which shall be
cited with express reference to the penalties provided for a violation
thereof.
(((7))) (8) Every criminal justice agency that maintains and
disseminates criminal history record information must maintain
information pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history
record information except a dissemination to the effect that the agency
has no record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:
(a) An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history
record information was disseminated;
(b) The date on which the information was disseminated;
(c) The individual to whom the information relates; and
(d) A brief description of the information disseminated.
The information pertaining to dissemination required to be
maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than one year.
(((8))) (9) In addition to the other provisions in this section
allowing dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW
4.24.550 governs dissemination of information concerning offenders who
commit sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal justice
agencies, their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil
liability for dissemination on criminal history record information
concerning sex offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) "Record of exonerating disposition" means a record held by a
court or judicial agency that would be nonconviction data if collected
by a criminal justice agency other than a court. This shall include
otherwise qualifying records that are part of court indices and records
of public judicial proceedings. It shall also include a record
relating to an incident where:
(a) A probable cause hearing was held and the court found there was
no probable cause;
(b) A charge was resolved by the prosecutor's acceptance of bail
forfeiture; or
(c) A charge was dismissed pursuant to a stipulated order of
continuance.
(2) A record of exonerating disposition held by a court or judicial
agency shall, upon the request of the person who is the subject of the
record, be kept confidential by that court or judicial agency, except
that the information shall be available to court personnel, judicial
officers, law enforcement, prosecuting agencies, the individual
identified in the records, and the attorney for that individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the
records privacy act of 2011.

--- END ---