BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
purpose, any person who is a male citizen or noncitizen of the United
States, who applies for an original, the renewal of, or a replacement
instruction permit, intermediate license, driver's license, or
identicard under this chapter, and who is under the age of twenty-six,
must be given the opportunity to register as required by the military
selective service act (62 Stat. 604; 50 App. U.S.C. Sec. 451 et seq.),
as amended.
(2) The submission of an application by an applicant under
subsection (1) of this section indicates that:
(a) The applicant has already registered with the selective service
system;
(b) The applicant authorizes the department to forward to the
selective service system the necessary personal information required
for registration into the system; or
(c) The applicant declines registration for purposes of the
military selective service act (62 Stat. 604; 50 App. U.S.C. Sec. 451
et seq.), as amended, in conjunction with the submission of an
application under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) The department shall forward electronically any necessary
personal information of the applicant to the selective service system
within ten days of receipt of the application, as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) When applicable, the department shall notify the applicant at
the time of application submission that, by submitting the application,
the applicant authorizes the department to register the applicant with
the selective service system. If the applicant is under the age of
eighteen at the time of application, the department shall notify the
applicant that he will be registered with the selective service system
as required by federal law. When providing notice under this
subsection (3)(b), the department shall provide the applicant with
materials containing the following statement:

"By submitting this application, I am consenting to registration
with the Selective Service System, if so required by federal law. If
under age 18, I understand that I will be registered as required by
federal law when I attain age 18."

(4)(a) If an applicant declines to register with the selective
service system under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the department
may not create a record indicating that the applicant declined to
register.
(b) Any department information that indicates that an applicant has
declined to register under subsection (2)(c) of this section is exempt
from the disclosure requirements under chapter 42.56 RCW, and the
department may not disclose the information to any other government
agency.
(5) The department may not deny the issuance of an instruction
permit, intermediate license, driver's license, or identicard if the
applicant declines to register with the selective service system,
provided that the applicant meets all other requirements of this
chapter.
(6) The department may provide selective service system
registration information to applicants who choose to decline the
opportunity to register with the selective service system if the
applicant requests registration information.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.230 and 2010 c 106 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(5) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(6)(a) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under section 1 of this act that indicates
that an applicant declined to register with the selective service
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---