BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.104 and 1991 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the state
registrar may prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other
reproductions of records of birth, death, fetal death, marriage, or
decrees of divorce, annulment, or legal separation registered under law
or that portion of the record of any birth which shows the child's full
name, sex, date of birth, and date of filing of the certificate. Such
reproductions, when certified by the state registrar, shall be
considered for all purposes the same as the original and shall be prima
facie evidence of the facts stated therein.
(2) The department may authorize by regulation the disclosure of
information contained in vital records for research purposes. All
research proposals must be submitted to the department and must be
reviewed and approved as to scientific merit and to ensure that
confidentiality safeguards are provided in accordance with department
policy.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, local
registrars may, upon request, furnish certified copies of the records
of birth, death, and fetal death, subject to all provisions of state
law applicable to the state registrar.
(4)(a) The state registrar and local registrars may not provide a
reproduction of a death certificate, or authorize the public inspection
or copying of an original death certificate, except as follows:
(i) To the deceased's spouse, child, parent, sibling, legal
guardian, or next of kin, or the authorized representative of the
deceased's spouse, child, parent, sibling, legal guardian, or next of
kin;
(ii) To a person who demonstrates that the death certificate is
needed for the determination or protection of a personal or property
right;
(iii) After fifty years have elapsed since the date of death on the
death certificate;
(iv) When the information is being requested under subsection (2)
of this section;
(v) Upon request to the federal agency responsible for national
vital statistics to be used solely for the conduct of the agency's
official duties. Before furnishing the death certificate, the state or
local registrar must enter into an agreement with the federal agency
indicating the statistical or research purposes for which the
certificate may be used and prohibiting the federal agency from
providing the death certificate for public inspection or copying. The
agreement shall also set forth the support to be provided by the
federal agency for the collection, processing, and transmission of the
death certificate. Upon written request of the federal agency, the
state or local registrar may approve, in writing, additional
statistical or research uses for the death certificates supplied under
the agreement;
(vi) Upon request to any other federal, state, or local agency to
be used solely for the conduct of the requesting agency's official
duties. A requesting state or local agency may not provide the death
certificate for public inspection or copying. Before furnishing the
death certificate to the federal agency, the state or local registrar
must enter into an agreement with the federal agency prohibiting the
federal agency from providing the death certificate for public
inspection or copying;
(vii) To the office of vital statistics from another state when the
death certificate relates to a resident of that state. Before
furnishing the death certificate to the office of vital statistics, the
state or local registrar must enter into an agreement with the office
of vital statistics prohibiting the office of vital statistics from
providing the death certificate for public inspection or copying. The
agreement shall also specify the statistical and administrative
purposes for which the records, reports, or data may be used and
provide instructions for the proper retention and disposition of the
certificate; or
(viii) To a private investigator licensed under chapter 18.165 RCW.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (4) prohibits the release of
information that does not identify any person named on the death
certificate.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.360 and 2010 c 128 s 3 and 2010 c 52 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510, 70.230.080, or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee
under RCW 4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW
74.42.640 or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056,
for reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056,
a notification of an incident under RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports
regarding adverse events under RCW 70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which
agency is in possession of the information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1);
(g) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
70.225 RCW;
(h) Information collected by the department of health under chapter
70.245 RCW except as provided in RCW 70.245.150;
(i) Cardiac and stroke system performance data submitted to
national, state, or local data collection systems under RCW
70.168.150(2)(b); ((and))
(j) All documents, including completed forms, received pursuant to
a wellness program under RCW 41.04.362, but not statistical reports
that do not identify an individual; and
(k) Death certificates to the extent required by RCW 70.58.104.
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.
(3)(a) Documents related to infant mortality reviews conducted
pursuant to RCW 70.05.170 are exempt from disclosure as provided for in
RCW 70.05.170(3).
(b)(i) If an agency provides copies of public records to another
agency that are exempt from public disclosure under this subsection
(3), those records remain exempt to the same extent the records were
exempt in the possession of the originating entity.
(ii) For notice purposes only, agencies providing exempt records
under this subsection (3) to other agencies may mark any exempt records
as "exempt" so that the receiving agency is aware of the exemption,
however whether or not a record is marked exempt does not affect
whether the record is actually exempt from disclosure.

--- END ---