BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Purveyors may not, either directly or through contracted
services, conduct annual backflow preventer inspections and tests
required by rules adopted under RCW 43.20.050.
(2) Purveyors shall develop and maintain a list of local persons or
firms who are qualified to conduct annual backflow preventer
inspections and tests. Lists required by this subsection must be
distributed, either by mail or through a web site or other electronic
means, to purveyor customers who are required by rules adopted under
RCW 43.20.050 to have annual backflow preventer inspections and tests.

--- END ---