BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the use
of tobacco products of all types is a significant public health
problem. Like cigarettes, cigars and smokeless tobacco can lead to
lifelong nicotine addiction. Cigar and cigarette smokers face
comparable risks for oral, throat and esophageal cancers. Smokeless
tobacco products similarly raise users' risk of various diseases
including cancers of the lip, tongue, cheeks, and gums.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that the use of noncigarette tobacco
products by youth is on the rise in Washington state. From 2004 –
2008, youth consumption of tobacco products other than cigarettes
increased forty-three percent locally. This increase has coincided
with the emergence on the market of a number of tobacco products with
enormous appeal to youth. These products include flavored tobacco
products, such as flavored cigars and smokeless tobacco, and
dissolvable tobacco products, which closely resemble candy.
(b) Although the sale of tobacco products to minors is illegal
throughout Washington, minors are still readily able to purchase
tobacco products from otherwise legally operating retail outlets.
Youth access to tobacco products is facilitated by the fact that these
products are not required to be stored behind a counter.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Reduce youth access to tobacco products by requiring that
tobacco products be stored in a location that is inaccessible to youth.
By reducing youth access to tobacco products, the legislature intends
to reduce youth tobacco use rates and reduce the number of today's
children who will grow up to become addicted users, suffer from tobacco
use, and die prematurely from it.
(b) Authorize local jurisdictions to adopt local ordinances or
regulations so that local concerns regarding youth access to tobacco
can be addressed.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.155.030 and 1994 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall sell or permit to be sold any tobacco product
through any device that mechanically dispenses tobacco products unless
the device is located fully within premises from which minors are
prohibited or in industrial worksites where minors are not employed and
not less than ten feet from all entrance or exit ways to and from each
premise. The board shall adopt rules that allow an exception to the
requirement that a device be located not less than ten feet from all
entrance or exit ways to and from a premise if it is architecturally
impractical for the device to be located not less than ten feet from
all entrance and exit ways.
(2) No person shall display or store tobacco products, including
products that contain substances derived from tobacco and intended for
human use including but not limited to nicotine, where those products
are accessible to consumers without direct assistance by the sales
personnel. This subsection shall not apply to the following:
(a) Vending machine sales as authorized by subsection (1) of this
section;
(b) A display of tobacco products that is located in a commercial
establishment in which by law no person younger than eighteen years of
age is permitted to enter at any time; or
(c) Retailers licensed under RCW 82.26.150(1)(b), whose primary
business is the sale of tobacco products as defined in RCW 82.26.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.155.130 and 1993 c 507 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter ((preempts political subdivisions from adopting or
enforcing requirements for the licensure and regulation of tobacco
product promotions and sales within retail stores, except that
political subdivisions that have adopted ordinances prohibiting
sampling by January 1, 1993, may continue to enforce these ordinances.
No political subdivision may: (1) Impose fees or license requirements
on retail businesses for possessing or selling cigarettes or tobacco
products, other than general business taxes or license fees not
primarily levied on tobacco products; or (2) regulate or prohibit
activities covered by RCW 70.155.020 through 70.155.080. This chapter
does not otherwise preempt political subdivisions from adopting
ordinances regulating the sale, purchase, use, or promotion of tobacco
products not inconsistent with chapter 507, Laws of 1993)) is not to be
construed to supersede or preempt local ordinances or regulations if
those ordinances or regulations are at least as restrictive as the
provisions of this chapter. This chapter does not preclude local
ordinances or regulations adopting fees or licensure for retailers of
cigarettes or other tobacco products. However, this section does not
authorize local ordinances or regulations relating to cigarette or
other tobacco product excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.155 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the board's other powers and authorities, the board
may suspend or revoke a retailer's license issued under RCW
82.26.150(1)(b) held by a business at any location, or may impose a
monetary penalty as set forth in RCW 70.155.100, if the board finds
that the licensee has violated this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---