BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.300 and 2003 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Secure community transition facilities shall meet the following
minimum staffing requirements:
(1)(((a) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its
first resident before July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the
facility shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per three
residents during normal waking hours and one awake staff per four
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(b) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its first
resident on or after July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the
facility shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per
resident during normal waking hours and two awake staff per three
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(2))) At any time the census of a facility is six or fewer
residents, all staff shall be classified as residential rehabilitation
counselor II or have a classification that indicates an equivalent or
higher level of skill, experience, and training.
(((3) Before being assigned to a facility, all staff shall have
training in sex offender issues, self-defense, and crisis de-escalation
skills in addition to departmental orientation and, as appropriate,
management training. All staff with resident treatment or care duties
must participate in ongoing in-service training.
(4))) (2)(a) For the secure transition facility located on McNeil
Island, the direct care staffing level shall be at least three
qualified, trained staff as described in subsection (3) of this
section, unless there are no residents housed at the facility, in which
case the facility need not staff to this ratio.
(b) For the secure community transition facility located in
Seattle, the direct care staffing level shall be at least two
qualified, trained staff as described in subsection (3) of this
section, unless there are no residents housed at the facility, in which
case the facility need not staff to this ratio.
(3) Before being assigned to a facility, all staff must have
received training in sex offender issues, self-defense, and crisis
de-escalation skills in addition to departmental orientation and, as
appropriate, management training. All staff with resident treatment or
care duties must participate in ongoing in-service training.
(4) All staff must pass a departmental background check and the
check is not subject to the limitations in chapter 9.96A RCW. A person
who has been convicted of a felony, or any sex offense, may not be
employed at the secure community transition facility or be approved as
an escort for a resident of the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---