BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.431 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have ((seven)) six components: Direct
care, therapy care, support services, operations, property, and
financing allowance((, and variable return)). The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care and support services
for all facilities shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are
set up or in use. Component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance for essential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for small nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety)) ninety-two percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for large nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety-two)) ninety-five percent
of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
For all facilities, the component rate allocation in direct care shall
be based upon actual facility occupancy. The median cost limits used
to set component rate allocations shall be based on the applicable
minimum occupancy percentage. In determining each facility's therapy
care component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department
shall apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's support services
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall
apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per
adjusted resident day. In determining each facility's operations
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall
apply the minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted
resident day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care component rate allocation shall
be rebased, ((using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period,)) so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
the direct care component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially
during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using
adjusted cost report data from two years prior to the rebase period, so
adjusted cost report data for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for
July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the therapy care component rate allocation
shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the therapy care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Effective July 1, 2009, the support services component rate
allocation shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012))
2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the support services component
rate allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data
from two years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data
for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the operations component rate allocation shall
be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the operations care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter.
(8) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(9) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: Inflation adjustments for partial-period
cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing facilities
entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a period of
absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership
of the nursing facility business, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(10) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(11) Effective July 1, 2010, there shall be no rate adjustment for
facilities with banked beds. For purposes of calculating minimum
occupancy, licensed beds include any beds banked under chapter 70.38
RCW.
(12) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.435 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The property component rate allocation for each facility shall
be determined by dividing the sum of the reported allowable prior
period actual depreciation, subject to department rule, adjusted for
any capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department,
and the retained savings from such cost center, by the greater of a
facility's total resident days in the prior period or resident days as
calculated on ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent facility occupancy
for essential community providers, ((ninety)) ninety-two percent
occupancy for small nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-two))
ninety-five percent facility occupancy for large nonessential community
providers. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the property
component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning July 1, 1999,)) The department shall establish for
each medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) The financing allowance ((shall
be)) is determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each
facility by ((.10)) .04, and dividing by the greater of a nursing
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period
or resident days calculated on ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent
facility occupancy((. Effective July 1, 2002, the financing allowance
component rate allocation for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. However, assets
acquired on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate
financing allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The
financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the net
invested funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations
receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from certificate
of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings
that have been submitted to the department of health for construction
review approval, prior to May 17, 1999)) for essential community
providers, ninety-two percent facility occupancy for small nonessential
community providers, or ninety-five percent occupancy for large
nonessential community providers. If a capitalized addition,
renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will result in a
different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior
period total resident days used in computing the financing allowance
shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident day level
or ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent of the new licensed bed
capacity for essential community providers, ninety-two percent facility
occupancy for small nonessential community providers, or ninety-five
percent occupancy for large nonessential community providers.
((Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, the total resident days used to compute the
financing allowance after a capitalized addition, renovation,
replacement, or retirement of an asset shall be set by using the
greater of a facility's total resident days from the most recent cost
report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent facility
occupancy.))
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in ((RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380)) department rule, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost
of land upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous
land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of
providing resident care ((shall)) must also be included. Subject to
provisions and limitations contained in this chapter, for land
purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost
of land ((shall be)) is the buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial
or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost ((shall be)) is that of the owner
of record on July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is
lower. In the case of leased facilities where the net invested funds
are unknown or the contractor is unable to provide necessary
information to determine net invested funds, the secretary ((shall
have)) has the authority to determine an amount for net invested funds
based on an appraisal conducted according to ((RCW 74.46.360(1)))
department rule.
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a contractor
has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May 25, 2001, or elects to
convert banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38
RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity
to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date
the beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no
case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5))) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.485 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Employ the resource utilization group III case mix
classification methodology. The department shall use the forty-four
group index maximizing model for the resource utilization group III
grouper version 5.10, but the department may revise or update the
classification methodology to reflect advances or refinements in
resident assessment or classification, subject to federal requirements.
The department may adjust the case mix index for any of the lowest ten
resource utilization group categories beginning with PA1 through PE2 to
any case mix index that aids in achieving the purpose and intent of RCW
74.39A.007 and cost-efficient care; and
(b) Implement minimum data set 3.0 under the authority of this
section and RCW 74.46.431(3). The department must notify nursing home
contractors twenty-eight days in advance the date of implementation of
the minimum data set 3.0. In the notification, the department must
identify for all semiannual rate settings following the date of minimum
data set 3.0 implementation a previously established semiannual case
mix adjustment established for the semiannual rate settings that will
be used for semiannual case mix calculations in direct care until
minimum data set 3.0 is fully implemented. ((After the department has
fully implemented minimum data set 3.0, it must adjust any semiannual
rate setting in which it used the previously established case mix
adjustment using the new minimum data set 3.0 data.))
(2) A default case mix group shall be established for cases in
which the resident dies or is discharged for any purpose prior to
completion of the resident's initial assessment. The default case mix
group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated by the
department.
(3) A default case mix group may also be established for cases in
which there is an untimely assessment for the resident. The default
case mix group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated
by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.496 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter or six-month period during a calendar year
shall be based on data from resident assessment instruments completed
for the resident and weighted by the number of days the resident was in
each case mix classification group. Days shall be counted as provided
in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the United States department of
health and human services 1995 nursing facility staff time measurement
study stemming from its multistate nursing home case mix and quality
demonstration project. Those minutes shall be weighted by statewide
ratios of registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and licensed
practical nurse to certified nurse aide, wages, including salaries and
benefits, which shall be based on 1995 cost report data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group III classification system by multiplying
the wage weight for each worker classification by the average number of
minutes that classification of worker spends caring for a resident in
that resource utilization group III classification group, and summing
the products;
(c) Assign ((a)) the lowest case mix weight ((of 1.000)) to the
resource utilization group III classification group with the lowest
total weighted minutes and calculate case mix weights by dividing the
lowest group's total weighted minutes into each group's total weighted
minutes and rounding weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the United
States department of health and human services updates its nursing
facility staff time measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be
revised, but only when direct care component rates are cost-rebased as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July
1st effective date of each cost-rebased direct care component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care component
rates are cost-rebased as provided in RCW 74.46.431(4).

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.501 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question based on the resident assessment instrument
completed by the facility and the requirements and limitations for the
instrument's completion and transmission (January 1st through March
31st, April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or
October 1st through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4) In determining the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a start
date for calculating case mix grouping periods as specified by rule.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care component rate, shall be one month and one day
after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the cost-rebasing
period facility average case mix index will be used throughout the
applicable cost-rebasing period in combination with cost report data as
specified by RCW 74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit. To allow for the transition to
minimum data set 3.0 and implementation of resource utilization group
IV for the July 1, 2011, through July 1, 2012, cost-rebasing periods
the department may determine the calendar quarter or quarters upon
which the facility average case mix must be calculated. A facility's
medicaid average case mix index shall be used to update a nursing
facility's direct care component rate semiannually.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters occurring during the cost report period
used to rebase the direct care component rate allocations as specified
in RCW 74.46.431. To allow for the transition to minimum data set 3.0
and implementation of resource utilization group IV for the July 1,
2011, through July 1, 2012, cost-rebasing periods the department may
determine the calendar quarter or quarters upon which the facility
average case mix must be calculated.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care component rate
semiannually shall be from the calendar six-month period commencing
nine months prior to the effective date of the semiannual rate. For
example, July 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, direct care component
rates shall utilize case mix averages from the October 1, 2009, through
March 31, 2010, calendar quarters, and so forth.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.506 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall determine and update semiannually for each
nursing facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate allocation, to be effective on
the first day of each six-month period. In determining direct care
component rates the department shall utilize, as specified in this
section, minimum data set resident assessment data for each resident of
the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary corrected by, the
department in the resident assessment instrument format approved by
federal authorities for use in this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be for rate periods as specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) The department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its
direct care component rate allocation for economic trends and
conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and update its medicaid
average case mix index as described in RCW 74.46.496 and 74.46.501,
consistent with the following:
(a) Adjust total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(c) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(6)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(d) Divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if applicable,
three peer groups: Those located in nonurban counties; those located
in high labor-cost counties, if any; and those located in other urban
counties;
(e) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(f) Determine each facility's semiannual direct care component rate
as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer group median
established under (e) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation
equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by
that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
six-month period specified in RCW 74.46.501(6)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer group
median established under (e) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable six-month period specified in RCW
74.46.501(6)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508 for a
facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.515 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
support services component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total allowable
support services costs by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy provided
by RCW 74.46.431(2), for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties, and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ((ten)) eight percent;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.521 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified
by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Operations component rates for essential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent of licensed beds. Operations
component rates for small nonessential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum occupancy of ((ninety)) ninety-two percent of
licensed beds. Operations component rates for large nonessential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((ninety-two)) ninety-five percent of licensed beds.
(3) For all calculations and adjustments in this subsection, the
department shall use the greater of the facility's actual occupancy or
an ((imputed)) occupancy equal to ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent
for essential community providers, ((ninety)) ninety-two percent for
small nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-two)) ninety-five
percent for large nonessential community providers. To determine each
facility's operations component rate the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period for facilities located within urban counties and for
those located within nonurban counties and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary for minimum
occupancy; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4)(a) Effective March 1, 2011, through June 30, 2011, the
department shall calculate the operations component rate using an
economic and efficiency adjustment factor in accordance with this
subsection. To calculate the most efficient and economically operated
nursing facilities, the department shall rank, without using peer
groups, all facilities in numerical order from highest to lowest
according to each facility's examined and documented, but unlidded
operations per resident day cost from the most recent cost report
period. The ranking must then be divided into four quartiles, each
containing, as nearly as possible, an equal number of facilities. The
department shall assign the following percentages to each quartile:
(i) One hundred percent to facilities in the lowest quartile;
(ii) Eighty-eight percent to facilities in the next lowest
quartile;
(iii) Seventy-eight percent to facilities in the next highest
quartile; and
(iv) Sixty-eight percent to facilities in the highest quartile.
(b) For all calculations and adjustments in this subsection, the
department shall use the greater of the facility's actual occupancy or
occupancy equal to eighty-seven percent for essential community
providers, ninety-two percent for small nonessential community
providers, or ninety-five percent for large nonessential community
providers. To determine each facility's operation component rate the
department shall set each facility's operations component rate at lower
of:
(i) The rate determined under subsection (3)(b) of this section; or
(ii) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period multiplied by its economic and
efficiency percentage determined under (a)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection.
(5) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component
rate allocation) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 4, 2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2011.

--- END ---