BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state treasurer shall transfer
ninety million ninety-eight thousand dollars or as much as is available
from the budget stabilization account to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2012.
(2) The state treasurer shall transfer ninety-nine million four
hundred eighty-four thousand dollars or as much as is available from
the budget stabilization account to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2013.

--- END ---