BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.510.250 and 1990 c 33 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the 2010-11 school year, on or before the last
business day of September 1969 and each month thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall apportion from the state
general fund to the several educational service districts of the state
the proportional share of the total annual amount due and apportionable
to such educational service districts for the school districts thereof
as follows:

September . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

October . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

November . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

December . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

January . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

February . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

March . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

April . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

May . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

June . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.0%

July . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

August . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

(2) Subject to the payment process in subsection (1) of this
section, for the 2010-11 school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall apportion from the state general fund on the
following schedule:

On or before the last business day of September . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of October . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of November . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%
On or before the last business day of December . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of January . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of February . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of March . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of April . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%
On or before the last business day of May . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%
On the first business day of June . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.0% less $253,000,000
On the first business day of July . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,000,000
On or before the last business day of July . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%
On or before the last business day of August . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

(3) The annual amount due and apportionable shall be the amount
apportionable for all apportionment credits estimated to accrue to the
schools during the apportionment year beginning September first and
continuing through August thirty-first. Appropriations made for school
districts for each year of a biennium shall be apportioned according to
the schedules set forth in this section for the fiscal year starting
September 1st of the then calendar year and ending August 31st of the
next calendar year. The apportionment from the state general fund for
each month shall be an amount which will equal the amount due and
apportionable to the several educational service districts during such
month: PROVIDED, That any school district may petition the
superintendent of public instruction for an emergency advance of funds
which may become apportionable to it but not to exceed ten percent of
the total amount to become due and apportionable during the school
districts apportionment year. The superintendent of public instruction
shall determine if the emergency warrants such advance and if the funds
are available therefor. If the superintendent determines in the
affirmative, he or she may approve such advance and, at the same time,
add such an amount to the apportionment for the educational service
district in which the school district is located: PROVIDED, That the
emergency advance of funds and the interest earned by school districts
on the investment of temporary cash surpluses resulting from obtaining
such advance of state funds shall be deducted by the superintendent of
public instruction from the remaining amount apportionable to said
districts during that apportionment year in which the funds are
advanced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---