BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are
many challenges facing the forest sector, such as climate change, loss
of forest cover in rural and urban areas, forest health and fire risks,
the development of environmental service markets, the enhancement of
habitat and biodiversity, timber and water supply, restoration of
forest ecosystems, and the economic health of forest-dependent
communities that rely on the retention of working forests.
(2) The legislature further finds that these forest issues, which
occur in both rural and urban environments, and the approaches taken to
address the issues, transcend the expertise and mission of the
University of Washington school of forest resources and the associated
centers and cooperatives. While each of these centers and cooperatives
contribute expertise and resources, the structure and continuity for
the integrated, interdisciplinary approach needed to address these
complex issues is lacking.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature for the institute of forest
resources to provide the structure and continuity needed by drawing
contributions from the associated centers and cooperatives into a more
consolidated, collaborative, interdisciplinary, and integrated process
that is responsive to the critical issues confronting the forest
sector.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.44.020 and 1988 c 81 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The institute of forest resources shall be administered and
directed by the ((dean of the college)) director of the school of
forest resources ((of)) at the University of Washington ((who shall
also be the director of the institute)).

Sec. 3 RCW 76.44.030 and 1979 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The institute of forest resources shall pursue coordinated
research and education related to the forest ((resource)) sector and
its multiple ((use)) components, including ((its)):
(a) Forest conservation, restoration, sustainable management, and
utilization; ((its))
(b) The evaluation of the economic, ecological, and societal value
of forest land ((use and the maintenance of its)) in both the rural and
urban environment;
(c) The manufacture and marketing of forest products, including
timber products, nontimber products, environmental services, and the
provision of recreation and aesthetic values.
(2) The institute of forest resources must seek to provide a
framework for identifying, prioritizing, funding, and conducting
interdisciplinary research critical to the forest sector and the
development of integrated, synthesized information and decision support
tools that improve the understanding of complex forestry issues for
stakeholders, policymakers, and other interested parties.
(3) In pursuit of these objectives, the institute of forest
resources is authorized to cooperate, when cooperation advances the
objectives listed in this section, with other entities, including but
not limited to:
(a) Universities((,));
(b) State and federal agencies((, industrial institutions,));
(c) Conservation and environmental organizations;
(d) Community and urban forestry organizations; and
(e) Domestic or foreign((, where such cooperation advances these
objectives)) industrial and business institutions.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.44.050 and 1979 c 50 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The institute ((is authorized to)) of forest resources may
solicit ((and/or accept funds through)) gifts, grants, ((contracts, or
institutional consulting arrangements for the prosecution of any
research or education activity which it may undertake in pursuit of its
objectives)) conveyances, bequests, and devices, including both real or
personal property, in trust or otherwise, to be directed to the
institute for carrying out the objectives of the institute as provided
in this chapter.
(2) The institute of forest resources may solicit contracts for
work, financial and in-kind contributions, and support from private
industries, interest groups, federal and state sources, and other
sources deemed appropriate by the director of the institute.
(3) The institute of forest resources may utilize separately
appropriated funds of the University of Washington for the institute's
operations and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of the school of forest resources at the
University of Washington may, at the discretion of the director,
appoint and maintain an eleven-member policy advisory committee to
advise the director on policies for the institute of forest resources
that are consistent with the institute's objectives as provided in this
chapter.
(2) If activated, the membership of the policy advisory committee
must represent, to the extent possible, the various interests concerned
with the institute of forest resources, including state and federal
agencies, tribal governments, conservation and environmental
organizations, urban forestry interests, rural communities, industry,
and business.
(3) Members of the advisory committee may not receive any salary or
other compensation for service on the advisory committee. However,
each member may be compensated, at the discretion of the director of
the institute, for each day in actual attendance at or traveling to and
from meetings of the advisory committee in accordance with RCW
43.03.220 together with travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the school of forest resources at the University of
Washington shall coordinate the various cooperatives and centers within
the school of forest resources to promote a holistic, efficient, and
integrated approach that broadens the research and outreach programs
and addresses issues facing the forest sector.

--- END ---