BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall establish procedures for the issuance of special
training certificates to employers to pay wages to new employees during
a training period at seventy-five percent of the minimum wage required
under RCW 49.46.020 or the minimum wage rate required under federal
law, whichever is greater. The following restrictions apply to the use
of the training certificates:
(1) The training period may last for a maximum of six hundred
eighty hours;
(2) Employers may only use this special training certificate once
per employee;
(3) Only employers with fifty employees or fewer may use the
special training certificate;
(4) Employees working under this special training certificate may
not constitute more than ten percent of an employer's workforce, except
that employers with fewer than ten employees may employ one employee at
a time using the special training certificate; and
(5) If an employer discharges an employee working under the special
training certificate prior to the completion of six hundred eighty
hours, the employer must notify the director and provide an explanation
for the discharge. The employer may not replace the discharged
employee with another employee working under a special training
certificate for one year from the date of the discharge.

--- END ---