BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.035 and 1995 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each
year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the
president, a majority of the board of directors, or by owners having
ten percent of the votes in the association.
(2) Not less than fourteen nor more than sixty days in advance of
any meeting of the association, the secretary or other officers
specified in the bylaws shall ((cause notice to be hand-delivered or
sent)) provide written notice to each owner of record by:
(a) Hand delivery to the mailing address of the owner or other
address designated in writing by the owner;
(b) Prepaid ((by)) first-class United States mail to the mailing
address of ((each)) the owner or to any other mailing address
designated in writing by the owner; or
(c) Electronic transmission to an address, location, or system
designated in writing by the owner. Notice to owners by an electronic
transmission complies with this section only with respect to those
owners who have delivered to the secretary or other officers specified
in the bylaws a written record consenting to receive electronically
transmitted notices. An owner who has consented to receipt of
electronically transmitted notices may revoke the consent at any time
by delivering a written record of the revocation to the secretary or
other officer specified in the bylaws. Consent is deemed revoked if
the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws is unable to
electronically transmit two consecutive notices given in accordance
with the consent.
(3) The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the
meeting and the business to be placed on the agenda by the board of
directors for a vote by the owners, including the general nature of any
proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, any budget
or changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in
assessment obligation, and any proposal to remove a director.
(((2))) (4) Except as provided in this subsection, all meetings of
the board of directors shall be open for observation by all owners of
record and their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep
minutes of all actions taken by the board, which shall be available to
all owners. Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in
closed session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive
session to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or
consider communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or
pending litigation, matters involving possible violations of the
governing documents of the association, and matters involving the
possible liability of an owner to the association. The motion shall
state specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to
the motion and the stated purpose for the closed session shall be
included in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the
consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to
those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No
motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session
may become effective unless the board of directors, following the
closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open
meeting on such motion, or other action which is reasonably identified.
The requirements of this subsection shall not require the disclosure of
information in violation of law or which is otherwise exempt from
disclosure.

--- END ---