BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the federal immigration and
nationality act makes it unlawful to hire for employment an alien
knowing the alien is an unauthorized alien with respect to such
employment. The legislature therefore intends to require the state and
all counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions thereof
to verify the employment eligibility of individuals hired for
employment.
(2) In accordance with the federal immigration and nationality act,
the state and all counties, cities, towns, and other political
subdivisions thereof shall complete an employment eligibility
verification form for each individual hired for employment. The state
and all counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions
thereof shall also use the e-verify program administered by the United
States citizenship and immigration services to confirm each
individual's employment eligibility.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "unauthorized alien" means the
same as in section 274A of the immigration and nationality act (8
U.S.C. Sec. 1324a).

--- END ---