BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that land use
planning actions deliberated in and approved and mitigated by one
jurisdiction can significantly affect one or more neighboring
jurisdictions. The impacts of the land use planning actions of a
neighboring jurisdiction can be especially pronounced when geographic
and public infrastructure limitations substantially affect permitted
development and the resulting impacts upon neighboring jurisdictions.
(2) The legislature, therefore, in the spirit of cooperation and
collaboration, intends to promote shared responsibilities under the
state environmental policy act in those extraordinary instances where
geographic and public infrastructure limitations create circumstances
in which the land use planning actions of one jurisdiction
significantly impact one or more neighboring jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a proposed project action significantly impacts two or
more agencies, the agencies, except as provided otherwise by this
section, must jointly divide all lead agency responsibilities
prescribed in accordance with this chapter.
(b) If the agencies are unable to agree to the division of lead
agency responsibilities, the director shall designate the division of
responsibilities within fifteen days of receiving a written request to
do so by one or more agencies. Designations made by the director under
this subsection must identify the lead agency for each segment of the
proposed project action based on a determination of which agency's
facilities and residents will receive the majority of the impacts from
that segment of the proposed project action.
(2) An agency that would be significantly impacted by a proposed
project action may elect to:
(a) Forego lead agency responsibilities otherwise required under
this section by notifying in writing the other affected agency or
agencies and the department; or
(b) Transfer lead agency responsibilities otherwise required under
this section to another agency through a written agreement approved by
both agencies and transmitted to the department.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply only to project
actions in or affecting unincorporated portions of urban growth areas
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 that:
(a) Border Puget Sound;
(b) Are surrounded on the landward side entirely by one or more
cities;
(c) Are one or more miles from any other portion of an urban growth
area that is in unincorporated territory; and
(d) Are fifty or more acres in size.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for purposes of
this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Agency" or "agencies" means a county, city, or town;
(b) "Department" means the department of ecology; and
(c) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

--- END ---