BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.030 and 2010 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Certificate of inspection" means an unsworn statement,
declaration, verification, or certificate made in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 9A.72.085 by a qualified inspector that states that
the landlord has not failed to fulfill any substantial obligation
imposed under RCW 59.18.060 that endangers or impairs the health or
safety of a tenant, including (a) structural members that are of
insufficient size or strength to carry imposed loads with safety, (b)
exposure of the occupants to the weather, (c) plumbing and sanitation
defects that directly expose the occupants to the risk of illness or
injury, (d) not providing facilities adequate to supply heat and water
and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant, (e) providing
heating or ventilation systems that are not functional or are
hazardous, (f) defective, hazardous, or missing electrical wiring or
electrical service, (g) defective or hazardous exits that increase the
risk of injury to occupants, and (h) conditions that increase the risk
of fire.
(2) "Distressed home" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.
(3) "Distressed home conveyance" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(4) "Distressed home purchaser" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(5) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(6) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more
persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign,
or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in
concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(7) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within
the gang or advances a gang purpose.
(8) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.
(9) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the ((landlord))
owner, lessor, or sublessor including, but not limited to, an agent, a
resident manager, or a designated property manager.
(10) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes all
instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an
obligation by an interest in real property.
(11) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(12) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(13) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto,
grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and
any other area or facility which is held out for use by the tenant.
(14) "Property" or "rental property" means all dwelling units on a
contiguous quantity of land managed by the same landlord as a single,
rental complex.
(15) "Qualified inspector" means a United States department of
housing and urban development certified inspector; a Washington state
licensed home inspector; an American society of home inspectors
certified inspector; a private inspector certified by the national
association of housing and redevelopment officials, the American
association of code enforcement, or other comparable professional
association as approved by the local municipality; a municipal code
enforcement officer; a Washington licensed structural engineer; or a
Washington licensed architect.
(16) "Reasonable attorneys' fees", where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(17) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or
modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other
provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(18) A "single family residence" is a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a
single family residence if it has direct access to a street and shares
neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any other
essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(19) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling
unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.060 and 2005 c 465 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises
fit for human habitation, and shall in particular:
(1) Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any
applicable code, statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their
maintenance or operation, which the legislative body enacting the
applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could enforce as to
the premises rented if such condition ((substantially)) endangers or
impairs the health or safety of the tenant;
(2) Maintain the structural components including, but not limited
to, the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and
all other structural components, in reasonably good repair so as to be
usable ((and capable of resisting any and all normal forces and loads
to which they may be subjected));
(3) Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and
safe from defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;
(4) Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by
insects, rodents, and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and,
except in the case of a single family residence, control infestation
during tenancy except where such infestation is caused by the tenant;
(5) Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and
tear, make repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the
premises in as good condition as it by law or rental agreement should
have been, at the commencement of the tenancy;
(6) Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the
tenant;
(7) Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other
facilities and appliances supplied by him or her in reasonably good
working order;
(8) Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight
condition;
(9) Except in the case of a single family residence, provide and
maintain appropriate receptacles in common areas for the removal of
ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the occupancy and arrange
for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;
(10) ((Except where the building is not equipped for the purpose,))
Provide facilities adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as
reasonably required by the tenant;
(11)(a) Provide a written notice to all tenants disclosing fire
safety and protection information. The landlord or his or her
authorized agent must provide a written notice to the tenant that the
dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection device as required in
RCW ((48.48.140)) 43.44.110. The notice shall inform the tenant of the
tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in
proper operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with
the provisions of RCW ((48.48.140)) 43.44.110(3). The notice must be
signed by the landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant
with copies provided to both parties. Further, except with respect to
a single-family residence, the written notice must also disclose the
following:
(i) Whether the smoke detection device is hard-wired or battery
operated;
(ii) Whether the building has a fire sprinkler system;
(iii) Whether the building has a fire alarm system;
(iv) Whether the building has a smoking policy, and what that
policy is;
(v) Whether the building has an emergency notification plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants;
(vi) Whether the building has an emergency relocation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants; and
(vii) Whether the building has an emergency evacuation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants.
(b) The information required under this subsection may be provided
to a tenant in a multifamily residential building either as a written
notice or as a checklist that discloses whether the building has fire
safety and protection devices and systems. The checklist shall include
a diagram showing the emergency evacuation routes for the occupants.
(c) The written notice or checklist must be provided to new tenants
at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed((, and must be
provided to current tenants as soon as possible, but not later than
January 1, 2004));
(12) Provide tenants with information provided or approved by the
department of health about the health hazards associated with exposure
to indoor mold. Information may be provided in written format
individually to each tenant, or may be posted in a visible, public
location at the dwelling unit property. The information must detail
how tenants can control mold growth in their dwelling units to minimize
the health risks associated with indoor mold. Landlords may obtain the
information from the department's web site or, if requested by the
landlord, the department must mail the information to the landlord in
a printed format. When developing or changing the information, the
department of health must include representatives of landlords in the
development process. The information must be provided by the landlord
to new tenants at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed((,
and must be provided to current tenants no later than January 1, 2006,
or must be posted in a visible, public location at the dwelling unit
property beginning July 24, 2005));
(13) The landlord and his or her agents and employees are immune
from civil liability for failure to comply with subsection (12) of this
section except where the landlord and his or her agents and employees
knowingly and intentionally do not comply with subsection (12) of this
section; and
(14) Designate to the tenant the name and address of the person who
is the landlord by a statement on the rental agreement or by a notice
conspicuously posted on the premises. The tenant shall be notified
immediately of any changes ((by certified mail or by an updated
posting)) in writing, which must be either (a) delivered personally to
the tenant or (b) mailed to the tenant and conspicuously posted on the
premises. If the person designated in this section does not reside in
the state where the premises are located, there shall also be
designated a person who resides in the county who is authorized to act
as an agent for the purposes of service of notices and process, and if
no designation is made of a person to act as agent, then the person to
whom rental payments are to be made shall be considered such
agent((;)). Regardless of such designation, any owner who resides
outside the state and who violates a provision of this chapter is
deemed to have submitted himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the
courts of this state and personal service of any process may be made on
the owner outside the state with the same force and effect as personal
service within the state. Any summons or process served out of state
must contain the same information and be served in the same manner as
personal service of summons or process served within the state, except
the summons or process must require the party to appear and answer
within sixty days after such personal service out of the state. In an
action for a violation of this chapter that is filed under chapter
12.40 RCW, service of the notice of claim outside the state must
contain the same information and be served in the same manner as
required under chapter 12.40 RCW, except the date on which the party is
required to appear must not be less than sixty days from the date of
service of the notice of claim.
No duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective
condition under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be
available to the tenant under this chapter, where the defective
condition complained of was caused by the conduct of such tenant, his
or her family, invitee, or other person acting under his or her
control, or where a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord
access to the property for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed
by subsection (1) of this section is incompatible with and greater than
the duty imposed by any other provisions of this section, the
landlord's duty shall be determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.66.100 and 1998 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Every district judge having authority to hear a particular case
may issue criminal process in and to any place in the state.
(2) Every district judge having authority to hear a particular case
may issue civil process, including writs of execution, attachment,
garnishment, and replevin, in and to any place as permitted by statute
or rule. This statute does not authorize service of process pursuant
to RCW 4.28.180 in actions filed pursuant to chapter 12.40 RCW, except
in actions brought against an owner under chapter 59.18 RCW, or in
civil infraction matters.

Sec. 4 RCW 59.18.063 and 1997 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall provide a receipt for any payment made by a
tenant in the form of cash.
(2) A landlord shall provide, upon the request of a tenant, a
written receipt for any payments made by the tenant in a form other
than cash.

Sec. 5 RCW 59.18.100 and 2010 c 8 s 19021 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If, at any time during the tenancy, the landlord fails to carry
out any of the duties imposed by RCW 59.18.060, and notice of the
defect is given to the landlord pursuant to RCW 59.18.070, the tenant
may submit to the landlord or his or her designated agent by
((certified)) first-class mail or in person a good faith estimate by
the tenant of the cost to perform the repairs necessary to correct the
defective condition if the repair is to be done by licensed or
registered persons, or if no licensing or registration requirement
applies to the type of work to be performed, the cost if the repair is
to be done by responsible persons capable of performing such repairs.
Such estimate may be submitted to the landlord at the same time as
notice is given pursuant to RCW 59.18.070((: PROVIDED, That)). The
remedy provided in this section shall not be available for a landlord's
failure to carry out the duties in RCW 59.18.060 (9) and (14)((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). If the tenant utilizes this section for
repairs pursuant to RCW 59.18.060(6), the tenant shall promptly provide
the landlord with a key to any new or replaced locks. The amount the
tenant may deduct from the rent may vary from the estimate, but cannot
exceed the ((one-month)) two-month limit as described in subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) If the landlord fails to commence remedial action of the
defective condition within the applicable time period after receipt of
notice and the estimate from the tenant, the tenant may contract with
a licensed or registered person, or with a responsible person capable
of performing the repair if no license or registration is required, to
make the repair((, and)). Upon the completion of the repair and an
opportunity for inspection by the landlord or his or her designated
agent, the tenant may deduct the cost of repair from the rent in an
amount not to exceed the sum expressed in dollars representing ((one))
two month's rental of the tenant's unit per repair((: PROVIDED,
That)). When the landlord must commence to remedy the defective
condition within ten days as provided in RCW 59.18.070(3), the tenant
cannot contract for repairs for ten days after notice or ((five)) two
days after the landlord receives the estimate, whichever is later((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The total costs of repairs deducted in any
twelve-month period under this subsection shall not exceed the sum
expressed in dollars representing two month's rental of the tenant's
unit.
(3) If the landlord fails to carry out the duties imposed by RCW
59.18.060 within the applicable time period, and if the cost of repair
does not exceed ((one-half)) one month's rent, including the cost of
materials and labor, which shall be computed at the prevailing rate in
the community for the performance of such work, and if repair of the
condition need not by law be performed only by licensed or registered
persons, and if the tenant has given notice under RCW 59.18.070,
although no estimate shall be necessary under this subsection, the
tenant may repair the defective condition in a workmanlike manner and
upon completion of the repair and an opportunity for inspection, the
tenant may deduct the cost of repair from the rent((: PROVIDED,
That)). Repairs under this subsection are limited to defects within
the leased premises((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The cost per repair
shall not exceed ((one-half)) one month's rent of the unit and ((that))
the total costs of repairs deducted in any twelve-month period under
this subsection shall not exceed one month's rent of the unit.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not:
(a) Create a relationship of employer and employee between landlord
and tenant; or
(b) Create liability under the workers' compensation act; or
(c) Constitute the tenant as an agent of the landlord for the
purposes of RCW 60.04.010 and 60.04.040.
(5) Any repair work performed under the provisions of this section
shall comply with the requirements imposed by any applicable code,
statute, ordinance, or regulation. A landlord whose property is
damaged because of repairs performed in a negligent manner may recover
the actual damages in an action against the tenant.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the tenant from agreeing
with the landlord to undertake the repairs himself or herself in return
for cash payment or a reasonable reduction in rent((, the agreement
thereof to be agreed upon between the parties, and)). Any such
agreement does not alter the landlord's obligations under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
When there is a written rental agreement for the premises, the
landlord shall provide an executed copy to each tenant who signs the
rental agreement. The tenant may request one free replacement copy
during the tenancy.

Sec. 7 RCW 59.18.110 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 207 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If a court or an arbitrator determines that:
(a) A landlord has failed to carry out a duty or duties imposed by
RCW 59.18.060; and
(b) A reasonable time has passed for the landlord to remedy the
defective condition following notice to the landlord in accordance with
RCW 59.18.070 or such other time as may be allotted by the court or
arbitrator; the court or arbitrator may determine the diminution in
rental value of the premises due to the defective condition and shall
render judgment against the landlord for the rent paid in excess of
such diminished rental value from the time of notice of such defect to
the time of decision and any costs of repair done pursuant to RCW
59.18.100 for which no deduction has been previously made. Such
decisions may be enforced as other judgments at law and shall be
available to the tenant as a set-off against any existing or subsequent
claims of the landlord.
The court or arbitrator may also authorize the tenant to make or
contract to make further corrective repairs((: PROVIDED, That)) and
the tenant may deduct from the rent the cost of such repairs, as long
as the court specifies a time period in which the landlord may make
such repairs before the tenant may commence or contract for such
repairs((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such repairs shall not exceed the
sum expressed in dollars representing one month's rental of the
tenant's unit in any one calendar year)).
(2) The tenant shall not be obligated to pay rent in excess of the
diminished rental value of the premises until such defect or defects
are corrected by the landlord or until the court or arbitrator
determines otherwise.

Sec. 8 RCW 59.18.130 and 1998 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each tenant shall pay the rental amount at such times and in such
amounts as provided for in the rental agreement or as otherwise
provided by law and comply with all obligations imposed upon tenants by
applicable provisions of all municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and in addition shall:
(1) Keep that part of the premises which he or she occupies and
uses as clean and sanitary as the conditions of the premises permit;
(2) Properly dispose from his or her dwelling unit all rubbish,
garbage, and other organic or flammable waste, in a clean and sanitary
manner at reasonable and regular intervals, and assume all costs of
extermination and fumigation for infestation caused by the tenant;
(3) Properly use and operate all electrical, gas, heating, plumbing
and other fixtures and appliances supplied by the landlord;
(4) Not intentionally or negligently destroy, deface, damage,
impair, or remove any part of the structure or dwelling, with the
appurtenances thereto, including the facilities, equipment, furniture,
furnishings, and appliances, or permit any member of his or her family,
invitee, licensee, or any person acting under his or her control to do
so. Violations may be prosecuted under chapter 9A.48 RCW if the
destruction is intentional and malicious;
(5) Not permit a nuisance or common waste;
(6) Not engage in drug-related activity at the rental premises, or
allow a subtenant, sublessee, resident, or anyone else to engage in
drug-related activity at the rental premises with the knowledge or
consent of the tenant. "Drug-related activity" means that activity
which constitutes a violation of chapter 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW;
(7) Maintain the smoke detection device in accordance with the
manufacturer's recommendations, including the replacement of batteries
where required for the proper operation of the smoke detection device,
as required in RCW ((48.48.140)) 43.44.110(3);
(8) Not engage in any activity at the rental premises that is:
(a) Imminently hazardous to the physical safety of other persons on
the premises; and
(b)(i) Entails physical assaults upon another person which result
in an arrest; or
(ii) Entails the unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 which results in an arrest, including
threatening another tenant or the landlord with a firearm or other
deadly weapon under RCW 59.18.352. Nothing in this subsection (8)
shall authorize the termination of tenancy and eviction of the victim
of a physical assault or the victim of the use or threatened use of a
firearm or other deadly weapon;
(9) Not engage in any gang-related activity at the premises, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or allow another to engage in such activity
at the premises, that renders people in at least two or more dwelling
units or residences insecure in life or the use of property or that
injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at least two or
more dwelling units or residences. In determining whether a tenant is
engaged in gang-related activity, a court should consider the totality
of the circumstances, including factors such as whether there have been
a significant number of complaints to the landlord about the tenant's
activities at the property, damages done by the tenant to the property,
including the property of other tenants or neighbors, harassment or
threats made by the tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been
reported to law enforcement agencies, any police incident reports
involving the tenant, and the tenant's criminal history; and
(10) Upon termination and vacation, restore the premises to their
initial condition except for reasonable wear and tear or conditions
caused by failure of the landlord to comply with his or her obligations
under this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). The tenant shall not be
charged for normal cleaning if he or she has paid a nonrefundable
cleaning fee.

Sec. 9 RCW 59.18.150 and 2010 c 148 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the
landlord to enter into the dwelling unit in order to inspect the
premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, alterations, or
improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the
dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants,
workers, or contractors.
(2) Upon written notice of intent to seek a search warrant, when a
tenant or landlord denies a fire official the right to search a
dwelling unit, a fire official may immediately seek a search warrant
and, upon a showing of probable cause specific to the dwelling unit
sought to be searched that criminal fire code violations exist in the
dwelling unit, a court of competent jurisdiction shall issue a warrant
allowing a search of the dwelling unit.
Upon written notice of intent to seek a search warrant, when a
landlord denies a fire official the right to search the common areas of
the rental building other than the dwelling unit, a fire official may
immediately seek a search warrant and, upon a showing of probable cause
specific to the common area sought to be searched that a criminal fire
code violation exists in those areas, a court of competent jurisdiction
shall issue a warrant allowing a search of the common areas in which
the violation is alleged.
The superior court and courts of limited jurisdiction organized
under Titles 3, 35, and 35A RCW have jurisdiction to issue such search
warrants. Evidence obtained pursuant to any such search may be used in
a civil or administrative enforcement action.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Common areas" means a common area or those areas that contain
electrical, plumbing, and mechanical equipment and facilities used for
the operation of the rental building.
(b) "Fire official" means any fire official authorized to enforce
the state or local fire code.
(4)(a) A search warrant may be issued by a judge of a superior
court or a court of limited jurisdiction under Titles 3, 35, and 35A
RCW to a code enforcement official of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision for the purpose of allowing the
inspection of any specified dwelling unit and premises to determine the
presence of an unsafe building condition or a violation of any building
regulation, statute, or ordinance.
(b) A search warrant must only be issued upon application of a
designated officer or employee of a county or city prosecuting or
regulatory authority supported by an affidavit or declaration made
under oath or upon sworn testimony before the judge, establishing
probable cause that a violation of a state or local law, regulation, or
ordinance regarding rental housing exists and endangers the health or
safety of the tenant or adjoining neighbors. In addition, the
affidavit must contain a statement that consent to inspect has been
sought from the owner and the tenant but could not be obtained because
the owner or the tenant either refused or failed to respond within five
days, or a statement setting forth facts or circumstances reasonably
justifying the failure to seek such consent. A landlord may not take
or threaten to take reprisals or retaliatory action as defined in RCW
59.18.240 against a tenant who gives consent to a code enforcement
official of the state or of any county, city, or other political
subdivision to inspect his or her dwelling unit to determine the
presence of an unsafe building condition or a violation of any building
regulation, statute, or ordinance.
(c) In determining probable cause, the judge is not limited to
evidence of specific knowledge, but may also consider any of the
following:
(i) The age and general condition of the premises;
(ii) Previous violations or hazards found present in the premises;
(iii) The type of premises;
(iv) The purposes for which the premises are used; or
(v) The presence of hazards or violations in and the general
condition of premises near the premises sought to be inspected.
(d) Before issuing an inspection warrant, the judge shall find that
the applicant has: (i) Provided written notice of the date,
approximate time, and court in which the applicant will be seeking the
warrant to the owner and, if the applicant reasonably believes the
dwelling unit or rental property to be inspected is in the lawful
possession of a tenant, to the tenant; and (ii) posted a copy of the
notice on the exterior of the dwelling unit or rental property to be
inspected. The judge shall also allow the owner and any tenant who
appears during consideration of the application for the warrant to
defend against or in support of the issuance of the warrant.
(e) All warrants must include at least the following:
(i) The name of the agency and building official requesting the
warrant and authorized to conduct an inspection pursuant to the
warrant;
(ii) A reasonable description of the premises and items to be
inspected; and
(iii) A brief description of the purposes of the inspection.
(f) An inspection warrant is effective for the time specified in
the warrant, but not for a period of more than ten days unless it is
extended or renewed by the judge who signed and issued the original
warrant upon satisfying himself or herself that the extension or
renewal is in the public interest. The inspection warrant must be
executed and returned to the judge by whom it was issued within the
time specified in the warrant or within the extended or renewed time.
After the expiration of the time specified in the warrant, the warrant,
unless executed, is void.
(g) An inspection pursuant to a warrant must not be made:
(i) Between 7:00 p.m. of any day and 8:00 a.m. of the succeeding
day, on Saturday or Sunday, or on any legal holiday, unless the owner
or, if occupied, the tenant specifies a preference for inspection
during such hours or on such a day;
(ii) Without the presence of an owner or occupant over the age of
eighteen years or a person designated by the owner or occupant unless
specifically authorized by a judge upon a showing that the authority is
reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose of the search warrant;
or
(iii) By means of forcible entry, except that a judge may expressly
authorize a forcible entry when:
(A) Facts are shown that are sufficient to create a reasonable
suspicion of a violation of a state or local law or rule relating to
municipal or county building, fire, safety, environmental, animal
control, land use, plumbing, electrical, health, minimum housing, or
zoning standards that, if the violation existed, would be an immediate
threat to the health or safety of the tenant; or
(B) Facts are shown establishing that reasonable attempts to serve
a previous warrant have been unsuccessful.
(h) Immediate execution of a warrant is prohibited, except when
necessary to prevent loss of life or property.
(i) Any person who willfully refuses to permit inspection,
obstructs inspection, or aids in the obstruction of an inspection of
property authorized by warrant issued pursuant to this section is
subject to remedial and punitive sanctions for contempt of court under
chapter 7.21 RCW. Such conduct may also be subject to a civil penalty
imposed by local ordinance that takes into consideration the facts and
circumstances and the severity of the violation.
(5) The landlord may enter the dwelling unit without consent of the
tenant in case of emergency or abandonment.
(6) The landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use it to
harass the tenant, and shall provide notice before entry as provided in
this subsection. Except in the case of emergency or if it is
impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least two
days' written notice of his or her intent to enter and shall enter only
at reasonable times. The notice must state the exact time and date or
dates of entry or specify a period of time during that date or dates in
which the entry will occur, in which case the notice must specify the
earliest and latest possible times of entry. The notice must also
specify the telephone number to which the tenant may communicate any
objection or request to reschedule the entry. The tenant shall not
unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter the dwelling
unit at a specified time where the landlord has given at least one
day's notice of intent to enter to exhibit the dwelling unit to
prospective or actual purchasers or tenants. A landlord shall not
unreasonably interfere with a tenant's enjoyment of the rented dwelling
unit by excessively exhibiting the dwelling unit.
(7) The landlord has no other right of access except by court
order, arbitrator or by consent of the tenant.
(8) A landlord or tenant who continues to violate the rights of the
tenant or landlord with respect to the duties imposed on the other as
set forth in this section after being served with one written
notification alleging in good faith violations of this section listing
the date and time of the violation shall be liable for up to one
hundred dollars for each violation after receipt of the notice. The
prevailing landlord or tenant may recover costs of the suit or
arbitration under this section, and may also recover reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(9) Nothing in this section is intended to (a) abrogate or modify
in any way any common law right or privilege or (b) affect the common
law as it relates to a local municipality's right of entry under
emergency or exigent circumstances.

Sec. 10 RCW 59.18.180 and 1998 c 276 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the tenant fails to comply with any portion of RCW 59.18.130
or 59.18.140, and such noncompliance can (a) substantially affect the
health and safety of the tenant or other tenants, or substantially
increase the hazards of fire or accident ((that can)), and (b) be
remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, the
tenant shall comply within thirty days after written notice by the
landlord specifying the noncompliance, or, in the case of emergency as
promptly as conditions require. If the tenant fails to remedy the
noncompliance within that period the landlord may enter the dwelling
unit and cause the work to be done and submit an itemized bill of the
actual and reasonable cost of repair, to be payable on the next date
when periodic rent is due, or on terms mutually agreed to by the
landlord and tenant, or immediately if the rental agreement has
terminated. ((Any substantial noncompliance by the tenant of RCW
59.18.130 or 59.18.140 shall constitute a ground for commencing an
action in unlawful detainer in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 59.12 RCW, and a landlord may commence such action at any time
after written notice pursuant to such chapter.)) The tenant shall have
a defense to an unlawful detainer action filed solely on this ground if
it is determined at the hearing authorized under the provisions of
chapter 59.12 RCW that the tenant is in substantial compliance with the
provisions of this section, or if the tenant remedies the noncomplying
condition within the thirty day period provided for above or any
shorter period determined at the hearing to have been required because
of an emergency: PROVIDED, That if the defective condition is remedied
after the commencement of an unlawful detainer action, the tenant may
be liable to the landlord for statutory costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(2) Any other substantial noncompliance by the tenant of RCW
59.18.130 or 59.18.140 constitutes a ground for commencing an action in
unlawful detainer in accordance with chapter 59.12 RCW. A landlord may
commence such action at any time after written notice pursuant to
chapter 59.12 RCW.
(3) If drug-related activity is alleged to be a basis for
termination of tenancy under RCW 59.18.130(6), 59.12.030(5), or
59.20.140(5), the compliance provisions of this section do not apply
and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action.
(((3))) (4) If criminal activity on the premises ((that creates an
imminent hazard to the physical safety of other persons on the
premises)) as ((defined)) described in RCW 59.18.130(8) is alleged to
be the basis for termination of the tenancy, and the tenant is arrested
as a result of this activity, then the compliance provisions of this
section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly to an
unlawful detainer action against the tenant who was arrested for this
activity.
(((4))) (5) If gang-related activity, as prohibited under RCW
59.18.130(9), is alleged to be the basis for termination of the
tenancy, then the compliance provisions of this section do not apply
and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action in
accordance with chapter 59.12 RCW, and a landlord may commence such an
action at any time after written notice under chapter 59.12 RCW.
(((5))) (6) A landlord may not be held liable in any cause of
action for bringing an unlawful detainer action against a tenant for
drug-related activity, for creating an imminent hazard to the physical
safety of others, or for engaging in gang-related activity that renders
people in at least two or more dwelling units or residences insecure in
life or the use of property or that injures or endangers the safety or
health of people in at least two or more dwelling units or residences
under this section, if the unlawful detainer action was brought in good
faith. Nothing in this section shall affect a landlord's liability
under RCW 59.18.380 to pay all damages sustained by the tenant should
the writ of restitution be wrongfully sued out.

Sec. 11 RCW 59.18.230 and 2010 c 8 s 19024 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any provision of a lease or other agreement, whether oral or
written, whereby any section or subsection of this chapter is waived
except as provided in RCW 59.18.360 and shall be deemed against public
policy and shall be unenforceable. Such unenforceability shall not
affect other provisions of the agreement which can be given effect
without them.
(2) No rental agreement may provide that the tenant:
(a) Agrees to waive or to ((forego)) forgo rights or remedies under
this chapter; or
(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising
out of the rental agreement; or
(c) Agrees to pay the landlord's attorneys' fees, except as
authorized in this chapter; or
(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the
landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord for that
liability or the costs connected therewith; or
(e) And landlord have agreed to a particular arbitrator at the time
the rental agreement is entered into.
(3) A provision prohibited by subsection (2) of this section
included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord
deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by him
or her to be prohibited, the tenant may recover actual damages
sustained by him or her, statutory damages not to exceed five hundred
dollars, costs of suit, and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(4) The common law right of the landlord of distress for rent is
hereby abolished for property covered by this chapter. Any provision
in a rental agreement creating a lien upon the personal property of the
tenant or authorizing a distress for rent is null and void and of no
force and effect. Any landlord who takes or detains the personal
property of a tenant without the specific written consent of the tenant
to such incident of taking or detention, and who, after written demand
by the tenant for the return of his or her personal property, refuses
to return the same promptly shall be liable to the tenant for the value
of the property retained, actual damages, and if the refusal is
intentional, may also be liable for damages of up to ((one)) five
hundred dollars per day but not to exceed ((one)) five thousand
dollars, for each day or part of a day that the tenant is deprived of
his or her property. The prevailing party may recover his or her costs
of suit and a reasonable attorneys' fee.
In any action, including actions pursuant to chapters 7.64 or 12.28
RCW, brought by a tenant or other person to recover possession of his
or her personal property taken or detained by a landlord in violation
of this section, the court, upon motion and after notice to the
opposing parties, may waive or reduce any bond requirements where it
appears to be to the satisfaction of the court that the moving party is
proceeding in good faith and has, prima facie, a meritorious claim for
immediate delivery or redelivery of said property.

Sec. 12 RCW 59.18.253 and 1991 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for a landlord to require a fee or deposit
from a prospective tenant for the privilege of being placed on a
waiting list to be considered as a tenant for a dwelling unit.
(2) A landlord who charges a prospective tenant a fee or deposit to
hold a dwelling unit or secure that the prospective tenant will move
into a dwelling unit, after the dwelling unit has been offered to the
prospective tenant, must provide the prospective tenant with a receipt
for the fee or deposit, together with a written statement of the
conditions, if any, under which the fee or deposit ((is refundable))
may be retained, immediately upon payment of the fee or deposit.
(3)(a) If the prospective tenant does occupy the dwelling unit,
then the landlord must credit the amount of the fee or deposit to the
tenant's first month's rent or to the tenant's security deposit. If
the prospective tenant does not occupy the dwelling unit, then the
landlord may keep up to the full amount of any fee or deposit that was
paid by the prospective tenant to secure the tenancy, so long as it is
in accordance with the written statement of conditions furnished to the
prospective tenant at the time the fee or deposit was charged.
(b) A fee ((charged to secure a tenancy)) or deposit to hold a
dwelling unit or secure that the prospective tenant will move into a
dwelling unit under this subsection does not include any cost charged
by a landlord to use a tenant screening service or obtain background
information on a prospective tenant.
(c) A portion of the fee or deposit may not be withheld if the
dwelling unit fails a tenant-based rental assistance program inspection
by a qualified inspector as defined in RCW 59.18.030. If the
inspection does not occur within ten days from the date of collection
of the fee or deposit or a longer period of time that the landlord and
tenant may agree upon, the landlord may notify the tenant that the
dwelling unit will no longer be held. The landlord shall promptly
return the fee or deposit to the prospective tenant after the landlord
is notified that the dwelling unit failed the inspection or the
landlord has notified the tenant that the dwelling unit will no longer
be held. The landlord complies with this section by promptly
depositing the fee or deposit in the United States mail properly
addressed with first-class postage prepaid.
(((3))) (4) In any action brought for a violation of this section,
a landlord may be liable for the amount of the fee or deposit charged.
In addition, any landlord who violates this section may be liable to
the prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed ((one hundred
dollars)) two times the fee or deposit. The prevailing party may also
recover court costs and a reasonable attorneys' fee.

Sec. 13 RCW 59.18.260 and 1983 c 264 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any moneys are paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit
or as security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease
or rental agreement, the lease or rental agreement shall be in writing
and shall include the terms and conditions under which the deposit or
portion thereof may be withheld by the landlord upon termination of the
lease or rental agreement. If all or part of the deposit may be
withheld to indemnify the landlord for damages to the premises for
which the tenant is responsible, the rental agreement shall be in
writing and shall so specify. No deposit may be collected by a
landlord unless the rental agreement is in writing and a written
checklist or statement specifically describing the condition and
cleanliness of or existing damages to the premises and furnishings,
including, but not limited to, walls, floors, countertops, carpets,
drapes, furniture, and appliances, is provided by the landlord to the
tenant at the commencement of the tenancy. The checklist or statement
shall be signed and dated by the landlord and the tenant, and the
tenant shall be provided with a copy of the signed checklist or
statement. No such deposit shall be withheld on account of normal wear
and tear resulting from ordinary use of the premises. The tenant has
the right to request one free replacement copy of the written
checklist. If the landlord collects a deposit without providing a
written checklist at the commencement of the tenancy, the landlord is
liable to the tenant for the amount of the deposit, and the prevailing
party may recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. This
section does not limit the tenant's right to recover moneys paid as
damages or security under RCW 59.18.280.

Sec. 14 RCW 59.18.270 and 2004 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease or
rental agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in a trust
account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose of holding such
security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a financial
institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041 or licensed escrow agent
located in Washington. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the
landlord shall be entitled to receipt of interest paid on such trust
account deposits. The landlord shall provide the tenant with a written
receipt for the deposit and shall provide written notice of the name
and address and location of the depository and any subsequent change
thereof. If during a tenancy the status of landlord is transferred to
another, any sums in the deposit trust account affected by such
transfer shall simultaneously be transferred to an equivalent trust
account of the successor landlord, and the successor landlord shall
promptly notify the tenant of the transfer and of the name, address,
and location of the new depository. If, during the tenancy, the
tenant's dwelling unit is foreclosed upon and the tenant's deposit is
not transferred to the successor after the foreclosure sale or other
transfer of the property from the foreclosed-upon owner to a successor,
the foreclosed-upon owner shall promptly refund the full deposit to the
tenant immediately after the foreclosure sale or transfer. If the
foreclosed-upon owner does not either immediately refund the full
deposit to the tenant or transfer the deposit to the successor, the
foreclosed-upon owner is liable to the tenant for damages up to two
times the amount of the deposit. In any action brought by the tenant
to recover the deposit, the prevailing party is entitled to recover the
costs of suit or arbitration, including reasonable attorneys' fees.
The tenant's claim to any moneys paid under this section shall be prior
to that of any creditor of the landlord, including a trustee in
bankruptcy or receiver, even if such moneys are commingled.

Sec. 15 RCW 59.18.285 and 1983 c 264 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
No moneys paid to the landlord which are nonrefundable may be
designated as a deposit or as part of any deposit. If any moneys are
paid to the landlord as a nonrefundable fee, the rental agreement shall
be in writing and shall clearly specify that the fee is nonrefundable.
If the landlord fails to provide a written rental agreement, the
landlord is liable to the tenant for the amount of any fees collected
as nonrefundable fees. If the written rental agreement fails to
specify that the fee is nonrefundable, the fee must be treated as a
refundable deposit under RCW 59.18.260, 59.18.270, and 59.18.280.

Sec. 16 RCW 59.18.310 and 1991 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the tenant defaults in the payment of rent and reasonably
indicates by words or actions the intention not to resume tenancy, the
tenant shall be liable for the following for such abandonment:
PROVIDED, That upon learning of such abandonment of the premises the
landlord shall make a reasonable effort to mitigate the damages
resulting from such abandonment:
(1) When the tenancy is month-to-month, the tenant shall be liable
for the rent for the thirty days following either the date the landlord
learns of the abandonment, or the date the next regular rental payment
would have become due, whichever first occurs.
(2) When the tenancy is for a term greater than month-to-month, the
tenant shall be liable for the lesser of the following:
(a) The entire rent due for the remainder of the term; or
(b) All rent accrued during the period reasonably necessary to
rerent the premises at a fair rental, plus the difference between such
fair rental and the rent agreed to in the prior agreement, plus actual
costs incurred by the landlord in rerenting the premises together with
statutory court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
In the event of such abandonment of tenancy and an accompanying
default in the payment of rent by the tenant, the landlord may
immediately enter and take possession of any property of the tenant
found on the premises and may store the same in any reasonably secure
place. A landlord shall make reasonable efforts to provide the tenant
with a notice containing the name and address of the landlord and the
place where the property is stored and informing the tenant that a sale
or disposition of the property shall take place pursuant to this
section, and the date of the sale or disposal, and further informing
the tenant of the right under RCW 59.18.230 to have the property
returned prior to its sale or disposal. The landlord's efforts at
notice under this subsection shall be satisfied by the mailing by
first-class mail, postage prepaid, of such notice to the tenant's last
known address and to any other address provided in writing by the
tenant or actually known to the landlord where the tenant might receive
the notice. The landlord shall return the property to the tenant after
the tenant has paid the actual or reasonable drayage and storage costs
whichever is less if the tenant makes a written request for the return
of the property before the landlord has sold or disposed of the
property. After forty-five days from the date the notice of such sale
or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the tenant, the
landlord may sell or dispose of such property, including personal
papers, family pictures, and keepsakes. The landlord may apply any
income derived therefrom against moneys due the landlord, including
actual or reasonable costs whichever is less of drayage and storage of
the property. If the property has a cumulative value of two hundred
fifty dollars or less, the landlord may sell or dispose of the property
in the manner provided in this section, except for personal papers,
family pictures, and keepsakes, after seven days from the date the
notice of sale or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the
tenant: PROVIDED, That the landlord shall make reasonable efforts, as
defined in this section, to notify the tenant. Any excess income
derived from the sale of such property under this section shall be held
by the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a period of one year
from the date of sale, and if no claim is made or action commenced by
the tenant for the recovery thereof prior to the expiration of that
period of time, the balance shall be the property of the landlord,
including any interest paid on the income.

Sec. 17 RCW 59.18.312 and 2008 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall, upon the execution of a writ of restitution
by the sheriff, enter and take possession of any property of the tenant
found on the premises. The landlord may store the property in any
reasonably secure place, including the premises, and sell or dispose of
the property as provided under subsection (3) of this section. The
landlord must store the property if the tenant serves a written request
to do so on the landlord or the landlord's representative by any of the
methods described in RCW 59.18.365 no later than three days after
service of the writ. A landlord may elect to store the property
without such a request unless the tenant or the tenant's representative
objects to the storage of the property. If the tenant or the tenant's
representative objects to the storage of the property or the landlord
elects not to store the property because the tenant has not served a
written request on the landlord to do so, the property shall be
deposited upon the nearest public property and may not be stored by the
landlord. If the landlord knows that the tenant is a person with a
disability as defined in RCW 49.60.040 (as amended by chapter 317, Laws
of 2007) and the disability impairs or prevents the tenant or the
tenant's representative from making a written request for storage, it
must be presumed that the tenant has requested the storage of the
property as provided in this section unless the tenant objects in
writing.
(2) Property stored under this section shall be returned to the
tenant after the tenant has paid the actual or reasonable drayage and
storage costs, whichever is less, or until it is sold or disposed of by
the landlord in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Prior to the sale of property stored pursuant to this section
with a cumulative value of over ((one)) two hundred fifty dollars, the
landlord shall notify the tenant of the pending sale. After thirty
days from the date the notice of the sale is mailed or personally
delivered to the tenant's last known address, the landlord may sell the
property, including personal papers, family pictures, and keepsakes,
and dispose of any property not sold.
If the property that is being stored has a cumulative value of
((one)) two hundred fifty dollars or less, then the landlord may sell
or dispose of the property in the manner provided in this section,
except for personal papers, family pictures, and keepsakes. Prior to
the sale or disposal of property stored pursuant to this section with
a cumulative value of ((one)) two hundred fifty dollars or less, the
landlord shall notify the tenant of the pending sale or disposal. The
notice shall either be mailed to the tenant's last known address or
personally delivered to the tenant. After seven days from the date the
notice is mailed or delivered to the tenant, the landlord may sell or
dispose of the property.
The landlord may apply any income derived from the sale of the
tenant's property against moneys due the landlord for drayage and
storage of the property. The amount of sale proceeds that the landlord
may apply towards such costs may not exceed the actual or reasonable
costs for drayage and storage of the property, whichever is less. Any
excess income derived from the sale of such property shall be held by
the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a period of one year
from the date of the sale. If no claim is made or action commenced by
the tenant for the recovery of the excess income prior to the
expiration of that period of time, then the balance shall be treated as
abandoned property and deposited by the landlord with the department of
revenue pursuant to chapter 63.29 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a right
of distress for rent.
(5) When serving a tenant with a writ of restitution pursuant to
RCW 59.12.100 and 59.18.410, the sheriff shall provide written notice
to the tenant that: (a) Upon execution of the writ, the landlord must
store the tenant's property only if the tenant serves a written request
on the landlord to do so no later than three days after service of the
writ; (b) the notice to the landlord requesting storage may be served
by personally delivering or mailing a copy of the request to the
landlord at the address identified in, or by facsimile to the facsimile
number listed on, the form described under subsection (6) of this
section; (c) if the tenant has not made such a written request to the
landlord, the landlord may elect to either store the tenant's property
or place the tenant's property on the nearest public property unless
the tenant objects; (d) if the property is stored, it may not be
returned to the tenant unless the tenant pays the actual or reasonable
costs of drayage and storage, whichever is less, within thirty days;
(e) if the tenant or the tenant's representative objects to storage of
the property, it will not be stored but will be placed on the nearest
public property; and (f) the landlord may sell or otherwise dispose of
the property as provided in subsection (3) of this section if the
landlord provides written notice to the tenant first.
(6) When serving a tenant with a writ of restitution under
subsection (5) of this section, the sheriff shall also serve the tenant
with a form provided by the landlord that can be used to request the
landlord to store the tenant's property, which must be substantially in
the following form:

REQUEST FOR STORAGE OF PERSONAL PROPERTY

. . . . . . . . . . .
Name of Plaintiff

. . . . . . . . . . .
Name(s) of Tenant(s)

I/we hereby request the landlord to store our personal property.
I/we understand that I/we am/are responsible for the actual or
reasonable costs of moving and storing the property, whichever is less.
If I/we fail to pay these costs, the landlord may sell or dispose of
the property pursuant to and within the time frame permitted under RCW
59.18.312(3).

Any notice of sale required under RCW 59.18.312(3) must be sent to
the tenants at the following address:

. . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
IF NO ADDRESS IS PROVIDED, NOTICE OF SALE WILL BE SENT TO THE LAST
KNOWN ADDRESS OF THE TENANT(S)

Dated:. . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . .
Tenant-Print Name

. . . . . . . . . . .
Tenant-Print Name

This notice may be delivered or mailed to the landlord or the
landlord's representative at the following address:

. . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
This notice may also be served by facsimile to the landlord or the
landlord's representative at:

. . . . . . . . . . .
Facsimile Number

IMPORTANT

IF YOU WANT YOUR LANDLORD TO STORE YOUR PROPERTY, THIS WRITTEN REQUEST
MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE LANDLORD NO LATER THAN THREE (3) DAYS AFTER THE
SHERIFF SERVES THE WRIT OF RESTITUTION. YOU SHOULD RETAIN PROOF OF
SERVICE.

Sec. 18 RCW 59.18.380 and 2010 c 8 s 19032 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the time and place fixed for the hearing of plaintiff's motion
for a writ of restitution, the defendant, or any person in possession
or claiming possession of the property, may answer, orally or in
writing, and assert any legal or equitable defense or set-off arising
out of the tenancy. If the answer is oral the substance thereof shall
be endorsed on the complaint by the court. The court shall examine the
parties and witnesses orally to ascertain the merits of the complaint
and answer, and if it shall appear that the plaintiff has the right to
be restored to possession of the property, the court shall enter an
order directing the issuance of a writ of restitution, returnable ten
days after its date, restoring to the plaintiff possession of the
property and if it shall appear to the court that there is no
substantial issue of material fact of the right of the plaintiff to be
granted other relief as prayed for in the complaint and provided for in
this chapter, the court may enter an order and judgment granting so
much of such relief as may be sustained by the proof, and the court may
grant such other relief as may be prayed for in the plaintiff's
complaint and provided for in this chapter, then the court shall enter
an order denying any relief sought by the plaintiff for which the court
has determined that the plaintiff has no right as a matter of law:
PROVIDED, That within three days after the service of the writ of
restitution issued prior to final judgment, the defendant, or person in
possession of the property, may, in any action for the recovery of
possession of the property for failure to pay rent, stay the execution
of the writ pending final judgment by paying into court or to the
plaintiff, as the court directs, all rent found to be due ((and all the
costs of the action)), and in addition by paying, on a monthly basis
pending final judgment, an amount equal to the monthly rent called for
by the lease or rental agreement at the time the complaint was filed:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That before any writ shall issue prior to final
judgment the plaintiff shall execute to the defendant and file in the
court a bond in such sum as the court may order, with sufficient surety
to be approved by the clerk, conditioned that the plaintiff will
prosecute his or her action without delay, and will pay all costs that
may be adjudged to the defendant, and all damages which he or she may
sustain by reason of the writ of restitution having been issued, should
the same be wrongfully sued out. The court shall also enter an order
directing the parties to proceed to trial on the complaint and answer
in the usual manner.
If it appears to the court that the plaintiff should not be
restored to possession of the property, the court shall deny
plaintiff's motion for a writ of restitution and enter an order
directing the parties to proceed to trial within thirty days on the
complaint and answer. If it appears to the court that there is a
substantial issue of material fact as to whether or not the plaintiff
is entitled to other relief as is prayed for in plaintiff's complaint
and provided for in this chapter, or that there is a genuine issue of
a material fact pertaining to a legal or equitable defense or set-off
raised in the defendant's answer, the court shall grant or deny so much
of plaintiff's other relief sought and so much of defendant's defenses
or set-off claimed, as may be proper.

Sec. 19 RCW 59.18.390 and 1997 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sheriff shall, upon receiving the writ of restitution,
forthwith serve a copy thereof upon the defendant, his or her agent, or
attorney, or a person in possession of the premises, and shall not
execute the same for three days thereafter, and the defendant, or
person in possession of the premises within three days after the
service of the writ of restitution may execute to the plaintiff a bond
to be filed with and approved by the clerk of the court in such sum as
may be fixed by the judge, with sufficient surety to be approved by the
clerk of the court, conditioned that they will pay to the plaintiff
such sum as the plaintiff may recover for the use and occupation of the
premises, or any rent found due, together with all damages the
plaintiff may sustain by reason of the defendant occupying or keeping
possession of the premises, together with all damages which the court
theretofore has awarded to the plaintiff as provided in this chapter,
and also all the costs of the action. If the writ of restitution was
issued after alternative service provided for in RCW 59.18.055, the
court shall determine the amount of the bond after considering the rent
claimed and any other factors the court deems relevant. The plaintiff,
his or her agent or attorneys, shall have notice of the time and place
where the court or judge thereof shall fix the amount of the
defendant's bond, and shall have notice and a reasonable opportunity to
examine into the qualification and sufficiency of the sureties upon the
bond before the bond shall be approved by the clerk. After the
issuance of a writ of restitution, acceptance of a payment by the
landlord or plaintiff that only partially satisfies the judgment will
not invalidate the writ unless pursuant to a written agreement executed
by both parties. The eviction will not be postponed or stopped unless
a copy of that written agreement is provided to the sheriff. It is the
responsibility of the tenant or defendant to ensure a copy of the
agreement is provided to the sheriff. Upon receipt of the agreement
the sheriff will cease action unless ordered to do otherwise by the
court. The writ of restitution and the notice that accompanies the
writ of restitution required under RCW 59.18.312 shall conspicuously
state in bold face type, all capitals, not less than twelve points
information about partial payments as set forth in subsection (2) of
this section. If the writ of restitution has been based upon a finding
by the court that the tenant, subtenant, sublessee, or a person
residing at the rental premises has engaged in drug-related activity or
has allowed any other person to engage in drug-related activity at
those premises with his or her knowledge or approval, neither the
tenant, the defendant, nor a person in possession of the premises shall
be entitled to post a bond in order to retain possession of the
premises. The writ may be served by the sheriff, in the event he or
she shall be unable to find the defendant, an agent or attorney, or a
person in possession of the premises, by affixing a copy of the writ in
a conspicuous place upon the premises: PROVIDED, That the sheriff
shall not require any bond for the service or execution of the writ.
The sheriff shall be immune from all civil liability for serving and
enforcing writs of restitution unless the sheriff is grossly negligent
in carrying out his or her duty.
(2) The notice accompanying a writ of restitution required under
RCW 59.18.312 shall be substantially similar to the following:

IMPORTANT NOTICE - PARTIAL PAYMENTS

YOUR LANDLORD'S ACCEPTANCE OF A PARTIAL PAYMENT FROM YOU AFTER
SERVICE OF THIS WRIT OF RESTITUTION WILL NOT AUTOMATICALLY POSTPONE OR
STOP YOUR EVICTION. IF YOU HAVE A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH YOUR LANDLORD
THAT THE EVICTION WILL BE POSTPONED OR STOPPED, IT IS YOUR
RESPONSIBILITY TO PROVIDE A COPY OF THE AGREEMENT TO THE SHERIFF. THE
SHERIFF WILL NOT CEASE ACTION UNLESS YOU PROVIDE A COPY OF THE
AGREEMENT. AT THE DIRECTION OF THE COURT THE SHERIFF MAY TAKE FURTHER
ACTION.

Sec. 20 RCW 59.18.410 and 2010 c 8 s 19033 are each amended to
read as follows:
If upon the trial the verdict of the jury or, if the case be tried
without a jury, the finding of the court be in favor of the plaintiff
and against the defendant, judgment shall be entered for the
restitution of the premises; and if the proceeding be for unlawful
detainer after neglect or failure to perform any condition or covenant
of a lease or agreement under which the property is held, or after
default in the payment of rent, the judgment shall also declare the
forfeiture of the lease, agreement, or tenancy. The jury, or the
court, if the proceedings be tried without a jury, shall also assess
the damages arising out of the tenancy occasioned to the plaintiff by
any forcible entry, or by any forcible or unlawful detainer, alleged in
the complaint and proved on the trial, and, if the alleged unlawful
detainer be after default in the payment of rent, find the amount of
any rent due, and the judgment shall be rendered against the defendant
guilty of the forcible entry, forcible detainer, or unlawful detainer
for the amount of damages thus assessed and for the rent, if any, found
due, and the court may award statutory costs and reasonable attorney's
fees. When the proceeding is for an unlawful detainer after default in
the payment of rent, and the lease or agreement under which the rent is
payable has not by its terms expired, execution upon the judgment shall
not be issued until the expiration of five days after the entry of the
judgment, within which time the tenant or any subtenant, or any
mortgagee of the term, or other party interested in the continuance of
the tenancy, may pay into court for the landlord the amount of the
judgment and costs, and thereupon the judgment shall be satisfied and
the tenant restored to his or her tenancy; but if payment, as herein
provided, be not made within five days the judgment may be enforced for
its full amount and for the possession of the premises. In all other
cases the judgment may be enforced immediately. If writ of restitution
shall have been executed prior to judgment no further writ or execution
for the premises shall be required. This section also applies if the
writ of restitution is issued pursuant to a final judgment entered
after a show cause hearing conducted in accordance with RCW 59.18.380.

--- END ---