BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is a
leader in addressing climate change by having established limits to
reduce greenhouse gas emissions and in ensuring the development of new
renewable energy resources by requiring large electrical utilities to
meet renewable energy resource targets through renewable portfolio
standards.
However, the legislature finds achieving the state's goals for
greenhouse gas emission reduction and implementation of renewable
energy resource standards is hindered by the fact that investments in
renewable energy resources by investor-owned electrical companies are
subject to retroactive prudence review of expenditures that may
disallow investments or expenditures.
The legislature established the clean energy leadership council in
2009 and directed the council to develop a plan by December 2010 for
growing Washington's clean energy sector and positioning Washington as
a national leader in clean energy development and policy. The council
determined that retroactive prudence review is an important influence
on the ease and speed of demonstrating leading edge clean energy
solutions by Washington companies.
The legislature finds that it is important that electrical
companies be able to make investments in renewable energy resources and
reduction in greenhouse gas emissions without fear of subsequent
disallowance of those investments from their future rate base.
The legislature intends to reduce the deterrent effect of a
retroactive prudence review on the ability of electrical companies to
make investments in renewable energy resources and to achieve the
renewable portfolio targets applicable to electrical companies.
The legislature intends that in making its prudence determination,
the utilities and transportation commission recognize that while there
are risks of unknowns created by the fact that the prudence
determination is being made at an early stage at which some information
that would be considered in a retroactive review may not be available,
there are also risks to the public from the continued reliance on
fossil fuels, and that it is in the public interest that the state
achieve its objectives for reduction in greenhouse gas emissions.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.04.250 and 1991 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall have power upon complaint or upon its own
motion to ascertain and determine the fair value for rate making
purposes of the property of any public service company used and useful
for service in this state and shall exercise such power whenever it
shall deem such valuation or determination necessary or proper under
any of the provisions of this title. In determining what property is
used and useful for providing electric, gas, or water service, the
commission may include the reasonable costs of construction work in
progress to the extent that the commission finds that inclusion is in
the public interest.
(2)(a) If an electrical company desires a determination regarding
the prudence of an investment in a plant or other property that will
supply electricity from sources other than fossil fuels, increase
efficiency, or reduce the fossil fuel used in producing electricity
before making that investment, the electrical company may file a
petition with the commission to obtain such a determination.
(b) When a petition is filed, the commission shall provide notice
to the public and potentially affected parties and expedite the hearing
of that petition. The hearing of such a petition is not considered a
general rate increase filing, and an administrative law judge of the
commission may enter an initial order including findings of fact and
conclusions of law, as provided in RCW 80.01.060(3). The commission
shall issue a final order, or if the matter is heard by an
administrative law judge, an initial order, within ninety days after
filing the petition.
(c) In considering the prudence of the investment, the commission
may establish a limit to the amount of the investment that will be
considered prudent. The commission shall balance against any risk of
unknowns of the investment the risk to the public of continued reliance
on fossil fuels and the state's objectives for reduction in greenhouse
gas emissions. If the investment is found to be prudent, recovery of
a return in rates on the amount of the investment determined to be
prudent will not occur until the next general rate increase filing by
the company after the plant or equipment is put into service.
(3) The commission shall have the power to make revaluations of the
property of any public service company from time to time.
(4) The commission shall, before any hearing is had, notify the
complainants and the public service company concerned of the time and
place of such hearing by giving at least thirty days' written notice
thereof, specifying that at the time and place designated a hearing
will be held for the purpose of ascertaining the value of the company's
property, used and useful as aforesaid, which notice shall be
sufficient to authorize the commission to inquire into and pass upon
the matters designated in this section.

--- END ---