BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.29A.130 and 2008 c 194 s 1 and 2008 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following leasehold interests ((shall be)) are exempt from
taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions((: PROVIDED, That)). However, this exemption ((shall))
does not apply to the leasehold interest of any sublessee of such
nonprofit fair association if such leasehold interest would be taxable
if it were the primary lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States((: PROVIDED, That)). However, this exemption ((shall
apply)) applies only where it is determined that contract rent paid is
greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor ((shall be)) are deemed a single
leasehold interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days((:
PROVIDED, That)). For purposes of this subsection((,)):
(a) Successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially
continuous use of possession of the same property to the same lessee
((shall be)) are deemed a single leasehold interest((: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)).
(b) No leasehold interest ((shall)) may be deemed to give use or
possession for a period of less than thirty days solely by virtue of
the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use the property
or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional,
temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for persons with disabilities of all
ages in a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be
exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the
property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable
purpose, the leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040 ((shall)) must be imposed and ((shall)) must be apportioned
accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium owned or used by a minor league baseball team.
For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas"
has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section, and
includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(((16))) (17) All leasehold interests in public facilities
districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.
(((17))) (18) All leasehold interests in property that is: (a)
Owned by the United States government or a municipal corporation; (b)
listed on any federal or state register of historical sites; and (c)
wholly contained within a designated national historic reserve under 16
U.S.C. Sec. 461.
(((18))) (19)(a) All leasehold interests in the public or
entertainment areas of an amphitheater if a private entity is
responsible for one hundred percent of the cost of constructing the
amphitheater which is not reimbursed by the public owner, both the
public owner and the private lessee sponsor events at the facility on
a regular basis, the lessee is responsible under the lease or agreement
to operate and maintain the facility, and the amphitheater has a
seating capacity of over seventeen thousand reserved and general
admission seats and is in a county that had a population of over three
hundred fifty thousand, but less than four hundred twenty-five thousand
when the amphitheater first opened to the public.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment
areas" include box offices or other ticket sales areas, entrance gates,
ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession
areas, restaurants, hospitality areas, kitchens or other work areas
primarily servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest
room areas, press and media areas, control booths, broadcast and
production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit areas,
scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading, staging,
and servicing areas, seating areas including lawn seating areas and
suites, stages, and any other areas to which the public has access or
which are used for the production of the entertainment event or other
public usage, and any other personal property used for these purposes.
"Public or entertainment areas" does not include office areas used
predominately by the lessee.
(((19))) (20) All leasehold interests in real property used for the
placement of military housing meeting the requirements of RCW
84.36.665.

--- END ---