BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2009 c 556 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that
students have an opportunity to learn the essential academic learning
requirements in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.
Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and
social studies skills. Health and fitness includes, but is not limited
to, mental health and suicide prevention education. Beginning with the
2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit an
implementation verification report to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may not require school districts to use a classroom-based
assessment in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet
the requirements of this section and shall clearly communicate to
districts their option to use other strategies chosen by the district.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and the eleventh or
twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment
in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school districts
shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to complete at
least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment
may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with
the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit
implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based
assessments in civics.
(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report
only the information necessary to comply with this section.

--- END ---