BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that federal law
prohibits the hiring or continued employment of workers whom employers
know are unauthorized to work in the United States. Employers are
required to verify that new workers are authorized to work in the
United States by completing employment eligibility verification forms.
Employers who hire workers who were referred for employment by certain
state employment agencies are deemed to have complied with federal law
if they retain appropriate documentation of the referral, and that
documentation certifies that the agencies verified that the workers are
authorized to work in the United States. Employers who hire workers
knowing that they are not authorized to work in the United States face
civil and criminal penalties. These requirements protect jobs for
authorized United States workers, improve the accuracy of wage and tax
reporting, and help United States employers maintain a legal workforce.
(2) The legislature also finds that the employment security
department, through the worksource centers, screens and refers workers
to employers. These screening and referral services expedite the
reemployment of unemployed workers and the filling of employer
vacancies, and thereby contribute to the overall health of the state
economy. If the employment security department fails to verify that
referred workers are authorized to work in the United States,
unauthorized workers may be referred to employers and employers may be
exposed to substantial legal risks.
(3) The legislature intends to require the employment security
department to verify that referred workers are authorized to work in
the United States, and provide appropriate documentation to referred
workers and employers. These requirements will help reinforce the
objectives of federal law and improve the services provided by the
employment security department. They will also help build employers'
confidence in the employment security department and worker referral
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The employment security department shall refer for employment
only those individuals whom it has verified are United States workers.
When verifying the status of those individuals, the department shall
comply with the procedures specified in section 274A(b) of the
immigration and nationality act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b)). The
department shall also provide referred workers and employers with
appropriate documentation of the referral, which certifies that the
department has complied with the procedures specified in section
274A(b) of the immigration and nationality act (8 U.S.C. Sec.
1324a(b)).
(2) For the purpose of this section, "United States worker" means
a worker who is legally authorized to work in the United States.

--- END ---