BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in statute, no public
agency, as that term is defined in RCW 42.30.020, may provide only a
specified segment or segments of the general public with access to land
owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the public agency for the
purpose of hunting or fishing without providing the same access
opportunity to the general public. This section applies to rules or
regulations of the public agency, access contracts and agreements, and
all other forms of express or implied access permission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any public agency, as that term is defined
in RCW 42.30.020, that allows a specified segment or segments of the
general public to access land owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by
the public agency for the purpose of hunting or fishing as of the
effective date of this section must either suspend access permission to
the specified segment or segments or allow access to the general
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Any department listed in RCW 43.17.010 shall comply with section 1
of this act when granting access for hunting or fishing to any land
owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall comply with section 1 of this act when
granting access for hunting or fishing to any land owned, leased, or
otherwise controlled by the commission for hunting or fishing access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Multiple Use" to read as follows:
The department shall comply with section 1 of this act when
granting access for hunting or fishing to any land owned, leased, or
otherwise controlled by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
A county shall comply with section 1 of this act when granting
access for hunting or fishing to any land owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city shall comply with section 1 of this act when granting access
for hunting or fishing to any land owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city shall comply with section 1 of this act when granting
access for hunting or fishing to any land owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the code city.

--- END ---