BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.56.190 and 2003 c 379 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
By October 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the administrative
office of the courts shall distribute such funds to counties for county
clerk collection budgets as are appropriated by the legislature for
this purpose, using the funding formula recommended by the Washington
association of county officials. The administrative office of the
courts shall not deduct any amount for indirect or direct costs, and
shall distribute the entire amount appropriated by the legislature to
the counties for county clerk collection budgets. The legal financial
obligations funds shall not be subject to the administrative office of
the courts administrative budget reductions or other budget reductions
by the administrative office of the courts. Said funds shall not be
deemed to have been reduced unless specifically identified by the
legislature. The administrative office of the courts shall report on
the amounts distributed to counties to the appropriate committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2003, and annually
thereafter.
The administrative office of the courts may expend for the purposes
of billing for legal financial obligations, such funds as are
appropriated for the legislature for this purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.56.190 and 1994 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The real estate of any judgment debtor, and such as the judgment
debtor may acquire, not exempt by law, shall be held and bound to
satisfy any judgment of the district court of the United States
rendered in this state and any judgment of the supreme court, court of
appeals, superior court, or district court of this state, and every
such judgment shall be a lien thereupon to commence as provided in RCW
4.56.200 and to run for a period of not to exceed ten years from the
day on which such judgment was entered unless the ten-year period is
extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3), or unless the judgment
results from a criminal sentence for a crime that was committed on or
after July 1, 2000, in which case the lien will remain in effect until
the judgment is fully satisfied. As used in this chapter, real estate
shall not include the vendor's interest under a real estate contract
for judgments rendered after August 23, 1983. If a judgment debtor
owns real estate, subject to execution, jointly or in common with any
other person, the judgment shall be a lien on the interest of the
defendant only.
Personal property of the judgment debtor shall be held only from
the time it is actually levied upon.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.7606 and 1991 c 93 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department or county clerk may issue to any person or
entity, except to the department, an order to withhold and deliver
property of any kind, including but not restricted to, earnings that
are due, owing, or belonging to the offender, if the department or
county clerk has reason to believe that there is in the possession of
such person or entity, property that is due, owing, or belonging to the
offender. Such order to withhold and deliver may be issued when a
court-ordered legal financial obligation payment is past due:
(a) If an offender's judgment and sentence or a subsequent order to
pay includes a statement that other income-withholding action under
this chapter may be taken without further notice to the offender.
(b) If a judgment and sentence or a subsequent order to pay does
not include the statement that other income-withholding action under
this chapter may be taken without further notice to the offender but
the department or county clerk has served a notice on the offender
stating such requirements and authorizations. The service shall have
been made by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return
receipt.
(2) The order to withhold and deliver shall:
(a) Include the amount of the court-ordered legal financial
obligation;
(b) Contain a summary of moneys that may be exempt from the order
to withhold and deliver and a summary of the civil liability upon
failure to comply with the order; and
(c) Be served by personal service or by any form of mail requiring
a return receipt.
(3) The department or county clerk shall also, on or before the
date of service of the order to withhold and deliver, mail or cause to
be mailed by any form of mail requiring a return receipt, a copy of the
order to withhold and deliver to the offender at the offender's last
known post office address, or, in the alternative, a copy of the order
shall be personally served on the offender on or before the date of
service of the order or within two days thereafter. The copy of the
order shall be mailed or served together with an explanation of the
right to petition for judicial review. If the copy is not mailed or
served as this section provides, or if any irregularity appears with
respect to the mailing or service, the superior court, in its
discretion on motion of the offender promptly made and supported by
affidavit showing that the offender has suffered substantial injury due
to the failure to mail the copy, may set aside the order to withhold
and deliver.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.7607 and 1991 c 93 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or entity upon whom service has been made is hereby
required to:
(a) Answer the order to withhold and deliver within twenty days,
exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall
make true answers to the matters inquired of in the order; and
(b) Provide further and additional answers when requested by the
department or county clerk.
(2) Any person or entity in possession of any property that may be
subject to the order to withhold and deliver shall:
(a)(i) Immediately withhold such property upon receipt of the order
to withhold and deliver;
(ii) Deliver the property to the appropriate clerk of the court as
soon as the twenty-day answer period expires;
(iii) Continue to withhold earnings payable to the offender at each
succeeding disbursement interval and deliver amounts withheld from
earnings to the appropriate clerk of the court within ten days of the
date earnings are payable to the offender;
(iv) Inform the department or county clerk of the date the amounts
were withheld as requested under this section; or
(b) Furnish the appropriate clerk of the court a good and
sufficient bond, satisfactory to the clerk, conditioned upon final
determination of liability.
(3) Where money is due and owing under any contract of employment,
expressed or implied, or other employment arrangement, or is held by
any person or entity subject to withdrawal by the offender, the money
shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the
appropriate clerk of the court.
(4) Delivery to the appropriate clerk of the court of the money or
other property held or claimed shall satisfy the requirement and serve
as full acquittance of the order to withhold and deliver.
(5) The person or entity required to withhold and deliver the
earnings of a debtor under this action may deduct a processing fee from
the remainder of the offender's earnings, even if the remainder would
otherwise be exempt under RCW 9.94A.761. The processing fee may not
exceed:
(a) Ten dollars for the first disbursement to the appropriate clerk
of the court; and
(b) One dollar for each subsequent disbursement.
(6) A person or entity shall be liable to the obligee in an amount
equal to one hundred percent of the value of the court-ordered legal
financial obligation that is the basis of the order to withhold and
deliver, or the amount that should have been withheld, whichever amount
is less, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorneys' fees
if that person or entity fails or refuses to deliver property under the
order.
The department or county clerk is authorized to issue a notice of
debt pursuant to and to take appropriate action to collect the debt
under this chapter if a judgment has been entered as the result of an
action by the court against a person or entity based on a violation of
this section.
(7) Persons or entities delivering money or property to the
appropriate clerk of the court under this chapter shall not be held
liable for wrongful delivery.
(8) Persons or entities withholding money or property under this
chapter shall not be held liable for wrongful withholding.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.7608 and 1991 c 93 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
An order to withhold and deliver or any other income-withholding
action authorized by this chapter may be served on the main office of
a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union or on a branch
office of the financial institution. Service on the main office shall
be effective to attach the deposits of an offender in the financial
institution and compensation payable for personal services due the
offender from the financial institution. Service on a branch office
shall be effective to attach the deposits, accounts, credits, or other
personal property of the offender, excluding compensation payable for
personal services, in the possession or control of the particular
branch served.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 9.94A.760 and 9.94A.7601
through 9.94A.761, if the department or county clerk initiates
collection action against a joint bank account, with or without the
right of survivorship, or any other funds which are subject to the
community property laws of this state, notice shall be given to all
affected parties that the account or funds are subject to potential
withholding. Such notice shall be by first-class mail, return receipt
required, or by personal service and be given at least twenty calendar
days before withholding is made. Upon receipt of such notice, the
nonobligated person shall have ten calendar days to file a petition
with the department or the superior court contesting the withholding of
his or her interest in the account or funds. The department or county
clerk shall provide notice of the right of the filing of the petition
with the notice provided in this paragraph. If the petition is not
filed within the period provided for herein, the department or county
clerk is authorized to proceed with the collection action.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.7609 and 1991 c 93 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department or county clerk may issue a notice of debt in
order to enforce and collect a court-ordered legal financial obligation
debt through either a notice of payroll deduction or an order to
withhold and deliver.
(2) The notice of debt may be personally served upon the offender
or be mailed to the offender at his or her last known address by any
form of mail requiring a return receipt, demanding payment within
twenty days of the date of receipt.
(3) The notice of debt shall include:
(a) A statement of the total court-ordered legal financial
obligation and the amount to be paid each month.
(b) A statement that earnings are subject to a notice of payroll
deduction.
(c) A statement that earnings or property, or both, are subject to
an order to withhold and deliver.
(d) A statement that the net proceeds will be applied to the
satisfaction of the court-ordered legal financial obligation.
(4) Action to collect a court-ordered legal financial obligation by
notice of payroll deduction or an order to withhold and deliver shall
be lawful after twenty days from the date of service upon the offender
or twenty days from the receipt or refusal by the offender of the
notice of debt.
(5) The notice of debt will take effect only if the offender's
monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment is not paid
when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount payable for
one month is owned.
(6) The department or county clerk shall not be required to issue
or serve the notice of debt in order to enforce and collect a court-ordered legal financial obligation debt through either a notice of
payroll deduction or an order to withhold and deliver if either the
offender's judgment and sentence or a subsequent order to pay includes
a statement that income-withholding action under this chapter may be
taken without further notice to the offender.

--- END ---