BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An owner of land desiring current use classification under RCW
84.34.020 (2)(a), (b), or (c) or (3) may include adjacent land used by
an electric light and power company or gas company through an easement
or right-of-way in the acreage determination under RCW 84.34.020
(2)(a), (b), or (c) or (3). The land used by the company through an
easement or right-of-way is not subject the gross income, land use,
ownership, and other requirements under RCW 84.34.020 (2)(a), (b), or
(c) or (3). The land used by the electric light and power company or
gas company must be owned or have been previously owned by the owner
seeking current use classification.
(2) "Electric light and power company" and "gas company" have the
same meanings as provided in RCW 84.12.200. "Electric light and power
company" includes the Bonneville power administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.
(2) This act applies to land that is modified or disqualified under
the open space act on or after January 1, 2006.

--- END ---