BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.145 and 2006 c 135 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in
consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall develop
educational materials to be made available throughout the state to
inform parents, students, school districts, and other interested
community members about:
(((1))) (a) The laws related to sex offenses, including the legal
elements of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is a
victim, the consequences upon conviction, and sex offender
registration, community notification(([,])), and the classification of
sex offenders based on an assessment of the risk of reoffending;
(((2))) (b) How to recognize behaviors characteristic of sex
offenses and sex offenders;
(((3))) (c) How to prevent victimization, particularly that of
young children;
(((4))) (d) How to take advantage of community resources for
victims of sexual assault; and
(((5))) (e) Other information as deemed appropriate.
(2) By September 1, 2012, and biennially thereafter, the Washington
coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall review and update the
educational materials developed under subsection (1) of this section to
assure that they remain current and accurate, and are age-appropriate
for a variety of ages.
(3) Every public school that offers sexual health education must
assure that sexual health education includes age-appropriate
information about the legal elements of sexual offenses under chapter
9A.44 RCW where a minor is a victim and the consequences upon
conviction, as well as the other information required to be included in
informational materials prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. Public schools that offer sexual health education are
encouraged to incorporate the materials developed under subsection (1)
of this section into the curriculum.

--- END ---