BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state agency web
sites provide timely and useful information to the public about state
agency programs and services. These web sites are informative in
nature and do not serve as a public forum or a limited public forum for
the discussion or exchange of ideas. The legislature further finds
that allowing state agencies to sell internet advertisements for
display on their web pages could provide new sources of revenue for the
state, particularly for those state agencies that maintain high-traffic
web pages. Therefore, the legislature intends to allow a limited
number of state agencies to sell internet advertisements for display on
their web sites, provided that the advertisements are consistent with
the business mission of the agency as well any internet advertisement
guidelines adopted by the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, the department of revenue, the
department of transportation, the employment security department, the
state lottery, and the department of information services, on behalf of
access Washington, shall begin selling internet advertisements for
display on those agency's web sites. In locations where internet
advertisements are offered on a state agency web page, the web page
must also include a disclaimer, indicating that the inclusion of
internet advertisements does not imply endorsement by the state.
(2) Prior to selling internet advertisements, a state agency must
develop policy, style, and content guidelines for internet
advertisements that ensures that the subject matter of any internet
advertisement displayed by the agency directly relates to the business
mission and purpose of the agency.
(3) Revenue generated from the sale of internet advertisements
under this section must be allocated as follows:
(a) Any revenues that can be directly attributed to the incremental
cost of offering internet advertisements may be retained by the agency,
plus ten percent of such costs may be retained by the agency and
allocated by the director of the agency for the purpose of encouraging
innovation; and
(b) The agency must transfer any remaining revenues to the higher
education coordinating board to fund the passport to college promise
scholarship program. All funds transferred to the higher education
coordinating board must be exclusively used for foster youth and may
not be retained or expended by the higher education coordinating board
for any other purpose.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "internet advertisement"
refers to specific advertising methods on the internet, including
display or banner advertisements, sponsorships, and business listings
where goods or services might be purchased online.

--- END ---