BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may impose an additional regular property tax in an
amount not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
in the county.
(2) Any tax imposed under this section must be used for public
health purposes and must be deposited in the public health pooling fund
established under RCW 70.12.030.
(3) A county may refer the question on imposing the tax for public
health to a public vote.
(4) Ballot propositions must conform with RCW 29A.36.210.
(5) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax
authorized in this section.
(6) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first tax
levy imposed under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2010 c 106 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145,
67.38.130, 84.52.069, ((or)) 84.52.135, or section 1 of this act must
contain in substance the following:

"Will the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter may indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 or section 1 of this
act must contain in substance the following:

"Will the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.043 and 2009 c 551 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named ((shall be)) are as
follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts ((shall be)) are as
follows: (a) The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and
sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the
state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support
of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one
dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the
levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any
city or town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county
is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty
cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general county
purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district
within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has
its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.125; ((and)) (j) levies by counties for
transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; and (k) levies by
counties for public health purposes under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor ((shall)) must recompute and establish
a consolidated levy in the following manner:
(((1))) (a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county,
county road district, and city or town purposes ((shall)) must be
extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations
established by law; however any state levy ((shall)) takes precedence
over all other levies and ((shall)) may not be reduced for any purpose
other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the
levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105,
the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was
protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, ((and)) 84.52.140,
and section 1 of this act, the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies
((shall)) must be reduced as follows:
(((a))) (i) The levy imposed by a county under section 1 of this
act must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of true and fair value of any property or eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of true
and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under RCW
84.52.140 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
((shall be)) eliminated;
(((b))) (iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the
levy by a fire protection district that is protected under RCW
84.52.125 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
((shall be)) eliminated;
(((c))) (iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by
a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or ((must be)) eliminated;
(((d))) (v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by
a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or ((must be)) eliminated;
(((e))) (vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the
levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW
84.52.120 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
((shall be)) eliminated;
(((f))) (vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies
imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro
rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or ((shall be)) eliminated; and
(((g))) (viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or eliminated.
(((2))) (b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these
limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such
property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the
consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:
(((a))) (i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those
junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145,
35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated;
(((b))) (ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of
flood control zone districts ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;
(((c))) (iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all
other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts,
regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts,
((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(((d))) (iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or
after January 1, 2002, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;
(((e))) (v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to
fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c) ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and
(((f))) (vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for
fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro
rata basis or eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.

--- END ---