BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.380 and 2009 c 183 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual ((annual)) amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right during the peak year of water use within the most recent
fifteen-year period of beneficial use, reduced by the estimated annual
amount of return flows((, averaged over the two years of greatest use
within the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of
the water right)). Before any transfer of such right to use water or
change of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use
can be made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change,
shall file a written application therefor with the department, and the
application shall not be granted until notice of the application is
published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such
transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for
such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued
shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the
county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in
the original certificate or permit to divert water. ((The)) Any time
period that the water right was banked under RCW 90.92.070, in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, or the water
right was subject to an agreement to not divert under RCW 90.92.050
will not be included in the most recent ((five-year)) fifteen-year
period of ((continuous)) beneficial use for the purpose of determining
the annual consumptive quantity under this section. ((If)) Any time
period that the water right has not been used during the ((previous
five years)) most recent fifteen-year period, but the nonuse of which
qualifies for one or more of the statutory good causes or exceptions to
relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140 and 90.44.520, ((the period of nonuse))
is not included in the most recent ((five-year)) fifteen-year period of
((continuous)) beneficial use for purposes of determining the annual
consumptive quantity of water under this section.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water right
that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or
a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.
(10) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual ((annual)) amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right during the peak year of water use within the most recent
fifteen-year period, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows((, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right)). Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of
the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be
made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall
file a written application therefor with the department, and the
application shall not be granted until notice of the application is
published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such
transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for
such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued
shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the
county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in
the original certificate or permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.031 and 1969 ex.s. c 284 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as used in RCW 90.14.031 through 90.14.121
shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Person" shall mean an individual, partnership, association,
public or private corporation, city or other municipality, county, or
a state agency, and the United States of America when claiming water
rights established under the laws of the state of Washington.
(2) "Beneficial use" shall include, but not be limited to, use for
domestic water, irrigation, fish, shellfish, game and other aquatic
life, municipal, recreation, industrial water, generation of electric
power, and navigation. For the purposes of this chapter, beneficial
use means or refers to the peak year of water use during the most
recent fifteen-year period.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.14.043 and 1985 c 435 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any time restrictions imposed by the provisions
of chapter 90.14 RCW, a person may file a claim pursuant to RCW
90.14.041 if such person obtains a certification from the pollution
control hearings board as provided in this section.
(2) A certification shall be issued by the pollution control
hearings board if, upon petition to the board, it is shown to the
satisfaction of the board that:
(a) Waters of the state have been applied to beneficial use
continuously (with no period of nonuse exceeding ((five)) fifteen
consecutive years) in the case of surface water beginning not later
than June 7, 1917, and in the case of groundwater beginning not later
than June 7, 1945, or
(b) Waters of the state have been applied to beneficial use
continuously (with no period of nonuse exceeding ((five)) fifteen
consecutive years) from the date of entry of a court decree confirming
a water right and any failure to register a claim resulted from a
reasonable misinterpretation of the requirements as they related to
such court decreed rights.
(3) The board shall have jurisdiction to accept petitions for
certification from any person through September 1, 1985, and not
thereafter.
(4) A petition for certification shall include complete information
on the claim pursuant to RCW 90.14.051 (1) through (8), and any such
information as the board may require.
(5) The department of ecology is directed to accept for filing any
claim certified by the board as provided in subsection (2) of this
section. The department of ecology, upon request of the board, may
provide assistance to the board pertinent to any certification
petition.
(6) A certification by the pollution control hearings board or a
filing with the department of ecology of a claim under this section
shall not constitute a determination or confirmation that a water right
exists.
(7) The provisions of RCW 90.14.071 shall have no applicability to
certified claims filed pursuant to this section.
(8) This section shall have no applicability to groundwaters
resulting from the operations of reclamation projects.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
When it appears to the department of ecology that a person entitled
to the use of water has not beneficially used his or her water right as
defined in RCW 90.14.031 or some portion thereof, and it appears that
said right has or may have reverted to the state because of such
nonuse, as provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180, the
department of ecology shall notify such person by order: PROVIDED,
That where a company, association, district, or the United States has
filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060 for the
total benefits of those served by it, the notice shall be served on
such company, association, district or the United States and not upon
any of its individual water users who may not have used the water or
some portion thereof which they were entitled to use. The order shall
contain: (1) A description of the water right, including the
approximate location of the point of diversion, the general description
of the lands or places where such waters were used, the water source,
the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the apparent authority
upon which the right is based; (2) a statement that unless sufficient
cause be shown on appeal the water right will be declared relinquished;
and (3) a statement that such order may be appealed to the pollution
control hearings board. Any person aggrieved by such an order may
appeal it to the pollution control hearings board pursuant to RCW
43.21B.310. The order shall be served by registered or certified mail
to the last known address of the person and be posted at the point of
division or withdrawal. The order by itself shall not alter the
recipient's right to use water, if any.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.14.140 and 2009 c 183 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of ((five))
fifteen or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result
of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150;
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW;
(i) If such a right is involved in an approved local water plan
created under RCW 90.92.090, provided the right is subject to an
agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or provided the right is
banked under RCW 90.92.070.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of ((five))
fifteen or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result
of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; or
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature
prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by
general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails,
without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof, and said right or portion thereof shall revert to the
state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for
appropriation in accordance with RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c 233 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state by
virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or
watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without
sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to
withdraw or divert said water for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to the
state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for
appropriation in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c 109 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the
state through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330,
90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same, or who voluntarily
fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of
said right to withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen successive
years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right or
portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by
said right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with
RCW 90.03.250. All certificates hereafter issued by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this
section by reference.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.92.070 and 2009 c 183 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may establish a mechanism to bank water for the
holders of water rights within the planning area to voluntarily deposit
them on a temporary or permanent basis.
(2) The board has the following authority regarding banked water in
the planning area:
(a) The board may accept a surface water right or a groundwater
right on a permanent or temporary basis under terms and conditions
agreed upon by the water rights holder and the board.
(b) On a temporary or permanent basis, the board may accept a water
right, or portion thereof, that will be made available under local
water plans for stream flow enhancement under the terms of the local
water plan, as provided in this chapter.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the board must
accept a water right temporarily banked for instream flow without
conducting a review of the extent and validity of the water right.
Such a water right may not thereafter be authorized for any other
purposes. A banked water right that has not been tentatively
determined as to its extent and validity is not entitled to be
protected from impairment by another water right.
(d) The board may manage a water right that has been banked as
mitigation for impairment to instream flows and other existing water
rights. However, the water right may only be available for mitigation
to the extent the department determines the water right is valid and
use of the water right for mitigation will not cause detriment or
injury to existing water rights.
(3)(a) A water right banked on a temporary basis remains in the
ownership of the water rights holder and not the state of Washington or
the board.
(b) A water right banked on a permanent basis must be transferred
to the state of Washington as a trust water right consistent with RCW
90.42.080.
(4) A water right or portion of a water right banked under this
chapter is not subject to loss by forfeiture under RCW 90.14.130
through 90.14.200. When a temporary water right is withdrawn from
banking, the time period that the water right was banked may not be
calculated as time water was not used for purposes of RCW 90.14.160,
90.14.170, and 90.14.180.
(5) When a temporarily deposited water right is withdrawn from
banking, the time period that the water right was banked may not be
included in the ((five)) fifteen years of prior water use for purposes
of applications to add acreage or purposes of water use under RCW
90.03.380(1).
(6) Nothing in this chapter forecloses or diminishes the rights of
any person to apply to the department to transfer a water right to the
state trust water rights program under the authority of chapter 90.42
RCW or to apply for a change of a water right to the department or to
a water conservancy board authorized under chapter 90.80 RCW.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This act applies to all administrative applications, petitions,
claims, actions, adjudications, determinations, orders, or other
decisions of the department of ecology or pollution control hearings
board involving any matter that was commenced prior to or is pending on
the effective date of this section, and to the determination of any
judicial action arising under this chapter in which no final
nonappealable judicial order has been entered prior to the effective
date of this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if a senior water
right holder objects to the application of this act to a matter, and it
is determined that the objecting party holds an existing water right
that would be impaired by the application of this act to the matter.
In such cases, the law as it existed prior to the effective date of
this section applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 2 and 7 of this act take effect
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---