BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.18.210 and 2007 c 313 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop a child
support order summary report form to provide for the reporting of
summary information in every case in which a child support order is
entered or modified either judicially or administratively. The child
support order summary report must be included at the top of the first
page of the Washington state child support worksheets, but must not be
considered part of the worksheets.
(2) The child support order summary report form must include all
data the department of social and health services division of child
support has determined necessary,)) In order to perform the required
quadrennial review of the Washington state child support guidelines
under RCW 26.19.025((.)), the division of child support must ((store
and maintain all of the order summary report information and)) prepare
a report at least every four years using data compiled from child
support court and administrative orders. The report must include all
information the division of child support determines is necessary to
perform the quadrennial review. On a monthly basis, the clerk of the
court must forward all child support worksheets that have been filed
with the court to the division of child support.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.19.025 and 2007 c 313 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2011 and every four years thereafter, the division
of child support shall convene a work group to review the child support
guidelines and the child support review report prepared under RCW
26.19.026 and 26.18.210 and determine if the application of the child
support guidelines results in appropriate support orders. Membership
of the work group shall be determined as provided in this subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(c) The governor, in consultation with the division of child
support, shall appoint the following members:
(i) The director of the division of child support;
(ii) A professor of law specializing in family law;
(iii) A representative from the Washington state bar association's
family law executive committee;
(iv) An economist;
(v) A representative of the tribal community;
(vi) Two representatives from the superior court judges
association, including a superior court judge and a court commissioner
who is familiar with child support issues;
(vii) A representative from the administrative office of the
courts;
(viii) A prosecutor appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(ix) A representative from legal services;
(x) Three noncustodial parents, each of whom may be a
representative of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual,
with at least one representing the interests of low-income,
noncustodial parents;
(xi) Three custodial parents, each of whom may be a representative
of an advocacy group, an attorney, or an individual, with at least one
representing the interests of low-income, custodial parents; and
(xii) An administrative law judge appointed by the office of
administrative hearings.
(2) Appointments to the work group shall be made by December 1,
2010, and every four years thereafter. The governor shall appoint the
chair from among the work group membership.
(3) The division of child support shall provide staff support to
the work group, and shall carefully consider all input received from
interested organizations and individuals during the review process.
(4) The work group may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for operation of the work group.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) By October 1, 2011, and every four years thereafter, the work
group shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature,
including recommendations for legislative action, if necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 26.09.173 (Modification of child support order -- Child
support order summary report) and 2007 c 313 s 2 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 2
s 23; and
(2) RCW 26.10.195 (Modification of child support order -- Child
support order summary report) and 2007 c 313 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 2
s 24.

--- END ---