BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that health insurance
rate increases in Washington state have resulted in premiums increasing
faster than incomes. While the legislature acknowledges that a vital
health insurance market is essential to Washington's economy and its
citizens, the accumulation of capital and surplus for nonprofit health
insurance carriers exceeds two billion dollars even as they request
rate increases. By requiring carriers to propose rates that
acknowledge actual net underwriting gain exceeding the gain originally
projected by the carrier, premiums will more closely align with the
benefits they confer without providing a windfall to the nonprofit
health carrier at the consumer's expense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Carrier" means a nonprofit health care service contractor or
health maintenance organization that offers a health plan.
(b) "Contribution to surplus, contingency charges, or risk charges"
means the portion of the projected earned premium not associated
directly with claims or expenses.
(c) "Surplus" means the amount reported on line 31, page 3 of the
2010 health annual statement filed with the commissioner or the
comparable amount on any subsequent revision of the health annual
statement.
(2) For each proposed rate filing submitted by a nonprofit health
carrier for either the individual or small group markets, the filing
must include a determination of whether the carrier's surplus exceeds
the three month average of the amount reported on line 16, page 4 of
the 2010 health annual statement, or the comparable amount reported on
any subsequent revision of the health annual statement.
(3) If the carrier's surplus exceeds the three-month average, the
carrier must submit the following information to the commissioner with
its proposed rate filing:
(a) The actual net underwriting gain for the line of business for
the three calendar years preceding the year in which the rate filing
being reviewed is submitted, as reported on the additional data
statement form filed with the health annual statement;
(b) A comparison of the underwriting gains reported under (a) of
this subsection to the prior projections of contribution to surplus,
contingency charges or risk charges, or any combination thereof, that
were submitted with its proposed rate filings for the three calendar
years preceding the year in which the rate filing being reviewed is
submitted; and
(c) For each of the three preceding calendar years, with its
proposed rate filing, a report on investment income based on the total
of line 25, page 4 of the health annual statement, apportioned by
premium volume. This investment income must be included in the
calculation of actual net underwriting gain.
(4) If the total of the actual net underwriting gain is greater
than the total of the proposed contribution to surplus, contingency
charges, or risk charges, or any combination thereof, the commissioner
must disallow the rate unless the carrier has adjusted its proposed
rate:
(a) By reducing the overall rate by the three-year averaged
difference between the gain and proposed contribution; and
(b) By reducing its proposed contribution to surplus, contingency
charges, or risk charges, or any combination thereof, to zero.
(5) If the total of the actual net underwriting gain is the same or
less than the total of the proposed contribution to surplus,
contingency charges, or risk charges, or any combination thereof, the
commissioner must disallow the rate unless the carrier has reduced its
proposed contribution to surplus, contingency charges, or risk charges,
or any combination thereof, to zero.
(6) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsections (2)
through (4) of this section, the commissioner must disallow a proposed
rate if the carrier:
(a) Does not recognize investment earnings, allocated
proportionally to each product line based on the ratio of its premium
volume to the entire premium collected by the company, in its
calculation or in the development of its proposed rates;
(b) Includes fines, remittances, penalties, administrative
sanctions, or similar impositions paid by the carrier, directly or
indirectly, in the calculation of rates; or
(c) Includes, directly or indirectly, any net loss incurred on a
self-funded plan for which it performs only administrative services in
the calculation or development of rates for underwritten health plans.
(7) All other statutes and rules related to rate filing for the
individual and small group plan market remain in effect to the extent
that they are consistent with this section.
(8) If a proposed rate filing is for a line of business without a
three-year history, and the carrier's surplus exceeds the standard set
forth in this section, the carrier may not propose a contribution to
surplus, contingency charges, or risk charges, or any combination
thereof, during the first three years of the line's operation.
(9) The commissioner may approve a rate that would otherwise be
disapproved if the commissioner finds that failure to approve the
proposed rate unreasonably impairs the financial health of the carrier.
The commissioner may waive or modify these requirements upon a finding
that a line of business contains or involves unique provisions or
circumstances and that the requirements represent an extraordinary
administrative burden on the carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---