BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing ((through))
thirty days past the date of final adjournment, and during the period
beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and
continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or
a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state
legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund,
to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before
a regular legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is
postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.560 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing ((through))
thirty days past the date of final adjournment, and during the period
beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and
continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or
a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state
legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund,
to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before
a regular legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is
postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---