BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is
critically important that scientific information used to inform public
policy be of the highest quality and integrity.
(2) The legislature further finds that the scientific information
used in support of or in justification for public policy actions in the
state of Washington can be of varying quality and integrity.
(3) The legislature further finds that a perceived lack of quality
and integrity of scientific information is a key factor leading to
litigation.
(4) The legislature further finds that the generally accepted
approach to ensuring the quality and integrity of scientific
information is the conduct of independent peer review by qualified
experts.
(5) The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has
not previously adopted a uniform standard for the use of independent
peer review by qualified experts.
(6) The legislature further finds that the only way to ensure that
agencies use scientifically credible information is for all agencies to
use the generally accepted practice of peer review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Natural resources agency" means the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of
ecology, and the department of agriculture.
(2) "Peer reviewed science" means information developed using the
scientific method for which the following factors are true:
(a) The scientific information is provided by a qualified,
scientific professional or professionals with issue-appropriate
expertise based on the professional's credentials, certifications,
earned advanced degrees, years of experience, recognized leadership in
an appropriate scholarly area, formal training, and recognized ability
to produce peer reviewed professional literature;
(b) The scientific information has been subjected to independent
peer review by at least three reviewers who are qualified and are
independent with no conflict of interest. Independent peer review may
be performed by reputable scientific journals, scholarly organizations
such as the national academies, commissioned by the relevant agency, or
commissioned by qualified entities whose interests will be affected by
the action;
(c) The methods used to obtain the information are clearly stated,
standardized for the pertinent scientific discipline, and are able to
be replicated;
(d) The conclusions underlying the information are based on
reasonable and logical assumptions supported by other studies and
consistent with the data presented;
(e) The data underlying the information have been analyzed using
the appropriate statistical or quantitative methods;
(f) The information has been placed in a proper context and is
appropriately framed with respect to the prevailing body of pertinent
scientific knowledge; and
(g) The information is based on assumptions, analytical techniques,
and conclusions that are clearly stated and well-referenced with
citations to credible literature and other pertinent existing
information.
(3) "Significant agency action" means an act of a natural resources
agency that meets one of the following:
(a) Results in substantive requirements for a nonstate actor, the
violation of which subjects the violator to penalty or sanction;
(b) Establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard
for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or
(c) Results in significant amendments to an existing policy or
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this
act, all natural resources agencies are required to demonstrate the use
of peer reviewed science before or simultaneous with taking a
significant agency action.
(2) The use of peer reviewed science must be evidenced by the
creation and maintenance of a public record that identifies:
(a) The scientific literature or other sources relied upon by the
natural resources agency; and
(b) Any scientific information reviewed by the natural resources
agency that does not meet the definition of peer reviewed science,
which must be accompanied by a narrative explanation of why that
information was or was not included.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Scientific studies may be brought
forward for consideration in support of a significant natural resources
agency action under section 3 of this act by a participating
governmental entity, academic institution, qualified participating
stakeholder group, or participating individual. These studies must be
demonstrated to meet the requirements of peer reviewed science prior to
being relied upon by a natural resources agency.
(2) For scientific studies where the information has not been
critically reviewed by other persons with qualified, relevant
scientific expertise, the natural resources agency implementing the
provisions of section 3 of this act shall obtain and document fully
independent, rigorous peer review by other persons with qualified,
relevant scientific expertise.
(3) Reviews conducted in compliance with this section may not be
performed by an employee of the natural resources agency responsible
for the provisions or enforcement of the significant agency action
informed by the science being reviewed or an employee of or an
affiliate of the entity that performed or helped fund the science being
reviewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A natural resources agency may proceed
with interim significant agency actions without fulfilling the
requirement for documenting the use of peer reviewed science under
section 3 of this act if:
(a) The natural resources agency is responding to an emergency
critical need or event imminently affecting public health or safety or
critical public infrastructure; and
(b) There is a lack of peer reviewed science available or
insufficient time to access the peer reviewed science without further
exacerbating the emergency critical need.
(2) Any agency action made using the provisions of subsection (1)
of this section is interim in nature and is strictly limited in scope
and effect to address the imminent emergency critical need until the
necessary peer reviewed science is either collected and documented, or
generated, so as to comply with the provisions of section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 34.05 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
standards for the use of science to support public policy.

--- END ---