BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Efforts are needed across the health care system to improve the
quality and cost–effectiveness of health care services provided in
Washington state and to improve care outcomes for patients.
(b) Some health care services currently provided in Washington
state present significant safety, efficacy, or cost-effectiveness
concerns. Substantial variation in practice patterns or high
utilization trends can be indicators of poor quality and potential
waste in the health care system, without producing better care outcomes
for patients.
(c) State purchased health care programs should partner with
private health carriers, third-party purchasers, and health care
providers in shared efforts to improve quality, health outcomes, and
cost-effectiveness of care.
(2) The legislature declares that collaboration among state
purchased health care programs, private health carriers, third-party
purchasers, and health care providers to identify appropriate
strategies that will increase the effectiveness of health care
delivered in Washington state is in the best interest of the public.
The legislature therefore intends to exempt from state antitrust laws,
and to provide immunity from federal antitrust laws through the state
action doctrine, for activities undertaken pursuant to efforts designed
and implemented under this act that might otherwise be constrained by
such laws. The legislature does not intend and does not authorize any
person or entity to engage in activities or to conspire to engage in
activities that would constitute per se violations of state and federal
antitrust laws including, but not limited to, agreements among
competing health care providers or health carriers as to the price or
specific level of reimbursement for health care services.
(3) The legislature intends that the Robert Bree collaborative
established in section 3 of this act provide a mechanism through which
public and private health care purchasers, health carriers, and
providers can work together to identify effective means to improve
quality health outcomes and cost-effectiveness of care. It is not the
intent of the legislature to mandate payment or coverage decisions by
private health care purchasers or carriers.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.250.010 and 2009 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced diagnostic imaging services" means magnetic resonance
imaging services, computed tomography services, positron emission
tomography services, cardiac nuclear medicine services, ultrasound, and
similar new imaging services.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Collaborative" means the Robert Bree collaborative established
in section 3 of this act.
(4) "Payor" means ((public purchasers and)) carriers licensed under
chapters 48.21, 48.41, 48.44, 48.46, and 48.62 RCW.
(((4) "Public purchaser" means the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the department of labor and
industries, the authority, and the Washington state health insurance
pool)) (5) "Self-funded health plan" means an employer-sponsored health
plan or Taft-Hartley plan that is not provided through a fully insured
health carrier.
(((5))) (6) "State purchased health care" has the same meaning as
in RCW 41.05.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.250 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the authority granted in RCW 41.05.013, the
authority shall convene a collaborative, to be known as the Robert Bree
collaborative. The collaborative shall identify health care services
for which there are substantial variation in practice patterns or high
utilization trends in Washington state, without producing better care
outcomes for patients, that are indicators of poor quality and
potential waste in the health care system. On an annual basis, the
collaborative shall identify up to three health care services it will
address.
(2) For each health care service identified, the collaborative
shall:
(a) Analyze and identify evidence-based best practice approaches to
improve quality and reduce variation in use of the service, including
identification of guidelines or protocols applicable to the health care
service. In evaluating guidelines, the collaborative should identify
the highest quality guidelines based upon the most rigorous and
transparent methods for identification, rating, and translation of
evidence into practice recommendations.
(b) Identify data collection and reporting necessary to develop
baseline health service utilization rates and to measure the impact of
strategies adopted under this section. Methods for data collection and
reporting should strive to minimize cost and administrative effort
related to data collection and reporting wherever possible, including
the use of existing data resources and nonfee-based tools for
reporting.
(c) Identify strategies to increase use of the evidence-based best
practice approaches identified under (a) of this subsection in both
state purchased and privately purchased health care plans. Strategies
considered should include, but are not limited to: Identifying goals
for appropriate utilization rates and reduction in practice variation
among providers; peer-to-peer consultation or second opinions; provider
feedback reports; use of patient decision aids; incentives for
appropriate use of health care services; centers of excellence or other
provider qualification standards; quality improvement systems; and
service utilization and outcomes reporting, including public reporting.
In developing strategies, the collaborative should strongly consider
related efforts of organizations such as the Puget Sound health
alliance, the Washington state hospital association, the national
quality forum, the joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations, the national committee for quality assurance, the
foundation for health care quality, and, where appropriate, more
focused quality improvement efforts, such as the Washington state
perinatal advisory committee and the Washington state surgical care and
outcomes assessment program. The collaborative shall provide an
opportunity for public comment on the strategies chosen before
finalizing their recommendations.
(3) For health care services identified by the collaborative for
which evidence about benefit and harm is inadequate or unavailable, the
collaborative may endorse coverage with evidence development. Such
coverage shall include items or services that have potential benefit
but lack adequate evidence about either the extent of potential benefit
or harm or the conditions or patients most likely to benefit or suffer
adverse consequences. In such cases, coverage may be conditioned on
the collection of additional clinical data that will inform patient-oriented outcomes. Data collection must meet quality criteria such as
clinical registry or trial standards. Data collection must be designed
to inform clinical outcomes relevant to establishing coverage and be
time limited, with results available to the collaborative. Funding for
data collection must be obtained from sources other than the state
general fund.
(4) The governor shall appoint twenty members of the collaborative,
who must include:
(a) Two members, selected from health carriers or third-party
administrators that have the most fully insured and self-funded covered
lives in Washington state. The count of total covered lives includes
enrollment in all companies included in their holding company system.
Each health carrier or third-party administrator is entitled to no more
than a single position on the collaborative to represent all entities
under common ownership or control;
(b) One member, selected from the health maintenance organization
having the most fully insured and self-insured covered lives in
Washington state. The count of total lives includes enrollment in all
companies included in its holding company system. Each health
maintenance organization is entitled to no more than a single position
on the collaborative to represent all entities under common ownership
or control;
(c) One member, chosen from among three nominees submitted by the
association of Washington health plans, representing national health
carriers that operate in multiple states outside of the Pacific
Northwest;
(d) Four physicians, selected from lists of nominees submitted by
the Washington state medical association, as follows:
(i) Two physicians, one of whom must be a practicing primary care
physician, representing large multispecialty clinics with fifty or more
physicians, selected from a list of five nominees. The primary care
physician must be either a family physician, an internal medicine
physician, or a general pediatrician; and
(ii) Two physicians, one of whom must be a practicing primary care
physician, representing clinics with less than fifty physicians,
selected from a list of five nominees. The primary care physician must
be either a family physician, an internal medicine physician, or a
general pediatrician;
(e) One osteopathic physician, selected from a list of five
nominees submitted by the Washington state osteopathic medical
association;
(f) Two physicians representing the largest hospital-based
physician systems in the state, selected from a list of five nominees
submitted jointly by the Washington state medical association and the
Washington state hospital association;
(g) Three members representing hospital systems, at least one of
whom is responsible for quality, submitted from a list of six nominees
from the Washington state hospital association;
(h) Three members, representing self-funded purchasers of health
care services for employees;
(i) Two members, representing state purchased health care programs;
and
(j) One member, representing the Puget Sound health alliance.
(5) The governor shall appoint the chair of the collaborative.
(6) The collaborative shall add members to its membership or
establish clinical committees on an ad hoc basis for the purpose of
acquiring clinical expertise needed to accomplish its responsibilities
under this section and RCW 70.250.010 and 70.250.030. Membership of
clinical committees should reflect clinical expertise in the area of
health care services being addressed by the collaborative, including
clinicians involved in related quality improvement or comparative
effectiveness efforts, as well as nonphysician practitioners.
(7) Permanent and ad hoc members of the collaborative or any of its
committees may not have personal financial conflicts of interest that
could substantially influence or bias their participation. If a
collaborative or committee member has a personal financial conflict of
interest with respect to a particular health care service being
addressed by the collaborative, he or she shall disclose such an
interest. The collaborative must determine whether the member should
be recused from any deliberations or decisions related to that service.
(8) A person serving on the collaborative or any of its clinical
committees shall be immune from civil liability, whether direct or
derivative, for any decisions made in good faith while pursuing
activities associated with the work of collaborative or any of its
clinical committees.
(9) The collaborative shall actively solicit federal or private
funds and in-kind contributions necessary to complete its work in a
timely fashion. Available state funds may be used to support the work
of the collaborative when the collaborative has selected a health care
service that is a high utilization or high-cost service in state
purchased health care programs or the health care service is undergoing
evaluation in one or more state purchased health care programs and
coordination will reduce duplication of efforts. The collaborative
shall not begin the work described in this section unless sufficient
funds are received from private or federal resources, or available
state funds.
(10) No member of the collaborative or its committees may be
compensated for his or her service.
(11) The proceedings of the collaborative shall be open to the
public and notice of meetings shall be provided at least ten days prior
to a meeting.
(12) The collaborative shall report to the governor and legislature
regarding the health services areas it has chosen, strategies adopted,
and available information related to the impact of strategies adopted
in the previous three years on the cost and quality of care provided in
Washington state. The initial report must be submitted by November 15,
2011, with annual reports thereafter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.250.030 and 2009 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than September 1, 2009, all state purchased health
care programs shall, except for state purchased health care services
that are purchased from or through health carriers as defined in RCW
48.43.005, implement evidence-based best practice guidelines or
protocols applicable to advanced diagnostic imaging services, and the
decision support tools to implement the guidelines or protocols,
identified under ((RCW 70.250.020)) section 3 of this act.
(2) By January 1, 2012, and every January 1st thereafter, all state
purchased health care programs must implement the evidence-based best
practice guidelines or protocols and strategies identified under
section 3 of this act. This requirement applies to health carriers, as
defined in RCW 48.43.005 and to entities acting as third-party
administrators that contract with state purchased health care programs
to provide or administer health benefits for enrollees of those
programs. If the collaborative fails to reach consensus within the
time frames identified in this section and section 3 of this act, state
purchased health care programs may pursue implementation of evidence-based strategies on their own initiative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 70.250.020 (Work group -- Members -- Duties -- Report -- Expiration of work group) and 2009 c 258 s 2 are each
repealed.

--- END ---