BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2009 c 568 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(5) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(6) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as
consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a
nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollee.
(7) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services;
(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan; and
(vii) Who is not receiving ((medical assistance administered by the
department of social and health services)) or has not been determined
to be currently eligible for federally financed categorically needy or
medically needy programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, except as provided
under RCW 70.47.110;
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through
(iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection and who is a foster parent
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the
time of enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection
and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than
two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services.
(10) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.060 and 2009 c 568 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services, and organ transplant services. All
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed
health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for
premium payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize
proven preventive and primary health care and shall include all
services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care.
However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are
eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not
contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain
continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of
age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who
choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for their
dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate. The
administrator shall encourage enrollees who have been continually
enrolled on basic health for a period of one year or more to complete
a health risk assessment and participate in programs approved by the
administrator that may include wellness, smoking cessation, and chronic
disease management programs. In approving programs, the administrator
shall consider evidence that any such programs are proven to improve
enrollee health status.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(((6))) (9)(b). Premiums due
for foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(f) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(g) To collect from all public employees a voluntary opt-in
donation of varying amounts through a monthly or one-time payroll
deduction as provided for in RCW 41.04.230. The donation must be
deposited in the health services account established in RCW 43.72.900
to be used for the sole purpose of maintaining enrollment capacity in
the basic health plan.
The administrator shall send an annual notice to state employees
extending the opportunity to participate in the opt-in donation program
for the purpose of saving enrollment slots for the basic health plan.
The first such notice shall be sent to public employees no later than
June 1, 2009.
The notice shall include monthly sponsorship levels of fifteen
dollars per month, thirty dollars per month, fifty dollars per month,
and any other amounts deemed reasonable by the administrator. The
sponsorship levels shall be named "safety net contributor," "safety net
hero," and "safety net champion" respectively. The donation amounts
provided shall be tied to the level of coverage the employee will be
purchasing for a working poor individual without access to health care
coverage.
The administrator shall ensure that employees are given an
opportunity to establish a monthly standard deduction or a one-time
deduction towards the basic health plan donation program. The basic
health plan donation program shall be known as the "save the safety net
program."
The donation permitted under this subsection may not be collected
from any public employee who does not actively opt in to the donation
program. Written notification of intent to discontinue participation
in the donation program must be provided by the public employee at
least fourteen days prior to the next standard deduction.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program. To prevent the risk of overexpenditure, the administrator may
disenroll persons receiving subsidies from the program based on
criteria adopted by the administrator. The criteria may include:
Length of continual enrollment on the program, income level, or
eligibility for other coverage. The administrator shall ((first
attempt to)) identify enrollees who are eligible for other coverage,
and, working with the department of social and health service as
provided in RCW 70.47.010(5)(d), transition enrollees currently
eligible for ((medical assistance)) federally financed categorically
needy or medically needy programs administered under chapter 74.09 RCW
to that coverage. The administrator shall develop criteria for persons
disenrolled under this subsection to reapply for the program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to give priority to members of the Washington national guard
and reserves who served in Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi
Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their spouses and dependents,
for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan, to establish
appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be
necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. The application is also considered an application for
medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW and must include a social
security number, if available, for each family member requesting
coverage. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100
through 74.13.145)) 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080 shall not be counted
toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(15) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(20) To give priority in enrollment to persons who disenrolled from
the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and subsequently became
ineligible for medicaid coverage.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.035 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 29 and 2010 c 94 s
22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funds, medical care services may be
provided to recipients of disability lifeline benefits, persons denied
disability lifeline benefits under RCW 74.04.005(5)(b) or 74.04.655 who
otherwise meet the requirements of RCW 74.04.005(5)(a), and recipients
of alcohol and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50
RCW, in accordance with medical eligibility requirements established by
the department. ((To the extent authorized in the operating budget,))
Enrollment in medical care services may not result in expenditures that
exceed the amount that has been appropriated in the operating budget.
If it appears that continued enrollment will result in expenditures
exceeding the appropriated level for a particular fiscal year, the
department may freeze new enrollment and establish a waiting list of
eligible persons who may receive benefits only when sufficient funds
are available. Upon implementation of a federal medicaid 1115 waiver
providing federal matching funds for medical care services, ((these
services also may be provided to persons who have been terminated from
disability lifeline benefits under RCW 74.04.005(5)(h))) persons
subject to termination of disability lifeline benefits under RCW
74.04.005(5)(h) remain enrolled in medical care services and persons
subject to denial of disability lifeline benefits under RCW
74.04.005(5)(h) remain eligible for medical care services.
(2) Determination of the amount, scope, and duration of medical
care services shall be limited to coverage as defined by the
department, except that adult dental, and routine foot care shall not
be included unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(3) The department shall enter into performance-based contracts
with one or more managed health care systems for the provision of
medical care services to recipients of disability lifeline benefits.
The contract must provide for integrated delivery of medical and mental
health services.
(4) The department shall establish standards of assistance and
resource and income exemptions, which may include deductibles and co-insurance provisions. In addition, the department may include a
prohibition against the voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for assistance.
(5) Residents of skilled nursing homes, intermediate care
facilities, and intermediate care facilities for persons with
intellectual disabilities, as that term is described by federal law,
who are eligible for medical care services shall be provided medical
services to the same extent as provided to those persons eligible under
the medical assistance program.
(6) ((Payments made by the department under this program shall be
the limit of expenditures for medical care services solely from state
funds.
(7))) Eligibility for medical care services shall commence with the
date of certification for disability lifeline benefits or the date of
eligibility for alcohol and drug addiction services provided under
chapter 74.50 RCW.

--- END ---