BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.040 and 2007 c 348 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A district may improve its lands by dredging, filling,
bulkheading, providing waterways or otherwise developing such lands for
industrial and commercial purposes. A district may also acquire,
construct, install, improve, and operate sewer and water utilities to
serve its own property and other property owners, or to deliver treated
or raw water to a public water system for municipal water supply
purposes, under terms, conditions, and rates to be fixed and approved
by the port commission. A district may also acquire, by purchase,
construction, lease, or in any other manner, and may maintain and
operate other facilities for the control or elimination of air, water,
or other pollution, including, but not limited to, facilities for the
treatment and/or disposal of industrial wastes, and may make such
facilities available to others under terms, conditions and rates to be
fixed and approved by the port commission. Such conditions and rates
shall be sufficient to reimburse the port for all costs, including
reasonable amortization of capital outlays caused by or incidental to
providing such other pollution control facilities. However, no part of
such costs of providing any pollution control facility to others shall
be paid out of any tax revenues of the port and no port shall enter
into an agreement or contract to provide sewer and/or water utilities
or pollution control facilities if substantially similar utilities or
facilities are available from another source (or sources) which is able
and willing to provide such utilities or facilities on a reasonable and
nondiscriminatory basis unless such other source (or sources) consents
thereto.
(2) In the event that a port elects to make such other pollution
control facilities available to others, it shall do so by lease, lease
purchase agreement, or other agreement binding such user to pay for the
use of said facilities for the full term of the revenue bonds issued by
the port for the acquisition of said facilities, and said payments
shall at least fully reimburse the port for all principal and interest
paid by it on said bonds and for all operating or other costs, if any,
incurred by the port in connection with said facilities. However,
where there is more than one user of any such facilities, each user
shall be responsible for its pro rata share of such costs and payment
of principal and interest. Any port intending to provide pollution
control facilities to others shall first survey the port district to
ascertain the potential users of such facilities and the extent of
their needs. The port shall conduct a public hearing upon the proposal
and shall give each potential user an opportunity to participate in the
use of such facilities upon equal terms and conditions.
(3) "Pollution control facility," as used in this section and RCW
53.08.041, does not include air quality improvement equipment that
provides emission reductions for engines, vehicles, and vessels.

--- END ---