BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.345
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state school directors' association shall work
with school districts to develop and implement a comprehensive
statewide reorganization initiative to streamline and provide
efficiencies in the administration and operation of school districts
and educational service districts. The goals of the initiative are
increased efficiency, cost savings, and an improved learning
environment for students.
(2) The school directors' association shall serve as the lead
organization for the reorganization initiative, but shall work
collaboratively with and be assisted by state associations representing
school administrators, school business managers, educational service
districts, principals, teachers, classified employees, and parents.
(3) The following efficiency strategies must be considered and may
be included under the initiative:
(a) Consolidation of districts;
(b) Consolidation of administration between or among districts;
(c) Developing and implementing shared services, including but not
limited to food services, transportation, administration, construction,
technology, and instruction;
(d) Increased use of technology; and
(e) Other efficiencies and consolidations as appropriate.
(4) The school directors' association shall file an annual report
starting September 1, 2011, and each September 1st thereafter, with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction that includes
documented and projected annual cost savings resulting from the
reorganization initiative.
(5) Cost savings resulting from the reorganization initiative under
this section shall remain in the public school system to allow school
districts to redirect resources to activities that improve student
learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission on statewide school district reorganization is
established to develop and recommend a comprehensive plan for the
reorganization of Washington school districts and to consider and
determine appeals of or alternatives to the reorganization plan if the
plan is adopted by the legislature.
(2) The commission shall be composed of the following members:
(a) One representative of the state board of education selected by
the members of the board;
(b) Two representatives of school administrators selected by the
Washington association of school administrators, with one
representative each from eastern and western Washington;
(c) Two representatives of school board directors selected by the
Washington state school directors' association, with one representative
each from eastern and western Washington;
(d) One representative of certificated instructional school
employees selected by the Washington education association;
(e) An individual with experience as a demographer or as a
participant on the redistricting commission under chapter 44.05 RCW
selected by the governor; and
(f) Four individuals selected jointly by the speaker of the house
of representatives and the president of the senate, with two
individuals each from eastern and western Washington.
(3) Staff support for the commission shall be provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent
of public instruction shall convene the initial meeting of the
commission, at which time the members of the commission shall elect a
chair from among the members.
(4) Members of the commission are entitled to receive compensation
under RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) Any vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the
selection originally provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission on statewide school district reorganization
established under section 2 of this act shall develop objective
criteria, ranked in priority order, for the reorganization of
Washington school districts. The commission may consider but shall not
be limited to the criteria in RCW 28A.315.015 and 28A.315.205. The
commission shall adopt the criteria as administrative rules under the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The commission shall hold at least
one public hearing on the proposed criteria in each educational service
district before final adoption. The commission shall cause notice to
be given at least ten days before the scheduled date of the hearing in
one or more newspapers of general circulation within the educational
service district.
(2)(a) Based on the adopted objective criteria, the commission
shall develop a comprehensive plan for the reorganization of Washington
school districts. The plan shall result in no more than one hundred
fifty school districts in the state and their boundaries. The plan
shall also result in a reorganization of the number and boundaries of
educational service districts.
(b) The commission shall hold at least one public hearing in each
educational service district during the development of the proposed
plan. The commission shall cause notice to be given at least ten days
before the scheduled date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the educational service district.
(c) After considering the information from the public hearings, the
results of the review under section 4 of this act, and any other
information or considerations, the commission shall submit the final
comprehensive school district reorganization plan to the superintendent
of public instruction, the governor, and the legislature by December 1,
2016, as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The comprehensive school district reorganization plan shall
consist of two parts, each of which shall be submitted separately in
the form of proposed legislation:
(a) Part A of the plan shall be a list of the recommended school
districts and educational service districts and their respective
boundaries. Except for amendments to correct technical errors or
omissions, the legislation implementing part A of the plan as submitted
by the commission may be amended only if approved by a two-thirds vote
of each house of the legislature; and
(b) Part B of the plan shall be recommended procedures and
timelines for implementation of the reorganization plan, including but
not limited to:
(i) A phased-in implementation schedule;
(ii) Procedures and timelines for determination, adjustment, and
transfer of assets and liabilities among school districts, including
bonded indebtedness;
(iii) Procedures and timelines for determination and election of
school district and educational service district boards of directors,
which shall include a transition period for any reorganized school
districts of up to two years, during which time all previous school
district boards of directors of the reorganized districts shall
continue to have governing responsibilities until a single board is
elected;
(iv) A process and a limited time frame for school districts to
appeal or propose an alternative to their reorganization as provided
under section 4 of this act; and
(v) Amendments to or temporary suspension of the provisions of this
chapter, chapter 28A.310 RCW, and other laws that are necessary to
implement the reorganization plan and also provide an ongoing process
for management of school district organization and boundary issues
after the plan has been implemented.
(4) Nothing in this section requires consolidation or closure of
high schools or other schools. Decisions regarding the disposition of
schools rest with school district boards of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint committee shall conduct an independent review of the
comprehensive plan developed under section 2 of this act to assure that
the proposed plan is based on and follows to the maximum extent
possible the objective criteria adopted by the commission on statewide
school district reorganization. The joint committee shall submit a
report of its findings, along with recommendations for any changes to
the plan that would improve its alignment with the criteria, to the
commission on statewide school district reorganization by September 1,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts whose organization is changed by a
reorganization plan adopted by the legislature under section 3 of this
act may appeal the reorganization to the commission on statewide school
district reorganization. An appeal that affects the organization of
more than one district must be submitted jointly by all affected
districts and must propose an alternative organization for
consideration by the commission. No school district may submit more
than one appeal under this section. The commission shall adopt rules
establishing the procedures, criteria, and time frame for consideration
and determination of appeals, including a deadline for school districts
to submit an appeal, based on the legislation enacted under section
3(3)(b) of this act. If the commission sustains an appeal under this
section, the commission shall order implementation of the alternative
organization of the school districts as submitted in the appeal.
(2) As an alternative to a reorganization adopted by the
legislature under section 3 of this act, school districts may submit
for consideration by the commission on statewide school district
reorganization a proposal to achieve significant efficiencies and
reductions in operating costs through the consolidation of services.
Consolidated services may include but are not limited to joint
transportation or food service operating agreements, consolidated
administration, joint use of facilities, or joint delivery and
management of special services. The proposal must be in the form of a
memorandum of understanding signed by the school directors of each
participating school district. The proposal must also include the
proposed organization of the school districts submitting the proposal.
The commission may approve an agreement under this subsection (2) only
if the school districts demonstrate significant efficiencies and
reductions in operating costs under the proposal. The commission shall
adopt rules establishing the procedures, criteria, and time frame for
consideration and approval of agreements, including a definition of
"significant efficiencies and reductions in operating costs," based on
the legislation enacted under section 3(3)(b) of this act. If the
commission approves a proposal under this section, the commission shall
order implementation of the memorandum of understanding and
implementation of the organization proposed by the participating school
districts.
(3) Decisions and orders of the commission on statewide school
district reorganization under this section must be filed with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of the
state auditor, appropriate county officials, and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2014, if the superintendent of public instruction files a finding with
the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the
senate, and the office of the code reviser as of January 1, 2014,
declaring that the reorganization initiative under section 1 of this
act has not resulted in sufficient cost savings and efficiencies.
(2) Sections 2 through 5 of this act take effect January 1, 2014,
only if the superintendent of public instruction files a finding with
the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the
senate, and the office of the code reviser as of January 1, 2014,
declaring that the reorganization initiative under section 1 of this
act has not resulted in sufficient cost savings and efficiencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If legislation submitted by the commission
on statewide school district reorganization as provided under section
3(3)(a) of this act is not signed into law before June 30, 2018,
sections 2 through 5 of this act expire July 1, 2018.

--- END ---