BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumer savings
is essential, both for individuals seeking to obtain the American
dream, and in order to rebuild a strong economy. The legislature
further finds that for most of the last two decades, consumers have
borrowed more than they have saved, with current United States savings
rates under six percent. The legislature intends to encourage
financial institutions to develop innovative products that create
incentives to encourage consumer savings, particularly savings by low-income consumers.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.0356 and 2000 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes:
(a) A business to conduct a promotional contest of chance as
defined in this section, in this state, or partially in this state,
whereby the elements of prize and chance are present but in which the
element of consideration is not present;
(b) A financial institution, as defined in RCW 30.22.040, to
conduct a promotional contest of chance under this section in which a
drawing for a prize is held that includes only those persons who
deposited funds in a savings account, certificate of deposit, or any
other savings program of the financial institution as eligible prize
recipients. No such contest may be conducted, either wholly or
partially, by means of the internet.
(2) Promotional contests of chance under this section are not
gambling as defined in RCW 9.46.0237.
(3) Promotional contests of chance shall be conducted as
advertising and promotional undertakings solely for the purpose of
advertising or promoting the services, goods, wares, and merchandise of
a business.
(4) No person eligible to receive a prize in a promotional contest
of chance under subsection (1)(a) of this section may be required to:
(a) Pay any consideration to the promoter or operator of the
business in order to participate in the contest; or
(b) Purchase any service, goods, wares, merchandise, or anything of
value from the business, however, for other than contests entered
through a direct mail solicitation, the promoter or sponsor may give
additional entries or chances upon purchase of service, goods, wares,
or merchandise if the promoter or sponsor provides an alternate method
of entry requiring no consideration.
(5) No person eligible to receive a prize in a promotional contest
of chance under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be required to
pay any consideration other than the deposit of funds, or purchase any
service, goods, wares, merchandise, or anything of value from the
financial institution.
(6)(a) As used in this section, "consideration" means anything of
pecuniary value required to be paid to the promoter or sponsor in order
to participate in a promotional contest. Such things as visiting a
business location, placing or answering a telephone call, completing an
entry form or customer survey, or furnishing a stamped, self-addressed
envelope do not constitute consideration.
(b) Coupons or entry blanks obtained by purchase of a bona fide
newspaper or magazine or in a program sold in conjunction with a
regularly scheduled sporting event are not consideration.
(((6))) (7) Unless authorized by the commission, equipment or
devices made for use in a gambling activity are prohibited from use in
a promotional contest.
(((7))) (8) This section shall not be construed to permit
noncompliance with chapter 19.170 RCW, promotional advertising of
prizes, and chapter 19.86 RCW, unfair business practices.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.170.020 and 1991 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Person" means an individual, corporation, the state or its
subdivisions or agencies, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
association, cooperative, or any other legal entity.
(2) "Prize" means a gift, award, travel coupon or certificate, free
item, or any other item offered in a promotion that is different and
distinct from the goods, service, or property promoted by a sponsor.
"Prize" does not include an item offered in a promotion where all of
the following elements are present:
(a) No element of chance is involved in obtaining the item offered
in the promotion;
(b) The recipient has the right to review the merchandise offered
for sale without obligation for at least seven days, and has a right to
obtain a full refund in thirty days for the return of undamaged
merchandise;
(c) The recipient may keep the item offered in the promotion
without obligation; and
(d) The recipient is not required to attend any sales presentation
or spend any sum in order to receive the item offered in the promotion.
(3) "Promoter" means a person conducting a promotion.
(4) "Promotion" means an advertising program, sweepstakes, contest,
direct giveaway, or solicitation directed to specific named
individuals, that includes the award of or chance to be awarded a
prize, but does not include a promotional contest of chance under RCW
9.46.0356(1)(b).
(5) "Offer" means a written notice delivered by hand, mail, or
other print medium offering goods, services, or property made as part
of a promotion to a person based on a representation that the person
has been awarded, or will be awarded, a prize.
(6) "Sponsor" means a person on whose behalf a promotion is
conducted to promote or advertise goods, services, or property of that
person.
(7) "Simulated check" means a document that is not currency or a
check, draft, note, bond, or other negotiable instrument but has the
visual characteristics thereof. "Simulated check" does not include a
nonnegotiable check, draft, note, or other instrument that is used for
soliciting orders for the purchase of checks, drafts, notes, bonds, or
other instruments and that is clearly marked as a sample, specimen, or
nonnegotiable.
(8) "Continuing obligation check" means a document that is a check,
draft, note, bond, or other negotiable instrument that, when cashed,
deposited, or otherwise used, imposes on the payee an obligation to
enter into a loan transaction. This definition does not include
checks, drafts, or other negotiable instruments that are used by
consumers to take advances on revolving loans, credit cards, or
revolving credit accounts.
(9) "Verifiable retail value" means:
(a) A price at which a promoter or sponsor can demonstrate that a
substantial number of prizes have been sold at retail in the local
market by a person other than the promoter or sponsor; or
(b) If the prize is not available for retail sale in the local
market, the retail fair market value in the local market of an item
substantially similar in each significant aspect, including size,
grade, quality, quantity, ingredients, and utility; or
(c) If the value of the prize cannot be established under (a) or
(b) of this subsection, then the prize may be valued at no more than
three times its cost to the promoter or sponsor.
(10) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings
bank, savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan
company, or consumer finance lender subject to regulation by an
official agency of this state or the United States, and any subsidiary
or affiliate thereof.

Sec. 4 RCW 30.22.040 and 1981 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context of this chapter otherwise requires, the terms
contained in this section have the meanings indicated.
(1) "Account" means a contract of deposit between a depositor or
depositors and a financial institution; the term includes a checking
account, savings account, certificate of deposit, savings certificate,
share account, savings bond, and other like arrangements.
(2) "Actual knowledge" means written notice to a manager of a
branch of a financial institution, or an officer of the financial
institution in the course of his employment at the branch, pertaining
to funds held on deposit in an account maintained by the branch
received within a period of time which affords the financial
institution a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge.
(3) "Individual" means a human being; "person" includes an
individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, joint
venture, trust, or other entity recognized by law to have separate
legal powers.
(4) "Agent" means a person designated by a depositor or depositors
in a contract of deposit or other document to have the authority to
deposit and to make payments from an account in the name of the
depositor or depositors.
(5) "Agency account" means an account to which funds may be
deposited and from which payments may be made by an agent designated by
a depositor. In the event there is more than one depositor named on an
account, each depositor may designate the same or a different agent for
the purpose of depositing to or making payments of funds from a
depositor's account.
(6) "Single account" means an account in the name of one depositor
only.
(7) "Joint account without right of survivorship" means an account
in the name of two or more depositors and which contains no provision
that the funds of a deceased depositor become the property of the
surviving depositor or depositors.
(8) "Joint account with right of survivorship" means an account in
the name of two or more depositors and which provides that the funds of
a deceased depositor become the property of one or more of the
surviving depositors.
(9) "Trust and P.O.D. accounts" means accounts payable on request
to a depositor during the depositor's lifetime, and upon the
depositor's death to one or more designated beneficiaries, or which are
payable to two or more depositors during their lifetimes, and upon the
death of all depositors to one or more designated beneficiaries. The
term "trust account" does not include deposits by trustees or other
fiduciaries where the trust or fiduciary relationship is established
other than by a contract of deposit with a financial institution.
(10) "Trust or P.O.D. account beneficiary" means a person or
persons, other than a codepositor, who has or have been designated by
a depositor or depositors to receive the depositor's funds remaining in
an account upon the death of a depositor or all depositors.
(11) "Depositor", when utilized in determining the rights of
individuals to funds in an account, means an individual who owns the
funds. When utilized in determining the rights of a financial
institution to make or withhold payment, and/or to take any other
action with regard to funds held under a contract of deposit,
"depositor" means the individual or individuals who have the current
right to payment of funds held under the contract of deposit without
regard to the actual rights of ownership thereof by these individuals.
A trust or P.O.D. account beneficiary becomes a depositor only when the
account becomes payable to the beneficiary by reason of having survived
the depositor or depositors named on the account, depending upon the
provisions of the contract of deposit.
(12) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business and accept deposits in this state under state or federal
law.
(13) "Depositor's funds" or "funds of a depositor" means the amount
of all deposits belonging to or made for the benefit of a depositor,
less all withdrawals of the funds by the depositor or by others for the
depositor's benefit, plus the depositor's prorated share of any
interest or dividends included in the current balance of the account
and any proceeds of deposit life insurance added to the account by
reason of the death of a depositor.
(14) "Payment(s)" of sums on deposit includes withdrawal, payment
by check or other directive of a depositor or his agent, any pledge of
sums on deposit by a depositor or his agent, any set-off or reduction
or other disposition of all or part of an account balance, and any
payments to any person under RCW 30.22.120, 30.22.140, 30.22.150,
30.22.160, 30.22.170, 30.22.180, 30.22.190, 30.22.200, and 30.22.220.
(15) "Proof of death" means a certified or authenticated copy of a
death certificate, or photostatic copy thereof, purporting to be issued
by an official or agency of the jurisdiction where the death
purportedly occurred, or a certified or authenticated copy of a record
or report of a governmental agency, domestic or foreign, that a person
is dead. In either case, the proofs constitute prima facie proof of
the fact, place, date, and time of death, and identity of the decedent
and the status of the dates, circumstances, and places disclosed by the
record or report.
(16) "Request" means a request for withdrawal, or a check or order
for payment, which complies with all conditions of the account,
including special requirements concerning necessary signatures and
regulations of the financial institution; but if the financial
institution conditions withdrawal or payment on advance notice, for
purposes of this chapter the request for withdrawal or payment is
treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is
treated as a request for withdrawal.
(17) "Withdrawal" means payment to a person pursuant to check or
other directive of a depositor.
(18) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions or his or her designee.
(19) "Promotional contest of chance" means a drawing for a prize
that includes only those persons who deposited funds in a savings
account, certificate of deposit, or any other savings program of the
financial institution as eligible prize recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 30.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If approved by its board of directors, a financial institution
may conduct a promotional contest of chance as permitted under RCW
9.46.0356(1)(b).
(2) A financial institution must not conduct a savings promotional
contest of chance, if, in the opinion of the director:
(a) It is likely to or does adversely affect the financial
institution's safety and soundness;
(b) It is administered in an unsafe and unsound or imprudent
manner, or in a manner that is likely to or does result in actual or
potential reputational harm to the financial institution; or
(c) It is likely to or has misled the financial institution's
members, depositors, or the general public.
(3) The director may examine the conduct of a promotional contest
of chance pursuant to his or her supervisory and examination powers
under:
(a) Title 30 RCW, in regard to a bank;
(b) Title 32 RCW, in regard to a mutual or stock savings bank; or
(c) Chapter 31.12 RCW, in regard to a state credit union.
(4) The director may exercise his or her full enforcement powers
under the titles and chapter in subsection (3) of this section and may
issue a cease and desist order for a violation of this section.
(5) A financial institution must maintain records sufficient to
facilitate an audit of a promotional contest of chance, and must
provide those records to the director upon request.

Sec. 6 RCW 31.12.402 and 2001 c 83 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A credit union may:
(1) Issue shares to and receive deposits from its members in
accordance with RCW 31.12.416;
(2) Make loans to its members in accordance with RCW 31.12.426 and
31.12.428;
(3) Pay dividends and interest to its members in accordance with
RCW 31.12.418;
(4) Impose reasonable charges for the services it provides to its
members;
(5) Impose financing charges and reasonable late charges in the
event of default on loans, subject to applicable law, and recover
reasonable costs and expenses, including, but not limited to,
collection costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred both before
and after judgment, incurred in the collection of sums due, if provided
for in the note or agreement signed by the borrower;
(6) Acquire, lease, hold, assign, pledge, sell, or otherwise
dispose of interests in personal property and in real property in
accordance with RCW 31.12.438;
(7) Deposit and invest funds in accordance with RCW 31.12.436;
(8) Borrow money, up to a maximum of fifty percent of its total
shares, deposits, and net worth;
(9) Discount or sell any of its assets, or purchase any or all of
the assets of another credit union, out-of-state credit union, or
federal credit union. However, a credit union may not discount or sell
all, or substantially all, of its assets without the approval of the
director;
(10) Accept deposits of deferred compensation of its members;
(11) Act as fiscal agent for and receive payments on shares and
deposits from the federal government or this state, and any agency or
political subdivision thereof;
(12) Engage in activities and programs as requested by the federal
government, this state, and any agency or political subdivision
thereof, when the activities or programs are not inconsistent with this
chapter;
(13) Hold membership in credit unions, out-of-state credit unions,
or federal credit unions and in organizations controlled by or
fostering the interests of credit unions, including, but not limited
to, a central liquidity facility organized under state or federal law;
(14) Pay additional dividends and interest to members, or an
interest rate refund to borrowers;
(15) Enter into lease agreements, lease contracts, and
lease-purchase agreements with members;
(16) Act as insurance agent or broker for the sale to members of:
(a) Group life, accident, health, and credit life and disability
insurance; and
(b) Other insurance that other types of Washington state-chartered
financial institutions are permitted to sell, on the same terms and
conditions that these institutions are permitted to sell such
insurance;
(17) Impose a reasonable service charge for the administration and
processing of accounts that remain dormant for a period of time
specified by the credit union;
(18) Establish and operate on-premises or off-premises electronic
facilities;
(19) Enter into formal or informal agreements with another credit
union for the purpose of fostering the development of the other credit
union;
(20) Work with community leaders to develop and prioritize efforts
to improve the areas where their members reside by making investments
in the community through contributions to organizations that primarily
serve either a charitable, social, welfare, or educational purpose, or
are exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code;
(21) Limit the personal liability of its directors in accordance
with provisions of its articles of incorporation that conform with RCW
23B.08.320;
(22) Indemnify its directors, supervisory committee members,
officers, employees, and others in accordance with provisions of its
articles of incorporation or bylaws that conform with RCW 23B.08.500
through 23B.08.600;
(23) Conduct a promotional contest of chance as authorized in RCW
9.46.0356(l)(b), as long as the conditions of RCW 9.46.0356(5) and
section 5 of this act are complied with to the satisfaction of the
director; and
(((23))) (24) Exercise such incidental powers as are necessary or
convenient to enable it to conduct the business of a credit union.

Sec. 7 RCW 30.08.140 and 1996 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Upon the issuance of a certificate of authority to a bank, the
persons named in the articles of incorporation and their successors
shall thereupon become a corporation and shall have power:
(1) To adopt and use a corporate seal.
(2) To have perpetual succession.
(3) To make contracts.
(4) To sue and be sued, the same as a natural person.
(5) To elect directors who, subject to the provisions of the
corporation's bylaws, shall have power to appoint such officers as may
be necessary or convenient, to define their powers and duties and to
dismiss them at pleasure, and who shall also have general supervision
and control of the affairs of such corporation.
(6) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of
incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration
and regulation of its affairs.
(7) To invest and reinvest its funds in marketable obligations
evidencing the indebtedness of any person, copartnership, association,
or corporation in the form of bonds, notes, or debentures commonly
known as investment securities except as may by regulation be limited
by the director.
(8) To discount and negotiate promissory notes, drafts, bills of
exchange and other evidences of debt, to receive deposits of money and
commercial paper, to lend money secured or unsecured, to issue all
forms of letters of credit, to buy and sell bullion, coins and bills of
exchange.
(9) To take and receive as bailee for hire upon terms and
conditions to be prescribed by the corporation, for safekeeping and
storage, jewelry, plate, money, specie, bullion, stocks, bonds,
mortgages, securities and valuable paper of any kind and other valuable
personal property, and to rent vaults, safes, boxes and other
receptacles for safekeeping and storage of personal property.
(10) If the bank be located in a city of not more than five
thousand inhabitants, to act as insurance agent. A bank exercising
this power may continue to act as an insurance agent notwithstanding a
change of the population of the city in which it is located.
(11) To accept drafts or bills of exchange drawn upon it having not
more than six months sight to run, which grow out of transactions
involving the importation or exportation of goods; or which grow out of
transactions involving the domestic shipment of goods, providing
shipping documents conveying or securing title are attached at the time
of acceptance; or which are secured at the time of acceptance by a
warehouse receipt or other such document conveying or securing title to
readily marketable staples. No bank shall accept, either in a foreign
or a domestic transaction, for any one person, company, firm or
corporation, to an amount equal at any one time in the aggregate to
more than ten percent of its paid up and unimpaired capital stock and
surplus unless the bank is secured by attached documents or by some
other actual security growing out of the same transaction as the
acceptance; and no bank shall accept such bills to an amount equal at
any time in the aggregate to more than one-half of its paid up and
unimpaired capital stock and surplus: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
director, under such general regulations applicable to all banks
irrespective of the amount of capital or surplus, as the director may
prescribe may authorize any bank to accept such bills to an amount not
exceeding at any time in the aggregate one hundred percent of its paid
up and unimpaired capital stock and surplus: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That
the aggregate of acceptances growing out of domestic transactions shall
in no event exceed fifty percent of such capital stock and surplus.
(12) To accept drafts or bills of exchange drawn upon it, having
not more than three months sight to run, drawn under regulations to be
prescribed by the director by banks or bankers in foreign countries or
dependencies or insular possessions of the United States for the
purpose of furnishing dollar exchange as required by the usages of
trade in the respective countries, dependencies or insular possessions.
Such drafts or bills may be acquired by banks in such amounts and
subject to such regulations, restrictions and limitations as may be
provided by the director: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no bank shall accept
such drafts or bills of exchange referred to in this subdivision for
any one bank to an amount exceeding in the aggregate ten percent of the
paid up and unimpaired capital and surplus of the accepting bank unless
the draft or bill of exchange is accompanied by documents conveying or
securing title or by some other adequate security, and that no such
drafts or bills of exchange shall be accepted by any bank in an amount
exceeding at any time the aggregate of one-half of its paid up and
unimpaired capital and surplus: PROVIDED FURTHER, That compliance by
any bank which is a member of the federal reserve system of the United
States with the rules, regulations and limitations adopted by the
federal reserve board thereof with respect to the acceptance of drafts
or bills of exchange by members of such federal reserve system shall be
a sufficient compliance with the requirements of this subdivision or
paragraph relating to rules, regulations and limitations prescribed by
the director.
(13) To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to
effect its purposes.
(14) To serve as custodian of an individual retirement account and
pension and profit sharing plans qualified under internal revenue code
section 401(a), the assets of which are invested in deposits of the
bank or trust company or are invested, pursuant to directions from the
customer owning the account, in securities traded on a national
securities market: PROVIDED, That the bank or trust company shall
accept no investment responsibilities over the account unless it is
granted trust powers by the director.
(15) To be a limited partner in a limited partnership that engages
in only such activities as are authorized for the bank.
(16) To exercise any other power or authority permissible under
applicable state or federal law conducted by out-of-state state banks
with branches in Washington to the same extent if, in the opinion of
the director, those powers and authorities affect the operations of
banking in Washington or affect the delivery of financial services in
Washington.
(17) To conduct a promotional contest of chance as authorized in
RCW 9.46.0356(l)(b), as long as the conditions of RCW 9.46.0356(5) and
section 5 of this act are complied with to the satisfaction of the
director.

Sec. 8 RCW 32.08.140 and 1999 c 14 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every mutual savings bank incorporated under this title shall have,
subject to the restrictions and limitations contained in this title,
the following powers:
(1) To receive deposits of money, to invest the same in the
property and securities prescribed in this title, to declare dividends
in the manner prescribed in this title, and to exercise by its board of
trustees or duly authorized officers or agents, subject to law, all
such incidental powers as shall be necessary to carry on the business
of a savings bank.
(2) To issue transferable certificates showing the amounts
contributed by any incorporator or trustee to the guaranty fund of such
bank, or for the purpose of paying its expenses. Every such
certificate shall show that it does not constitute a liability of the
savings bank, except as otherwise provided in this title.
(3) To purchase, hold and convey real property as prescribed in RCW
32.20.280.
(4) To pay depositors as hereinafter provided, and when requested,
pay them by drafts upon deposits to the credit of the savings bank in
any city in the United States, and to charge current rates of exchange
for such drafts.
(5) To borrow money in pursuance of a resolution adopted by a vote
of a majority of its board of trustees duly entered upon its minutes
whereon shall be recorded by ayes and noes the vote of each trustee,
for the purpose of repaying depositors, and to pledge or hypothecate
securities as collateral for loans so obtained. Immediate written
notice shall be given to the director of all amounts so borrowed, and
of all assets so pledged or hypothecated.
(6) Subject to such regulations and restrictions as the director
finds to be necessary and proper, to borrow money in pursuance of a
resolution, policy, or other governing document adopted by its board of
trustees, for purposes other than that of repaying depositors and to
pledge or hypothecate its assets as collateral for any such loans,
provided that no amount shall at any time be borrowed by a savings bank
pursuant to this subsection (6), if such amount, together with the
amount then remaining unpaid upon prior borrowings by such savings bank
pursuant to this subsection (6), exceeds thirty percent of the assets
of the savings bank.
The sale of securities or loans by a bank subject to an agreement
to repurchase the securities or loans shall not be considered a
borrowing. Borrowings from federal, state, or municipal governments or
agencies or instrumentalities thereof shall not be subject to the
limits of this subsection.
(7) To collect or protest promissory notes or bills of exchange
owned by such bank or held by it as collateral, and remit the proceeds
of the collections by drafts upon deposits to the credit of the savings
bank in any city in the United States, and to charge the usual rates or
fees for such collection and remittance for such protest.
(8) To sell gold or silver received in payment of interest or
principal of obligations owned by the savings bank or from depositors
in the ordinary course of business.
(9) To act as insurance agent for the purpose of writing fire
insurance on property in which the bank has an insurable interest, the
property to be located in the city in which the bank is situated and in
the immediate contiguous suburbs, notwithstanding anything in any other
statute to the contrary.
(10) To let vaults, safes, boxes or other receptacles for the
safekeeping or storage of personal property, subject to laws and
regulations applicable to, and with the powers possessed by, safe
deposit companies.
(11) To elect or appoint in such manner as it may determine all
necessary or proper officers, agents, boards, and committees, to fix
their compensation, subject to the provisions of this title, and to
define their powers and duties, and to remove them at will.
(12) To make and amend bylaws consistent with law for the
management of its property and the conduct of its business.
(13) To wind up and liquidate its business in accordance with this
title.
(14) To adopt and use a common seal and to alter the same at
pleasure.
(15) To exercise any other power or authority permissible under
applicable state or federal law exercised by other savings banks or by
savings and loan associations with branches in Washington to the same
extent as those savings institutions if, in the opinion of the
director, the exercise of these powers and authorities by the other
savings institutions affects the operations of savings banks in
Washington or affects the delivery of financial services in Washington.
(16) To exercise the powers and authorities conferred by RCW
30.04.215.
(17) To exercise the powers and authorities that may be carried on
by a subsidiary of the mutual savings bank that has been determined to
be a prudent investment pursuant to RCW 32.20.380.
(18) To do all other acts authorized by this title.
(19) To exercise the powers and authorities that may be exercised
by an insured state bank in compliance with 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831a.
(20) To conduct a promotional contest of chance as authorized in
RCW 9.46.0356(l)(b), as long as the conditions of RCW 9.46.0356(5) and
section 5 of this act are complied with to the satisfaction of the
director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 7 and 8 of this act take effect
when the director of the department of financial institutions finds
that a federal regulatory agency has, through federal law, regulation,
or official regulatory interpretation, interpreted federal law to
permit banks operating under the authority of Title 30 or 32 RCW to
conduct a promotional contest of chance as defined in RCW 30.22.040.

--- END ---