BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.200 and 2010 c 161 s 611 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature recognizes that the special license plate
review board established in RCW 46.16.705 reviews and approves
applications for special license plate series.
(2))) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the
((special license plate review board)) department:
(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates
unless otherwise specified;
(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the
department;
(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW; and
(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the ((special
license plate review board)) department.
(((3) The special license plate review board approves, and)) (2)
The department approves and shall issue((,)) the following special
license plates:

LICENSE PLATE DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

Armed forces collection Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty
military personnel, reservists, and members of the national
guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a
symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces
to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard,
and national guard.

Endangered wildlife Displays a symbol or artwork, approved by the special
license plate review board and the legislature.

Gonzaga University alumni Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak Recognizes an organization that supports programs that
provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in
the line of duty.

Music matters Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who
are members of the Washington state council of
firefighters.

Share the road Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety
and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

Washington lighthouses Recognizes an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental
education programs.

Washington state parks Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations
of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural,
cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and
supports priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wildlife collection Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets Recognizes an organization that assists local member
agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control
agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on
Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(4) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters
and paramedics special license plates must show proof eligibility by
providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state
council of firefighters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Music Matters license plates" means special license plates issued
under RCW 46.18.200 that display the "Music Matters" logo.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.220 and 2010 c 161 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW,
the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(b) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(c) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(d) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(e) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(f) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(g) Gonzaga University
alumni $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(h) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(j) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(k) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(l) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(m) Music matters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(n) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((n))) (o) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(((o))) (p) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((p))) (q) Ski and ride
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((q))) (r) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(((r))) (s) Washington
lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((s))) (t) Washington state
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((t))) (u) Washington's
national parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((u))) (v) Washington's
wildlife collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((v))) (w) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((w))) (x) Wild on
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.420 and 2010 c 161 s 809 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220 ((that were approved by the special license plate review
board under RCW 46.18.200));
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fee amounts for each special license plate to the
following appropriate account as created in this section:

ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Gonzaga University alumni association Scholarship funds to needy and qualified students
attending or planning to attend Gonzaga University

Helping kids speak Provide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to families
of children who suffer from a delay in language or speech
development

Law enforcement memorial Provide support and assistance to survivors and families of
law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line
of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize,
and maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to
honor those fallen officers

Lighthouse environmental programs Support selected Washington state lighthouses that are
accessible to the public and staffed by volunteers; provide
environmental education programs; provide grants for
other Washington lighthouses to assist in funding
infrastructure preservation and restoration; encourage and
support interpretive programs by lighthouse docents

Music matters awareness Promote music education in schools throughout
Washington

Share the road Promote bicycle safety and awareness education in
communities throughout Washington

Ski & ride Washington Promote winter snowsports, such as skiing and
snowboarding, and related programs, such as ski and ride
safety programs, underprivileged youth ski and ride
programs, and active, healthy lifestyle programs

Washington state council of firefighters benevolent fund Receive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on
behalf of members of the Washington state council of
firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need

Washington's national park fund Build awareness of Washington's national parks and
support priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks

We love our pets Support and enable the Washington federation of animal
welfare and control agencies to promote and perform
spay/neuter surgery of Washington state pets in order to
reduce pet population

(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the accounts described in subsection (2) of this
section. The accounts are subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(4) Funds in the special license plate accounts described in
subsection (2) of this section must be disbursed subject to the
conditions described in subsection (2) of this section and under
contract between the department and qualified nonprofit organizations
that provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation operating in
Washington that has received a determination of tax exempt status under
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The qualified nonprofit organization must
meet all the requirements under RCW 46.18.100(1).

Sec. 5 RCW 46.18.060 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 94 and 2010 c 161
s 604 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The creation of the board does not in any way preclude the
authority of the legislature to independently propose and enact special
license plate legislation.
(2))) The ((board)) department must review and either approve or
reject special license plate applications submitted by sponsoring
organizations.
(((3))) (2) Duties of the ((board)) department include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the senate and house
transportation committees;
(b) Report annually to the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees on the special license plate applications
that were considered by the ((board)) department;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
and
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The ((board))
department may submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate
series to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees((; and
(e) Provide policy guidance and directions to the department
concerning the adoption of rules necessary to limit the number of
special license plates for which an organization or a governmental
entity may apply)).
(((4))) (3) Except as provided in RCW 46.18.245, in order to assess
the effects and impact of the proliferation of special license plates,
the legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance of any
additional plates until July 1, 2011. During this period of time,
((the special license plate review board created in RCW 46.16.705 and))
the department ((are)) is prohibited from accepting, reviewing,
processing, or approving any applications. Additionally, a special
license plate may not be enacted by the legislature during the
moratorium, unless the proposed license plate has been approved by the
former special license plate review board before February 15, 2005.
(4) The Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200
are exempt from the requirements of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.18.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 95 and 2010 c 161
s 606 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring organization meeting the requirements of RCW
46.18.100, applying for the creation of a special license plate ((to
the special license plate review board)) must, on an application
supplied by the department, provide the minimum application
requirements in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The sponsoring organization shall:
(a) Submit prepayment of all start-up costs associated with the
creation and implementation of the special license plate in an amount
determined by the department. The department shall place this money
into the special license plate applicant trust account created under
RCW 46.68.380;
(b) Provide a proposed license plate design;
(c) Provide a marketing strategy outlining short and long-term
marketing plans for each special license plate and a financial analysis
outlining the anticipated revenue and the planned expenditures of the
revenues derived from the sale of the special license plate;
(d) Provide a signature of a legislative sponsor and proposed
legislation creating the special license plate;
(e) Provide proof of organizational qualifications as determined by
the department as provided for in RCW 46.18.100;
(f) Provide signature sheets that include signatures from
individuals who intend to purchase the special license plate and the
number of plates each individual intends to purchase. The sheets must
reflect a minimum of three thousand five hundred intended purchases of
the special license plate.
(3) After an application is approved by the ((special license plate
review board)) department, the application need not be reviewed again
((by the board)) for a period of three years.
(4) The Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200
are exempt from the requirements of this section.

--- END ---