BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice training commission and the Washington
state patrol shall ensure that issues related to motorcycle profiling
are addressed in basic law enforcement training and offered to in-service law enforcement officers in conjunction with existing training
regarding profiling.
(2) State and local law enforcement agencies shall add a statement
condemning motorcycle profiling to existing policies regarding
profiling.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means
using solely the fact that a person is riding a motorcycle or is
wearing certain motorcycle-related paraphernalia while riding a
motorcycle as a pretext in deciding whether or not to stop, detain,
question, search, or arrest a person operating a motorcycle.

--- END ---