BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares as
follows:
(1) In its first twenty years of existence, the growth management
act established under chapter 36.70A RCW has helped local jurisdictions
to better coordinate, plan, and shape the growth within their
communities. The result of comprehensive land-use planning, capital
facilities planning, blueprints for achieving the thirteen goals of the
growth management act, and regular updates to how those goals are being
met, is that jurisdictions around the state have been able to balance
their land-use visions within the financial realities and impacts of
what is occurring in their communities, and to take thoughtful,
balanced approaches to juggling the demands of growth with the need to
sustain and preserve the state's natural environment;
(2) However, as is true with many implementation projects, the
level of effort, level of commitment, and level of progress made by
jurisdictions in carrying out the objectives of the growth management
act, in recognizing that infrastructure investment is needed to spur
market recognition and growth potential and in preparing their
communities for the demands of growth while also protecting and
sustaining natural resources, has differed from place to place;
(3) The legislature recognizes the fact that the promise of the
growth management act has always been limited by the fact that the
state's investments in infrastructure have failed to keep pace with the
growth that has occurred on the ground, making it more difficult for
jurisdictions to achieve the potential of the plans and blueprints laid
out for their communities;
(4) Despite the legislature's best intentions, the economic
realities facing the state make it extremely unlikely that
infrastructure investment at all levels will ever be able to fully keep
up with the population and employment growth experiencing by
communities throughout Washington;
(5) In an era where resources are limited and will continue to be,
the legislature thus needs to find new ways to better focus and
coordinate the infrastructure investments it is able to make through
grant and loan programs made available to local communities.
Therefore the legislature intends to direct the establishment of a
process that will support communities that have demonstrated
outstanding progress in achieving the goals of the growth management
act. The legislature also intends to ensure that in creating such a
process and thereby creating an incentive for local jurisdictions,
nothing shall be developed that in any way penalizes other
jurisdictions which may not be as far along in attaining those goals of
the growth management act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
The department is directed to establish a process and criteria by
which entities that consistently achieve outstanding progress in
implementing the growth management act may qualify for additional
points in competitive scoring of grants and loan programs that are used
to help local communities carry out their obligations under the act.
(1) The grant and loan programs include, but are not limited to,
the public works assistance account, safe drinking water revolving loan
fund, centennial clean water account, stormwater grants administered by
the department of ecology, economic development grants, Washington
wildlife and recreation program, and housing trust fund.
(2) The process and criteria must be developed in a manner, and on
a timeline, that takes into consideration state grant and loan funding
cycles.
(3) In establishing the process and criteria under this section,
the department shall work with, and regularly consult, a broad array of
stakeholders representing cities, counties, and special purpose
districts. The department may also include in its outreach and
consultation representatives of organizations with special expertise
in, and understanding of, specific grant and loan programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
In developing the process and criteria directed under section 2 of
this act, the department shall utilize performance tools that can serve
as a measuring stick for evaluating the progress of local jurisdictions
in carrying out and implementing the goals of the growth management
act. These goals include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) Land-use elements that maximize a jurisdiction's ability to
accommodate density and more intense growth, particularly in downtown
areas;
(2) Housing elements that afford a rich and diverse range of
housing stock and ensure a certain percentage of affordable housing
stock;
(3) Transportation elements that are accommodating of all modes of
transportation, including not only vehicles but pedestrians,
bicyclists, trail users, and transit, including high-capacity and
rapid-frequency transit;
(4) Utilities elements that maximize available lands and resources
by creating regional conveyance and detention facilities, rather than
forcing property owners to make parcel-by-parcel investments in
infrastructure;
(5) Parks elements that ensure the accommodation of open space and
trail space in high-density areas;
(6) Maximizing the value of public investments;
(7) Supporting the sustainable economic growth of the state;
(8) Redeveloping existing lands prior to the development of new
land;
(9) Supporting achievement of improved jobs-housing balances within
a jurisdiction;
(10) Consistency with countywide planning policies; and
(11) Enhancing the natural environment and using sustainable
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall complete the
development of the process and criteria by December 31, 2010, and shall
report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the
established criteria. The department shall begin utilizing this
process beginning with spring 2012 grant and loan cycles, if feasible.

--- END ---