BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.260 and 1979 c 151 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any territory is annexed to a city or town, a
certificate as hereinafter provided shall be submitted in triplicate to
the office of financial management, hereinafter in this section
referred to as "the office", within thirty days of the effective date
of annexation specified in the relevant ordinance. After approval of
the certificate, the office shall retain the original copy in its
files, and transmit the second copy to the department of transportation
and return the third copy to the city or town. Such certificates shall
be in such form and contain such information as shall be prescribed by
the office. A copy of the complete ordinance containing a legal
description and a map showing specifically the boundaries of the
annexed territory shall be attached to each of the three copies of the
certificate. The certificate shall be signed by the mayor and attested
by the city clerk. Upon request, the office shall furnish
certification forms to any city or town.
(2)(a) The resident population of the annexed territory shall be
determined by, or under the direction of, the mayor of the city or
town. ((Such population determination shall consist of an actual
enumeration of the population which shall be made in accordance with
practices and policies, and subject to the approval of, the office.))
(b) If the annexed territory consists entirely of one or more
partial federal census blocks, or if 2010 federal decennial census data
has not been released within eighteen months immediately prior to the
date of annexation, the population determination shall consist of an
actual enumeration of the population.
(c) In any circumstance, the city or town may choose to have the
population determination of the entire annexed territory consist of an
actual enumeration. However, if the annexed territory includes or
consists of one or more complete federal census blocks, and if 2010
federal decennial census data has been released within eighteen months
immediately prior to the date of annexation, the population
determination may consist of:
(i) Relevant federal 2010 census data pertaining to the complete
block or blocks, as such data has been updated by the most recent
official population estimate released by the office pursuant to RCW
43.62.030;
(ii) An actual enumeration of any population located within the
annexed territory but outside the complete federal census block or
blocks; and
(iii) If the office confirms the existence of a known census error
within a complete federal census block and identifies a structure or
complex listed in (c)(iii)(A) through (C) of this subsection (2) as a
likely source of the error, an actual enumeration of one or more of the
block's identified:
(A) Group quarters;
(B) Mobile home parks; and
(C) Apartment buildings that are composed of at least fifty units
and are certified for occupancy between January 1, 2010, and April 1,
2011.
(d) Whenever an actual enumeration is used, it shall be made in
accordance with the practices and policies of the office.
(e) The city or town shall be responsible for the full cost of the
population determination.
(3) The population shall be determined as of the effective date of
annexation as specified in the relevant ordinance.
Until an annexation certificate is filed and approved as provided
herein, such annexed territory shall not be considered by the office in
determining the population of such city or town.
Upon approval of the annexation certificate, the office shall
forward to each state official or department responsible for making
allocations or payments to cities or towns, a revised certificate
reflecting the increase in population due to such annexation. Upon and
after the date of the commencement of the next quarterly period, the
population determination indicated in such revised certificate shall be
used as the basis for the allocation and payment of state funds to such
city or town.
For the purposes of this section, each quarterly period shall
commence on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October. Whenever a revised certificate is forwarded by the office
thirty days or less prior to the commencement of the next quarterly
period, the population of the annexed territory shall not be considered
until the commencement of the following quarterly period.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.14.700 and 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 28 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any territory is annexed to a code city, a certificate
as hereinafter provided shall be submitted in triplicate to the office
of financial management within thirty days of the effective date of
annexation specified in the relevant ordinance. After approval of the
certificate, the office of financial management shall retain the
original copy in its files, and transmit the second copy to the
department of transportation and return the third copy to the code
city. Such certificates shall be in such form and contain such
information as shall be prescribed by the office of financial
management. A copy of the complete ordinance containing a legal
description and a map showing specifically the boundaries of the
annexed territory shall be attached to each of the three copies of the
certificate. The certificate shall be signed by the mayor and attested
by the city clerk. Upon request, the office of financial management
shall furnish certification forms to any code city.
(2)(a) The resident population of the annexed territory shall be
determined by, or under the direction of, the mayor of the code city.
(b) If the annexed territory consists entirely of one or more
partial federal census blocks, or if 2010 federal census data has not
been released within eighteen months immediately prior to the date of
annexation, the population determination shall consist of an actual
enumeration of the population.
(c) In any circumstance, the city or town may choose to have the
population determination of the entire annexed territory consist of an
actual enumeration. However, if the annexed territory includes or
consists of one or more complete federal census blocks, and if 2010
federal census data has been released within eighteen months
immediately prior to the date of annexation, the population
determination may consist of:
(i) Relevant 2010 federal census data pertaining to the complete
block or blocks, as such data has been updated by the most recent
official population estimate released by the office pursuant to RCW
43.62.030;
(ii) An actual enumeration of any population located within the
annexed territory but outside the complete federal census block or
blocks; and
(iii) If the office confirms the existence of a known census error
within a complete federal census block and identifies a structure or
complex listed in (c)(iii)(A) through (C) of this subsection (2) as a
likely source of the error, an actual enumeration of one or more of the
block's identified:
(A) Group quarters;
(B) Mobile home parks; and
(C) Apartment buildings that are composed of at least fifty units
and are certified for occupancy between January 1, 2010, and April 1,
2011.
(d) Whenever an actual enumeration is used, it shall be made in
accordance with the practices and policies of the office of financial
management.
(e) The code city shall be responsible for the full cost of the
population determination.
(3) Upon approval of the annexation certificate, the office of
financial management shall forward to each state official or department
responsible for making allocations or payments to cities or towns, a
revised certificate reflecting the increase in population due to such
annexation. Upon and after the date of the commencement of the next
quarterly period, the population determination indicated in such
revised certificate shall be used as the basis for the allocation and
payment of state funds to such city or town.
For the purposes of this section, each quarterly period shall
commence on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October. Whenever a revised certificate is forwarded by the office of
financial management thirty days or less prior to the commencement of
the next quarterly period, the population of the annexed territory
shall not be considered until the commencement of the following
quarterly period.
((The resident population of the annexed territory shall be
determined by, or under the direction of, the mayor of the code city.
Such population determination shall consist of an actual enumeration of
the population which shall be made in accordance with practices and
policies, and subject to the approval of the office of financial
management. The population shall be determined as of the effective
date of annexation as specified in the relevant ordinance.))
(4) Until an annexation certificate is filed and approved as
provided herein, such annexed territory shall not be considered by the
office of financial management in determining the population of such
code city.

--- END ---