BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.030 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 503 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) As used in this chapter and except as otherwise provided in
this section, the term "selling price" means the true and fair value of
the property conveyed. If property has been conveyed in an arm's
length transaction between unrelated persons for a valuable
consideration, a rebuttable presumption exists that the selling price
is equal to the total consideration paid or contracted to be paid to
the transferor, or to another for the transferor's benefit.
(2)(a) If the sale is a transfer of a controlling interest in an
entity with an interest in real property located in this state, the
selling price ((shall be)) is the true and fair value of the real
property owned by the entity and located in this state. If the true
and fair value of the real property located in this state cannot
reasonably be determined, the selling price ((shall)) must be
determined according to subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If the sale is a transfer between an unrelated transferor and
transferee and consists of five parcels or more, "selling price" means
the greater of: (i) The total consideration paid or contracted to be
paid to the transferor, or to another for the transferor's benefit; or
(ii) the total value determined under subsection (4) of this section
for the parcels. Separate sales between the same transferor and
transferee, or persons related to the transferor and transferee, within
any twelve-month period shall be aggregated for the purpose of
determining whether the five parcel requirement is met.
(3)(a) As used in this section, "total consideration paid or
contracted to be paid" includes money or anything of value, paid or
delivered or contracted to be paid or delivered in return for the sale,
and shall include the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract
indebtedness, or other incumbrance, either given to secure the purchase
price, or any part thereof, or remaining unpaid on such property at the
time of sale.
(b) Total consideration ((shall)) does not include the amount of
any outstanding lien or incumbrance in favor of the United States, the
state, or a municipal corporation for taxes, special benefits, or
improvements.
(4) If the total consideration for the sale cannot be ascertained
or the true and fair value of the property to be valued at the time of
the sale cannot reasonably be determined, the market value assessment
for the property maintained on the county property tax rolls at the
time of the sale ((shall)) must be used as the selling price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to transfers occurring on
or after August 1, 2011.

--- END ---