BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Residential mortgage loan" means an extension of credit
secured by residential real property located in this state upon which
is constructed a single-family dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of
four or less units.
(b) "Lender" means any person or entity loaning money for the
purpose of making a residential mortgage loan. "Lender" includes
financial institutions as defined in RCW 30.22.041, consumer loan
companies subject to regulation under chapter 31.04 RCW, and mortgage
brokers and lenders subject to regulation under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(2) A lender that purchases or otherwise receives a residential
mortgage loan from another lender may not require a homeowner to
purchase flood insurance in connection with that residential mortgage
loan unless:
(a) The original lender required flood coverage;
(b) The determination by the original lender to not require flood
insurance was incorrect at the time the loan was made and flood
coverage was required by federal law based on federal emergency
management agency maps in order for the original loan to be made; or
(c) The federal emergency management agency has reclassified the
area where the home is located and the flood insurance is now required
by federal law based on federal emergency management agency maps in
order for a residential mortgage loan for a home in that locale.
(3) If a county, city, or town makes a determination regarding the
location of the property and the classification of the flood risk of
that property, a lender is required to use that determination for the
purposes of determining whether or not flood insurance was required
under subsection (2)(a) of this section or is required under subsection
(2)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by section 1 of this act are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 1 of this act is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business
and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair
method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is also invalid.

--- END ---