BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 1995, the legislature enacted a sales
and use tax exemption for manufacturing machinery and equipment,
commonly referred to as the "M&E exemption." The legislature finds
that the purposes of this exemption were to encourage the growth and
development of the state's private sector manufacturing industry and
improve this state's ability to compete with other states for
manufacturing investment. The legislature further finds that it was
not the purpose of the M&E exemption to provide tax breaks to state
agencies and institutions, nor to public utilities and other businesses
with respect to machinery and equipment primarily used for activities
that are taxable under the state public utility tax or are otherwise
not considered to be manufacturing for business and occupation tax
purposes.
(2) The legislature further finds that despite previous attempts at
clarifying the M&E exemption, significant ambiguity persists,
particularly with respect to the scope of the exemption. Such
ambiguity results in costly appeals and litigation and may result in
significant unanticipated revenue losses for the state and local
governments.
(3) Therefore, the legislature finds it necessary to reaffirm its
original intent in establishing the M&E exemption. The legislature
declares that the amendments to the existing M&E exemption and to RCW
82.04.120 in this act are clarifying and, as such, apply retroactively
as well as prospectively.
(4) The legislature finds that Washington is home to premier public
research institutions. The legislature recognizes that the state's
public universities provide cutting-edge research and development,
which helps stimulate growth in the private sector and is vital to the
economic well-being of our state. University research leads directly
to new products, companies, production methods, and ways of organizing
work. The legislature further recognizes that our public universities
will play an important role in shaping the next generation of
Washington industries, including biofuels and other renewable energy,
global health, and advanced manufacturing. Therefore, because the
amendments to the existing M&E exemption in this act clarify that state
agencies and institutions are not eligible for the M&E exemption, this
act provides a new, stand-alone sales and use tax exemption for
machinery and equipment used primarily in technological research and
development operations by the state's four-year institutions of higher
education.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02565 and 2009 c 535 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer
or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a
testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment((, but only when the
purchaser provides the seller with)).
(b) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or
research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water
pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation. "Machinery and equipment" also includes digital goods.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation
that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if
the machinery and equipment:
(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal
property;
(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of
tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;
(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or
tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;
(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal
property;
(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;
(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in
the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation;
(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package,
or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or
transported; or
(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW
82.63.010.
(d) "Manufacturer" means a person that qualifies as a manufacturer
under RCW 82.04.110. "Manufacturer" also includes a person that prints
newspapers or other materials.
(e) "Manufacturing" means only those activities that come within
the definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW, or would
be taxed as such if such activity were conducted in this state or if
not for an exemption or deduction. "Manufacturing" also includes
printing newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW if the
activity is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.
(f) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials
enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed
material leaves the manufacturing site. With respect to the production
of class A or exceptional quality biosolids by a wastewater treatment
facility, the manufacturing operation begins at the point where class
B biosolids undergo additional processing to achieve class A or
exceptional quality standards. Notwithstanding anything to the
contrary in this section, the term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part. The term does not include ((the production of
electricity by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010
or)) the preparation of food products on the premises of a person
selling food products at retail.
(((e))) (g) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of
electrical energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.
(((f))) (h) "Research and development operation" means engaging in
research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer
or processor for hire.
(((g))) (i) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or
determine the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible
personal property.
(((h))) (j) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible
personal property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing
operation begins at the point where the tangible personal property
enters the testing site and ends at the point where the tangible
personal property leaves the testing site. The term also includes the
testing of tangible personal property for use in that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part. The term does not include the testing of tangible
personal property for use in the production of electricity by a light
and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of
food products on the premises of a person selling food products at
retail.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.120 and 2009 c 535 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or
useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced
for sale or commercial or industrial use, and ((shall)) includes:
(((1))) (a) The production or fabrication of special made or custom
made articles;
(((2))) (b) The production or fabrication of dental appliances,
devices, restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory products
by a dental laboratory or dental technician;
(((3))) (c) Cutting, delimbing, and measuring of felled, cut, or
taken trees; and
(((4))) (d) Crushing and/or blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel,
or ore.
(2) "To manufacture" ((shall)) does not include:
(a) Conditioning of seed for use in planting; cubing hay or
alfalfa;
(b) Activities which consist of cutting, grading, or ice glazing
seafood which has been cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state;
(c) The growing, harvesting, or producing of agricultural products;
(d) Packing of agricultural products, including sorting, washing,
rinsing, grading, waxing, treating with fungicide, packaging, chilling,
or placing in controlled atmospheric storage;
(e) The production of digital goods; ((or))
(f) The production of computer software if the computer software is
delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible
storage media, including the delivery by use of a tangible storage
media where the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to
the purchaser; and
(g) Any activity that is integral to any public service business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010 and with respect to which the gross income
associated with such activity: (i) Is subject to tax under chapter
82.16 RCW; or (ii) would be subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW if
such activity were conducted in this state or if not for an exemption
or deduction.
(3) With respect to wastewater treatment facilities:
(a) "To manufacture" does not include the treatment of wastewater,
the production of reclaimed water, and the production of class B
biosolids; and
(b) "To manufacture" does include the production of class A or
exceptional quality biosolids, but only with respect to the processing
activities that occur after the biosolids have reached class B
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
a public research institution of machinery and equipment used primarily
in a research and development operation, or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.
(b) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(2) A public research institution claiming the exemption provided
in this section must file a complete annual survey with the department
under RCW 82.32.585.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means those fixtures, pieces of
equipment, digital goods, and support facilities that are an integral
and necessary part of a research and development operation, and
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
such fixtures, equipment, and support facilities, including repair
parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment" may include,
but is not limited to: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment, instrumentation, and other devices used in a
process of experimentation to develop a new or improved pilot model,
plant process, product, formula, or invention; vats, tanks, and
fermenters; operating structures; and all equipment used to control,
monitor, or operate the machinery and equipment.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings; and
(iv) Those building fixtures that are not an integral and necessary
part of a research and development operation and that are permanently
affixed to and become a physical part of a building, such as utility
systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning, communications,
plumbing, or electrical.
(c) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time. If machinery and equipment is used simultaneously in a research
and development operation and also for other purposes, the use for
other purposes must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous
use for purposes of determining whether the machinery and equipment is
used primarily in a research and development operation.
(d) "Public research institution" means any college or university
included within the definitions of state universities, regional
universities, or state college in RCW 28B.10.016.
(e) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research
and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by a public research institution of machinery and equipment used
primarily in a research and development operation, or to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.
(3) A public research institution receiving the benefit of the
exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual survey
with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.585 and 2010 c 114 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
survey under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department.
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the survey is
due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a
person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a
survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey
must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey. For a person that
claimed an exemption provided in section 4 or 5 of this act, the survey
must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in the
prior calendar year for each general area or category of research and
development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and
services were acquired in the prior calendar year.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter
82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned,
and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply
to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) For persons claiming the tax exemption in section 4 or 5 of
this act, the survey must also include the general areas or categories
of research and development for which machinery and equipment and labor
and services were acquired, exempt from tax under section 4 or 5 of
this act, in the prior calendar year.
(f) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the
((amount of the tax preference claimed)) information required in
subsection (2)(a) of this section, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information ((on the amount of tax preference claimed))
required in subsection (2)(a) of this section is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as reported on
the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or otherwise
allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or
other information known to the department, the amount actually claimed
or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve
and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature declares that the only
reason why the phrase "the production of electricity by a light and
power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010" was deleted from the
definition of "manufacturing operation" in RCW 82.08.02565(2)(f) in
section 2 of this act is because that language is superfluous.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply both
prospectively and retroactively to any tax period open for assessment
or refund of taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this act may be construed as a
repudiation of any provision of WAC 458-20-13601.

--- END ---