BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriations acts for the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal bienniums, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of one billion four hundred forty-four million nine hundred fifty-three thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and all costs
incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at
such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:
(a) One billion three hundred twenty million six hundred forty-seven thousand dollars to remain in the state building construction
account created by RCW 43.83.020;
(b) Twenty-one million dollars to the outdoor recreation account
created by RCW 79A.25.060;
(c) Twenty-one million dollars to the habitat conservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.020;
(d) Four million dollars to the riparian protection account created
by RCW 79A.15.120;
(e) Four million dollars to the farmlands preservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.130;
(f) Sixty million dollars to the state taxable building
construction account. All receipts from taxable bond issues are to be
deposited into the account. If the state finance committee deems it
necessary or advantageous to issue more than the amount specified in
this subsection (1)(f) as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal
internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of
nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce the total financing
costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such additional taxable bonds
shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account
in lieu of any transfer otherwise provided by this section. If the
state finance committee determines that a portion of the amount
specified in this subsection (1)(f) as taxable bonds may be issued as
nontaxable bonds in compliance with federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds, then such bond proceeds shall be transferred to the state
building construction account in lieu of the transfer to the state
taxable building construction account otherwise provided by this
subsection (1)(f). The state treasurer shall submit written notice to
the director of financial management if it is determined that any such
additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account
is necessary or that a transfer from the state taxable building
construction account to the state building construction account may be
made. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in
the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2(1) (a) through (f) of
this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2(1) (a) through (f) of
this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 2(1) (a)
through (f) of this act, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any
general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in
the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.99I RCW
to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this act have not been issued by June
30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue such
remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.99N RCW
to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this act have not been issued by June
30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue such
remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.99P RCW
to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this act have not been issued by June
30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue such
remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.99Q.130 and 2009 c 500 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design,
construction, and other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the
state legislative building, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum
of eighty-two million five hundred ten thousand dollars or as much
thereof as may be required to finance the rehabilitation and
improvements to the legislative building and all costs incidental
thereto. The approved rehabilitation plan includes costs associated
with earthquake repairs and future earthquake mitigation and allows for
associated relocation costs and the acquisition of appropriate
relocation space. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at a
price the state finance committee determines. No bonds authorized in
this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. The
proceeds of the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
section shall be deposited in the capitol historic district
construction account hereby created in the state treasury. These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this
section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and
sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management subject to
legislative appropriation.
(2) If any bonds authorized in this act have not been issued by
June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue
such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.99Q
RCW to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.020(5) have not been
issued by June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee
to issue such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---