BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.510.250 and 1990 c 33 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On or before the last business day of September 1969 and each
month thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall
apportion from the state general fund to the several educational
service districts of the state the proportional share of the total
annual amount due and apportionable to such educational service
districts for the school districts thereof as follows:

September . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

October . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

November . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

December . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

January . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

February . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

March . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

April . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

May . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

June . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.0%

July . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

August . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

The annual amount due and apportionable shall be the amount
apportionable for all apportionment credits estimated to accrue to the
schools during the apportionment year beginning September first and
continuing through August thirty-first. Appropriations made for school
districts for each year of a biennium shall be apportioned according to
the schedule set forth in this section for the fiscal year starting
September 1st of the then calendar year and ending August 31st of the
next calendar year, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section. The apportionment from the state general fund for each month
shall be an amount which will equal the amount due and apportionable to
the several educational service districts during such month: PROVIDED,
That any school district may petition the superintendent of public
instruction for an emergency advance of funds which may become
apportionable to it but not to exceed ten percent of the total amount
to become due and apportionable during the school districts
apportionment year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
determine if the emergency warrants such advance and if the funds are
available therefor. If the superintendent determines in the
affirmative, he or she may approve such advance and, at the same time,
add such an amount to the apportionment for the educational service
district in which the school district is located: PROVIDED, That the
emergency advance of funds and the interest earned by school districts
on the investment of temporary cash surpluses resulting from obtaining
such advance of state funds shall be deducted by the superintendent of
public instruction from the remaining amount apportionable to said
districts during that apportionment year in which the funds are
advanced.
(2) In the 2010-11 school year, the June apportionment payment to
school districts shall be reduced by one hundred twenty-eight million
dollars, and an additional apportionment payment shall be made on July
1, 2011, in the amount of one hundred twenty-eight million dollars.
This July 1st payment shall be in addition to the regularly calculated
July apportionment payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---