BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that private sector
businesses in this state are the foundation of the state's economy
through their power to generate jobs for state citizens and revenues in
support of state programs. The legislature further finds that the
state's private sector is the best means for keeping the state's
revenues working to enhance both state and global economic development.
Therefore, when the state participates in the market through state
purchasing, it is vital to the state and serves a public purpose to
promote the fullest possible participation of the state's private
sector businesses in that procurement process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state purchasing and material control director, under the
powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939, and all state
purchasing agencies, including educational institutions, operating
under delegated authority granted under RCW 43.19.190 or 28B.10.029
must, in the award of procurement contracts, apply a three percent
bidding preference to the bids of in-state businesses as required in
this section.
(2) The percent bidding preference provided for under this section:
(a) Applies to contracts that are:
(i) Awarded on or after January 1, 2012;
(ii) For less than one million dollars; and
(iii) For state purchases of goods or services or state public
works projects;
(b) May not be awarded to a noncompliant bidder and may not be used
to achieve any applicable minimum bidding requirement;
(c) Applies to the maximum extent consistent with international
trade agreement commitments and with applicable requirements of federal
law. If the state purchasing and material control director determines
that compliance with this section may conflict with international trade
agreement commitments or with federal requirements that are a
prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
if such compliance would otherwise conflict with federal law, the
purchasing agency shall not apply the bidding preference granted under
this section only to the extent necessary to eliminate the conflict.
A finding by the director with regard to one purchasing agency does not
affect the application of this section to purchases by another
purchasing agency or in another circumstance; and
(d) As authorized by the state purchasing and material control
director, may be determined to be inapplicable to purchases made
through a multistate contracting consortium, but only if such action is
not taken solely to avoid applying the bidding preference required
under this section.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "In-state business" means a business that has its principal
office located in this state and the majority of its officers domiciled
in this state.
(b) "Percent bidding preference" means the percent by which an
in-state business's responsive bid may exceed the lowest responsive bid
submitted by a responsible bidder who is not an in-state business and
have the in-state business be awarded the contract.
(4) Any purchasing agency adopting rules to implement this section
must consult with and coordinate the rules with other purchasing
agencies' rules with the goal of harmonizing the adopted rules. Rules
adopted under this section must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(5)(a) Each July 31st, beginning July 31, 2013, the department of
general administration shall publish on its web site information about
the bidding preference program provided for under this section,
including the number of businesses awarded state contracts under the
bidding preference program, the number and amounts of contracts awarded
under the bidding preference program and the percentage of awards this
represents statewide, and the number of employment positions in
Washington reported by the businesses that were awarded state contracts
under the bidding preference program.
(b) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the office of financial management must, by December
1, 2012, submit a report to the legislature and the governor with an
analysis and recommendations for reducing barriers to participation in
state procurement by in-state businesses with fifty or fewer employees.
At a minimum, the analysis and recommendations must address:
(i) The technical assistance needed by small businesses, including
assistance with addressing barriers that result from experience
requirements related to a contract;
(ii) Alternative methods for meeting any inventory level
requirements related to a contract; and
(iii) Other qualifications for bidders that in-state small
businesses identify as imposing barriers to participation in state
procurement.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2010 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An institution of higher education may exercise
independently those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education.
(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the
department of general administration.
(c) Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of
higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and
43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1901, section 2 of this act, 43.19.1906,
43.19.1911, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1937, 43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700
through 43.19.704, and 43.19.560 through 43.19.637.
(d) Purchases under chapter 39.29, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by
institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for
materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into
by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.
(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450.
(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350.
(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily
demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that
the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any
of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW
43.19.685, 43.19.534, and 43.19.637.
(h) Any institution of higher education that chooses to exercise
independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of
commodities shall notify the director of general administration.
Thereafter the director of general administration shall not be required
to provide those services for that institution for the duration of the
general administration contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(5) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts awarded under this chapter by the state are subject
to the requirements established under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts awarded under this chapter are subject to the
requirements established under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.1901 and 1987 c 434 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "purchase" as used in RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200, and
as they may hereafter be amended, shall include leasing or renting((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the purchasing, leasing, or renting of
electronic data processing equipment shall not be included in the term
"purchasing" if and when such transactions are otherwise expressly
provided for by law, except that such purchasing, leasing, or renting
is subject to section 2 of this act.
((The acquisition of job services and all other services for the
family independence program under chapter 74.21 RCW shall not be
included in the term "purchasing" under this chapter.))

Sec. 7 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2009 c 486 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of general administration shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(a) Development of a state commodity coding system, including
common stock numbers for items maintained in stores for reissue;
(b) Determination where consolidations, closures, or additions of
stores operated by state agencies and educational institutions should
be initiated;
(c) Institution of standard criteria for determination of when and
where an item in the state supply system should be stocked;
(d) Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state stores,
and formulation of standards for replenishment of stock;
(e) Formulation of an overall distribution and redistribution
system for stock items which establishes sources of supply support for
all agencies, including interagency supply support;
(f) Determination of what function data processing equipment,
including remote terminals, shall perform in statewide purchasing and
material control for improvement of service and promotion of economy;
(g) Standardization of records and forms used statewide for supply
system activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing,
requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard
notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct
purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the goods as
available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods as
available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(h) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the
requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(i) Establishment of warehouse operation and storage standards to
achieve uniform, effective, and economical stores operations;
(j) Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing of
material in store and for processing requisitions requiring purchase;
(k) Formulation of criteria for determining when centralized rather
than decentralized purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum benefit
of volume buying of identical or similar items, including procurement
from federal supply sources;
(l) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state
owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(m) Institution of standard criteria for purchase and placement of
state furnished materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed
equipment, in newly constructed or renovated state buildings;
(n) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the state
for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced by
improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(o) Establishment of a formal certification program for state
employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents
for the state under the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;
(p) Development of performance measures for the reduction of total
overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and services used
each biennium by the state;
(q) Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations
to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are
attributable to the establishment and implementation of improved
purchasing and material control procedures;
(r) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation
between state agencies, including educational institutions, and
political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material control
services;
(s) Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which
require the establishment of overall statewide policy for effective and
economical supply management;
(t) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, alternate vehicle fuels and
systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall energy-related
costs and energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(u) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations;
(v) Development of procedures and policies implementing the bidding
preference program provided for in section 2 of this act, with model
bidding application documents that include, at a minimum, a request
that bidders provide the location of the bidder's principal place of
business, the residential addresses of its officers, and the number of
its employment positions in Washington;
(w) Development of procurement policies and procedures, such as
unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate
the purchase of products and services by state agencies and
institutions from Washington small businesses to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with international trade agreement
commitments;
(((w))) (x) Development of food procurement procedures and
materials that encourage and facilitate the purchase of Washington
grown food by state agencies and institutions to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with international trade agreement
commitments; and
(((x))) (y) Development of policies requiring all food contracts to
include a plan to maximize to the extent practicable and consistent
with international trade agreement commitments the availability of
Washington grown food purchased through the contract.
(2) The department of general administration shall convene a
working group including representatives of the office of financial
management, the department of information services, and the state
printer. The purpose of the working group is to work collaboratively
to develop common policies and procedures that encourage and facilitate
state government purchases from Washington small businesses, as
required in subsection (1)(((v))) (w) of this section, and in RCW
39.29.065, 43.78.110, and 43.105.041(1)(j). By December 1, 2009, these
central services agencies shall jointly provide a written progress
report to the governor and legislature on actions taken and planned,
barriers identified, and solutions recommended to reach this goal.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 43.19.1908.
(a) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(b) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(c) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---