BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card, plate, booklet, credit card number,
credit card account number, or other identifying symbol, instrument, or
device that can be used to pay for, or to obtain, credit, goods, or
services.
(b) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as defined under
RCW 30.22.041.
(2) A financial institution that issues a credit card may not
charge an interest rate in connection with the credit card that is in
excess of the maximum rate allowed under RCW 19.52.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by section 1 of this act are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 1 of this act is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business
and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair
method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is also invalid.

--- END ---