BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.08.040 and 2008 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to any person recording a plat, replat, or altered plat
subsequent to May 31st in any year and prior to the date of the
collection of taxes in the ensuing year, the person ((shall)) must
deposit with the county treasurer a sum equal to the product of the
county assessor's latest valuation on the property less improvements in
such subdivision multiplied by the current year's dollar rate
((increased by twenty-five percent)) on the property platted. The
treasurer's receipt ((shall be)) is evidence of the payment. The
treasurer ((shall)) must appropriate so much of the deposit as will pay
the taxes and assessments on the property when the levy rates are
certified by the assessor using the value of the property at the time
of filing a plat, replat, or altered plat, and in case the sum
deposited is in excess of the amount necessary for the payment of the
taxes and assessments, the treasurer ((shall)) must return, to the
party depositing, the amount of excess.

--- END ---