BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that health carriers
in Washington are currently subject to a variety of mandated benefits
under state law, some of which are required by federal law. The
legislature further finds that the mandated health care benefits
provided under federal law adequately protect consumers. Furthermore,
under the federal patient protection and affordable care act and the
health care and education reconciliation act of 2010, health carriers
will be required to offer essential health benefits. These new federal
requirements, along with existing state mandates that may possibly
conflict and overlap with the federal mandates, will make the
regulatory landscape for health carriers confusing and difficult to
implement. State mandated benefits that exceed the essential health
benefits may also result in increased costs for the state as it
implements federal health care reform. It is therefore the intent of
the legislature to repeal all state mandated benefits and replace them
with a requirement that health carriers comply with federal mandates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
All health plans offered in this state must include all benefits
required by federal law.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.005 and 2010 c 292 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan
(other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by
the insurance commissioner; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six thousand
dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance
commissioner; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket
expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical
care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States
department of labor. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following
January 1st.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) (("Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(11) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(12))) "Employee" has the same meaning given to the term, as of
January 1, 2008, under section 3(6) of the federal employee retirement
income security act of 1974.
(((13))) (11) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means
amounts paid to health carriers directly providing services, health
care providers, or health care facilities by enrollees and may include
copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.
(((14))) (12) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or
on behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(((15))) (13) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers
licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment
centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A
RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and
includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities
as required by federal law and implementing regulations.
(((16))) (14) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(((17))) (15) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating
to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(((18))) (16) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability
insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(((19))) (17) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any
policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the
following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83
RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(((20))) (18) "Material modification" means a change in the
actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more than five
percent but less than fifteen percent.
(((21))) (19) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition,
illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(((22))) (20) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or
deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the
continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership,"
"policy," "contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(((23))) (21) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with,
under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform
a utilization review.
(((24))) (22) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person,
firm, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision,
sole proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged
in business that employed an average of at least one but no more than
fifty employees, during the previous calendar year and employed at
least one employee on the first day of the plan year, is not formed
primarily for purposes of buying health insurance, and in which a bona
fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number
of employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are
eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this
state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of
a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose of determining
eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually.
Except as otherwise specifically provided, a small employer shall
continue to be considered a small employer until the plan anniversary
following the date the small employer no longer meets the requirements
of this definition. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
is covered as a group of one must also: (a) Have been employed by the
same small employer or small group for at least twelve months prior to
application for small group coverage, and (b) verify that he or she
derived at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for
the previous taxable year, except a self-employed individual or sole
proprietor in an agricultural trade or business, must have derived at
least fifty-one percent of his or her income from the trade or business
through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn
taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate
internal revenue service form 1040, for the previous taxable year.
(((25))) (23) "Utilization review" means the prospective,
concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity and
appropriateness of the allocation of health care resources and services
of a provider or facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee
or group of enrollees.
(((26))) (24) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as,
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education
for the purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health
service costs.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.045 and 2007 c 253 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) Every health plan delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed by a health carrier on and after January 1, 1996, shall((:
(a) Permit every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions included in the basic health plan
services to the extent that:
(i) The provision of such health services or care is within the
health care providers' permitted scope of practice; and
(ii) The providers agree to abide by standards related to:
(A) Provision, utilization review, and cost containment of health
services;
(B) Management and administrative procedures; and
(C) Provision of cost-effective and clinically efficacious health
services.
(b))) annually report the names and addresses of all officers,
directors, or trustees of the health carrier during the preceding year,
and the amount of wages, expense reimbursements, or other payments to
such individuals, unless substantially similar information is filed
with the commissioner or the national association of insurance
commissioners. This requirement does not apply to a foreign or alien
insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW that files a
supplemental compensation exhibit in its annual statement as required
by law.
(((2) The requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section do not
apply to a licensed health care profession regulated under Title 18 RCW
when the licensing statute for the profession states that such
requirements do not apply.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 48.02.062 (Mental health services -- Rules) and 2005 c 6 s
10;
(2) RCW 48.20.385 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 2;
(3) RCW 48.20.390 (Podiatric medicine and surgery) and 1963 c 87 s
1;
(4) RCW 48.20.391 (Diabetes coverage) and 1997 c 276 s 2;
(5) RCW 48.20.392 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 2;
(6) RCW 48.20.393 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 728 & 1989 c 338 s 1;
(7) RCW 48.20.395 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
5 & 1983 c 113 s 1;
(8) RCW 48.20.397 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 1;
(9) RCW 48.20.410 (Optometry) and 1965 c 149 s 2;
(10) RCW 48.20.411 (Registered nurses or advanced registered
nurses) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 729 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 188 s 3;
(11) RCW 48.20.414 (Psychological services) and 1971 ex.s. c 197 s
1;
(12) RCW 48.20.416 (Dentistry) and 1974 ex.s. c 42 s 1;
(13) RCW 48.20.418 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 21;
(14) RCW 48.20.420 (Dependent child coverage -- Continuation for
incapacity) and 1985 c 264 s 10 & 1969 ex.s. c 128 s 3;
(15) RCW 48.20.430 (Dependent child coverage -- From moment of
birth -- Congenital anomalies -- Notification of birth) and 1983 1st ex.s.
c 32 s 18 & 1974 ex.s. c 139 s 1;
(16) RCW 48.20.490 (Continuation of coverage by former spouse and
dependents) and 1980 c 10 s 1;
(17) RCW 48.20.520 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 1;
(18) RCW 48.20.580 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2007 c 8 s 1;
(19) RCW 48.21.125 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 3;
(20) RCW 48.21.130 (Podiatric medicine and surgery) and 1963 c 87
s 2;
(21) RCW 48.21.140 (Optometry) and 1965 c 149 s 3;
(22) RCW 48.21.141 (Registered nurses or advanced registered
nurses) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 730 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 188 s 4;
(23) RCW 48.21.143 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 10 & 1997 c 276 s 3;
(24) RCW 48.21.144 (Psychological services) and 1971 ex.s. c 197 s
2;
(25) RCW 48.21.146 (Dentistry) and 1974 ex.s. c 42 s 2;
(26) RCW 48.21.148 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 22;
(27) RCW 48.21.150 (Dependent child coverage -- Continuation for
incapacity) and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 32 & 1969 ex.s. c 128 s 4;
(28) RCW 48.21.155 (Dependent child coverage -- From moment of
birth -- Congenital anomalies -- Notification of birth) and 1983 1st ex.s.
c 32 s 20 & 1974 ex.s. c 139 s 2;
(29) RCW 48.21.160 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Legislative
declaration) and 1987 c 458 s 13 & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 1;
(30) RCW 48.21.180 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Contracts issued
or renewed after January 1, 1988) and 2003 c 248 s 9, 1990 1st ex.s. c
3 s 7, 1987 c 458 s 14, & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 3;
(31) RCW 48.21.190 (Chemical dependency benefits -- RCW 48.21.160
through 48.21.190, 48.44.240 inapplicable, when) and 1975 1st ex.s. c
266 s 10 & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 5;
(32) RCW 48.21.195 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 15;
(33) RCW 48.21.197 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Rules) and 1987
c 458 s 21;
(34) RCW 48.21.200 (Individual or group disability, health care
service contract, health maintenance agreement -- Reduction of benefits
on basis of other existing coverages) and 2007 c 80 s 3, 1993 c 492 s
282. Prior: 1983 c 202 s 16, 1983 c 106 s 24, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 266
s 20;
(35) RCW 48.21.220 (Home health care, hospice care, optional
coverage required -- Standards, limitations, restrictions -- Rules--Medicare supplemental contracts excluded) and 1988 c 245 s 31, 1984 c
22 s 1, & 1983 c 249 s 1;
(36) RCW 48.21.225 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 731 & 1989 c 338 s 2;
(37) RCW 48.21.227 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 3;
(38) RCW 48.21.230 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
6 & 1983 c 113 s 2;
(39) RCW 48.21.235 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 2;
(40) RCW 48.21.241 (Mental health services -- Group health plans--Definition -- Coverage required, when) and 2007 c 8 s 2, 2006 c 74 s 1,
& 2005 c 6 s 3;
(41) RCW 48.21.250 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 2;
(42) RCW 48.21.260 (Conversion policy to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 2010 c 110 s 1 & 1984 c 190 s 3;
(43) RCW 48.21.270 (Conversion policy -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 4;
(44) RCW 48.21.280 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 3;
(45) RCW 48.21.300 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 2;
(46) RCW 48.21.310 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 2;
(47) RCW 48.21.320 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 2;
(48) RCW 48.21A.090 (Home health care, hospice care, optional
coverage required -- Standards, limitations, restrictions -- Rules--Medicare supplemental contracts excluded) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 220,
1988 c 245 s 32, 1984 c 22 s 2, & 1983 c 249 s 2;
(49) RCW 48.42.100 (Women's health care services -- Duties of health
care carriers) and 2000 c 7 s 1 & 1995 c 389 s 1;
(50) RCW 48.43.017 (Organ transplant benefit waiting periods -- Prior
creditable coverage) and 2009 c 82 s 2;
(51) RCW 48.43.041 (Individual health benefit plans -- Mandatory
benefits) and 2000 c 79 s 26;
(52) RCW 48.43.043 (Colorectal cancer examinations and laboratory
tests -- Required benefits or coverage) and 2007 c 23 s 1;
(53) RCW 48.43.093 (Health carrier coverage of emergency medical
services -- Requirements -- Conditions) and 1997 c 231 s 301;
(54) RCW 48.43.115 (Maternity services -- Intent -- Definitions--Patient preference -- Clinical sovereignty of provider -- Notice to
policyholders -- Application) and 2003 c 248 s 14 & 1996 c 281 s 1;
(55) RCW 48.43.125 (Coverage at a long-term care facility following
hospitalization -- Definition) and 1999 c 312 s 2;
(56) RCW 48.43.180 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 23;
(57) RCW 48.43.185 (General anesthesia services for dental
procedures) and 2001 c 321 s 2;
(58) RCW 48.43.190 (Payment of chiropractic services -- Parity) and
2008 c 304 s 1;
(59) RCW 48.44.212 (Coverage of dependent children to include
newborn infants and congenital anomalies from moment of birth--Notification period) and 1984 c 4 s 1, 1983 c 202 s 5, & 1974 ex.s. c
139 s 3;
(60) RCW 48.44.225 (Podiatric physicians and surgeons not excluded)
and 1983 c 154 s 5;
(61) RCW 48.44.240 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Provisions of
group contracts delivered or renewed after January 1, 1988) and 2005 c
223 s 25, 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 12, 1987 c 458 s 16, 1975 1st ex.s. c
266 s 14, & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 4;
(62) RCW 48.44.245 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 17;
(63) RCW 48.44.290 (Registered nurses or advanced registered
nurses) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 733, 1986 c 223 s 6, & 1981 c 175 s 1;
(64) RCW 48.44.300 (Podiatric medicine and surgery -- Benefits not to
be denied) and 1986 c 223 s 7 & 1983 c 154 s 2;
(65) RCW 48.44.305 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 4;
(66) RCW 48.44.315 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 12 & 1997 c 276 s 4;
(67) RCW 48.44.320 (Home health care, hospice care, optional
coverage required -- Standards, limitations, restrictions -- Rules--Medicare supplemental contracts excluded) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 222,
1988 c 245 s 33, 1984 c 22 s 3, & 1983 c 249 s 3;
(68) RCW 48.44.325 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 734 & 1989 c 338 s 3;
(69) RCW 48.44.327 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 4;
(70) RCW 48.44.330 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
7 & 1983 c 113 s 3;
(71) RCW 48.44.335 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 3;
(72) RCW 48.44.341 (Mental health services -- Health plans--Definition -- Coverage required, when) and 2007 c 8 s 3, 2006 c 74 s 2,
& 2005 c 6 s 4;
(73) RCW 48.44.344 (Benefits for prenatal diagnosis of congenital
disorders -- Contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1990) and 1988 c 276 s 7;
(74) RCW 48.44.360 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 5;
(75) RCW 48.44.370 (Conversion contract to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 2010 c 110 s 2 & 1984 c 190 s 6;
(76) RCW 48.44.380 (Conversion contract -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 7;
(77) RCW 48.44.400 (Continuance provisions for former family
members) and 1986 c 223 s 11;
(78) RCW 48.44.420 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 4;
(79) RCW 48.44.440 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 3;
(80) RCW 48.44.460 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 3;
(81) RCW 48.44.500 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 24;
(82) RCW 48.46.250 (Coverage of dependent children -- Newborn
infants, congenital anomalies -- Notification period) and 1984 c 4 s 2 &
1983 c 202 s 12;
(83) RCW 48.46.272 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 14 & 1997 c 276 s 5;
(84) RCW 48.46.275 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 735 & 1989 c 338 s 4;
(85) RCW 48.46.277 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 5;
(86) RCW 48.46.280 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
8 & 1983 c 113 s 4;
(87) RCW 48.46.285 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 4;
(88) RCW 48.46.291 (Mental health services -- Health plans--Definition -- Coverage required, when) and 2007 c 8 s 4, 2006 c 74 s 3,
& 2005 c 6 s 5;
(89) RCW 48.46.350 (Chemical dependency treatment) and 2003 c 248
s 19, 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 14, 1987 c 458 s 18, & 1983 c 106 s 13;
(90) RCW 48.46.355 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 19;
(91) RCW 48.46.375 (Benefits for prenatal diagnosis of congenital
disorders -- Agreements entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1990) and 1988 c 276 s 8;
(92) RCW 48.46.440 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 8;
(93) RCW 48.46.450 (Conversion agreement to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 2010 c 110 s 3 & 1984 c 190 s 9;
(94) RCW 48.46.460 (Conversion agreement -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 10;
(95) RCW 48.46.480 (Continuation of coverage of former family
members) and 1985 c 320 s 8;
(96) RCW 48.46.490 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 5;
(97) RCW 48.46.510 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 4;
(98) RCW 48.46.520 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 3;
(99) RCW 48.46.530 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 4;
(100) RCW 48.46.570 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 25;
(101) RCW 48.46.580 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 5;
(102) RCW 48.125.200 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s
6; and
(103) RCW 48.43.515 (Access to appropriate health services--Enrollee options -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 7.

--- END ---