BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall review the subsidy rates currently paid to
child care centers whose average daily population includes more than
fifty percent of children for whom the center receives a state
subsidized rate. No later than December 1, 2011, the department shall
make a recommendation to the appropriate legislative committees whether
the subsidy rates to these child care centers should be increased, and
if so, by how much and for what reasons. In developing its
recommendation, the department must consider the results of the state's
voluntary quality improvement rating system pilot communities and
potential impacts a tiered reimbursement subsidy rate structure linked
to quality indicators would have on the quality of child care in the
state. If the department recommends that subsidy rates for these
centers should not be raised, then it shall detail the reasons for its
conclusion.

--- END ---