BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The title and registration advisory committee is created within the
department. The committee consists of the director or a designee, who
serves as chair, the assistant director for vehicle services, the
administrator of title and registration services, two members from each
of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees,
two county auditors nominated by the Washington association of county
officials, and two representatives of subagents nominated by an
association of vehicle subagents. The committee shall meet at least
twice a year and may meet as often as necessary. The committee's
purpose is to foster communication between the legislature, the
department, county auditors, and subagents. The committee shall make
recommendations about revisions to fee structures, implications of fee
revisions on cost sharing, and the development of standard contracts
provided for in RCW 46.01.140 (1)(a) and (4)(a).

Sec. 2 RCW 46.01.140 and 2010 c 161 s 204 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
(1) County auditor/agent duties. A county auditor or other agent
appointed by the director shall:
(a) Enter into a standard contract provided by the director, as
developed in consultation with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee;
(b) Provide all services authorized by the director for vehicle
certificates of title and vehicle registration applications and
issuance under the direction and supervision of the director including,
but not limited to:
(i) Processing reports of sale;
(ii) Processing transitional ownership transactions;
(iii) Processing mail-in vehicle registration renewals until
directed otherwise by legislative authority;
(iv) Issuing registrations and temporary ORV use permits for
off-road vehicles as required under chapter 46.09 RCW;
(v) Issuing registrations for snowmobiles as required under chapter
46.10 RCW; and
(vi) Collecting fees and taxes as required.
(2) County auditor/agent assistants and subagents. A county
auditor or other agent appointed by the director may, with approval of
the director:
(a) Appoint assistants as special deputies to accept applications
for vehicle certificates of title and to issue vehicle registrations;
and
(b) Recommend and request that the director appoint subagencies
within the county to accept applications for vehicle certificates of
title and vehicle registration application issuance.
(3) Appointing subagents. A county auditor or other agent
appointed by the director who requests a subagency shall, with approval
of the director:
(a) Use an open competitive process including, but not limited to,
a written business proposal and oral interview to determine the
qualifications of all interested applicants; and
(b) Submit all proposals to the director with a recommendation for
appointment of one or more subagents who have applied through the open
competitive process. If a qualified successor who is an existing
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee has
applied, the county auditor shall provide the name of the qualified
successor and the name of one other applicant who is qualified and was
chosen through the open competitive process.
(4) Subagent duties. A subagent appointed by the director shall:
(a) Enter into a standard contract with the county auditor or agent
provided by the director, as developed in consultation with the title
and registration advisory committee; and
(b) Provide all services authorized by the director for vehicle
certificates of title and vehicle registration applications and
issuance under the direction and supervision of the county auditor or
agent and the director including, but not limited to:
(i) Processing reports of sale;
(ii) Processing transitional ownership transactions;
(iii) Mailing out vehicle registrations and replacement plates to
internet payment option customers until directed otherwise by
legislative authority;
(iv) Issuing registrations and temporary ORV use permits for
off-road vehicles as required under chapter 46.09 RCW;
(v) Issuing registrations for snowmobiles as required under chapter
46.10 RCW; and
(vi) Collecting fees and taxes as required.
(5) Subagent successorship. A subagent appointed by the director
who no longer wants his or her appointment may recommend a successor
who is the subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency
employee. The recommended successor must participate in the open
competitive process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendations and appointment determinations, the following
provisions apply:
(a) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers;
(b) A subagent may not receive any direct or indirect compensation
or remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment; and
(c) The appointment of a successor is intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments to minimize public inconvenience.
The appointment of a successor does not create a proprietary or
property interest in the appointment.
(6) Standard contracts. The standard contracts provided by the
director in this section may include provisions that the director deems
necessary to ensure that readily accessible and acceptable service is
provided to the citizens of the state, including the full collection of
fees and taxes. The standard contracts must include provisions that:
(a) Describe responsibilities and liabilities of each party related
to service expectations and levels;
(b) Describe the equipment to be supplied by the department and
equipment maintenance;
(c) Require specific types of insurance or bonds, or both, to
protect the state against any loss of collected revenue or loss of
equipment;
(d) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by each of
the parties;
(e) Describe allowable costs that may be charged for vehicle
registration activities as described in subsection (7) of this section;
and
(f) Describe causes and procedures for termination of the contract,
which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(7) County auditor/agent cost reimbursement. A county auditor or
other agent appointed by the director who does not cover expenses for
services provided by the standard contract may submit to the department
a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be submitted on
a form developed by the department. The department shall develop
procedures to standardize and identify allowable costs and to verify
whether a request is reasonable. Payment must be made on those
requests found to be allowable from the licensing services account.
(8) County auditor/agent revenue disbursement. County revenues
that exceed the cost of providing services described in the standard
contract, calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection
(7) of this section, must be expended as determined by the county
legislative authority during the process established by law for
adoption of county budgets.
(9) Appointment authority. The director has final appointment
authority for county auditors or other agents or subagents.
(10) Rules. The director may adopt rules to implement this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.01.325 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 138 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare, with the advice of the title and
registration advisory committee, an annual comprehensive analysis and
evaluation of agent and subagent fees. The director shall make
recommendations for agent and subagent fee revisions approved by the
title and registration advisory committee to the senate and house
transportation committees by January 1st of every third year starting
with 1996. Fee revision recommendations may be made more frequently
when justified by the annual analysis and evaluation, and as requested
by the title and registration advisory committee.
(2) The annual comprehensive analysis and evaluation must consider,
but is not limited to:
(a) Unique and significant financial, legislative, or other
relevant developments that may impact fees;
(b) Current funding for ongoing operating and maintenance
automation project costs affecting revenue collection and service
delivery;
(c) Future system requirements including an appropriate sharing of
costs between the department, agents, and subagents;
(d) Beneficial mix of customer service delivery options based on a
fee structure commensurate with quality performance standards;
(e) Appropriate indices projecting state and national growth in
business and economic conditions prepared by the United States
department of commerce, the department of revenue, and the revenue
forecast council for the state of Washington.

--- END ---