BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - AGENCY SPECIFIC PROVISIONSEastern State Hospital Board and Western State Hospital Board
Sec. 1 RCW 72.23.025 and 2006 c 333 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to improve the quality of
service at state hospitals, eliminate overcrowding, and more
specifically define the role of the state hospitals. The legislature
intends that eastern and western state hospitals shall become clinical
centers for handling the most complicated long-term care needs of
patients with a primary diagnosis of mental disorder. To this end, the
legislature intends that funds appropriated for mental health programs,
including funds for regional support networks and the state hospitals
be used for persons with primary diagnosis of mental disorder. The
legislature finds that establishment of ((the eastern state hospital
board, the western state hospital board, and)) institutes for the study
and treatment of mental disorders at both eastern state hospital and
western state hospital will be instrumental in implementing the
legislative intent.
(2)(((a) The eastern state hospital board and the western state
hospital board are each established. Members of the boards shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Each board
shall include:
(i) The director of the institute for the study and treatment of
mental disorders established at the hospital;
(ii) One family member of a current or recent hospital resident;
(iii) One consumer of services;
(iv) One community mental health service provider;
(v) Two citizens with no financial or professional interest in
mental health services;
(vi) One representative of the regional support network in which
the hospital is located;
(vii) One representative from the staff who is a physician;
(viii) One representative from the nursing staff;
(ix) One representative from the other professional staff;
(x) One representative from the nonprofessional staff; and
(xi) One representative of a minority community.
(b) At least one representative listed in (a)(viii), (ix), or (x)
of this subsection shall be a union member.
(c) Members shall serve four-year terms. Members of the board
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060 and shall receive compensation as provided in RCW
43.03.240.
(3) The boards established under this section shall:
(a) Monitor the operation and activities of the hospital;
(b) Review and advise on the hospital budget;
(c) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature for
improving the quality of service provided by the hospital;
(d) Monitor and review the activities of the hospital in
implementing the intent of the legislature set forth in this section;
and
(e) Consult with the secretary regarding persons the secretary may
select as the superintendent of the hospital whenever a vacancy occurs.
(4))) (a) There is established at eastern state hospital and
western state hospital, institutes for the study and treatment of
mental disorders. The institutes shall be operated by joint operating
agreements between state colleges and universities and the department
of social and health services. The institutes are intended to conduct
training, research, and clinical program development activities that
will directly benefit ((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness who
are receiving treatment in Washington state by performing the following
activities:
(i) Promote recruitment and retention of highly qualified
professionals at the state hospitals and community mental health
programs;
(ii) Improve clinical care by exploring new, innovative, and
scientifically based treatment models for persons presenting
particularly difficult and complicated clinical syndromes;
(iii) Provide expanded training opportunities for existing staff at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(iv) Promote bilateral understanding of treatment orientation,
possibilities, and challenges between state hospital professionals and
community mental health professionals.
(b) To accomplish these purposes the institutes may, within funds
appropriated for this purpose:
(i) Enter joint operating agreements with state universities or
other institutions of higher education to accomplish the placement and
training of students and faculty in psychiatry, psychology, social
work, occupational therapy, nursing, and other relevant professions at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(ii) Design and implement clinical research projects to improve the
quality and effectiveness of state hospital services and operations;
(iii) Enter into agreements with community mental health service
providers to accomplish the exchange of professional staff between the
state hospitals and community mental health service providers;
(iv) Establish a student loan forgiveness and conditional
scholarship program to retain qualified professionals at the state
hospitals and community mental health providers when the secretary has
determined a shortage of such professionals exists.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary,
the institutes may enter into agreements with the department or the
state hospitals which may involve changes in staffing necessary to
implement improved patient care programs contemplated by this section.
(d) The institutes are authorized to seek and accept public or
private gifts, grants, contracts, or donations to accomplish their
purposes under this section.

Firearms Range Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 79A.25.220 (Firearms range advisory
committee) and 2007 c 241 s 55, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 71, & 1990 c 195 s 3
are each repealed.

Home Care Quality Authority
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 70.127.041 (Home care quality authority not subject to
regulation) and 2002 c 3 s 13;
(2) RCW 74.39A.230 (Authority created) and 2002 c 3 s 2; and
(3) RCW 74.39A.280 (Powers) and 2002 c 3 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.290 is decodified.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2009 c 580 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider ((who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority)) has met any training
requirements established by the department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessing and reauthorizing services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance((. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider who was referred by the authority, the area agency on aging
must notify the authority regarding its concerns)); and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider ((who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority)).
Individual providers who are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject
to background checks under RCW 74.39A.055.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. ((When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority.)) The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.39A.220 and 2002 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington find as follows:
(1) Thousands of Washington seniors and persons with disabilities
live independently in their own homes, which they prefer and is less
costly than institutional care such as nursing homes.
(2) Many Washington seniors and persons with disabilities currently
receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers hired
directly by them under the medicaid personal care, community options
programs entry system, or chore services program.
(3) Quality long-term in-home care services allow Washington
seniors, persons with disabilities, and their families the choice of
allowing seniors and persons with disabilities to remain in their
homes, rather than forcing them into institutional care such as nursing
homes. Long-term in-home care services are also less costly, saving
Washington taxpayers significant amounts through lower reimbursement
rates.
(((4) The quality of long-term in-home care services in Washington
would benefit from improved regulation, higher standards, better
accountability, and improved access to such services. The quality of
long-term in-home care services would further be improved by a well-trained, stable individual provider workforce earning reasonable wages
and benefits.
(5) Washington seniors and persons with disabilities would benefit
from the establishment of an authority that has the power and duty to
regulate and improve the quality of long-term in-home care services.
(6) The authority should ensure that the quality of long-term in-home care services provided by individual providers is improved through
better regulation, higher standards, increased accountability, and the
enhanced ability to obtain services. The authority should also
encourage stability in the individual provider workforce through
collective bargaining and by providing training opportunities.))

Sec. 7 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030 and
74.39A.095 and 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, and 41.56.026((,
70.127.041, and 74.09.740)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) (("Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3))) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Individual provider" means a person, including a personal
aide, who has contracted with the department to provide personal care
or respite care services to functionally disabled persons under the
medicaid personal care, community options program entry system, chore
services program, or respite care program, or to provide respite care
or residential services and support to persons with developmental
disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide respite care as
defined in RCW 74.13.270.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.39A.250 and 2002 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The authority must carry out the following duties:
(a) Establish qualifications and reasonable standards for
accountability for and investigate the background of individual
providers and prospective individual providers, except in cases where,
after the department has sought approval of any appropriate amendments
or waivers under RCW 74.09.740, federal law or regulation requires that
such qualifications and standards for accountability be established by
another entity in order to preserve eligibility for federal funding.
Qualifications established must include compliance with the minimum
requirements for training and satisfactory criminal background checks
as provided in RCW 74.39A.050 and confirmation that the individual
provider or prospective individual provider is not currently listed on
any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used by the department at
the time of the investigation;
(b) Undertake recruiting activities to identify and recruit
individual providers and prospective individual providers;
(c) Provide training opportunities, either directly or through
contract, for individual providers, prospective individual providers,
consumers, and prospective consumers;
(d))) The department shall provide assistance to consumers and
prospective consumers in finding individual providers and prospective
individual providers through the establishment of a referral registry
of individual providers and prospective individual providers. Before
placing an individual provider or prospective individual provider on
the referral registry, the ((authority)) department shall determine
that:
(((i))) (a) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider has met the minimum requirements for training set forth in RCW
74.39A.050;
(((ii))) (b) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider has satisfactorily undergone a criminal background check
conducted within the prior twelve months; and
(((iii))) (c) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider is not listed on any long-term care abuse and neglect registry
used by the department((;
(e) Remove)).
(2) The department shall remove from the referral registry any
individual provider or prospective individual provider ((the authority
determines)) that does not ((to)) meet the qualifications set forth in
(((d) of this)) subsection (1) of this section or to have committed
misfeasance or malfeasance in the performance of his or her duties as
an individual provider. The individual provider or prospective
individual provider, or the consumer to which the individual provider
is providing services, may request a fair hearing to contest the
removal from the referral registry, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW((;
(f))) (3) The department shall provide routine, emergency, and
respite referrals of individual providers and prospective individual
providers to consumers and prospective consumers who are authorized to
receive long-term in-home care services through an individual
provider((;
(g))).
(4) The department shall give preference in the recruiting,
training, referral, and employment of individual providers and
prospective individual providers to recipients of public assistance or
other low-income persons who would qualify for public assistance in the
absence of such employment((; and
(h) Cooperate with the department, area agencies on aging, and
other federal, state, and local agencies to provide the services
described and set forth in this section. If, in the course of carrying
out its duties, the authority identifies concerns regarding the
services being provided by an individual provider, the authority must
notify the relevant area agency or department case manager regarding
such concerns.
(2) In determining how best to carry out its duties, the authority
must identify existing individual provider recruitment, training, and
referral resources made available to consumers by other state and local
public, private, and nonprofit agencies. The authority may coordinate
with the agencies to provide a local presence for the authority and to
provide consumers greater access to individual provider recruitment,
training, and referral resources in a cost-effective manner. Using
requests for proposals or similar processes, the authority may contract
with the agencies to provide recruitment, training, and referral
services if the authority determines the agencies can provide the
services according to reasonable standards of performance determined by
the authority. The authority must provide an opportunity for consumer
participation in the determination of the standards)).

Sec. 9 RCW 74.39A.260 and 2009 c 580 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department must perform criminal background checks for
individual providers and prospective individual providers ((and ensure
that the authority has ready access to any long-term care abuse and
neglect registry used by the department)). Individual providers who
are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under
RCW 74.39A.055.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2007 c 361 s 7 and 2007 c 278 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the authority
during the collective bargaining process to allow the authority to
communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services
received by consumers. ((The governor or the governor's designee shall
consult the authority on all issues for which the exclusive bargaining
representative requests to engage in collective bargaining under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section.)) The ((authority))
department shall ((work with)) solicit input from the developmental
disabilities council, the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment, the state council on aging, and other consumer advocacy
organizations to obtain informed input from consumers on their
interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all issues
proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6) ((and
(7))) of this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires; and
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.
(5) ((In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6))) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW
74.39A.300, the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual
providers are determined solely through collective bargaining as
provided in this chapter. No agency or department of the state may
establish policies or rules governing the wages or hours of individual
providers. However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (((6))) (5)(f).
(((7))) (6) At the request of the exclusive bargaining
representative, the governor or the governor's designee appointed under
chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in
RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive bargaining representative over
employer contributions to the training partnership for the costs of:
(a) Meeting all training and peer mentoring required under this
chapter; and (b) other training intended to promote the career
development of individual providers.
(((8)(a))) (7) The state, the department, ((the authority,)) the
area agencies on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not
be held vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the ((authority's)) referral registry or referred to a
consumer or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective
bargaining agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the
referral registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for
a consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider
and the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(((b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(9))) (8) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.56.030 and 2010 c 296 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) (("Home care quality authority" means the authority under
chapter 74.39A RCW.
(9))) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(((10))) (9) "Institution of higher education" means the University
of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington
University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington
University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state
community colleges.
(((11))) (10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent
contractor who provides spoken language interpreter services for
department of social and health services appointments or medicaid
enrollee appointments, or provided these services on or after January
1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language
access agency, or the department.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency.
(((12))) (11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public
employer except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b)
appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a
specified term of office as a member of a multimember board,
commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or
body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy,
administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential
relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable
bargaining unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii)
any person appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or
resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember
board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive
head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner
or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or a
department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e)
who is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court
judge, or court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this
subsection, no more than one assistant for each judge or commissioner
may be excluded from a bargaining unit.
(((13))) (12) "Public employer" means any officer, board,
commission, council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any
public body governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public
body. For the purposes of this section, the public employer of
district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters is
the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting
on behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for
nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the
respective district court or superior court.
(((14))) (13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement
officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of
any city or town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more
and law enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any
county with a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional
employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and
noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or
more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.105.340 and 2008 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate among state agencies to develop
a consumer protection web site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop
web site for consumer information. At a minimum, the web site must
provide links to information on:
(a) Insurance information provided by the office of the insurance
commissioner, including information on how to file consumer complaints
against insurance companies, how to look up authorized insurers, and
how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(b) Child care information provided by the department of early
learning, including how to select a child care provider, how child care
providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(c) Financial information provided by the department of financial
institutions, including consumer information on financial fraud,
investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(d) Health care information provided by the department of health,
including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(e) Home care information provided by the ((home care quality
authority)) department, including information to assist consumers in
finding an in-home provider;
(f) Licensing information provided by the department of licensing,
including information regarding business, vehicle, and professional
licensing; and
(g) Other information available on existing state agency web sites
that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the department
on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could be made
available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Horse Racing Commission--Reducing Commission Members
Sec. 13 RCW 67.16.012 and 1998 c 345 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the Washington horse racing commission, to
consist of ((five)) three commissioners, appointed by the governor and
confirmed by the senate. The commissioners shall be citizens,
residents, and qualified electors of the state of Washington, one of
whom shall be a breeder of race horses and shall be of at least one
year's standing. The terms of the members shall be six years. Each
member shall hold office until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified. Vacancies in the office of commissioner shall be filled by
appointment to be made by the governor for the unexpired term. Any
commissioner may be removed at any time at the pleasure of the
governor. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each
commissioner shall enter into a surety company bond, to be approved by
the governor and attorney general, payable to the state of Washington,
in the penal sum of five thousand dollars, conditioned upon the
faithful performance of his or her duties and the correct accounting
and payment of all sums received and coming within his or her control
under this chapter, and in addition thereto each commissioner shall
take and subscribe to an oath of office of the same form as that
prescribed by law for elective state officers.

Indeterminate Sentencing Review Board
Sec. 14 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is created within the department. The board shall
consist of a ((chairman)) chair and four other members, each of whom
shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate.
Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall expire on
April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the membership of the
board shall be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent
of the senate. In the event of the inability of any member to act, the
governor shall appoint some competent person to act in his stead during
the continuance of such inability. The members shall not be removable
during their respective terms except for cause determined by the
superior court of Thurston county. The governor in appointing the
members shall designate one of them to serve as ((chairman)) chair at
the governor's pleasure. The appointed ((chairman)) chair shall serve
as a fully participating board member ((and as the director of the
agency)).
The members of the board and ((its officers and employees)) staff
assigned to the board shall not engage in any other business or
profession or hold any other public office without the prior approval
of the executive ethics board indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020,
42.52.030, 42.52.040 and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of
appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as the
representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association. The members of the board shall
each severally receive salaries ((fixed by the governor)) in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Employees assigned to the
board shall be employees of the department.
The ((board)) secretary may employ((, and fix, with the approval of
the governor, the compensation of and prescribe the duties of)) a
senior administrative officer and such ((officers, employees, and
assistants)) other personnel as may be necessary((, and provide
necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment)) to carry out the duties
of the board.

Sec. 15 RCW 9.95.005 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 318 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board shall meet at major state correctional institutions at
such times as may be necessary for a full and complete study of the
cases of all convicted persons whose durations of confinement are to be
determined by it; whose community custody supervision is under the
board's authority; or whose applications for parole come before it.
Other times and places of meetings may also be fixed by the board.
The superintendents of the different institutions shall provide
suitable quarters for the board ((and assistants)) while in the
discharge of their duties.

Sec. 16 RCW 9.95.007 and 1986 c 224 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may meet and transact business in panels. Each board
panel shall consist of at least two members of the board. In all
matters concerning the internal affairs of the board and policy-making
decisions, a majority of the full board must concur in such matters.
The ((chairman)) chair of the board with the consent of a majority of
the board may designate any two members to exercise all the powers and
duties of the board in connection with any hearing before the board.
If the two members so designated cannot unanimously agree as to the
disposition of the hearing assigned to them, such hearing shall be
reheard by the full board. All actions of the full board shall be by
concurrence of a majority of the sitting board members.

Sec. 17 RCW 9.95.140 and 2009 c 28 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall cause a complete record to be kept of every
prisoner under the jurisdiction of the board released on parole or
community custody. Such records shall be organized in accordance with
the most modern methods of filing and indexing so that there will be
always immediately available complete information about each such
prisoner. Subject to information sharing provisions related to
((mentally ill)) offenders((,)) with mental illness and the end of
sentence review committee, ((and the department of corrections,)) the
board may make rules as to the privacy of such records and their use by
others than the board and ((its)) the department staff assigned to
perform board-related duties. Sex offenders convicted of crimes
committed before July 1, 1984, who are under the board's jurisdiction
shall be subject to the determinations of the end of sentence review
committee regarding risk level and subject to sex offender registration
and community notification. The board and the department staff
assigned to perform board-related duties shall be immune from liability
for the release of information concerning sex offenders as provided in
RCW 4.24.550.
The superintendents of state correctional facilities and all
officers and employees thereof and all other public officials shall at
all times cooperate with the board and furnish to the board((, its
officers, and employees)) and staff assigned to perform board-related
duties such information as may be necessary to enable it to perform its
functions, and such superintendents and other employees shall at all
times give the members of the board((, its officers, and employees))
and staff assigned to perform board-related duties free access to all
prisoners confined in the state correctional facilities.
(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 shall be subject to the
determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk
level and subject to sex offender registration and community
notification.
(3) The end of sentence review committee shall make law enforcement
notifications for offenders under board jurisdiction on the same basis
that it notifies law enforcement regarding offenders sentenced under
chapter 9.94A RCW for crimes committed after July 1, 1984.

Sec. 18 RCW 9.95.280 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 344 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may deputize any
person (regularly employed by another state) to act as an officer and
agent of this state in effecting the return of any person convicted of
a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has violated the terms and
conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state. In any
matter relating to the return of such a person, any agent so deputized
shall have all the powers of a police officer of this state.

Sec. 19 RCW 9.95.300 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 346 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may enter into
contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for the
purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the
return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of
parole, probation, or community custody as granted by this state.

Sec. 20 RCW 9.96.050 and 2009 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender on parole has performed all obligations of
his or her release, including any and all legal financial obligations,
for such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board
that his or her final release is not incompatible with the best
interests of society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the
board may make a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of
discharge to the offender.
(b) The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the offender's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted and any and all legal
financial obligations have been paid, the board shall issue a final
order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years.
(c) The discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the effect
of restoring all civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520,
and the certification of discharge shall so state.
(d) This restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to
receive, possess, own, or transport firearms.
(e) The board shall issue a certificate of discharge to the
offender in person or by mail to the offender's last known address.
(2) ((The board shall send to the department of corrections)) A
copy of every signed certificate of discharge for offender sentences
under the authority of the department of corrections shall be placed in
the department's files.
(3) The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered
as a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

Sec. 21 RCW 71.05.385 and 2009 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A mental health service provider shall release to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:
(a) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a
person who has been committed under this chapter.
(b) Information related to mental health services, in the format
determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person
who:
(i) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;
(ii) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity
of a serious violent offense; or
(iii) Was charged with a serious violent offense and such charges
were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.
Legal counsel may release such information to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section on behalf of the mental
health service provider, provided that nothing in this subsection shall
require the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client
privileged information.
(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this
section shall be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of a
county or city jail, designated mental health professionals, public
health officers, therapeutic court personnel, or personnel of the
department of corrections, ((or personnel of)) including the
indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform
board-related duties, when such information is requested during the
course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health
service provider or person employed by a mental health service
provider, or its legal counsel, shall be liable for information
released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules
adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.440.
(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(b) of
this section must comply with the following restrictions:
(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted
by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate
purposes for requesting information under this section include:
(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment
reports;
(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;
(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when
confined in a city or county jail;
(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender,
including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions
of community supervision; and
(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of
corrections supervision.
(b) Information shall not be requested under this section unless
the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who
is the subject of the information:
(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation
of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or
her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the
near future; or
(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning
which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under
this chapter.
(c) Any information received under this section shall be held
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in
this chapter, except:
(i) Such information may be shared with other persons who have the
right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this
section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to
the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner
consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;
(ii) Such information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney
acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information
under this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection shall
be subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as
the person who requested the information; and
(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(4) A request for information related to mental health services
under this section shall not require the consent of the subject of the
records. Such request shall be provided in writing, except to the
extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request
may include requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the
information being requested.
(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant
risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service provider,
or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental
health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information
regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of
corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may
be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed
in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is
limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being
treated by the mental health service provider and the address or
information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.
(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement
authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance
portability and accountability act.
(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the department
shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to
mental health services made under this section and a standard format
for information provided in response to such requests. Consistent with
the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal
health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the
standard form for responsive information, the department shall design
the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the
minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is
requested.

Sec. 22 RCW 72.09.585 and 2004 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department is determining an offender's risk
management level, the department shall inquire of the offender and
shall be told whether the offender is subject to court-ordered
treatment for mental health services or chemical dependency services.
The department shall request and the offender shall provide an
authorization to release information form that meets applicable state
and federal requirements and shall provide the offender with written
notice that the department will request the offender's mental health
and substance abuse treatment information. An offender's failure to
inform the department of court-ordered treatment is a violation of the
conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an
infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or
infraction is subject to sanctions.
(2) When an offender discloses that he or she is subject to court-ordered mental health services or chemical dependency treatment, the
department shall provide the mental health services provider or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a written request for
information and any necessary authorization to release information
forms. The written request shall comply with rules adopted by the
department of social and health services or protocols developed jointly
by the department and the department of social and health services. A
single request shall be valid for the duration of the offender's
supervision in the community. Disclosures of information related to
mental health services made pursuant to a department request shall not
require consent of the offender.
(3) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be released to the indeterminate
sentence review board as relevant to carry out its responsibility of
planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons
under its jurisdiction. Further disclosure by the indeterminate
sentence review board is subject to the limitations set forth in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section and must be consistent with the
written policy of the indeterminate sentence review board. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
indeterminate sentence review board or ((its employees)) staff assigned
to perform board-related duties provided that the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence.
(4) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be used to meet the statutory duties of
the department to provide evidence or report to the court. Disclosure
to the public of information provided to the court by the department
related to mental health services shall be limited in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.500 or this section.
(5) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to other
state and local agencies as relevant to plan for and provide offenders
transition, treatment, and supervision services, or as relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by a
particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the written policy
established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall
not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence. The information received by a state or local agency from
the department shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations
on disclosure set forth in chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and,
subject to these limitations, may be released only as relevant and
necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular offender.
(6) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to
individuals only with respect to offenders who have been determined by
the department to have a high risk of reoffending by a risk assessment,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, only as relevant and necessary for those
individuals to take reasonable steps for the purpose of self-protection, or as provided in RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may
not be disclosed for the purpose of engaging the public in a system of
supervision, monitoring, and reporting offender behavior to the
department. The department must limit the disclosure of information
related to mental health services to the public to descriptions of an
offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and
need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not
disclose or release to the public copies of treatment documents or
records, except as otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of
information to the public must be done in a manner consistent with the
written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose
or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its
employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any person from
reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or she
believes creates a public safety risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) The indeterminate sentence review
board is transferred to the department of corrections.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the indeterminate
sentence review board shall be delivered to the custody of the
department of corrections. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
indeterminate sentence review board shall be made available to the
department of corrections. All funds, credits, or other assets held by
the indeterminate sentence review board shall be assigned to the
department of corrections.
(b) Any appropriations made to the indeterminate sentence review
board shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of corrections.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the indeterminate sentence review board are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of corrections to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the indeterminate
sentence review board shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of corrections. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of
corrections.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the indeterminate sentence review board shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the indeterminate sentence review
board assigned to the department of corrections under this act whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
department of corrections shall become a part of the existing
bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this act and despite the
transfer of the indeterminate sentence review board to the department
of corrections, the members of the indeterminate sentence review board
will possess and shall exercise independent judgment when making any
decisions concerning offenders. These decisions include, but are not
limited to, decisions concerning offenders' release, revocation, or
reinstatement, or the imposition of conditions of supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 RCW 4.24.5502 is decodified.

Migratory Waterfowl Art Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 RCW 77.12.680 (Migratory waterfowl art
committee -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Chairman -- Review of
expenditures -- Compensation) and 1987 c 506 s 54 & 1985 c 243 s 5 are
each repealed.

Sec. 26 RCW 77.12.670 and 2002 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The)) Beginning July 1, 2011, the department, after
soliciting recommendations from the public, shall select the design for
the migratory bird stamp ((to be produced by the department shall use
the design as provided by the migratory waterfowl art committee)).
(2) All revenue derived from the sale of migratory bird license
validations or stamps by the department to any person hunting waterfowl
or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund)) account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of
printing and production of the stamps for migratory waterfowl hunters
as determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those
migratory waterfowl projects specified by the director of the
department for the acquisition and development of migratory waterfowl
habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection, and
propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state. Migratory bird
license validation and stamp funds may not be used on lands controlled
by private hunting clubs or on private lands that charge a fee for
public access. Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may
be used for migratory waterfowl projects on private land where public
hunting is provided by written permission or on areas established by
the department as waterfowl hunting closures.
(3) All revenue derived from the sale of the license validation and
stamp by the department to persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl
migratory birds shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of printing
and production of the stamps for nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters as
determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those
nonwaterfowl migratory bird projects specified by the director for the
acquisition and development of nonwaterfowl migratory bird habitat in
the state and for the enhancement, protection, and propagation of
nonwaterfowl migratory birds in the state.
(4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and stamp
sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors, the
department shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl
hunters and solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the
yearly migratory bird hunter harvest information program survey results
or, in the event that these results are not available, other similar
survey results. A two-year average of the most recent survey results
shall be used to determine the proportion of the revenue attributed to
migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year. For fiscal
year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six percent of the
stamp revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and
four percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory game hunters.
(5) Acquisition shall include but not be limited to the acceptance
of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the rental, lease,
or purchase of real estate or any interest therein. If the department
acquires any fee interest, leasehold, or rental interest in real
property under this section, it shall allow the general public
reasonable access to that property and shall, if appropriate, ensure
that the deed or other instrument creating the interest allows such
access to the general public. If the department obtains a covenant in
real property in its favor or an easement or any other interest in real
property under this section, it shall exercise its best efforts to
ensure that the deed or other instrument creating the interest grants
to the general public in the form of a covenant running with the land
reasonable access to the property. The private landowner from whom the
department obtains such a covenant or easement shall retain the right
of granting access to the lands by written permission, but may not
charge a fee for access.
(6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps in any given
year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The excess
stamps may be sold to the ((migratory waterfowl art committee for sale
to the)) public.

Sec. 27 RCW 77.12.690 and 2009 c 333 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((migratory waterfowl art committee)) director is
responsible for the selection of the annual migratory bird stamp design
((and shall provide the design to the department. If the committee
does not perform this duty within the time frame necessary to achieve
proper and timely distribution of the stamps to license dealers, the
director shall initiate the art work selection for that year)). The
((committee)) department shall create collector art prints and related
artwork, utilizing the same design ((as provided to the department)).
The administration, sale, distribution, and other matters relating to
the prints and sales of stamps with prints and related artwork shall be
the responsibility of the ((migratory waterfowl art committee))
department.
(2) The total amount brought in from the sale of prints and related
artwork shall be deposited in the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170. The costs of producing and marketing of prints and related
artwork((, including administrative expenses mutually agreed upon by
the committee and the director,)) shall be paid out of the total amount
brought in from sales of those same items. Net funds derived from the
sale of prints and related artwork shall be used by the director to
contract with one or more appropriate individuals or nonprofit
organizations for the development of waterfowl propagation projects
within Washington which specifically provide waterfowl for the Pacific
flyway. The department shall not contract with any individual or
organization that obtains compensation for allowing waterfowl hunting
except if the individual or organization does not permit hunting for
compensation on the subject property.
((The migratory waterfowl art committee shall have an annual audit
of its finances conducted by the state auditor and shall furnish a copy
of the audit to the commission.))

Sec. 28 RCW 77.08.045 and 1998 c 191 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted pursuant to this title:
(1) "Migratory waterfowl" means members of the family Anatidae,
including brants, ducks, geese, and swans;
(2) "Migratory bird" means migratory waterfowl and coots, snipe,
doves, and band-tailed pigeon;
(3) "Migratory bird stamp" means the stamp that is required by RCW
77.32.350 to be in the possession of all persons to hunt migratory
birds; and
(4) "Prints and artwork" means replicas of the original stamp
design that are sold to the general public. Prints and artwork are not
to be construed to be the migratory bird stamp that is required by RCW
77.32.350. Artwork may be any facsimile of the original stamp design,
including color renditions, metal duplications, or any other kind of
design((; and
(5) "Migratory waterfowl art committee" means the committee created
by RCW 77.12.680. The committee's primary function is to select the
annual migratory bird stamp design)).

Performance Agreement Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee -- Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160 s 4 are each repealed.

Salmon Stamp Selection Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 RCW 77.12.856 (Salmon stamp selection
committee -- Creation) and 1999 c 342 s 5 are each repealed.

Sec. 31 RCW 77.12.850 and 1999 c 342 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.12.850
through 77.12.860 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except
those classified as game fish in this title, and includes:

Scientific Name
Common Name

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye salmon

(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) (("Committee" means the salmon stamp selection committee
created in RCW 77.12.856.
(4))) "Stamp" means the stamp created under the Washington salmon
stamp program and the Washington junior salmon stamp program, created
in RCW 77.12.850 through 77.12.860.

State Advisory Board of Plumbers
Sec. 32 RCW 18.106.110 and 2006 c 185 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be
composed of seven members appointed by the ((governor)) director. Two
members shall be journeyman plumbers, one member shall be a specialty
plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing business,
at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a specialty
plumbing business, and one member from the general public who is
familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.
(2) The term of one journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the
term of the second journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of
the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person
conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the
second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the
term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1,
2007; and the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997.
Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the ((governor))
director shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three
years. However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member
whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement
is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason,
the ((governor)) director shall appoint a new member to serve out the
term of the person whose position has become vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 33 RCW 49.04.010 and 2001 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of labor and industries shall appoint an
apprenticeship council, composed of three representatives each from
employer and employee organizations, respectively. The terms of office
of the members of the apprenticeship council first appointed by the
director of labor and industries shall be as follows: One
representative each of employers and employees shall be appointed for
one year, two years, and three years, respectively. Thereafter, each
member shall be appointed for a term of three years. The ((governor))
director of labor and industries shall also appoint a public member to
the apprenticeship council for a three-year term. ((The appointment of
the public member is subject to confirmation by the senate.)) Each
member shall hold office until a successor is appointed and has
qualified and any vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired portion of the term. A designated representative from each
of the following: The workforce training and education coordinating
board, state board for community and technical colleges, employment
security department, and United States department of labor,
apprenticeship, training, employer, and labor services, shall be ex
officio members of the apprenticeship council. Ex officio members
shall have no vote. Each member of the council, not otherwise
compensated by public moneys, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240.
(2) The apprenticeship council is authorized to approve
apprenticeship programs, and establish apprenticeship program standards
as rules, including requirements for apprentice-related and
supplemental instruction, coordination of instruction with job
experiences, and instructor qualifications. The council shall consider
recommendations from the state board for community and technical
colleges on matters of apprentice-related and supplemental instruction,
coordination of instruction with job experiences, and instructor
qualifications. The rules for apprenticeship instructor qualifications
shall either be by reference or reasonably similar to the applicable
requirements established by or pursuant to chapter 28B.50 RCW. The
council is further authorized to issue such rules as may be necessary
to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter, including a
procedure to resolve an impasse should a tie vote of the council occur,
and perform such other duties as are hereinafter imposed.
(3) Not less than once a year the apprenticeship council shall make
a report to the director of labor and industries of its activities and
findings which shall be available to the public.

Sec. 34 RCW 36.93.051 and 1991 c 363 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boundary review board in each county with a population of one
million or more shall consist of eleven members chosen as follows:
(1) ((Three persons shall be appointed by the governor;
(2) Three)) Four persons shall be appointed by the county
appointing authority;
(((3) Three)) (2) Four persons shall be appointed by the mayors of
the cities and towns located within the county; and
(((4) Two)) (3) Three persons shall be appointed by the board from
nominees of special districts in the county.
The governor shall designate one initial appointee to serve a term
of two years, and two initial appointees to serve terms of four years,
if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial
appointee to serve a term of one year, and two initial appointees to
serve terms of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the
first day of February in the year the appointment was made.
The county appointing authority shall designate one of its initial
appointees to serve a term of two years, and two of its initial
appointees to serve terms of four years, if the appointments are made
in an odd-numbered year, or one of its initial appointees to serve a
term of one year, and two of its initial appointees to serve terms of
three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year,
with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of
February in the year the appointment was made.
The mayors making the initial city and town appointments shall
designate two of their initial appointees to serve terms of two years,
and one of their initial appointees to serve a term of four years, if
the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or two of their
initial appointees to serve terms of one year, and one of their initial
appointees to serve a term of three years, if the appointments are made
in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated
from the first day of February in the year the appointment was made.
The board shall make two initial appointments from the nominees of
special districts, with one appointee serving a term of four years and
one initial appointee serving a term of two years, if the appointments
are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial appointee serving a
term of three years and one initial appointee serving a term of one
year if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the
length of the term being calculated from the first day of March in the
year in which the appointment is made.
After the initial appointments, all appointees shall serve four-year terms.
No appointee may be an official or employee of the county or a
governmental unit in the county, or a consultant or advisor on a
contractual or regular retained basis of the county, any governmental
unit in the county, or any agency or association thereof.

Commission on Pesticide Registration
Sec. 35 RCW 15.92.090 and 1999 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commission on pesticide registration is established. The
commission shall be composed of twelve voting members appointed by the
((governor)) director as follows:
(a) Eight members from the following segments of the state's
agricultural industry as nominated by a statewide private agricultural
association or agricultural commodity commission formed under Title 15
RCW: (i) The tree fruit industry; (ii) hop growers; (iii) potato
growers; (iv) wheat growers; (v) vegetable and seed growers; (vi) berry
growers; (vii) wine grape growers; and (viii) the nursery and landscape
industry. Although members are appointed from various segments of the
agriculture industry, they are appointed to represent and advance the
interests of the industry as a whole.
(b) One member from each of the following: (i) Forest protection
industry; (ii) food processors; (iii) agricultural chemical industry;
and (iv) professional pesticide applicators. One member shall be
appointed for each such segment of the industry and shall be nominated
by a statewide, private association of that segment of the industry.
The representative of the agricultural chemical industry shall be
involved in the manufacture of agricultural crop protection products.
The following shall be ex officio, nonvoting members of the
commission: The coordinator of the interregional project number four
at Washington State University; the director of the department of
ecology or the director's designee; the director of the department of
agriculture or the director's designee; the director of the department
of labor and industries or the director's designee; and the secretary
of the department of health or the secretary's designee.
(2) Each voting member of the commission shall serve a term of
three years. ((However, the first appointments in the first year shall
be made by the governor for one, two, and three-year terms so that, in
subsequent years, approximately one-third of the voting members shall
be appointed each year. The governor shall assign the initial one,
two, and three-year terms to members by lot.)) A vacancy shall be
filled by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner
provided for an appointment to the full term. No member of the
commission may be removed by the ((governor)) director during his or
her term of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. Each member of the
commission shall receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for attending meetings of the commission and
for performing special duties, in the way of official commission
business, specifically assigned to the person by the commission. The
voting members of the commission serve without compensation from the
state other than such travel expenses.
(3) ((Nominations for the initial appointments to the commission
under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted by September 1,
1995. The governor shall make initial appointments to the commission
by October 15, 1995.
(4))) The commission shall elect a chair from among its voting
members each calendar year. After its original organizational meeting,
the commission shall meet at the call of the chair. A majority of the
voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum and an official
action of the commission may be taken by a majority vote of the quorum.

Community Economic Revitalization Board
Sec. 36 RCW 43.160.030 and 2008 c 327 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two
major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses
of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The
board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the
((governor)) director of commerce: A recognized private or public
sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one
city official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian
tribe; one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area
east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of
the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east
of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from
the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the ((governor)) director of commerce.
The members of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as
vice-chair. The director of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, the director of revenue, the commissioner of
employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as
nonvoting advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the ((governor)) director of commerce
shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may
be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific
written charges by the ((governor)) director of commerce, under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the ((governor)) director of commerce may
not be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled
meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence
limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be
replaced by the ((governor)) director of commerce.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Commute Trip Reduction Board
Sec. 37 RCW 70.94.537 and 2006 c 329 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sixteen member state commute trip reduction board is
established as follows:
(a) The secretary of ((the department of)) transportation or the
secretary's designee who shall serve as chair;
(b) One representative from the office of ((the governor or the
governor's designee)) financial management;
(c) The director or the director's designee of one of the following
agencies, to be determined by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation:
(i) Department of general administration;
(ii) Department of ecology;
(iii) Department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce;
(d) Three representatives from cities and towns or counties
appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of transportation for staggered
four-year terms from a list recommended by the association of
Washington cities or the Washington state association of counties;
(e) Two representatives from transit agencies appointed by the
((governor)) secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms
from a list recommended by the Washington state transit association;
(f) Two representatives from participating regional transportation
planning organizations appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms;
(g) Four representatives of employers at or owners of major
worksites in Washington, or transportation management associations,
business improvement areas, or other transportation organizations
representing employers, appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms; and
(h) Two citizens appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms.
Members of the commute trip reduction board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members appointed by the ((governor))
secretary of transportation shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220. The board has all powers necessary to carry out its duties
as prescribed by this chapter.
(2) By March 1, 2007, the department of transportation shall
establish rules for commute trip reduction plans and implementation
procedures. The commute trip reduction board shall advise the
department on the content of the rules. The rules are intended to
ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and goals among
jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences in
employment and housing density, employer size, existing and anticipated
levels of transit service, special employer circumstances, and other
factors the board determines to be relevant. The rules shall include:
(a) Guidance criteria for growth and transportation efficiency
centers;
(b) Data measurement methods and procedures for determining the
efficacy of commute trip reduction activities and progress toward
meeting commute trip reduction plan goals;
(c) Model commute trip reduction ordinances;
(d) Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of employers
who have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in more
than one jurisdiction;
(e) An appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of
special characteristics of their business or its locations would be
unable to meet the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may
obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements and criteria for
determining eligibility for waiver or modification;
(f) Establishment of a process for determining the state's affected
areas, including criteria and procedures for regional transportation
planning organizations in consultation with local jurisdictions to
propose to add or exempt urban growth areas;
(g) Listing of the affected areas of the program to be done every
four years as identified in subsection (5) of this section;
(h) Establishment of a criteria and application process to
determine whether jurisdictions that voluntarily implement commute trip
reduction are eligible for state funding;
(i) Guidelines and deadlines for creating and updating local
commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure consistency
between the local commute trip reduction plan and the transportation
demand management strategies identified in the transportation element
in the local comprehensive plan, as required by RCW 36.70A.070;
(j) Guidelines for creating and updating regional commute trip
reduction plans, including guidance to ensure the regional commute trip
reduction plan is consistent with and incorporated into transportation
demand management components in the regional transportation plan;
(k) Methods for regional transportation planning organizations to
evaluate and certify that designated growth and transportation
efficiency center programs meet the minimum requirements and are
eligible for funding;
(l) Guidelines for creating and updating growth and transportation
efficiency center programs; and
(m) Establishment of statewide program goals. The goals shall be
designed to achieve substantial reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee, at a level that is projected to improve
the mobility of people and goods by increasing the efficiency of the
state highway system.
(3) The board shall create a state commute trip reduction plan that
shall be updated every four years as discussed in subsection (5) of
this section. The state commute trip reduction plan shall include, but
is not limited to: (a) Statewide commute trip reduction program goals
that are designed to substantially improve the mobility of people and
goods; (b) identification of strategies at the state and regional
levels to achieve the goals and recommendations for how transportation
demand management strategies can be targeted most effectively to
support commute trip reduction program goals; (c) performance measures
for assessing the cost-effectiveness of commute trip reduction
strategies and the benefits for the state transportation system; and
(d) a sustainable financial plan. The board shall review and approve
regional commute trip reduction plans, and work collaboratively with
regional transportation planning organizations in the establishment of
the state commute trip reduction plan.
(4) The board shall work with affected jurisdictions, major
employers, and other parties to develop and implement a public
awareness campaign designed to increase the effectiveness of local
commute trip reduction programs and support achievement of the
objectives identified in this chapter.
(5) The board shall evaluate and update the commute trip reduction
program plan and recommend changes to the rules every four years, with
the first assessment report due July 1, 2011, to ensure that the latest
data methodology used by the department of transportation is
incorporated into the program and to determine which areas of the state
should be affected by the program. The board shall review the
definition of a major employer no later than December 1, 2009. The
board shall regularly identify urban growth areas that are projected to
be affected by chapter 329, Laws of 2006 in the next four-year period
and may provide advance planning support to the potentially affected
jurisdictions.
(6) The board shall review progress toward implementing commute
trip reduction plans and programs and the costs and benefits of commute
trip reduction plans and programs and shall make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2009, and every two years
thereafter. In assessing the costs and benefits, the board shall
consider the costs of not having implemented commute trip reduction
plans and programs with the assistance of the transportation
performance audit board authorized under chapter 44.75 RCW. The board
shall examine other transportation demand management programs
nationally and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the
legislature. The recommendations shall address the need for
continuation, modification, or termination or any or all requirements
of this chapter.
(7) The board shall invite personnel with appropriate expertise
from state, regional, and local government, private, public, and
nonprofit providers of transportation services, and employers or owners
of major worksites in Washington to act as a technical advisory group.
The technical advisory group shall advise the board on the
implementation of local and regional commute trip reduction plans and
programs, program evaluation, program funding allocations, and state
rules and guidelines.

Sec. 38 RCW 38.52.040 and 1995 c 269 s 1202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the emergency management council
(hereinafter called the council), to consist of not more than seventeen
members who shall be appointed by the ((governor)) adjutant general.
The membership of the council shall include, but not be limited to,
representatives of city and county governments, sheriffs and police
chiefs, the Washington state patrol, the military department, the
department of ecology, state and local fire chiefs, seismic safety
experts, state and local emergency management directors, search and
rescue volunteers, medical professions who have expertise in emergency
medical care, building officials, and private industry. The
representatives of private industry shall include persons knowledgeable
in emergency and hazardous materials management. The council members
shall elect a chairman from within the council membership. The members
of the council shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed
for their travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or
hereafter amended.
(2) The emergency management council shall advise the governor and
the director on all matters pertaining to state and local emergency
management. The council may appoint such ad hoc committees,
subcommittees, and working groups as are required to develop specific
recommendations for the improvement of emergency management practices,
standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall ensure that the
governor receives an annual assessment of statewide emergency
preparedness including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard
mitigation and reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety
improvements, reduction of flood hazards, and coordination of hazardous
materials planning and response activities. The council or a
subcommittee thereof shall periodically convene in special session and
serve during those sessions as the state emergency response commission
required by P.L. 99-499, the emergency planning and community right-to-know act. When sitting in session as the state emergency response
commission, the council shall confine its deliberations to those items
specified in federal statutes and state administrative rules governing
the coordination of hazardous materials policy. The council shall
review administrative rules governing state and local emergency
management practices and recommend necessary revisions to the director.

Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Steering Committee
Sec. 39 RCW 70.168.020 and 2000 c 93 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an emergency medical services and
trauma care steering committee composed of representatives of
individuals knowledgeable in emergency medical services and trauma
care, including emergency medical providers such as physicians, nurses,
hospital personnel, emergency medical technicians, paramedics,
ambulance services, a member of the emergency medical services
licensing and certification advisory committee, local government
officials, state officials, consumers, and persons affiliated
professionally with health science schools. The ((governor)) secretary
shall appoint members of the steering committee. Members shall be
appointed for a period of three years. The department shall provide
administrative support to the committee. All appointive members of the
committee, in the performance of their duties, may be entitled to
receive travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The ((governor)) secretary may remove members from the committee who
have three unexcused absences from committee meetings. The
((governor)) secretary shall fill any vacancies of the committee in a
timely manner. The terms of those members representing the same field
shall not expire at the same time.
The committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair whose terms of
office shall be for one year each. The chair shall be ineligible for
reelection after serving four consecutive terms.
The committee shall meet on call by the ((governor,)) the
secretary((,)) or the chair.
(2) The emergency medical services and trauma care steering
committee shall:
(a) Advise the department regarding emergency medical services and
trauma care needs throughout the state.
(b) Review the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
plans and recommend changes to the department before the department
adopts the plans.
(c) Review proposed departmental rules for emergency medical
services and trauma care.
(d) Recommend modifications in rules regarding emergency medical
services and trauma care.

Horse Racing Compact Committee
Sec. 40 RCW 67.17.050 and 2001 c 18 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created an interstate governmental entity to be known
as the "compact committee" which shall be comprised of one official
from the racing commission or its equivalent in each party state who
shall be appointed, serve, and be subject to removal in accordance with
the laws of the party state he or she represents. Under the laws of
his or her party state, each official shall have the assistance of his
or her state's racing commission or the equivalent thereof in
considering issues related to licensing of participants in live racing
and in fulfilling his or her responsibilities as the representative
from his or her state to the compact committee. If an official is
unable to perform any duty in connection with the powers and duties of
the compact committee, the racing commission or equivalent thereof from
his or her state shall designate another of its members as an alternate
who shall serve in his or her place and represent the party state as
its official on the compact committee until that racing commission or
equivalent thereof determines that the original representative official
is able once again to perform his or her duties as that party state's
representative official on the compact committee. The designation of
an alternate shall be communicated by the affected state's racing
commission or equivalent thereof to the compact committee as the
committee's bylaws may provide.
(2) The ((governor)) horse racing commission shall appoint the
official to represent the state of Washington on the compact committee
for a term of four years. No official may serve more than three
consecutive terms. A vacancy shall be filled by the ((governor)) horse
racing commission for the unexpired term.

Productivity Board
Sec. 41 RCW 41.60.015 and 2000 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the productivity board, which may also
be known as the employee involvement and recognition board. The board
shall administer the employee suggestion program and the teamwork
incentive program under this chapter.
(2) The board shall be composed of:
(a) The secretary of state who shall act as chairperson;
(b) The director of personnel appointed under the provisions of RCW
41.06.130 or the director's designee;
(c) The director of financial management or the director's
designee;
(d) The director of general administration or the director's
designee;
(e) Three persons with experience in administering incentives such
as those used by industry, with the ((governor,)) lieutenant governor,
secretary of state, and speaker of the house of representatives each
appointing one person. The ((governor's)) secretary of state's
appointee shall be a representative of an employee organization
certified as an exclusive representative of at least one bargaining
unit of classified employees; and
(f) Two persons representing state agencies and institutions with
employees subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, and one person representing
those subject to chapter 28B.16 RCW, both appointed by the ((governor;
and
(g) In addition, the governor and board chairperson may jointly
appoint persons to the board on an ad hoc basis. Ad hoc members shall
serve in an advisory capacity and shall not have the right to vote))
secretary of state.
Members under subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section shall be
appointed to serve three-year terms.
Members of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of
this section may be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Any
board member who is not a state employee may be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 42 RCW 43.20A.685 and 1981 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The initial members of the council shall be appointed by the
governor to staggered terms such that approximately one-third of the
members serve terms of one year, one-third serve terms of two years,
and one-third serve terms of three years. Thereafter,)) Members of the
council shall be appointed ((by the governor)) to terms of three years,
except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be
for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs.
No member of the council may serve more than two consecutive three-year
terms. Each area agency on aging advisory council shall appoint one
member ((shall be appointed)) from ((each)) its state-designated
planning and service area ((from a list of names transmitted by each
area agency on aging advisory council, such list including the names of
all persons nominated within the planning and service area together
with the area agency on aging advisory council's recommendations)).
The governor shall appoint one additional member from names submitted
by the association of Washington cities and one additional member from
names submitted by the Washington state association of counties. In
addition, the governor may appoint not more than five at large members,
in order to ensure that rural areas (those areas outside of a standard
metropolitan statistical area), minority populations, and those
individuals with special skills which could assist the state council
are represented. The members of the state council on aging shall
elect, at the council's initial meeting and at the council's first
meeting each year, one member to serve as chairperson of the council
and another member to serve as secretary of the council.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate shall each appoint two nonvoting members to the council;
one from each of the two largest caucuses in each house. The terms of
the members so appointed shall be for approximately two years and the
terms shall expire before the first day of the legislative session in
odd-numbered years. They shall be compensated by their respective
houses as provided under RCW 44.04.120, as now or hereafter amended.
(3) With the exception of the members from the Washington state
association of cities, the Washington state association of counties,
and the nonvoting legislative members, all members of the council shall
be at least fifty-five years old.

Washington State Horse Park Commission
Sec. 43 RCW 79A.30.030 and 2000 c 11 s 85 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit corporation may be formed under the nonprofit
corporation provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW to carry out the purposes
of this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 79A.30.040, the corporation
shall have all the powers and be subject to the same restrictions as
are permitted or prescribed to nonprofit corporations and shall
exercise those powers only for carrying out the purposes of this
chapter and those purposes necessarily implied therefrom. The
nonprofit corporation shall be known as the Washington state horse park
authority. The articles of incorporation shall provide that it is the
responsibility of the authority to develop, promote, operate, manage,
and maintain the Washington state horse park. The articles of
incorporation shall provide for appointment of directors and other
conduct of business consistent with the requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The articles of incorporation shall provide for a seven-member board of directors for the authority, all appointed by the
((governor)) commission. Board members shall serve three-year terms,
except that two of the original appointees shall serve one-year terms,
and two of the original appointees shall serve two-year terms. A board
member may serve consecutive terms.
(b) The articles of incorporation shall provide that the
((governor)) commission appoint board members as follows:
(i) One board member shall represent the interests of the
commission((. In making this appointment, the governor shall solicit
recommendations from the commission));
(ii) One board member shall represent the interests of the county
in which the park is located. In making this appointment, the
((governor)) commission shall solicit recommendations from the county
legislative authority; and
(iii) Five board members shall represent the geographic and sports
discipline diversity of equestrian interests in the state, and at least
one of these members shall have business experience relevant to the
organization of horse shows or operation of a horse show facility. In
making these appointments, the ((governor)) commission shall solicit
recommendations from a variety of active horse-related organizations in
the state.
(3) The articles of incorporation shall include a policy that
provides for the preferential use of a specific area of the horse park
facilities at nominal cost for horse groups associated with youth
groups and ((the disabled)) individuals with disabilities.
(4) The ((governor)) commission shall make appointments to fill
board vacancies for positions authorized under subsection (2) of this
section, upon additional solicitation of recommendations from the board
of directors.
(5) The board of directors shall perform their duties in the best
interests of the authority, consistent with the standards applicable to
directors of nonprofit corporations under RCW 24.03.127.

Educational Opportunity Gap Oversight and Accountability Committee
Sec. 44 RCW 28A.300.136 and 2010 c 235 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee is created to synthesize the findings and
recommendations from the 2008 achievement gap studies into an
implementation plan, and to recommend policies and strategies to the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and the state board of education to close the
achievement gap.
(2) The committee shall recommend specific policies and strategies
in at least the following areas:
(a) Supporting and facilitating parent and community involvement
and outreach;
(b) Enhancing the cultural competency of current and future
educators and the cultural relevance of curriculum and instruction;
(c) Expanding pathways and strategies to prepare and recruit
diverse teachers and administrators;
(d) Recommending current programs and resources that should be
redirected to narrow the gap;
(e) Identifying data elements and systems needed to monitor
progress in closing the gap;
(f) Making closing the achievement gap part of the school and
school district improvement process; and
(g) Exploring innovative school models that have shown success in
closing the achievement gap.
(3) Taking a multidisciplinary approach, the committee may seek
input and advice from other state and local agencies and organizations
with expertise in health, social services, gang and violence
prevention, substance abuse prevention, and other issues that
disproportionately affect student achievement and student success.
(4) The ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate
education committees, or their designees;
(b) One additional member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house and one additional member of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the office of the education ombudsman;
(d) A representative of the center for the improvement of student
learning in the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(e) A representative of federally recognized Indian tribes whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington
state, designated by the federally recognized tribes; and
(f) Four members appointed by the governor in consultation with the
state ethnic commissions, who represent the following populations:
African-Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Pacific
Islander Americans.
(5) The governor and the tribes are encouraged to designate members
who have experience working in and with schools.
(6) The committee may convene ad hoc working groups to obtain
additional input and participation from community members. Members of
ad hoc working groups shall serve without compensation and shall not be
reimbursed for travel or other expenses.
(7) The chair or cochairs of the committee shall be selected by the
members of the committee. Staff support for the committee shall be
provided by the center for the improvement of student learning.
Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but must be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative
members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the quality
education council shall work collaboratively with the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee to
close the achievement gap.

Capitol Campus Design Advisory Committee
Sec. 45 RCW 43.34.080 and 1990 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The capitol campus design advisory committee is established as
an advisory group to the capitol committee and the director of general
administration to review programs, planning, design, and landscaping of
state capitol facilities and grounds and to make recommendations that
will contribute to the attainment of architectural, aesthetic,
functional, and environmental excellence in design and maintenance of
capitol facilities on campus and located in neighboring communities.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following persons
who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the ((governor))
director of general administration:
(a) Two architects;
(b) A landscape architect; and
(c) An urban planner.
The ((governor)) director of general administration shall appoint
the chair and vice chair and shall ((instruct the director of general
administration to)) provide the staff and resources necessary for
implementing this section. The advisory committee shall meet at least
once every ninety days and at the call of the chair.
The members of the committee shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
43.03.220 and 44.04.120.
(3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of
state and two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus,
who shall be appointed by the president of the senate.
(4) The advisory committee shall review plans and designs affecting
state capitol facilities as they are developed. The advisory
committee's review shall include:
(a) The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate
professional design services including design-build proposals;
(b) Compliance with the capitol campus master plan and design
concepts as adopted by the capitol committee;
(c) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol facilities
relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon
the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other
factors;
(d) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to
the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of
the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and
(e) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals,
street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol
campus and buildings.

Correctional Industries Board
Sec. 46 RCW 72.09.070 and 2004 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) There is created a correctional industries ((board of
directors)) advisory committee which shall have the composition
provided in RCW 72.09.080. The advisory committee shall make
recommendations to the secretary regarding the implementation of RCW
72.09.100.
(((2) Consistent with general department of corrections policies
and procedures pertaining to the general administration of correctional
facilities, the board shall establish and implement policy for
correctional industries programs designed to:
(a) Offer inmates meaningful employment, work experience, and
training in vocations that are specifically designed to reduce
recidivism and thereby enhance public safety by providing opportunities
for legitimate means of livelihood upon their release from custody;
(b) Provide industries which will reduce the tax burden of
corrections and save taxpayers money through production of goods and
services for sale and use;
(c) Operate correctional work programs in an effective and
efficient manner which are as similar as possible to those provided by
the private sector;
(d) Encourage the development of and provide for selection of,
contracting for, and supervision of work programs with participating
private enterprise firms;
(e) Develop and select correctional industries work programs that
do not unfairly compete with Washington businesses;
(f) Invest available funds in correctional industries enterprises
and meaningful work programs that minimize the impact on in-state jobs
and businesses.
(3) The board of directors shall at least annually review the work
performance of the director of correctional industries division with
the secretary.
(4) The director of correctional industries division shall review
and evaluate the productivity, funding, and appropriateness of all
correctional work programs and report on their effectiveness to the
board and to the secretary.
(5) The board of directors shall have the authority to identify and
establish trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs. The secretary shall appoint the
members of the committees.
Where a labor management trade advisory and apprenticeship
committee has already been established by the department pursuant to
RCW 72.62.050 the existing committee shall also advise the board of
directors.
(6) The board shall develop a strategic yearly marketing plan that
shall be consistent with and work towards achieving the goals
established in the six-year phased expansion of class I and class II
correctional industries established in RCW 72.09.111. This marketing
plan shall be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 17 of each calendar year until the goals set
forth in RCW 72.09.111 are achieved.))

Sec. 47 RCW 72.09.090 and 1989 c 185 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The correctional industries account is established in the state
treasury. The department of corrections shall deposit in the account
all moneys collected and all profits that accrue from the industrial
and agricultural operations of the department and any moneys
appropriated to the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
for expenses arising in the correctional industries operations.
The division's net profits from correctional industries' sales and
contracts shall be reinvested, without appropriation, in the expansion
and improvement of correctional industries. However, the ((board of
directors)) secretary shall annually recommend that some portion of the
profits from correctional industries be returned to the state general
fund.
The ((board and)) secretary shall request appropriations or
increased appropriations whenever it appears that additional money is
needed to provide for the establishment and operation of a
comprehensive correctional industries program.

Sec. 48 RCW 72.09.100 and 2005 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department, in
developing and selecting correctional industries work programs, does
not encourage the development of, or provide for selection of or
contracting for, or the significant expansion of, any new or existing
class I correctional industries work programs that unfairly compete
with Washington businesses. The legislature intends that the
requirements relating to fair competition in the correctional
industries work programs be liberally construed by the ((correctional
industries board of directors)) department to protect Washington
businesses from unfair competition. For purposes of establishing such
a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the department
consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The ((correctional industries board of directors)) department
shall review these proposed industries, including any potential new
class I industries work program or the significant expansion of an
existing class I industries work program, before the department
contracts to provide such products or services. The review shall
include the analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to determine if the
proposed correctional industries work program will compete with any
Washington business. An agreement for a new class I correctional
industries work program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of
an existing class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly
competes with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department ((of corrections)) shall supply appropriate
security and custody services without charge to the participating
firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b)(i) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit.
(ii) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(A) Public agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations;
(C) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately
used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(D) An employee and immediate family members of an employee of the
department ((of corrections)); and
(E) A person under the supervision of the department ((of
corrections)) and his or her immediate family members.
(iii) The ((correctional industries board of directors)) department
shall authorize the type and quantity of items that may be purchased
and sold under (b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection.
(iv) It is prohibited to purchase any item purchased under
(b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection for the purpose of resale.
(v) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be
donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge
to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the ((correctional industries board of directors))
department before offering such products and services for sale to
private contractors.
(ii) The ((board of directors)) secretary shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential
impact of the proposed products and services on the Washington state
business community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to
the state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department ((of corrections)).
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) ((Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,))
Provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department ((of
corrections)) through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department
((of corrections)). They shall be designed and managed to accomplish
the following objectives:
(i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department to set policy
for work crews. The department shall ((present to the board of
directors)) prepare quarterly detail statements showing where work
crews worked, what correctional industry class, and the hours worked.
((The board of directors may review any class III program at its
discretion.))
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department
((of corrections)). They shall be designed and managed to provide
services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor
or infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department to set policy
for work crews. The department shall ((present to the board of
directors)) prepare quarterly detail statements showing where work
crews worked, what correctional industry class, and the hours worked.
((The board of directors may review any class IV program at its
discretion.)) Class IV correctional industries operated in work camps
established pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements
of this subsection (4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department ((of corrections)). A
unit of local government shall provide work supervision services
without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department ((of corrections)) shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department ((of corrections)). The purpose of this class of industries
is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the
sentencing court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department ((of corrections)) shall reimburse
nonprofit agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 49 RCW 72.09.015 and 2010 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult basic education" means education or instruction designed
to achieve general competence of skills in reading, writing, and oral
communication, including English as a second language and preparation
and testing services for obtaining a high school diploma or a general
equivalency diploma.
(2) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(3) "Community custody" has the same meaning as that provided in
RCW 9.94A.030 and also includes community placement and community
supervision as defined in RCW 9.94B.020.
(4) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(5) "Correctional facility" means a facility or institution
operated directly or by contract by the secretary for the purposes of
incarcerating adults in total or partial confinement, as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.
(6) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(7) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(8) "Earned early release" means earned release as authorized by
RCW 9.94A.728.
(9) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple-site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective in reducing
recidivism for the population.
(10) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an
inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a
private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the
inmate is confined.
(11) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and
policies.
(12) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program
required by the department, including an education, work, or other
program.
(13) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren,
grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents,
great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally married to or in a
state registered domestic partnership with an inmate. "Immediate
family" does not include an inmate adopted by another inmate or the
immediate family of the adopted or adopting inmate.
(14) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or
her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds
and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(15) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare an
offender for release into the community. It should be developed
collaboratively between the department and the offender and based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool
to identify the offender's risks and needs. The individual reentry
plan describes actions that should occur to prepare individual
offenders for release from prison or jail, specifies the supervision
and services they will experience in the community, and describes an
offender's eventual discharge to aftercare upon successful completion
of supervision. An individual reentry plan is updated throughout the
period of an offender's incarceration and supervision to be relevant to
the offender's current needs and risks.
(16) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of the
department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released from such
facility on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons
received from another state, state agency, county, or federal
jurisdiction.
(17) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which
contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to
bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.
(18) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or
physical intervention to control an offender or limit an offender's
freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical
restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of
minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact,
without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited
force and designed to:
(a) Prevent an offender from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;
(b) Remove a disruptive offender who is unwilling to leave the area
voluntarily; or
(c) Guide an offender from one location to another.
(19) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the woman or youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic.
(20) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(21) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based on
preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or
consensus-based practice.
(22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(23) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a
person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(24) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(25) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into a new
product line or service to the class I business that results from an
increase in benefits provided by the department, including a decrease
in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer, electricity,
and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax advantages, or
other overhead costs.
(26) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of
corrections, or his or her designee.
(27) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an
incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the correctional facility to
another location from the moment she leaves the correctional facility
to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the
escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from the
correctional facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to
the other location.
(28) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive advantage that
a business may acquire as a result of a correctional industries
contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages, utility rates
(water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other overhead costs.
To determine net competitive advantage, the ((correctional industries
board)) department of corrections shall review and quantify any
expenses unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(29) "Vocational training" or "vocational education" means
"vocational education" as defined in RCW 72.62.020.
(30) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer or
service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10,
2004.
(31) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional industries
jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 50 RCW 72.62.020 and 1989 c 185 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
The term "vocational education" means a planned series of learning
experiences, the specific objective of which is to prepare individuals
for gainful employment as semiskilled or skilled workers or technicians
or subprofessionals in recognized occupations and in new and emerging
occupations, but shall not mean programs the primary characteristic of
which is repetitive work for the purpose of production, including the
correctional industries program. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to prohibit the ((correctional industries board of
directors)) department of corrections from identifying and establishing
trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs.

Sec. 51 RCW 72.09.080 and 1993 sp.s. c 20 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The correctional industries ((board of directors)) advisory
committee shall consist of nine voting members, appointed by the
((governor)) secretary. Each member shall serve a three-year staggered
term. ((Initially, the governor shall appoint three members to one-year terms, three members to two-year terms, and three members to
three-year terms.)) The speaker of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate shall each appoint one member from each of
the two largest caucuses in their respective houses. The legislators
so appointed shall be nonvoting members and shall serve two-year terms,
or until they cease to be members of the house from which they were
appointed, whichever occurs first. The nine members appointed by the
((governor)) secretary shall include three representatives from labor,
three representatives from business representing cross-sections of
industries and all sizes of employers, and three members from the
general public.
(2) The ((board of directors)) committee shall elect a chair and
such other officers as it deems appropriate from among the voting
members.
(3) The voting members of the ((board of directors)) committee
shall serve with compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed by the department for travel expenses and per diem under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended. Legislative
members shall be reimbursed under RCW 44.04.120, as now or hereafter
amended.
(4) The secretary shall provide such staff services, facilities,
and equipment as the board shall require to carry out its duties.

Hanford Area Economic Investment Fund Committee
Sec. 52 RCW 43.31.425 and 1998 c 76 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Hanford area economic investment fund advisory committee is
hereby established to advise the director of the department of
commerce.
(1) The committee shall have eleven members. The ((governor))
director of the department of commerce shall appoint the members, in
consultation with Hanford area elected officials, subject to the
following requirements:
(a) All members shall either reside or be employed within the
Hanford area.
(b) The committee shall have a balanced membership representing one
member each from the elected leadership of Benton county, Franklin
county, the city of Richland, the city of Kennewick, the city of Pasco,
a Hanford area port district, the labor community, and four members
from the Hanford area business and financial community.
(c) Careful consideration shall be given to assure minority
representation on the committee.
(2) Each member appointed by the ((governor)) director of the
department of commerce shall serve a term of three years((, except that
of the members first appointed, four shall serve two-year terms and
four shall serve one-year terms)). A person appointed to fill a
vacancy of a member shall be appointed in a like manner and shall serve
for only the unexpired term. A member is eligible for reappointment.
A member may be removed by the ((governor)) director of the department
of commerce for cause.
(3) The ((governor)) director of the department of commerce shall
designate a member of the committee as its chairperson. The committee
may elect such other officers as it deems appropriate. Six members of
the committee constitute a quorum and six affirmative votes are
necessary for the transaction of business or the exercise of any power
or function of the committee.
(4) The members shall serve without compensation, but are entitled
to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(5) Members shall not be liable to the state, to the fund, or to
any other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial
or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or
intentional violations of law. The department may purchase liability
insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the
claims of others.

Sec. 53 RCW 43.31.422 and 2004 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Hanford area economic investment fund is established in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall only be used
for reasonable assistant attorney general costs in support of the
committee or pursuant to the decisions of the committee created in RCW
43.31.425 for Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area
infrastructure projects, or other Hanford area economic development and
diversification projects, but may not be used for government or
nonprofit organization operating expenses. Up to five percent of
moneys in the fund may be used for program administration. For the
purpose of this chapter "Hanford area" means Benton and Franklin
counties. The director of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce or the director's designee shall authorize
disbursements from the fund ((after an affirmative vote of at least six
members)) with the advice of the committee created in RCW 43.31.425
((on any decisions reached by the committee created in RCW 43.31.425)).
The fund is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements. The
legislature intends to establish similar economic investment funds for
areas that develop low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Home Inspector Advisory Licensing Board
Sec. 54 RCW 18.280.040 and 2008 c 119 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state home inspector advisory licensing board is created.
The board consists of seven members appointed by the ((governor))
director, who shall advise the director concerning the administration
of this chapter. Of the appointments to this board, six must be
actively engaged as home inspectors immediately prior to their
appointment to the board, and one must be currently teaching in a home
inspector education program. Insofar as possible, the composition of
the appointed home inspector members of the board must be generally
representative of the geographic distribution of home inspectors
licensed under this chapter. No more than two board members may be
members of a particular national home inspector association or
organization.
(2) A home inspector must have the following qualifications to be
appointed to the board:
(a) Actively engaged as a home inspector in the state of Washington
for five years;
(b) Licensed as a home inspector under this chapter, except for
initial appointments; and
(c) Performed a minimum of five hundred home inspections in the
state of Washington.
(3) Members of the board are appointed for three-year terms. Terms
must be staggered so that not more than two appointments are scheduled
to be made in any calendar year. Members hold office until the
expiration of the terms for which they were appointed. The
((governor)) director may remove a board member for just cause. The
((governor)) director may appoint a new member to fill a vacancy on the
board for the remainder of the unexpired term. All board members are
limited to two consecutive terms.
(4) Each board member is entitled to compensation for each day
spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

Real Estate Appraiser Commission
Sec. 55 RCW 18.140.230 and 2005 c 339 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established the real estate appraiser commission of the
state of Washington, consisting of seven members who shall act to give
advice to the director.
(1) The seven commission members shall be appointed by the
((governor)) director in the following manner: For a term of six years
each, with the exception of the first appointees who shall be the
incumbent members of the predecessor real estate appraiser advisory
committee to serve for the duration of their current terms, with all
other subsequent appointees to be appointed for a six-year term.
(2) At least two of the commission members shall be selected from
the area of the state east of the Cascade mountain range and at least
two of the commission members shall be selected from the area of the
state west of the Cascade mountain range. At least two members of the
commission shall be certified general real estate appraisers, at least
two members of the commission shall be certified residential real
estate appraisers, and at least one member of the commission may be a
licensed real estate appraiser, all pursuant to this chapter. No
certified or licensed appraiser commission member shall be appointed
who has not been certified and/or licensed pursuant to this chapter for
less than ten years, except that this experience duration shall be not
less than five years only for any commission member taking office
before January 1, 2003. One member shall be an employee of a financial
institution as defined in this chapter whose duties are concerned with
real estate appraisal management and policy. One member shall be an
individual engaged in mass appraisal whose duties are concerned with ad
valorem appraisal management and policy and who is licensed or
certified under this chapter. One member may be a member of the
general public.
(3) The members of the commission annually shall elect their
chairperson and vice chairperson to serve for a term of one calendar
year. A majority of the members of said commission shall at all times
constitute a quorum.
(4) Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by appointment by
the ((governor)) director for the unexpired term.

Sentencing Guidelines Commission
NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 13.40.005 (Juvenile disposition standards commission -- Abolished -- References to commission -- Transfer of powers, duties, and
functions) and 1995 c 269 s 301;
(2) RCW 9.94A.850 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Established -- Powers and duties) and 2009 c 375 s 8, 2009 c 28 s 17, & 2005 c 282 s
19;
(3) RCW 9.94A.863 (Monetary threshold amounts of property crimes -- Review -- Report) and 2009 c 431 s 2;
(4) RCW 9.94A.8672 (Sex offender policy board -- Establishment) and
2008 c 249 s 2;
(5) RCW 9.94A.8673 (Sex offender policy board -- Membership) and 2008
c 249 s 3;
(6) RCW 9.94A.8675 (Sex offender policy board -- Authority) and 2008
c 249 s 5; and
(7) RCW 72.09.350 (Corrections mental health center -- Collaborative
arrangement with University of Washington -- Services for mentally ill
offenders -- Annual report to the legislature) and 1993 c 459 s 1.

Sec. 57 RCW 9.94A.860 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 311 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The sentencing guidelines commission is hereby created as
provided in this section. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.875, the
commission is advisory only and may only advise the governor and the
legislature as deemed necessary by the governor and the legislature.
(2) The commission consists of twenty voting members, one of whom
the governor shall designate as chairperson. With the exception of ex
officio voting members, the voting members of the commission shall be
appointed by the governor, or his or her designee, subject to
confirmation by the senate.
(((2))) (3) The voting membership consists of the following:
(a) The head of the state agency having general responsibility for
adult correction programs, as an ex officio member;
(b) The director of financial management or designee, as an ex
officio member;
(c) The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board, as an ex
officio member;
(d) The head of the state agency, or the agency head's designee,
having responsibility for juvenile corrections programs, as an ex
officio member;
(e) Two prosecuting attorneys;
(f) Two attorneys with particular expertise in defense work;
(g) Four persons who are superior court judges;
(h) One person who is the chief law enforcement officer of a county
or city;
(i) Four members of the public who are not prosecutors, defense
attorneys, judges, or law enforcement officers, one of whom is a victim
of crime or a crime victims' advocate;
(j) One person who is an elected official of a county government,
other than a prosecuting attorney or sheriff;
(k) One person who is an elected official of a city government;
(l) One person who is an administrator of juvenile court services.
In making the appointments, the governor shall endeavor to assure
that the commission membership includes adequate representation and
expertise relating to both the adult criminal justice system and the
juvenile justice system. In making the appointments, the governor
shall seek the recommendations of Washington prosecutors in respect to
the prosecuting attorney members, of the Washington state bar
association in respect to the defense attorney members, of the
association of superior court judges in respect to the members who are
judges, of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in
respect to the member who is a law enforcement officer, of the
Washington state association of counties in respect to the member who
is a county official, of the association of Washington cities in
respect to the member who is a city official, of the office of crime
victims advocacy and other organizations of crime victims in respect to
the member who is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate, and
of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators in
respect to the member who is an administrator of juvenile court
services.
(((3))) (4)(a) All voting members of the commission, except ex
officio voting members, shall serve terms of three years and until
their successors are appointed and confirmed.
(b) The governor shall stagger the terms of the members appointed
under subsection (((2))) (3)(j), (k), and (l) of this section by
appointing one of them for a term of one year, one for a term of two
years, and one for a term of three years.
(((4))) (5) The speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate may each appoint two nonvoting members to the
commission, one from each of the two largest caucuses in each house.
The members so appointed shall serve two-year terms, or until they
cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed,
whichever occurs first.
(((5))) (6) The members of the commission ((shall)) may not be
reimbursed for travel expenses ((as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060)). Legislative members ((shall)) may not be reimbursed by
their respective houses ((as provided under RCW 44.04.120)). Members
((shall be)) are not compensated ((in accordance with RCW 43.03.250)).
(7) The commission may meet if a meeting is called by the governor
and the legislature and only for such purposes as determined by the
governor and the legislature.
(8) The administrative office of the courts must serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation,
analysis, and dissemination of information on:
(a) State and local adult sentencing practices;
(b) State and local juvenile practices; and
(c) Juveniles sentenced as adults.

Sec. 58 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(2) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must be sent a completed copy of the judgment and
sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under
subsection (1) of this section and shall compile a yearly and
cumulative judicial record of each sentencing judge in regards to his
or her sentencing practices for any and all felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must compare each individual judge's sentencing
practices to the standard or presumptive sentence range for any and all
felony crimes listed in subsection (2) of this section for the
appropriate offense level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518,
offender score as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly
weapon enhancements as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both.
These comparative records shall be retained and made available to the
public for review in a current, newly created or reworked official
published document by the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
administrative office of the courts.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the ((sentencing
guidelines commission)) administrative office of the courts as required
in subsection (2) of this section, the ((sentencing guidelines
commission shall have)) administrative office of the courts has the
authority and ((shall)) must undertake reasonable and necessary steps
to assure that all past, current, and future sentencing documents as
defined in subsection (1) of this section are received by the
((sentencing guidelines commission)) administrative office of the
courts.

Sec. 59 RCW 13.50.010 and 2010 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombudsman,
the department of social and health services and its contracting
agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having
children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight
committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(b) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the
juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(c) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the
case;
(d) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the
records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
administrative office of the courts records needed for its research and
data-gathering functions ((under RCW 9.94A.850 and other statutes)).
Access to records or information for research purposes shall be
permitted only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records
or information will be preserved. Each person granted permission to
inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes
shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names
of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
((sentencing guidelines commission under RCW 9.94A.850)) administrative
office of the courts upon request. The commission shall not disclose
the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without
the named individual's written permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

Sec. 60 RCW 9.94A.74501 and 2001 c 35 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) department of
corrections must serve as the state council for interstate adult
offender supervision as required under article IV of RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. ((To assist the
commission in performing its functions as the state council, the
department of corrections shall provide staffing and support
services.)) The ((commission)) department of corrections may form a
subcommittee, including members representing the legislative, judicial,
and executive branches of state government, and victims' groups((, and
the secretary of corrections,)) to perform the functions of the state
council. Any such subcommittee shall include representation of both
houses and at least two of the four largest political caucuses in the
legislature.
(2) The ((commission,)) department of corrections or a subcommittee
if formed for that purpose, shall:
(a) Review department of corrections operations and procedures
under RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend policies to the compact
administrator, including policies to be pursued in the administrator's
capacity as the state's representative on the interstate commission
created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745; and
(b) Report annually to the legislature on interstate supervision
operations and procedures under RCW 9.94A.745, including
recommendations for policy changes((; and
(c) Not later than December 1, 2004, report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of its functioning as the state council under article
IV of RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend any legislation it deems
appropriate)).
(3) The ((commission, or a subcommittee if formed for that purpose,
shall)) department of corrections must appoint ((one of its members,
or)) an employee of the ((department designated by the secretary))
department of corrections, or a subcommittee if formed for that purpose
shall appoint one of its members, to represent the state at meetings of
the interstate commission created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745
when the compact administrator cannot attend.

Sec. 61 RCW 9.94A.855 and 2005 c 282 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((commission shall)) administrative office of the courts must
appoint a research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient
resources to accomplish its duties. The ((commission)) administrative
office of the courts may request from ((the office of financial
management, the indeterminate sentence review board, the administrative
office of the courts,)) the department of corrections((,)) and the
department of social and health services such data, information, and
data processing assistance as it may need to accomplish its duties, and
such services shall be provided without cost to the ((commission))
administrative office of the courts. ((The commission shall adopt its
own bylaws.
The salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be
fixed by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.))

Sec. 62 RCW 9A.52.025 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to
commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters
or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.
(2) Residential burglary is a class B felony. In establishing
sentencing guidelines and disposition standards, ((the sentencing
guidelines commission and the juvenile disposition standards commission
shall consider)) residential burglary ((as)) is to be considered a more
serious offense than second degree burglary.

Sec. 63 RCW 10.98.140 and 1987 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial
management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal
justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies
shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state
criminal justice forecasting.
(2) The office of financial management shall be the official state
agency for the sentenced felon jail forecast. This forecast shall
provide at least a six-year projection and shall be published by
December 1 of every even-numbered year beginning with 1986. The office
of financial management shall seek advice regarding the assumptions in
the forecast from criminal justice agencies and associations.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must keep records on all sentencings above or
below the standard range defined by chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum,
the records shall include the name of the offender, the crimes for
which the offender was sentenced, the name and county of the sentencing
judge, and the deviation from the standard range. Such records shall
be made available to public officials upon request.

Sec. 64 RCW 10.98.160 and 2005 c 282 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions,
and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office
of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall
consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the
administrative office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies,
local jails, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the
indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting
attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial
management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice
issues. The Washington integrated justice information board shall
review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the
courts for development and modification of the statewide justice
information network.

Sec. 65 RCW 72.66.016 and 1983 c 255 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A furlough shall not be granted to a resident if the furlough
would commence prior to the time the resident has served the minimum
amounts of time provided under this section:
(a) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is longer than
twelve months, he or she shall have served at least six months of the
term;
(b) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is less than twelve
months, he or she shall have served at least ninety days and shall have
no longer than six months left to serve on his or her minimum term;
(c) If he or she is serving a mandatory minimum term of
confinement, he or she shall have served all but the last six months of
such term.
(2) A person convicted and sentenced for a violent offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 is not eligible for furlough until the person
has served at least one-half of the minimum term as established by the
((board of prison terms and paroles or the sentencing guidelines
commission)) indeterminate sentence review board.

Sec. 66 RCW 2.56.030 and 2009 c 479 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and
direction of the chief justice:
(1) Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the
offices of the judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the
courts and make recommendations, through the chief justice, for the
improvement of the same;
(2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine
the need for assistance by any court;
(3) Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the
assignment of judges where courts are in need of assistance and carry
out the direction of the chief justice as to the assignments of judges
to counties and districts where the courts are in need of assistance;
(4) Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports
of the business transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the
chief justice to the end that proper action may be taken in respect
thereto;
(5) Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations
necessary for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
make recommendations in respect thereto;
(6) Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to
the expenditure of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance
and operation of the judicial system and the offices connected
therewith;
(7) Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or
rules adopted by the supreme court of this state on cases and other
judicial business in which action has been delayed beyond periods of
time specified by law or rules of court and make report thereof to
supreme court of this state;
(8) Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW
2.56.060;
(9) Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a
report of the activities of the administrator's office for the
preceding calendar year including activities related to courthouse
security;
(10) Administer programs and standards for the training and
education of judicial personnel;
(11) Examine the need for new superior court and district court
judge positions under an objective workload analysis. The results of
the objective workload analysis shall be reviewed by the board for
judicial administration which shall make recommendations to the
legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that an objective
workload analysis become the basis for creating additional district and
superior court positions, and recommendations should address that
objective;
(12) Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under
chapter 2.14 RCW;
(13) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme
court of this state;
(14) Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general
understanding of child development, placement, and treatment resources,
as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes
including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules,
interviewing skills, and special needs of the abused or neglected
child. This curriculum shall be completed and made available to all
juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service providers and be
updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or case
law;
(15) Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW
2.56.150(3), a comprehensive statewide curriculum for persons who act
as guardians ad litem under Title 13 or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall
be made available July 1, 2008, and include specialty sections on child
development, child sexual abuse, child physical abuse, child neglect,
domestic violence, clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing
techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant
statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made
available to all superior court judges, court personnel, and all
persons who act as guardians ad litem;
(16) Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of
malicious harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of
RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of
malicious harassment victims. This curriculum shall be made available
to all superior court and court of appeals judges and to all justices
of the supreme court;
(17) Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training
commission and the commissions established under chapters 43.113,
43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a general understanding of
ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for working with
youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be available
to all superior court judges and court commissioners assigned to
juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic and cultural
diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile
courts statewide;
(18) Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other
electronic equipment in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall
promulgate necessary standards and procedures and shall provide
technical assistance to courts as required;
(19) Develop a Washington family law handbook in accordance with
RCW 2.56.180;
(20) Administer state funds for improving the operation of the
courts and provide support for court coordinating councils, under the
direction of the board for judicial administration;
(21) Administer the family and juvenile court improvement grant
program;
(22)(a) Administer and distribute amounts appropriated under RCW
43.08.250(2) for district court judges' and qualifying elected
municipal court judges' salary contributions. The administrator for
the courts shall develop a distribution formula for these amounts that
does not differentiate between district and elected municipal court
judges.
(b) A city qualifies for state contribution of elected municipal
court judges' salaries under (a) of this subsection if:
(i) The judge is serving in an elected position;
(ii) The city has established by ordinance that a full-time judge
is compensated at a rate equivalent to at least ninety-five percent,
but not more than one hundred percent, of a district court judge salary
or for a part-time judge on a pro rata basis the same equivalent; and
(iii) The city has certified to the office of the administrator for
the courts that the conditions in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
have been met;
(23) Subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated
therefor, assist courts in the development and implementation of
language assistance plans required under RCW 2.43.090;
(24)(a) Serve as a sentencing clearinghouse and information center
for the collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of
information on state and local adult and juvenile sentencing practices;
(b) maintain a computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information
system by individual superior court judge consisting of offender,
offense, history, and sentence information entered from judgment and
sentence forms for all adult felons; and (c) annually publish an adult
sentencing manual, a juvenile disposition manual, and statistical
summaries of adult felony sentencing and juvenile disposition data.

Sec. 67 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2009 c 479 s 50 and 2009 c 445 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the 2007-2009 biennium, operation of the
integrated crisis response and intensive case management pilots
contracted with the department of social and health services division
of alcohol and substance abuse. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the Washington
state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug
court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the
criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment
providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary,
shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
2013.

Sec. 68 RCW 9.95.011 and 2009 c 28 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the court commits a convicted person to the department of
corrections on or after July 1, 1986, for an offense committed before
July 1, 1984, the court shall, at the time of sentencing or revocation
of probation, fix the minimum term. The term so fixed shall not exceed
the maximum sentence provided by law for the offense of which the
person is convicted.
The court shall attempt to set the minimum term reasonably
consistent with the purposes, standards, and sentencing ranges
((adopted under RCW 9.94A.850)) under chapter 9.94A RCW of the
sentencing reform act, but the court is subject to the same limitations
as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1) through
(4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent
as a minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.
Thereafter, the expiration of the minimum term set by the court
minus any time credits earned under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110
constitutes the parole eligibility review date, at which time the board
may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW 9.95.100 and
9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects the
board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by
the court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080,
9.95.100, 9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a person
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507, for a sex offense committed on or after
September 1, 2001, less any time credits permitted by statute, the
board shall review the person for conditional release to community
custody as provided in RCW 9.95.420. If the board does not release the
person, it shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an additional
five years. The board shall review the person again not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.
(b) If at the time a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for a sex
offense committed on or after September 1, 2001, arrives at a
department of corrections facility, the offender's minimum term has
expired or will expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's
arrival, then no later than one hundred twenty days after the
offender's arrival at a department of corrections facility, but after
the board receives the results from the end of sentence review process
and the recommendations for additional or modified conditions of
community custody from the department, the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in RCW
9.95.420. If the board does not release the person, it shall set a new
minimum term not to exceed an additional five years. The board shall
review the person again not less than ninety days prior to the
expiration of the new minimum term.
(c) In setting a new minimum term, the board may consider the
length of time necessary for the offender to complete treatment and
programming as well as other factors that relate to the offender's
release under RCW 9.95.420. The board's rules shall permit an offender
to petition for an earlier review if circumstances change or the board
receives new information that would warrant an earlier review.

Sec. 69 RCW 9.95.009 and 1990 c 3 s 707 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On July 1, 1986, the board of prison terms and paroles shall be
redesignated as the indeterminate sentence review board. The board's
membership shall be reduced as follows: On July 1, 1986, and on July
1st of each year until 1998, the number of board members shall be
reduced in a manner commensurate with the board's remaining workload as
determined by the office of financial management based upon its
population forecast for the indeterminate sentencing system and in
conjunction with the budget process. To meet the statutory obligations
of the indeterminate sentence review board, the number of board members
shall not be reduced to fewer than three members, although the office
of financial management may designate some or all members as part-time
members and specify the extent to which they shall be less than full-time members. Any reduction shall take place by the expiration, on
that date, of the term or terms having the least time left to serve.
(2) After July 1, 1984, the board shall continue its functions with
respect to persons convicted of crimes committed prior to July 1, 1984,
and committed to the department of corrections. When making decisions
on duration of confinement, including those relating to persons
committed under a mandatory life sentence, and parole release under RCW
9.95.100 and 9.95.110, the board shall consider the purposes,
standards, and sentencing ranges ((adopted pursuant to RCW 9.94A.850))
under chapter 9.94A RCW of the sentencing reform act and the minimum
term recommendations of the sentencing judge and prosecuting attorney,
and shall attempt to make decisions reasonably consistent with those
ranges, standards, purposes, and recommendations: PROVIDED, That the
board and its successors shall give adequate written reasons whenever
a minimum term or parole release decision is made which is outside the
sentencing ranges ((adopted pursuant to RCW 9.94A.850)) under chapter
9.94A RCW of the sentencing reform act. In making such decisions, the
board and its successors shall consider the different charging and
disposition practices under the indeterminate sentencing system.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, the indeterminate sentence review board shall give public
safety considerations the highest priority when making all
discretionary decisions on the remaining indeterminate population
regarding the ability for parole, parole release, and conditions of
parole.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 70 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.411 (Sex offender policy board -- Termination) and
2008 c 249 s 9; and
(2) RCW 43.131.412 (Sex offender policy board -- Repeal) and 2008 c
249 s 10.

Escrow Commission
Sec. 71 RCW 18.44.011 and 2010 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Committee" means the escrow advisory committee of the state of
Washington created by RCW 18.44.500.
(2) "Controlling person" is any person who owns or controls ten
percent or more of the beneficial ownership of any escrow agent,
regardless of the form of business organization employed and regardless
of whether such interest stands in such person's true name or in the
name of a nominee.
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of financial
institutions.
(((3))) (4) "Designated escrow officer" means any licensed escrow
officer designated by a licensed escrow agent and approved by the
director as the licensed escrow officer responsible for supervising
that agent's handling of escrow transactions, management of the agent's
trust account, and supervision of all other licensed escrow officers
employed by the agent.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of financial
institutions, or his or her duly authorized representative.
(((5))) (6) "Director of licensing" means the director of the
department of licensing, or his or her duly authorized representative.
(((6))) (7) "Escrow" means any transaction, except the acts of a
qualified intermediary in facilitating an exchange under section 1031
of the internal revenue code, wherein any person or persons, for the
purpose of effecting and closing the sale, purchase, exchange,
transfer, encumbrance, or lease of real or personal property to another
person or persons, delivers any written instrument, money, evidence of
title to real or personal property, or other thing of value to a third
person to be held by such third person until the happening of a
specified event or the performance of a prescribed condition or
conditions, when it is then to be delivered by such third person, in
compliance with instructions under which he or she is to act, to a
grantee, grantor, promisee, promisor, obligee, obligor, lessee, lessor,
bailee, bailor, or any agent or employee thereof.
(((7))) (8) "Escrow agent" means any person engaged in the business
of performing for compensation the duties of the third person referred
to in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section.
(((8) "Escrow commission" means the escrow commission of the state
of Washington created by RCW 18.44.500.))
(9) "Licensed escrow agent" means any sole proprietorship, firm,
association, partnership, or corporation holding a license as an escrow
agent under the provisions of this chapter.
(10) "Licensed escrow officer" means any natural person handling
escrow transactions and licensed as such by the director.
(11) "Person" means a natural person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or the plural
thereof, whether resident, nonresident, citizen, or not.
(12) "Split escrow" means a transaction in which two or more escrow
agents act to effect and close an escrow transaction.

Sec. 72 RCW 18.44.221 and 1999 c 30 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall, within thirty days after ((the)) a written
request ((of the escrow commission)), hold a public hearing to
determine whether the fidelity bond, surety bond, and/or the errors and
omissions policy specified in RCW 18.44.201 is reasonably available to
a substantial number of licensed escrow agents. If the director
determines and the insurance commissioner concurs that such bond or
bonds and/or policy is not reasonably available, the director shall
waive the requirements for such bond or bonds and/or policy for a fixed
period of time.

Sec. 73 RCW 18.44.251 and 1995 c 238 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A request for a waiver of the required errors and omissions policy
may be accomplished under the statute by submitting to the director an
affidavit that substantially addresses the following:

Sec. 74 RCW 18.44.195 and 2010 c 34 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person desiring to become a licensed escrow officer must
successfully pass an examination as required by the director.
(2) The examination shall be in such form as prescribed by the
director with the advice of the ((escrow commission)) committee.

Sec. 75 RCW 18.44.510 and 1984 c 287 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((escrow commission)) committee members shall each be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses as provided for state officials and employees in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, when called into session by the director
or when otherwise engaged in the business of the ((commission))
committee.

Sec. 76 RCW 18.44.500 and 1995 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is established ((an escrow commission)) a committee of the
state of Washington, to consist of the director of financial
institutions or his or her designee as ((chairman)) chair, and five
other members who shall act as advisors to the director as to the needs
of the escrow profession, including but not limited to the design and
conduct of tests to be administered to applicants for escrow licenses,
the schedule of license fees to be applied to the escrow licensees,
educational programs, audits and investigations of the escrow
profession designed to protect the consumer, and such other matters
determined appropriate. The director is hereby empowered to and shall
appoint the other members, each of whom shall have been a resident of
this state for at least five years and shall have at least five years
experience in the practice of escrow as an escrow agent or as a person
in responsible charge of escrow transactions.
((The members of the first commission shall serve for the following
terms: One member for one year, one member for two years, one member
for three years, one member for four years, and one member for five
years, from the date of their appointment, or until their successors
are duly appointed and qualified.)) Every member of the ((commission))
committee shall receive a certificate of appointment from the director
and before beginning the member's term of office shall file with the
secretary of state a written oath or affirmation for the faithful
discharge of the member's official duties. On the expiration of the
term of each member, the director shall appoint a successor to serve
for a term of five years or until the member's successor has been
appointed and qualified.
The director may remove any member of the ((commission)) committee
for cause. Vacancies in the ((commission)) committee for any reason
shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.
Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, and
shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Livestock Identification Advisory Board
Sec. 77 RCW 16.57.015 and 2003 c 326 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall establish a livestock identification
advisory ((board)) committee. The ((board)) committee shall be
composed of six members appointed by the director. One member shall
represent each of the following groups: Beef producers, public
livestock market operators, horse owners, dairy farmers, cattle
feeders, and meat processors. As used in this subsection, "meat
processor" means a person licensed to operate a slaughtering
establishment under chapter 16.49 RCW or the federal meat inspection
act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). In making appointments, the director
shall solicit nominations from organizations representing these groups
statewide. The ((board)) committee shall elect a member to serve as
chair of the ((board)) committee.
(2) The purpose of the ((board)) committee is to provide advice to
the director regarding livestock identification programs administered
under this chapter and regarding inspection fees and related licensing
fees. The director shall consult the ((board)) committee before
adopting, amending, or repealing a rule under this chapter or altering
a fee under RCW 16.58.050, 16.65.030, 16.65.037, or 16.65.090. If the
director publishes in the state register a proposed rule to be adopted
under the authority of this chapter and the rule has not received the
approval of the advisory ((board)) committee, the director shall file
with the ((board)) committee a written statement setting forth the
director's reasons for proposing the rule without the ((board's))
committee's approval.
(3) The members of the advisory ((board)) committee serve three-year terms. However, the director shall by rule provide shorter
initial terms for some of the members of the ((board)) committee to
stagger the expiration of the initial terms. The members serve without
compensation. The director may authorize the expenses of a member to
be reimbursed if the member is selected to attend a regional or
national conference or meeting regarding livestock identification. Any
such reimbursement shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 78 RCW 16.57.353 and 2004 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) To support the agriculture industry in meeting federal
requirements for the country-of-origin labeling of meat. Any
requirements established under this subsection for country of origin
labeling purposes shall be substantially consistent with and shall not
exceed the requirements established by the United States department of
agriculture; and
(b) In consultation with the livestock identification advisory
((board)) committee under RCW 16.57.015, to implement federal
requirements for animal identification needed to trace the source of
livestock for disease control and response purposes.
(2) The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with
other states and agencies of federal government to carry out such
systems and to promote consistency of regulation.

Superintendent of Public Instruction
NEW SECTION. Sec. 79 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group established by statute or executive order, the
superintendent of public instruction may appoint advisory groups on
subject matters within the superintendent's responsibilities or as may
be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of
federal funds by the federal department. The advisory groups shall be
constituted as required by federal law or as the superintendent may
determine.
Members of advisory groups under the authority of the
superintendent may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Except as provided in this section, members of advisory groups
under the authority of the superintendent are volunteering their
services and are not eligible for compensation. A person is eligible
to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars
for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the
group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the
chairperson of the group if the person (1) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, as a certificated employee of
a local school district; (2) is participating as part of their
employment with the local school district; and (3) the meeting or
duties are performed outside the period in which school days as defined
by RCW 28A.150.030 are conducted. The superintendent may reimburse
local school districts for substitute certificated employees to enable
members to meet or perform duties on school days. A person is eligible
to receive compensation from federal funds in an amount to be
determined by personal service contract for groups required by federal
law.

Quality Education Council
Sec. 80 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2010 c 236 s 15 and 2010 c 234 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning; and
(d) One nonlegislative representative from the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee
established under RCW 28A.300.136, to be selected by the members of the
committee.
(4) ((In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)))(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(((6))) (5) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by
January 1, 2012, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan
for a voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the
report, the council shall seek input from the early learning advisory
council created in RCW 43.215.090.
(((7))) (6) The council shall submit a report to the governor and
the legislature by December 1, 2010, that includes:
(a) Recommendations for specific strategies, programs, and funding,
including funding allocations through the funding distribution formula
in RCW 28A.150.260, that are designed to close the achievement gap and
increase the high school graduation rate in Washington public schools.
The council shall consult with the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and the building
bridges work group in developing its recommendations; and
(b) Recommendations for assuring adequate levels of state-funded
classified staff to support essential school and district services.
(((8))) (7) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the council. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((9))) (8) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

PART II - OTHER PROVISIONS
Sec. 81 RCW 43.03.220 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 142 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group which is established by the executive, legislative, or
judicial branch to participate in state government and which functions
primarily in an advisory, coordinating, or planning capacity shall be
identified as a class one group.
(2) Absent any other provision of law to the contrary, no money
beyond the customary reimbursement or allowance for expenses may be
paid by or through the state to members of class one groups for
attendance at meetings of such groups.
(3) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) (a) No
person designated as a member of a class one board, commission,
council, committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for
subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is
funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under
section ((605, chapter 3, Laws of 2010)) 89 of this act. Class one
groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a
meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and
public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members
to be physically present at one location only when necessary or
required by law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence
at one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) (b) Class one
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 82 RCW 43.03.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 143 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any agricultural commodity board or commission established
pursuant to Title 15 or 16 RCW shall be identified as a class two group
for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class two group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends
an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed
duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not
receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the
person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in
nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) No person
designated as a member of a class two board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section ((605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010)) 89 of this act. Class two groups, when
feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that
does not require travel while still maximizing member and public
participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be
physically present at one location only when necessary or required by
law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence at one
location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management.))
(5) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) Class two
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 83 RCW 43.03.240 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 144 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group which has rule-making authority, performs quasi
judicial functions, has responsibility for the administration or policy
direction of a state agency or program, or performs regulatory or
licensing functions with respect to a specific profession, occupation,
business, or industry shall be identified as a class three group for
purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class three group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an
official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties
approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive
compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a)
occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any
agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or
Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation
from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) No person
designated as a member of a class three board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section ((605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010)) 89 of this act. Class three groups, when
feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that
does not require travel while still maximizing member and public
participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be
physically present at one location only when necessary or required by
law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence at one
location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management.))
(5) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) Class three
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 84 RCW 43.03.250 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 145 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group shall be identified as a class four group for
purposes of compensation if the group:
(a) Has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions,
or has responsibility for the administration or policy direction of a
state agency or program;
(b) Has duties that are deemed by the legislature to be of
overriding sensitivity and importance to the public welfare and the
operation of state government; and
(c) Requires service from its members representing a significant
demand on their time that is normally in excess of one hundred hours of
meeting time per year.
(2) Each member of a class four group is eligible to receive
compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each
day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or
performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of
the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal
government, Washington state government, or Washington state local
government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for
working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) Class four
groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a
meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and
public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members
to be physically present at one location only when necessary or
required by law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence
at one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management.))

Sec. 85 RCW 43.03.265 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 146 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority,
performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy
direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs
regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care
profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class
five group for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the
member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily
prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person
shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section
if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time
in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent
with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) No person
designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section ((605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010)) 89 of this act. Class five groups, when
feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a meeting that
does not require travel while still maximizing member and public
participation and may use a meeting format that requires members to be
physically present at one location only when necessary or required by
law. ((Meetings that require a member's physical presence at one
location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management.))
(5) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) Class five
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 86 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
Except under a specific statute to the contrary, agencies are
prohibited from entering into personal service contracts with members
of any agency board, commission, council, committee, or other similar
group formed to advise the activities and management of state
government for services related to work done as a member of the agency
board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group.

Sec. 87 RCW 43.03.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 141 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall prescribe reasonable
allowances to cover reasonable and necessary subsistence and lodging
expenses for elective and appointive officials and state employees
while engaged on official business away from their designated posts of
duty. The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate
the allowances provided in lieu of subsistence and lodging expenses and
may prescribe the conditions under which reimbursement for subsistence
and lodging may be allowed. The schedule of allowances adopted by the
office of financial management may include special allowances for
foreign travel and other travel involving higher than usual costs for
subsistence and lodging. The allowances established by the director
shall not exceed the rates set by the federal government for federal
employees. However, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the allowances
for any county that is part of a metropolitan statistical area, the
largest city of which is in another state, shall equal the allowances
prescribed for that larger city.
(2) Those persons appointed to serve without compensation on any
state board, commission, or committee, if entitled to payment of travel
expenses, shall be paid pursuant to special per diem rates prescribed
in accordance with subsection (1) of this section by the office of
financial management.
(3) The director of financial management may prescribe reasonable
allowances to cover reasonable expenses for meals, coffee, and light
refreshment served to elective and appointive officials and state
employees regardless of travel status at a meeting where: (a) The
purpose of the meeting is to conduct official state business or to
provide formal training to state employees or state officials; (b) the
meals, coffee, or light refreshment are an integral part of the meeting
or training session; (c) the meeting or training session takes place
away from the employee's or official's regular workplace; and (d) the
agency head or authorized designee approves payments in advance for the
meals, coffee, or light refreshment. In order to prevent abuse, the
director may regulate such allowances and prescribe additional
conditions for claiming the allowances.
(4) Upon approval of the agency head or authorized designee, an
agency may serve coffee or light refreshments at a meeting where: (a)
The purpose of the meeting is to conduct state business or to provide
formal training that benefits the state; and (b) the coffee or light
refreshment is an integral part of the meeting or training session.
The director of financial management shall adopt requirements necessary
to prohibit abuse of the authority authorized in this subsection.
(5) The schedule of allowances prescribed by the director under the
terms of this section and any subsequent increases in any maximum
allowance or special allowances for areas of higher than usual costs
shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of
representatives and the senate at each regular session of the
legislature.
(6) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011,)) No person
designated as a member of a class one through class three or class five
board, commission, council, committee, or similar group may receive an
allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance
cost is funded by the state general fund. Exceptions may be granted
under section ((605, chapter 3, Laws of 2010)) 89 of this act.

Sec. 88 RCW 43.03.060 and 1990 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever it becomes necessary for elective or appointive
officials or employees of the state to travel away from their
designated posts of duty while engaged on official business, and it is
found to be more advantageous or economical to the state that travel be
by a privately-owned vehicle rather than a common carrier or a state-owned or operated vehicle, a mileage rate established by the director
of financial management shall be allowed. The mileage rate established
by the director shall not exceed any rate set by the United States
treasury department above which the substantiation requirements
specified in Treasury Department Regulations section 1.274-5T(a)(1), as
now law or hereafter amended, will apply.
(2) The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate
the specific mileage rate or other allowance for the use of privately-owned vehicles or common carriers on official business and the
conditions under which reimbursement of transportation costs may be
allowed. The reimbursement or other payment for transportation
expenses of any employee or appointive official of the state shall be
based on the method deemed most advantageous or economical to the
state.
(3) The mileage rate established by the director of financial
management pursuant to this section and any subsequent changes thereto
shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of
representatives and the senate at each regular session of the
legislature.
(4) No person designated as a member of a class one through class
three or class five board, commission, council, committee, or similar
group may receive an allowance for subsistence, lodging, or travel
expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the state general fund.
Exceptions may be granted under section 89 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 89 A new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Exceptions to restrictions on subsistence, lodging, or travel
expenses under this chapter may be granted for the critically necessary
work of an agency. For agencies of the executive branch, the
exceptions shall be subject to approval by the director of financial
management or the director's designee. For agencies of the judicial
branch, the exceptions shall be subject to approval of the chief
justice of the supreme court. For the house of representatives and the
senate, the exceptions shall be subject to the approval of the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate,
respectively, under the direction of the senate committee on facilities
and operations and the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives. For other legislative agencies, the exceptions shall
be subject to approval of both the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate under the direction of
the senate committee on facilities and operations and the executive
rules committee of the house of representatives.

Executive Ethics Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 90 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the executive ethics board are transferred to the public disclosure and
ethics commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the executive ethics
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be delivered to the custody of the public disclosure and ethics
commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the executive ethics board in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the public disclosure and ethics commission. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the public
disclosure and ethics commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the executive ethics board for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
public disclosure and ethics commission.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds,
books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the executive ethics
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the public disclosure and ethics
commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the public disclosure and ethics
commission.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
executive ethics board shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

Sec. 91 RCW 42.52.010 and 2005 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(4) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(5) "Commission" means the public disclosure and ethics commission
created in RCW 42.17A.100.
(6) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(((6))) (7) "Confidential information" means (a) specific
information, rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available
to the general public on request or (b) information made confidential
by law.
(((7))) (8) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or
more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(((8))) (9) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial
conduct, the legislative ethics board, and the ((executive ethics
board)) commission.
(((9))) (10) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in
RCW 42.17.020.
(((10))) (11) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17 RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(((11))) (12) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to
a state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or
similar item or activity in connection with the state officer's or
state employee's official role.
(((12))) (13) "Official duty" means those duties within the
specific scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as
defined by the officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the
state Constitution.
(((13))) (14) "Participate" means to participate in state action or
a proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(((14))) (15) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether
or not operated for profit.
(((15))) (16) "Regulatory agency" means any state board,
commission, department, or officer, except those in the legislative or
judicial branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative
proceedings, issue permits or licenses, or to control or affect
interests of identified persons.
(((16))) (17) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction
involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating
authority, whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone
or through subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or
otherwise direct state action in respect of such transaction.
(((17))) (18) "State action" means any action on the part of an
agency, including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(((18))) (19) "State officer" means every person holding a position
of public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial
office of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior
court, judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court,
members of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate
and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of
elective offices in the executive branch of state government, chief
executive officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions,
or committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(((19))) (20) "State employee" means an individual who is employed
by an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(((20))) (21) "University" includes "state universities" and
"regional universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes
any research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute and the Washington Technology Center.
(((21))) (22) "University research employee" means a state officer
or state employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the
state officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology
transfer, approved consulting activities related to research and
technology transfer, or other incidental activities.
(((22))) (23) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its
ordinary meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(((23))) (24)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a
proceeding, application, submission, request for a ruling or other
determination, contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the
state officer, state employee, or former state officer or state
employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 92 RCW 42.52.220 and 2005 c 106 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied
scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in
RCW 28B.140.005, each university may develop, adopt, and implement one
or more written administrative processes that shall, upon approval by
the governor, apply in place of the obligations imposed on universities
and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040,
42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and
42.52.160. The universities shall coordinate on the development of
administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. A
university research employee in compliance with the processes
authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW
42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130,
42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.
(2) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce
activity subject to the written approval processes under this section,
as provided in RCW 42.52.360.

Sec. 93 RCW 42.52.360 and 2005 c 106 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce this
chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to statewide elected
officers and all other officers and employees in the executive branch,
boards and commissions, and institutions of higher education.
(2) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce this
chapter with regard to the activities of university research employees
as provided in this subsection.
(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110,
42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall
be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in
regulations of the United States public health service and the office
of the secretary of the department of health and human services in
Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity
in research.
(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and
42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive
system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work
activities by university research employees while assuring that such
employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the
university.
(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the
administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the
university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the
university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable
reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess
of de minimis.
(3) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall:
(a) Develop educational materials and training;
(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(c) Issue advisory opinions;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal
from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; and
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.
(4) The ((board)) commission may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the ((board)) commission or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 42.52.220, the ((executive ethics
board)) commission may review and approve agency policies as provided
for in this chapter.
(6) This section does not apply to state officers and state
employees of the judicial branch.

Sec. 94 RCW 42.52.550 and 1994 c 154 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
The citizen members of the legislative ethics board ((and the
members of the executive ethics board)) shall be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislator members of the
legislative ethics board shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
44.04.120.

Sec. 95 RCW 42.52.570 and 2008 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of fish and wildlife and the parks and
recreation commission may approve private business activity in state-owned housing provided under Title 77 RCW or chapter 79A.05 RCW.
(2) Prior to granting approval of private business activity in
state-owned housing, the department of fish and wildlife and the parks
and recreation commission must adopt a private business activity policy
that is approved by the ((executive ethics board)) commission.
(a) The private business activity policy may only authorize private
business activity by the resident state employee while the employee is
off duty or the employee's spouse who is approved for residency in the
agency housing or the employee's children.
(b) The private business activity policy may not allow private
business activity that negatively impacts the agency's operations. For
the purposes of this section, "negatively impacts" includes but is not
limited to: (i) Negative impacts to visitors' services or access; (ii)
in-person visits to state-owned housing for the purpose of transacting
business that negatively impacts agency operations; (iii) the
incurrence of additional expenses by the state; (iv) the use of signage
in the state-owned residence; (v) advertising on state-owned property;
or (vi) an appearance of state endorsement of the private business
activity.
(3) The private business activity must comply with all other local,
state, and federal laws.
(4) All approvals of a private business activity in state-owned
housing must be by the agency director or designee in writing.
(5) A state employee is presumed not to be in violation of RCW
42.52.070 or 42.52.160 if the employee or the employee's spouse or
child complies with this section.

Sec. 96 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall consist of a chairman and four other members, each
of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall
expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the
membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor
with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability of any
member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person to act
in his stead during the continuance of such inability. The members
shall not be removable during their respective terms except for cause
determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The governor in
appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve as chairman
at the governor's pleasure. The appointed chairman shall serve as a
fully participating board member and as the director of the agency.
The members of the board and its officers and employees shall not
engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public
office without the prior approval of the ((executive ethics board))
public disclosure and ethics commission indicating compliance with RCW
42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the
time of appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as
the representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association. The members of the board shall
each severally receive salaries fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The board may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor,
the compensation of and prescribe the duties of a senior administrative
officer and such officers, employees, and assistants as may be
necessary, and provide necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.

Sec. 97 RCW 42.40.020 and 2008 c 266 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in
any department or agency of state government.
(3) "Good faith" means the individual providing the information or
report of improper governmental activity has a reasonable basis in fact
for reporting or providing the information. An individual who
knowingly provides or reports, or who reasonably ought to know he or
she is providing or reporting, malicious, false, or frivolous
information, or information that is provided with reckless disregard
for the truth, or who knowingly omits relevant information is not
acting in good faith.
(4) "Gross mismanagement" means the exercise of management
responsibilities in a manner grossly deviating from the standard of
care or competence that a reasonable person would observe in the same
situation.
(5) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(6)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by an
employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is a gross waste of public funds or resources as defined
in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature;
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety;
(iv) Which is gross mismanagement; or
(v) Which prevents the dissemination of scientific opinion or
alters technical findings without scientifically valid justification,
unless state law or a common law privilege prohibits disclosure. This
provision is not meant to preclude the discretion of agency management
to adopt a particular scientific opinion or technical finding from
among differing opinions or technical findings to the exclusion of
other scientific opinions or technical findings. Nothing in this
subsection prevents or impairs a state agency's or public official's
ability to manage its public resources or its employees in the
performance of their official job duties. This subsection does not
apply to de minimis, technical disagreements that are not relevant for
otherwise improper governmental activity. Nothing in this provision
requires the auditor to contract or consult with external experts
regarding the scientific validity, invalidity, or justification of a
finding or opinion.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(7) "Public official" means the attorney general's designee or
designees; the director, or equivalent thereof in the agency where the
employee works; an appropriate number of individuals designated to
receive whistleblower reports by the head of each agency; or the
((executive ethics board)) public disclosure and ethics commission.
(8) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(9) "Use of official authority or influence" includes threatening,
taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or
approving any personnel action such as an appointment, promotion,
transfer, assignment including but not limited to duties and office
location, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment,
performance evaluation, determining any material changes in pay,
provision of training or benefits, tolerance of a hostile work
environment, or any adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other
disciplinary action.
(10)(a) "Whistleblower" means:
(i) An employee who in good faith reports alleged improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, initiating an investigation by the
auditor under RCW 42.40.040; or
(ii) An employee who is perceived by the employer as reporting,
whether they did or not, alleged improper governmental action to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, initiating an investigation by the auditor under RCW
42.40.040.
(b) For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter
49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means:
(i) An employee who in good faith provides information to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an
employee who is believed to have reported asserted improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, or to have provided information to
the auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040
but who, in fact, has not reported such action or provided such
information; or
(ii) An employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting
review or provides information to the rules review committee, and an
employee who is believed to have identified rules warranting review or
provided information to the rules review committee but who, in fact,
has not done so.

Sec. 98 RCW 42.40.910 and 2008 c 266 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Chapter 266, Laws of 2008 and chapter 361, Laws of 1999 do not
affect the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board, the
((executive ethics board)) public disclosure and ethics commission, or
the commission on judicial conduct, as set forth in chapter 42.52 RCW.
The senate, the house of representatives, and the supreme court shall
adopt policies regarding the applicability of chapter 42.40 RCW to the
senate, house of representatives, and judicial branch.

Sec. 99 RCW 42.17.190 and 1995 c 397 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate shall report
annually: The total budget; the portion of the total attributed to
staff; and the number of full-time and part-time staff positions by
assignment, with dollar figures as well as number of positions.
(2) Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or
otherwise expressly authorized by law, no public funds may be used
directly or indirectly for lobbying: PROVIDED, This does not prevent
officers or employees of an agency from communicating with a member of
the legislature on the request of that member; or communicating to the
legislature, through the proper official channels, requests for
legislative action or appropriations which are deemed necessary for the
efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in the proper
performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this
subsection does not apply to the legislative branch.
(3) Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may
expend public funds for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be
limited to (a) providing information or communicating on matters
pertaining to official agency business to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating the official
position or interests of the agency to any elected official or officer
or employee of any agency: PROVIDED, That public funds may not be
expended as a direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any
elected official or officer or employee of any agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, the term "gift" means a voluntary transfer
of any thing of value without consideration of equal or greater value,
but does not include informational material transferred for the sole
purpose of informing the recipient about matters pertaining to official
agency business. This section does not permit the printing of a state
publication which has been otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) No elective official or any employee of his or her office or
any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may
use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following
activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose an initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the initiative
to the legislature, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members
of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the
expression of an opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry;
(c) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency;
(d) Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature
that would be permitted under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180 if conducted
regarding other ballot measures.
(5) Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district which expends
public funds for lobbying shall file with the commission, except as
exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly statements providing the
following information for the quarter just completed:
(a) The name of the agency filing the statement;
(b) The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected
official, officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of
the nature of the lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent
on the lobbying;
(c) A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying
including but not limited to travel, consultant or other special
contractual services, and brochures and other publications, the
principal purpose of which is to influence legislation;
(d) For purposes of this subsection the term "lobbying" does not
include:
(i) Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of
financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the
office of financial management to the legislature for appropriations
other than its own agency budget requests;
(ii) Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to
a legislative request expressly requesting or directing a specific
study, recommendation, or report by an agency on a particular subject;
(iii) Official reports including recommendations submitted to the
legislature on an annual or biennial basis by a state agency as
required by law;
(iv) Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or
within state agencies or between or within local agencies;
(v) Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:
(A) Telephone conversations or preparation of written
correspondence;
(B) In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four
days or parts thereof during any three-month period by officers or
employees of that agency and in-person lobbying by any elected official
of such agency on behalf of such agency or in connection with the
powers, duties, or compensation of such official: PROVIDED, That the
total expenditures of nonpublic funds made in connection with such
lobbying for or on behalf of any one or more members of the legislature
or state elected officials or public officers or employees of the state
of Washington do not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month period:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the exemption under this subsection is in
addition to the exemption provided in (A) of this subsection;
(C) Preparation or adoption of policy positions.
The statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by
the commission and shall be filed within one month after the end of the
quarter covered by the report.
(6) In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or special purpose district may determine and so notify the ((public
disclosure)) commission, that elected officials, officers, or employees
who on behalf of any such local agency engage in lobbying reportable
under subsection (5) of this section shall register and report such
reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist who is required to
register and report under RCW 42.17.150 and 42.17.170. Each such local
agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW 42.17.180.
(7) The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected
official or officer or employee of an agency from complying with other
provisions of this chapter, if such elected official, officer, or
employee is not otherwise exempted.
(8) The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and
certain local agencies to report the identities of those persons who
lobby on behalf of the agency for compensation, together with certain
separately identifiable and measurable expenditures of an agency's
funds for that purpose. This section shall be reasonably construed to
accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency to report any of
its general overhead cost or any other costs which relate only
indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or which are equally
attributable to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the
agency.
The ((public disclosure)) commission may adopt rules clarifying and
implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

Sec. 100 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department
of information services, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure and ethics commission, the executive director of the
Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and
conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director
of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of
tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, ((executive ethics board,)) forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure and
ethics commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings
board, public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board,
board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of
Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission,
Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources
board, Washington public power supply system executive board,
Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 101 RCW 42.17.350 and 1998 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a "public disclosure and ethics
commission" which shall be composed of five members who shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. All
appointees shall be persons of the highest integrity and
qualifications. No more than three members shall have an
identification with the same political party.
(2) The term of each member shall be five years. No member is
eligible for appointment to more than one full term. Any member may be
removed by the governor, but only upon grounds of neglect of duty or
misconduct in office.
(3) During his or her tenure, a member of the commission is
prohibited from engaging in any of the following activities, either
within or outside the state of Washington:
(a) Holding or campaigning for elective office;
(b) Serving as an officer of any political party or political
committee;
(c) Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in
opposition to a candidate or proposition;
(d) Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support
of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;
(e) Participating in any way in any election campaign; or
(f) Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a
member or the staff of the commission may lobby to the limited extent
permitted by RCW 42.17.190 on matters directly affecting this chapter.
(4) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled within thirty days
of the vacancy by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and the
appointee shall serve for the remaining term of his or her predecessor.
A vacancy shall not impair the powers of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the commission.
(5) Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The
commission shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of
procedure in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and in addition shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while
engaged in the business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The compensation provided pursuant to this section
shall not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any
retirement system created pursuant to the general laws of this state.

Sec. 102 RCW 42.17.510 and 2010 c 204 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. For partisan office, if a candidate has
expressed a party or independent preference on the declaration of
candidacy, that party or independent designation shall be clearly
identified in electioneering communications, independent expenditures,
or political advertising.
(2) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of
this section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section, all political advertising undertaken as an
independent expenditure or an electioneering communication by a person
or entity other than a bona fide political party must include as part
of the communication:
(a) The statement: "No candidate authorized this ad. It is paid
for by (name, address, city, state)";
(b) If the sponsor is a political committee, the statement: "Top
Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the names of the five
persons or entities making the largest contributions in excess of seven
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement or communication; and
(c) If the sponsor is a political committee established,
maintained, or controlled directly, or indirectly through the formation
of one or more political committees, by an individual, corporation,
union, association, or other entity, the full name of that individual
or entity.
(3) The information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter.
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing entities if the full
name of the entity has been clearly spoken previously during the
broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by
a listing of the names of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions in excess of seven hundred dollars reportable
under this chapter during the twelve-month period before the date of
the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing
entities if the full name of the entity has been clearly spoken
previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the ((public disclosure)) commission shall, by rule, exempt
from the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 103 RCW 42.17A.100 and 2010 c 204 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public disclosure and ethics commission is established.
The commission shall be composed of five members appointed by the
governor, with the consent of the senate. All appointees shall be
persons of the highest integrity and qualifications. No more than
three members shall have an identification with the same political
party.
(2) The term of each member shall be five years. No member is
eligible for appointment to more than one full term. Any member may be
removed by the governor, but only upon grounds of neglect of duty or
misconduct in office.
(3) During his or her tenure, a member of the commission is
prohibited from engaging in any of the following activities, either
within or outside the state of Washington:
(a) Holding or campaigning for elective office;
(b) Serving as an officer of any political party or political
committee;
(c) Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in
opposition to a candidate or proposition;
(d) Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support
of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;
(e) Participating in any way in any election campaign; or
(f) Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a
member or the staff of the commission may lobby to the limited extent
permitted by RCW 42.17A.635 on matters directly affecting this chapter.
(4) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled within thirty days
of the vacancy by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and the
appointee shall serve for the remaining term of his or her predecessor.
A vacancy shall not impair the powers of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the commission.
(5) Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The
commission shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of
procedure in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while engaged in
the business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The compensation provided pursuant to this section shall
not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any
retirement system created under the laws of this state.

Sec. 104 RCW 42.17A.320 and 2010 c 204 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. For partisan office, if a candidate has
expressed a party or independent preference on the declaration of
candidacy, that party or independent designation shall be clearly
identified in electioneering communications, independent expenditures,
or political advertising.
(2) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of
this section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section, all political advertising undertaken as an
independent expenditure or an electioneering communication by a person
or entity other than a bona fide political party must include as part
of the communication:
(a) The statement: "No candidate authorized this ad. It is paid
for by (name, address, city, state)";
(b) If the sponsor is a political committee, the statement: "Top
Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the names of the five
persons or entities making the largest contributions in excess of seven
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement or communication; and
(c) If the sponsor is a political committee established,
maintained, or controlled directly, or indirectly through the formation
of one or more political committees, by an individual, corporation,
union, association, or other entity, the full name of that individual
or entity.
(3) The information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter.
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing entities if the full
name of the entity has been clearly spoken previously during the
broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by
a listing of the names of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions in excess of seven hundred dollars reportable
under this chapter during the twelve-month period before the date of
the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing
entities if the full name of the entity has been clearly spoken
previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the ((public disclosure)) commission shall, by rule, exempt
from the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 105 RCW 42.17A.635 and 2010 c 204 s 808 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate shall report
annually: The total budget; the portion of the total attributed to
staff; and the number of full-time and part-time staff positions by
assignment, with dollar figures as well as number of positions.
(2) Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or
otherwise expressly authorized by law, no public funds may be used
directly or indirectly for lobbying. However, this does not prevent
officers or employees of an agency from communicating with a member of
the legislature on the request of that member; or communicating to the
legislature, through the proper official channels, requests for
legislative action or appropriations that are deemed necessary for the
efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in the proper
performance of their official duties. This subsection does not apply
to the legislative branch.
(3) Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may
expend public funds for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be
limited to (a) providing information or communicating on matters
pertaining to official agency business to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating the official
position or interests of the agency to any elected official or officer
or employee of any agency. Public funds may not be expended as a
direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any elected
official or officer or employee of any agency. For the purposes of
this subsection, "gift" means a voluntary transfer of any thing of
value without consideration of equal or greater value, but does not
include informational material transferred for the sole purpose of
informing the recipient about matters pertaining to official agency
business. This section does not permit the printing of a state
publication that has been otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) No elective official or any employee of his or her office or
any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may
use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17A.555 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following
activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose an initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the initiative
to the legislature, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members
of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the
expression of an opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency;
(d) Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature
that would be permitted under RCW 42.17A.555 and 42.52.180 if conducted
regarding other ballot measures.
(5) Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district that expends
public funds for lobbying shall file with the commission, except as
exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly statements providing the
following information for the quarter just completed:
(a) The name of the agency filing the statement;
(b) The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected
official, officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of
the nature of the lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent
on the lobbying;
(c) A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying
including but not limited to travel, consultant or other special
contractual services, and brochures and other publications, the
principal purpose of which is to influence legislation;
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "lobbying" does not include:
(i) Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of
financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the
office of financial management to the legislature for appropriations
other than its own agency budget requests;
(ii) Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to
a legislative request expressly requesting or directing a specific
study, recommendation, or report by an agency on a particular subject;
(iii) Official reports including recommendations submitted to the
legislature on an annual or biennial basis by a state agency as
required by law;
(iv) Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or
within state agencies or between or within local agencies;
(v) Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:
(A) Telephone conversations or preparation of written
correspondence;
(B) In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four
days or parts thereof during any three-month period by officers or
employees of that agency and in-person lobbying by any elected official
of such agency on behalf of such agency or in connection with the
powers, duties, or compensation of such official. The total
expenditures of nonpublic funds made in connection with such lobbying
for or on behalf of any one or more members of the legislature or state
elected officials or public officers or employees of the state of
Washington may not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month period.
The exemption under this subsection (5)(d)(v)(B) is in addition to the
exemption provided in (d)(v)(A) of this subsection;
(C) Preparation or adoption of policy positions.
The statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by
the commission and shall be filed within one month after the end of the
quarter covered by the report.
(6) In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section, any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or special purpose district may determine and so notify the ((public
disclosure)) commission that elected officials, officers, or employees
who, on behalf of any such local agency, engage in lobbying reportable
under subsection (5) of this section shall register and report such
reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist who is required to
register and report under RCW 42.17A.600 and 42.17A.615. Each such
local agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW
42.17A.630.
(7) The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected
official or officer or employee of an agency from complying with other
provisions of this chapter, if such elected official, officer, or
employee is not otherwise exempted.
(8) The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and
certain local agencies to report the identities of those persons who
lobby on behalf of the agency for compensation, together with certain
separately identifiable and measurable expenditures of an agency's
funds for that purpose. This section shall be reasonably construed to
accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency to report any of
its general overhead cost or any other costs that relate only
indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or that are equally attributable
to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the agency.
(9) The ((public disclosure)) commission may adopt rules clarifying
and implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

Sec. 106 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the director of the state system of community and technical colleges,
the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure and ethics commission, the
executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the
recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems,
the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of
the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the
secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director
of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state
universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each
district and each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, ((public
disclosure commission,)) public employees' benefits board, recreation
and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board,
shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation
commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and
transportation commission, Washington State University board of
regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 107 RCW 43.03.028 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of personnel shall study the duties and salaries
of the directors of the several departments and the members of the
several boards and commissions of state government, who are subject to
appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the
governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies
of state government:
The arts commission; the human rights commission; the board of
accountancy; the board of pharmacy; the eastern Washington historical
society; the Washington state historical society; the recreation and
conservation office; the criminal justice training commission; the
department of personnel; the state library; the traffic safety
commission; the horse racing commission; the advisory council on
vocational education; the public disclosure and ethics commission; the
state conservation commission; the commission on Hispanic affairs; the
commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state board for
volunteer firefighters and reserve officers; the transportation
improvement board; the public employment relations commission; the
forest practices appeals board; and the energy facilities site
evaluation council.
(2) The department of personnel shall report to the governor or the
chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing authority at least once in
each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor may designate, but
not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its
recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

Sec. 108 RCW 44.05.020 and 1983 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.
(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal
law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each
year ending in zero.
(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the
Washington public disclosure and ethics commission pursuant to RCW
42.17.150.
(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional
redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 42.52.340 (Transfer of jurisdiction) and 1994 c 154 s 204;
(2) RCW 42.52.350 (Executive ethics board) and 1994 c 154 s 205;
and
(3) RCW 42.52.380 (Political activities of board members) and 1997
c 11 s 1 & 1994 c 154 s 208.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 Sections 99 through 102 of this act expire
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 Sections 103 through 106 of this act take
effect January 1, 2012.

Effective/Expiration Dates
NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 Except for sections 79, 86, and 103
through 106 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

INDEX PAGE #

Capitol Campus Design Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
Commission on Pesticide Registration . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
Community Economic Revitalization Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
Commute Trip Reduction Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
Correctional Industries Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
Eastern State Hospital Board and Western State Hospital Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
Educational Opportunity Gap Oversight and Accountability Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
Effective/Expiration Dates . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Steering Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
Escrow Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
Executive Ethics Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
Firearms Range Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
Hanford Area Economic Investment Fund Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
Home Care Quality Authority . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
Home Inspector Advisory Licensing Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
Horse Racing Commission-Reducing Commission Members . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
House Racing Compact Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
Indeterminate Sentencing Review Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
Livestock Identification Advisory Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
Migratory Waterfowl Art Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
Performance Agreement Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
Productivity Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
Quality Education Council . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
Salmon Stamp Selection Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
Sentencing Guidelines Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
State Advisory Board of Plumbers . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
Superintendent of Public Instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
Washington State Horse Park Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
--- END ---