BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.28.270 and 2009 c 373 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of checks, credit or
debit cards, prepaid accounts, electronic funds transfers, and other
similar methods as approved by the board, as cash payments for purposes
of this title. ((Electronic fund[s] transfers)) Such methods of
payment must be: (1) Voluntary; (2) conducted pursuant to a prior
written agreement of the parties that includes a provision that the
purchase be initiated by an irrevocable invoice or sale order before
the time of delivery; (3) initiated by the retailer, manufacturer,
importer, or distributor no later than the first business day following
delivery; and (4) completed as promptly as is reasonably practical, and
in no event((,)) later than five business days following delivery.

--- END ---