BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of bait purchased by
a qualifying buyer for use on a vessel subject to a salmon or nonsalmon
charter license under RCW 77.65.150.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "qualifying buyer" means a
person holding a salmon or nonsalmon charter license under RCW
77.65.150 or a charter booking service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a
qualifying buyer of bait for use on a vessel subject to a salmon or
nonsalmon charter license under RCW 77.65.150. "Qualifying buyer" has
the same meaning as provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively as well as
prospectively; however, taxpayers may not seek a refund for sales or
use taxes that have already been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---