BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
All real and personal property is exempt from a county emergency
medical services property tax levy authorized under RCW 84.52.069 if
the following requirements are met:
(1) The property is located in a county with a population of more
than one million five hundred thousand;
(2) The property is located in a city included within two counties;
and
(3) The locally assessed value of the property in the portion of
the city included within the county described under subsection (1) of
this section is less than one hundred twenty-five million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.

--- END ---