BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.08.045 and 1998 c 191 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted pursuant to this title:
(1) "Migratory waterfowl" means members of the family Anatidae,
including brants, ducks, geese, and swans;
(2) "Migratory bird" means migratory waterfowl and coots, snipe,
doves, and band-tailed pigeon;
(3) "Migratory bird ((stamp)) permit" means the ((stamp)) permit
that is required by RCW 77.32.350 to be in the possession of all
persons to hunt migratory birds;
(4) "Prints and artwork" means replicas of the original stamp
design that are sold to the general public. Prints and artwork are not
to be construed to be the migratory bird ((stamp)) permit that is
required by RCW 77.32.350. Artwork may be any facsimile of the
original stamp design, including color renditions, metal duplications,
or any other kind of design; and
(5) "Migratory waterfowl art committee" means the committee created
by RCW 77.12.680. The committee's primary function is to select the
annual migratory bird stamp design.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.170 and 2009 c 333 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties((, and));
(d) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW ((and)), RCW 77.65.490, ((except annual resident
adult saltwater and all annual razor clam and shellfish licenses, which
shall be deposited into the state general fund)) and application fees;
(((d))) (e) Fees for informational materials published by the
department;
(((e))) (f) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;
(((f))) (g) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this
title;
(((g))) (h) Compensation for damage to department property or
wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW
77.12.320. However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and
court-ordered restitution or donations associated with any fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be
deposited pursuant to RCW 77.15.425;
(((h))) (i) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under
chapter 82.27 RCW;
(((i))) (j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and
raffles authorized by the commission; ((and
(j))) (k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW
77.32.560; and
(l) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.177 and 2001 c 253 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers
receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the state general
fund:
(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title,
except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and
(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish.
(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state
treasurer of moneys collected by the department.
(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district
court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test
fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds
exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be
allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse
the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in
excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.
(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from
state general funded hatcheries by the department of general
administration shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement
group account established in RCW 77.95.090.
(6) ((Moneys received by the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the
extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish
or shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the
conservation of these resources.
(7))) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery
licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed
estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated
as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this
subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and
enforcement.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.32.050 and 2009 c 333 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All recreational and commercial licenses, permits, tags,
((and)) stamps ((required by this title and raffle tickets authorized
under chapter 77.12 RCW)), and raffle tickets shall be issued under the
authority of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the
issuance of ((recreational)) licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and
raffle tickets, and for the collection, payment, and handling of
license fees, including terms and conditions to govern dealers, and
((dealers')) dealer fees. A transaction fee on commercial and
recreational documents issued through an automated licensing system may
be set by the commission and collected from licensees. The department
may authorize all or part of such fee to be paid directly to a
contractor providing automated licensing system services. ((Fees
retained by dealers shall be uniform throughout the state.)) The
department and dealers shall ((authorize dealers to)) collect and
retain dealer fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard
hunting or fishing recreational license document or commercial license
document, except that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for
issuance of tags or when a licensee buys a license that involves a
stamp or display card format rather than a standard department
licensing document form. Dealer fees must be uniform throughout the
state.
(2) ((For the 2009-2011 biennium)) Until September 1, 2011, the
department shall charge an additional transaction fee of ten percent on
all recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets.
These transaction fees must be deposited into the state wildlife
account, created in RCW 77.12.170, for funding fishing and hunting
opportunities for recreational license holders.
(3) The application fee is waived for all commercial license
documents that are issued through the automated licensing system.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.32.240 and 1998 c 191 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
A scientific permit allows the holder to collect for research or
display food fish, game fish, shellfish, and wildlife, including avian
nests and eggs as required in RCW 77.32.010, under conditions
prescribed by the director. Before a permit is issued, the applicant
shall demonstrate to the director their qualifications and establish
the need for the permit. The director may require a bond of up to one
thousand dollars to ensure compliance with the permit. Permits are
valid for the time specified, unless sooner revoked.
Holders of permits may exchange specimens with the approval of the
director.
A permit holder who violates this section shall forfeit the permit
and bond and shall not receive a similar permit for one year. The fee
for a scientific permit is twelve dollars. The application fee is one
hundred five dollars.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.32.350 and 2009 c 333 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit
((or stamp)) is required to hunt for migratory birds.
(((1))) A migratory bird ((validation)) permit is required for all
persons sixteen years of age or older to hunt migratory birds. The fee
for the ((validation)) permit for hunters is ((ten)) fifteen dollars
for residents and nonresidents. ((The fee for the stamp for collectors
is ten dollars.
(2) The migratory bird license must be validated at the time of
signature of the licensee.))

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.370 and 1998 c 191 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special hunting season permit is required to hunt in each
special season ((established under chapter 77.12 RCW)).
(2) Persons may apply for special hunting season permits as
provided by rule of the commission.
(3) ((The application fee to enter the drawing for a special
hunting permit is five dollars for residents, fifty dollars for
nonresidents, and three dollars for youth.)) The application fee to
enter a drawing for a special hunting season permit or authorization
is:
(a) Six dollars for residents, or one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, for the permits in categories designated by the
commission for deer or elk, female big game, or for small game;
(b) Twelve dollars for residents, or one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, for the permits that the commission designates as
"quality" hunts that allow the harvest of buck deer, bull elk, or allow
the harvest of male big game species that are only available for
hunting by special permit;
(c) Twelve dollars for residents and nonresidents to apply for
special authorizations to hunt for migratory birds; and
(d) Three dollars for youth for any special hunt drawing or special
authorization.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.32.430 and 2010 c 193 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs
((ten)) eleven dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than ((three))
seven dollars((, including any or all fees authorized under RCW
77.32.050,)) and fifty cents when purchased for a personal use
saltwater, combination, or shellfish and seaweed license. The
endorsement shall cost no more than ((one dollar, including any or all
fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050,)) three dollars when purchased for
a temporary combination fishing license authorized under RCW
77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are ((not)) neither subject to the ten-dollar
charge nor to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this
section. Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card
issued before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a
temporary short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5)(a) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards,
catch card penalty fees, and the Dungeness crab endorsement must be
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.
((The funds received from the Dungeness crab endorsement may be used
only for the sampling, monitoring, and management of catch associated
with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries. Until June 30, 2011,
funds received from the Dungeness crab endorsement may be used for the
removal and disposal of derelict shellfish gear either directly by the
department or under contract with a third party.)) One dollar of the
funds received from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be
used for the removal and disposal of derelict shellfish gear either
directly by the department or under contract with a third party. The
department is required to maintain a separate accounting of these funds
and provide an annual report to the commission and the legislature by
January 1st of every year. The remaining portion of the funds received
from the sale of each Dungeness crab endorsement must be used for
education, sampling, monitoring, and management of catch associated
with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries.
(b) Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and not
supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab
recreational fisheries management.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.32.450 and 2005 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is ((sixty-six)) eighty-five dollars for residents, ((six
hundred sixty)) seven hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents, and
((thirty-three)) forty dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
((fifty-six)) seventy-five dollars for residents, ((five hundred
sixty)) six hundred seventy dollars for nonresidents, and ((twenty-eight)) thirty-five dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: ((Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the
time of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee
for this license is forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and twenty-three dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4:)) Deer ((or elk. At the time of purchase,
the holder must identify either deer or elk)). The fee for this
license is ((thirty-six)) thirty-nine dollars for residents, three
hundred ((sixty)) ninety-three dollars for nonresidents, and eighteen
dollars for youth.
(((e))) (d) Big game number 4: Elk. The fee for this license is
forty-four dollars for residents, four hundred fifty dollars for
nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear ((and cougar)). The fee for this
license is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(f) Big game number 6: Cougar. The fee for this license is twenty
dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ten
dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is ((twenty)) sixty dollars for residents, ((two
hundred)) three hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and ((ten))
twenty dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is ((twenty)) sixty dollars for residents, two
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and ((ten)) twenty dollars for
youth.
(((c) Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.))
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, ((or)) moose, or other big game species not
specified the permit fees are ((as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one)) three hundred dollars for
residents, one thousand five hundred dollars for nonresidents, and
fifty dollars for youth.
(((b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.))
(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule,
offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one
general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under
a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred ((fifty))
sixty-five dollars ((for residents and one thousand five hundred
dollars for nonresidents)).
(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection
(3)(((a) through (c))) of this section ((or in multiple seasons as set
out in subsection (4) of this section)) is by special permit issued
under RCW 77.32.370.
(((6) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a
license or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning
bear or cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.))

Sec. 11 RCW 77.32.460 and 2006 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.
(a) The fee for this license is thirty-five dollars for residents,
one hundred ((fifty)) sixty-five dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen
dollars for youth.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased ((in conjunction with))
at the same time as a big game combination license package is
((sixteen)) twenty dollars for residents, eighty-eight dollars for
nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is
((fifty)) sixty dollars for nonresidents.
(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required
to hunt for turkey.
(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag
will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game
license at no charge.
(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is fourteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and ((nine)) ten dollars for
youth.
(c) All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the
state wildlife account. One-third of the moneys received from turkey
tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management.
An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be
appropriated solely for upland game bird management. Moneys received
from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these
purposes.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.32.470 and 2009 c 333 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is ((thirty-six)) forty-five dollars for
residents, ((seventy-two)) one hundred eight dollars for nonresidents,
and five dollars for youth. There is an additional fifty-cent
surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is
((eighteen)) twenty-five dollars for residents, ((thirty-six)) fifty-two dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be
deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty-five dollars for residents, ((forty))
seventy-five dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident
seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
((five)) three consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or
possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or
offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - ((Seven)) Eight dollars for residents and
((fourteen)) sixteen dollars for nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - ((Ten)) Twelve dollars for residents and twenty-four dollars for nonresidents; and
(iii) Three days - ((Thirteen)) Fifteen dollars for residents and
((twenty-six)) thirty dollars for nonresidents((;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents)).
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is ((seven)) eight dollars for a
one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and
nonresidents for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) ((A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d))) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any
branch of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination
fishing license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake
fishing season as defined by rule of the commission.
(((e))) (d) The temporary combination fishing license fee for
active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United
States armed forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this
subsection. Active duty military personnel must provide a valid
military identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary
license to qualify for the resident rate.
(((f))) (e) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the
temporary combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp,
to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW
77.12.702.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to allow the use of two fishing
poles per fishing license holder for use on selected state waters. If
authorized by the commission, license holders must purchase a two-pole
stamp to use a second pole. The proceeds from the sale of the two-pole
stamp must be deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170 and used for the operation and maintenance of state-owned
fish hatcheries. The fee for a two-pole stamp is ((twenty)) thirteen
dollars for residents and nonresidents, and five dollars for
((resident)) seniors.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.32.520 and 2007 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for
all persons other than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of
age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish,
including razor clams, for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.
(2) A razor clam license allows a person to harvest only razor
clams for personal use from state waters, including national park
beaches.
(3) The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:
(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, ((seven)) ten
dollars;
(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty-seven
dollars; and
(c) For a senior, five dollars.
(4) The fee for an annual razor clam license is ((five)) eight
dollars ((and fifty cents)) for residents ((and eleven)), fifteen
dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for seniors.
(5) The fee for a three-day razor clam license is ((three)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) for both residents and nonresidents.
(6) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license or razor clam
license must be in immediate possession of the licensee and available
for inspection while a licensee is harvesting shellfish or seaweed.
However, the license does not need to be visible at all times.

Sec. 14 RCW 77.32.580 and 2009 c 420 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to a recreational license required under this
chapter, a Columbia river salmon and steelhead stamp or endorsement is
required in order for any person fifteen years of age or older to fish
recreationally for salmon or steelhead in the Columbia river and its
tributaries where these fisheries have been authorized by the
department. The cost for each stamp or endorsement is seven dollars
and fifty cents for residents and nonresidents and six dollars for
youth and seniors. The department shall deposit all receipts from
stamp or endorsement purchases into the Columbia river recreational
salmon and steelhead pilot stamp program account created in RCW
77.12.714.
(2) For the purposes of this section and RCW 77.12.712 and
77.12.714 through 77.12.718, the term "Columbia river" means the
Columbia river from a line across the Columbia river between Rocky
Point in Washington and Tongue Point in Oregon to the Chief Joseph dam.

Sec. 15 RCW 77.65.020 and 2000 c 107 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this title, a license issued under
this chapter is not transferable from the license holder to any other
person.
(2) The following restrictions apply to transfers of commercial
fishery licenses, salmon delivery licenses, and salmon charter licenses
that are transferable between license holders:
(a) The license holder shall surrender the previously issued
license to the department.
(b) The department shall complete no more than one transfer of the
license in any seven-day period.
(c) The fee to transfer a license from one license holder to
another is:
(i) The same as the resident license renewal fee if the license is
not limited under chapter 77.70 RCW;
(ii) Three and one-half times the resident renewal fee if the
license is not a commercial salmon license and the license is limited
under chapter 77.70 RCW;
(iii) Fifty dollars if the license is a commercial salmon license
and is limited under chapter 77.70 RCW;
(iv) Five hundred dollars if the license is a Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license; or
(v) If a license is transferred from a resident to a nonresident,
an additional fee is assessed that is equal to the difference between
the resident and nonresident license fees at the time of transfer, to
be paid by the transferee.
(d) In addition to the fees under (c) of this subsection, an
application fee of one hundred five dollars applies to all commercial
license transfers.
(3) A commercial license that is transferable under this title
survives the death of the holder. Though such licenses are not
personal property, they shall be treated as analogous to personal
property for purposes of inheritance and intestacy. Such licenses are
subject to state laws governing wills, trusts, estates, intestate
succession, and community property, except that such licenses are
exempt from claims of creditors of the estate and tax liens. The
surviving spouse, estate, or beneficiary of the estate may apply for a
renewal of the license. There is no fee for transfer of a license from
a license holder to the license holder's surviving spouse or estate, or
to a beneficiary of the estate.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.65.090 and 1994 c 260 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
This section applies to all commercial fishery licenses, delivery
licenses, and charter licenses, except for emergency salmon delivery
licenses.
(1) The holder of a license subject to this section may substitute
the vessel designated on the license or designate a vessel if none has
previously been designated if the license holder:
(a) Surrenders the previously issued license to the department;
(b) Submits to the department an application that identifies the
currently designated vessel, the vessel proposed to be designated, and
any other information required by the department; and
(c) Pays to the department a fee of thirty-five dollars and an
application fee of one hundred five dollars.
(2) Unless the license holder owns all vessels identified on the
application described in subsection (1)(b) of this section or unless
the vessel is designated on a Dungeness crab-coastal or a Dungeness
crab-coastal class B fishery license, the following restrictions apply
to changes in vessel designation:
(a) The department shall change the vessel designation on the
license no more than four times per calendar year.
(b) The department shall change the vessel designation on the
license no more than once in any seven-day period.

Sec. 17 RCW 77.65.110 and 2001 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to all commercial fishery licenses, charter
boat ((license[s])) licenses, and delivery licenses.
(1) A person designated as an alternate operator must possess an
alternate operator license issued under RCW 77.65.130, and be
designated on the license prior to engaging in the activities
authorized by the license. The holder of the commercial fishery
license, charter boat license, or delivery license may designate up to
two alternate operators for the license, except:
(a) Whiting -- Puget Sound fishery licensees may not designate
alternate operators;
(b) Emergency salmon delivery licensees may not designate alternate
operators;
(c) Shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery licensees may designate no more
than one alternate operator at a time; and
(d) Shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery licensees may designate no
more than one alternate operator at a time.
(2) The fee to change the alternate operator designation is twenty-two dollars in addition to the application fee of one hundred five
dollars.

Sec. 18 RCW 77.65.150 and 2007 c 442 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler
permits listed in this section according to the requirements of this
title. The licenses and permits and their annual license fees,
application fees, and surcharges are:

License or Permit
Annual Fee
(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge)
(RCW 77.12.702 Surcharge)
Application Fee Governing
Section

Resident
Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225
(plus $35 for RCW 77.12.702
Surcharge) $375
(plus $35 for RCW
77.12.702 Surcharge) $ 70

(b) Salmon charter $380
(plus $100)
(plus $35 for RCW 77.12.702
Surcharge) $685
(plus $100)
(plus $35 for RCW
77.12.702 Surcharge) $105 RCW 77.70.050

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 $ 0 RCW 77.70.060

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 $ 70 RCW 77.65.350

(2) A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for
salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a
salmon charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of
RCW 77.70.050.
(3) A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food
fish other than salmon, albacore tuna, and shellfish.
(4)(a) "Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a
fee, fish for food fish or shellfish for personal use in those state
waters set forth in (b) of this subsection. "Charter boat" also means
a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food fish or
shellfish for personal use in offshore waters or in the waters of other
states. The director may specify by rule when a vessel is a "charter
boat" within this definition.
(b) A person may not operate a vessel from which persons may, for
a fee, fish for food fish or shellfish in Puget Sound, Grays Harbor,
Willapa Bay, Pacific Ocean waters, Lake Washington, or the Columbia
river below the bridge at Longview unless the vessel is designated on
a charter boat license.
(5) A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington
charter license under the same rules as Washington charter boat
operators in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of Washington state
from the southern border of the state of Washington to Leadbetter
Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not take on or discharge
passengers for any purpose from any Washington port, the Washington
shore, or a dock, landing, or other point in Washington. The
provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as the state
of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.
(6) A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this
section may be renewed if the license holder notifies the department by
May 1st of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery
during that calendar year. The license holder must pay the one hundred
dollar enhancement surcharge ((and)), a thirty-five dollar surcharge to
be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702,
plus a ((fifteen-dollar handling charge)) one hundred five dollar
application fee, in order to be considered a valid renewal and eligible
to renew the license the following year.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.65.160 and 2001 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following commercial salmon fishery licenses are required
for the license holder to use the specified gear to fish for salmon in
state waters. Only a person who meets the qualifications of RCW
77.70.090 may hold a license listed in this subsection. The licenses
and their annual license fees, application fees, and surcharges under
RCW 77.95.090 are:

Fishery
License Resident
Fee Nonresident
Fee Surcharge Application Fee

(a) Salmon Gill Net -- Grays Harbor-Columbia river $380 $685 plus $100 $105

(b) Salmon Gill Net -- Puget Sound $380 $685 plus $100 $105

(c) Salmon Gill Net -- Willapa Bay-Columbia river $380 $685 plus $100 $105

(d) Salmon purse seine $530 $985 plus $100 $105

(e) Salmon reef net $380 $685 plus $100 $105

(f) Salmon troll $380 $685 plus $100 $105

(2) A license issued under this section authorizes no taking or
delivery of salmon or other food fish unless a vessel is designated
under RCW 77.65.100.
(3) Holders of commercial salmon fishery licenses may retain
incidentally caught food fish other than salmon, subject to rules of
the department.
(4) A salmon troll license includes a salmon delivery license.
(5) A salmon gill net license authorizes the taking of salmon only
in the geographical area for which the license is issued. The
geographical designations in subsection (1) of this section have the
following meanings:
(a) "Puget Sound" includes waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca,
Georgia Strait, Puget Sound and all bays, inlets, canals, coves,
sounds, and estuaries lying easterly and southerly of the international
boundary line and a line at the entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca
projected northerly from Cape Flattery to the lighthouse on Tatoosh
Island and then to Bonilla Point on Vancouver Island.
(b) "Grays Harbor-Columbia river" includes waters of Grays Harbor
and tributary estuaries lying easterly of a line projected northerly
from Point Chehalis Light to Point Brown and those waters of the
Columbia river and tributary sloughs and estuaries easterly of a line
at the entrance to the Columbia river projected southerly from the most
westerly point of the North jetty to the most westerly point of the
South jetty.
(c) "Willapa Bay-Columbia river" includes waters of Willapa Bay and
tributary estuaries and easterly of a line projected northerly from
Leadbetter Point to the Cape Shoalwater tower and those waters of the
Columbia river and tributary sloughs described in (b) of this
subsection.
(6) A commercial salmon troll fishery license may be renewed under
this section if the license holder notifies the department by May 1st
of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery during
that calendar year. A commercial salmon gill net, reef net, or seine
fishery license may be renewed under this section if the license holder
notifies the department before the third Monday in September of that
year that he or she will not participate in the fishery during that
calendar year. The license holder must pay the one hundred dollar
enhancement surcharge, plus a ((fifteen-dollar handling charge)) one
hundred five dollar application fee before the third Monday in
September, in order to be considered a valid renewal and eligible to
renew the license the following year.
(7) Notwithstanding the annual license fees and surcharges
established in subsection (1) of this section, a person who holds a
resident commercial salmon fishery license shall pay an annual license
fee of one hundred dollars plus the surcharge and application fee if
all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The license holder is at least seventy-five years of age;
(b) The license holder owns a fishing vessel and has fished with a
resident commercial salmon fishery license for at least thirty years;
and
(c) The commercial salmon fishery license is for a geographical
area other than the Puget Sound.
An alternate operator may not be designated for a license renewed
at the one hundred dollar annual fee under this subsection (7).

Sec. 20 RCW 77.65.170 and 2005 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A salmon delivery license is required for a commercial fishing
vessel to deliver salmon taken for commercial purposes in offshore
waters to a place or port in the state. As used in this section,
"deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and include
arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals
ashore from offshore waters. The annual fee for a salmon delivery
license is three hundred eighty dollars for residents and six hundred
eighty-five dollars for nonresidents. The application fee for a salmon
delivery license is one hundred five dollars. The annual surcharge
under RCW 77.95.090 is one hundred dollars for each license. Holders
of nonlimited entry delivery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.210 may
apply the nonlimited entry delivery license fee against the salmon
delivery license fee.
(2) Only a person who meets the qualifications established in RCW
77.70.090 may hold a salmon delivery license issued under this section.
(3) A salmon delivery license authorizes no taking of salmon or
other food fish or shellfish from the waters of the state.
(4) If the director determines that the operation of a vessel under
a salmon delivery license results in the depletion or destruction of
the state's salmon resource or the delivery into this state of salmon
products prohibited by law, the director may revoke the license under
the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 77.65.190 and 2005 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who does not qualify for a license under RCW 77.70.090
shall obtain a nontransferable emergency salmon delivery license to
make one delivery from a commercial fishing vessel of salmon taken for
commercial purposes in offshore waters. As used in this section,
"delivery" means arrival at a place or port, and include arrivals from
offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals ashore from
offshore waters. The director shall not issue an emergency salmon
delivery license unless, as determined by the director, a bona fide
emergency exists. The license fee is two hundred twenty-five dollars
for residents and four hundred seventy-five dollars for nonresidents.
The application fee is one hundred five dollars. An applicant for an
emergency salmon delivery license shall designate no more than one
vessel that will be used with the license. Alternate operator licenses
are not required of persons delivering salmon under an emergency salmon
delivery license. Emergency salmon delivery licenses are not
renewable.

Sec. 22 RCW 77.65.200 and 2009 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required
for food fish fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. As
used in this section, "food fish" does not include salmon. The
director may issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to
a person who meets the qualifications established in applicable
governing sections of this title.

Fishery
(Governing section(s)) Annual Fee Application Fee Vessel
Required? Limited
Entry?

Resident
Nonresident

(a) Baitfish Lampara $185 $295 $ 70 Yes No

(b) Baitfish purse seine $530 $985 $ 70 Yes No

(c) Bottom fish jig $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(d) Bottom fish pot $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(e) Bottom fish troll $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(f) Carp $130 $185 $ 70 No No

(g) Columbia river smelt $380 $685 $ 70 No No

(h) Dog fish set net $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(i) Emerging commercial
fishery (RCW 77.70.160
and 77.65.400) $185 $295 $ 105 Determined by rule Determined by rule

(j) Food fish drag seine $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(k) Food fish set line $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(l) Food fish trawl- $240 $405 $ 70 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(m) Food fish trawl- $185 $295 $ 70 Yes No

Puget Sound

(n) Herring dip bag net $175 $275 $ 70 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(o) Herring drag seine $175 $275 $ 70 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(p) Herring gill net $175 $275 $ 105 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(q) Herring Lampara $175 $275 $ 70 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(r) Herring purse seine $175 $275 $105 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.120)

(s) Herring spawn-on-kelp
(RCW 77.70.210) N/A N/A N/A Yes Yes

(t) Sardine purse seine (RCW
77.70.480) $185 $295 $ 105 Yes Yes

(u) Sardine purse seine
temporary (RCW
77.70.480) $185 $295 $ 105 Yes No

(v) Smelt dip bag net $130 $185 $ 70 No No

(w) Smelt gill net $380 $685 $ 70 Yes No

(x) Whiting-Puget Sound
(RCW 77.70.130) $295 $520
$ 105 Yes
Yes

(2) The director may by rule determine the species of food fish
that may be taken with the commercial fishery licenses established in
this section, the gear that may be used with the licenses, and the
areas or waters in which the licenses may be used. Where a fishery
license has been established for a particular species, gear,
geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general fishery
license may not be used to take food fish in that fishery.

Sec. 23 RCW 77.65.210 and 2007 c 442 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not use a commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or
shellfish taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters to a port in
the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As used in this
section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and
include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters. As used in this section, "food
fish" does not include salmon. As used in this section, "shellfish"
does not include ocean pink shrimp, coastal crab, or fish or shellfish
taken under an emerging commercial fisheries license if taken from off-shore waters. The annual license fee for a nonlimited entry delivery
license is one hundred ten dollars for residents and two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and an additional thirty-five dollar
surcharge for both residents and nonresidents to be deposited in the
rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702. The application
fee for a nonlimited entry delivery license is one hundred five
dollars.
(2) Holders of salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.160, salmon delivery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.170, crab
pot fishery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.220, food fish trawl -- Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses
issued under RCW 77.65.200, Dungeness crab -- coastal fishery licenses,
ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses, shrimp trawl -- Non-Puget Sound
fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses issued under
RCW 77.65.220 may deliver food fish or shellfish taken in offshore
waters without a nonlimited entry delivery license.
(3) A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of
food fish or shellfish from state waters.

Sec. 24 RCW 77.65.220 and 2000 c 107 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required
for shellfish fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. The
director may issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to
a person who meets the qualifications established in applicable
governing sections of this title.

Fishery
(Governing section(s)) Annual Fee Application Fee Vessel
Required? Limited
Entry?

Resident Nonresident

(a) Burrowing shrimp $185 $295 $ 105 Yes No

(b) Crab ring net- $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(c) Crab ring net- $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

Puget Sound

(d) Dungeness crab-coastal
(RCW 77.70.280) $295 $520 $ 105 Yes Yes

(e) Dungeness crab- $295 $520 $ 105 Yes Yes

coastal, class B

(RCW 77.70.280)

(f) Dungeness crab- $130 $185 $ 105 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.110)

(g) Emerging commercial
fishery (RCW 77.70.160
and 77.65.400) $185 $295 $ 105 Determined Determined

by rule by rule

(h) Geoduck (RCW $ 0 $ 0 $70 Yes Yes

77.70.220)

(i) Hardshell clam $530 $985 $ 70 Yes No

mechanical
harvester

(RCW 77.65.250)

(j) Oyster reserve $130 $185 $ 70 No No

(RCW 77.65.260)

(k) Razor clam $130 $185 $ 105 No No

(l) Sea cucumber dive $130 $185 $ 105 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.190)

(m) Sea urchin dive $130 $185 $105 Yes Yes

(RCW 77.70.150)

(n) Shellfish dive $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(o) Shellfish pot $130 $185 $ 70 Yes No

(p) Shrimp pot- $185 $295 $ 105 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.410)

(q) Shrimp trawl- $240 $405 $ 105 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(r) Shrimp trawl- $185 $295 $105 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 77.70.420)

(s) Squid $185 $295 $70 Yes No

(2) The director may by rule determine the species of shellfish
that may be taken with the commercial fishery licenses established in
this section, the gear that may be used with the licenses, and the
areas or waters in which the licenses may be used. Where a fishery
license has been established for a particular species, gear,
geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general fishery
license may not be used to take shellfish in that fishery.

Sec. 25 RCW 77.65.280 and 2002 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A wholesale fish dealer's license is required for:
(1) A business in the state to engage in the commercial processing
of food fish or shellfish, including custom canning or processing of
personal use food fish or shellfish.
(2) A business in the state to engage in the wholesale selling,
buying, or brokering of food fish or shellfish. A wholesale fish
dealer's license is not required of those businesses which buy
exclusively from Washington licensed wholesale dealers and sell solely
at retail.
(3) Fishermen who land and sell their catch or harvest in the state
to anyone other than a licensed wholesale dealer within or outside the
state, unless the fisher has a direct retail endorsement.
(4) A business to engage in the commercial manufacture or
preparation of fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or other by-products from food fish or shellfish.
(5) A business employing a fish buyer as defined under RCW
77.65.340.
The annual license fee for a wholesale dealer is two hundred fifty
dollars. The application fee is one hundred five dollars. A wholesale
fish dealer's license is not required for persons engaged in the
processing, wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of private sector
cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020. However, if a
means of identifying such products is required by rules adopted under
RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from licensing requirements established by
this subsection applies only if the aquatic products are identified in
conformance with those rules.

Sec. 26 RCW 77.65.340 and 2000 c 107 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A fish buyer's license is required of and shall be carried by
each individual engaged by a wholesale fish dealer to purchase food
fish or shellfish from a licensed commercial fisherman. A fish buyer
may represent only one wholesale fish dealer.
(2) The annual fee for a fish buyer's license is ninety-five
dollars. The application fee is one hundred five dollars.

Sec. 27 RCW 77.65.390 and 2005 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
An ocean pink shrimp delivery license is required for a commercial
fishing vessel to deliver ocean pink shrimp taken for commercial
purposes in offshore waters and delivered to a port in the state. As
used in this section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place
or port, and include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the
state and arrivals from state or offshore waters. The annual license
fee is one hundred fifty dollars for residents and three hundred
dollars for nonresidents. The application fee is one hundred five
dollars. Ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses are transferable.

Sec. 28 RCW 77.65.440 and 2009 c 333 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall issue the personal licenses listed in this
section according to the requirements of this title. The licenses and
their annual fees are:

Personal License Annual Fee
(RCW 77.95. Surcharge) Application Fee Governing
Section

Resident Nonresident

(1) Alternate Operator $ 35 $ 35 $ 70 RCW 77.65.130

(2) Geoduck Diver $185 $295 $ 70 RCW 77.65.410

(3) Food Fish Guide $130 $630 $ 70 RCW 77.65.370

(plus $20) (plus $100)

Sec. 29 RCW 77.65.450 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state trapping license allows the holder to trap fur-bearing
animals throughout the state((;)). However, a trapper may not place
traps on private property without permission of the owner, lessee, or
tenant where the land is improved and apparently used, or where the
land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude intruders or
to indicate a property boundary line, or where notice is given by
posting in a conspicuous manner. A state trapping license is void on
April 1st following the date of issuance. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or older, fifteen
dollars for residents under sixteen years of age, and one hundred
eighty dollars for nonresidents. The application fee is one hundred
five dollars.

Sec. 30 RCW 77.65.480 and 2009 c 333 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A taxidermy license allows the holder to practice taxidermy for
commercial purposes, as that term is defined in RCW 77.15.110. The fee
for this license is one hundred eighty dollars. The application fee is
seventy dollars.
(2) A fur dealer's license allows the holder to purchase, receive,
or resell raw furs for commercial purposes, as that term is defined in
RCW 77.15.110. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars.
The application fee is seventy dollars.
(3) A game fish guide license allows the holder to offer or perform
the services of a game fish guide in the taking of game fish. The fee
for this license is one hundred eighty dollars for a resident and six
hundred dollars for a nonresident. The application fee is seventy
dollars.
(4) A game farm license allows the holder to operate a game farm to
acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under conditions
prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for
this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight
dollars for each following year. The application fee is seventy
dollars.
(5) A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game
fish into the waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the
commission. The fee for this permit is twenty-four dollars. The
application fee is seventy dollars.
(6) A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote,
conduct, hold, or sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in
accordance with rules of the commission. The fee for a fishing contest
permit is twenty-four dollars. The fee for a field trial contest
permit is twenty-four dollars. The application fee is seventy dollars.
(7)(a) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to
purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish
harvested by Indian fishers lawfully exercising fishing rights reserved
by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under conditions
prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this license is one
hundred eighty dollars. The application fee is one hundred five
dollars.
(b) An anadromous game fish buyer's license is not required for
those businesses that buy steelhead trout and other anadromous game
fish from Washington licensed game fish dealers and sell solely at
retail.

Sec. 31 RCW 77.65.510 and 2009 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must establish and administer a direct retail
endorsement to serve as a single license that permits a Washington
license holder or alternate operator to commercially harvest retail-eligible species and to clean, dress, and sell his or her catch
directly to consumers at retail, including over the internet. The
direct retail endorsement must be issued as an optional addition to all
holders of: (a) A commercial fishing license for retail-eligible
species that the department offers under this chapter; and (b) an
alternate operator license who are designated as an alternate operator
on a commercial fishing license for retail eligible species.
(2) The direct retail endorsement must be offered at the time of
application for the qualifying commercial fishing license. Individuals
in possession of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued under
this chapter, and alternate operators designated on such a license, may
add a direct retail endorsement to their current license at any time.
Individuals who do not have a commercial fishing license for retail-eligible species issued under this chapter, and who are not designated
as alternate operators on such a license, may not receive a direct
retail endorsement. The costs, conditions, responsibilities, and
privileges associated with the endorsed commercial fishing license is
not affected or altered in any way by the addition of a direct retail
endorsement. These costs include the base cost of the license and any
revenue and excise taxes.
(3) An individual need only add one direct retail endorsement to
his or her license portfolio. If a direct retail endorsement is
selected by an individual holding more than one commercial fishing
license issued under this chapter, a single direct retail endorsement
is considered to be added to all qualifying commercial fishing licenses
held by that individual, and is the only license required for the
individual to sell at retail any retail-eligible species permitted by
all of the underlying endorsed licenses. If a direct retail
endorsement is selected by an individual designated as an alternate
operator on more than one commercial license issued under this chapter,
a single direct retail endorsement is the only license required for the
individual to sell at retail any retail-eligible species permitted by
all of the underlying endorsed licenses on which the individual is
designated as an alternate operator. The direct retail endorsement
applies only to the Washington license holder or alternate operator
obtaining the endorsement.
(4) In addition to any fees charged for the endorsed licenses and
harvest documentation as required by this chapter or the rules of the
department, the department may set a reasonable annual fee not to
exceed the administrative costs to the department for a direct retail
endorsement. The application fee is one hundred five dollars.
(5) The holder of a direct retail endorsement is responsible for
documenting the commercial harvest of salmon and crab according to the
provisions of this chapter, the rules of the department for a wholesale
fish dealer, and the reporting requirements of the endorsed license.
Any retail-eligible species caught by the holder of a direct retail
endorsement must be documented on fish tickets.
(6) The direct retail endorsement must be displayed in a readily
visible manner by the seller wherever and whenever a sale to someone
other than a licensed wholesale dealer occurs. The commission may
require that the holder of a direct retail endorsement notify the
department up to eighteen hours before conducting an in-person sale of
retail-eligible species, except for in-person sales that have a
cumulative retail sales value of less than one hundred fifty dollars in
a twenty-four hour period that are sold directly from the vessel. For
sales occurring in a venue other than in person, such as over the
internet, through a catalog, or on the phone, the direct retail
endorsement number of the seller must be provided to the buyer both at
the time of sale and the time of delivery. All internet sales must be
conducted in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
(7) The direct retail endorsement is to be held by a natural person
and is not transferrable or assignable. If the endorsed license is
transferred, the direct retail endorsement immediately becomes void,
and the transferor is not eligible for a full or prorated reimbursement
of the annual fee paid for the direct retail endorsement. Upon
becoming void, the holder of a direct retail endorsement must surrender
the physical endorsement to the department.
(8) The holder of a direct retail endorsement must abide by the
provisions of Title 69 RCW as they apply to the processing and retail
sale of seafood. The department must distribute a pamphlet, provided
by the department of agriculture, with the direct retail endorsement
generally describing the labeling requirements set forth in chapter
69.04 RCW as they apply to seafood.
(9) The holder of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued
under this chapter, or an alternate operator designated on such a
license, must either possess a direct retail endorsement or a wholesale
dealer license provided for in RCW 77.65.280 in order to lawfully sell
their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other than a licensed
wholesale dealer.
(10) The direct retail endorsement entitles the holder to sell a
retail-eligible species only at a temporary food service establishment
as that term is defined in RCW 69.06.045, or directly to a restaurant
or other similar food service business.

Sec. 32 RCW 77.70.080 and 2000 c 107 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The total number of anglers authorized by the director shall
not exceed the total number authorized for 1980.
(2) Angler permits issued under RCW 77.70.060 are transferable.
All or a portion of the permit may be transferred to another salmon
charter license holder.
(3) The angler permit holder and proposed transferee shall notify
the department when transferring an angler permit, and the director
shall issue a new angler permit certificate. If the original permit
holder retains a portion of the permit, the director shall issue a new
angler permit certificate reflecting the decrease in angler capacity.
(4) The department shall collect a fee of ten dollars for each
certificate issued under subsection (3) of this section, plus an
application fee of one hundred five dollars.

Sec. 33 RCW 77.70.190 and 2010 c 193 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sea cucumber dive fishery license is required to take sea
cucumbers for commercial purposes. A sea cucumber dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may be
in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is
not renewable. However, if the license is not held because of
revocation or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall
renew the license in the name of a natural person at the end of the
revocation or suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of
the license before the end of the year in which the revocation or
suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during either of
the previous two years because of a license suspension by the director
or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the
person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. The collections and deposits
must continue, as set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection, through
license year 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty, whichever occurs first. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The sea cucumber
dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall only be used to retire sea cucumber
licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty, and
thereafter shall only be used for sea cucumber management and
enforcement. The director or the director's designee shall notify the
department of revenue within thirty days when the number of licenses is
reduced to twenty.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea cucumber dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty,
whichever occurs first.
(b) For licenses issued for license years 2000 through 2013, or
until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty, whichever occurs
first, a surcharge shall be charged on the sea cucumber dive fishery
license for designating an alternate operator. The surcharge shall be
as follows: Five hundred dollars for the first year or each of the
first two consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is
designated and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter
that any alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are transferable. For
licenses issued for license years 2000 through 2013, or whenever the
number of licenses is reduced to twenty, whichever occurs first, there
is a surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber dive fishery license. The
surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first transfer of a license
valid for license year 2000 and two thousand five hundred dollars for
any subsequent transfer, occurring in the license years 2000 through
2013, or whenever the number of licenses is reduced to twenty,
whichever occurs first. The application fee to transfer a sea cucumber
dive fishery license is one hundred five dollars. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a
transfer from the natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that
person's spouse or child.
(6) If fewer than twenty persons are eligible for sea cucumber dive
fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty
natural persons to be eligible for a sea cucumber dive fishery license.
New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed according
to rules of the department that recover the value of such licensed
privilege.

Sec. 34 RCW 77.70.220 and 2000 c 107 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person shall not harvest geoduck clams commercially without
a geoduck fishery license. This section does not apply to the harvest
of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020. The application fee is seventy dollars.
(2) Only a person who has entered into a geoduck harvesting
agreement with the department of natural resources under RCW
((79.96.080)) 79.135.210 may hold a geoduck fishery license.
(3) A geoduck fishery license authorizes no taking of geoducks
outside the boundaries of the public lands designated in the underlying
harvesting agreement, or beyond the harvest ceiling set in the
underlying harvesting agreement.
(4) A geoduck fishery license expires when the underlying geoduck
harvesting agreement terminates.
(5) The director shall determine the number of geoduck fishery
licenses that may be issued for each geoduck harvesting agreement, the
number of units of gear whose use the license authorizes, and the type
of gear that may be used, subject to RCW 77.60.070. In making those
determinations, the director shall seek to conserve the geoduck
resource and prevent damage to its habitat.
(6) The holder of a geoduck fishery license and the holder's agents
and representatives shall comply with all applicable commercial diving
safety regulations adopted by the federal occupational safety and
health administration established under the federal occupational safety
and health act of 1970 as such law exists on May 8, 1979, 84 Stat. 1590
et seq.; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq. A violation of those regulations
is a violation of this subsection. For the purposes of this section,
persons who dive for geoducks are "employees" as defined by the federal
occupational safety and health act. A violation of this subsection is
grounds for suspension or revocation of a geoduck fishery license
following a hearing under the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW. The
director shall not suspend or revoke a geoduck fishery license if the
violation has been corrected within ten days of the date the license
holder receives written notice of the violation. If there is a
substantial probability that a violation of the commercial diving
standards could result in death or serious physical harm to a person
engaged in harvesting geoduck clams, the director shall suspend the
license immediately until the violation has been corrected. If the
license holder is not the operator of the harvest vessel and has
contracted with another person for the harvesting of geoducks, the
director shall not suspend or revoke the license if the license holder
terminates its business relationship with that person until compliance
with this subsection is secured.
(7) A person using a vessel in the geoduck fishery is required to
apply for and obtain a vessel identification number from the
department. The application fee for the vessel identification number
is one hundred five dollars.

Sec. 35 RCW 77.70.260 and 2000 c 107 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of an ocean pink shrimp fishing vessel that does not
qualify for an ocean pink shrimp delivery license issued under RCW
77.65.390 shall obtain an ocean pink shrimp single delivery license in
order to make a landing into a state port of ocean pink shrimp taken in
offshore waters. The director shall not issue an ocean pink shrimp
single delivery license unless, as determined by the director, a bona
fide emergency exists. A maximum of six ocean pink shrimp single
delivery licenses may be issued annually to any vessel. The fee for an
ocean pink shrimp single delivery license is one hundred dollars. The
application fee is one hundred five dollars.

Sec. 36 RCW 77.70.490 and 2009 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license:
(a) May only be issued to a person that held a coastal pilchard
experimental fishery permit in 2008, except as otherwise provided in
this section;
(b) Must be renewed annually to remain active; and
(c) Subject to the restrictions of subsections (6) and (7) of this
section and RCW 77.65.040, is transferable.
(2) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license may be
issued to any person that held a coastal pilchard experimental fishery
permit in 2005, 2006, or 2007 and is precluded from qualifying under
subsection (1) of this section because the vessel designated on the
permit sank prior to 2008.
(3) Beginning in 2010, after taking into consideration the status
of the Pacific sardine population, the impact of removal of sardines
and other forage fish to the marine ecosystem, including the effect on
endangered marine species, and the market for Pacific sardines in the
state, the director may issue:
(a) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license to any
person provided that the issuance would not raise the number of
licenses beyond the number initially issued in 2009;
(b) A Washington Pacific sardine purse seine temporary annual
fishery permit to any person if the combined number of active
Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery licenses and annual
temporary permits already issued during the year is less than twenty-five.
(4) The annual fee for a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine
fishery license is one hundred eighty-five dollars for residents and
two hundred ninety-five dollars for nonresidents. The application fee
is one hundred five dollars.
(5) The fee for a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine temporary
annual fishery permit is one hundred eighty-five dollars for residents
and two hundred ninety-five dollars for nonresidents. The application
fee is one hundred five dollars. A temporary annual fishery permit
expires at the end of the calendar year in which the permit is issued.
(6) Only a person who owns or operates the vessel designated on the
license or permit may hold a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine
fishery license or temporary annual fishery permit.
(7) A person may not own or hold an ownership interest in more than
two Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery licenses.
(8) The director shall adopt rules that require a person fishing
under a Washington Pacific sardine purse seine fishery license or a
temporary annual permit to minimize bycatch, and to the extent bycatch
cannot be avoided, to minimize the mortality of such bycatch.

Sec. 37 RCW 77.115.040 and 2007 c 216 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All aquatic farmers, as defined in RCW 15.85.020, shall
register with the department. The application fee is one hundred five
dollars. The director shall assign each aquatic farm a unique
registration number and develop and maintain in an electronic database
a registration list of all aquaculture farms. The department shall
establish procedures to annually update the aquatic farmer information
contained in the registration list. The department shall coordinate
with the department of health using shellfish growing area
certification data when updating the registration list.
(2) Registered aquaculture farms shall provide the department with
the following information:
(a) The name of the aquatic farmer;
(b) The address of the aquatic farmer;
(c) Contact information such as telephone, fax, web site, and e-mail address, if available;
(d) The number and location of acres under cultivation, including
a map displaying the location of the cultivated acres;
(e) The name of the landowner of the property being cultivated or
otherwise used in the aquatic farming operation;
(f) The private sector cultured aquatic product being propagated,
farmed, or cultivated; and
(g) Statistical production data.
(3) The state veterinarian shall be provided with registration and
statistical data by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 RCW 77.32.510 (Recreational license fees--Disposition of appropriation) and 1998 c 191 s 43 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 Sections 1 through 4 and 6 through 38 of
this act take effect September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Section 14 of this act expires June 30,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Section 5 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect June 30, 2011.

--- END ---