BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that legislation
authorizing modification of the state energy code directed the state
building code council to update the building code provisions by
incrementally increasing energy efficiency through code modification
starting in 2013. This start date was chosen because the legislature
was aware that there are substantial costs to consumers and employers
associated with implementation of the energy code's increased energy
efficiency standards and wanted to provide builders and local
authorities sufficient time to adapt to new procedures. The state
building code council adopted extensive modifications to the energy
code in November 2009. Since that time, the governor has requested a
delay in implementation of the revisions to the energy code because the
impact of the changes would slow the economic recovery of the state.
The legislature supports the governor's concern that the 2009
amendments to the energy code will slow recovery of the economy and
supports a delay in implementation of the amendments until at least
April 1, 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2010 c 271 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the state building
code council shall adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended
by the council by rule.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of general administration as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior
to publication of proposed rules. The director of the department of
general administration shall recommend to the state building code
council any changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the
requirements of this section.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington
state in place of the existing state energy code.
(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.27A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Changes to the state energy code as adopted by the state
building code council on November 20, 2009, that modified chapter 51-11
WAC may not be implemented prior to April 1, 2012.
(2) This section expires April 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires April 1, 2014.

--- END ---