BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.510 and 2004 c 195 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall issue a superseding water right permit or
certificate for a groundwater right where the source of water is an
aquifer for which the department adopts rules establishing a
groundwater management subarea and water from the federal Columbia
basin project is delivered for use by a person who holds such a
groundwater right. The superseding water right permit or certificate
shall designate that portion of the groundwater right that is replaced
by water from the federal Columbia basin project as a standby or
reserve right that may be used when water delivered by the federal
project is curtailed or otherwise not available. The period of
curtailment or unavailability shall be deemed a low flow period under
RCW 90.14.140(2)(b). The total number of acres irrigated by the person
under the groundwater right and through the use of water delivered from
the federal project must not exceed the quantity of water ((used))
authorized by the federal bureau of reclamation and number of acres
irrigated under the person's water right permit or certificate for the
use of water from the aquifer.

--- END ---