BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 87.03.136 and 1994 c 117 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An irrigation district has the power to sell or lease real property
owned by the district whenever its board of directors, by resolution:
Determines that the property is not necessary or needed for the use of
the district; and authorizes the sale or lease. Notice of the
district's intention to sell or lease the property shall be made by
publication at least twenty days before the transaction is executed
regarding the property in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county where the property or part of the property is located or, if
there is no such newspaper in the county, in a newspaper of general
circulation published in an adjoining county. The publication shall be
made at least once a week during three consecutive weeks. The notice
shall state whether the sale or lease will be negotiated by the
district or will be awarded by bid.
The district may lease the property ((from year to year)) for a
duration determined by the board, afford the lessee the option to
purchase the property, sell the property on contract for deferred
payments, sell the property pursuant to a promissory note secured by a
mortgage or deed of trust, or sell the property for cash and conveyance
by deed. The appropriate documents shall be executed by the president
of the board and acknowledged by the secretary.
The resolution authorizing the sale or lease shall be entered in
the minutes of the board and shall fix the price at which the lease,
option, or sale may be made. The price shall be not less than the
reasonable market value of the property; however, the board may,
without consideration, dedicate, grant, or convey district land or
easements in district land for highway or public utility purposes that
convenience the inhabitants of the district if the board deems that the
action will enhance the value of the remaining district land to an
extent equal to or greater than the value of the land or easement
dedicated, granted, or conveyed.

--- END ---