BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.010 and 1999 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to make the criminal justice system
accountable to the public by developing a system for the sentencing of
felony offenders which structures, but does not eliminate,
discretionary decisions affecting sentences, and to:
(1) Ensure that the punishment for a criminal offense is
proportionate to the seriousness of the offense and the offender's
criminal history;
(2) Promote respect for the law by providing punishment which is
just;
(3) Be commensurate with the punishment imposed on others
committing similar offenses;
(4) Protect the public;
(5) Offer the offender an opportunity to improve him or herself;
(6) Make frugal use of the state's and local governments'
resources; ((and))
(7) Reduce the risk of reoffending by offenders in the community;
and
(8) Consider a victim's needs and provide restitution and support
as needed to ensure that the person will not be further victimized.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2008 c 231 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set
the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the
amount if the department has active supervision of the offender,
otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an
offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid prior to any
payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution is
satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment proportionally
among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence
over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court.
All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the
county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of
incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, or by
agreement between the department and the county clerk, the county clerk
may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly
payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment amount, or
if the department set the monthly payment amount and the department has
subsequently turned the collection of the legal financial obligation
over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the monthly payment
amount without the matter being returned to the court. During the
period of repayment, the county clerk may require the offender to
report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the appropriateness of
the collection schedule for the legal financial obligation. During
this reporting, the offender is required under oath to respond
truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, or if there is an agreement
between the department and the county clerk for the county clerk to
assume collection responsibility on any case or group of cases, the
county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid legal financial
obligations from the offender. Any amount collected by the department
shall be remitted daily to the county clerk for the purpose of
disbursements. The department and the county clerks are authorized,
but not required, to accept credit cards as payment for a legal
financial obligation, and any costs incurred related to accepting
credit card payments shall be the responsibility of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94B.040, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.
(11)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(12) The department shall arrange for the collection of unpaid
legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in the
community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(13) The county clerk may access the records of the employment
security department for the purposes of verifying employment or income,
seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties necessary
to the collection of an offender's legal financial obligations.
(14) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the
counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other persons
acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any offender
who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the department
for a term of community custody, and who remains under the jurisdiction
of the court for payment of legal financial obligations.

--- END ---