BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.10.495 and 2003 c 53 s 234 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a snowmobile in such a way as to
endanger human life.
(2) No person shall operate a snowmobile in such a way as to run
down or harass deer, elk, or any wildlife, or any domestic animal, nor
shall any person ((carry any loaded weapon upon, nor)) hunt from((,))
any snowmobile except by permit issued by the director of fish and
wildlife under RCW 77.32.237.
(3) Any person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---