BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.49.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every city and town shall prescribe by ordinance within what time
assessments or installments thereof ((shall)) must be paid, and
((shall)) may provide for the payment and collection of penalties and
interest thereon at a rate as ((shall be)) fixed by the legislative
body of the city or town. ((Assessments or installments thereof, when
delinquent, in addition to such interest, shall bear such penalty not
less than five percent as shall be by general ordinance prescribed.))

Sec. 2 RCW 35.50.030 and 2002 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If on the first day of January in any year, two installments of
any local improvement assessment are delinquent, or if the final
installment thereof has been delinquent for more than one year, the
city or town ((shall)) must proceed with the foreclosure of the
delinquent assessment or delinquent installments thereof by proceedings
brought in its own name in the superior court of the county in which
the city or town is situate.
(2) The proceedings shall be commenced on or before March 1st of
that year or on or before such other date in such year as may be fixed
by general ordinance, but not before the city or town treasurer has
notified by certified mail the persons whose names appear on the
current assessment roll as owners of the property charged with the
assessments or installments which are delinquent, at the address last
known to the treasurer, a notice thirty days before the commencement of
the proceedings. If the person whose name appears on the assessment
rolls of the county assessor as owner of the property, or whose name
appears on the tax rolls of the county treasurer as taxpayer of the
property, or the address shown for the owner, differs from that
appearing on the city or town assessment roll, then the treasurer shall
also mail a copy of the notice to that person or that address.
(3) The notice shall state the amount due, including foreclosure
costs, upon each separate lot, tract, or parcel of land and the date
after which the proceedings will be commenced. The city or town
treasurer shall file with the clerk of the superior court at the time
of commencement of the foreclosure proceeding the affidavit of the
person who mailed the notices. This affidavit shall be conclusive
proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding the mandatory foreclosure requirements
established in subsection (2) of this section, a city or town may delay
foreclosure proceedings for residential property owners for up to one
year if the owner enters into an installment plan that is acceptable to
the city or town and that allows the owner to become current with
delinquent installments within that one-year period. However, the city
or town may not exercise this option to delay foreclosure proceedings
for any delinquencies that exist or occur within two years from the
date the final installment is due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply only to
local improvement assessment rolls formed after the effective date of
this section.

--- END ---