BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.64.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1609 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the official canvass of returns of any election reveals that
the difference in the number of votes cast for the approval of a
statewide or local ballot measure and the number of votes cast for the
rejection of such measure is less than two thousand votes and also less
than one-half of one percent of the total number of votes cast on such
measure, ((the secretary of state shall direct that)) a recount of all
votes cast on such measure must be made ((on such measure,)) in the
manner provided by RCW ((29A.64.040)) 29A.64.041 and ((29A.64.060,
and)) 29A.64.061. The cost of ((such)) a recount of a statewide
measure will be at the expense of the state ((expense)).

--- END ---