BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.19.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means (a) an agency or facility operated, licensed, or
certified by the state of Washington ((or)); (b) a federally recognized
Indian tribe located within the state; or (c) a county.
(2) "Agency affiliated counselor" means a person registered under
this chapter who is engaged in counseling and employed by an agency.
"Agency affiliated counselor" includes juvenile probation counselors
who are employees of the juvenile court under RCW 13.04.035 and
13.04.040 and juvenile court employees providing functional family
therapy, aggression replacement training, or other evidence-based
programs approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration of the
department of social and health services.
(3) "Certified adviser" means a person certified under this chapter
who is engaged in private practice counseling to the extent authorized
in RCW 18.19.200.
(4) "Certified counselor" means a person certified under this
chapter who is engaged in private practice counseling to the extent
authorized in RCW 18.19.200.
(5) "Client" means an individual who receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.
(6) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques,
including but not limited to social work, mental health counseling,
marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer,
assist or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in the
amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity
and awareness of self and others and the development of human
potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed
to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to
counseling.
(7) "Counselor" means an individual, practitioner, therapist, or
analyst who engages in the practice of counseling to the public for a
fee, including for the purposes of this chapter, hypnotherapists.
(8) "Department" means the department of health.
(9) "Hypnotherapist" means a person registered under this chapter
who is practicing hypnosis as a modality.
(10) "Private practice counseling" means the practice of counseling
by a certified counselor or certified adviser as specified in RCW
18.19.200.
(11) "Psychotherapy" means the practice of counseling using
diagnosis of mental disorders according to the fourth edition of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, published in
1994, and the development of treatment plans for counseling based on
diagnosis of mental disorders in accordance with established practice
standards.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.

--- END ---