BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.33.010 and 2003 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state or any municipality or any political subdivision
thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease or otherwise dispose of
any property, real or personal, or property rights, including but not
limited to the title to real property, to the state or any municipality
or any political subdivision thereof, or the federal government, or a
federally recognized Indian tribe, on such terms and conditions as may
be mutually agreed upon by the proper authorities of the state and/or
the subdivisions concerned. The terms and conditions for any sale,
transfer, exchange, lease, or disposal of real property to a federally
recognized Indian tribe must retain any existing lease agreements,
easements, and public access provisions in place at the time of the
transaction. In addition, the state, or any municipality or any
political subdivision thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease, or
otherwise dispose of personal property, except weapons, to a foreign
entity.
(2) This section shall be deemed to provide an alternative method
for the doing of the things authorized herein, and shall not be
construed as imposing any additional condition upon the exercise of any
other powers vested in the state, municipalities or political
subdivisions.
(3) No intergovernmental transfer, lease, or other disposition of
property made pursuant to any other provision of law prior to May 23,
1972, shall be construed to be invalid solely because the parties
thereto did not comply with the procedures of this section.

--- END ---