BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.53 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.64A RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall develop a process to evaluate military
training and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training
and educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall develop a process to evaluate military
training and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training
and educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.88A
RCW to read as follows:
The commission shall develop a process to evaluate military
training and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training
and educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.89 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 18.135
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 18.215
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 18.260
RCW to read as follows:
The commission shall develop a process to evaluate military
training and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training
and educational requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---