BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop a process to evaluate military training
and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall develop a process to evaluate military training and
experience that may be applied toward meeting the training and
educational requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.170 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a process to evaluate military
training and experience that may be applied toward meeting the training
and educational requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---