BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.710 and 2009 c 580 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending
charges and disciplinary board final decisions of:
(a) Any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered
for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised
access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental
illness or developmental disabilities. This includes, but is not
limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments, financial
eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities,
investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions
otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;
(b) Individual providers who are paid by the state and providers
who are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services
involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services
provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW; and
(c) Individuals or businesses or organizations for the care,
supervision, case management, or treatment of children, persons with
developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults, including but not
limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 70.127, 70.128,
72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW.
(2) ((The investigation may include an examination of state and
national criminal identification data.)) The secretary shall require a
fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state
patrol and the federal bureau of investigation as provided in RCW
43.43.837. Unless otherwise authorized by law, the secretary shall use
the information solely for the purpose of determining the character,
suitability, and competence of ((these)) the applicant((s)).
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, an
individual provider or home care agency provider who has resided in the
state less than three years before applying for employment involving
unsupervised access to a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34
RCW must be fingerprinted for the purpose of investigating conviction
records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau
of investigation. This subsection applies only with respect to the
provision of in-home services funded by medicaid personal care under
RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver services
under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services under RCW 74.39A.110. However,
this subsection does not supersede RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).
(4) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are
hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW
74.39A.055, except that the department may require a background check
at any time under RCW 43.43.837. For the purposes of this subsection,
"background check" includes, but is not limited to, a fingerprint check
submitted for the purpose of investigating conviction records through
both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation.
(5) An individual provider or home care agency provider hired to
provide in-home care for and having unsupervised access to a vulnerable
adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must have no conviction for a
disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842. An individual
or home care agency provider must also have no conviction for a crime
relating to drugs as defined in RCW 43.43.830. This subsection applies
only with respect to the provision of in-home services funded by
medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options program
entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services
under RCW 74.39A.110.
(6) The secretary shall provide the results of the state background
check on long-term care workers, including individual providers, to the
persons hiring them or to their legal guardians, if any, for their
determination of the character, suitability, and competence of the
applicants. If the person elects to hire or retain an individual
provider after receiving notice from the department that the applicant
has a conviction for an offense that would disqualify the applicant
from having unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, then the secretary shall deny payment
for any subsequent services rendered by the disqualified individual
provider.
(7) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such
information as they may have and that the secretary may require for
such purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.837 and 2009 c 580 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in order
to determine the character, competence, and suitability of any
applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access, the
secretary may require a fingerprint-based background check through both
the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at
any time, but shall require a fingerprint-based background check when
the applicant or service provider has resided in the state less than
three consecutive years before application, and:
(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to
children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;
(b) Is an individual residing in an applicant or service provider's
home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the
department to provide services to children or people with developmental
disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or
(c) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services
funded by:
(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;
(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or
(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established
pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the
department.
(2) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are
hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW
74.39A.055.
(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided
for in RCW 43.215.215 and 43.20A.710, the department of early learning
and the department of social and health services shall share federal
fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law.
The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill
their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual
who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or
juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check
results with any other state agency or person.
(4) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background
check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal
history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the
department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a
foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and
state law.
(((4))) (5) Any secure facility operated by the department under
chapter 71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to
undergo a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington
state patrol identification and criminal history section and the
federal bureau of investigation.
(((5))) (6) Service providers and service provider applicants who
are required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be
hired for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under
law or program rules when:
(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and
(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on
the immediate result of the background check.
(((6))) (7) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the
federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks
shall be paid by the department for applicants or service providers
providing:
(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW
74.15.030;
(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW
74.09.520;
(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;
(e) Services under other home and community long-term care
programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW,
administered by the department;
(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW
71.09.115; and
(g) Foster care as required under RCW 74.15.030.
(((7))) (8) Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay
fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.
(((8))) (9) Children's administration service providers licensed
under RCW 74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check
fees to their applicants unless the individual is determined to be
disqualified due to the background information.
(((9))) (10) The department shall develop rules identifying the
financial responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the
department for paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll,
print, or scan fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state
patrol or federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background
check.
(((10))) (11) For purposes of this section, unless the context
plainly indicates otherwise:
(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department or
service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher,
contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised
access because of the nature of the work or services he or she
provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual
who will or may have unsupervised access and is:
(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department;
(ii) Seeking a contract with the department or a service provider;
(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or
transfer;
(iv) An individual that a department client or guardian of a
department client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to
himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and
who might be eligible to receive payment from the department for
services rendered; or
(v) A department applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.
(b) "Authorized" means the department grants an applicant, home, or
facility permission to:
(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;
(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and
children;
(iii) Receive payments from a department program; or
(iv) Work or serve in a department-covered position.
(c) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(d) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(e) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.
(f) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies,
businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or
regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements
with the department to provide services to vulnerable adults,
juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom
a department client or guardian of a department client may choose to
hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another
vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to
receive payment from the department for services rendered. "Service
provider" does not include those certified under chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.200 and 2007 c 415 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the director's duty with regard to licensing:
(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to
designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether
because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the
children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or
size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any
other factor relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents
or guardians, and persons representative of the various type agencies
to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing
applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed
under this chapter;
(3) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the director
shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of each
agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other
persons having unsupervised access to children in care;
(4) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided
for in RCW 43.215.215 and 43.20A.710, the department of early learning
and the department of social and health services shall share federal
fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law.
The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill
their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual
who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or
juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check
results with any other state agency or person.
(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this
chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an agency is
authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;
(((5))) (6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents
of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to
require regular reports from each licensee;
(((6))) (7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether
or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements
adopted under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at
least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after
consultation with affected groups for child day care requirements; and
(((8))) (9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to
help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early
learning of children.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.215.215 and 2007 c 415 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate
character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early
learning services to children, the department may consider the history
of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement
agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern
of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or
welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been
destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such
purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or
neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider
licensed under this chapter.
(2) In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an
agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have
unsupervised access to children in care, and who have not resided in
the state of Washington during the three-year period before being
authorized to care for children, shall be fingerprinted.
(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history
record check.
(b) The fingerprint criminal history record checks shall be at the
expense of the licensee. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the
employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to
be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record.
(c) The director shall use the information solely for the purpose
of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies,
excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such
information as they may have and that the director may require for such
purpose.
(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the
department of early learning and the department of social and health
services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based
background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of
this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint
background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles.
Neither department may share the federal background check results with
any other state agency or person.

--- END ---