BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that forest biomass is
an abundant and renewable by-product of Washington's forest land
management. Forest biomass can be utilized to generate clean renewable
aviation fuels.
In some Washington forests, residual forest biomass is burned on
site or left to decompose. The lack of forest products markets in some
areas means that removal of standing forest biomass for forest health
and wildfire risk reduction treatments must occur at substantial cost.
Utilizing forest biomass to generate clean renewable aviation fuels can
reduce greenhouse gases emitted from burning forest biomass in open
slash piles.
Research recently conducted in the Pacific Northwest found that
emissions from regulated facilities utilizing forest residuals as their
feedstock emitted fewer greenhouse gases into the atmosphere than
burning the feedstock in an open slash burn or, in some cases, fewer
emissions than leaving the biomass to biodegrade.
The legislature finds that making use of the state's forest biomass
resources for aviation fuel production may increase the value of
Washington's commercial forest lands, generate new revenues from state
lands, protect forest land of all ownerships from severe forest health
problems and uncharacteristic wildfire, stimulate Washington's economy,
create green jobs, and reduce Washington's dependence on foreign oil.
The legislature finds that opportunities exist to create
living-wage green jobs through the development of an aviation biofuel
sector in the state. Exploring opportunities for the forest products
sector to collaborate with the states existing aviation sector to meet
renewable energy goals will also help maintain existing jobs in both of
these industries.
The legislature finds that work is already underway in exploring
the potential of linking Washington's strong past in both timber and
aeronautics with our future in renewable energy. The department of
natural resource's forest biomass initiative and the sustainable
aviation fuel northwest initiative have set the stage to enable
Washington to emerge as a national leader in greening our country's and
our world's aviation fuel.
It is the intent of the legislature to support existing efforts
through the development and implementation of a forest biomass to
aviation fuel demonstration biofacility project and strategy for
initiating a broad forest biomass to aviation fuel sector in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of natural resources may
develop and implement a forest biomass to aviation fuel demonstration
project.
(1) The demonstration project must be designed to:
(a) Demonstrate opportunities for state lands to generate trust
income through the development of aviation biofuel production capacity;
(b) Create green jobs;
(c) Avoid interfering with the current supply area for forest
biomass collection surrounding an existing fixed location biomass
energy production site and forest products production sites;
(d) Be consistent with report findings from the University of
Washington and the department of natural resources concerning
operationally and ecologically sustainable feedstocks and production
processes;
(e) Comply with the state's existing energy efficiency goals. In
selecting a site for the demonstration project, preference must be
given to facilities that are already highly energy efficient or that
will gain significant efficiency through the installation of a
biofacility utilizing waste heat and energy.
(2) To develop and implement the forest biomass to aviation fuel
demonstration project, the department of natural resources may form
forest biomass aviation fuel partnerships. These partnerships are
encouraged to:
(a) Be public-private partnerships focused on convening the
entities necessary to grow, harvest, process, transport, and utilize
forest biomass to generate sustainable aviation fuel;
(b) Employ emerging technologies that emphasize efficient feedstock
utilization (most energy/dry ton of product);
(c) Include representatives from, but not limited to:
Entrepreneurs or organizations developing and operating emerging forest
biomass processing technologies; contractors capable of providing the
local labor needed to collect, process, and transport feedstocks;
tribes, federal land management agencies, county, city, and other local
governments and other state agencies; workforce development
organizations; accredited research institutions; aviation companies;
ports; existing biofuel production facilities; oil refining companies
located in Washington; not-for-profit conservation organizations;
private forest landowners; and forest product manufacturers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 2012, the department of natural
resources in collaboration with the department of commerce and research
institutions, through the convening and conduct of an expert panel
comprised of, but not limited to, representatives from state agencies,
local governments, natural resource industries, biofuel producers, oil
refiners, utilities, infrastructure providers, transportation fuel
markets, and environmental groups, shall provide the legislature with
a report detailing a strategy for developing a broad forest biomass to
aviation biofuel sector in the state. The report must:
(1) Integrate forest biomass supply data being collected and report
findings by the University of Washington in collaboration with the
department of natural resources to be used to estimate potential forest
biomass supply and potential aviation production volumes;
(2) Include a fully vetted supply chain strategy for forest biomass
to aviation fuel;
(3) Identify existing and potential sites where bioprocessing could
be colocated, such as operating or closed pulp and paper installations
and other existing industrial sites;
(4) Identify state and other public resources that can be used to
accelerate the supply chain development including, but not limited to:
Education and work-force training needs; transportation and utility
infrastructure; and biofuels and bioproduct purchase contracts by
public agencies;
(5) Identify opportunities to collaborate with other states and
federal agencies;
(6) Address and plan to ensure sustainability, leveraging existing
safeguards such as the state's forest practices rules;
(7) Include estimates on the number of jobs retained and created
through the development of a forest biomass to aviation fuel sector;
(8) Identify funding opportunities available for a forest biomass
to aviation fuel demonstration project;
(9) Identify any opportunities for legislative action that could
further facilitate a biomass to aviation fuel industry;
(10) Identify and explore linkages with the president's biofuels
interagency working group. This must include:
(a) A clear description of a full supply chain opportunity in
Washington; and
(b) A request for federal funding to support this effort;
(11) Provide an update on progress toward implementation of a
demonstration biofacility in the state pursuant to section 2 of this
act.

--- END ---