BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.081 and 2007 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute from the timber
tax distribution account to each county the amount of tax collected on
behalf of each county under RCW 84.33.051, less each county's
proportionate share of appropriations for collection and administration
activities under RCW 84.33.051, and ((shall)) must transfer to the
state general fund the amount of tax collected on behalf of the state
under RCW 84.33.041, less the amount of the distribution under
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section and the state's proportionate
share of appropriations for collection and administration activities
under RCW 84.33.041. The county treasurer ((shall)) must deposit
moneys received under this section in a county timber tax account which
((shall)) must be established by each county. Following receipt of
moneys under this section, the county treasurer ((shall)) must make
distributions from any moneys available in the county timber tax
account to taxing districts in the county, except the state, under
subsections (2) through (((4))) (5) of this section.
(2) From moneys available, there first ((shall)) must be a
distribution to each taxing district having debt service payments due
during the calendar year, based upon bonds issued under authority of a
vote of the people conducted pursuant to RCW 84.52.056 and based upon
excess levies for a capital project fund authorized pursuant to RCW
84.52.053, of an amount equal to the timber assessed value of the
district multiplied by the tax rate levied for payment of the debt
service and capital projects((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in respect
to levies for a debt service or capital project fund authorized before
July 1, 1984, the amount allocated ((shall)) may not be less than an
amount equal to the same percentage of such debt service or capital
project fund represented by timber tax allocations to such payments in
calendar year 1984. Distribution under this subsection (2) ((shall))
may be used only for debt service and capital projects payments. The
distribution under this subsection ((shall)) must be made as follows:
One-half of such amount ((shall)) must be distributed in the first
quarter of the year and one-half ((shall)) must be distributed in the
third quarter of the year.
(3) From the moneys remaining after the distributions under
subsection (2) of this section, the county treasurer ((shall)) must
distribute to each school district an amount equal to one-half of the
timber assessed value of the district ((or eighty percent of the timber
roll of such district in calendar year 1983 as determined under this
chapter, whichever is greater,)) multiplied by the tax rate, if any,
levied by the district under RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.053 for purposes
other than debt service payments and capital projects supported under
subsection (2) of this section. The distribution under this subsection
((shall)) must be made as follows: One-half of such amount ((shall))
must be distributed in the first quarter of the year and one-half
((shall)) must be distributed in the third quarter of the year.
(4)(a) From the moneys remaining after the distributions under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an amount must be placed in
reserve status, to the extent possible, as follows:
(i) In the first full calendar year following the effective date of
this section, an amount sufficient to make the reserve balance equal to
twenty percent of the current calendar year distributions required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(ii) In the second full calendar year following the effective date
of this section, an amount sufficient to make the reserve balance equal
to forty percent of the current calendar year distributions required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(iii) In the third full calendar year following the effective date
of this section an amount sufficient to make the reserve balance equal
to sixty percent of the current calendar year distributions required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(iv) In the fourth full calendar year following the effective date
of this section, an amount sufficient to make the reserve balance equal
to eighty percent of the current calendar year distributions required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section; and
(v) In the fifth full calendar year following the effective date of
this section and every year thereafter, an amount sufficient to make
the reserve balance equal to one hundred percent of the subsequent
calendar year distributions required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section;
(b) Distributions under this subsection (4) may begin in the first
full calendar year following the effective date of this section to
offset any shortfall in moneys necessary to make the distributions
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section. Distributions from the
reserve under this subsection (4) must be made as follows: One-half of
such amount must be distributed in the first quarter of the year and
one-half must be distributed in the third quarter of the year.
(5) After the distributions directed under subsections (2) ((and
(3))) through (4) of this section, if any, each taxing district
((shall)) must receive an amount equal to the timber assessed value of
the district multiplied by the tax rate, if any, levied as a regular
levy of the district or as a special levy not included in subsection
(2) or (3) of this section.
(((5))) (6) If there are insufficient moneys in the county timber
tax account to make full distribution under subsection (((4))) (5) of
this section, the county treasurer ((shall)) must multiply the amount
to be distributed to each taxing district under that subsection by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the county timber tax
account balance before making the distribution under that subsection.
The denominator of the fraction is the account balance which would be
required to make full distribution under that subsection.
(((6) After making the distributions under subsections (2) through
(4) of this section in the full amount indicated for the calendar year,
the county treasurer shall place any excess revenue up to twenty
percent of the total distributions made for the year under subsections
(2) through (4) of this section in a reserve status until the beginning
of the next calendar year.)) (7) Any moneys remaining in the county
timber tax account after ((this amount is placed in reserve shall))
making the distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this
section must be distributed to each taxing district in the county in
the same proportions as the distributions made under subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section.
(((7))) (8) On the last business day of the second month of each
calendar quarter, the state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute from
the timber tax distribution account to each county an amount of tax
collected by the state under RCW 84.33.041 equal to the amount of any
tribal tax credited against the county's tax under an agreement entered
into under RCW 43.06.480.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.080 and 2010 c 106 s 314 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor must extend the taxes upon the tax rolls in
the form prescribed in this section. The rate percent necessary to
raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and county purposes, and
for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
computed upon the assessed value of the property of the county. The
rate percent necessary to raise the amount of taxes levied for any
taxing district within the county must be computed upon the assessed
value of the property of the district. All taxes assessed against any
property must be added together and extended on the rolls in a column
headed consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever the
tax amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than one-half of a
cent it must be rounded up to one cent, and whenever it amounts to one-half of a cent or less it must be dropped. The amount of all taxes
must be entered in the proper columns, as shown by entering the rate
percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total tax and the total
tax assessed against the property.
(2) For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the
amount of any excess levy in a taxing district entitled to a
distribution under RCW 84.33.081, other than the state, the county
assessor must add the district's timber assessed value, as defined in
RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed value of the property. However, for
school districts maintenance and operations levies, only one-half of
the district's timber assessed value ((or eighty percent of the timber
roll of the district in calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter
84.33 RCW, whichever is greater,)) must be added to the assessed value
of the property.
(3) Upon the completion of such tax extension, it is the duty of
the county assessor to make in each assessment book, tax roll or list
a certificate in the following form:

(4) The county assessor must deliver the tax rolls to the county
treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of January, taking a receipt
from the treasurer. At the same time, the county assessor must provide
the county auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing the total
amount of taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

--- END ---