BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The growth management act requires local
governments to adopt comprehensive plans and development regulations
that balance the fourteen goals underpinning the act. Among these
goals are requirements that applications for both state and local
government permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to
ensure predictability. The goals also specify that adopted plans
should encourage economic development throughout the state by promoting
the retention and expansion of existing businesses and by recruiting
new businesses.
These vital goals have not been equally and sufficiently provided
for, in part, because of conflicting, duplicative, and bureaucratic
permit requirements under the growth management act, the shoreline
management act, and the state environmental policy act.
The legislature finds there is a need to identify the duplicative,
conflicting, and unduly burdensome elements of the permitting processes
required by these three acts. The legislature also finds that there is
a need to make recommendations to eliminate these duplications,
conflicts, and burdensome elements for the purposes of streamlining
permitting processes and fostering economic development and new jobs in
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The "land use planning for jobs
legislative task force" is established, with voting members appointed
as provided in this subsection.
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one voting member
from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(iii) The legislative leaders of the two largest political parties
in each house of the legislature shall jointly appoint the following
voting members:
(A) Two members representing local governments with fewer than
fifty thousand residents and two members representing local governments
with fifty thousand or more residents. From among these four members,
there shall be representation from the following regions of Washington
state: Northeast; northwest; southeast; and southwest;
(B) One member from and representing the planning community;
(C) One member from and representing the business community;
(D) One member from and representing the building industry;
(E) One member from and representing the agricultural community;
and
(F) One member from and representing the environmental community.
(b) The directors of the departments of ecology and commerce may
each appoint one nonvoting representative to participate in the task
force.
(c) The task force's cochairs shall be the senator affiliated with
the democratic caucus and the representative affiliated with the
republican caucus. The representative affiliated with the republican
caucus shall convene the initial meeting of the task force by August
15, 2011.
(2) The task force shall identify duplicative, conflicting, and
unduly burdensome aspects of land use and development regulations
required by laws and regulations enacted pursuant to the growth
management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, the shoreline management act,
chapter 90.58 RCW, and the state environmental policy act, chapter
43.21C RCW. The task force shall also make recommendations to assist
state and local authorities in streamlining the permitting requirements
of the three acts into one uniform process that ensures that
communities preserve public safety and have the necessary
infrastructure for economic development that is free from
inappropriately burdensome requirements.
(3)(a) The task force shall, at a minimum, review and make findings
and recommendations regarding:
(i) A uniform permit application process to simultaneously address
all environmental issues under the shoreline management act, critical
areas ordinances adopted under the growth management act, and the state
environmental policy act, eliminating any conflicts or duplicative
requirements;
(ii) Other measures that would help local authorities address
concerns raised by citizens desiring to build infrastructure that
creates sustainable and long-term economic opportunities for
communities; and
(iii) Other matters identified by a consensus of the voting members
of the task force.
(b) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and senate by July 15, 2012.
(c) Findings and recommendations of the task force must be
determined by consensus of the voting members of the task force. A
draft version of the findings and recommendations shall be made
available to the public prior to being submitted to the governor and
the legislature, and the task force shall accept public testimony
regarding its draft findings and recommendations.
(4) Task force meetings shall be open to the public. The task
force must, subject to expenditure approvals required in subsection (7)
of this section, provide opportunities for members and the public to
listen to the proceedings telephonically or through other available
technologies.
(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(6) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members are not eligible for travel reimbursements unless funding for
those reimbursements, referencing this act by bill or chapter number,
is provided by June 30, 2011, in the omnibus appropriations act.
(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
house of representatives and the senate. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the house of representatives executive rules
committee and the senate facilities and operations committee, or their
successor committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
planning for jobs act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire
December 31, 2012.

--- END ---