BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The educational service districts shall
analyze options and make recommendations for a clear legal framework
and process for dissolution of a school district on the basis of
financial insolvency.
(2) The analysis must include, but not be limited to:
(a) A definition of financial insolvency;
(b) A time frame, criteria, and process for initiating a
dissolution of an insolvent school district;
(c) Roles and responsibilities of the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, educational service districts, and regional
committees on school district organization; and
(d) Recommendations for how to address such issues as:
(i) Limiting a school board's ability to incur additional debt
during the dissolution process;
(ii) Terminating staff contracts expeditiously;
(iii) Liquidation of liabilities;
(iv) Waiving requirements of the school accounting manual;
(v) Clarifying effective dates of transfers of property for
taxation purposes;
(vi) Dealing with bonded indebtedness; and
(vii) Circumstances that require approval of voters in either the
annexing school district or the dissolving school district, or both.
(3) In conducting the analysis, the educational service districts
must consult with individuals with legal and financial expertise.
(4) As part of their report, the educational service districts may
recommend a financial early warning system for consistent, early
identification of school districts with potential fiscal difficulties.
(5) The educational service districts must submit a final report
and recommendations to the governor and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by January 5, 2012. The recommendations
must specifically address amendments to current law as well as propose
new laws as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2011, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---