BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Any person convicted in a court in this
state and subsequently imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he
or she is actually innocent may file a claim for compensation and
damages against the state.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:
(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not commit any
of the acts charged in the accusatory instrument, or the person's acts
or omissions charged in the accusatory instrument did not constitute a
crime;
(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually
innocent.
(3)(a) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1)
of this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or
if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim
may be filed on behalf of that person by any relative, attorney, or
agent acting as the person's representative.
(b) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1) of
this section is deceased, the claim may be filed on behalf of his or
her estate by the person's surviving spouse or domestic partner,
attorney, or agent acting as the person's personal representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All claims of wrongful conviction and
imprisonment shall be filed in superior court. The venue for such
actions shall be governed by RCW 4.92.010.
(2) Service of the summons and complaint shall be governed by RCW
4.92.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In order to file an actionable claim for
wrongful conviction and imprisonment, the claimant must establish by
documentary evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in
state court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and
has served all or part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the
felony or felonies for which the claimant was sentenced and which are
grounds for the compensation claim;
(c)(i) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or
vacated and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of
significant new information or, if a new trial was ordered following
the presentation of significant new information, either the claimant
was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not retried
and the accusatory instrument dismissed; or
(ii) The statute on which the accusatory instrument was based or
the application of the statute violated the Constitution of the United
States or the state Constitution; and
(d) The claim is not time-barred by section 8 of this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claim shall state facts in sufficient detail for the
finder of fact to determine that:
(a) The claimant did not commit any of the acts charged in the
accusatory instrument or the claimant's acts or omissions charged in
the accusatory instrument did not constitute a crime; and
(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a
crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is proven to be
false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under this
subsection.
(3) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated or deceased, in which case the person filing on behalf of
the claimant shall verify the claim.
(4) The office of the county prosecuting attorney responsible for
charging and prosecuting the felony or felonies for which the claimant
was sentenced and which are grounds for the complaint is not a party to
the action, but may submit briefs to the court related to a claim for
compensation under this section.
(5)(a) If the court finds after reading the claim that the claimant
does not meet the filing criteria set forth in section 3 of this act,
it shall dismiss the claim, either on its own motion or on the motion
of the state.
(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any party is entitled to the rights of
appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a decision on such
motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review of the superior
court action shall be de novo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) In order to obtain a judgment in his or
her favor, the claimant must show by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(a) The claimant was convicted of one or more felonies in state
court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has
served all or any part of the sentence;
(b) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies for which the claimant was
sentenced and which are the grounds for the compensation claim;
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of significant new
information or, if a new trial was ordered following the presentation
of significant new information, either the claimant was found not
guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not retried and the
accusatory instrument dismissed; or
(iii) The statute on which the accusatory instrument was based or
the application of the statute violated the Constitution of the United
States or the state Constitution;
(d) The claimant did not commit any of the acts charged in the
accusatory instrument, or the claimant's acts or omissions charged in
the accusatory instrument did not constitute a crime; and
(e) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about his or her conviction. A guilty plea
to a crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is proven
to be false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under
this subsection.
(2) Any pardon or proclamation issued to the claimant by the
governor shall be admissible as evidence when it is certified by the
officer having lawful custody of the pardon or proclamation, with the
seal of the office affixed, or with the official certificate of such
officer.
(3) In exercising its discretion regarding the weight and
admissibility of evidence, the court shall give due consideration to
difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time, the death or
unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of evidence, or other
factors not caused by the wrongly convicted person or those acting on
his or her behalf.
(4) If the state concedes that the claimant was wrongly convicted,
the court shall award compensation as provided in subsection (5) of
this section.
(5) If the jury or, in the case where the right to a jury is
waived, the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
claimant was wrongly convicted, the court shall award the following
compensation and damages to the claimant:
(a) Compensation, as adjusted for partial years served and to
account for inflation from the effective date of this section, in an
amount not less than:
(i) Fifty thousand dollars for each year of actual confinement
including time spent awaiting trial; and
(ii) Fifty thousand dollars for each year served on death row; and
(iii) Twenty-five thousand dollars for each year served on parole,
community custody, or as a registered sex offender pursuant only to the
felony or felonies which are grounds for the compensation claim;
(b) Compensation for child support payments owed by the claimant
that became due and interest on child support arrearages that accrued
while the claimant was in custody on the felony or felonies which are
grounds for the compensation claim. Such funds shall be paid on the
person's behalf in a lump-sum payment to the department of social and
health services for disbursement under Title 26 RCW;
(c) Economic damages for lost wages including but not limited to
the greater amount equal to:
(i) Loss of earnings calculated by the claimant's gross income the
year before the wrongful conviction, multiplied by each year of
incarceration for the felony or felonies which are grounds for the
compensation claim; or
(ii) Gross wages earned by the claimant while incarcerated for the
felony or felonies which are grounds for the complaint, adjusted to the
minimum hourly wage in effect in the state the year the claimant was
released from custody and offset by any portion already received by the
claimant;
(d) Reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees, and any
other sums paid by the claimant as required by the judgment and
sentence;
(e) Higher education tuition waivers for the claimant and all
qualifying children as provided in section 9 of this act;
(f) Up to ten years of eligibility to participate in the health and
dental insurance plans and contracts offered by the public employees'
benefits board. The court shall issue an order directing the health
care authority to enroll the claimant and his or her dependent children
and spouse or domestic partner as provided for in section 10 of this
act. The court order must specify the amount of time for which the
claimant and his or her dependent children and spouse or domestic
partner are eligible to receive benefits, and that the claimant and his
or her dependent children and spouse or domestic partner shall not be
responsible for any costs associated with participation; and
(g) Reasonable attorneys' fees for successfully bringing the
wrongful conviction claim. The attorneys' fees shall be calculated at
ten percent of the damage award plus expenses. However, attorneys'
fees, exclusive of expenses, shall not exceed seventy-five thousand
dollars. These fees shall not be deducted from the compensation due to
the claimant, and counsel shall not be entitled to receive additional
fees from the client. The court may not award any attorneys' fees to
the claimant if the claimant fails to prove he or she was wrongly
convicted.
(6) The compensation and damage award shall not include any
punitive damages.
(7) The compensation and damage award shall not be offset by any
expenses incurred by the state or any political subdivision of the
state including, but not limited to, expenses incurred to secure the
claimant's custody, or to feed, clothe, or provide medical services for
the claimant. The court shall not offset against the award the value
of any services or reduction in fees for services to be provided to the
claimant as part of the damages awarded to the claimant pursuant to
this section.
(8) Except attorneys' fees under subsection (5)(g) of this section,
compensation and damages awarded under this act shall not be considered
income for tax purposes.
(9)(a) Upon finding that the claimant was wrongly convicted, the
court shall seal the claimant's record of conviction.
(b) Upon request of the claimant, the court may order the
claimant's record of conviction vacated if the record has not already
been vacated, expunged, or destroyed under court rules. The
requirements for vacating records under RCW 9.94A.640 shall not apply.
(10) Upon request of the claimant, the court shall refer the
claimant to the department of corrections or the department of social
and health services for access to reentry services, if available,
including but not limited to the community-based transition programs
and long-term support programs for education, mentoring, life skills
training, assessment, job skills development, and mental health and
substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) On or after the effective date of this
section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal and
vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 3(1)(c)(i) of this act, the court shall provide
to the person at the time the relief is granted a copy of chapter 4.---RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).
(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence
review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the
governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after the effective
date of this section, shall provide a copy of sections 1 through 10 of
this act to the individual pardoned.
(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she shall have an additional twelve months, beyond
the statute of limitations under section 8 of this act, to bring a
claim under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The provisions of this chapter shall not
preclude any other legal remedy available to the claimant to seek
redress for the wrongful conviction and imprisonment.
(2) If the claimant pursues a separate claim for tortious conduct
or a civil rights violation based on the wrongful conviction, the
related arrest, or subsequent incarceration, the statute of limitations
under this chapter is tolled pending resolution of that claim, and the
tort award shall offset any compensation awarded under this chapter.
(3) The state may not assert as a defense to a claim under this
chapter a release dismissal agreement, plea agreement, or any similar
agreement whereby the prosecutor's office or an agent acting on its
behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain action if the accused
individual agrees to forgo legal action against the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Except as provided in section 6(3) of this
act, an action for compensation under this chapter must be commenced
within three years after the grant of judicial relief and satisfaction
of other conditions described in section 4 of this act; provided,
however, that any action by the state challenging or appealing the
grant of judicial relief shall toll the three-year period. Any person
meeting the criteria set forth in section 1 of this act who was wrongly
convicted before the effective date of this section may commence an
action under this chapter within three years after the effective date
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in subsection (2) of this section and
the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the
following persons:
(a) A wrongly convicted person; and
(b) Any child or stepchild of a wrongly convicted person who was
born or became the stepchild of, or was adopted by, the wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 5 of this
act.
(2) The following conditions apply to waivers under subsection (1)
of this section:
(a) A wrongly convicted person must be a Washington domiciliary to
be eligible for the tuition waiver.
(b) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of
seventeen and twenty-six years to be eligible for the tuition waiver.
A child's marital status does not affect eligibility.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for
those who qualify under subsection (1) of this section but are
encouraged.
(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (1) of this
section may attend full-time or part-time. Total credits earned using
the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the
equivalent of semester credits.
(3) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms of this section.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Child" means a biological child, stepchild, or adopted child
who was born of, became the stepchild of, or was adopted by a wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 5 of this
act.
(b) "Fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a
condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related
activities at an institution of higher education.
(c) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. In
ascertaining whether a wrongly convicted person or child is domiciled
in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education
shall, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided
in RCW 28B.15.013.
(d) "Wrongly convicted person" means a Washington domiciliary who
was awarded damages under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who was awarded damages under section 5 of this
act and his or her dependent children and spouse or domestic partner
are eligible to participate in the health and dental insurance plans
and contracts offered by the board as prescribed by court order, and no
person eligible under this section is responsible for any costs
associated with that participation.
(2) The authority, upon receipt of the court order, must enroll the
individual and his or her dependent children and spouse or domestic
partner in a health and dental insurance plan in compliance with the
terms and conditions of the court order.
(3) The administrator shall adopt rules under RCW 41.50.050 as the
administrator may find necessary to implement this section and to avoid
conflicts with any applicable federal or state laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When a court refers a person to the department under section 5 of
this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful conviction claim,
the department shall provide reasonable access to existing reentry
programs and services. Nothing in this section requires the department
to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---