BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there have been
instances where regulatory agencies discovered actions by a regulated
entity that are in error after reports have been accepted and approved
or inspections have been conducted and approved. Retroactively
applying fines after governmental approval creates an unfriendly
business environment and can place unexpected financial burdens on
businesses. Businesses should be able to rely on government approval
and acceptance of reports and inspections and not risk penalties when
mistakes are made by government personnel or contractors. It is the
intent of the legislature that regulated parties who have received
acceptance and approval by the regulating government authority should
not be subsequently fined or penalized, but should be encouraged to
correct action that is deemed in error or violates reporting or
inspection requirements during the next reporting period. The
regulating authority should notify the regulated party of the violation
to prevent future violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency may not issue a fine or impose a penalty on a person
if:
(a) An inspection is approved by an official of the agency
requiring the inspection and a subsequent reevaluation of the approved
inspection by the regulating agency identifies a violation by the
regulated party; or
(b) Documentation required under an agency's reporting requirements
is submitted to the agency by a regulated party and is accepted and
approved by the regulating agency and a subsequent reevaluation of the
approved documentation identifies a violation based on failure to
provide required documentation or information.
(2) A rule adopted under this chapter may not authorize the
imposition of a civil fine on a person based on the following
circumstances if:
(a) An inspection is approved by an official of the agency
requiring the inspection and a subsequent reevaluation of the approved
inspection by the regulating agency identifies a violation by the
regulated party; or
(b) Documentation required under an agency's reporting requirements
is submitted to the agency by a regulated party and is accepted and
approved by the regulating agency and a subsequent reevaluation of the
approved documentation identifies a violation based on failure to
provide required documentation or information.
(3) Violations identified after an inspection or documentation has
been approved may be remedied through technical assistance provided to
the regulated party allowing correction of the circumstances of the
violation for future reporting periods or inspections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---