BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there have been
instances where regulatory agencies discovered actions by a regulated
entity that are in error after reports have been accepted and approved
or inspections have been conducted and approved. Retroactively
applying fines after governmental approval creates an unfriendly
business environment and can place unexpected financial burdens on
businesses. Businesses should be able to rely on government approval
and acceptance of reports and inspections and not risk penalties when
mistakes are made by government personnel or contractors. It is the
intent of the legislature that regulated parties who have received
acceptance and approval by the regulating government authority should
not be subsequently fined or penalized, but should be encouraged to
correct action that is deemed in error or violates reporting or
inspection requirements during the next reporting period. The
regulating authority should notify the regulated party of the violation
to prevent future violations.
The legislature intends to remove the financial incentives for
agencies to find violations. It is the intent of the legislature to
remove the connection between penalty assessment and funding of the
regulatory program and direct penalty assessments to be deposited in
the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Neither the department nor the authority may issue a fine or
impose a penalty on a person for:
(a) A violation resulting from an inspection that was not
identified to the regulated party at the time of the inspection and
where the inspection was approved by a government official; or
(b) A violation based on failure to provide required documentation
when the documentation submitted to the department or authority has
been accepted and approved by a government official.
(2) The department or the authority must notify the regulated party
of the violation. Violations identified under subsection (1)(a) and
(b) of this section may be remedied through technical assistance to the
regulated party allowing them to correct the circumstances of the
violation for future reporting periods or inspections.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.431 and 1995 c 403 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, and in addition to or as an alternate to any other penalty
provided by law, any person who violates any of the provisions of
chapter 70.94 RCW, chapter 70.120 RCW, or any of the rules in force
under such chapters may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars per day for each violation. Each such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation, each day's continuance shall be a separate and
distinct violation.
Any person who fails to take action as specified by an order issued
pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars for each day of continued noncompliance.
(2) Penalties incurred but not paid shall accrue interest,
beginning on the ninety-first day following the date that the penalty
becomes due and payable, at the highest rate allowed by RCW 19.52.020
on the date that the penalty becomes due and payable. If violations or
penalties are appealed, interest shall not begin to accrue until the
thirty-first day following final resolution of the appeal.
The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.
(3) Each act of commission or omission which procures, aids or
abets in the violation shall be considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the same penalty. The
penalties provided in this section shall be imposed pursuant to RCW
43.21B.300.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section by the department
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((air
pollution control account established in RCW 70.94.015)) general fund
or, if recovered by the authority, shall be paid into the treasury of
the authority ((and credited to its funds)). If a prior penalty for
the same violation has been paid to a local authority, the penalty
imposed by the department under subsection (1) of this section shall be
reduced by the amount of the payment.
(5) To secure the penalty incurred under this section, the state or
the authority shall have a lien on any vessel used or operated in
violation of this chapter which shall be enforced as provided in RCW
60.36.050.
(6) Public or private entities that are recipients or potential
recipients of department grants, whether for air quality related
activities or not, may have such grants rescinded or withheld by the
department for failure to comply with provisions of this chapter.
(7) In addition to other penalties provided by this chapter,
persons knowingly under-reporting emissions or other information used
to set fees, or persons required to pay emission or permit fees who are
more than ninety days late with such payments may be subject to a
penalty equal to three times the amount of the original fee owed.
(8) By January 1, 1992, the department shall develop rules for
excusing excess emissions from enforcement action if such excess
emissions are unavoidable. The rules shall specify the criteria and
procedures for the department and local air authorities to determine
whether a period of excess emissions is excusable in accordance with
the state implementation plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2010 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.95.315, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 90.76 RCW
shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with
return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person
incurring the penalty from the department or the local air authority,
describing the violation with reasonable particularity. Within thirty
days after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may
apply in writing to the department or the authority for the remission
or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the
department or authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever
terms the department or the authority in its discretion deems proper.
The department or the authority may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it
may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a
demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of
information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for relief from
penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), ((RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision,)) RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which
shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the
underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2010 c 210 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.95.315, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 and chapter 90.76 RCW shall be
imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return
receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the
penalty from the department or the local air authority, describing the
violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties issued by local
air authorities, within thirty days after the notice is received, the
person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the authority for
the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the
application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon
whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The
authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in
such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and
shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of
extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or
factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the
application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a
local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an
application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), ((RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision,)) RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which
shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the
underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act shall be liberally construed to
give full effect to the objectives and purposes for which it was
enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---