BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has determined that it is
necessary to examine patterns related to the exchange of out-of-state
offenders needing supervision. The examination must assess the past
action and behavior of other states that send offenders to the state of
Washington for supervision to assure that the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision operates to protect the safety of the people
and communities of Washington and other individual states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 At the next meeting of the interstate
compact commission, Washington's representatives on the commission
shall seek a resolution by the commission regarding any inequitable
distribution of costs, benefits, and obligations affecting Washington
under the interstate compact.

--- END ---