BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.160 and 2010 c 66 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with section 2 of this act, the director may adopt
rules:
(a) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of cattle or
horses or the furnishing of proof that cattle or horses passing or
being transported through the point have been inspected or identified
and are lawfully being transported;
(b) Providing for issuance of individual horse and cattle
identification certificates or other means of horse and cattle
identification; and
(c) Designating the documents that constitute other satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle and horses. A bill of sale may not be
designated as documenting satisfactory proof of ownership for cattle.
(2) A self-inspection certificate may be accepted as satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle if the director determines that the self-
inspection certificate, together with other available documentation,
sufficiently establishes ownership. Self-inspection certificates
completed after June 10, 2010, are not satisfactory proof of ownership
for cattle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding horse
ownership identification may not mandate that the owner of an unbranded
horse show proof of horse brand inspection when moving the horse from
Washington or bringing the horse back into Washington if no transfer of
ownership has taken place.
(2) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the department to
adopt or enforce rules regarding:
(a) Health certification for horses in any context;
(b) Brand inspection requirements in any context for branded
horses; or
(c) Brand inspection requirements for all horses upon the transfer
of ownership.

--- END ---