BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2008 c 327 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the building communities fund
program. Under the program, capital and technical assistance grants
may be made to nonprofit organizations for acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential
community services, including social service centers and multipurpose
community centers, including those serving a distinct or ethnic
population. Such facilities must be located in a distressed community
or serve a substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit
((and)), evaluate, and rank applications for the building communities
fund program as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations.
(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. To be considered qualified, applicants must demonstrate that
the proposed project:
(i) Will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the services
provided to citizens;
(ii) Will be located in a distressed community or will serve a
substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons;
(iii) Will offer three or more distinct activities that meet a
single community service objective or offer a diverse set of activities
that meet multiple community service objectives, including but not
limited to: Providing social services; expanding employment
opportunities for or increasing the employability of community
residents; or offering educational or recreational opportunities
separate from the public school system or private schools, as long as
recreation is not the sole purpose of the facility;
(iv) Reflects a long-term vision for the development of the
community, shared by residents, businesses, leaders, and partners;
(v) Requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase
of the project;
(vi) Is ready to proceed and will make timely use of the funds;
(vii) Is sponsored by one or more entities that have the
organizational and financial capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant
agreement and to maintain the project into the future;
(viii) Fills an unmet need for community services;
(ix) Will achieve its stated objectives; and
(x) Is a community priority as shown through tangible commitments
of existing or future assets made to the project by community
residents, leaders, businesses, and government partners.
(c) The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total cost of the project, except, under exceptional
circumstances, the department may reduce the amount of nonstate match
required. No more than ten percent of the total granted amount may be
awarded to qualified eligible projects that meet the definition of
exceptional circumstances defined in this subsection. For purposes of
this subsection, exceptional circumstances include but are not limited
to: Natural disasters affecting projects; emergencies beyond an
applicant's control, such as a fire or an unanticipated loss of a lease
where services are currently provided; a delay that could result in a
threat to public health or safety; or instances where a local community
could quantifiably demonstrate that they had exhausted all possible
fund-raising efforts. The nonstate portion of the total project cost
may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for
the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(d) The department may not set a monetary limit to funding
requests.
(3) The department shall submit ((annually)) biennially to the
governor and the legislature in the department's capital budget request
((an unranked)) a ranked list of the qualified eligible projects for
which applications were received. The list must include a description
of each project, its total cost, and the amount of state funding
requested. The appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature shall
use this list to determine building communities fund projects that may
receive funding in the capital budget. The total amount of state
capital funding available for all projects on the ((annual)) biennial
list shall be determined by the capital budget beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. In addition, if cash funds have been
appropriated, up to three million dollars may be used for technical
assistance grants. The department shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(4) In addition to the list of ranked qualified eligible projects,
the department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature a summary report that describes the solicitation and
evaluation processes, including but not limited to the number of
applications received, the total amount of funding requested, issues
encountered, if any, and any recommendations for process improvements.
(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

--- END ---