BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.12.063 and 2010 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section, unless the property is
eligible to be sold under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any of the
following governmental entities or persons, unless the property is
eligible to be sold under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any person through the solicitation of written bids through
public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW;
(k) A federally qualified community health center as defined in RCW
82.04.4311; or
(l) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) If the department determines that all or a portion of real
property or an interest in real property that was acquired through
condemnation within the previous ten years is no longer necessary for
a transportation purpose, the former owner has a right of repurchase as
described in this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection,
"former owner" means the person or entity from whom the department
acquired title. At least ninety days prior to the date on which the
property is intended to be sold by the department, the department must
mail notice of the planned sale to the former owner of the property at
the former owner's last known address or to a forwarding address if
that owner has provided the department with a forwarding address. If
the former owner of the property's last known address, or forwarding
address if a forwarding address has been provided, is no longer the
former owner of the property's address, the right of repurchase is
extinguished. If the former owner notifies the department within
thirty days of the date of the notice that the former owner intends to
repurchase the property, the department shall proceed with the sale of
the property to the former owner for fair market value and shall not
list the property for sale to other owners. If the former owner does
not provide timely written notice to the department of the intent to
exercise a repurchase right, or if the sale to the former owner is not
completed within six months of the date of notice that the former owner
intends to repurchase the property, the right of repurchase is
extinguished.
(4) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(((4))) (5) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by
deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant
to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.12.063 and 2006 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section, unless the property is
eligible to be sold under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any of the
following governmental entities or persons, unless the property is
eligible to be sold under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any person through the solicitation of written bids through
public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) If the department determines that all or a portion of real
property or an interest in real property that was acquired through
condemnation within the previous ten years is no longer necessary for
a transportation purpose, the former owner has a right of repurchase as
described in this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection,
"former owner" means the person or entity from whom the department
acquired title. At least ninety days prior to the date on which the
property is intended to be sold by the department, the department must
mail notice of the planned sale to the former owner of the property at
the former owner's last known address or to a forwarding address if
that owner has provided the department with a forwarding address. If
the former owner of the property's last known address, or forwarding
address if a forwarding address has been provided, is no longer the
former owner of the property's address, the right of repurchase is
extinguished. If the former owner notifies the department within
thirty days of the date of the notice that the former owner intends to
repurchase the property, the department shall proceed with the sale of
the property to the former owner for fair market value and shall not
list the property for sale to other owners. If the former owner does
not provide timely written notice to the department of the intent to
exercise a repurchase right, or if the sale to the former owner is not
completed within six months of the date of notice that the former owner
intends to repurchase the property, the right of repurchase is
extinguished.
(4) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(((4))) (5) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by
deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant
to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---