BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the current economic environment
requires that the state, when appropriate, charge for some of the
services provided directly to the users of those services. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction is currently supported with
state funds to process certification fees. In addition, the
legislature finds that the processing of certifications should be moved
to an online system that allows educators to manage their
certifications and provides better information to policymakers. The
legislature intends to assess a certification processing fee to
eliminate state-funded support of the cost to issue educator
certificates.
(2) In addition to the certification fee established under RCW
28A.410.060, the superintendent of public instruction shall charge an
application processing fee for initial educator certificates and
subsequent actions, once the electronic certification application
system is funded and implemented but not before September 1, 2013. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish the amount of the
fee by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent shall set the
fee at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering the
educator certification program under RCW 28A.300.040(9). Revenue
generated through the processing fee shall be deposited in the educator
certification processing account.
(3) The educator certification processing account is established in
the custody of the state treasurer. The superintendent of public
instruction shall deposit in the account all moneys received from the
fees collected in subsection (2) of this section. Moneys in the
account may be spent only for the processing of educator certificates
and subsequent actions. Disbursements from the account shall be on
authorization of the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee. The account is subject to the allotment
procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for disbursements.

--- END ---