BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration must develop and maintain
a public display of the state Constitution, the federal Constitution,
and the Declaration of Independence. The department may include in a
display other historical legal documents that are fundamental in
shaping the political system of the United States after consultation
with members of the house of representatives committee on general
government appropriations.
(1) The display must be placed in the state capitol building in an
area accessible to the public and obvious to visitors.
(2) The display must be in a form to allow the public to examine
the text of the documents. The display must be permanent and ongoing
and may be movable.

--- END ---