BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington, from one corner to
the other, is blessed with magnificent natural resources in all parts
of the state, comprised of fish and wildlife, water, forest and
agriculture lands, and parks and outdoor recreational lands. Just as
there is an abundance of natural resources, there is also a complex
administrative system of several state agencies that manage, preserve,
and protect those resources.
It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate, streamline, and
reorganize the agencies responsible for administering the natural
resources of Washington with the goal of improving management of the
resources and providing better services to citizens in the most
efficient and cost-effective manner while continuing to meet the needs
of present and future generations. Washington's citizens and economy
are dependent on natural resources and an efficient system to manage
those natural resources.

--- END ---