BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Managing Washington's administrative support
system is complex and shared by multiple agencies. Many functions,
such as facilities and lease management, fleet management, purchasing
and contracts, information services, printing, accounting, and human
resources, are performed by those agencies.
It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate central services
into one agency to accomplish several goals. First, having one agency
provide central services to all other state agencies should enable
agencies to focus on their primary mission, whether it is children's
safety or resource management. Second, bringing the central services
into one agency should streamline provision of those services to the
other agencies resulting in a more cost-efficient and cost-effective
system leading to more taxpayer value. Third, having the central
services in one agency should improve coordination of support services
vital to all agencies and improve service to Washington citizens.
Fourth, it will eliminate duplication among agencies.

--- END ---