BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to improve fairness
for students, alleviate burden on the school system, and reduce local
and state costs of test administration by eliminating the use of
statewide assessments as a high school graduation requirement. The
legislature finds that statewide assessments can continue to be used
for system accountability purposes without this requirement.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2010 c 244 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The high school assessment system shall include but need not
be limited to the Washington assessment of student learning,
opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the
assessment in which the student was not successful, and if approved by
the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or
more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standard for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the score students must achieve
on the mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state
standard in that content area on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12))) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation ((and to assure that students
are on track for high school graduation)), each school district shall
prepare plans for and notify students and their parents or legal
guardians as provided in this ((subsection)) section. Student learning
plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on
any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the
previous school year ((or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences)). The parent or legal guardian shall
be notified about the information in the student learning plan,
preferably through a parent conference and at least annually. To the
extent feasible, schools serving English language learner students and
their parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family.
(2) The plan shall include the following information as applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards ((and stay on track for
graduation));
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) ((The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i))) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(((j))) (i) Available programs offered through skill centers or
community and technical colleges, including the college high school
diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2009 c 310 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The assessments shall be
implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(b) The superintendent shall develop end-of-course assessments for
the first year of high school mathematics that include the standards
common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I and for the second
year of high school mathematics that include the standards common to
geometry and integrated mathematics II. The assessments under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the
state standard on the mathematics content area of the high school
((Washington)) assessment ((of student learning)) for purposes of ((RCW
28A.655.061)) state and federal accountability.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall also develop
subtests for the end-of-course assessments that measure standards for
the first two years of high school mathematics that are unique to
algebra I, integrated mathematics I, geometry, and integrated
mathematics II. The results of the subtests shall be reported at the
student, teacher, school, and district level.
(2) ((For the graduating classes of 2013 and 2014 and for purposes
of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, a
student may use: (a) Results from the end-of-course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics plus the results from the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics; or
(b) results from the comprehensive mathematics assessment to
demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on the mathematics
content area of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015 and for purposes of
the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the Washington assessment of student
learning shall be assessed using the end-of-course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics plus the end-of-course assessment
for the second year of high school mathematics. All of the objective
alternative assessments available to students under RCW 28A.655.061 and
28A.655.065 shall be available to any student who has taken the
sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does not meet the state
mathematics standard on the sequence of end-of-course assessments.
(4))) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at
least annually or more often if necessary to keep the education
committees of the legislature informed on each step of the development
and implementation process under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.195.010 and 2009 c 548 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a
sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate
any specific educational or other programs for private schools except
as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. The state board of education shall not require private
school students to meet the student learning goals, ((obtain a
certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual
achievement to graduate from high school,)) to master the essential
academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
((28A.655.061)) 28A.655.070. However, private schools may choose, on
a voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential
academic learning requirements((,)) or take the assessments((, and
obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of
individual achievement)). Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the
equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a
school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one
thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and
at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in
kindergarten.
(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical
facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is
instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching
material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section
provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility
of the administration and administrators of the particular private
school involved.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction
under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:
(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of
the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with
the superintendent of the public school district within which the
parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the
student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. The state board of education shall
not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master
the essential academic learning requirements, ((to)) or take the
assessments((, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and
28A.155.045)) under RCW 28A.655.070. The standardized test
administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall
be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of
the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not
making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of
development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any
deficiency.
(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section
shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school
without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do
comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to
be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2009 c 548 s 111 and 2009 c 223 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to
declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education,
gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to
be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) ((The certificate of academic achievement requirements under
RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c))) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to ((earn a certificate of
academic achievement)) meet the state's essential academic learning
requirements, complete the program and earn the program's certificate
or credential, and complete other state and local graduation
requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2009 c 556 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and
education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public
school districts a standardized high school transcript. The
superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms
"credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter,
semester, or trimester system can be compared.
(((2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.))

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2009 c 548 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the ((Washington assessment of student learning and, for
high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement))
statewide assessments of student learning. The board shall also
determine student scores that identify levels of student performance
below and beyond the standard. ((The board shall consider the
incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the decision
regarding the award of the certificates.)) The board shall set such
performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. ((The initial performance
standards and any changes recommended by the board in the performance
standards for the tenth grade assessment shall be presented to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by
November 30th of the school year in which the changes will take place
to permit the legislature to take statutory action before the changes
are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature.)) The legislature shall be advised of the initial
performance standards and any changes made to the ((elementary level
performance standards and the middle school level)) performance
standards;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2009 c 450 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals((, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school,)) or to master the essential academic learning
requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or
programs in participating universities only if the board of directors
of the student's school district has decided to participate in the
program. Participating institutions of higher education, in
consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards
for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a
secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the
institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil
and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The
notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that
pupil.
(2) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and
28B.15.041, running start students shall pay to the community or
technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each
community or technical college; and all other institutions of higher
education operating a running start program may charge technology fees.
The fees charged shall be prorated based on credit load.
(3) The institutions of higher education must make available fee
waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must
establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students
before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low
income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is
currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable
documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited
to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or
reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria
established in the institution's policy.
(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of
higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition
or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher
education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted
for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms
and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges, in
collaboration with the other institutions of higher education that
participate in the running start program and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall identify, assess, and
report on alternatives for providing ongoing and adequate financial
support for the program. Such alternatives shall include but are not
limited to student tuition, increased support from local school
districts, and reallocation of existing state financial support among
the community and technical college system to account for differential
running start enrollment levels and impacts. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall report the assessment of
alternatives to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.155.170 and 2007 c 318 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district that operates a
high school shall establish a policy and procedures that permit any
student who is receiving special education or related services under an
individualized education program pursuant to state and federal law and
who will continue to receive such services between the ages of eighteen
and twenty-one to participate in the graduation ceremony and activities
after four years of high school attendance with his or her age-appropriate peers and receive a certificate of attendance.
(2) Participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a
certificate of attendance under this section does not preclude a
student from continuing to receive special education and related
services under an individualized education program beyond the
graduation ceremony.
(3) A student's participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt
of a certificate of attendance under this section shall not be
construed as the student's receipt of ((either:
(a))) a high school diploma pursuant to RCW 28A.230.120((; or
(b) A certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW
28A.155.045)).

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.15.520 and 2010 c 261 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1)(a) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for:
(i) Students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through
28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will
enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high
school diploma or certificate((, but who are not eligible students as
defined by RCW 28A.600.405)); and shall waive all of tuition fees and
services and activities fees for:
(ii) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter
41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, or
Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became
totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they
begin their course of study at a community college within ten years of
their graduation from high school; and
(iii) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined
in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24
RCW, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or
became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any
public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department
in this state.
(b) The governing boards of the community colleges shall report to
the state board for community and technical colleges on the annual cost
of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving
spouses and children under parts (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall consolidate
the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature;
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate ((but who are
not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405)). The waiver
shall be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school
diploma or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) ((The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8))) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(((9))) (8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.
(((10))) (9) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund
costs of instruction, library and student services, utilities and
maintenance, other costs related to instruction as well as
institutional financial aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions
to instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance
and other costs related to instruction shall be proportionally less
than other program areas including administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.155.045 (Certificate of individual achievement) and
2007 c 354 s 3 & 2004 c 19 s 104;
(2) RCW 28A.180.100 (Continuing education plan for older students)
and 2004 c 19 s 105;
(3) RCW 28A.655.0611 (Graduation without certificate of academic
achievement or certificate of individual achievement) and 2009 c 17 s
1 & 2007 c 354 s 4;
(4) RCW 28A.655.063 (Objective alternative assessments--Reimbursement of costs -- Testing fee waivers) and 2007 c 354 s 7 & 2006
c 115 s 5;
(5) RCW 28A.655.065 (Objective alternative assessment methods--Appeals from assessment scores -- Waivers and appeals from assessment
requirements -- Rules) and 2009 c 556 s 19, 2008 c 170 s 205, 2007 c 354
s 6, & 2006 c 115 s 1;
(6) RCW 28A.600.405 (Participation in high school completion pilot
program -- Eligible students -- Funding allocations -- Rules -- Information for
students and parents) and 2007 c 355 s 4; and
(7) RCW 28B.50.534 (High school completion pilot program) and 2007
c 355 s 3.

--- END ---