BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the time a bail bond agent, as defined in RCW 18.185.010,
executes a bail bond transaction with a defendant or indemnitor, the
bail bond agent shall require the defendant or indemnitor to make a
down payment in cash on the bail bond premium.
(2) This section applies regardless of whether the bail bond agent
issues a property bond or a surety bond.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.185.110 and 2008 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020,
18.185.030, and 18.185.250;
(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word,
representation, or conduct of the licensee. However, this subsection
(3) does not prevent a bail bond recovery agent from using any pretext
to locate or apprehend a fugitive criminal defendant or gain any
information regarding the fugitive;
(4) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030 or
18.185.250;
(5) Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or
other evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or
her principal or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in
trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the
happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within
thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;
(6) Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return
collateral or security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;
(7) Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad
faith, dishonesty, or untrustworthiness;
(8) Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the
director under chapter 18.235 RCW;
(9) Wearing, displaying, holding, or using badges not approved by
the department;
(10) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another
person to believe that the bail bond recovery agent is a sworn peace
officer;
(11) Failing to carry a copy of the contract or to present a copy
of the contract as required under RCW 18.185.270(1);
(12) Using the services of an unlicensed bail bond recovery agent
or using the services of a bail bond recovery agent without issuing the
proper contract;
(13) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material misstatement or
omission in the application for a license;
(14) Using the services of a person performing the functions of a
bail bond recovery agent who has not been licensed by the department as
required by this chapter;
(15) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
being both (a) licensed under this chapter or supervised by a licensed
bail bond recovery agent under RCW 18.185.290; and (b) under contract
with a bail bond agent;
(16) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
exercising due care to protect the safety of persons other than the
defendant and the property of persons other than the defendant; ((or))
(17) Using a dog in the apprehension of a fugitive criminal
defendant; or
(18) Issuing a bail bond without receiving a down payment in cash
on the bail bond premium, as required by section 1 of this act.

--- END ---