BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that the
citizens of Washington state are best served by enacting sustainable
operating budgets that: (1) Focus on the critical programs and
services best provided by government; (2) provide greater continuity in
providing these programs and services over time; and (3) are better
able to accommodate economic downturns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout sections 3 and 4 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Ensuing biennium" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
43.88.020(7).
(2) "Maintenance level" means the cost of maintaining the ensuing
biennium's service levels into the next following biennium, including
bow waves, mandatory rate changes, and entitlement caseload changes,
plus projected traditional policy level items, such as employee
compensation adjustments and pension cost increases.
(3) "Near general fund" means the state general fund, pension
funding stabilization account, and the education legacy trust account.
(4) "Next following biennium" means the fiscal biennium after the
ensuing biennium.
(5) "Operating budget" means the omnibus operating appropriations
act, or any combination of acts that make appropriations for operating
budget purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 UNSUSTAINABLE BUDGETS PROHIBITED. (1) The
governor may not propose, and the legislature may not enact, any
operating budget that is unsustainable in either the ensuing biennium,
or the next following biennium, or both.
(2) An operating budget is unsustainable in the ensuing biennium
when, if enacted, it would result in appropriations that exceed the
total of:
(a) Forecasted revenue plus beginning fund balances for the near
general fund; and
(b) Any portion of the projected ending fund balance in the budget
stabilization account that may be withdrawn under Article VII, section
12(d) (i) or (ii) of the state Constitution.
(3) An operating budget is unsustainable in the next following
biennium when the maintenance level projection for that next following
biennium exceeds the total of:
(a) Forecasted revenues plus the projected beginning balances for
the near general fund; and
(b) Any portion of the projected ending fund balance in the budget
stabilization account that may be withdrawn under Article VII, section
12(d) (i) or (ii) of the state Constitution.
(4) Nothing in this section requires the legislature to include
funding for any specific item in its budget.
(5) Whether the budget documents proposed by the governor are
sustainable is determined according to information set forth in the
four-year outlook prepared by the office of financial management under
section 4(1) of this act. Whether the budget enacted by the
legislature is determined according to the information set forth in the
adjusted four-year outlook prepared by the legislative committees under
section 4(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FOUR-YEAR BUDGET OUTLOOKS REQUIRED. (1)
When the governor submits his or her operating budget documents to the
legislature as provided in RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060, the office of
financial management shall simultaneously publish a four-year outlook
that is based on the governor's budget documents. The revenue and
caseload projections used in the four-year outlook must be based on the
most recent official forecasts adopted by the economic and revenue
forecast council and the caseload forecast council, adjusted by the
office of financial management for policy changes made in the
governor's budget documents.
(2) Before the house of representatives or the senate or any
standing committee of either house of the legislature may vote on an
operating budget, the respective house's fiscal committee that has
jurisdiction over the operating budget shall publish a summary document
estimating how that operating budget proposal changes the office of
financial management's four-year outlook published under subsection (1)
of this section. The summary document must be updated to reflect the
most current forecast revisions adopted by the economic and revenue
forecast council and the caseload forecast council. For purposes of
this subsection, "vote" means the vote on a majority recommendation in
the case of a legislative committee and the vote on third reading in
the case of either the senate or the house of representatives.
(3) The four-year outlook developed under subsection (1) of this
section and adjusted under subsection (2) of this section must include
an estimate of all budget decisions for which no specific funding
source is identified and for programs with a delayed effective date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.88 RCW.

--- END ---