BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.83 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A traffic school established by a city, town, or county under
this chapter that collects fees for the cost of attending the traffic
school may use any fees collected that are in excess of the costs of
the traffic school for the following activities:
(a) Safe driver education materials and programs;
(b) Safe driver education promotions and advertising; or
(c) Costs associated with the training of law enforcement officers.
(2) This section does not authorize a city, town, or county to
increase or impose new fees for traffic schools solely for the uses
authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section is not intended, and may not be construed, to
reduce, increase, or otherwise impact funding for judicial programs,
functions, or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.83 RCW
to read as follows:
A traffic school established by a city, town, or county under this
chapter that collects fees for the cost of attending the traffic school
may not charge a fee in excess of the penalty for an unscheduled
traffic infraction established by the supreme court pursuant to RCW
46.63.110.

--- END ---