BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file
all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet
as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.
(2) No later than January 1, 2014, all lobbyists and lobbyists'
employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615,
42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 must file all reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17A.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following persons and individuals must pay an annual fee to
the commission:
(a) Every political committee must pay a fee of two hundred dollars
to the commission each calendar year that it is required to report
under RCW 42.17A.205, 42.17A.210, 42.17A.220, 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235,
or 42.17A.250;
(b) Every lobbyist whose total reportable accrued compensation for
lobbying, whether from or on behalf of one or more lobbyists'
employers, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous calendar
year must pay a fee of two hundred dollars to the commission each
calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.600,
42.17A.615, 42.17A.630, or 42.17A.640;
(c) Every lobbyist employer whose total reportable accrued expenses
and payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one
or more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous
calendar year, must pay a fee of two hundred dollars to the commission
each calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.600,
42.17A.615, 42.17A.630, or 42.17A.640;
(d) Every government entity that employs more than fifty full-time
equivalent employees must pay a fee of one hundred fifty dollars each
calendar year that it is required to report under RCW 42.17A.635(5);
(e) Every elected official that receives a salary and is required
to report under RCW 42.17A.700 must pay a fee of two hundred dollars to
the commission for each calendar year he or she is an elected official
and is required to report.
(2) No person or individual must pay more than one fee in a
calendar year under this section. Any person may appeal a fee to the
commission if he or she is imposed more than one fee under this section
in a calendar year.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules and procedures to implement
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public disclosure electronic filing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees paid under
section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for costs incurred as a result of the
design, development, implementation, and maintenance of:
(a) Computer hardware and software or other applications to
accommodate electronic filing of the reports required by this chapter;
and
(b) A database and query system compatible with current
architecture, technology, and operating systems that result in readily
available data to the public for review and analysis.
(2) Only the executive director of the public disclosure
commission, or the executive director's designee, may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---