BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.04.091 and 1992 c 126 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person claiming a lien under RCW 60.04.021 shall file for
recording, in the county where the subject property is located, a
notice of claim of lien not later than ninety days after the person has
ceased to furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment
or the last date on which employee benefit contributions were due. The
notice of claim of lien:
(1) Shall state in substance and effect:
(a) The name, phone number, and address of the claimant;
(b) The first and last date on which the labor, professional
services, materials, or equipment was furnished or employee benefit
contributions were due;
(c) The name of the person indebted to the claimant;
(d) The street address, legal description, or other description
reasonably calculated to identify, for a person familiar with the area,
the location of the real property to be charged with the lien;
(e) The name of the owner or reputed owner of the property, if
known, and, if not known, that fact shall be stated; and
(f) The principal amount for which the lien is claimed.
(2) Shall be signed by the claimant or some person authorized to
act on his or her behalf who shall affirmatively state they have read
the notice of claim of lien and believe the notice of claim of lien to
be true and correct under penalty of perjury, and shall be acknowledged
((pursuant to)) before an authorized person specified in chapter 64.08
RCW, subject to RCW 64.08.100. If the lien has been assigned, the name
of the assignee shall be stated. Where an action to foreclose the lien
has been commenced such notice of claim of lien may be amended as
pleadings may be by order of the court insofar as the interests of
third parties are not adversely affected by such amendment.
(a) A claim of lien substantially in the following form with the
appropriate acknowledgment specified in (b) of this subsection shall be
sufficient:

CLAIM OF LIEN

. . . . . ., claimant, vs . . . . . ., name of person indebted
to claimant:

Notice is hereby given that the person named below claims a
lien pursuant to chapter ((64.04)) 60.04 RCW. In support of
this lien the following information is submitted:

1. NAME OF LIEN CLAIMANT: . . . . . . . . . . . .

TELEPHONE NUMBER: . . . . . . . . . . . .

ADDRESS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

2. DATE ON WHICH THE CLAIMANT BEGAN TO PERFORM LABOR,
PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, SUPPLY MATERIAL OR EQUIPMENT OR
THE DATE ON WHICH EMPLOYEE BENEFIT CONTRIBUTIONS BECAME DUE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

3. NAME OF PERSON INDEBTED TO THE CLAIMANT:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY AGAINST WHICH A LIEN IS
CLAIMED (Street address, legal description or other information
that will reasonably describe the property): . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

5. NAME OF THE OWNER OR REPUTED OWNER (If not known
state "unknown"): . . . . . . . . . . . .

6. THE LAST DATE ON WHICH LABOR WAS PERFORMED;
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES WERE FURNISHED; CONTRIBUTIONS TO AN
EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN WERE DUE; OR MATERIAL, OR EQUIPMENT WAS
FURNISHED: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

7. PRINCIPAL AMOUNT FOR WHICH THE LIEN IS CLAIMED IS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

8. IF THE CLAIMANT IS THE ASSIGNEE OF THIS CLAIM SO
STATE HERE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

(b)(i) An acknowledgment for an individual claimant, an attorney of
an individual claimant, or the administrator, representative, or agent
of the trustees of an employee benefit plan substantially in the same
form as the following shall be sufficient:

STATE OF WASHINGTON, COUNTY OF
. . . . . . . ., ss.
. . . . . . . ., being sworn, says: I am the claimant (or attorney of
the claimant, or administrator, representative, or agent of the
trustees of an employee benefit plan) above named; I have read or heard
the foregoing claim, read and know the contents thereof, and believe
the same to be true and correct and that the claim of lien is not
frivolous and is made with reasonable cause, and is not clearly
excessive under penalty of perjury.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

Subscribed and sworn to before me this . . . . day of . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

(Seal or stamp of notary public)
. . . . . . . . .
Title
My appointment
expires . . . . . . . . .
(ii) An acknowledgment for a corporate claimant substantially in
the same form as the following shall be sufficient:

STATE OF WASHINGTON, COUNTY OF
. . . . . . . . . , ss.
. . . . . . . . . , being sworn, says: I am the president (or vice
president, secretary, treasurer, or other authorized officer or agent,
as the case may be) of . . . . . . . . . that executed the claim of a
lien, and I acknowledge this claim to be the free and voluntary act and
deed of the corporation, for the uses and purposes therein mentioned;
I am authorized to execute this claim and the seal affixed is the
corporate seal of the corporation; I have read or heard the foregoing
claim, read and know the contents thereof, and believe the same to be
true and correct and that the claim of lien is not frivolous and is
made with reasonable cause, and is not clearly excessive under penalty
of perjury.
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)
(Seal or stamp of corporation)
Subscribed and sworn to before me this . . . . day of . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)
(Seal or stamp of notary public)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Title
My appointment
expires . . . . . . . . . . . .
(iii) A party or entity not specified in (b)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection shall modify the pattern form to comply with the
acknowledgment requirements pursuant to chapter 64.08 RCW.
(c) The period provided for recording the claim of lien is a period
of limitation and no action to foreclose a lien shall be maintained
unless the claim of lien is filed for recording within the ninety-day
period stated. The lien claimant shall give a copy of the claim of
lien to the owner or reputed owner by mailing it by certified or
registered mail or by personal service within fourteen days of the time
the claim of lien is filed for recording. Failure to do so results in
a forfeiture of any right the claimant may have to attorneys' fees and
costs against the owner under RCW 60.04.181.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---