BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.069 and 2004 c 129 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxing district" means a county,
emergency medical service district, city or town, public hospital
district, urban emergency medical service district, regional fire
protection service authority, or fire protection district.
(2) A taxing district may impose additional regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars
of the assessed value of property in the taxing district. The tax
((shall be)) is imposed (a) each year for six consecutive years, (b)
each year for ten consecutive years, or (c) permanently. A tax levy
under this section must be specifically authorized by a majority of
((at least three-fifths of the)) registered voters thereof approving a
proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special
election((, at which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the
proposition shall constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty
percent of the total number of voters voting in such taxing district at
the last preceding general election when the number of registered
voters voting on the proposition does not exceed forty percent of the
total number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last
preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths
of the registered voters thereof voting on the proposition when the
number of registered voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty
percent of the total number of voters voting in such taxing district in
the last preceding general election)). Ballot propositions ((shall))
must conform with RCW 29A.36.210. A taxing district ((shall)) may not
submit to the voters at the same election multiple propositions to
impose a levy under this section.
(3) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues
generated by the levy. The taxing district ((shall)) must maintain a
statement of the accounting which ((shall)) must be updated at least
every two years and shall be available to the public upon request at no
charge.
(4) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for a referendum procedure to apply to the ordinance or
resolution imposing the tax. This referendum procedure ((shall)) must
specify that a referendum petition may be filed at any time with a
filing officer, as identified in the ordinance or resolution. Within
ten days, the filing officer ((shall)) must confer with the petitioner
concerning form and style of the petition, issue the petition an
identification number, and secure an accurate, concise, and positive
ballot title from the designated local official. The petitioner
((shall have)) has thirty days in which to secure the signatures of not
less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the taxing
district, as of the last general election, upon petition forms which
contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be
referred. The filing officer ((shall)) must verify the sufficiency of
the signatures on the petition and, if sufficient valid signatures are
properly submitted, shall certify the referendum measure to the next
election within the taxing district if one is to be held within one
hundred eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum petition,
or at a special election to be called for that purpose in accordance
with RCW 29A.04.330.
The referendum procedure provided in this subsection ((shall be))
is exclusive in all instances for any taxing district imposing the tax
under this section and ((shall)) supersedes the procedures provided
under all other statutory or charter provisions for initiative or
referendum which might otherwise apply.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section ((shall)) must be used only
for the provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical
services, including related personnel costs, training for such
personnel, and related equipment, supplies, vehicles and structures
needed for the provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical
services.
(6)(a) If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing
district within the county may levy a tax under this section. If a
regional fire protection service authority imposes a tax under this
section, no other taxing district that is a participating fire
protection jurisdiction in the regional fire protection service
authority may levy a tax under this section. No other taxing district
may levy a tax under this section if another taxing district has levied
a tax under this section within its boundaries((: PROVIDED, That)).
However:
(i) If a county levies less than fifty cents per thousand dollars
of the assessed value of property, then any other taxing district may
levy a tax under this section equal to the difference between the rate
of the levy by the county and fifty cents((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));
and
(ii) If a taxing district within a county levies this tax, and the
voters of the county subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then
the amount of the taxing district levy within the county ((shall)) must
be reduced, when the combined levies exceed fifty cents.
(b) Whenever a tax is levied countywide, the service ((shall))
must, insofar as is feasible, be provided throughout the county((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). However, no countywide levy proposal may be
placed on the ballot without the approval of the legislative authority
of each city exceeding fifty thousand population within the county((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(c) This section and RCW 36.32.480 ((shall)) do not prohibit any
city or town from levying an annual excess levy to fund emergency
medical services((: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)).
(d) If a county proposes to impose tax levies under this section,
no other ballot proposition authorizing tax levies under this section
by another taxing district in the county may be placed before the
voters at the same election at which the county ballot proposition is
placed((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(e) Any taxing district emergency medical service levy that is
limited in duration and that is authorized subsequent to a county
emergency medical service levy that is limited in duration((, shall))
expires concurrently with the county emergency medical service levy.
(7) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 ((shall)) do not apply to the
tax levy authorized in this section.
(8) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (2) of this
section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount authorized for
the taxing district under this section, any future increase up to the
maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically authorized by the
voters in accordance with subsection (2) of this section at a general
or special election.
(9) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 ((shall)) does not apply to the
first levy imposed pursuant to this section following the approval of
such levy by the voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(10) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority.

--- END ---