BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of trustees of Eastern Washington University may offer
educational specialist degrees subject to review and approval by the
higher education coordinating board.

--- END ---