BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to end the
disability lifeline program and establish a limited program for persons
who are unable to engage in gainful employment due to age, blindness,
or disability.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.04.005 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this title, unless the context indicates
otherwise, the following definitions ((shall)) apply:
(1) "Public assistance" or "assistance"(( -- )) means public aid to
persons in need thereof for any cause, including services, medical
care, assistance grants, disbursing orders, work relief, ((disability
lifeline benefits)) and federal aid assistance.
(2) "Department"(( -- )) means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "County or local office"(( -- )) means the administrative office
for one or more counties or designated service areas.
(4) "Director" or "secretary" means the secretary of social and
health services.
(5) (("Disability lifeline program" means a program that provides
aid and support in accordance with the conditions set out in this
subsection.
(a) Aid and assistance shall be provided to persons who are not
eligible to receive federal aid assistance, other than basic food
benefits transferred electronically and medical assistance and meet one
of the following conditions:
(i) Are pregnant and in need, based upon the current income and
resource requirements of the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program; or
(ii) Are incapacitated from gainful employment by reason of bodily
or mental infirmity that will likely continue for a minimum of ninety
days as determined by the department. The standard for incapacity in
this subsection, as evidenced by the ninety-day duration standard, is
not intended to be as stringent as federal supplemental security income
disability standards; and
(A) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law;
(B) Have furnished the department their social security number. If
the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been
issued or is not known, an application for a number shall be made prior
to authorization of benefits, and the social security number shall be
provided to the department upon receipt;
(C) Have not refused or failed without good cause to participate in
drug or alcohol treatment if an assessment by a certified chemical
dependency counselor indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause
must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as
determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in
drug or alcohol dependency treatment, when needed outpatient drug or
alcohol treatment is not available to the person in the county of his
or her residence or when needed inpatient treatment is not available in
a location that is reasonably accessible for the person; and
(D) Have not refused or failed without good cause to participate in
vocational rehabilitation services, if an assessment conducted under
RCW 74.04.655 indicates that the person might benefit from such
services. Good cause must be found to exist when a person's physical
or mental condition, as determined by the department, prevents the
person from participating in vocational rehabilitation services, or
when vocational rehabilitation services are not available to the person
in the county of his or her residence.
(b)(i) Persons who initially apply and are found eligible for
disability lifeline benefits based upon incapacity from gainful
employment under (a) of this subsection on or after September 2, 2010,
who are homeless and have been assessed as needing chemical dependency
or mental health treatment or both, must agree, as a condition of
eligibility for the disability lifeline program, to accept a housing
voucher in lieu of a cash grant if a voucher is available. The
department shall establish the dollar value of the housing voucher.
The dollar value of the housing voucher may differ from the value of
the cash grant. Persons receiving a housing voucher under this
subsection also shall receive a cash stipend of fifty dollars per
month.
(ii) If the department of commerce has determined under RCW
43.330.175 that sufficient housing is not available, persons described
in this subsection who apply for disability lifeline benefits during
the time period that housing is not available shall receive a cash
grant in lieu of a cash stipend and housing voucher.
(iii) Persons who refuse to accept a housing voucher under this
subsection but otherwise meet the eligibility requirements of (a) of
this subsection are eligible for medical care services benefits under
RCW 74.09.035, subject to the time limits in (h) of this subsection.
(c) The following persons are not eligible for the disability
lifeline program:
(i) Persons who are unemployable due primarily to alcohol or drug
addiction. These persons shall be referred to appropriate assessment,
treatment, shelter, or supplemental security income referral services
as authorized under chapter 74.50 RCW. Referrals shall be made at the
time of application or at the time of eligibility review. This
subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the department from
granting disability lifeline benefits to alcoholics and drug addicts
who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental conditions that
meet the eligibility criteria for the disability lifeline program;
(ii) Persons who refuse or fail to cooperate in obtaining federal
aid assistance, without good cause.
(d) Disability lifeline benefits shall be provided only to persons
who are not members of assistance units receiving federal aid
assistance, except as provided in (a) of this subsection, and who will
accept available services that can reasonably be expected to enable the
person to work or reduce the need for assistance unless there is good
cause to refuse. Failure to accept such services shall result in
termination until the person agrees to cooperate in accepting such
services and subject to the following maximum periods of ineligibility
after reapplication:
(i) First failure: One week;
(ii) Second failure within six months: One month;
(iii) Third and subsequent failure within one year: Two months.
(e) Persons who are likely eligible for federal supplemental
security income benefits shall be moved into the disability lifeline
expedited component of the disability lifeline program. Persons placed
in the expedited component of the program may, if otherwise eligible,
receive disability lifeline benefits pending application for federal
supplemental security income benefits. The monetary value of any
disability lifeline benefit that is subsequently duplicated by the
person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same period
shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by operation of law
be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.
(f) For purposes of determining whether a person is incapacitated
from gainful employment under (a) of this subsection:
(i) The department shall adopt by rule medical criteria for
disability lifeline incapacity determinations to ensure that
eligibility decisions are consistent with statutory requirements and
are based on clear, objective medical information; and
(ii) The process implementing the medical criteria shall involve
consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or
health care professionals regarding incapacity, and any eligibility
decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth
clear and convincing reasons for doing so.
(g) Persons receiving disability lifeline benefits based upon a
finding of incapacity from gainful employment who remain otherwise
eligible shall have their benefits discontinued unless the recipient
demonstrates no material improvement in their medical or mental health
condition. The department may discontinue benefits when there was
specific error in the prior determination that found the person
eligible by reason of incapacitation.
(h)(i) Beginning September 1, 2010, no person who is currently
receiving or becomes eligible for disability lifeline program benefits
shall be eligible to receive benefits under the program for more than
twenty-four months in a sixty-month period. For purposes of this
subsection, months of receipt of general assistance-unemployable
benefits count toward the twenty-four month limit. Months during which
a person received benefits under the expedited component of the
disability lifeline or general assistance program or under the aged,
blind, or disabled component of the disability lifeline or general
assistance program shall not be included when determining whether a
person has been receiving benefits for more than twenty-four months.
On or before July 1, 2010, the department must review the cases of all
persons who have received disability lifeline benefits or general
assistance unemployable benefits for at least twenty months as of that
date. On or before September 1, 2010, the department must review the
cases of all remaining persons who have received disability lifeline
benefits for at least twelve months as of that date. The review should
determine whether the person meets the federal supplemental security
income disability standard and, if the person does not meet that
standard, whether the receipt of additional services could lead to
employability. If a need for additional services is identified, the
department shall provide case management services, such as assistance
with arranging transportation or locating stable housing, that will
facilitate the person's access to needed services. A person may not be
determined ineligible due to exceeding the time limit unless he or she
has received a case review under this subsection finding that the
person does not meet the federal supplemental security income
disability standard.
(ii) The time limits established under this subsection expire June
30, 2013.
(i) No person may be considered an eligible individual for
disability lifeline benefits with respect to any month if during that
month the person:
(i) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(ii) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.
(6) "Disability lifeline expedited" means a component of the
disability lifeline program under which persons receiving disability
lifeline benefits have been determined, after examination by an
appropriate health care provider, to be likely to be eligible for
federal supplemental security income benefits based on medical and
behavioral health evidence that meets the disability standards used for
the federal supplemental security income program.
(7))) "Federal aid assistance"(( -- )) means the specific categories
of assistance for which provision is made in any federal law existing
or hereafter passed by which payments are made from the federal
government to the state in aid or in respect to payment by the state
for public assistance rendered to any category of needy persons for
which provision for federal funds or aid may from time to time be made,
or a federally administered needs-based program.
(((8))) (6) "Applicant"(( -- )) means any person who has made a
request, or on behalf of whom a request has been made, to any county or
local office for assistance.
(((9))) (7) "Recipient"(( -- )) means any person receiving assistance
and in addition those dependents whose needs are included in the
recipient's assistance.
(((10))) (8) "Standards of assistance"(( -- )) means the level of
income required by an applicant or recipient to maintain a level of
living specified by the department.
(((11))) (9) "Resource"(( -- )) means any asset, tangible or
intangible, owned by or available to the applicant at the time of
application, which can be applied toward meeting the applicant's need,
either directly or by conversion into money or its equivalent. The
department may by rule designate resources that an applicant may retain
and not be ineligible for public assistance because of such resources.
Exempt resources shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) A home that an applicant, recipient, or their dependents is
living in, including the surrounding property;
(b) Household furnishings and personal effects;
(c) A motor vehicle, other than a motor home, used and useful
having an equity value not to exceed five thousand dollars;
(d) A motor vehicle necessary to transport a household member with
a physical disability. This exclusion is limited to one vehicle per
person with a physical disability;
(e) All other resources, including any excess of values exempted,
not to exceed one thousand dollars or other limit as set by the
department, to be consistent with limitations on resources and
exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance. The department shall
also allow recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to
exempt savings accounts with combined balances of up to an additional
three thousand dollars;
(f) Applicants for or recipients of ((disability lifeline benefits
shall)) assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled under section 3 of
this act must have their eligibility based on resource limitations
consistent with the temporary assistance for needy families program
rules adopted by the department; and
(g) If an applicant for or recipient of public assistance possesses
property and belongings in excess of the ceiling value, such value
shall be used in determining the need of the applicant or recipient,
except that: (i) The department may exempt resources or income when
the income and resources are determined necessary to the applicant's or
recipient's restoration to independence, to decrease the need for
public assistance, or to aid in rehabilitating the applicant or
recipient or a dependent of the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the
department may provide grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine
months from the date the agreement is signed pursuant to this section
to persons who are otherwise ineligible because of excess real property
owned by such persons when they are making a good faith effort to
dispose of that property: PROVIDED, That:
(A) The applicant or recipient signs an agreement to repay the
lesser of the amount of aid received or the net proceeds of such sale;
(B) If the owner of the excess property ceases to make good faith
efforts to sell the property, the entire amount of assistance may
become an overpayment and a debt due the state and may be recovered
pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;
(C) Applicants and recipients are advised of their right to a fair
hearing and afforded the opportunity to challenge a decision that good
faith efforts to sell have ceased, prior to assessment of an
overpayment under this section; and
(D) At the time assistance is authorized, the department files a
lien without a sum certain on the specific property.
(((12))) (10)(a) "Income"(( -- (a))) means all appreciable gains in
real or personal property (cash or kind) or other assets, which are
received by or become available for use and enjoyment by an applicant
or recipient during the month of application or after applying for or
receiving public assistance.
(b) The department may by rule and regulation exempt income
received by an applicant for or recipient of public assistance which
can be used by him or her to decrease his or her need for public
assistance or to aid in rehabilitating him or her or his or her
dependents, but such exemption ((shall)) may not, unless otherwise
provided in this title, exceed the exemptions of resources granted
under this chapter to an applicant for public assistance. In addition,
for cash assistance the department may disregard income pursuant to RCW
74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.
(((b))) (c) If, under applicable federal requirements, the state
has the option of considering property in the form of lump sum
compensatory awards or related settlements received by an applicant or
recipient as income or as a resource, the department ((shall)) must
consider such property to be a resource.
(((13))) (11) "Need"(( -- )) means the difference between the
applicant's or recipient's standards of assistance for himself or
herself and the dependent members of his or her family, as measured by
the standards of the department, and value of all nonexempt resources
and nonexempt income received by or available to the applicant or
recipient and the dependent members of his or her family.
(((14))) (12) For purposes of determining eligibility for public
assistance and participation levels in the cost of medical care, the
department ((shall)) must exempt restitution payments made to people of
Japanese and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the civil liberties act of 1988
and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island restitution act passed by
congress, P.L. 100-383, including all income and resources derived
therefrom.
(((15))) (13) In the construction of words and phrases used in this
title, the singular number ((shall)) includes the plural, the masculine
gender ((shall)) includes both the feminine and neuter genders and the
present tense ((shall)) includes the past and future tenses, unless the
context thereof ((shall)) clearly indicates to the contrary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts specifically
appropriated for this purpose, grant assistance and other services may
be provided to aged, blind, and disabled persons in need who:
(i) Are not eligible to receive federal aid assistance, other than
medical assistance or basic food program benefits. However, an
individual who refuses or fails to cooperate in obtaining federal aid
assistance, without good cause, is not eligible for assistance for the
aged, blind, and disabled; and
(ii) Meet the following requirements:
(A) Are aged, blind, or disabled. For the purposes of determining
eligibility for assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled, the
following definitions apply:
(I) "Aged" means aged sixty-five or older.
(II) "Blind" means statutorily blind as defined for the purpose of
determining eligibility for the federal supplemental security income
program.
(III) "Disabled" means likely to meet the federal supplemental
security income disability standard;
(B) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law;
(C) Have furnished the department their social security number. If
the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been
issued or is not known, an application for a number must be made prior
to authorization of benefits, and the social security number must be
provided to the department upon receipt; and
(D) Have not refused or failed without good cause to participate in
drug or alcohol treatment if an assessment by a certified chemical
dependency counselor indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause
must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as
determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in
drug or alcohol dependency treatment, when needed outpatient drug or
alcohol treatment is not available to the person in the county of his
or her residence or when needed inpatient treatment is not available in
a location that is reasonably accessible for the person.
(b) For purposes of determining whether a person is disabled under
this subsection (1):
(i) The department may rely upon a previous disability
determination by the social security administration;
(ii) The department must adopt rules and processes for determining
disability that are sufficient to indicate that a person is likely to
meet the federal supplemental security income disability standard.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, such rules need not
conform to Part 416 of Title 20 of the code of federal regulations; and
(iii) Medical evidence used to determine disability must be
consistent with the standards for evidence used to determine disability
for the federal supplemental security income program.
(2) Assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled must be provided
only to persons who are not members of assistance units receiving
federal aid assistance, except as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and who will accept available services that can reasonably be
expected to reduce the need for assistance unless there is good cause
to refuse. Failure to accept such services results in termination
until such time as the person cooperates with the treatment or service.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, persons who appear eligible to receive supplemental security
income under Title XVI of the federal social security act may, if
otherwise eligible, receive interim assistance for the aged, blind, and
disabled pending final determination on an application for federal
supplemental security income benefits, as provided for in RCW
74.04.620. Upon a final determination of eligibility by the social
security administration, interim assistance for the aged, blind, and
disabled will cease. Any assistance that is subsequently duplicated by
the person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same
period is considered a debt due the state and is by operation of law
subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.
(4) The department must by rule adopt criteria for conducting
periodic reviews of the eligibility of recipients of assistance for the
aged, blind, and disabled whose eligibility is based on a determination
of blindness or disability. The department may discontinue such
benefits:
(a) If it determines the recipient's medical or mental impairment
no longer meets the criteria established under subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) When there was specific error in the prior determination of
disability or blindness; or
(c) Upon a final determination by the social security
administration that the recipient is not disabled.
(5) No person may be considered an eligible individual for
assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled with respect to any month
if during that month the person:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.04.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 20 are each amended
to read as follows:
Persons ((eligible for disability lifeline benefits)) receiving
assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled under section 3 of this
act are eligible for mental health services to the extent that they
meet the client definitions and priorities established by chapter 71.24
RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.04.266 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 21 are each amended
to read as follows:
In determining need for ((disability lifeline benefits)) assistance
for the aged, blind, and disabled under section 3 of this act, the
department may by rule and regulation establish a monthly earned income
exemption in an amount not to exceed the exemption allowable under
disability programs authorized in Title XVI of the federal social
security act.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.04.620 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 22 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to establish a program of state
supplementation to the national program of supplemental security income
consistent with Public Law 92-603 and Public Law 93-66 to those persons
who are in need thereof in accordance with eligibility requirements
established by the department.
(2) The department is authorized to establish reasonable standards
of assistance and resource and income exemptions specifically for such
program of state supplementation which shall be consistent with the
provisions of the social security act.
(3) The department is authorized to make payments to applicants for
supplemental security income, pursuant to agreements as provided in
Public Law 93-368, who are otherwise eligible for ((disability lifeline
benefits)) assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled under section
3 of this act.
(((4) Any agreement between the department and a supplemental
security income applicant providing for the reimbursement of interim
assistance to the department shall provide, if the applicant has been
represented by an attorney, that twenty-five percent of the
reimbursement received shall be withheld by the department and all or
such portion thereof as has been approved as a fee by the United States
department of health and human services shall be released directly to
the applicant's attorney. The secretary may maintain such records as
are deemed appropriate to measure the cost and effectiveness of such
agreements and may make recommendations concerning the continued use of
such agreements to the legislature.))

Sec. 7 RCW 74.09.035 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 29 and 2010 c 94 s
22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((To the extent of available funds)) Subject to the
availability of amounts specifically appropriated for this purpose,
medical care services may be provided to recipients of ((disability
lifeline benefits, persons denied disability lifeline benefits under
RCW 74.04.005(5)(b) or 74.04.655 who otherwise meet the requirements of
RCW 74.04.005(5)(a), and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction
services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW,)) assistance for the aged,
blind, and disabled under section 3 of this act in accordance with
medical eligibility requirements established by the department. ((To
the extent authorized in the operating budget, upon implementation of
a federal medicaid 1115 waiver providing federal matching funds for
medical care services, these services also may be provided to persons
who have been terminated from disability lifeline benefits under RCW
74.04.005(5)(h).))
(2) Determination of the amount, scope, and duration of medical
care services ((shall be)) is limited to coverage as defined by the
department, except that adult dental, and routine foot care shall not
be included unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(3) ((The department shall enter into performance-based contracts
with one or more managed health care systems for the provision of
medical care services to recipients of disability lifeline benefits.
The contract must provide for integrated delivery of medical and mental
health services.
(4))) The department ((shall)) must establish standards of
assistance and resource and income exemptions, which may include
deductibles and co-insurance provisions. In addition, the department
may include a prohibition against the voluntary assignment of property
or cash for the purpose of qualifying for assistance.
(((5))) (4) Residents of skilled nursing homes, intermediate care
facilities, and intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded,
as that term is described by federal law, who are eligible for medical
care services shall be provided medical services to the same extent as
provided to those persons eligible under the medical assistance
program.
(((6))) (5) Payments made by the department under this program
shall be the limit of expenditures for medical care services solely
from state funds.
(((7))) (6) Eligibility for medical care services ((shall))
commences with the date of certification for ((disability lifeline
benefits or the date of eligibility for alcohol and drug addiction
services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW)) assistance for the aged,
blind, and disabled under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.09.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 28 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) "Committee" means the children's health services committee
((created in section 3 of this act)).
(3) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee.
((A combination of two or more county authorities or tribal
jurisdictions may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the
requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.))
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(6) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual
who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a medicare
prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D coverage;
and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid benefits for
the month under any eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan
or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.
(7) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(8) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are
without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical
services.
(9) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of
the federal social security act.
(10) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care
financed by state funds and provided to ((disability lifeline benefits
recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW)) assistance for aged, blind, and
disabled recipients under section 3 of this act.
(11) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(12) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually
by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.09.555 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 30 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules and policies
providing that when persons with a mental disorder, who were enrolled
in medical assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released
from confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully
reinstated on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review
of their continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is
required under federal or state law.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, and the regional support networks, ((shall)) must
establish procedures for coordination between department field offices,
institutions for mental disease, and correctional institutions, as
defined in RCW 9.94.049, that result in prompt reinstatement of
eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are
likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from
confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services
applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of their
release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services identity
cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services immediately
upon their release from confinement; and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of
applications on behalf of confined persons.
(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution or institution for mental diseases ((shall)) must provide
the department with that information for purposes of making medical
assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the
person's release from confinement. The department ((shall)) must, to
the maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in
making its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible
for medical assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Confined" or "confinement" means incarcerated in a
correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049, or admitted to an
institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R. part 435, Sec.
1009 on July 24, 2005.
(((5) For purposes of this section,)) (b) "Likely to be eligible"
means that a person:
(((a))) (i) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security
income or ((the disability lifeline program)) assistance for the aged,
blind, and disabled under section 3 of this act immediately before he
or she was confined and his or her enrollment was terminated during his
or her confinement; or
(((b))) (ii) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security
income or ((the disability lifeline program)) assistance for the aged,
blind, and disabled under section 3 of this act at any time during the
five years before his or her confinement, and medical or psychiatric
examinations during the person's confinement indicate that the person
continues to be disabled and the disability is likely to last at least
twelve months following release.
(((6))) (5) The economic services administration ((shall)) must
adopt standardized statewide screening and application practices and
forms designed to facilitate the application of a confined person who
is likely to be eligible for medicaid.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.08A.440 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 32 are each
amended to read as follows:
Recipients exempted from active work search activities due to
incapacity or a disability ((shall)) must receive ((disability lifeline
benefits as they)) services related to the facilitation of enrollment
in the federal supplemental security income program, access to chemical
dependency treatment, referrals to vocational rehabilitation, and other
services needed to assist the recipient in becoming employable.
((Disability lifeline benefits shall not supplant cash assistance and
other services provided through the temporary assistance for needy
families program.)) To the greatest extent possible, services
((shall)) must be funded through the temporary assistance for needy
families appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.04.0052 (Teen applicants' living situation -- Criteria--Presumption -- Protective payee -- Adoption referral) and 2010 1st sp.s. c
8 s 18, 1997 c 58 s 502, & 1994 c 299 s 34;
(2) RCW 43.330.175 (Disability lifeline housing voucher program)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8;
(3) RCW 74.04.655 (Vocational rehabilitation -- Assessment, referral)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 5;
(4) RCW 74.50.010 (Legislative findings) and 1988 c 163 s 1 & 1987
c 406 s 2;
(5) RCW 74.50.011 (Additional legislative findings) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 1;
(6) RCW 74.50.035 (Shelter services -- Eligibility) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 2;
(7) RCW 74.50.040 (Client assessment, treatment, and support
services) and 1987 c 406 s 5;
(8) RCW 74.50.050 (Treatment services) and 2002 c 64 s 1, 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 5, 1988 c 163 s 3, & 1987 c 406 s 6;
(9) RCW 74.50.055 (Treatment services -- Eligibility) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 4;
(10) RCW 74.50.060 (Shelter assistance program) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 8 s 31, 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 3, 1988 c 163 s 4, & 1987 c 406 s 7;
(11) RCW 74.50.070 (County multipurpose diagnostic center or
detention center) and 1987 c 406 s 8;
(12) RCW 74.50.080 (Rules -- Discontinuance of service) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 6 & 1989 c 3 s 2; and
(13) RCW 74.50.900 (Short title) and 1987 c 406 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2011.

--- END ---