BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to those general powers and rights deemed
appropriate by the department, retrospective rating plan employers and
groups who administer their plans with an approved claims administrator
shall have the authority to assist the department in the processing of
claims when approved by the department. However, the department
retains the final authority over decisions with respect to any
individual claim. Under this authority, retrospective rating plan
employers and groups may do any or all of the following:
(a) Schedule medical examinations and consultations, using only
qualified persons from the department's approved examiner list. No
more than two independent medical examinations for each claim may be
scheduled by the claims administrator within any twenty-four month
period. An independent medical examination may be scheduled when the
claim file includes medical reports indicating that an examination may
be necessary for any of the following reasons: Establishing a
diagnosis, outlining a program of treatment, evaluating what, if any,
conditions are related to the claimed industrial injury or occupational
disease, determining whether an industrial injury or occupational
disease has aggravated a preexisting condition, establishing an
impairment rating when the claim file medical reports indicate that the
worker's claim-related condition is at maximum medical improvement,
evaluating whether the industrial injury or occupational disease has
worsened, or evaluating the worker's mental or physical restrictions as
well as the worker's ability to work. The results of any independent
medical examination scheduled under this subsection must be sent by the
examiner or independent medical examination panel directly to the
department for the claimant's claim file. The department shall enforce
penalties under RCW 51.32.110 for refusals to submit to medical
examinations scheduled by retrospective rating plan employers or groups
or obstruction of the same.
(b) Schedule vocational assessments using only qualified providers
from a qualified provider list developed by the department. Providers
may be selected based on department quality or performance indicators
and based on industry experience. Any vocational assessment resulting
from a referral under this section must be sent by the vocational
rehabilitation counselor directly to the department for the claimant's
claim file.
(c) Close claims as provided by this subsection. Closure of claims
shall be conducted under the standards and procedures as provided in
this title, except as provided in this section. If a claim with date
of injury or manifestation of occupational disease on or after January
1, 2012: (i) Involves only medical treatment and/or the payment of
temporary disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 for a period of
thirty days or less; (ii) at the time medical treatment is concluded,
does not involve permanent disability; (iii) is one with respect to
which the department has not intervened under subsection (2) of this
section; and (iv) concerns an injured worker who has returned to work
with the retrospective rating plan employer or employer within the
group at the worker's previous job or at a job that has at least
ninety-five percent of at-injury wages as calculated under RCW
51.08.178, the claim may be closed by the retrospective rating plan
employer or group, subject to reporting of claims to the department in
a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW. No later than at the time of closure for such claims, the
retrospective rating plan employer or group shall issue and send to the
department and the worker a written order and forward to the worker a
notification developed by the department describing in nontechnical
language the worker's rights under this title.
(2) If a dispute arises from the handling of any claim under this
section, the injured worker, or retrospective rating plan employer or
group, may request the department to intervene. When exercising any
authority under subsection (1) of this section, a retrospective rating
plan employer or group must inform a worker in writing that the worker
may request the department to intervene at any time.
(3) The department shall require the retrospective rating plan
employer or group to notify the department prior to exercising any
authority authorized by this section. Rules adopted under this section
must minimize the department's need to respond and ensure that any
delay in response by the department does not impede the timely
administration of the claim. Charges incurred by the retrospective
rating plan employer or group for independent medical examinations or
vocational rehabilitation assessments shall be charged against the
claim.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "approved claims
administrator" means a person who meets department qualifications to
manage industrial insurance claims for retrospective rating plan
employers and groups. Any claims managers employed by the approved
claims administrator to manage retrospective rating plan claims must
pass a certification test approved by the department as established in
rule. The department may audit or review the claims management process
of a retrospective rating plan employer or group that has received
authority to assist the department with the processing of claims. The
director shall take corrective action, subject to appeal to the board
of industrial insurance appeals, against a retrospective rating plan
employer or group, if the director determines that a claims manager
under its direction is not following proper industrial insurance claims
procedures. Corrective actions taken by the director may include:
(a) Probationary period of time for the claims manager;
(b) Additional mandatory training for claims management personnel;
and
(c) Monitoring of the activities of the employer or group to
determine progress towards compliance.
The director shall adopt rules defining the corrective actions
which may be taken in response to a given condition. If the director
determines that compliance has been attained, no further action shall
be taken. If compliance has not been attained, the director may take
additional corrective action including the removal of the additional
authority to assist the department in the processing of claims under
this section. The withdrawal of approval revokes the ability of the
approved claims administrator to exercise authority under this section,
but does not otherwise affect the administrator's status or the
retrospective rating plan employer or group's status in the
retrospective rating program.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
Payment by an employer for direct primary care services as defined
in RCW 48.150.010 does not disqualify: (1) An employer from
participating in the retrospective rating plan; (2) a group sponsor
from promoting a retrospective rating plan; or (3) a plan administrator
from administering a retrospective rating plan. The department may
adopt rules requiring a direct practice to provide such information as
the department requires to establish refunds or assessments for
employers or groups under this chapter. Any billing rule requiring a
provider to bill for services does not apply to a direct practice. For
purposes of this section, "direct practice" shall have the meaning in
RCW 48.150.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a retrospective rating plan employer or group or its
representative communicates with a medical provider, the employer must
provide to the worker and send to the claim file a copy of any written
communication received and a memorandum describing any oral
communication. The copy of the written communication and memorandum
describing an oral communication must be provided within seventy-two
hours of receiving the information.
(2) The information required to be provided under subsection (1) of
this section must be provided regardless of the source of the
information and any claim of privilege or work product.
(3) The employer must send the information required to be provided
under subsection (1) of this section to the claim file electronically.
If the worker chooses, the information must be sent to the worker
electronically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
A retrospective rating plan employer or group must maintain
complete records of all claims administered under this chapter. The
records may be maintained by service companies or at an out-of-state
location under conditions and procedures established by the director.
The retrospective rating plan employer or group must make the records
available for inspection upon request by the department, worker or
beneficiary, or their representative within five business days of the
request at a location within the state requested by the department,
worker or beneficiary, or representative. The expense of producing the
records must be borne by the retrospective rating plan employer or
group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a study of the impact of section 1 of this act
on the state's workers' compensation system, including the impact on
the retrospective rating plan performance and refunds, the department's
processes, and worker outcomes and satisfaction. The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall submit the study to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 4 of this act expire July 1,
2016.

--- END ---