BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phosphorus loading of surface waters can stimulate the growth
of weeds and algae and that this growth can have adverse environmental,
health, and aesthetic effects;
(b) Turf fertilizer contributes to phosphorus loading. Limits on
turf fertilizer labeled as containing phosphorus can significantly
reduce the discharge of phosphorus into the state's ground and surface
waters;
(c) Turf fertilizer containing no or very low amounts of phosphorus
is readily available and maintaining established turf in a healthy and
green condition is not dependent upon the addition of turf fertilizer
labeled as containing phosphorus; and
(d) While significant reductions of phosphorus from laundry
detergent and dishwashing detergent have been achieved, similar
progress in reducing phosphorus contributions from turf fertilizer has
not been accomplished.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to significantly limit the
use of turf fertilizers labeled as containing phosphorus.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.54.270 and 1998 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Terms used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter ((have the meaning given to them in this chapter)) unless
the context clearly ((indicates)) requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a term, design, or trademark used in connection
with the distribution and sale of one or more grades of commercial
fertilizers.
(2) "Bulk fertilizer" means commercial fertilizer distributed in a
nonpackaged form such as, but not limited to, tote bags, tote tanks,
bins, tanks, trailers, spreader trucks, and railcars.
(3) "Calcium carbonate equivalent" means the acid-neutralizing
capacity of an agricultural liming material expressed as a weight
percentage of calcium carbonate.
(4) "Commercial fertilizer" means a substance containing one or
more recognized plant nutrients and that is used for its plant nutrient
content or that is designated for use or claimed to have value in
promoting plant growth, and shall include limes, gypsum, and
manipulated animal and vegetable manures. It does not include
unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures, organic waste-derived
material, and other products exempted by the department by rule.
(5) "Composting" means the controlled aerobic degradation of
organic waste materials. Natural decay of organic waste under
uncontrolled conditions is not composting.
(6) "Customer-formula fertilizer" means a mixture of commercial
fertilizer or materials of which each batch is mixed according to the
specifications of the final purchaser.
(7) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington or its duly authorized representative.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture.
(9) "Distribute" means to import, consign, manufacture, produce,
compound, mix, or blend commercial fertilizer, or to offer for sale,
sell, barter, exchange, or otherwise supply commercial fertilizer in
this state.
(10) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(11) "Fertilizer material" means a commercial fertilizer that
either:
(a) Contains important quantities of no more than one of the
primary plant nutrients: Nitrogen, phosphate, and potash;
(b) Has eighty-five percent or more of its plant nutrient content
present in the form of a single chemical compound; or
(c) Is derived from a plant or animal residue or by-product or
natural material deposit that has been processed in such a way that its
content of plant nutrients has not been materially changed except by
purification and concentration.
(12) "Grade" means the percentage of total nitrogen, available
phosphoric acid, and soluble potash stated in whole numbers in the same
terms, order, and percentages as in the "guaranteed analysis," unless
otherwise allowed by a rule adopted by the department. Specialty
fertilizers may be guaranteed in fractional units of less than one
percent of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or phosphoric acid, and
soluble potassium or potash. Fertilizer materials, bone meal, manures,
and similar materials may be guaranteed in fractional units.
(13) "Guaranteed analysis."
(a) Until the director prescribes an alternative form of
"guaranteed analysis" by rule the term "guaranteed analysis" shall mean
the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed in the following
order and form:

Total nitrogen (N) . . . . . . . . . . . . percent

Available phosphoric acid (P2O5) . . . . . . . . . . . . percent

Soluble potash (K2O) . . . . . . . . . . . . percent

The percentage shall be stated in whole numbers unless otherwise
allowed by the department by rule.
The "guaranteed analysis" may also include elemental guarantees for
phosphorus (P) and potassium (K).
(b) For unacidulated mineral phosphatic material and basic slag,
bone, tankage, and other organic phosphatic materials, the total
phosphoric acid or degree of fineness may also be guaranteed.
(c) Guarantees for plant nutrients other than nitrogen, phosphorus,
and potassium shall be as allowed or required by rule of the
department. The guarantees for such other nutrients shall be expressed
in the form of the element.
(d) The guaranteed analysis for limes shall include the percentage
of calcium or magnesium expressed as their carbonate; the calcium
carbonate equivalent as determined by methods prescribed by the
association of official analytical chemists; and the minimum percentage
of material that will pass respectively a one hundred mesh, sixty mesh,
and ten mesh sieve. The mesh size declaration may also include the
percentage of material that will pass additional mesh sizes.
(e) In commercial fertilizer, the principal constituent of which is
calcium sulfate (gypsum), the percentage of calcium sulfate (CaSO4.2H2O)
shall be given along with the percentage of total sulfur.
(14) "Imported fertilizer" means any fertilizer distributed into
Washington from any other state, province, or country.
(15) "Label" means the display of all written, printed, or graphic
matter, upon the immediate container, or a statement accompanying a
fertilizer.
(16) "Labeling" includes all written, printed, or graphic matter,
upon or accompanying a commercial fertilizer, or advertisement,
brochures, posters, television, and radio announcements used in
promoting the sale of such fertilizer.
(17) "Licensee" means the person who receives a license to
distribute a commercial fertilizer under the provisions of this
chapter.
(18) "Lime" means a substance or a mixture of substances, the
principal constituent of which is calcium or magnesium carbonate,
hydroxide, or oxide, singly or combined.
(19) "Manipulation" means processed or treated in any manner,
including drying to a moisture content less than thirty percent.
(20) "Manufacture" means to compound, produce, granulate, mix,
blend, repackage, or otherwise alter the composition of fertilizer
materials.
(21) "Micronutrients" are: Boron; chlorine; cobalt; copper; iron;
manganese; molybdenum; sodium; and zinc.
(22) "Micronutrient fertilizer" means a produced or imported
commercial fertilizer that contains commercially valuable
concentrations of micronutrients but does not contain commercially
valuable concentrations of nitrogen, phosphoric acid, available
phosphorus, potash, calcium, magnesium, or sulfur.
(23) "Official sample" means a sample of commercial fertilizer
taken by the department and designated as "official" by the department.
(24) "Organic waste-derived material" means grass clippings,
leaves, weeds, bark, plantings, prunings, and other vegetative wastes,
uncontaminated wood waste from logging and milling operations, food
wastes, food processing wastes, and materials derived from these wastes
through composting. "Organic waste-derived material" does not include
products that include biosolids.
(25) "Packaged fertilizer" means commercial fertilizers, either
agricultural or specialty, distributed in nonbulk form.
(26) "Person" means an individual, firm, brokerage, partnership,
corporation, company, society, or association.
(27) "Percent" or "percentage" means the percentage by weight.
(28) "Produce" means to compound or fabricate a commercial
fertilizer through a physical or chemical process, or through mining.
"Produce" does not include mixing, blending, or repackaging commercial
fertilizer products.
(29) "Registrant" means the person who registers commercial
fertilizer under the provisions of this chapter.
(30) "Specialty fertilizer" means a commercial fertilizer
distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as, but not limited to, use
on home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal
parks, cemeteries, greenhouses, and nurseries.
(31) "Ton" means the net weight of two thousand pounds avoirdupois.
(32) "Total nutrients" means the sum of the percentages of total
nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash as guaranteed
and as determined by analysis.
(33) "Washington application rate" is calculated by using an
averaging period of up to four consecutive years that incorporates
agronomic rates that are representative of soil, crop rotation, and
climatic conditions in Washington state.
(34) "Waste-derived fertilizer" means a commercial fertilizer that
is derived in whole or in part from solid waste as defined in chapter
70.95 or 70.105 RCW, or rules adopted thereunder, but does not include
fertilizers derived from biosolids or biosolids products regulated
under chapter 70.95J RCW or wastewaters regulated under chapter 90.48
RCW.
(35)(a) "Turf" means land, including residential property,
commercial property, and publicly owned land, which is planted in
closely mowed, managed grass.
(b) "Turf" does not include pasture land, land used to grow grass
for sod, or any other land used for agricultural production or
residential vegetable or flower gardening.
(36)(a) "Turf fertilizer" means a commercial fertilizer that is
labeled for use on turf.
(b) "Turf fertilizer" does not include commercial fertilizers
derived solely from organic materials, biosolids, or biosolid products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 15.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, apply turf
fertilizer that is labeled as containing phosphorus to turf;
(b) Apply turf fertilizer labeled as containing phosphorus to turf
when the ground is frozen;
(c) Intentionally apply turf fertilizer labeled as containing
phosphorus to an impervious surface;
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, sell turf
fertilizer that is labeled as containing phosphorus; or
(e) Display turf fertilizer that is labeled as containing
phosphorus in a retail store unless the turf fertilizer is also clearly
labeled for a use permitted by this section.
(2) The prohibitions in this section on the application, sale, and
retail display of turf fertilizer that is labeled as containing
phosphorus, other than the prohibitions in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of
this section, do not apply in the following instances:
(a) Application for the purpose of establishing grass or repairing
damaged grass, using either seeds or sod, during the growing season in
which the grass is established;
(b) Application to an area if the soil in the area is deficient in
plant available phosphorus, as shown by a soil test performed no more
than thirty-six months before the application; or
(c) Application to pasture, interior house plants, flower and
vegetable gardens located on either public or private property, land
used to grow grass for sod, or any land used for agricultural or
silvicultural production.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section:
(i) Limits the ability of a city or county to adopt a local
ordinance regarding the application or sale of turf fertilizer that is
labeled as containing phosphorus that is more restrictive than the
provisions of this section;
(ii) Requires the enforcement or monitoring of compliance with this
section by local governments; or
(iii) Requires local governments to participate in the
administration of this section, including the verification of soil
tests under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) A city or county may not adopt a local ordinance regarding the
application or sale of turf fertilizer that is labeled as containing
phosphorus that is less restrictive than this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.54.470 and 1998 c 36 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for violations of section 3 of this act, any person who
violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and the fines collected shall be disposed of as provided
under RCW 15.54.480.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be considered as requiring the
department to report for prosecution or to cancel the registration of
a commercial fertilizer product or to stop the sale of fertilizers for
violations of this chapter, when violations are of a minor character,
and/or when the department believes that the public interest will be
served and protected by a suitable notice of the violation in writing.
(3) It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom any
violation of this chapter is reported, to cause appropriate proceedings
to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction
without delay. Before the department reports a violation of this
chapter for such prosecution, an opportunity shall be given the
distributor to present his or her view in writing or orally to the
department.
(4) The department is hereby authorized to apply for, and the court
authorized to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining
any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the
provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter,
notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law. Any such
injunction shall be issued without bond.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.54.474 and 1998 c 36 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for violations of section 3 of this act, every person who
fails to comply with this chapter, or any rule adopted under it, may be
subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by the director, in an
amount of not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars for every
such violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate and
distinct offense. Every person, who, through an act of commission or
omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered
to have violated this chapter and may be subject to the penalty
provided for in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---