BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that to fully comply
with requirements in section 642B of the federal head start act, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 9837b, regarding state advisory council membership,
Washington must amend existing law to reflect necessary changes in
early learning advisory council membership in accordance with the
federal requirement.
Accordingly, the purpose of this act is to specify four of the
governor's appointees as permanent members on the early learning
advisory council to comply with state advisory council requirements as
follows: The head start state collaboration office director or a
designee; a representative of a head start, early head start,
migrant/seasonal head start, or tribal head start program; a
representative of a local education agency; and a representative of the
state agency responsible for programs under section 619 or part C of
the federal individuals with disabilities education act. This act also
revises the categories of groups from which the governor may appoint
additional representatives as members of the council.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.090 and 2010 c 234 s 3 and 2010 c 12 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise
the department on statewide early learning issues that would build a
comprehensive system of quality early learning programs and services
for Washington's children and families by assessing needs and the
availability of services, aligning resources, developing plans for data
collection and professional development of early childhood educators,
and establishing key performance measures.
(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that guides the department in
promoting alignment of private and public sector actions, objectives,
and resources, and ensuring school readiness.
(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(4) Councilmembers shall serve two-year terms. However, to stagger
the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve of the
members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to two-year
terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years, with the
terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be
staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of members
representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(5) The council shall consist of not more than twenty-three
members, as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) The governor shall appoint seven leaders in early childhood
education, with at least one representative with experience or
expertise in ((each)) one or more of the areas such as the following:
((Children with disabilities,)) The K-12 system, family day care
providers, and child care centers with four of the seven governor's
appointees made as follows:
(i) The head start state collaboration office director or the
director's designee;
(ii) A representative of a head start, early head start,
migrant/seasonal head start, or tribal head start program;
(iii) A representative of a local education agency; and
(iv) A representative of the state agency responsible for programs
under section 619 or part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education act;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent
advisory ((council)) group, to be appointed by the governor;
(f) One representative of the private-public partnership created in
RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the partnership board;
(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments;
and
(h) One representative from the Washington federation of
independent schools.
(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state
agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for
two-year terms.
(7) The council shall appoint two members and stakeholders with
expertise in early learning to sit on the technical working group
created in section 2, chapter 234, Laws of 2010.
(8) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(9) The department shall provide staff support to the council.

--- END ---