BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS
SUBPART 1. SHORT TITLE, DEFINITIONS, AND GENERAL CONCEPTS
Sec. 101 RCW 62A.9A-102 and 2001 c 32 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Article 9A definitions. In this Article:
(((1))) (a) "Accession" means goods that are physically united with
other goods in such a manner that the identity of the original goods is
not lost.
(((2)(A))) (b)(i) "Account," except as used in "account for," means
a right to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by
performance, (((i))) (A) for property that has been or is to be sold,
leased, licensed, assigned, or otherwise disposed of, (((ii))) (B) for
services rendered or to be rendered, (((iii))) (C) for a policy of
insurance issued or to be issued, (((iv))) (D) for a secondary
obligation incurred or to be incurred, (((v))) (E) for energy provided
or to be provided, (((vi))) (F) for the use or hire of a vessel under
a charter or other contract, (((vii))) (G) arising out of the use of a
credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the
card, or (((viii))) (H) as winnings in a lottery or other game of
chance operated or sponsored by a state, governmental unit of a state,
or person licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or
governmental unit of a state. The term includes health-care-insurance
receivables.
(((B))) (ii) The term does not include (((i))) (A) rights to
payment evidenced by chattel paper or an instrument, (((ii))) (B)
commercial tort claims, (((iii))) (C) deposit accounts, (((iv))) (D)
investment property, (((v))) (E) letter-of-credit rights or letters of
credit, or (((vi))) (F) rights to payment for money or funds advanced
or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a credit or charge
card or information contained on or for use with the card.
(((3))) (c) "Account debtor" means a person obligated on an
account, chattel paper, or general intangible. The term does not
include persons obligated to pay a negotiable instrument, even if the
instrument constitutes part of chattel paper.
(((4))) (d) "Accounting," except as used in "accounting for," means
a record:
(((A))) (i) Authenticated by a secured party;
(((B))) (ii) Indicating the aggregate unpaid secured obligations as
of a date not more than thirty-five days earlier or thirty-five days
later than the date of the record; and
(((C))) (iii) Identifying the components of the obligations in
reasonable detail.
(((5))) (e) "Agricultural lien" means an interest, other than a
security interest, in farm products:
(((A))) (i) Which secures payment or performance of an obligation
for:
(((i))) (A) Goods or services furnished in connection with a
debtor's farming operation; or
(((ii))) (B) Rent on real property leased by a debtor in connection
with its farming operation;
(((B))) (ii) Which is created by statute in favor of a person that:
(((i))) (A) In the ordinary course of its business, furnished goods
or services to a debtor in connection with a debtor's farming
operation; or
(((ii))) (B) Leased real property to a debtor in connection with
the debtor's farming operation; and
(((C))) (iii) Whose effectiveness does not depend on the person's
possession of the personal property.
(((6))) (f) "As-extracted collateral" means:
(((A))) (i) Oil, gas, or other minerals that are subject to a
security interest that:
(((i))) (A) Is created by a debtor having an interest in the
minerals before extraction; and
(((ii))) (B) Attaches to the minerals as extracted; or
(((B))) (ii) Accounts arising out of the sale at the wellhead or
minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in which the debtor had an
interest before extraction.
(((7))) (g) "Authenticate" means:
(((A))) (i) To sign; or
(((B) To execute or otherwise adopt a symbol, or encrypt or
similarly process a record in whole or in part, with the present intent
of the authenticating person to identify the person and adopt or accept
a record.
(8))) (ii) With present intent to adopt or accept a record, to
attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound,
symbol, or process.
(h) "Bank" means an organization that is engaged in the business of
banking. The term includes savings banks, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, and trust companies.
(((9))) (i) "Cash proceeds" means proceeds that are money, checks,
deposit accounts, or the like.
(((10))) (j) "Certificate of title" means a certificate of title
with respect to which a statute provides for the security interest in
question to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result of
the security interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien
creditor with respect to the collateral. The term includes another
record maintained as an alternative to a certificate of title by the
governmental unit that issues certificates of title if a statute
permits the security interest in question to be indicated on the record
as a condition or result of the security interest's obtaining priority
over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral.
(((11))) (k) "Chattel paper" means a record or records that
evidence both a monetary obligation and a security interest in specific
goods, a security interest in specific goods and software used in the
goods, a security interest in specific goods and license of software
used in the goods, a lease of specific goods, or a lease of specific
goods and license of software used in the goods. In this subsection,
"monetary obligation" means a monetary obligation secured by the goods
or owed under a lease of the goods and includes a monetary obligation
with respect to software used in the goods. The term "chattel paper"
does not include (((A))) (i) charters or other contracts involving the
use or hire of a vessel or (((B))) (ii) records that evidence a right
to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or
information contained on or for use with the card. If a transaction is
evidenced by records that include an instrument or series of
instruments, the group of records taken together constitutes chattel
paper.
(((12))) (l) "Collateral" means the property subject to a security
interest or agricultural lien. The term includes:
(((A))) (i) Proceeds to which a security interest attaches;
(((B))) (ii) Accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and
promissory notes that have been sold; and
(((C))) (iii) Goods that are the subject of a consignment.
(((13))) (m) "Commercial tort claim" means a claim arising in tort
with respect to which:
(((A))) (i) The claimant is an organization; or
(((B))) (ii) The claimant is an individual, and the claim:
(((i))) (A) Arose in the course of the claimant's business or
profession; and
(((ii))) (B) Does not include damages arising out of personal
injury to, or the death of, an individual.
(((14))) (n) "Commodity account" means an account maintained by a
commodity intermediary in which a commodity contract is carried for a
commodity customer.
(((15))) (o) "Commodity contract" means a commodity futures
contract, an option on a commodity futures contract, a commodity
option, or another contract if the contract or option is:
(((A))) (i) Traded on or subject to the rules of a board of trade
that has been designated as a contract market for such a contract
pursuant to federal commodities laws; or
(((B))) (ii) Traded on a foreign commodity board of trade,
exchange, or market, and is carried on the books of a commodity
intermediary for a commodity customer.
(((16))) (p) "Commodity customer" means a person for which a
commodity intermediary carries a commodity contract on its books.
(((17))) (q) "Commodity intermediary" means a person that:
(((A))) (i) Is registered as a futures commission merchant under
federal commodities law; or
(((B))) (ii) In the ordinary course of its business, provides
clearance or settlement services for a board of trade that has been
designated as a contract market pursuant to federal commodities law.
(((18))) (r) "Communicate" means:
(((A))) (i) To send a written or other tangible record;
(((B))) (ii) To transmit a record by any means agreed upon by the
persons sending and receiving the record; or
(((C))) (iii) In the case of transmission of a record to or by a
filing office, to transmit a record by any means prescribed by filing-office rule.
(((19))) (s) "Consignee" means a merchant to which goods are
delivered in a consignment.
(((20))) (t) "Consignment" means a transaction, regardless of its
form, in which a person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of
sale and:
(((A))) (i) The merchant:
(((i))) (A) Deals in goods of that kind under a name other than the
name of the person making delivery;
(((ii))) (B) Is not an auctioneer; and
(((iii))) (C) Is not generally known by its creditors to be
substantially engaged in selling the goods of others;
(((B))) (ii) With respect to each delivery, the aggregate value of
the goods is one thousand dollars or more at the time of delivery;
(((C))) (iii) The goods are not consumer goods immediately before
delivery; and
(((D))) (iv) The transaction does not create a security interest
that secures an obligation.
(((21))) (u) "Consignor" means a person that delivers goods to a
consignee in a consignment.
(((22))) (v) "Consumer debtor" means a debtor in a consumer
transaction.
(((23))) (w) "Consumer goods" means goods that are used or bought
for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(((24))) (x) "Consumer-goods transaction" means a consumer
transaction in which:
(((A))) (i) An individual incurs a consumer obligation; and
(((B))) (ii) A security interest in consumer goods secures the
obligation.
(((25))) (y) "Consumer obligation" means an obligation which:
(((A))) (i) Is incurred as part of a transaction entered into
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; and
(((B))) (ii) Arises from an extension of credit, or commitment to
extend credit, in an aggregate amount not exceeding forty thousand
dollars, or is secured by personal property used or expected to be used
as a principal dwelling.
"Consumer obligor" means an obligor who is an individual and who
incurred a consumer obligation.
(((26))) (z) "Consumer transaction" means a transaction in which
(((A))) (i) an individual incurs a consumer obligation, (((B))) (ii) a
security interest secures the obligation, and (((C))) (iii) the
collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes. The term includes consumer-goods transactions.
(((27))) (aa) "Continuation statement" means an amendment of a
financing statement which:
(((A))) (i) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing
statement to which it relates; and
(((B))) (ii) Indicates that it is a continuation statement for, or
that it is filed to continue the effectiveness of, the identified
financing statement.
(((28))) (bb) "Debtor" means:
(((A))) (i) A person having an interest, other than a security
interest or other lien, in the collateral, whether or not the person is
an obligor;
(((B))) (ii) A seller of accounts, chattel paper, payment
intangibles, or promissory notes; or
(((C))) (iii) A consignee.
(((29))) (cc) "Deposit account" means a demand, time, savings,
passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank. The term does not
include investment property or accounts evidenced by an instrument.
(((30))) (dd) "Document" means a document of title or a receipt of
the type described in RCW 62A.7-201(2).
(((31))) (ee) "Electronic chattel paper" means chattel paper
evidenced by a record or records consisting of information stored in an
electronic medium.
(((32))) (ff) "Encumbrance" means a right, other than an ownership
interest, in real property. The term includes mortgages and other
liens on real property.
(((33))) (gg) "Equipment" means goods other than inventory, farm
products, or consumer goods.
(((34))) (hh) "Farm products" means goods, other than standing
timber, with respect to which the debtor is engaged in a farming
operation and which are:
(((A))) (i) Crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including:
(((i))) (A) Crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes; and
(((ii))) (B) Aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;
(((B))) (ii) Livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods
produced in aquacultural operations;
(((C))) (iii) Supplies used or produced in a farming operation; or
(((D))) (iv) Products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured
states.
(((35))) (ii) "Farming operation" means raising, cultivating,
propagating, fattening, grazing, or any other farming, livestock, or
aquacultural operation.
(((36))) (jj) "File number" means the number assigned to an initial
financing statement pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-519(a).
(((37))) (kk) "Filing office" means an office designated in RCW
62A.9A-501 as the place to file a financing statement.
(((38))) (ll) "Filing-office rule" means a rule adopted pursuant to
RCW 62A.9A-526.
(((39))) (mm) "Financing statement" means a record or records
composed of an initial financing statement and any filed record
relating to the initial financing statement.
(((40))) (nn) "Fixture filing" means the filing of a financing
statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and
satisfying RCW 62A.9A-502 (a) and (b). The term includes the filing of
a financing statement covering goods of a transmitting utility which
are or are to become fixtures.
(((41))) (oo) "Fixtures" means goods that have become so related to
particular real property that an interest in them arises under real
property law.
(((42))) (pp) "General intangible" means any personal property,
including things in action, other than accounts, chattel paper,
commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, goods,
instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of
credit, money, and oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction. The
term includes payment intangibles and software.
(((43))) (qq) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance
of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.
(((44))) (rr) "Goods" means all things that are movable when a
security interest attaches. The term includes (((A))) (i) fixtures,
(((B))) (ii) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a
conveyance or contract for sale, (((C))) (iii) the unborn young of
animals, (((D))) (iv) crops grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the
crops are produced on trees, vines, or bushes, and (((E))) (v)
manufactured homes. The term also includes a computer program embedded
in goods and any supporting information provided in connection with a
transaction relating to the program if (((i))) (A) the program is
associated with the goods in such a manner that it customarily is
considered part of the goods, or (((ii))) (B) by becoming the owner of
the goods, a person acquires a right to use the program in connection
with the goods. The term does not include a computer program embedded
in goods that consist solely of the medium in which the program is
embedded. The term also does not include accounts, chattel paper,
commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, general
intangibles, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights,
letters of credit, money, or oil, gas, or other minerals before
extraction or a manufactured home converted to real property under
chapter 65.20 RCW.
(((45))) (ss) "Governmental unit" means a subdivision, agency,
department, county, parish, municipality, or other unit of the
government of the United States, a state, or a foreign country. The
term includes an organization having a separate corporate existence if
the organization is eligible to issue debt on which interest is exempt
from income taxation under the laws of the United States.
(((46))) (tt) "Health-care-insurance receivable" means an interest
in or claim under a policy of insurance which is a right to payment of
a monetary obligation for health-care goods or services provided.
(((47))) (uu) "Instrument" means a negotiable instrument or any
other writing that evidences a right to the payment of a monetary
obligation, is not itself a security agreement or lease, and is of a
type that in ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery
with any necessary indorsement or assignment. The term does not
include (((A))) (i) investment property, (((B))) (ii) letters of
credit, (((C))) (iii) writings that evidence a right to payment arising
out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on
or for use with the card, (((D))) (iv) writings that do not contain a
promise or order to pay, or (((E))) (v) writings that are expressly
nontransferable or nonassignable.
(((48))) (vv) "Inventory" means goods, other than farm products,
which:
(((A))) (i) Are leased by a person as lessor;
(((B))) (ii) Are held by a person for sale or lease or to be
furnished under a contract of service;
(((C))) (iii) Are furnished by a person under a contract of
service; or
(((D))) (iv) Consist of raw materials, work in process, or
materials used or consumed in a business.
(((49))) (ww) "Investment property" means a security, whether
certificated or uncertificated, security entitlement, securities
account, commodity contract, or commodity account.
(((50))) (xx) "Jurisdiction of organization," with respect to a
registered organization, means the jurisdiction under whose law the
organization is formed or organized.
(((51))) (yy) "Letter-of-credit right" means a right to payment or
performance under a letter of credit, whether or not the beneficiary
has demanded or is at the time entitled to demand payment or
performance. The term does not include the right of a beneficiary to
demand payment or performance under a letter of credit.
(((52))) (zz) "Lien creditor" means:
(((A))) (i) A creditor that has acquired a lien on the property
involved by attachment, levy, or the like;
(((B))) (ii) An assignee for benefit of creditors from the time of
assignment;
(((C))) (iii) A trustee in bankruptcy from the date of the filing
of the petition; or
(((D))) (iv) A receiver in equity from the time of appointment.
(((53))) (aaa) "Manufactured home" means a manufactured home or
mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302.
(((54))) (bbb) [Reserved]
(((55))) (ccc) "Mortgage" means a consensual interest in real
property, including fixtures, which secures payment or performance of
an obligation.
(((56))) (ddd) "New debtor" means a person that becomes bound as
debtor under RCW 62A.9A-203(d) by a security agreement previously
entered into by another person.
(((57))) (eee) "New value" means (((A))) (i) money, (((B))) (ii)
money's worth in property, services, or new credit, or (((C))) (iii)
release by a transferee of an interest in property previously
transferred to the transferee. The term does not include an obligation
substituted for another obligation.
(((58))) (fff) "Noncash proceeds" means proceeds other than cash
proceeds.
(((59))) (ggg) "Obligor" means a person that, with respect to an
obligation secured by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on
the collateral, (((A))) (i) owes payment or other performance of the
obligation, (((B))) (ii) has provided property other than the
collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation, or
(((C))) (iii) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment
or other performance of the obligation. The term does not include
issuers or nominated persons under a letter of credit.
(((60))) (hhh) "Original debtor", except as used in RCW 62A.9A-310(((c))) (3), means a person that, as debtor, entered into a security
agreement to which a new debtor has become bound under RCW 62A.9A-203(d).
(((61))) (iii) "Payment intangible" means a general intangible
under which the account debtor's principal obligation is a monetary
obligation.
(((62))) (jjj) "Person related to," with respect to an individual,
means:
(((A))) (i) The spouse or state-registered domestic partner of the
individual;
(((B))) (ii) A brother, brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of
the individual;
(((C))) (iii) An ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or
the individual's spouse or state-registered domestic partner; or
(((D))) (iv) Any other relative, by blood or by marriage or other
law, of the individual or the individual's spouse or state-registered
domestic partner who shares the same home with the individual.
(((63))) (kkk) "Person related to," with respect to an
organization, means:
(((A))) (i) A person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled
by, or under common control with the organization;
(((B))) (ii) An officer or director of, or a person performing
similar functions with respect to, the organization;
(((C))) (iii) An officer or director of, or a person performing
similar functions with respect to, a person described in (((63)(A)))
(kkk)(i) of this subsection;
(((D))) (iv) The spouse or state-registered domestic partner of an
individual described in (((63)(A), (B), or (C))) (kkk)(i), (ii), or
(iii) of this subsection; or
(((E))) (v) An individual who is related by blood or by marriage or
other law to an individual described in (((63)(A), (B), (C), or (D)))
(kkk)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection and shares the same
home with the individual.
(((64))) (lll) "Proceeds", except as used in RCW 62A.9A-609(b),
means the following property:
(((A))) (i) Whatever is acquired upon the sale, lease, license,
exchange, or other disposition of collateral;
(((B))) (ii) Whatever is collected on, or distributed on account
of, collateral;
(((C))) (iii) Rights arising out of collateral;
(((D))) (iv) To the extent of the value of collateral, claims
arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or interference with the use
of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to, the collateral;
or
(((E))) (v) To the extent of the value of collateral and to the
extent payable to the debtor or the secured party, insurance payable by
reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or infringement of
rights in, or damage to, the collateral.
(((65))) (mmm) "Promissory note" means an instrument that evidences
a promise to pay a monetary obligation, does not evidence an order to
pay, and does not contain an acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has
received for deposit a sum of money or funds.
(((66))) (nnn) "Proposal" means a record authenticated by a secured
party, which includes the terms on which the secured party is willing
to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation
it secures pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-620, 62A.9A-621, and 62A.9A-622.
(((67))) (ooo) "Public-finance transaction" means a secured
transaction in connection with which:
(((A))) (i) Debt securities are issued;
(((B))) (ii) All or a portion of the securities issued have an
initial stated maturity of at least twenty years; and
(((C))) (iii) The debtor, obligor, secured party, account debtor or
other person obligated on collateral, assignor or assignee of a secured
obligation, or assignor or assignee of a security interest is a state
or a governmental unit of a state.
(((68))) (ppp) "Public organic record" means a record that is
available to the public for inspection and is:
(i) A record consisting of the record initially filed with or
issued by a state or the United States to form or organize an
organization and any record filed with or issued by the state or the
United States which amends or restates the initial record;
(ii) An organic record of a business trust consisting of the record
initially filed with a state and any record filed with the state which
amends or restates the initial record, if a statute of the state
governing business trusts requires that the record be filed with the
state; or
(iii) A record consisting of legislation enacted by the legislature
of a state or the congress of the United States which forms or
organizes an organization, any record amending the legislation, and any
record filed with or issued by the state or the United States which
amends or restates the name of the organization.
(qqq) "Pursuant to commitment," with respect to an advance made or
other value given by a secured party, means pursuant to the secured
party's obligation, whether or not a subsequent event of default or
other event not within the secured party's control has relieved or may
relieve the secured party from its obligation.
(((69))) (rrr) "Record," except as used in "for record," "of
record," "record or legal title," and "record owner," means information
that is inscribed on a tangible medium or which is stored in an
electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(((70))) (sss) "Registered organization" means an organization
formed or organized solely under the law of a single state or the
United States ((and as to which the state or the United States must
maintain a public record showing the organization to have been
organized)) by the filing of a public organic record with, the issuance
of a public organic record by, or the enactment of legislation by the
state or the United States. The term includes a business trust that is
formed or organized under the law of a single state if a statute of the
state governing business trusts requires that the business trust's
organic record be filed with the state.
(((71))) (ttt) "Secondary obligor" means an obligor to the extent
that:
(((A))) (i) The obligor's obligation is secondary; or
(((B))) (ii) The obligor has a right of recourse with respect to an
obligation secured by collateral against the debtor, another obligor,
or property of either.
(((72))) (uuu) "Secured party" means:
(((A))) (i) A person in whose favor a security interest is created
or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not any
obligation to be secured is outstanding;
(((B))) (ii) A person that holds an agricultural lien;
(((C))) (iii) A consignor;
(((D))) (iv) A person to which accounts, chattel paper, payment
intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold;
(((E))) (v) A trustee, indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent,
or other representative in whose favor a security interest or
agricultural lien is created or provided for; or
(((F))) (vi) A person that holds a security interest arising under
RCW 62A.2-401, 62A.2-505, 62A.2-711(3), 62A.2A-508(5), 62A.4-210, or
62A.5-118.
(((73))) (vvv) "Security agreement" means an agreement that creates
or provides for a security interest.
(((74))) (www) "Send," in connection with a record or notification,
means:
(((A))) (i) To deposit in the mail, deliver for transmission, or
transmit by any other usual means of communication, with postage or
cost of transmission provided for, addressed to any address reasonable
under the circumstances; or
(((B))) (ii) To cause the record or notification to be received
within the time that it would have been received if properly sent under
(((A))) (www)(i) of this subsection.
(((75))) (xxx) "Software" means a computer program and any
supporting information provided in connection with a transaction
relating to the program. The term does not include a computer program
that is included in the definition of goods.
(((76))) (yyy) "State" means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or
any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(((77))) (zzz) "Supporting obligation" means a letter-of-credit
right or secondary obligation that supports the payment or performance
of an account, chattel paper, a document, a general intangible, an
instrument, or investment property.
(((78))) (aaaa) "Tangible chattel paper" means chattel paper
evidenced by a record or records consisting of information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium.
(((79))) (bbbb) "Termination statement" means an amendment of a
financing statement which:
(((A))) (i) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing
statement to which it relates; and
(((B))) (ii) Indicates either that it is a termination statement or
that the identified financing statement is no longer effective.
(((80))) (cccc) "Transmitting utility" means a person primarily
engaged in the business of:
(((A))) (i) Operating a railroad, subway, street railway, or
trolley bus;
(((B))) (ii) Transmitting communications electrically,
electromagnetically, or by light;
(((C))) (iii) Transmitting goods by pipeline or sewer; or
(((D))) (iv) Transmitting or producing and transmitting
electricity, steam, gas, or water.
(((b))) (2) Definitions in other Articles. The following
definitions in other Articles apply to this Article:

"Applicant." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Beneficiary." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Broker." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Certificated security." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Check." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Clearing corporation." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Contract for sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Customer." RCW 62A.4-104.

"Entitlement holder." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Financial asset." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Holder in due course." RCW 62A.3-302.

"Issuer" with respect to a
letter of credit or letter-of-credit right. RCW 62A.5-102.

"Issuer" with respect to a
security. RCW 62A.8-201.

"Lease." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lease agreement." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lease contract." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Leasehold interest." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessee." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessee in ordinary course
of business." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessor." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessor's residual interest." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Letter of credit." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104.

"Negotiable instrument." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Nominated person." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Note." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Proceeds of a letter of
credit." RCW 62A.5-114.

"Prove." RCW 62A.3-103.

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Securities account." RCW 62A.8-501.

"Securities intermediary." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security certificate." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security entitlement." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Uncertificated security." RCW 62A.8-102.

(((c))) (3) Article 1 definitions and principles. Article 1
contains general definitions and principles of construction and
interpretation applicable throughout this Article.

Sec. 102 RCW 62A.9A-105 and 2001 c 32 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) General rule: Control of electronic chattel paper. A secured
party has control of electronic chattel paper if a system employed for
evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably
establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper
was assigned.
(2) Specific facts giving control. A system satisfies subsection
(1) of this section if the record or records comprising the chattel
paper are created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that:
(((1))) (a) A single authoritative copy of the record or records
exists which is unique, identifiable and, except as otherwise provided
in ((subsections (4), (5), and (6) of this section)) (d), (e), and (f)
of this subsection, unalterable;
(((2))) (b) The authoritative copy identifies the secured party as
the assignee of the record or records;
(((3))) (c) The authoritative copy is communicated to and
maintained by the secured party or its designated custodian;
(((4))) (d) Copies or ((revisions)) amendments that add or change
an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with
the ((participation)) consent of the secured party;
(((5))) (e) Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a
copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative
copy; and
(((6))) (f) Any ((revision)) amendment of the authoritative copy is
readily identifiable as ((an)) authorized or unauthorized ((revision)).

PART 2
PERFECTION AND PRIORITY
SUBPART 1. LAW GOVERNING PERFECTION AND PRIORITY
Sec. 201 RCW 62A.9A-307 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-307 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) "Place of business." In this section, "place of
business" means a place where a debtor conducts its affairs.
(((b))) (2) Debtor's location: General rules. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the following rules determine a debtor's
location:
(((1))) (a) A debtor who is an individual is located at the
individual's principal residence.
(((2))) (b) A debtor that is an organization and has only one place
of business is located at its place of business.
(((3))) (c) A debtor that is an organization and has more than one
place of business is located at its chief executive office.
(((c))) (3) Limitation of applicability of subsection (2) of this
section. Subsection (((b))) (2) of this section applies only if a
debtor's residence, place of business, or chief executive office, as
applicable, is located in a jurisdiction whose law generally requires
information concerning the existence of a nonpossessory security
interest to be made generally available in a filing, recording, or
registration system as a condition or result of the security interest's
obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to
the collateral. If subsection (((b))) (2) of this section does not
apply, the debtor is located in the District of Columbia.
(((d))) (4) Continuation of location: Cessation of existence, etc.
A person that ceases to exist, have a residence, or have a place of
business continues to be located in the jurisdiction specified by
subsections (((b) and (c))) (2) and (3) of this section.
(((e))) (5) Location of registered organization organized under
state law. A registered organization that is organized under the law
of a state is located in that state.
(((f))) (6) Location of registered organization organized under
federal law; bank branches and agencies. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (((i))) (9) of this section, a registered organization
that is organized under the law of the United States and a branch or
agency of a bank that is not organized under the law of the United
States or a state are located:
(((1))) (a) In the state that the law of the United States
designates, if the law designates a state of location;
(((2))) (b) In the state that the registered organization, branch,
or agency designates, if the law of the United States authorizes the
registered organization, branch, or agency to designate its state of
location, including by designating its main office, home office, or
other comparable office; or
(((3))) (c) In the District of Columbia, if neither (((1) nor (2)))
(a) or (b) of this subsection applies.
(((g))) (7) Continuation of location: Change in status of
registered organization. A registered organization continues to be
located in the jurisdiction specified by subsection (((e) or (f))) (5)
or (6) of this section notwithstanding:
(((1))) (a) The suspension, revocation, forfeiture, or lapse of the
registered organization's status as such in its jurisdiction of
organization; or
(((2))) (b) The dissolution, winding up, or cancellation of the
existence of the registered organization.
(((h))) (8) Location of United States. The United States is
located in the District of Columbia.
(((i))) (9) Location of foreign bank branch or agency if licensed
in only one state. A branch or agency of a bank that is not organized
under the law of the United States or a state is located in the state
in which the branch or agency is licensed, if all branches and agencies
of the bank are licensed in only one state.
(((j))) (10) Location of foreign air carrier. A foreign air
carrier under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, is located
at the designated office of the agent upon which service of process may
be made on behalf of the carrier.
(((k))) (11) Section applies only to this part. This section
applies only for purposes of this part.

SUBPART 2. PERFECTION
Sec. 202 RCW 62A.9A-311 and 2010 c 161 s 1151 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Security interest subject to other law. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((d))) (4) of this section, the
filing of a financing statement is not necessary or effective to
perfect a security interest in property subject to:
(((1))) (a) A statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States
whose requirements for a security interest's obtaining priority over
the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property preempt RCW
62A.9A-310(((a))) (1);
(((2))) (b) RCW 46.12.675 or 88.02.520, or chapter 65.12 RCW; or
(((3))) (c) A ((certificate-of-title)) statute of another
jurisdiction which provides for a security interest to be indicated on
((the)) a certificate of title as a condition or result of the security
interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with
respect to the property.
(((b))) (2) Compliance with other law. Compliance with the
requirements of a statute, regulation, or treaty described in
subsection (((a))) (1) of this section for obtaining priority over the
rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing
statement under this Article. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (((d))) (4) of this section, RCW 62A.9A-313, and 62A.9A-316
(((d) and (e))) (4) and (5) for goods covered by a certificate of
title, a security interest in property subject to a statute,
regulation, or treaty described in subsection (((a))) (1) of this
section may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements,
and a security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding
a change in the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.
(((c))) (3) Duration and renewal of perfection. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((d))) (4) of this section and RCW
62A.9A-316 (((d) and (e))) (4) and (5), duration and renewal of
perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the
requirements prescribed by a statute, regulation, or treaty described
in subsection (((a))) (1) of this section are governed by the statute,
regulation, or treaty. In other respects, the security interest is
subject to this Article.
(((d))) (4) Inapplicability to certain inventory. During any
period in which collateral subject to RCW ((46.12.095)) 46.12.675 or
88.02.520, or chapter 65.12 RCW is inventory held for sale or lease by
a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in the
business of selling goods of that kind, this section does not apply to
a security interest in that collateral created by that person.

Sec. 203 RCW 62A.9A-316 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-316 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) General rule: Effect on perfection of change in
governing law. A security interest perfected pursuant to the law of
the jurisdiction designated in RCW 62A.9A-301(1) or 62A.9A-305(c)
remains perfected until the earliest of:
(((1))) (a) The time perfection would have ceased under the law of
that jurisdiction;
(((2))) (b) The expiration of four months after a change of the
debtor's location to another jurisdiction; or
(((3))) (c) The expiration of one year after a transfer of
collateral to a person that thereby becomes a debtor and is located in
another jurisdiction.
(((b))) (2) Security interest perfected or unperfected under law of
new jurisdiction. If a security interest described in subsection
(((a))) (1) of this section becomes perfected under the law of the
other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event described in
subsection (((a))) (1) of this section, it remains perfected
thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under
the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event, it
becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as
against a purchaser of the collateral for value.
(((c))) (3) Possessory security interest in collateral moved to new
jurisdiction. A possessory security interest in collateral, other than
goods covered by a certificate of title and as-extracted collateral
consisting of goods, remains continuously perfected if:
(((1))) (a) The collateral is located in one jurisdiction and
subject to a security interest perfected under the law of that
jurisdiction;
(((2))) (b) Thereafter the collateral is brought into another
jurisdiction; and
(((3))) (c) Upon entry into the other jurisdiction, the security
interest is perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction.
(((d))) (4) Goods covered by certificate of title from this state.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section,
a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title which is
perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction when the
goods become covered by a certificate of title from this state remains
perfected until the security interest would have become unperfected
under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become so
covered.
(((e))) (5) When subsection (((d))) (4) security interest becomes
unperfected against purchasers. A security interest described in
subsection (((d))) (4) of this section becomes unperfected as against
a purchaser of the goods for value and is deemed never to have been
perfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value if the
applicable requirements for perfection under RCW 62A.9A-311(((b))) (2)
or 62A.9A-313 are not satisfied before the earlier of:
(((1))) (a) The time the security interest would have become
unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not
become covered by a certificate of title from this state; or
(((2))) (b) The expiration of four months after the goods had
become so covered.
(((f))) (6) Change in jurisdiction of bank, issuer, nominated
person, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary. A security
interest in deposit accounts, letter-of-credit rights, or investment
property which is perfected under the law of the bank's jurisdiction,
the issuer's jurisdiction, a nominated person's jurisdiction, the
securities intermediary's jurisdiction, or the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction, as applicable, remains perfected until the earlier of:
(((1))) (a) The time the security interest would have become
unperfected under the law of that jurisdiction; or
(((2))) (b) The expiration of four months after a change of the
applicable jurisdiction to another jurisdiction.
(((g))) (7) Subsection (((f))) (6) of this section security
interest perfected or unperfected under law of new jurisdiction. If a
security interest described in subsection (((f))) (6) of this section
becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the
earlier of the time or the end of the period described in subsection
(((f))) (6) of this section, it remains perfected thereafter. If the
security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other
jurisdiction before the earlier of that time or the end of that period,
it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as
against a purchaser of the collateral for value.
(8) Effect on filed financing statement of change in governing law.
The following rules apply to collateral to which a security interest
attaches within four months after the debtor changes its location to
another jurisdiction:
(a) A financing statement filed before the change pursuant to the
law of the jurisdiction designated in RCW 62A.9A-301(1) or 62A.9A-305(c) is effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if
the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security
interest in the collateral had the debtor not changed its location.
(b) If a security interest perfected by a financing statement that
is effective under (a) of this subsection (8) becomes perfected under
the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the
financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the
jurisdiction designated in RCW 62A.9A-301(1) or 62A.9A-305(c) or the
expiration of the four-month period, it remains perfected thereafter.
If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the
other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event, it becomes
unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a
purchaser of the collateral for value.
(9) Effect of change in governing law on financing statement filed
against original debtor. If a financing statement naming an original
debtor is filed pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in
RCW 62A.9A-301(1) or 62A.9A-305(c) and the new debtor is located in
another jurisdiction, the following rules apply:
(a) The financing statement is effective to perfect a security
interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within
four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under RCW 62A.-9A-203(d), if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect
a security interest in the collateral had the collateral been acquired
by the original debtor.
(b) A security interest perfected by the financing statement and
which becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before
the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become
ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in RCW 62A.9A-301(1) or 62A.9A-305(c) or the expiration of the four-month period
remains perfected thereafter. A security interest that is perfected by
the financing statement but which does not become perfected under the
law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event becomes
unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a
purchaser of the collateral for value.

SUBPART 3. PRIORITY
Sec. 204 RCW 62A.9A-317 and 2001 c 32 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Conflicting security interests and rights of lien
creditors. A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to
the rights of:
(((1))) (a) A person entitled to priority under RCW 62A.9A-322; and
(((2))) (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((e))) (5)
of this section, a person that becomes a lien creditor before the
earlier of the time:
(((A))) (i) The security interest or agricultural lien is
perfected; or
(((B))) (ii) One of the conditions specified in RCW 62A.9A-203(b)(3) is met and a financing statement covering the collateral is
filed.
(((b))) (2) Buyers that receive delivery. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section, a buyer, other than
a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, documents, goods,
instruments, or a ((security certificate)) certificated security takes
free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives
value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the
security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.
(((c))) (3) Lessees that receive delivery. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section, a lessee of goods
takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee
gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge
of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is
perfected.
(((d))) (4) Licensees and buyers of certain collateral. A licensee
of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of
((accounts, electronic chattel paper, general intangibles, or
investment property)) collateral other than tangible chattel paper,
tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security
takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value
without knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.
(((e))) (5) Purchase-money security interest. Except as otherwise
provided in RCW 62A.9A-320 and 62A.9A-321, if a person files a
financing statement with respect to a purchase-money security interest
before or within twenty days after the debtor receives delivery of the
collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a
buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time the
security interest attaches and the time of filing.

Sec. 205 RCW 62A.9A-326 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-326 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Subordination of security interest created by new
debtor. Subject to subsection (((b))) (2) of this section, a security
interest that is created by a new debtor ((which is)) in collateral in
which the new debtor has or acquires rights and is perfected solely by
a filed financing statement that ((is effective solely under RCW
62A.9A-508 in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights))
would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the
application of RCW 62A.9A-316(9)(a) or 62A.9A-508 is subordinate to a
security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than
by such a filed financing statement ((that is effective solely under
RCW 62A.9A-508)).
(((b))) (2) Priority under other provisions; multiple original
debtors. The other provisions of this part determine the priority
among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected
by filed financing statements ((that are effective solely under RCW
62A.9A-508)) described in subsection (1) of this section. However, if
the security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor
were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting
security interests rank according to priority in time of the new
debtor's having become bound.

PART 3
RIGHTS OF THIRD PARTIES
Sec. 301 RCW 62A.9A-406 and 2003 c 87 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Discharge of account debtor; effect of notification.
Subject to subsections (((b))) (2) through (((j))) (10) of this
section, an account debtor on an account, chattel paper, or a payment
intangible may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor until,
but not after, the account debtor receives a notification,
authenticated by the assignor or the assignee, that the amount due or
to become due has been assigned and that payment is to be made to the
assignee. After receipt of the notification, the account debtor may
discharge its obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge
the obligation by paying the assignor.
(((b))) (2) When notification ineffective. Subject to subsection
(((h))) (8) of this section, notification is ineffective under
subsection (((a))) (1) of this section:
(((1))) (a) If it does not reasonably identify the rights assigned;
(((2))) (b) To the extent that an agreement between an account
debtor and a seller of a payment intangible limits the account debtor's
duty to pay a person other than the seller and the limitation is
effective under law other than this Article; or
(((3))) (c) At the option of an account debtor, if the notification
notifies the account debtor to make less than the full amount of any
installment or other periodic payment to the assignee, even if:
(((A))) (i) Only a portion of the account, chattel paper, or
payment intangible has been assigned to that assignee;
(((B))) (ii) A portion has been assigned to another assignee; or
(((C))) (iii) The account debtor knows that the assignment to that
assignee is limited.
(((c))) (3) Proof of assignment. Subject to subsection (((h))) (8)
of this section, if requested by the account debtor, an assignee shall
seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made.
Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may discharge its
obligation by paying the assignor, even if the account debtor has
received a notification under subsection (((a))) (1) of this section.
(((d))) (4) Term restricting assignment generally ineffective.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section
and RCW 62A.2A-303 and 62A.9A-407, and subject to subsections (((h)))
(8) and (((j))) (10) of this section, a term in an agreement between an
account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note is ineffective
to the extent that it:
(((1))) (a) Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the
account debtor or person obligated on the promissory note to the
assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or
enforcement of a security interest in, the account, chattel paper,
payment intangible, or promissory note; or
(((2))) (b) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the
creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security
interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment,
claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the
account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note.
(((e))) (5) Inapplicability of subsection (((d))) (4) of this
section to certain sales. Subsection (((d))) (4) of this section does
not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or promissory note, other
than a sale pursuant to a disposition under RCW 62A.9A-610 or an
acceptance of collateral under RCW 62A.9A-620.
(((f))) (6) [Reserved]
(((g))) (7) Subsection (((b)(3))) (2)(c) of this section not
waivable. Subject to subsection (((h))) (8) of this section, an
account debtor may not waive or vary its option under subsection
(((b)(3))) (2)(c) of this section.
(((h))) (8) Rule for individual under other law. This section is
subject to law other than this Article which establishes a different
rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the
obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(((i))) (9) Inapplicability to health-care-insurance receivable.
This section does not apply to an assignment of a health-care-insurance
receivable.
(((j)(1))) (10)(a) Inapplicability of subsection (((d))) (4) of
this section to certain transactions. After July 1, 2003, subsection
(((d))) (4) of this section does not apply to the assignment or
transfer of or creation of a security interest in:
(((A))) (i) A claim or right to receive compensation for injuries
or sickness as described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 104(a)(1) or (2); or
(((B))) (ii) A claim or right to receive benefits under a special
needs trust as described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(d)(4).
(((2))) (b) This subsection will not affect a transfer of
structured settlement payment rights under chapter 19.205 RCW.

Sec. 302 RCW 62A.9A-408 and 2003 c 87 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Term restricting assignment generally ineffective.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((b))) (2) of this section,
a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account
debtor and a debtor which relates to a health-care-insurance receivable
or a general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or
franchise, and which term prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent
of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor
to, the assignment or transfer of, or creation, attachment, or
perfection of a security interest in, the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible, is ineffective to the
extent that the term:
(((1))) (a) Would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of
a security interest; or
(((2))) (b) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the
creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give
rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense,
termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note,
health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible.
(((b))) (2) Applicability of subsection (((a))) (1) of this section
to sales of certain rights to payment. Subsection (((a))) (1) of this
section applies to a security interest in a payment intangible or
promissory note only if the security interest arises out of a sale of
the payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale pursuant
to a disposition under RCW 62A.9A-610 or an acceptance of collateral
under RCW 62A.9A-620.
(((c))) (3) Legal restrictions on assignment generally ineffective.
A rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or
requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official,
person obligated on a promissory note, or account debtor to the
assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, a
promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general
intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise between
an account debtor and a debtor, is ineffective to the extent that the
rule of law, statute, or regulation:
(((1))) (a) Would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of
a security interest; or
(((2))) (b) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the
creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give
rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense,
termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note,
health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible.
(((d))) (4) Limitation on ineffectiveness under subsections (((a)))
(1) and (((c))) (3) of this section. To the extent that a term in a
promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a
debtor which relates to a health-care-insurance receivable or general
intangible or a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in
subsection (((c))) (3) of this section would be effective under law
other than this Article but is ineffective under subsection (((a))) (1)
or (((c))) (3) of this section, the creation, attachment, or perfection
of a security interest in the promissory note, health-care-insurance
receivable, or general intangible:
(((1))) (a) Is not enforceable against the person obligated on the
promissory note or the account debtor;
(((2))) (b) Does not impose a duty or obligation on the person
obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor;
(((3))) (c) Does not require the person obligated on the promissory
note or the account debtor to recognize the security interest, pay or
render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or
performance from the secured party;
(((4))) (d) Does not entitle the secured party to use or assign the
debtor's rights under the promissory note, health-care-insurance
receivable, or general intangible, including any related information or
materials furnished to the debtor in the transaction giving rise to the
promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general
intangible;
(((5))) (e) Does not entitle the secured party to use, assign,
possess, or have access to any trade secrets or confidential
information of the person obligated on the promissory note or the
account debtor; and
(((6))) (f) Does not entitle the secured party to enforce the
security interest in the promissory note, health-care-insurance
receivable, or general intangible.
(((e)(1))) (5)(a) Inapplicability of subsections (((a))) (1) and
(((c))) (3) of this section to certain payment intangibles. After July
1, 2003, subsections (((a))) (1) and (((c))) (3) of this section do not
apply to the assignment or transfer of or creation of a security
interest in:
(((A))) (i) A claim or right to receive compensation for injuries
or sickness as described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 104(a)(1) or (2); or
(((B))) (ii) A claim or right to receive benefits under a special
needs trust as described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(d)(4).
(((2))) (b) This subsection will not affect a transfer of
structured settlement payment rights under chapter 19.205 RCW.

PART 4
FILING
SUBPART 1. FILING OFFICE; CONTENTS AND
EFFECTIVENESS OF FINANCING STATEMENT
Sec. 401 RCW 62A.9A-503 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-503 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Sufficiency of debtor's name. A financing statement
sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:
(((1))) (a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection
(1), if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is
held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the
financing statement provides the name ((of the debtor indicated)) that
is stated to be the registered organization's name on the public
organic record ((of)) most recently filed with or issued or enacted by
the ((debtor's)) registered organization's jurisdiction of organization
which ((shows the debtor to have been organized;
(2) If the debtor is a decedent's estate)) purports to state,
amend, or restate the registered organization's name;
(b) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, if the collateral is
being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only
if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the
name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing
statement, indicates that the ((debtor is an estate;
(3) If the debtor is a trust or a trustee acting with respect to
property held in trust, only if the financing statement:
(A) Provides the name specified for the trust in its organic
documents or, if no name is specified, provides the name of the settlor
and additional information sufficient to distinguish the debtor from
other trusts having one or more of the same settlors; and
(B) Indicates, in the debtor's name or otherwise, that the debtor
is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in
trust; and
(4))) collateral is being administered by a personal
representative;
(c) If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered
organization, only if the financing statement:
(i) Provides, as the name of the debtor:
(A) If the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the
trust, the name specified; or
(B) If the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for
the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and
(ii) In a separate part of the financing statement:
(A) If the name is provided in accordance with (c)(i)(A) of this
subsection, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or
(B) If the name is provided in accordance with (c)(i)(B) of this
subsection, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish
the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or
the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust,
unless the additional information so indicates;
(d) If the debtor is an individual, only if the financing
statement:
(i) Provides the individual name of the debtor;
(ii) Provides the surname and first personal name of the debtor; or
(iii) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, provides the name
of the individual which is indicated on a driver's license or
identification card that this state has issued to the individual and
which has not expired; and
(e) In other cases:
(((A))) (i) If the debtor has a name, only if ((it)) the financing
statement provides the ((individual or)) organizational name of the
debtor; and
(((B))) (ii) If the debtor does not have a name, only if ((it)) the
financing statement provides the names of the partners, members,
associates, or other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that
each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the
debtor.
(((b))) (2) Additional debtor-related information. A financing
statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with
subsection (((a))) (1) of this section is not rendered ineffective by
the absence of:
(((1))) (a) A trade name or other name of the debtor; or
(((2))) (b) Unless required under subsection (((a)(4)(B)))
(1)(e)(ii) of this section, names of partners, members, associates, or
other persons comprising the debtor.
(((c))) (3) Debtor's trade name insufficient. A financing
statement that provides only the debtor's trade name does not
sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.
(((d))) (4) Representative capacity. Failure to indicate the
representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a
secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.
(((e))) (5) Multiple debtors and secured parties. A financing
statement may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of
more than one secured party.
(6) Name of decedent. The name of the decedent indicated on the
order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by
the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the
"name of the decedent" under subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(7) Multiple driver's licenses. If this state has issued to an
individual more than one driver's license or identification card of a
kind described in subsection (1)(d) of this section, the one that was
issued most recently is the one to which subsection (1)(d) of this
section refers.
(8) Definition. In this section, the "name of the settlor or
testator" means:
(a) If the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is
stated to be the settlor's name on the public organic record most
recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor's jurisdiction
of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the
settlor's name; or
(b) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated
in the trust's organic record.

Sec. 402 RCW 62A.9A-507 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-507 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Disposition. A filed financing statement remains
effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased,
licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or
agricultural lien continues, even if the secured party knows of or
consents to the disposition.
(((b))) (2) Information becoming seriously misleading. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((c))) (3) of this section and RCW
62A.9A-508, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after
the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the
financing statement becomes seriously misleading under RCW 62A.9A-506.
(((c))) (3) Change in debtor's name. If ((a debtor so changes
its)) the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor
becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under RCW 62A.9A-503(1)
so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under RCW
62A.9A-506:
(((1))) (a) The financing statement is effective to perfect a
security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or
within four months after, the ((change)) filed financing statement
becomes seriously misleading; and
(((2))) (b) The financing statement is not effective to perfect a
security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four
months after the ((change)) filed financing statement becomes seriously
misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement which
renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed
within four months after the ((change)) filed financing statement
becomes seriously misleading.

Sec. 403 RCW 62A.9A-515 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-515 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Five-year effectiveness. Except as otherwise provided
in subsections (((b), (e), (f), and (g))) (2), (5), (6), and (7) of
this section, a filed financing statement is effective for a period of
five years after the date of filing.
(((b))) (2) [Reserved]
(((c))) (3) Lapse and continuation of financing statement. The
effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration
of the period of its effectiveness unless before the lapse a
continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (((d))) (4) of
this section. Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective
and any security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by
the financing statement becomes unperfected, unless the security
interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or
agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is deemed never to
have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.
(((d))) (4) When continuation statement may be filed. A
continuation statement may be filed only within six months before the
expiration of the five-year period specified in subsection (((a))) (1)
of this section or the thirty-year period specified in subsection
(((b))) (2) of this section, whichever is applicable.
(((e))) (5) Effect of filing continuation statement. Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-510, upon timely filing of a
continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing
statement continues for a period of five years commencing on the day on
which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the
absence of the filing. Upon the expiration of the five-year period,
the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in
subsection (((c))) (3) of this section, unless, before the lapse,
another continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (((d)))
(4) of this section. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed
in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial
financing statement.
(((f))) (6) Transmitting utility financing statement. If a debtor
is a transmitting utility and a filed initial financing statement so
indicates, the financing statement is effective until a termination
statement is filed.
(((g))) (7) Record of mortgage as financing statement. A record of
a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a
fixture filing under RCW 62A.9A-502(c) remains effective as a financing
statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or
satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the
real property.

Sec. 404 RCW 62A.9A-516 and 2001 c 32 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) What constitutes filing. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (((b))) (2) of this section, communication of a record to
a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the
record by the filing office constitutes filing.
(((b))) (2) Refusal to accept record; filing does not occur.
Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office
refuses to accept because:
(((1))) (a) The record is not communicated by a method or medium of
communication authorized by the filing office;
(((2))) (b) An amount equal to or greater than the applicable
filing fee is not tendered or, in the case of a filing office described
in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1), an amount equal to the applicable filing fee
is not tendered;
(((3))) (c) The filing office is unable to index the record
because:
(((A))) (i) In the case of an initial financing statement, the
record does not provide a name for the debtor;
(((B))) (ii) In the case of an amendment or ((correction))
information statement, the record:
(((i))) (A) Does not identify the initial financing statement as
required by RCW 62A.9A-512 or 62A.9A-518, as applicable; or
(((ii))) (B) Identifies an initial financing statement whose
effectiveness has lapsed under RCW 62A.9A-515;
(((C))) (iii) In the case of an initial financing statement that
provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an
amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual
which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which
the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor's ((last
name)) surname; or
(((D))) (iv) In the case of a record filed or recorded in the
filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1), the record does not
provide a name for the debtor or a sufficient description of the real
property to which the record relates;
(((4))) (d) In the case of an initial financing statement or an
amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not
provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;
(((5))) (e) In the case of an initial financing statement or an
amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously
provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the
record does not:
(((A))) (i) Provide a mailing address for the debtor; or
(((B))) (ii) Indicate whether the name provided as the name of the
debtor is the name of an individual or an organization; ((or
(C) If the financing statement indicates that the debtor is an
organization, provide:
(i) A type of organization for the debtor;
(ii) A jurisdiction of organization for the debtor; or
(iii) An organizational identification number for the debtor or
indicate that the debtor has none;
(6))) (f) In the case of an assignment reflected in an initial
financing statement under RCW 62A.9A-514(a) or an amendment filed under
RCW 62A.9A-514(b), the record does not provide a name and mailing
address for the assignee; or
(((7))) (g) In the case of a continuation statement, the record is
not filed within the six-month period prescribed by RCW
62A.9A-515(((d))) (4).
(((c))) (3) Rules applicable to subsection (((b))) (2) of this
section. For purposes of subsection (((b))) (2) of this section:
(((1))) (a) A record does not provide information if the filing
office is unable to read or decipher the information; and
(((2))) (b) A record that does not indicate that it is an amendment
or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as
required by RCW 62A.9A-512, 62A.9A-514, or 62A.9A-518, is an initial
financing statement.
(((d))) (4) Refusal to accept record; record effective as filed
record. A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender
of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a
reason other than one set forth in subsection (((b))) (2) of this
section, is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser
of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the
absence of the record from the files.

Sec. 405 RCW 62A.9A-518 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-518 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a) Correction statement.)) (1) Statement with respect to record
indexed under person's name. A person may file in the filing office
((a correction)) an information statement with respect to a record
indexed there under the person's name if the person believes that the
record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed.
(((b) Sufficiency of correction statement. A correction)) (2)
Contents of statement under subsection (1) of this section. An
information statement under subsection (1) of this section must:
(((1))) (a) Identify the record to which it relates by the file
number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record
relates;
(((2))) (b) Indicate that it is ((a correction)) an information
statement; and
(((3))) (c) Provide the basis for the person's belief that the
record is inaccurate and indicate the manner in which the person
believes the record should be amended to cure any inaccuracy or provide
the basis for the person's belief that the record was wrongfully filed.
(3) Statement by secured party of record. A person may file in the
filing office an information statement with respect to a record filed
there if the person is a secured party of record with respect to the
financing statement to which the record relates and believes that the
person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under RCW
62A.9A-509(d).
(4) Contents of statement under subsection (5) of this section. An
information statement under subsection (3) of this section must:
(a) Identify the record to which it relates by the file number
assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record
relates;
(b) Indicate that it is an information statement; and
(c) Provide the basis for the person's belief that the person that
filed the record was not entitled to do so under RCW 62A.9A-509(d).
(((c))) (5) Record not affected by ((correction)) information
statement. The filing of ((a correction)) an information statement
does not affect the effectiveness of an initial financing statement or
other filed record.

SUBPART 2. DUTIES AND OPERATION OF FILING OFFICE
Sec. 406 RCW 62A.9A-521 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-521 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Initial financing statement form. A filing office that
accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial
financing statement in the following form and format except for a
reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A-516(((b))) (2):

((UCC FINANCING STATEMENT

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS (front and back) CAREFULLY

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT AT FILER [optional]

B. SEND ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO: (Name and Address)

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1. DEBTOR'S EXACT FULL LEGAL NAME - insert only one debtor name (1a or 1b) - do not abbreviate or combine names

1a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

1b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

1c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

1d. TAX ID #:
SSN OR EIN
ADD'L INFO RE
ORGANIZATION
DEBTOR
1e. TYPE OF
ORGANIZATION
1f. JURISDICTION OF
ORGANIZATION
1g. ORGANIZATIONAL
ID #, If any
□ NONE

2. ADDITIONAL DEBTOR'S EXACT FULL LEGAL NAME - insert only one debtor name (2a or 2b) - do not abbreviate or combine names

2a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

2b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

2c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

2d. TAX ID #:
SSN OR EIN
ADD'L INFO RE
ORGANIZATION
DEBTOR
2e. TYPE OF
ORGANIZATION
2f. JURISDICTION OF
ORGANIZATION
2g. ORGANIZATIONAL
ID #, If any
□ NONE

3. SECURED PARTY'S NAME (or NAME of TOTAL ASSIGNEE of ASSIGNOR S/P) - insert only one secured party name (3a or 3b)

3a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

3b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

3c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

4. This FINANCING STATEMENT covers the following collateral:

5. ALTERNATIVE DESIGNATION [if applicable]: □ LESSEE/LESSOR □ CONSIGNEE/CONSIGNOR

□ BAILEE/BAILOR □ SELLER/BUYER □ AG. LIEN □ NON-UCC FILING

6. □ This FINANCING STATEMENT is to be filed [for record] (or recorded) in the REAL ESTATE RECORDS. Attach Addendum [if applicable]

7. Check to REQUEST SEARCH REPORT(S) on Debtor(s) □ All Debtors □ Debtor 1 □ Debtor 2

[Additional Fee] [optional]

8. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE DATA

NATIONAL UCC FINANCING STATEMENT (FORM UCC1) (REV. 07/29/98)

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS (front and back) CAREFULLY

9. NAME OF FIRST DEBTOR (1a or 1b) ON RELATED FINANCING STATEMENT

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

10. MISCELLANEOUS:

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

11. ADDITIONAL DEBTOR'S EXACT FULL LEGAL NAME - insert only one name (11a or 11b) - do not abbreviate or combine names

11a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

11b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

11c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

11d. TAX ID #:
SSN OR EIN
ADD'L INFO RE
ORGANIZATION
DEBTOR
11e. TYPE OF
ORGANIZATION
11f. JURISDICTION OF
ORGANIZATION
11g. ORGANIZATIONAL
ID #, If any
□ NONE

12. □ ADDITIONAL SECURED PARTY'S or □ ASSIGNOR S/P'S NAME - insert only one name (12a or 12b)

12a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

12b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

12c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

13. This FINANCING STATEMENT covers □ timber to be cut or
□ as-extracted collateral, or is filed as a □ fixture filing.
16. Additional collateral description:

14. Description of real estate:

15. Name and address of a RECORD OWNER of above-described real estate

(if Debtor does not have a record interest):

17. Check only if applicable and check only one box.
Debtor is a □ Trust or □ Trustee acting with respect
to property held in trust or □ Decedent's Estate

18. Check only if applicable and check only one box.
□ Debtor is a TRANSMITTING UTILITY
□ Filed in connection with a Manufactured-Home
Transaction - effective 30 years
□ Filed in connection with a Public-Finance
Transaction - effective 30 years

NATIONAL UCC FINANCING STATEMENT ADDENDUM (FORM UCC1Ad) (REV. 07/29/98)))

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT AT FILER (optional)

B. E-MAIL CONTACT AT FILER (optional)

C. SEND ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO: (Name and Address)

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1. DEBTOR'S NAME - provide only one Debtor name (1a or 1b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

1a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

1b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
THAT ARE PART OF
THE NAME OF THIS
DEBTOR

SUFFIX

1c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

2. DEBTOR'S NAME - provide only one Debtor name (2a or 2b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

2a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

2b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
THAT ARE PART OF
THE NAME OF THIS
DEBTOR

SUFFIX

2c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

3. SECURED PARTY'S NAME (or NAME of ASSIGNEE of ASSIGNOR SECURED PARTY) - provide only one secured party name (3a or 3b)

3a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

3b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)

SUFFIX

3c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

4. COLLATERAL: This Financing Statement covers the following collateral:

5. Check only if applicable and check only one box:

Collateral is □ held in Trust (see Instructions)

□ being administered by a Decedent's
Personal Representative.

6a. Check only if applicable and check only one box:

□ Public-Finance Transaction □ Manufactured-Home Transaction □ A Debtor is a Transmitting Utility

6b. Check only if applicable and check only one box:

□ Agricultural Lien □ Non-UCC Filing

7. ALTERNATIVE DESIGNATION (if applicable):

□
Lessee/Lessor □ Cosignee/Cosignor □ Seller/Buyer □ Bailee/Bailor □ Licensee/Licensor

8. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE DATA

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT (FORM UCC1)] (REV. 09/30/10)

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS

9. NAME OF FIRST DEBTOR (same as item 1a or 1b on Financing Statement)

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

10. ADDITIONAL DEBTOR'S NAME - provide only one Debtor name (10a or 10b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's
name)

10a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME (exact, full name, without any modifications)

OR

10b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
THAT ARE PART OF
THE NAME OF THIS
DEBTOR
SUFFIX

10c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

11. □ ADDITIONAL SECURED PARTY'S NAME or □ ASSIGNOR SECURED PARTY'S NAME - provide only one name (11a or 11b)

11a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

11b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

11c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

12. ADDITIONAL SPACE FOR ITEM 4 (Collateral)

13. □ This FINANCING STATEMENT is to be filed [for record] (or recorded) in the REAL
ESTATE RECORDS (if applicable)

14. This FINANCING STATEMENT:

□ covers timber to be cut □ covers as-extracted collateral □ is filed as a fixture filing

15. Name and address of a RECORD OWNER of real estate described in item 16 (if Debtor does not have a record interest)

16. Description of real estate

17. Miscellaneous

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT ADDENDUM (FORM UCC1Ad)] (REV. 09/30/10)

(((b))) (2) Amendment form. A filing office that accepts written
records may not refuse to accept a written record in the following form
and format except for a reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A-516(((b))) (2):

((UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS (front and back) CAREFULLY

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT AT FILER [optional]

B. SEND ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO: (Name and Address)

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1a. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE # 1b. This FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT is
to be filed [for record] (or recorded) in the
□ REAL ESTATE RECORDS.

2. □ TERMINATION: Effectiveness of the Financing Statement identified above is terminated with respect to security interest(s) of the Secured Party authorizing this
Termination Statement.

3. □ CONTINUATION: Effectiveness of the Financing Statement identified above with respect to security interest(s) of the Secured Party authorizing this Continuation
Statement is continued for the additional period provided by applicable law.

4. □ ASSIGNMENT (full or partial): Give name of assignee in item 7a or 7b and address of assignee in item 7c; and also give name of assignor in item 9.

5. AMENDMENT (PARTY INFORMATION): This Amendment affects Debtor or Secured Party of record. Check only one of these two boxes.

Also check one of the following three boxes and provide appropriate information in items 6 and/or 7.

□ CHANGE name and/or address: Give current record
name in item 6a or 6b; also give new name (if name
changed) in item 7a or 7b and/or new address (if address
change) in item 7c.
□ DELETE name: Give record name to be deleted in
item 6a or 6b.
□ ADD name: Complete item 7a or 7b, and also
item 7c; also complete items 7d-7g (if applicable).

6. CURRENT RECORD INFORMATION:

6a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

6b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

7. CHANGED (NEW) OR ADDED INFORMATION:

7a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

7b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

7c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

7d. TAX ID #:
SSN OR EIN
ADD'L INFO RE
ORGANIZATION
DEBTOR
7e. TYPE OF
ORGANIZATION
7f. JURISDICTION OF
ORGANIZATION
7g. ORGANIZATIONAL
ID #, If any
□ NONE

8. AMENDMENT (COLLATERAL CHANGE): check only one box.

Describe collateral deleted or added, or give entire restated collateral description, or describe collateral assigned.

9. NAME OF SECURED PARTY OF RECORD AUTHORIZING THIS AMENDMENT (name of assignor, if this is an Assignment). If this is an Amendment
authorized by a Debtor which adds collateral or adds the authorizing Debtor, or if this is a Termination authorized by a Debtor, check here and enter name of
DEBTOR authorizing this Amendment.

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

10. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE DATA

NATIONAL UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT (FORM UCC3) (REV. 07/29/98)

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS (front and back) CAREFULLY

11. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE #
(same as item 1a on Amendment form)

12. NAME OF PARTY AUTHORIZING THIS AMENDMENT
(same as item 9 on Amendment form)

12a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

12b. INDIVIDUAL'S LAST NAME FIRST NAME MIDDLE NAME SUFFIX

13. Use this space for additional information

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

NATIONAL UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT ADDENDUM (FORM UCC3Ad) (REV. 07/29/98)))

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT AT FILER (optional)

B. E-MAIL CONTACT AT FILER (optional)

C. SEND ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO: (Name and Address)

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1a. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE NUMBER

1b. This FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT is to be filed (for record) (or recorded) in the REAL ESTATE RECORDS. Filer: attach Amendment Addendum
(Form UCC3 Ad) and provide Debtor's name in item 13.

2. □ TERMINATION: Effectiveness of the Financing Statement identified above is terminated with respect to the security interest(s) of Secured Party authorizing this
Termination Statement.

3. □ ASSIGNMENT (full or partial): Provide name of Assignee in item 7a or 7b, and address of Assignee in item 7c and name of Assignor in item 9. For partial
assignment, complete items 7 and 9 and also indicate affected collateral in item 8.

4. □ CONTINUATION: Effectiveness of the Financing Statement identified above with respect to the security interest(s) of Secured Party authorizing this Continuation
Statement is continued for the additional period provided by applicable law.

5. □ PARTY INFORMATION CHANGE:
Check one of these two boxes:
This Change affects □ Debtor or □ Secured Party of record

AND

Check one of these three boxes to:

□ CHANGE name and/or address: Complete item 6a or 6b; and item 7a or 7b and item 7c.

□ ADD name: Complete item 7a or 7b, and item 7c.

□ DELETE name: Give record name to be deleted in item 6a or 6b.

6. CURRENT RECORD INFORMATION: Complete for Party Information Change - provide only one name (6a or 6b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or
abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

6a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

6b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

7. CHANGED OR ADDED INFORMATION: Complete for Assignment or Party Information Change - provide only one name (7a or 7b) (use exact full name; do not
omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

7a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

7b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
THAT ARE PART OF
THE NAME OF THIS
DEBTOR
SUFFIX

7c. MAILING ADDRESS CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

8. □ COLLATERAL CHANGE:
Also check one of these four boxes:

□ ADD collateral □ DELETE collateral □ RESTATE covered collateral □ ASSIGN collateral

Indicate collateral:

9. NAME OF SECURED PARTY OF RECORD AUTHORIZING THIS AMENDMENT - provide only one name (9a or 9b) (name of assignor, if this is an
Assignment).
If this is an Amendment authorized by a DEBTOR, check here □ and provide name of authorizing Debtor

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

10. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE DATA

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT (FORM UCC3)] (REV. 09/30/10)

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS

11. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE NUMBER (same as item 1a on Amendment form)

12. NAME OF PARTY AUTHORIZING THIS AMENDMENT (same as item 9 on Amendment form)

12a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

12b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
SUFFIX

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

13. Name of DEBTOR on related financing statement (Name of a current Debtor of record required for indexing purposes only in some filing offices - see Instruction for
item 13 - insert only one Debtor name (13a or 13b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

13a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

OR

13b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL
NAME ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
SUFFIX

14. ADDITIONAL SPACE FOR ITEM 8 (Collateral)

15. This FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT:

□ covers timber to be cut □ covers as-extracted collateral □ is filed as a fixture filing

16. Name and address of a RECORD OWNER of real estate described in item 17 (if Debtor does not have a record interest)

17. Description of real estate

18. MISCELLANEOUS:

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT ADDENDUM (FORM UCC1) (REV. 09/30/10)

PART 5
DEFAULT
Sec. 501 RCW 62A.9A-607 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-607 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Collection and enforcement generally. If so agreed,
and in any event after default, a secured party:
(((1))) (a) May notify an account debtor or other person obligated
on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to or for
the benefit of the secured party;
(((2))) (b) May take any proceeds to which the secured party is
entitled under RCW 62A.9A-315;
(((3))) (c) May enforce the obligations of an account debtor or
other person obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the
debtor with respect to the obligation of the account debtor or other
person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render
performance to the debtor, and with respect to any property that
secures the obligations of the account debtor or other person obligated
on the collateral;
(((4))) (d) If it holds a security interest in a deposit account
perfected by control under RCW 62A.9A-104(a)(1), may apply the balance
of the deposit account to the obligation secured by the deposit
account; and
(((5))) (e) If it holds a security interest in a deposit account
perfected by control under RCW 62A.9A-104(a) (2) or (3), may instruct
the bank to pay the balance of the deposit account to or for the
benefit of the secured party.
(((b))) (2) Nonjudicial enforcement of mortgage. If necessary to
enable a secured party to exercise, under subsection (((a)(3))) (1)(c)
of this section, the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage
nonjudicially, the secured party may record in the office in which a
record of the mortgage is recorded the secured party's sworn affidavit
stating that:
(((1))) (a) Default has occurred ((under the security agreement
that creates or provides for a security interest in the obligations
secured by the mortgage)) with respect to the obligation secured by the
mortgage;
(((2))) (b) A copy of the security agreement that creates or
provides for a security interest in the obligations secured by the
mortgage is attached to the affidavit; and
(((3))) (c) The secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage
nonjudicially.
If the secured party's affidavit and attached copy of the security
agreement in the form prescribed by chapter 65.04 RCW are presented
with the applicable fee to the office in which a record of the mortgage
is recorded, the affidavit and attached copy of the security agreement
shall be recorded pursuant to RCW 65.04.030(3).
(((c))) (3) Commercially reasonable collection and enforcement. A
secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if the
secured party:
(((1))) (a) Undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of
an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral; and
(((2))) (b) Is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or
otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary
obligor.
(((d))) (4) Expenses of collection and enforcement. A secured
party may deduct from the collections made pursuant to subsection
(((c))) (3) of this section reasonable expenses of collection and
enforcement, including reasonable attorneys' fees and legal expenses
incurred by the secured party.
(((e))) (5) Duties to secured party not affected. This section
does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other person
obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.

PART 6
TRANSITION PROVISIONS FOR 2011 AMENDMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 (1) Preeffective date transactions or
liens. Except as otherwise provided in this section or sections 602
through 608 of this act, this act applies to a transaction or lien
within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or
created before the effective date of this section.
(2) Preeffective date proceedings. This act does not affect an
action, case, or proceeding commenced before the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-803 to read as follows:
SECURITY INTEREST PERFECTED BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. (1) Continuing
perfection: Perfection requirements satisfied. A security interest
that is a perfected security interest immediately before the effective
date of this section is a perfected security interest under chapter
62A.9A RCW if, on the effective date of this section, the applicable
requirements for attachment and perfection under chapter 62A.9A RCW as
of the effective date of this section are satisfied without further
action.
(2) Continuing perfection: Perfection requirements not satisfied.
Except as otherwise provided in section 604 of this act, if,
immediately before the effective date of this section, a security
interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable
requirements for perfection under chapter 62A.9A RCW as of the
effective date of this section are not satisfied when this section
takes effect, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only
if the applicable requirements for perfection under chapter 62A.9A RCW
as of the effective date of this section are satisfied within one year
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-804 to read as follows:
SECURITY INTEREST UNPERFECTED BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. A security
interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before
the effective date of this section becomes a perfected security
interest:
(1) Without further action, on the effective date of this section
if the applicable requirements for perfection under chapter 62A.9A RCW
are satisfied before or at that time; or
(2) When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied
if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-805 to read as follows:
EFFECTIVENESS OF ACTION TAKEN BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. (1)
Preeffective date filing effective. The filing of a financing
statement before the effective date of this section is effective to
perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the
applicable requirements for perfection under chapter 62A.9A RCW as of
the effective date of this section.
(2) When preeffective date filing becomes ineffective. This act
does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that,
before the effective date of this section, is filed and satisfies the
applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the
jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in chapter 62A.9A RCW as
it existed before the effective date of this section. However, except
as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and
section 605 of this act, the financing statement ceases to be
effective:
(a) If the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time
the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had this
section not taken effect; or
(b) If the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at
the earlier of:
(i) The time the financing statement would have ceased to be
effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or
(ii) June 30, 2018.
(3) Continuation statement. The filing of a continuation statement
after the effective date of this section does not continue the
effectiveness of a financing statement filed before the effective date
of this section. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation
statement after the effective date of this section and in accordance
with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in
chapter 62A.9A RCW as of the effective date of this section, the
effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that
jurisdiction before the effective date of this section continues for
the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.
(4) Application of subsection (2)(b)(ii) to transmitting utility
financing statement. Subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section applies to
a financing statement that, before the effective date of this section,
is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable
requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing
perfection as provided in chapter 62A.9A RCW as it existed before the
effective date of this section, only to the extent that chapter 62A.9A
RCW as of the effective date of this section provides that the law of
a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing
statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in
collateral covered by the financing statement.
(5) Application of Part 4. A financing statement that includes a
financing statement filed before the effective date of this section and
a continuation statement filed after the effective date of this section
is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of
RCW 62A.9A-502, 62A.9A-503, 62A.9A-507, 62A.9A-515, 62A.9A-516, 62A.9A-518, and 62A.9A-521 as of the effective date of this section, for an
initial financing statement. A financing statement that indicates that
the debtor is a decedent's estate indicates that the collateral is
being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of
RCW 62A.9A-503(1)(b) as of the effective date of this section. A
financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a
trustee acting with respect to property held in trust indicates that
the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of RCW 62A.9A-503(1)(c) as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-806 to read as follows:
WHEN INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT SUFFICES TO CONTINUE EFFECTIVENESS
OF FINANCING STATEMENT. (1) Initial financing statement in lieu of
continuation statement. The filing of an initial financing statement
in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A-501 continues the effectiveness
of a financing statement filed before the effective date of this
section if:
(a) The filing of an initial financing statement in that office
would be effective to perfect a security interest under chapter 62A.9A
RCW as of the effective date of this section;
(b) The preeffective date financing statement was filed in an
office in another state; and
(c) The initial financing statement satisfies subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) Period of continued effectiveness. The filing of an initial
financing statement under subsection (1) of this section continues the
effectiveness of the preeffective date financing statement:
(a) If the initial financing statement is filed before the
effective date of this section, for the period provided in RCW 62A.9A-515, as it existed before the effective date of this section with
respect to an initial financing statement; and
(b) If the initial financing statement is filed after the effective
date of this section, for the period provided in RCW 62A.9A-515 as of
the effective date of this section with respect to an initial financing
statement.
(3) Requirements for initial financing statement under subsection
(1) of this section. To be effective for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section, an initial financing statement must:
(a) Beginning on the effective date of this section, satisfy the
requirements of RCW 62A.9A-502, 62A.9A-503, 62A.9A-507, 62A.9A-515,
62A.9A-516, 62A.9A-518, and 62A.9A-521 for an initial financing
statement;
(b) Identify the preeffective date financing statement by
indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and
providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the
financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed
with respect to the financing statement; and
(c) Indicate that the preeffective date financing statement remains
effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-807 to read as follows:
AMENDMENT OF PREEFFECTIVE DATE FINANCING STATEMENT. (1)
"Preeffective date financing statement." For the purposes of this
section, "preeffective date financing statement" means a financing
statement filed before the effective date of this section.
(2) Applicable law. After the effective date of this section, a
person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate
the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in,
a preeffective date financing statement only in accordance with the law
of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in chapter 62A.9A
RCW as of the effective date of this section. However, the
effectiveness of a preeffective date financing statement also may be
terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the
financing statement is filed.
(3) Method of amending: General rule. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the law of this state
governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a
preeffective date financing statement may be amended after the
effective date of this section only if:
(a) The preeffective date financing statement and an amendment are
filed in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A-501;
(b) An amendment is filed in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A-501
concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial
financing statement that satisfies section 605(3) of this act; or
(c) An initial financing statement that provides the information as
amended and satisfies section 605(3) of this act is filed in the office
specified in RCW 62A.9A-501.
(4) Method of amending: Continuation. If the law of this state
governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a
preeffective date financing statement may be continued only under
section 604 (3) or (5) or 605 of this act.
(5) Method of amending: Additional termination rule. Whether or
not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest,
the effectiveness of a preeffective date financing statement filed in
this state may be terminated after the effective date of this section
by filing a termination statement in the office in which the
preeffective date financing statement is filed, unless an initial
financing statement that satisfies section 605(3) of this act has been
filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing
perfection as provided in chapter 62A.9A RCW as of the effective date
of this section as the office in which to file a financing statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-808 to read as follows:
PERSON ENTITLED TO FILE INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT OR CONTINUATION
STATEMENT. A person may file an initial financing statement or a
continuation statement under this part if:
(1) The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and
(2) The filing is necessary under this part:
(a) To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed
before the effective date of this section; or
(b) To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 A new section is added to chapter 62A.9A
RCW to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-809 to read as follows:
PRIORITY. This act determines the priority of conflicting claims
to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were
established before the effective date of this section, chapter 62A.9A
RCW as it existed before the effective date of this section determines
priority.

PART 7
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
Sec. 701 RCW 62A.2A-103 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-808 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In this Article unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Buyer in ordinary course of business" means a person who in
good faith and without knowledge that the sale to him or her is in
violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold
interest of a third party in the goods buys in ordinary course from a
person in the business of selling goods of that kind but does not
include a pawnbroker. "Buying" may be for cash, or by exchange of
other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and includes
receiving goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for
sale but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in
total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.
(b) "Cancellation" occurs when either party puts an end to the
lease contract for default by the other party.
(c) "Commercial unit" means such a unit of goods as by commercial
usage is a single whole for purposes of lease and division of which
materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A
commercial unit may be a single article, as a machine, or a set of
articles, as a suite of furniture or a line of machinery, or a
quantity, as a gross or carload, or any other unit treated in use or in
the relevant market as a single whole.
(d) "Conforming" goods or performance under a lease contract means
goods or performance that are in accordance with the obligations under
the lease contract.
(e) "Consumer lease" means a lease that a lessor regularly engaged
in the business of leasing or selling makes to a lessee who is an
individual who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family,
or household purpose, if the total payments to be made under the lease
contract, excluding payments for options to renew or buy, do not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars.
(f) "Fault" means wrongful act, omission, breach, or default.
(g) "Finance lease" means a lease with respect to which:
(i) The lessor does not select, manufacture, or supply the goods;
(ii) The lessor acquires the goods or the right to possession and
use of the goods in connection with the lease; and
(iii) Only in the case of a consumer lease, either:
(A) The lessee receives a copy of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods
before signing the lease contract;
(B) The lessee's approval of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods is
a condition to effectiveness of the lease contract; or
(C) The lessee, before signing the lease contract, receives an
accurate and complete statement designating the promises and
warranties, and any disclaimers of warranties, limitations or
modifications of remedies, or liquidated damages, including those of a
third party, such as the manufacturer of the goods, provided to the
lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection with or as part
of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to
possession and use of the goods.
(h) "Goods" means all things that are movable at the time of
identification to the lease contract, or are fixtures (RCW 62A.2A-309),
but the term does not include money, documents, instruments, accounts,
chattel paper, general intangibles, or minerals or the like, including
oil and gas, before extraction. The term also includes the unborn
young of animals.
(i) "Installment lease contract" means a lease contract that
authorizes or requires the delivery of goods in separate lots to be
separately accepted, even though the lease contract contains a clause
"each delivery is a separate lease" or its equivalent.
(j) "Lease" means a transfer of the right to possession and use of
goods for a term in return for consideration, but a sale, including a
sale on approval or a sale or return, or retention or creation of a
security interest is not a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublease.
(k) "Lease agreement" means the bargain, with respect to the lease,
of the lessor and the lessee in fact as found in their language or by
implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or
usage of trade or course of performance as provided in this Article.
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a
sublease agreement.
(l) "Lease contract" means the total legal obligation that results
from the lease agreement as affected by this Article and any other
applicable rules of law. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublease contract.
(m) "Leasehold interest" means the interest of the lessor or the
lessee under a lease contract.
(n) "Lessee" means a person who acquires the right to possession
and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublessee.
(o) "Lessee in ordinary course of business" means a person who in
good faith and without knowledge that the lease to him or her is in
violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold
interest of a third party in the goods, leases in ordinary course from
a person in the business of selling or leasing goods of that kind, but
does not include a pawnbroker. "Leasing" may be for cash, or by
exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured credit and
includes receiving goods or documents of title under a preexisting
lease contract but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security
for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.
(p) "Lessor" means a person who transfers the right to possession
and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublessor.
(q) "Lessor's residual interest" means the lessor's interest in the
goods after expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease
contract.
(r) "Lien" means a charge against or interest in goods to secure
payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, but the term does
not include a security interest.
(s) "Lot" means a parcel or a single article that is the subject
matter of a separate lease or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient
to perform the lease contract.
(t) "Merchant lessee" means a lessee that is a merchant with
respect to goods of the kind subject to the lease.
(u) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or
more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The
discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if
the rate was not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction
was entered into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a
commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and
circumstances of each case at the time the transaction was entered
into.
(v) "Purchase" includes taking by sale, lease, mortgage, security
interest, pledge, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an
interest in goods.
(w) "Sublease" means a lease of goods the right to possession and
use of which was acquired by the lessor as a lessee under an existing
lease.
(x) "Supplier" means a person from whom a lessor buys or leases
goods to be leased under a finance lease.
(y) "Supply contract" means a contract under which a lessor buys or
leases goods to be leased.
(z) "Termination" occurs when either party pursuant to a power
created by agreement or law puts an end to the lease contract otherwise
than for default.
(2) Other definitions applying to this Article or to specified
Parts thereof, and the sections in which they appear are:

"Accessions." RCW 62A.2A-310(((1))).

"Construction
mortgage." RCW 62A.2A-309(((1)(d))).

"Encumbrance." RCW 62A.2A-309(((1)(e))).

"Fixtures." RCW 62A.2A-309(((1)(a))).

"Fixture filing." RCW 62A.2A-309(((1)(b))).

"Purchase money
lease." RCW 62A.2A-309(((1)(c))).

(3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to this
Article:

"Account." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(2))).

"Between merchants." RCW 62A.2-104(((3))).

"Buyer." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(a))).

"Chattel paper." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(11))).

"Consumer goods." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(23))).

"Document." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(30))).

"Entrusting." RCW 62A.2-403(((3))).

"General intangible." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(42))).

"Good faith." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(b))).

"Instrument." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(47))).

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104(1).

"Mortgage." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(55))).

"Pursuant to
commitment." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(68))).

"Receipt." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(c))).

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106(((1))).

"Sale on approval." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Sale or return." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Seller." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(d))).

(4) In addition, Article 62A.1 RCW contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 702 RCW 43.340.050 and 2002 c 365 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The authority may issue its bonds in principal amounts which,
in the opinion of the authority, are necessary to provide sufficient
funds for achievement of its purposes, the payment of debt service on
its bonds, the establishment of reserves to secure the bonds, the costs
of issuance of its bonds and credit enhancements, if any, and all other
expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary to carry out
its purposes or powers. The authority may also issue refunding bonds,
including advance refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding
previously issued bonds, and may issue other types of bonds, debt
obligations, and financing arrangements necessary to fulfill its
purposes or the purposes of this chapter. The bonds are investment
securities and negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for the
purposes of the uniform commercial code.
(2) The authority's bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at
such time or times, be in such denominations, be in such form, be
registered or registrable in such manner, be made transferable,
exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such medium of
payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of
redemption, bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, be
taxable or tax exempt, be payable at such time or times, and be sold in
such manner and at such price or prices, as the authority determines.
The bonds shall be executed by one or more officers of the authority,
and by the trustee or paying agent if the authority determines to use
a trustee or paying agent for the bonds. Execution of the bonds may be
by manual or facsimile signature, provided that at least one signature
on the bond is manual.
(3) The bonds of the authority shall be subject to such terms,
conditions, covenants, and protective provisions as are found necessary
or desirable by the authority, including, but not limited to, pledges
of the authority's assets, setting aside of reserves, and other
provisions the authority finds are necessary or desirable for the
security of bondholders.
(4) Any revenue pledged by the authority to be received under the
sales agreement or in special funds created by the authority shall be
valid and binding at the time the pledge is made. Receipts so pledged
and then or thereafter received by the authority and any securities in
which such receipts may be invested shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further
act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against
all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, whether
such parties have notice of the lien. Notwithstanding any other
provision to the contrary, the resolution or indenture of the authority
or any other instrument by which a pledge is created need not be
recorded or filed pursuant to chapter 62A.9A RCW to perfect such
pledge. The authority shall constitute a governmental unit within the
meaning of RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(45))).
(5) When issuing bonds, the authority may provide for the future
issuance of additional bonds or parity debt on a parity with
outstanding bonds, and the terms and conditions of their issuance. The
authority may issue refunding bonds in accordance with chapter 39.53
RCW or issue bonds with a subordinate lien against the fund or funds
securing outstanding bonds.
(6) The board and any person executing the bonds are not liable
personally on the indebtedness or subject to any personal liability or
accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.
(7) The authority may, out of any fund available therefor, purchase
its bonds in the open market.

Sec. 703 RCW 60.56.015 and 2001 c 32 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agister who holds a lien under RCW 60.56.010 shall perfect the
lien by (1) posting notice of the lien in a conspicuous location on the
premises where the lien holder is keeping the animal or animals, (2)
providing a copy of the posted notice to the owner of the animal or
animals, and (3) providing a copy of the posted notice to any lien
creditor as defined in RCW 62A.9A-102(((52))) if the amount of the
agister lien is in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars. A lien
creditor may be determined through a search under RCW 62A.9A-523 and
62A.9A-526. The lien holder is entitled to collect from the buyer, the
seller, or the person selling on a commission basis if there is a
failure to make payment to the perfected lien holder.

Sec. 704 RCW 60.11.040 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-827 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Within fourteen days of receipt of a written request from the
lien debtor, or other person who provides the lien holder authorization
from the lien debtor for such statement, the lien holder shall provide
that person a statement described in subsection (2) of this section.
Failure timely to provide the statement shall cause the lien holder to
be liable to the person requesting for the attorneys' fees and costs
incurred by that person to obtain the statement, together with damages
incurred by that person due to the failure of the lien holder to
provide the statement, including in the case of the lien debtor any
loss resulting from the lien debtor's inability to obtain financing, or
the increased costs thereof.
(2) The statement shall be in writing, authenticated by the
claimant, and shall contain in substance the following information:
(a) The name and address of the claimant;
(b) The name and address of the debtor;
(c) The date of commencement of performance for which the lien is
claimed;
(d) A description of the labor services, materials, or supplies
furnished;
(e) A description of the crop and its location to be charged with
the lien sufficient for identification; and
(f) The signature of the claimant.
(3) The statement need not be filed with the department of
licensing.
(4) A lien for rent claimed by a landlord pursuant to this chapter
shall be effective during the term of the lease for a period of up to
five years. A financing statement for a landlord lien covering a lease
term longer than five years may be continued in accordance with RCW
62A.9A-515(((d))) (4). A landlord who has a right to a share of the
crop may place suppliers on notice by filing a financing statement in
the same manner as provided for filing a financing statement for a
landlord's lien.

Sec. 705 RCW 62A.2A-310 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-812 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Goods are "accessions" when they are installed in or affixed to
other goods.
(2) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract
entered into before the goods became accessions is superior to all
interests in the whole except as stated in subsection (4) of this
section.
(3) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract
entered into at the time or after the goods became accessions is
superior to all subsequently acquired interests in the whole except as
stated in subsection (4) of this section but is subordinate to
interests in the whole existing at the time the lease contract was made
unless the holders of such interests in the whole have in writing
consented to the lease, or disclaimed an interest in the goods as part
of the whole, or the accession is leased under tariff No. 74 for
residential conversion burners leased by a natural gas utility.
(4) Unless the accession is leased under tariff No. 74 for
residential conversion burners leased by a natural gas utility, the
interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract described in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section is subordinate to the interest
of:
(a) A buyer in the ordinary course of business or a lessee in the
ordinary course of business of any interest in the whole acquired after
the goods became accessions;
(b) A creditor with a security interest in the whole perfected
before the lease contract was made to the extent that the creditor
makes subsequent advances without knowledge of the lease contract; or
(c) A creditor with a security interest in the whole which is
perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate-of-title
statute under RCW 62A.9A-311(((b))) (2).
(5) When under subsections (2) or (3) and (4) of this section a
lessor or a lessee of accessions holds an interest that is superior to
all interests in the whole, the lessor or the lessee may (a) on
default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease contract
by the other party but subject to the provisions of the lease contract
and this Article, or (b) if necessary to enforce his or her other
rights and remedies under this Article, remove the goods from the
whole, free and clear of all interests in the whole, but he or she must
reimburse any holder of an interest in the whole who is not the lessee
and who has not otherwise agreed for the cost of repair of any physical
injury but not for any diminution in value of the whole caused by the
absence of the goods removed or by any necessity for replacing them.
A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove
until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the
performance of this obligation.

Sec. 706 RCW 62A.8-103 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-815 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A share or similar equity interest issued by a corporation,
business trust, joint stock company, or similar entity is a security.
(2) An "investment company security" is a security. "Investment
company security" means a share or similar equity interest issued by an
entity that is registered as an investment company under the federal
investment company laws, an interest in a unit investment trust that is
so registered, or a face-amount certificate issued by a face-amount
certificate company that is so registered. Investment company security
does not include an insurance policy or endowment policy or annuity
contract issued by an insurance company.
(3) An interest in a partnership or limited liability company is
not a security unless it is dealt in or traded on securities exchanges
or in securities markets, its terms expressly provide that it is a
security governed by this Article, or it is an investment company
security. However, an interest in a partnership or limited liability
company is a financial asset if it is held in a securities account.
(4) A writing that is a security certificate is governed by this
Article and not by Article 3, even though it also meets the
requirements of that Article. However, a negotiable instrument
governed by Article 3 is a financial asset if it is held in a
securities account.
(5) An option or similar obligation issued by a clearing
corporation to its participants is not a security, but is a financial
asset.
(6) A commodity contract, as defined in RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(15))),
is not a security or a financial asset.

Sec. 707 RCW 62A.9A-209 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-209 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Applicability of section. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (((c))) (3) of this section, this section applies if:
(((1))) (a) There is no outstanding secured obligation; and
(((2))) (b) The secured party is not committed to make advances,
incur obligations, or otherwise give value.
(((b))) (2) Duties of secured party after receiving demand from
debtor. Within ten days after receiving an authenticated demand by the
debtor, a secured party shall send to an account debtor that has
received notification of an assignment to the secured party as assignee
under RCW 62A.9A-406(((a))) (1) an authenticated record that releases
the account debtor from any further obligation to the secured party.
(((c))) (3) Inapplicability to sales. This section does not apply
to an assignment constituting the sale of an account, chattel paper, or
payment intangible.

Sec. 708 RCW 62A.9A-309 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-309 are each amended
to read as follows:
The following security interests are perfected when they attach:
(1) A purchase-money security interest in consumer goods, except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-311(((b))) (2) with respect to
consumer goods that are subject to a statute or treaty described in RCW
62A.9A-311(((a))) (1);
(2) An assignment of accounts or payment intangibles which does not
by itself or in conjunction with other assignments to the same assignee
transfer more than fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total
amount of the assignor's outstanding accounts and payment intangibles;
(3) A sale of a payment intangible;
(4) A sale of a promissory note;
(5) A security interest created by the assignment of a health-care-insurance receivable to the provider of the health-care goods or
services;
(6) A security interest arising under RCW 62A.2-401, 62A.2-505,
62A.2-711(3), or 62A.2A-508(5), until the debtor obtains possession of
the collateral;
(7) A security interest of a collecting bank arising under RCW
62A.4-210;
(8) A security interest of an issuer or nominated person arising
under RCW 62A.5-118;
(9) A security interest arising in the delivery of a financial
asset under RCW 62A.9A-206(c);
(10) A security interest in investment property created by a broker
or securities intermediary;
(11) A security interest in a commodity contract or a commodity
account created by a commodity intermediary;
(12) An assignment for the benefit of all creditors of the
transferor and subsequent transfers by the assignee thereunder; and
(13) A security interest created by an assignment of a beneficial
interest in a decedent's estate.

Sec. 709 RCW 62A.9A-310 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-310 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) General rule: Perfection by filing. Except as
otherwise provided in subsections (((b) and (d))) (2) and (4) of this
section and RCW 62A.9A-312(b), a financing statement must be filed to
perfect all security interests and agricultural liens.
(((b))) (2) Exceptions: Filing not necessary. The filing of a
financing statement is not necessary to perfect a security interest:
(((1))) (a) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A-308 (d), (e), (f),
or (g);
(((2))) (b) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A-309 when it
attaches;
(((3))) (c) In property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty
described in RCW 62A.9A-311(((a))) (1);
(((4))) (d) In goods in possession of a bailee which is perfected
under RCW 62A.9A-312(d) (1) or (2);
(((5))) (e) In certificated securities, documents, goods, or
instruments which is perfected without filing or possession under RCW
62A.9A-312 (e), (f), or (g);
(((6))) (f) In collateral in the secured party's possession under
RCW 62A.9A-313;
(((7))) (g) In a certificated security which is perfected by
delivery of the security certificate to the secured party under RCW
62A.9A-313;
(((8))) (h) In deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper,
investment property, or letter-of-credit rights which is perfected by
control under RCW 62A.9A-314;
(((9))) (i) In proceeds which is perfected under RCW 62A.9A-315; or
(((10))) (j) That is perfected under RCW 62A.9A-316.
(((c))) (3) Assignment of perfected security interest. If a
secured party assigns a perfected security interest or agricultural
lien, a filing under this Article is not required to continue the
perfected status of the security interest against creditors of and
transferees from the original debtor.
(((d))) (4) Further exception: Filing not necessary for handler's
lien. The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to perfect
the agricultural lien of a handler on orchard crops as provided in RCW
60.11.020(3).

Sec. 710 RCW 62A.9A-313 and 2001 c 32 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Perfection by possession or delivery. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((b))) (2) of this section, a secured
party may perfect a security interest in negotiable documents, goods,
instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper by taking possession of
the collateral. A secured party may perfect a security interest in
certificated securities by taking delivery of the certificated
securities under RCW 62A.8-301.
(((b))) (2) Goods covered by certificate of title. With respect to
goods covered by a certificate of title issued by this state, a secured
party may perfect a security interest in the goods by taking possession
of the goods only in the circumstances described in RCW
62A.9A-316(((d))) (4).
(((c))) (3) Collateral in possession of person other than debtor.
With respect to collateral other than certificated securities and goods
covered by a document, a secured party takes possession of collateral
in the possession of a person other than the debtor, the secured party,
or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of
the debtor's business, when:
(((1))) (a) The person in possession authenticates a record
acknowledging that it holds possession of the collateral for the
secured party's benefit; or
(((2))) (b) The person takes possession of the collateral after
having authenticated a record acknowledging that it will hold
possession of collateral for the secured party's benefit.
(((d))) (4) Time of perfection by possession; continuation of
perfection. If perfection of a security interest depends upon
possession of the collateral by a secured party, perfection occurs no
earlier than the time the secured party takes possession and continues
only while the secured party retains possession.
(((e))) (5) Time of perfection by delivery; continuation of
perfection. A security interest in a certificated security in
registered form is perfected by delivery when delivery of the
certificated security occurs under RCW 62A.8-301 and remains perfected
by delivery until the debtor obtains possession of the security
certificate.
(((f))) (6) Acknowledgment not required. A person in possession of
collateral is not required to acknowledge that it holds possession for
a secured party's benefit.
(((g))) (7) Effectiveness of acknowledgment; no duties or
confirmation. If a person acknowledges that it holds possession for
the secured party's benefit:
(((1))) (a) The acknowledgment is effective under subsection
(((c))) (3) of this section or RCW 62A.8-301(1), even if the
acknowledgment violates the rights of a debtor; and
(((2))) (b) Unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than
this Article otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to
the secured party and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to
another person.
(((h))) (8) Secured party's delivery to person other than debtor.
A secured party having possession of collateral does not relinquish
possession by delivering the collateral to a person other than the
debtor or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary
course of the debtor's business if the person was instructed before the
delivery or is instructed contemporaneously with the delivery:
(((1))) (a) To hold possession of the collateral for the secured
party's benefit; or
(((2))) (b) To redeliver the collateral to the secured party.
(((i))) (9) Effect of delivery under subsection (((h))) (8) of this
section; no duties or confirmation. A secured party does not
relinquish possession, even if a delivery under subsection (((h))) (8)
of this section violates the rights of a debtor. A person to which
collateral is delivered under subsection (((h))) (8) of this section
does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to
confirm the delivery to another person unless the person otherwise
agrees or law other than this Article otherwise provides.

Sec. 711 RCW 62A.9A-320 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-320 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Buyer in ordinary course of business. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section, a buyer
in ordinary course of business, other than a person buying farm
products from a person engaged in farming operations, takes free of a
security interest created by the buyer's seller, even if the security
interest is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence.
(((b))) (2) Buyer of consumer goods. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (((e))) (5) of this section, a buyer of goods from a
person who used or bought the goods for use primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes takes free of a security interest, even
if perfected, if the buyer buys:
(((1))) (a) Without knowledge of the security interest;
(((2))) (b) For value;
(((3))) (c) Primarily for the buyer's personal, family, or
household purposes; and
(((4))) (d) Before the filing of a financing statement covering the
goods.
(((c))) (3) Effectiveness of filing for subsection (((b))) (2) of
this section. To the extent that it affects the priority of a security
interest over a buyer of goods under subsection (((b))) (2) of this
section, the period of effectiveness of a filing made in the
jurisdiction in which the seller is located is governed by RCW
62A.9A-316 (((a) and (b))) (1) and (2).
(((d))) (4) Buyer in ordinary course of business at wellhead or
minehead. A buyer in ordinary course of business buying oil, gas, or
other minerals at the wellhead or minehead or after extraction takes
free of an interest arising out of an encumbrance.
(((e))) (5) Possessory security interest not affected. Subsections
(((a) and (b))) (1) and (2) of this section do not affect a security
interest in goods in the possession of the secured party under RCW
62A.9A-313.

Sec. 712 RCW 62A.9A-328 and 2001 c 32 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following rules govern priority among conflicting security
interests in the same investment property:
(1) A security interest held by a secured party having control of
investment property under RCW 62A.9A-106 has priority over a security
interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the
investment property.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of
which has control under RCW 62A.9A-106 rank according to priority in
time of:
(a) If the collateral is a security, obtaining control;
(b) If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a
securities account and:
(i) If the secured party obtained control under RCW
62A.8-106(4)(a), the secured party's becoming the person for which the
securities account is maintained;
(ii) If the secured party obtained control under RCW
62A.8-106(4)(b), the securities intermediary's agreement to comply with
the secured party's entitlement orders with respect to security
entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or
(iii) If the secured party obtained control through another person
under RCW 62A.8-106(4)(c), the time on which priority would be based
under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or
(c) If the collateral is a commodity contract carried with a
commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for control
specified in RCW 62A.9A-106(b)(2) with respect to commodity contracts
carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary.
(3) A security interest held by a securities intermediary in a
security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the
securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security
interest held by another secured party.
(4) A security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a
commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity
intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by
another secured party.
(5) A security interest in a certificated security in registered
form which is perfected by taking delivery under RCW 62A.9A-313(((a)))
(1) and not by control under RCW 62A.9A-314 has priority over a
conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control.
(6) Conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities
intermediary, or commodity intermediary which are perfected without
control under RCW 62A.9A-106 rank equally.
(7) In all other cases, priority among conflicting security
interests in investment property is governed by RCW 62A.9A-322 and
62A.9A-323.

Sec. 713 RCW 62A.9A-335 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-335 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Creation of security interest in accession. A security
interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral
that becomes an accession.
(((b))) (2) Perfection of security interest. If a security
interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an accession, the
security interest remains perfected in the collateral.
(((c))) (3) Priority of security interest. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (((d))) (4) of this section, the other
provisions of this part determine the priority of a security interest
in an accession.
(((d))) (4) Compliance with certificate-of-title statute. A
security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest
in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of
a certificate-of-title statute under RCW 62A.9A-311(((b))) (2).
(((e))) (5) Removal of accession after default. After default,
subject to Part 6 of this Article, a secured party may remove an
accession from other goods if the security interest in the accession
has priority over the claims of every person having an interest in the
whole.
(((f))) (6) Reimbursement following removal. A secured party that
removes an accession from other goods under subsection (((e))) (5) of
this section shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest
or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other
than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the
whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the
holder or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other
goods caused by the absence of the accession removed or by any
necessity for replacing it. A person entitled to reimbursement may
refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate
assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

Sec. 714 RCW 62A.9A-337 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-337 are each amended
to read as follows:
If, while a security interest in goods is perfected by any method
under the law of another jurisdiction, this state issues a certificate
of title that does not show that the goods are subject to the security
interest or contain a statement that they may be subject to security
interests not shown on the certificate:
(1) A buyer of the goods, other than a person in the business of
selling goods of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the
buyer gives value and receives delivery of the goods after issuance of
the certificate and without knowledge of the security interest; and
(2) The security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security
interest in the goods that attaches, and is perfected under RCW
62A.9A-311(((b))) (2), after issuance of the certificate and without
the conflicting secured party's knowledge of the security interest.

Sec. 715 RCW 62A.9A-338 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-338 are each amended
to read as follows:
If a security interest or agricultural lien is perfected by a filed
financing statement providing information described in RCW
62A.9A-516(((b)(5))) (2)(e) which is incorrect at the time the
financing statement is filed:
(1) The security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to a
conflicting perfected security interest in the collateral to the extent
that the holder of the conflicting security interest gives value in
reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information; and
(2) A purchaser, other than a secured party, of the collateral
takes free of the security interest or agricultural lien to the extent
that, in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information, the
purchaser gives value and, in the case of chattel paper, documents,
goods, instruments, or a security certificate, receives delivery of the
collateral.

Sec. 716 RCW 62A.9A-405 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-405 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Effect of modification on assignee. A modification of
or substitution for an assigned contract is effective against an
assignee if made in good faith. The assignee acquires corresponding
rights under the modified or substituted contract. The assignment may
provide that the modification or substitution is a breach of contract
by the assignor. This subsection is subject to subsections (((b)
through (d))) (2) through (4) of this section.
(((b))) (2) Applicability of subsection (((a))) (1) of this
section. Subsection (((a))) (1) of this section applies to the extent
that:
(((1))) (a) The right to payment or a part thereof under an
assigned contract has not been fully earned by performance; or
(((2))) (b) The right to payment or a part thereof has been fully
earned by performance and the account debtor has not received
notification of the assignment under RCW 62A.9A-406(((a))) (1).
(((c))) (3) Rule for individual under other law. This section is
subject to law other than this Article which establishes a different
rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the
obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(((d))) (4) Inapplicability to health-care-insurance receivable.
This section does not apply to an assignment of a health-care-insurance
receivable.

Sec. 717 RCW 62A.9A-505 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-505 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Use of terms other than "debtor" and "secured party."
A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer
of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing
statement, or may comply with a statute or treaty described in RCW
62A.9A-311(((a))) (1), using the terms "consignor," "consignee,"
"lessor," "lessee," "bailor," "bailee," "licensor," "licensee,"
"owner," "registered owner," "buyer," "seller," or words of similar
import, instead of the terms "secured party" and "debtor."
(((b))) (2) Effect of financing statement under subsection (((a)))
(1) of this section. This part applies to the filing of a financing
statement under subsection (((a))) (1) of this section and, as
appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing
statement under RCW 62A.9A-311(((b))) (2), but the filing or compliance
is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures
an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the
collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the
consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner, or buyer which attaches to
the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

Sec. 718 RCW 62A.9A-506 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-506 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Minor errors and omissions. A financing statement
substantially satisfying the requirements of this part is effective,
even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or
omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.
(((b))) (2) Financing statement seriously misleading. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((c))) (3) of this section, a
financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the
debtor in accordance with RCW 62A.9A-503(((a))) (1) is seriously
misleading.
(((c))) (3) Financing statement not seriously misleading. If a
search of the records of the filing office under the debtor's correct
name, using the filing office's standard search logic, if any, would
disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the
name of the debtor in accordance with RCW 62A.9A-503(((a))) (1), the
name provided does not make the financing statement seriously
misleading.
(((d))) (4) "Debtor's correct name." For purposes of RCW
62A.9A-508(((b))) (2), the "debtor's correct name" in subsection
(((c))) (3) of this section means the correct name of the new debtor.

Sec. 719 RCW 62A.9A-508 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-508 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Financing statement naming original debtor. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, a filed financing statement naming
an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in
collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent
that the financing statement would have been effective had the original
debtor acquired rights in the collateral.
(((b))) (2) Financing statement becoming seriously misleading. If
the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the
new debtor causes a filed financing statement that is effective under
subsection (((a))) (1) of this section to be seriously misleading under
RCW 62A.9A-506:
(((1))) (a) The financing statement is effective to perfect a
security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and
within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under RCW
62A.9A-203(d); and
(((2))) (b) The financing statement is not effective to perfect a
security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than
four months after the new debtor becomes bound under RCW 62A.9A-203(d)
unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new
debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.
(((c))) (3) When section not applicable. This section does not
apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains
effective against the new debtor under RCW 62A.9A-507(((a))) (1).

Sec. 720 RCW 62A.9A-510 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-510 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Filed record effective if authorized. A filed record
is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may
file it under RCW 62A.9A-509.
(((b))) (2) Authorization by one secured party of record. A record
authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing
statement with respect to another secured party of record.
(((c))) (3) Continuation statement not timely filed. A
continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period
prescribed by RCW 62A.9A-515(((d))) (4) is ineffective.

Sec. 721 RCW 62A.9A-520 and 2001 c 32 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Mandatory refusal to accept record. The filing office
described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(2) shall refuse to accept a record for
filing for a reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A-516(((b))) (2). A filing
office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1) shall refuse to accept a
record for filing for a reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A-516(((b) (1)
through (4))) (2) (a) through (d) and any filing office may refuse to
accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in RCW
62A.9A-516(((b))) (2).
(((b))) (2) Communication concerning refusal. If a filing office
refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the
person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal
and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing
office accepted it. The communication must be made at the time and in
the manner prescribed by filing-office rule but, in the case of a
filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(2), in no event more than
two business days after the filing office receives the record.
(((c))) (3) When filed financing statement effective. A filed
financing statement satisfying RCW 62A.9A-502 (a) and (b) is effective,
even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing
under subsection (((a))) (1) of this section. However, RCW 62A.9A-338
applies to a filed financing statement providing information described
in RCW 62A.9A-516(((b)(5))) (2)(e) which is incorrect at the time the
financing statement is filed.
(((d))) (4) Separate application to multiple debtors. If a record
communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to
more than one debtor, this part applies as to each debtor separately.

Sec. 722 RCW 62A.9A-601 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-601 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Rights of secured party after default. After default,
a secured party has the rights provided in this part and, except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-602, those provided by agreement of
the parties. A secured party:
(((1))) (a) May reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose, or otherwise
enforce the claim, security interest, or agricultural lien by any
available judicial procedure; and
(((2))) (b) If the collateral is documents, may proceed either as
to the documents or as to the goods they cover.
(((b))) (2) Rights and duties of secured party in possession or
control. A secured party in possession of collateral or control of
collateral under RCW 62A.9A-104, 62A.9A-105, 62A.9A-106, or 62A.9A-107
has the rights and duties provided in RCW 62A.9A-207.
(((c))) (3) Rights cumulative; simultaneous exercise. The rights
under subsections (((a) and (b))) (1) and (2) of this section are
cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.
(((d))) (4) Rights of debtor and obligor. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (((g))) (7) of this section and RCW 62A.9A-605,
after default, a debtor and an obligor have the rights provided in this
part and by agreement of the parties.
(((e))) (5) Lien of levy after judgment. If a secured party has
reduced its claim to judgment, the lien of any levy that may be made
upon the collateral by virtue of an execution based upon the judgment
relates back to the earliest of:
(((1))) (a) The date of perfection of the security interest or
agricultural lien in the collateral;
(((2))) (b) The date of filing a financing statement covering the
collateral; or
(((3))) (c) Any date specified in a statute under which the
agricultural lien was created.
(((f))) (6) Execution sale. A sale pursuant to an execution is a
foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial
procedure within the meaning of this section. A secured party may
purchase at the sale and thereafter hold the collateral free of any
other requirements of this Article.
(((g))) (7) Consignor or buyer of certain rights to payment.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-607(((c))) (3), this part
imposes no duties upon a secured party that is a consignor or is a
buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory
notes.
(((h))) (8) Enforcement restrictions. All rights and remedies
provided in this part with respect to promissory notes or an agreement
between an account debtor and a debtor which relates to a health-care-insurance receivable or a general intangible, including a contract,
permit, license, or franchise, are subject to RCW 62A.9A-408 to the
extent applicable.

Sec. 723 RCW 62A.9A-602 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-602 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-624, to the extent that
they give rights to an obligor (other than a secondary obligor) or a
debtor and impose duties on a secured party, the debtor or obligor may
not waive or vary the rules stated in the following listed sections:
(1) RCW 62A.9A-207(b)(4)(C), which deals with use and operation of
the collateral by the secured party;
(2) RCW 62A.9A-210, which deals with requests for an accounting and
requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account;
(3) RCW 62A.9A-607(((c))) (3), which deals with collection and
enforcement of collateral;
(4) RCW 62A.9A-608(a) and 62A.9A-615(c) to the extent that they
deal with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection,
enforcement, or disposition;
(5) RCW 62A.9A-608(a) and 62A.9A-615(d) to the extent that they
require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral;
(6) RCW 62A.9A-609 to the extent that it imposes upon a secured
party that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the
duty to do so without breach of the peace;
(7) RCW 62A.9A-610(b), 62A.9A-611, 62A.9A-613, and 62A.9A-614,
which deal with disposition of collateral;
(8) [Reserved]
(9) RCW 62A.9A-616, which deals with explanation of the calculation
of a surplus or deficiency;
(10) RCW 62A.9A-620, 62A.9A-621, and 62A.9A-622, which deal with
acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation;
(11) RCW 62A.9A-623, which deals with redemption of collateral;
(12) RCW 62A.9A-624, which deals with permissible waivers; and
(13) RCW 62A.9A-625 and 62A.9A-626, which deal with the secured
party's liability for failure to comply with this Article.

Sec. 724 RCW 62A.9A-611 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-611 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) "Notification date." In this section, "notification
date" means the earlier of the date on which:
(((1))) (a) A secured party sends to the debtor and any secondary
obligor an authenticated notification of disposition; or
(((2))) (b) The debtor and any secondary obligor waive the right to
notification.
(((b))) (2) Notification of disposition required. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (((d))) (4) of this section, a secured
party that disposes of collateral under RCW 62A.9A-610 shall send to
the persons specified in subsection (((c))) (3) of this section a
reasonable authenticated notification of disposition.
(((c))) (3) Persons to be notified. To comply with subsection
(((b))) (2) of this section, the secured party shall send an
authenticated notification of disposition to:
(((1))) (a) The debtor;
(((2))) (b) Any secondary obligor; and
(((3))) (c) If the collateral is other than consumer goods:
(((A))) (i) Any other secured party or lienholder that, ten days
before the notification date, held a security interest in or other lien
on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement
that:
(((i))) (A) Identified the collateral;
(((ii))) (B) Was indexed under the debtor's name as of that date;
and
(((iii))) (C) Was filed in the office in which to file a financing
statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date;
and
(((B))) (ii) Any other secured party that, ten days before the
notification date, held a security interest in the collateral perfected
by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in RCW
62A.9A-311(((a))) (1).
(((d))) (4) Subsection (((b))) (2) of this section inapplicable:
Perishable collateral; recognized market. Subsection (((b))) (2) of
this section does not apply if the collateral is perishable or
threatens to decline speedily in value or is of a type customarily sold
on a recognized market.
(((e))) (5) Compliance with subsection (((c)(3)(A))) (3)(c)(i) of
this section. A secured party complies with the requirement for
notification prescribed by subsection (((c)(3)(A))) (3)(c)(i) of this
section if:
(((1))) (a) Not later than twenty days or earlier than thirty days
before the notification date, the secured party requests, in a
commercially reasonable manner, information concerning financing
statements indexed under the debtor's name in the office indicated in
subsection (((c)(3)(A))) (3)(c)(i) of this section; and
(((2))) (b) Before the notification date, the secured party:
(((A))) (i) Did not receive a response to the request for
information; or
(((B))) (ii) Received a response to the request for information and
sent an authenticated notification of disposition to each secured party
or other lienholder named in that response whose financing statement
covered the collateral.

Sec. 725 RCW 62A.9A-621 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-621 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Persons to which proposal to be sent. A secured party
that desires to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of
the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to:
(((1))) (a) Any other secured party or lienholder that, ten days
before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest
in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a
financing statement that:
(((A))) (i) Identified the collateral;
(((B))) (ii) Was indexed under the debtor's name as of that date;
and
(((C))) (iii) Was filed in the office or offices in which to file
a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of
that date; and
(((2))) (b) Any other secured party that, ten days before the
debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in the
collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or
treaty described in RCW 62A.9A-311(((a))) (1).
(((b))) (2) Proposal to be sent to secondary obligor in partial
satisfaction. A secured party that desires to accept collateral in
partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its
proposal to any secondary obligor in addition to the persons described
in subsection (((a))) (1) of this section.

Sec. 726 RCW 62A.9A-625 and 2001 c 32 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Judicial orders concerning noncompliance. If it is
established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with
this Article, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or
disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.
(((b))) (2) Damages for noncompliance. Subject to subsections
(((c), (d), and (f))) (3), (4), and (6) of this section, a person is
liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to
comply with this Article or by filing a false statement under RCW
62A.9A-607(((b))) (2) or 62A.9A-619. Loss caused by a failure to
comply may include loss resulting from the debtor's inability to
obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.
(((c))) (3) Persons entitled to recover damages; statutory damages
in consumer-goods transaction. Except as otherwise provided in RCW
62A.9A-628:
(((1))) (a) A person that, at the time of the failure, was a
debtor, was an obligor, or held a security interest in or other lien on
the collateral may recover damages under subsection (((b))) (2) of this
section for its loss; and
(((2))) (b) If the collateral is consumer goods, a person that was
a debtor or a secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to
comply with this part may recover for that failure in any event an
amount not less than the credit service charge plus ten percent of the
principal amount of the obligation or the time-price differential plus
ten percent of the cash price.
(((d))) (4) Recovery when deficiency eliminated or reduced. A
debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under RCW 62A.9A-626 may recover
damages for the loss of any surplus. However, a debtor or secondary
obligor may not recover under subsection (((b) or (c)(2))) (2) or
(3)(b) of this section for noncompliance with the provisions of this
part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance to
the extent that its deficiency is eliminated or reduced under RCW
62A.9A-626.
(((e))) (5) Statutory damages: Noncompliance with specified
provisions. In addition to any damages recoverable under subsection
(((b))) (2) of this section, the debtor, consumer obligor, or person
named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may recover five
hundred dollars in each case from a person that:
(((1))) (a) Fails to comply with RCW 62A.9A-208;
(((2))) (b) Fails to comply with RCW 62A.9A-209;
(((3))) (c) Files a record that the person is not entitled to file
under RCW 62A.9A-509(a);
(((4))) (d) Fails to cause the secured party of record to file or
send a termination statement as required by RCW 62A.9A-513 (a) or (c)
within twenty days after the secured party receives an authenticated
demand from a debtor;
(((5))) (e) Fails to comply with RCW 62A.9A-616(b)(1) and whose
failure is part of a pattern, or consistent with a practice, of
noncompliance; or
(((6))) (f) Fails to comply with RCW 62A.9A-616(b)(2).
(((f))) (6) Statutory damages: Noncompliance with RCW 62A.9A-210.
A debtor or consumer obligor may recover damages under subsection
(((b))) (2) of this section and, in addition, five hundred dollars in
each case from a person that, without reasonable cause, fails to comply
with a request under RCW 62A.9A-210. A recipient of a request under
RCW 62A.9A-210 which never claimed an interest in the collateral or
obligations that are the subject of a request under RCW 62A.9A-210 has
a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with the request within the
meaning of this subsection.
(((g))) (7) Limitation of security interest: Noncompliance with
RCW 62A.9A-210. If a secured party fails to comply with a request
regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under RCW
62A.9A-210, the secured party may claim a security interest only as
shown in the list or statement included in the request as against a
person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

Sec. 727 RCW 62A.9A-628 and 2001 c 32 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) Limitation of liability of secured party for
noncompliance with article. Unless a secured party knows that a person
is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how
to communicate with the person:
(((1))) (a) The secured party is not liable to the person, or to a
secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement
against the person, for failure to comply with this Article; and
(((2))) (b) The secured party's failure to comply with this Article
does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.
(((b))) (2) Limitation of liability based on status as secured
party. A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured
party:
(((1))) (a) To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the
secured party knows:
(((A))) (i) That the person is a debtor or obligor;
(((B))) (ii) The identity of the person; and
(((C))) (iii) How to communicate with the person; or
(((2))) (b) To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a
financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:
(((A))) (i) That the person is a debtor; and
(((B))) (ii) The identity of the person.
(((c))) (3) Limitation of liability if reasonable belief that
transaction not a consumer-goods transaction or consumer transaction.
A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person's liability
for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission
arising out of the secured party's reasonable belief that a transaction
is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that
goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party's belief is based on
its reasonable reliance on:
(((1))) (a) A debtor's representation concerning the purpose for
which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or
(((2))) (b) An obligor's representation concerning the purpose for
which a secured obligation was incurred.
(((d))) (4) Limitation of liability for statutory damages. A
secured party is not liable to any person under RCW
62A.9A-625(((c)(2))) (3)(b) for its failure to comply with RCW
62A.9A-616.
(((e))) (5) Limitation of multiple liability for statutory damages.
A secured party is not liable under RCW 62A.9A-625(((c)(2))) (3)(b)
more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 801 RCW 1.08.015 and 2009 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to such general policies as may be promulgated by the
committee and to the general supervision of the committee, the reviser
shall:
(1) Codify for consolidation into the Revised Code of Washington
all laws of a general and permanent nature heretofore or hereafter
enacted by the legislature, and assign permanent numbers as provided by
law to all new titles, chapters, and sections so added to the revised
code.
(2) Edit and revise such laws for such consolidation, to the extent
deemed necessary or desirable by the reviser and without changing the
meaning of any such law, in the following respects only:
(a) Make capitalization uniform with that followed generally in the
revised code.
(b) Make chapter or section division and subdivision designations
uniform with ((that)) those followed in the revised code, except that
for chapter 62A.9A RCW, the reviser shall make section division and
subdivision designations uniform with those followed by the national
conference of commissioners on uniform state laws for article 9 of the
uniform commercial code.
(c) Substitute for the term "this act," where necessary, the term
"section," "part," "code," "chapter," or "title," or reference to
specific section or chapter numbers, as the case may require.
(d) Substitute for reference to a section of an "act," the proper
code section number reference.
(e) Substitute for "as provided in the preceding section" and other
phrases of similar import, the proper code section number references.
(f) Substitute the proper calendar date for "effective date of this
act," "date of passage of this act," and other phrases of similar
import.
(g) Strike out figures where merely a repetition of written words,
and substitute, where deemed advisable for uniformity, written words
for figures.
(h) Rearrange any misplaced statutory material, incorporate any
omitted statutory material as well as correct manifest errors in
spelling, and manifest clerical or typographical errors, or errors by
way of additions or omissions.
(i) Correct manifest errors in references, by chapter or section
number, to other laws.
(j) Correct manifest errors or omissions in numbering or
renumbering sections of the revised code.
(k) Rearrange the order of sections to conform to such logical
arrangement of subject matter as may most generally be followed in the
revised code, and alphabetize definition sections, when to do so will
not change the meaning or effect of such sections.
(l) Change the wording of section captions, if any, and provide
captions to new chapters and sections.
(m) Strike provisions manifestly obsolete.
(3) Create new code titles, chapters, and sections of the Revised
Code of Washington, or otherwise revise the title, chapter and
sectional organization of the code, all as may be required from time to
time, to effectuate the orderly and logical arrangement of the
statutes. Such new titles, chapters, and sections, and organizational
revisions, shall have the same force and effect as the ninety-one
titles originally enacted and designated as the "Revised Code of
Washington" pursuant to the code adoption acts codified in chapter 1.04
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 The office of the code reviser must
develop legislation for the 2012 legislative session to correct any
internal references required to be updated as a result of amendments in
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---