BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2013, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2012" or "FY 2012" means the period beginning July
1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2012.
(b) "Fiscal year 2013" or "FY 2013" means the period beginning July
1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2013.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(3) The appropriations in this act are appropriations for capital
purposes from sources other than bond proceeds. Appropriations in this
act may not necessarily represent all expenditures authorized for a
particular project for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. For some
projects receiving appropriations in this act, additional
appropriations from other sources for those projects may also be
contained in chapter . . . ., Laws of 2011 (House Bill No. 2020).
(4) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any
portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(5) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only
and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior
biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for
reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of
specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what
may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2011-2013
biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not
necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for
the project or program in the future.
(6) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless
the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant
conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.
Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining
on June 30, 2011, from the 2009-2011 biennial appropriations for each
project.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,334,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Account (20044002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 130, chapter 26, Laws of 2003.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,936,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20064003)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,372,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,469,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20064011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 121, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,449,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20074004)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,902,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,898,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,091,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20074015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1028, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,711,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,930,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000010)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 1012, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,199,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $801,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Freedom Program (30000056)

Reappropriation:
Energy Recovery Act Account--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,282,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Block Grants (91000011)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $911,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,289,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000013)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,531,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board - Export Assistance Grants
and Loans (92000069)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or
other public works facility for which an investment grade audit is
obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition
that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the
recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing
state matching funds for projects that:
(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;
(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;
or
(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.
(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total
program or project funds.
(3) The majority of companies involved in these projects must be
companies that are located in Washington state.
(4) Eligible projects must:
(a) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely
available today; and
(b) Be designed to generate solutions that are applicable both
inside and outside of the state.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the list of projects
in LEAP capital document No. 2011-1D, developed May 24, 2011.
(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade audit is obtainable, the public works board must
require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an
investment grade audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of
the audit as part of its public works assistance account loan.
(3) The public works board is directed to develop a more effective
program for the efficient achievement of the goals of RCW 70.235.070.
The board shall report to the legislature on this effort by January 1,
2012.
(4) For application rounds that occur during the 2011-2013
biennium, roads, streets, and bridges will not be eligible for funding
from the public works assistance account.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $928,000
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $790,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Lake Dredging (30000571)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
begin the process of seeking necessary permits to dredge and spot
dredge excess sediments as required under all of the proposed long-term
management strategies.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Reuse GA Building for Heritage Center, State Library, and State
Patrol (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the preparation of an updated predesign for renovation of the "GA
Building." Tenants in the renovated facility must include the
Washington state heritage center, the Washington state library, the
state patrol, and other possible state agency tenants. The Washington
state heritage center shall occupy approximately 50,000 square feet,
the Washington state library shall occupy approximately 50,000 square
feet, and the state patrol and other state agencies shall occupy the
remaining space. A small cafeteria with public space may be included
in a part of the building that provides view of the Olympic Mountains,
Budd Bay, and Capital Lake. The predesign must limit the scope of the
project to a price that can be financed with the fund balance and
expected annual revenue in the Washington state heritage center account
and the current level lease payments of the tenants expected to move
into the building at the time of occupancy. The department shall also
review the suitability of the space in "OB2" that will be vacated by
the department of information services for expanding archive storage
space. The space in the renovated "GA Building" must be limited to the
exhibition of historically significant documents from the state
archives and may include online access to state archive records, and
must not include permanent storage of state archive documents.

Appropriation:
Washington State Heritage Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,633,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,039,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Camp Murray New Primary Gate Entrance (30000482)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,994,000
Military Department Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (20082006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,736,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000560)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,677,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,278,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000561)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,273,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,231,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30001291)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,214,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,214,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Frances Haddon Morgan Center (91000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the department of social and health services to develop a predesign
with options for the future use of the Frances Haddon Morgan Center
site, including the permanent use of the property to support housing or
other services for low-income, disabled, or vulnerable persons. The
predesign shall be delivered to the house of representatives fiscal
committees and the senate ways and means committee by December 31,
2011. This predesign shall not delay any activities associated with
ceasing to operate the facility as a residential habilitation center
after December 31, 2012. On and after January 1, 2013, the Frances
Haddon Morgan Center property must remain either in public ownership,
or may be sold or leased for a nominal amount to a nonprofit
organization for the permanent use of the property to support housing
or other services for low-income, disabled, or vulnerable persons.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Yakima Valley School (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the department of social and health services to develop a predesign
with options for the future use of the Yakima Valley School site,
including the permanent use of the property to support housing or other
services for low-income, disabled, or vulnerable persons. The
predesign shall be delivered to the house of representatives fiscal
committees and the senate ways and means committee by December 31,
2011. This predesign shall not delay any activities associated with
ceasing to operate the facility as a residential habilitation center
after December 31, 2012. On and after January 1, 2013, the Yakima
Valley School property must remain either in public ownership, or may
be sold or leased for a nominal amount to a nonprofit organization for
the permanent use of the property to support housing or other services
for low-income, disabled, or vulnerable persons.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20064001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,944,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,373,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,721,000

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,089,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,472,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (90000001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,728,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
Labor and Industries Building Repairs and Renewal (30000014)

Appropriation:
Accident Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000
Medical Aid Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,381,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (20054009)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,052,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Motor Vehicle Mercury Removal Program (20062850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 137, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (20064002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,025,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,825,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,766,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,448,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,432,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,456,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,878,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,988,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,134,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mason County Consortium (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,342,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,475,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,050,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,833,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup and Prevention of Waste Tire Piles (30000012)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,289,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup and Restoration (30000020)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,234,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,687,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,524,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
terms and conditions: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions
of section 3005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,284,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account--
Waste Facilities 1980--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,343,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,080,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,243,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (91000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal ARRA . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (91000024)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Wood Smoke Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000140)

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,750,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $17,500,000 of the cleanup
settlement account--state appropriation may be used for cleanup
activities associated with the Asarco contamination in Everett.

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,495,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding To Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $998,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Leaking Underground Tanks (91000002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,118,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,382,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the city
of Snohomish to implement the near-term wastewater treatment plant
improvement project required under agreed order No. 7973 between the
department of ecology and the city.
(2) $3,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for the Freeland sewer project.
(3) $540,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the city
of Connell's Klindworth Campbell waterline distribution project.
(4) $600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for the town of Mabton's wastewater treatment project.
(5) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must
require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an
investment grade audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of
the audit as part of its centennial clean water program grant.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other
public works facility for which an investment grade audit is
obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade audit.
The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
water pollution control revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,205,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Prevention and Cleanup (30000210)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wood Stove Pollution Reduction (30000211)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (30000212)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000214)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local waste and pollution prevention projects.
Grants shall fund new organics composting and conversion, green
building, and moderate risk waste initiatives described in the state
"beyond waste" plan.
(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for grants to
local governments to provide alternatives to backyard burning of
organic materials. Priority for these grants shall be given to: (a)
Urban growth areas of less than 5,000 people affected by the January 1,
2007, ban on outdoor burning; (b) projects that develop infrastructure
for an ongoing program; and (c) projects that coordinate regionally.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,440,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Hood Canal Regional Septic Repair Loan Program (30000215)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,235,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,069,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Skykomish Restoration (30000218)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,711,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Cleanup (30000015)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,248,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Boat Launch (30000281)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
construction projects or design/construction projects statewide that
result in the greatest improvements necessary to meet national
pollution discharge elimination system requirements for communities
least able to pay for those projects or for jurisdictions who are early
adopters of new regulations and effective new technology. The
department must develop specific evaluative criteria to award grants on
a competitive basis to projects that meet the policy objectives in this
section, demonstrate readiness to proceed and have a minimum cash match
of twenty-five percent.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (20061023)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ike Kinswa State Park Improvement (20082950)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (30000665)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Account Authority (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall provide lists of potential purchases and sales to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature prior to committing the state parks and recreation
commission to any sale or purchase of land or buildings and prior to
any allotments made for those purchases. The list shall include any
potential operating or capital cost impacts known to the state parks
and recreation commission.

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000768)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (30000769)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,892,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,483,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 403, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,045,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,955,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20064003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,894,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 170, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,593,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (20084003)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20084008)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,502,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,591,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,409,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,985,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
National Recreational Trails Program (30000012)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,045,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,248,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000144)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,412,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000145)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (30000141)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The board shall work with its existing
stakeholder groups to suggest priorities and procedures for the use of
any funds diverted during the 2009-2011 biennium which in future years
might be restored to the program. Established allocations among
recreation users shall be respected. Special consideration shall be
given to funding of the Reiter Foothills forest recreation motorized
trail system, recreation projects of statewide significance, or
recreation projects that would enhance destination facilities.

Appropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000203)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, developed
April 6, 2011.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program - Practice Incentive
Payment Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (20062001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $855,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Reappropriation:
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $745,000
Appropriation:
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound General Investigation for Nearshore Restoration
(92000025)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are
provided contingent upon the department providing advance notice to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management before applying for federal grants for acquisition
of fish and wildlife habitat lands. The department shall submit this
information in the form of a report that explains the funding source,
the match and use requirements, a description of the project that will
be funded, and a description of future impacts to the operating budget.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,411,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,802,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,533,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,209,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,955,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,600,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,170,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,882,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,636,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (20081015)

Reappropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,524,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,476,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Fuels Reduction, Forest Health, and Ecosystem Improvement
(91000001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,994,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,006,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Elk River Estuarine Lands Acquisition (91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works: Preservation (30000202)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (30000205)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall consult with an
agricultural economist with expertise in the fruit growing sector at
the Washington State University college of agriculture to review
existing policy and recommend changes in the management of trust lands
in agricultural production to increase long-term benefits to trust
beneficiaries. A report of the review must be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011.

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Natural Resources Real Property
Replacement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Community and Technical College Forest
Reserve Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $302,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $377,500,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Burn Building (91000003)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Burn Building Repairs (91000002)

Reappropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For school construction projects funded
through the school construction assistance grant program, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require mapping the design
of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be
remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $776,499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,526,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,526,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,337,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) $952,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,960,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,581,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Program Administration (30000095)

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,851,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,111,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,962,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pre-Disaster Mitigation Planning Grant (91000011)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,107,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Minor Public Works (30000013)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,811,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma-Soils Remediation (20082852)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma-Land Acquisition (20092003)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Safe Campus (30000022)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000027)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,444,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington - Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,801,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000480)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000065)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $687,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,538,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000525)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,960,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Clean Technology Laboratory (30000069)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,213,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Pullman - Agricultural Animal Health
Research Facility (30000514)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,096,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000823)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,460,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000054)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,887,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000056)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000431)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,868,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,039,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000016)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,366,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Preservation (30000444)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000463)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Preservation (30000003)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000016)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Laboratory and Art Annex Building Renovation (30000026)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preservation (30000051)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,940,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Laboratory Building Preservation and Renovation
(30000002)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000502)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lecture Hall Remodel Predesign (30000493)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,540,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,362,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Network Infrastructure/Switches (30000011)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000431)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000510)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Services & Performing Arts Facility (30000424)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,552,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000010)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000036)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $875,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000048)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (30000078)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,537,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,227,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Preservation (30000210)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,063,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,180,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,242,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000505)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,316,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000434)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Preservation (30000461)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000709)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6
2011 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 6001 2009 c 497 s 3136 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The board shall terminate its contract for
restoration of the Bear River Estuary (Project No. 10-1652).
Unexpended grant funding attributable to this project may be spent by
the board for other salmon recovery projects.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000,000

Sec. 6002 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Regional Innovation Cluster Match (91000080)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
support facilities to be located in Washington state to increase the
competitiveness of state or regional proposals for federal energy
innovation and research funding. State funding must not exceed twenty
percent of the total program or project funds. If a Washington state
research organization is not awarded federal funding for energy
innovation and research by June 30, 2011, the remaining appropriation
in this section may be allotted for export assistance as provided in
section 1018 of this act.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Burn Building Repairs (91000002)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (91000024)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000

Sec. 6005 2009 c 497 s 3155 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (20062001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for efforts to restore
nearshore habitat and estuaries in Puget Sound. The department of fish
and wildlife must focus on restoring natural nearshore processes,
including protection and restoration of beach sediments and removal of
existing bulkheads.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide the Puget
Sound partnership, as created by chapter 341, Laws of 2007 the
opportunity to review and provide comment on proposed projects and
activities recommended for funding. This review must be consistent
with the funding schedule for the program.
(3) Funded projects require a nonstate match or in-kind
contributions. The department of fish and wildlife must seek to
maximize the amount of nonstate match from local, state, tribal, and
federal partners. Individual projects require a minimum 33 percent
cash or in-kind match.
(4) Eligible projects must be within Puget Sound and identified by
a salmon recovery lead entity or marine resource committee and
identified in a current salmon recovery, watershed, or nearshore
habitat restoration and protection plan.
(5) Project evaluation criteria must be developed by the Puget
Sound nearshore steering committee. The criteria must be consistent
with the technical guidance developed by the Puget Sound nearshore
science team and shall be coordinated with the salmon recovery funding
board to ensure that project funding and matching requirements are
maximized to the greatest extent possible.
(6) The department of fish and wildlife must not utilize any amount
of these reappropriations to support administration or overhead.
Funding to support the administration of the funds and the
implementation of selected projects must be obtained from the
department of fish and wildlife's operating budget.
(7) In recognition of the urgent need to complete the Puget Sound
nearshore ecosystem restoration project general investigation, up to
$1,446,000 of these reappropriations may be used to match federal funds
implementing the cost-share agreement between the department and the
United States army corps of engineers.
(8) Up to $2,061,735 of the reappropriations are provided solely
for the following projects:

Project Amount
Duwamish Garden estuary restoration $300,000
Seahurst Park bulkhead phase II $1,100,000
Lower Dosewallips floodplain $609,875
Titlow Beach pocket estuary restoration $51,860

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,636,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,236,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,190,000))
$7,627,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,426,000))
$15,663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Sec. 6007 2010 1st sp.s. c 3 s 6005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR SPOKANE COMMUNITY COLLEGE
The Washington state military department shall transfer building
100 and 5.47 acres of associated land at Geiger field to Spokane
community college. The college may exchange the transferred land for
land that is better suited for the development of a Spokane aerospace
technology center. The Washington state military department shall
execute the land transfer within thirty days after the effective date
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

(End of part)

PART 7
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) The office of financial management shall report any transfer
effected under this section to the house of representatives capital
budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, at least
thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of
financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers
within thirty days from the date of transfer. The governor's capital
budget request following any transfer shall reflect that transfer in
the affected agency.

Sec. 7005 RCW 39.35B.050 and 2007 c 506 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of financial management shall:
(1) Design and implement a cost-effective life-cycle cost model by
October 1, 2008, based on the work completed by the joint legislative
audit and review committee in January 2007 and in consultation with
legislative fiscal committees;
(2) Deploy the life-cycle cost model for use by state agencies once
completed and tested;
(3) Update the life-cycle cost model periodically in consultation
with legislative fiscal committees;
(4) Establish clear policies, standards, and procedures regarding
the use of life-cycle cost analysis by state agencies including:
(a) When state agencies must use the life-cycle cost analysis,
including the types of proposed capital projects and leased facilities
to which it must be applied;
(b) Procedures state agencies must use to document the results of
required life-cycle cost analyses;
(c) Standards regarding the discount rate and other key model
assumptions; ((and))
(d) A process to document and justify any deviation from the
standard assumptions;
(e) Establish a requirement that agencies conduct the analysis
comparing a thirty-year and fifty-year building life when using the
life-cycle cost model; and
(f) Establish a requirement that agencies include renovation,
system replacement, and remodel costs in maintenance costs for use in
the life-cycle cost model.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008 The department of general administration
shall not charge the facility depreciation component of lease charges
for nonprofit tenants in the building adjoining Capitol Way and 11th
avenue during the 2011-2013 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010 The capital projects advisory review
board and the department of general administration, in consultation
with the office of superintendent of public instruction, shall develop
a performance-based school construction pilot program. The pilot
program must consist of a minimum of two new K-12 school construction
projects and two K-12 modernization projects, for consideration under
the school construction assistance grant program. Performance-based
contracting as allowed in chapter 39.35A RCW shall be the means of
project delivery for all applicable systems or structural improvements.
The program shall at a minimum include the following: (1) Guidelines
for developing a prequalified list of energy services contractors
eligible for selection to lead or participate on a team to design and
construct a new building, or renovate a building; (2) a process for
evaluating the projects submitted by school districts to determine if
they are candidates for the pilot; (3) a model contract that requires
a guarantee of system performance by way of ongoing monitoring and
verification of energy measures to be used in the building; and (4) any
rule making or oversight that the department of general administration
considers necessary for the success of the pilot program. The pilot
program recommendations shall be delivered to the house capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee by January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid
from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia basin
college for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to add space to the delta high school for
the science technology engineering math program.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Forks Satellite building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a wellness center on the Port
Angeles campus.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a music
and art center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom community
college for up to $3,916,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an auxiliary services
building.
(2) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Albertsons's building.
(3) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the John L. O'Brien building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $250,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the "Perry Street child care site" land purchase.
(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $15,850,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct or
renovate specialized housing and treatment facilities for youth
committed to the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The debt
service is to be paid with the savings associated with closure of the
Maple Lane school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under
this act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery,
agencies shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that
projects and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020
action agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of
information on specific actions, projects, associated funding,
performance measures, and other information necessary to track project
implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In
situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is
not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda Puget Sound
partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor
and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING
(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of school plant facilities may be expended for
the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington state arts commission
may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund
larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities may be
expended for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 may be expended for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2011-2013 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the fiscal
committees of the legislature, may select capital projects that have
completed predesign to undergo a budget evaluation study. The budget
evaluation study team approach using value engineering techniques must
be utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the
studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.
Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of
financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected
agencies to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018 (1) The fish and wildlife commission,
acting through the department of general administration, shall transfer
to the city of Olympia its three parcels of property located in
downtown Olympia as recommended in the report submitted to the
legislature by the department of general administration January 12,
2011. The department of general administration must obtain an
appraisal to determine the fair market value of these properties and
negotiate a contract with the city of Olympia with the following
provisions: (a) A plan and timeline for preparing the parcels for
higher use with a significant component of mixed use retail and market
rate housing; (b) a process for determining the city's costs associated
with that planning and development effort; (c) an agreement on how to
divide the proceeds from eventual sale of the properties to a private
developer or developers between the state and the city; and (d) a
contingency that addresses the reversion right if the city fails to
meet the conditions of the agreement.
(2) The division of the proceeds must be in proportion to the
amounts determined as the fair market value of the properties before
transfer and the amount determined under subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The department of general administration shall submit the
proposed contract to the appropriate committees of the legislature
sixty days prior to the execution of the contract with the city. The
state's share of the proceeds shall be deposited in the state wildlife
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
The superintendent of public instruction shall work with the
department of general administration to help raise school district
awareness of the department's services related to standard construction
contract language, consultant agreement language, and the consultant
selection process. The superintendent of public instruction shall use
their web site, or other means, to post access to this information.

Sec. 7020 RCW 28B.20.725 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6008 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board is hereby empowered:
(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any
bonds being issued;
(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement
fund and any reserve account therein;
(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of
Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary
to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such
fund;
(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement
fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any
bonds;
(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington
building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in
excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of
such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund.
However, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that
are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of
transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund. However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund.

Sec. 7021 RCW 28B.30.750 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6009 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board is hereby empowered:
(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any
bonds being issued;
(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement
fund and any reserve account therein;
(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State
University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary
to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such
fund;
(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement
fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any
bonds;
(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University
building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in
excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of
such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund.
However, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund. However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund.

Sec. 7022 RCW 28B.15.210 and 2009 c 499 s 1 and 2009 c 497 s 6019
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees
to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and
dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as
follows:
One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the
remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account."
The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account
shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering,
maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates
of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums
transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to
the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the
payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided
by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in
RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 biennium, sums
credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be
used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

Sec. 7023 RCW 28B.15.310 and 2009 c 499 s 2 and 2009 c 497 s 6020
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington
State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion
as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be
made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the
Washington State University building account.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University building
account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings,
equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University
as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the
university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94
RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the
((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State
University building account shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs. Expenditures so made shall be accounted
for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until
appropriated by the legislature.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond
retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university,
except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as
authorized by law.

Sec. 7024 RCW 28B.35.370 and 2009 c 499 s 5 and 2009 c 497 s 6021
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with
such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are
received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing
bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal
school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts
required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified
by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a
prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described
normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer
shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the Western Washington University
capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital
projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the
state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital
projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional
universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If
in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by
any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building
and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its
institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and
such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of
moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.
(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall
be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The
Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited
in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and
expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and
for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance,
demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets,
and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or
appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred
therefrom as authorized by law. During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013
biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used
for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.
(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may
also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7025 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2009 c 499 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall
appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the
outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the
college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all
requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal
and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at
all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable
out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction,
erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of
buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for
community and technical colleges in the name of the state of
Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and
architectural services provided by the department of general
administration, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any
bonds issued for such purposes. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in
the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs.
(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital
projects account may also be used for certificates of participation
under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7026 RCW 43.43.944 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 923 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940;
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums; and
(d) General fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account by the
legislature.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. The state patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire
service training account under this section to contract with the
Washington state firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of
the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The contract
may call for payments on a monthly basis. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for
school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol
and for repairs of the burn building. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for
school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol,
and for predesign and repairs of the burn building.
(3) Any general fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account
shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship
training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with
outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter
joint apprenticeship training program.

Sec. 7027 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2008 c 327 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the building communities fund
program. Under the program, capital and technical assistance grants
may be made to nonprofit organizations for acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential
community services, including social service centers and multipurpose
community centers, including those serving a distinct or ethnic
population. Such facilities must be located in a distressed community
or serve a substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit
((and)), evaluate, and rank applications for the building communities
fund program as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations.
(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. To be considered qualified, applicants must demonstrate that
the proposed project:
(i) Will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the services
provided to citizens;
(ii) Will be located in a distressed community or will serve a
substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons;
(iii) Will offer three or more distinct activities that meet a
single community service objective or offer a diverse set of activities
that meet multiple community service objectives, including but not
limited to: Providing social services; expanding employment
opportunities for or increasing the employability of community
residents; or offering educational or recreational opportunities
separate from the public school system or private schools, as long as
recreation is not the sole purpose of the facility;
(iv) Reflects a long-term vision for the development of the
community, shared by residents, businesses, leaders, and partners;
(v) Requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase
of the project;
(vi) Is ready to proceed and will make timely use of the funds;
(vii) Is sponsored by one or more entities that have the
organizational and financial capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant
agreement and to maintain the project into the future;
(viii) Fills an unmet need for community services;
(ix) Will achieve its stated objectives; and
(x) Is a community priority as shown through tangible commitments
of existing or future assets made to the project by community
residents, leaders, businesses, and government partners.
(c) The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total cost of the project, except, under exceptional
circumstances, the department may reduce the amount of nonstate match
required. No more than ten percent of the total granted amount may be
awarded to qualified eligible projects that meet the definition of
exceptional circumstances defined in this subsection. For purposes of
this subsection, exceptional circumstances include but are not limited
to: Natural disasters affecting projects; emergencies beyond an
applicant's control, such as a fire or an unanticipated loss of a lease
where services are currently provided; or a delay that could result in
a threat to public health or safety. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(d) The department may not set a monetary limit to funding
requests.
(3) The department shall submit ((annually)) biennially to the
governor and the legislature in the department's capital budget request
((an unranked)) a ranked list of the qualified eligible projects for
which applications were received. The list must include a description
of each project, its total cost, and the amount of state funding
requested. The appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature shall
use this list to determine building communities fund projects that may
receive funding in the capital budget. The total amount of state
capital funding available for all projects on the ((annual)) biennial
list shall be determined by the capital budget beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. In addition, if cash funds have been
appropriated, up to three million dollars may be used for technical
assistance grants. The department shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(4) In addition to the list of ranked qualified eligible projects,
the department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature a summary report that describes the solicitation and
evaluation processes, including but not limited to the number of
applications received, the total amount of funding requested, issues
encountered, if any, and any recommendations for process improvements.
(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7028 A new section is added to chapter 43.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to modernize state programs that
provide financial and technical assistance related to local
infrastructure by: (a) Clarifying the policy objectives and priorities
for state assistance for local infrastructure; (b) eliminating
redundancy among the various state programs; (c) increasing the speed
of delivering state assistance and the ability to respond to emerging
needs; (d) maximizing the acquisition and use of federal funding
sources; (e) ensuring transparency in state and federal assistance; (f)
improving access to the lowest cost private market financing; and (g)
ensuring accountability and the periodic review of progress.
(2) By November 1, 2011, the public works board must prepare and
submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature an
implementation plan for creating a reformed state system for providing
local infrastructure assistance. In developing the plan, the board
must consult with state agencies that provide infrastructure funding
and technical assistance including, but not limited to, the departments
of commerce, health, and ecology. The board must also work in
cooperation with local governments or entities that benefit from
infrastructure funding and technical assistance.
(3) The board, state agencies, and local partners must consider,
among other things, consolidation of state appropriations to support
policy-focused investments including water quality, safe drinking
water, storm water, economic development, access to private financing,
solid waste and recycling, and flood levees. In addition, they must
consider consolidating assistance packages, streamlining application
processes, and clarify the respective responsibilities of state and
local agencies in planning for, developing and maintaining local public
infrastructure.
(4) The implementation plan must include draft legislation and the
organizational and budgetary changes necessary to implement the new
system in time for the 2013-2015 budget cycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
The department of general administration shall provide the office
of the superintendent of public instruction with existing standard
construction contract and consultant agreement standardized language
and selection process, for publication on office of the superintendent
of public instruction's web site, which can be used at no charge by
school districts. In addition, the department of general
administration shall provide an option to school districts to modify
existing standard construction contract or consultant agreement
language and assist districts with the consultant selection process an
hourly rate for these services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7030 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Riverpoint Center Property Sale (30000061)

Eastern Washington University is authorized to sell its center at
701 West First Avenue in downtown Spokane, and directed to deposit the
proceeds of the sale into the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account. The university shall report to the office of
financial management and to the appropriate committees of the
legislature upon the sale of the downtown center and completion of the
updated appraisal.

Sec. 7031 2011 c 5 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $16,400,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $29,400,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling and Litter Control Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $3,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $3,000,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $15,340,000 for fiscal year
2010 ((and $37,780,000 for fiscal year 2011)) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,120,000))
$15,340,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $37,060,000 for fiscal year
2010 ((and $65,759,000 for fiscal year 2011)) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,819,000))
$37,060,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $105,228,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $106,451,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,679,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $8,520,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $12,550,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,070,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,600,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,500,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $3,900,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed by more
than $26,000,000 the actual amount of the annual
payment to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,098,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
$26,000,000 less than the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment to
the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,170,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline sales and
use tax account, $24,274,000 for fiscal year 2010
and $24,182,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,456,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For
transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $3,100,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $1,961,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,961,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Judicial Information Systems Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $3,250,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,250,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $1,000,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $1,500,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Emergency Water Projects Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $390,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $5,550,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$4,450,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,038,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$2,978,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,016,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $8,604,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $5,156,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,760,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $279,640,000 for fiscal year
2010 and (($229,560,000)) $155,508,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($509,200,000))
$435,148,000
Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,130,000
Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $31,000,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$31,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
city-county assistance account, $5,000,000 on
July 1, 2009, and $5,000,000 on July 1, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $6,930,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,930,000
Shared Game Lottery Account: For transfer to the
education legacy trust account, $3,600,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,400,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
State Lottery Account: For transfer to the education
legacy trust account, $9,500,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $9,500,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2010,
an amount not to exceed the actual cash balance
of the fund and $1,957,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,957,000
Washington Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual cash
balance of the fund and $2,966,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,966,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual cash
balance of the fund and $1,008,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,008,000
GET Ready for Math and Science Scholarship Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2010, an amount not to exceed
the actual cash balance not comprised of or
needed to match private contributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $7,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Data Processing Revolving Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund, $5,632,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,159,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,791,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $8,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $7,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Water Quality Capital Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $278,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Performance Audits of Government Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $10,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $7,000,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
Job Development Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $20,930,000 for fiscal
year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,930,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $10,117,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $32,075,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,192,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $90,690,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $53,384,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,074,000
Cleanup Settlement Account: For transfer to the
state efficiency and restructuring account for
fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,480,000
Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the
state drought preparedness account, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Washington State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $10,000,000
for fiscal year 2011. The transfer in this section
shall occur on June 30, 2011, only if by that date
the Washington state convention and trade center is
not transferred to a public facilities district
pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6889
(convention and trade center) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Institutional Welfare/Betterment Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Teacher Conditional Scholarship Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,150,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $2,150,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
Fingerprint Identification Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $800,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Prevent or Reduce Owner-Occupied Foreclosure
Program Account: For transfer to the financial
education public-private partnership account for
fiscal year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual
cash balance of the fund as of June 30, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,000
Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $1,500,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Tourism Enterprise Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $590,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $590,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $205,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,000
Life Sciences Discovery Fund: For transfer to
the basic health plan stabilization account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Life Sciences Discovery Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,500,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Distressed County Assistance Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $205,000 for
fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 205,000
State Drought Preparedness Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $400,000 for
fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $300,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account: For transfer to the state general fund
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Sec. 7032 RCW 82.16.020 and 2009 c 469 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during the fiscal
year 2011, twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1)
of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of
the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures.

Sec. 7033 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during the fiscal
year 2011, twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1)
of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of
the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures.

Sec. 7034 RCW 82.18.040 and 2000 c 103 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Taxes collected under this chapter shall be held in trust until
paid to the state. Taxes received by the state shall be deposited in
the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050:
PROVIDED, That during the fiscal year 2011, taxes received by the state
under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures. Any person collecting the tax who appropriates
or converts the tax collected shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor if
the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the
date payment is due. If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by
this chapter to the person charged with collection of the tax and the
person charged with collection fails to pay the tax to the department,
the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the tax.
The tax shall be due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from
the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting the tax.
The tax shall be due from the person collecting the tax at the end
of the tax period in which the tax is received from the taxpayer. If
the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount billed for
taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount remitted shall be
applied first to payment of the solid waste collection tax and this tax
shall have priority over all other claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 7035 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during
the fiscal year 2011, six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of this
tax must be deposited in the general fund for general purpose
expenditures. An amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the
proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the
city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7036 SALARY ADJUSTMENT
The appropriations in this act shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this act and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Appropriations in this act are provided solely for a 3.0
percent salary reduction effective July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013,
for all employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches,
including those employees in the Washington management service, and
including employees exempt from merit system rules, except for:
(a) Elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials;
(b) Student employees at state institutions of higher education;
(c) Faculty employees at state institutions of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That appropriations to higher education institutions
are reduced in an amount reflecting a 3.0 percent reduction in faculty
salary expenditures;
(d) Certificated employees of the state school for the blind and
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss;
(e) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol
represented by the state patrol troopers' association and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants' association;
(f) Represented ferry workers of the Washington state department of
transportation, provided, however, that other reductions are included
in section 504 of the 2011-2013 transportation appropriations act;
(g) Employees whose salary is less than $2,500 per month; and
(h) Employees as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For employees subject to the 3.0 percent reduction in salary
under subsection (1) of this section employees will receive temporary
salary reduction leave of up to 5.2 hours per month. The director of
personnel shall adopt rules governing the accrual and use of temporary
salary reduction leave.
(3) The department of retirement systems shall include any forgone
salary or lost work hours under subsections (1) and (3) of this section
in the final average compensation of employees affected for purposes of
calculating retirement benefits, as specified in executive request
legislation Z-0211.1/11.
(4) The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in office of financial management document 2011-01, which is
hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in office of financial
management document 2011-01 and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7037 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7038 Section 7005 of this act expires June 30,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7039 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 7022 through 7025 and 7027 of this act
which take effect July 1, 2011.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 58
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 59
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 37, 61
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48, 83
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 39, 62
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 58
SPOKANE COMMUNITY COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
STATE TREASURER
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 42, 59
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 46, 47
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
--- END ---