BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that alternative
learning experiences are individual courses for public school students
that are detailed in a written student learning plan supervised and
monitored by a certificated public school teacher but primarily occur
away from the regular public school classroom setting. The legislature
further finds that although alternative learning experiences are
similar to home-based instruction in that both are characterized by
learning that occurs away from school, alternative learning experiences
are not home-based instruction. The legislature further finds that
home-based students may enroll part-time in public school classes and
programs, including alternative learning experiences. The legislature
further finds that if a student is enrolled full-time in alternative
learning experiences, the student is not a home-based student, even if
all the instruction is provided by a parent.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.092 and 2009 c 190 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts are prohibited from advertising, marketing,
and otherwise providing unsolicited information about learning programs
offered by the school district, including but not limited to digital
learning programs, part-time enrollment opportunities, and other
alternative learning programs, to students and their parents who have
filed a declaration of intent to cause a child to receive home-based
instruction under RCW 28A.200.010. School districts may respond to
requests for information that are initiated by a parent. This section
does not apply to general mailings or newsletters sent by the school
district to all households in the district.
(2) School districts are prohibited from advertising or marketing
full-time enrollment in an alternative learning experience as being a
home-based instruction program. Any student who is enrolled as a full-time student in alternative learning experiences is a full-time public
school student. Any student who is enrolled as a part-time student in
alternative learning experiences is a part-time public school student
for the actual hours in which he or she is participating in the
program. A school district that enrolls a student full-time in an
alternative learning experience must provide the parent or guardian of
the student, before the student's enrollment, with a description of the
difference between home-based instruction pursuant to chapter 28A.200
RCW and full-time enrollment in alternative learning experiences.

--- END ---