BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.01.440 (Adoption of statewide goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 -- Department's duties -- Reports to
the legislature) and 2008 c 14 s 8; and
(2) RCW 70.235.070 (Distribution of funds for infrastructure and
capital development projects -- Prerequisites) and 2009 c 519 s 9.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.078 and 2007 c 516 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
To support achievement of the policy goals described in RCW
47.04.280, the department shall:
(1) Maintain an inventory of the condition of structures and
corridors in most urgent need of retrofit or rehabilitation;
(2) Develop long-term financing tools that reliably provide ongoing
maintenance and preservation of the transportation infrastructure;
(3) Balance system safety and convenience through all phases of a
project to accommodate all users of the transportation system to
safely, reliably, and efficiently provide mobility to people and goods;
(4) ((Develop strategies to gradually reduce the per capita vehicle
miles traveled based on consideration of a range of reduction methods;
(5))) Consider efficiency tools, including high occupancy vehicle
and high occupancy toll lanes, corridor-specific and systemwide pricing
strategies, active traffic management, commute trip reduction, and
other demand management tools;
(((6))) (5) Promote integrated multimodal planning; and
(((7))) (6) Consider engineers and architects to design
environmentally sustainable, context-sensitive transportation systems.

--- END ---