BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.031 and 2003 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc., except that the standards for
liquified petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and
Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54
(National Fuel Gas Code);
(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International
Code Council(([,])), Inc., including those standards of the National
Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the
International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording
in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be
precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) The International Wildland Urban Interface Code, published by
the International Code Council, Inc.;
(5) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any
provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not
adopted; and
(((5))) (6) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards
for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by ((the
physically disabled)) persons with physical disabilities or elderly
persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section, the first named code
shall govern over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are
addressed during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

--- END ---