BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.200 and 2002 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if:
(a) In the commission of a robbery or of immediate flight
therefrom, he or she:
(i) Is armed with a deadly weapon; or
(ii) Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon;
or
(iii) Inflicts bodily injury; ((or))
(b) He or she commits a robbery within and against a financial
institution as defined in RCW 7.88.010 or 35.38.060; or
(c) He or she commits a robbery of a pharmacy as defined in RCW
18.64.011. "Pharmacy" includes only the portion of the building or
store that is licensed by the board of pharmacy.
(2) Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---