BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sport shooting
ranges in this state offer valuable hunter and firearm safety training,
offer legitimate and important forms of recreation to the general
public, and provide the opportunity for many law enforcement agencies
to maintain necessary firearms skills efficiently and at little or no
cost. The continued existence and viability of sport shooting ranges
is impacted by burdensome retroactive regulation and lawsuits, thereby
potentially threatening the availability of low-cost firearms training
to some local law enforcement agencies, as well as hunter and firearms
safety training and recreation to the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who
owns or operates a sport shooting range in this state shall not be
subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution for a violation of
a law or ordinance relating to noise or noise pollution resulting from
the operation or use of the range if the range is in compliance with
all state and local government noise control laws or ordinances that
applied to the range and its operation on the date of initial operation
of the range, or on January 1, 1980, whichever date is later.
(b) A sport shooting range must be classified as a conforming use
if it operates in compliance with all state and local government noise
control laws or ordinances that were applicable to the range and its
operation on the date of initial operation of the range, or on January
1, 1980, whichever date is later.
(2)(a) A person who owns or operates a sport shooting range is not
subject to an action for nuisance on the basis of noise or noise
pollution, and a court of the state shall not enjoin the use or
operation of a range on the basis of noise or noise pollution, if: (i)
The range is in compliance with all state or local government noise
control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation
on the date of initial operation of the range, or on January 1, 1980,
whichever date is later; and (ii) there has not been a substantial
change in the nature of the use or operation of the range since the
plaintiff acquired title to the property that is adversely affected by
the use or operation of the range.
(b) This subsection does not prohibit or affect actions for
negligence or recklessness in the operation of the range or by a person
using the range.
(3) A person who participates in sport shooting at a sport shooting
range accepts the risks associated with the sport to the extent the
risks are obvious. Those risks include, but are not limited to,
injuries that may result from noise, discharge of a projectile or shot,
malfunction of sport shooting equipment not owned by the shooting
range, natural variations in terrain, surface or subsurface snow or ice
conditions, bare spots, rocks, trees, and other forms of natural growth
or debris.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this section does
not prohibit a local government from regulating the location and
construction of a sport shooting range after the effective date of this
section.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means a county, city, or town.
(b) "Person" means an individual, proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, club, or other legal entity.
(c) "Sport shooting range" or "range" means an area designed and
operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet,
trap, black powder, or any other similar sport shooting activities.

--- END ---