BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2010 c 236 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. During the 2011-2013 biennium,
funding shall continue to be phased-in each year until full statewide
implementation of all-day kindergarten is achieved in the 2017-18
school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day
kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in
subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's
percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as
long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally,
schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to
the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2)(a) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis,
schools must identify the skills, knowledge, and characteristics of
kindergarten students at the beginning of the school year in order to
support social-emotional, physical, and cognitive growth and
development of individual children; support early learning provider and
parent involvement; and inform instruction. Kindergarten teachers
shall administer the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills, as directed by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the department of early learning, and report the
results to the superintendent. The superintendent shall share the
results with the director of the department of early learning.
(b) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and
guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(c) Beginning in the 2012-13 school year, the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills shall be administered at
the beginning of the school year to all students enrolled in state-funded full-day kindergarten programs with the exception of students
who have been excused from participation by their parents or guardians.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Before implementing the Washington kindergarten inventory of
developing skills as provided under RCW 28A.150.315, the superintendent
of public instruction and the department of early learning must assure
that a fairness and bias review of the assessment process has been
conducted, including providing an opportunity for input from the
achievement gap oversight and accountability committee under RCW
28A.300.136 and from an additional diverse group of community
representatives, parents, and educators to be convened by the
superintendent and the director of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect September
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2011, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---