BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state ferry system is a critical component of the state's highway
system. The current system is financially unsustainable and the
legislature intends for this act to provide guidance for efficiently
managing scarce resources. The legislature recognizes that labor is
one of the main cost drivers for operating the system and recent
recommendations from the passenger vessel association confirm a similar
recognition from legislative studies conducted over the years. The
legislature also recognizes the unique skills required of ferry
employees to ensure safe and comfortable operations of the Washington
state ferry system for both themselves and their customers.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that ferry system management must
play a strong role in improving the system and controlling costs, and
this act is intended to provide the tools necessary for management to
be held accountable for the performance of the system. It is time to
take on the difficult task of controlling labor costs. This act
intends to reign in abuses that have been brought to light and to give
clear guidance so that the relationship between employees and
management can move from an adversarial one to one where the focus is
on improving efficiencies, customer service, and working cohesively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 31, 2011, the marine employees'
commission is merged with the public employment relations commission
and becomes an independent division within the public employment
relations commission. The office of financial management must oversee
the merger and ensure that the only costs transferred to the public
employment relations commission are direct costs associated with the
members of the marine employees' commission themselves.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.280 and 2010 c 283 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission within the
public employment relations commission. The governor shall appoint the
marine employees' commission with the consent of the senate. The
marine employees' commission shall consist of three members: One
member to be appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one
member from the public who has significant knowledge of maritime
affairs. The public member shall be chair of the marine employees'
commission. One of the original members shall be appointed for a term
of three years, one for a term of four years, and one for a term of
five years. Their successors shall be appointed for terms of five
years each, except that any person chosen to fill a vacancy shall be
appointed only for the unexpired term of the member whom he or she
succeeds. Marine employees' commission members are eligible for
reappointment. Any member of the marine employees' commission may be
removed by the governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty
or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause. Marine employees'
commission members are not eligible for state retirement under chapter
41.40 RCW by virtue of their service on the marine employees'
commission. Members of the marine employees' commission shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive
reimbursement for official travel and other expenses at the same rate
and on the same terms as provided for the transportation commission by
RCW 47.01.061. The payments shall be made from the Puget Sound ferry
operations account.
(2) The marine employees' commission shall: (a) Adjust all
complaints, grievances, and disputes between labor and management
arising out of the operation of the ferry system as provided in RCW
47.64.150; (b) provide for impasse mediation as required in RCW
47.64.210; and (c) perform those duties required in RCW 47.64.300.
(3)(a) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and disputes,
the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify the marine
employees' commission, which shall make careful inquiry into the cause
thereof and issue an order advising the ferry employee, or the ferry
employee organization representing him or her, and the department of
transportation, as to the decision of the marine employees' commission.
(b) The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes
at all hearings conducted by the marine employees' commission. The
orders and awards of the marine employees' commission are final and
binding upon any ferry employee or employees or their representative
affected thereby and upon the department.
(c) The marine employees' commission shall adopt rules of procedure
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(d) The marine employees' commission has the authority to subpoena
any ferry employee or employees, or their representatives, and any
member or representative of the department, and any witnesses. The
marine employees' commission may require attendance of witnesses and
the production of all pertinent records at any hearings held by the
marine employees' commission. The subpoenas of the marine employees'
commission are enforceable by order of any superior court in the state
of Washington for the county within which the proceeding may be
pending.
((The commission may hire staff as necessary, appoint consultants,
enter into contracts, and conduct studies as reasonably necessary to
carry out this chapter.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint transportation committee created in RCW 44.04.300 shall
periodically meet and consult with the governor to set parameters
around ferry employee collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The public employment relations commission
shall coordinate with the department of transportation to provide the
joint transportation committee with a report on the implementation of
this act by December 31, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.64.011 and 2006 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the governor and employee organizations to be the
exclusive representatives during collective bargaining negotiations.
(2) "Commission" means the marine employees' commission created
within the public employment relations commission in RCW 47.64.280 (as
recodified by this act).
(3) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(4) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) "Lockout" means the refusal of the employer to furnish work to
ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee organizations to
make concessions during collective bargaining, grievance, or other
labor relation negotiations. Curtailment of employment of ferry
employees due to lack of work resulting from a strike or work stoppage
shall not be considered a lockout.
(8) "Office of financial management" means the office as created in
RCW 43.41.050.
(9) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her willful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of
work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full,
faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the
purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any
other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work
under conditions which pose an endangerment to the health and safety of
ferry employees or the public, as determined by the master of the
vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.150 and 1983 c 15 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agreement with a ferry employee organization that is the
exclusive representative of ferry employees in an appropriate unit may
provide procedures for the consideration of ferry employee grievances
and of disputes over the interpretation and application of agreements.
Negotiated procedures may provide for binding arbitration of ferry
employee grievances and of disputes over the interpretation and
application of existing agreements. An arbitrator's decision on a
grievance shall not change or amend the terms, conditions, or
applications of the collective bargaining agreement. The procedures
shall provide for the invoking of arbitration only with the approval of
the employee organization. The costs of arbitrators shall be shared
equally by the parties.
Ferry system employees shall follow either the grievance procedures
provided in a collective bargaining agreement, or if no such procedures
are so provided, shall submit the grievances to the ((marine
employees')) commission as provided in RCW 47.64.280 (as recodified by
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 47.64.280 is recodified as a section in
chapter 41.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.64.080 (Employee seniority rights) and 1984 c 7 s 341 &
1961 c 13 s 47.64.080; and
(2) RCW 47.64.330 (Collective bargaining limitations) and 2006 c
164 s 15.

--- END ---