BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that advances in
technology have created opportunities for establishing additional
nuclear-generated power in Washington. Nuclear-generated power has the
potential to increase utilization of alternative energy, provide
additional power for converting Washington's motor vehicle fleet to
electric cars, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. Nuclear power also
provides additional baseload electric generation that can serve as
backup power for intermittent renewable resources, such as wind and
solar, while providing for innovation and deployment of new
technologies. The legislature also finds that the Tri-Cities area is
a recognized leader in nuclear research and innovation and provides a
ready pool of expertise the state can draw on to further advance the
development of nuclear-generated power. Construction of additional
nuclear-generated power will also create good family-wage construction
and operational jobs and provide opportunities for the next generation
of nuclear engineers, scientists, and researchers. The legislature
intends to expedite the regulatory processes and provide incentives for
establishing additional nuclear-generated power in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall commit to the following goals for construction
of nuclear energy facilities to provide additional in-state energy
production:
(a) By 2020, at least one nuclear energy facility;
(b) By 2030, at least three nuclear energy facilities; and
(c) By 2040, at least five nuclear energy facilities.
(2) By December 31st of each even-numbered year, the department
must report to the governor and the legislature on the progress of
meeting the goals established in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.075 and 2006 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person filing an application for certification of an energy
facility or an alternative energy resource facility pursuant to this
chapter may apply to the council for an expedited processing of such an
application. The application for expedited processing shall be
submitted to the council in such form and manner and accompanied by
such information as may be prescribed by council rule. The council may
grant an applicant expedited processing of an application for
certification upon finding that the environmental impact of the
proposed energy facility is not significant or will be mitigated to a
nonsignificant level under RCW 43.21C.031 and the project is found
under RCW 80.50.090(2) to be consistent and in compliance with city,
county, or regional land use plans or zoning ordinances. For a nuclear
power facility where the primary purpose is to produce and sell
electricity, the council must grant an applicant expedited processing
of an application for certification if the governor joins in the
request for an expedited process or the legislature adopts a joint
memorial supporting the request for an expedited process.
(2) Upon granting an applicant expedited processing of an
application for certification, the council shall not be required to:
(a) Commission an independent study to further measure the
consequences of the proposed energy facility or alternative energy
resource facility on the environment, notwithstanding the other
provisions of RCW 80.50.071; nor
(b) Hold an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, on the application.
(3) The council shall adopt rules governing the expedited
processing of an application for certification pursuant to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on
nuclear energy is established, with nine members as provided in this
subsection:
(i) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives; and
(iii) The governor shall appoint five members including:
(A) Three individuals with expertise in nuclear energy;
(B) One member representing executive branch agencies; and
(C) One member representing a joint operating agency organized
under chapter 43.52 RCW.
(b) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives jointly shall appoint the cochairs of the task force
from among the legislative members of the task force. The cochairs
shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. A steering
committee consisting of the legislative members of the task force shall
advise the cochairs on the meetings and other activities of the task
force.
(2) The task force shall study the feasibility of pursuing
additional nuclear-generated power in Washington including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) An examination of advanced nuclear power reactors including,
but not limited to, generations III, IV, and small modular nuclear
technologies;
(b) A review of the advanced nuclear technologies that are in
operation in other countries;
(c) An examination of the methods by which spent fuel may be
recycled, converted, or disposed of;
(d) A review of the safety issues associated with operating and
maintaining advanced nuclear power reactors;
(e) The estimated cost per kilowatt hour of nuclear energy
generated by an advanced nuclear power reactor as compared to other
lower carbon energy resources, such as wind, solar, and hydroelectric;
(f) An examination of the licensing, permitting, or other
regulatory costs associated with constructing advanced nuclear power
reactors in the state and methods to expedite the licensing,
permitting, and regulatory compliance processes;
(g) A review of potential federal incentives that may be available
to support advanced nuclear power reactor projects in Washington;
(h) A review of integrating additional nuclear generation into the
electric grid;
(i) Maximizing either public or private, or both, investment in
additional nuclear generation to reduce rate payer risk; and
(j) Quantification of greenhouse gas reductions resulting from
additional nuclear generation.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research. Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the task force may contract for additional staff with
specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry
out the mandates of this study.
(4) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2011.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2012.

--- END ---