BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.200 and 2010 c 161 s 611 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature recognizes that the special license plate
review board established in RCW 46.16.705 reviews and approves
applications for special license plate series.
(2))) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the
((special license plate review board)) department:
(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates
unless otherwise specified;
(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the
department;
(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW; and
(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the ((special
license plate review board)) department.
(((3) The special license plate review board approves, and)) (2)
The department approves and shall issue((,)) the following special
license plates:

LICENSE PLATE DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

Armed forces collection Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty
military personnel, reservists, and members of the national
guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a
symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces
to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard,
and national guard.

Endangered wildlife Displays a symbol or artwork, approved by the special
license plate review board and the legislature.

Gonzaga University alumni association Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak Recognizes an organization that supports programs that
provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

In God we trust Displays the words "In God We Trust."

Keep kids safe Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in
the line of duty.

Professional firefighters and paramedics Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who
are members of the Washington state council of
firefighters.

Share the road Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety
and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

Washington lighthouses Recognizes an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental
education programs.

Washington state parks Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations
of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural,
cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and
supports priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wildlife collection Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets Recognizes an organization that assists local member
agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control
agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on
Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(((4))) (3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional
firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof
eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the
Washington state council of firefighters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"In God We Trust license plates" means license plates issued under
RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork with the words "In God
We Trust."

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.220 and 2010 c 161 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW,
the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(b) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(c) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(d) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(e) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(f) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(g) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(h) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(j) In God we trust $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(k) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((k))) (l) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((l))) (m) Military affiliate
radio system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(((m))) (n) Professional
firefighters and
paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((n))) (o) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(((o))) (p) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((p))) (q) Ski and ride
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((q))) (r) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(((r))) (s) Washington
lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((s))) (t) Washington state
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((t))) (u) Washington's
national parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((u))) (v) Washington's
wildlife collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((v))) (w) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((w))) (x) Wild on
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.425 and 2010 c 161 s 810 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220 ((that were approved by the special license plate review
board under RCW 46.18.200));
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate
type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces RCW 43.60A.140 N/A

Endangered wildlife RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife
program activities

In God we trust RCW 43.60A.215 As specified in RCW 43.60A.215

Keep kids safe RCW 43.121.100 As specified in RCW 43.121.050

Washington state parks RCW 79A.05.059 Provide public educational opportunities
and enhancement of Washington state
parks

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 77.12.170 Only for the department of fish and
wildlife's game species management
activities

Wild on Washington RCW 77.12.170 Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as
defined in RCW 77.32.560

Sec. 5 RCW 43.60A.215 and 2010 c 90 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The disabled veterans assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the
authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for
the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required to permit the expenditure of the funds.
(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds
generated by voluntary donations under RCW 43.60A.210 and the issuance
of "In God We Trust" license plates under RCW 46.18.200.
(3) All receipts from (a) voluntary donations under RCW 43.60A.210
and (b) except as provided in RCW 46.68.425(2), the sale of "In God We
Trust" license plates must be deposited into the account.
(4) All moneys deposited into the account must be used by the
department for activities that benefit veterans including, but not
limited to, providing programs and services that assist veterans with
the procurement of durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing
equipment, emergency home or vehicle repair, emergency food or
emergency shelter, or service animals. The first priority for
assistance provided through the account must be given to veterans who
are experiencing a financial hardship and do not qualify for other
federal or state veterans programs and services. Funds from the
account may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the
department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same
meaning as in RCW 41.04.005 and 41.04.007, and also means an actively
serving member of the national guard or reserves, or is active duty
military personnel.

--- END ---