BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the ferry system
is an important driver of the Washington state economy, supporting jobs
and businesses in communities around Puget Sound. The ferry system is
also an integral part of the state highway system and, as such,
benefits all citizens by connecting communities and markets around the
state.
The legislature further finds that funding for the ferry system
remains insufficient to provide adequate service in support of this
economic engine. Further, new funding sources will only be acceptable
when the state can show that the ferry system manages its costs
prudently, while delivering reliable, safe, and quality cross-sound
transportation services.
The legislature finds that the ferry system is subject to the
statewide transportation system policy goals established in RCW
47.04.280 and yet performance criteria are not fully used by management
to improve operations or demonstrate to the public that ferry service
is being provided in the most cost-effective manner.
Therefore, the legislature intends to: Strengthen performance
incentives for Washington state ferries managers; increase the
accountability and transparency of ferry management and operations;
improve service to ferry riders; and realize cost savings in the ferry
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:
(a) "Management" means a Washington management services employee or
exempt employee at the Washington state ferries.
(b) "Performance criteria" means measurable standards to be used by
the department to evaluate the sufficiency of the services being
provided to ferry riders.
(c) "Performance report" means a report that summarizes ferry
system performance using the performance criteria under subsection (2)
of this section, identifies whether performance targets were achieved,
and includes a management discussion of the results.
(2) Performance criteria may include, but not be limited to:
(a) Safety performance as measured by passenger injuries per one
million passenger miles and by injuries per ten thousand revenue
service hours that are recordable by standards of the federal
occupational safety and health administration and related to standard
operating procedures;
(b) Service effectiveness measures including, but not limited to,
passenger satisfaction of interactions with ferry employees,
cleanliness and comfort of vessels and terminals, and satisfactory
response to requests for assistance. Passenger satisfaction must be
measured by an evaluation that is created by a contracted market
research company and conducted by the Washington state transportation
commission as part of the ferry riders' opinion group survey. The
Washington state transportation commission shall, to the extent
possible, integrate the passenger satisfaction evaluation into the
ferry user data survey described in RCW 47.60.286;
(c) On-time performance by route within ten minutes of published
sailing time. This measurement must exclude delays that are authorized
or are outside of the control of the department including, but not
limited to, medical issues, weather or tidal conditions, and security
or other safety issues;
(d) Cost containment measures including, but not limited to,
operating cost per passenger mile, operating cost per revenue service
mile, discretionary overtime as a percentage of straight time, and
gallons of fuel consumed per revenue service mile;
(e) Maintenance and capital program effectiveness measures
including, but not limited to: Project delivery rate as measured by
the number of projects completed on time and within the omnibus
transportation appropriations act; vessel and terminal design and
engineering costs as measured by a percentage of the total capital
program, including measurement of the ongoing operating and maintenance
costs; and total vessel out-of-service time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Performance targets must be established by an ad hoc committee
with members from and designated by the office of the governor. By
July 1, 2011, the ad hoc committee shall present the performance
targets to the representatives of the legislative transportation
committees and the joint transportation committee for review and
approval.
(2) By October 1, 2011, the department shall complete a performance
report that provides a baseline assessment of current performance using
final 2009-2011 data. This report must be reviewed by the office of
financial management and be provided to the legislative transportation
committees by November 1, 2011.
(3) By October 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, the department
shall complete a performance report for the prior fiscal year. This
report must be reviewed by the office of financial management, and the
findings of the report must be incorporated into the governor's
proposed biennial transportation budget. The office of financial
management shall transmit a copy of the reviewed performance report to
the legislature with the governor's proposed biennial transportation
budget.
(4)(a) By June 30, 2013, the Washington state ferries must meet or
exceed the target performance level for seventy-five percent of the
performance criteria under section 2(2) of this act. If the department
does not meet or exceed the target performance level for seventy-five
percent of the performance criteria, the department must competitively
contract out ferry system management functions to a private management
services firm.
(b) The invitation for bid process for the contract may include a
preliminary request for qualifications to inform the most effective way
to contract for management functions.
(c) Consistent with RCW 41.06.142(3), the contract is not subject
to requirements for agencies purchasing services that have been
customarily and historically provided by state employees.
(d) The contract must be a fixed cost contract that requires the
private management services firm to meet or exceed the target
performance level for seventy-five percent of the performance criteria
under section 2(2) of this act. Based on this performance criteria,
the contract must provide for incentive or retained payment
arrangements as a means of ensuring satisfactory performance of the
contract and improved performance of the ferry system over time.
(e) The contract must include a requirement that the firm retain
existing and future collective bargaining agreements as negotiated
between the state and the employees' labor representatives. The
private management services firm may rehire Washington management
services employees or exempt employees at the Washington state ferries.
(f) The contract must be for a two-year period. If the private
management services firm meets or exceeds the performance criteria
under section 2(2) of this act, the contract is renewable for an
additional two years for a maximum of ten years. After ten years, the
department shall implement an invitation for bid process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may not allow for department of
transportation Washington management services managers or exempt
management services managers to belong to the same bargaining unit
representing employees whom the managers supervise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---