BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state legislature finds that
for cancer patients, there is an inequity in how much they have to pay
toward the cost of a self-administered oral medication and how much
they have to pay for an intravenous product that is administered in a
physician's office or clinic. The legislature further finds that when
these inequities exist, patients' access to medically necessary,
appropriate treatment is often unfairly restricted. The legislature
also acknowledges that self-administered chemotherapy is the only
treatment for some types of cancer where there is no intravenous
alternative. The legislature declares that in order to reduce the out-of-pocket costs for cancer patients whose diagnosis requires treatment
through self-administered anticancer medication, the cost-sharing
responsibilities for these patients must be on a basis at least
comparable to those of patients receiving intravenously administered
anticancer medication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter, including those subject to the provision
of Title 48 RCW, and is issued or renewed beginning January 1, 2012,
and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must provide
coverage for prescribed, self-administered anticancer medication that
is used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis at
least comparable to cancer chemotherapy medications administered by a
health care provider or facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005 (15) and
(16).
(2) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health
plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls
in approving coverage for any chemotherapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2012,
that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must provide
coverage for prescribed, self-administered anticancer medication that
is used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis at
least comparable to cancer chemotherapy medications administered by a
health care provider or facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005 (15) and
(16).
(2) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health
plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls
in approving coverage for any chemotherapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2012,
that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must provide
coverage for prescribed, self-administered anticancer medication that
is used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis at
least comparable to cancer chemotherapy medications administered by a
health care provider or facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005 (15) and
(16).
(2) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health
plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls
in approving coverage for any chemotherapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2012,
that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must provide
coverage for prescribed, self-administered anticancer medication that
is used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis at
least comparable to cancer chemotherapy medications administered by a
health care provider or facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005 (15) and
(16).
(2) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health
plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls
in approving coverage for any chemotherapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2012,
that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must provide
coverage for prescribed, self-administered anticancer medication that
is used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis at
least comparable to cancer chemotherapy medications administered by a
health care provider or facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005 (15) and
(16).
(2) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit a health
plan from administering a formulary or preferred drug list, requiring
prior authorization, or imposing other appropriate utilization controls
in approving coverage for any chemotherapy.

--- END ---