BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
has a long history of providing legal, financial, and political support
for a wide range of innovative programs and initiatives and that these
can and do operate successfully in public schools through the currently
authorized governance structure of locally elected boards of directors
of school districts.
(2) Examples of innovation schools can be found all across the
state including, but not limited to:
(a) The Vancouver school of arts and academics that offers students
beginning in sixth grade the opportunity to immerse themselves in the
full range of the arts, including dance, music, theater, literary arts,
visual arts, and moving image arts, as well as all levels of core
academic courses;
(b) Thornton Creek elementary school in Seattle, an award-winning
parent-initiated learning option based on the expeditionary learning
outward bound model;
(c) The technology access foundation academy, a unique public-private partnership with the Federal Way school district that offers a
rigorous and relevant curriculum through project-based learning, full
integration of technology, and a small learning community intended to
provide middle and high school students the opportunity for success in
school and college;
(d) Talbot Hill elementary school in Renton, where students
participate in a microsociety program that includes selecting a
government, conducting business and encouraging entrepreneurialism, and
providing community services such as banking, newspaper, post office,
and courts;
(e) The Tacoma school of the arts, where sophomores through seniors
form a cohesive, full-time learning community to study the full range
of humanities, mathematics, science, and language as well as build a
broad foundation in all forms of the arts, culminating with an in-depth
senior arts project that showcases each student's talent and interest;
(f) The SPRINT program at Shaw middle school in Spokane, an
alternative learning community for students in seventh and eighth grade
proposed and created by a group of parents who wish to be very actively
involved in their students' education;
(g) Puesta del sol elementary school in Bellevue, offering a
diverse multicultural program and Spanish language immersion beginning
in kindergarten;
(h) The Washington national guard youth challenge program operated
in collaboration with the Bremerton school district that offers high-risk youth a rigorous and structured residential program that builds
students' academic, social, and emotional skills, and physical fitness
while providing up to one year of high school credits toward
graduation;
(i) The Lincoln center program at Lincoln high school in Tacoma, an
extended day program that has virtually eliminated the academic
achievement gap and significantly boosted attendance and test scores
for racially diverse, low-income, and highly mobile students;
(j) Delta high school, a science, technology, engineering, and
math-focused school option for students in the Tri-Cities operating in
cooperation with three school districts, the regional skill center,
local colleges and universities, and the business community; and
(k) Aviation high school in the Highline school district, offering
a project-based curriculum and learning environment centered on an
aviation and aeronautics theme with strong business and community
support.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage additional
innovation schools by disseminating information about current models
and recognizing the effort and commitment that goes into their creation
and operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that innovation schools accomplish the
following objectives:
(a) Provide students and parents with a diverse array of
educational options;
(b) Promote active and meaningful parent and community involvement
and partnership with local schools;
(c) Serve as laboratories for educational experimentation and
innovation;
(d) Respond and adapt to different styles, approaches, and
objectives of learning;
(e) Hold students and educators to high expectations and standards;
and
(f) Encourage and facilitate bold, creative, and innovative
educational ideas.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop basic criteria and a streamlined review process for identifying
Washington innovation schools. Any public school may be nominated by
a community, organization, school district, or through self-nomination
to be designated as a Washington innovation school. If the office of
the superintendent of public instruction finds that the school meets
the criteria, the school shall receive a designation as a Washington
innovation school. Within available funds, the office shall develop a
logo, certificate, and other recognition strategies to encourage and
highlight the accomplishments of innovation schools.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a page on the office web site to highlight examples of
Washington innovation schools that includes links to research
literature and national best practices, as well as summary information
and links to the web sites of Washington innovation schools. The
office is encouraged to offer an educational administrator intern the
opportunity to create the web page as a project toward completion of
his or her administrator certificate. The office shall publicize the
Washington innovation school designation and encourage schools,
communities, and school districts to access the web site and create
additional models of innovation.

--- END ---