BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the council of presidents, the four-year institutions of
higher education, the private independent higher education
institutions, and the private career schools shall collaborate to carry
out the following goals:
(a) Increase the number of students who receive academic credit for
prior learning and the number of students who receive credit for prior
learning that counts towards their major or towards earning their
degree, certificate, or credential, while ensuring that credit is
awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(b) Increase the number and type of academic credits accepted for
prior learning in institutions of higher education, while ensuring that
credit is awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(c) Develop transparent policies and practices in awarding academic
credit for prior learning;
(d) Improve prior learning assessment practices across the
institutions of higher education;
(e) Create tools to develop faculty and staff knowledge and
expertise in awarding credit for prior learning and to share exemplary
policies and practices among institutions of higher education;
(f) Develop articulation agreements when patterns of credit for
prior learning are identified for particular programs and pathways; and
(g) Develop outcome measures to track progress on the goals
outlined in this section.
(2) The board shall convene the academic credit for prior learning
work group.
(a) The work group must include the following members in addition
to representation from the board:
(i) The state board for community and technical colleges;
(ii) The workforce training and education coordinating board;
(iii) The council of presidents;
(iv) Representatives from Washington institutions of higher
education;
(v) Representatives from faculty of two and four-year institutions
of higher education;
(vi) Representatives from private career schools; and
(vii) Representatives from business and labor.
(b) The purpose of the work group is to coordinate and implement
the goals in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The board shall report progress on the goals and outcome
measures annually by December 31st. All entities listed in subsection
(2)(a) of this section shall collaborate with the board to provide
information for tracking purposes.
(4) The office of financial management shall work with the board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the four-year
institutions of higher education to track the number of students
receiving academic credit for prior learning and the type of credit
awarded at institutions of higher education. This information shall be
included among the outcomes tracked in RCW 43.41.400(2)(f) beginning in
2013.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "prior learning" means the
knowledge and skills gained through work and life experience; through
military training and experience; and through formal and informal
education and training from in-state and out-of-state institutions
including foreign institutions.

--- END ---