BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each contractor,
provider, or vendor must submit and receive transactions with the
authority electronically in the manner and format prescribed in this
section and by the authority. For purpose of this section,
"transactions" include, but are not limited to, authorization, billing,
or receipt of payment for state purchased health care services, as
defined in RCW 41.05.011, that are administered by the authority.
(2) Contracts between the authority and health carriers, as defined
in RCW 48.43.005, or third-party administrators for the provision or
administration of health care services shall include a provision
requiring the carrier or third-party administrator to condition payment
for health care services upon their network health care providers
billing and receiving payment for services electronically. This
requirement must be implemented no later than July 2012, or the
effective date of contracts executed under any upcoming contract
procurement.
(3) The authority shall waive the requirements of this section upon
a written request that demonstrates one or more of the following:
(a) The health care provider or vendor delivers timely access to
care or services for which there is a critical need in the geographic
area served by the provider or vendor;
(b) The health care provider or vendor has service interruptions or
inadequate internet service in their community and has low claim
volume; or
(c) The health care provider or vendor is a newly contracted
provider or vendor and needs sufficient time to be able to comply with
the requirements of this section.
(4) Transactions that are not submitted electronically in the
manner and format prescribed by the authority may be returned without
processing.
(5) The authority must adopt any rules it deems necessary to
implement the provisions of this section, including an administrative
processing fee for any charge that is not submitted electronically in
the manner and format specified by the authority.
(6) The authority must work in good faith with contractors,
providers, and vendors that have not obtained a waiver to allow each
sufficient time to transition to the electronic submissions considering
their circumstances including size, transaction volume, and available
financial and labor resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each contractor,
provider, or vendor must submit and receive transactions with the
department electronically in the manner and format prescribed in this
section and by the department. For purpose of this section,
"transactions" include, but are not limited to, authorization, billing,
or receipt of payment for state purchased health care services, as
defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(2) The department shall implement the requirements under this
section in phases as follows:
(a) For transactions processed through the state's medicaid
management information system, the department shall require: (i)
Institutional and professional claims to be submitted and paid
electronically by January 2012; (ii) dental claims to be submitted and
paid electronically by July 2012; and (iii) service authorizations to
be submitted electronically by January 2013; and
(b) Contracts between the authority and health carriers, as defined
in RCW 48.43.005, or third-party administrators for the provision or
administration of health care services shall include a provision
requiring the carrier or third-party administrator to condition payment
for health care services upon their network health care providers
billing and receiving payment for services electronically. This
requirement must be implemented no later than July 2012, or the
effective date of contracts executed under any upcoming contract
procurement.
(3) The department shall waive the requirements of this section
upon a written request that demonstrates one or more of the following
circumstances:
(a) The health care provider or vendor delivers timely access to
care or services for which there is a critical need in the geographic
area served by the provider or vendor;
(b) The health care provider or vendor has service interruptions or
inadequate internet service in their community and who has low claim
volume; or
(c) The health care provider or vendor is a newly contracted
provider or vendor and needs sufficient time to be able to comply with
the requirements of this section.
(4) Transactions that are not submitted electronically in the
manner and format prescribed by the department may be returned without
processing.
(5) The department must adopt any rules it deems necessary to
implement the provisions of this section, including an administrative
processing fee for any charge that is not submitted electronically in
the manner and format specified by the department.
(6) The department shall work in good faith with contractors,
providers, and vendors that have not obtained waivers to allow each
sufficient time to transition to the electronic submissions considering
their circumstances including size, transaction volume, and available
financial and labor resources.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.04.030 and 2004 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and
efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician
assistants governed by the provisions of chapters 18.57A and 18.71A
RCW, acting under a supervising physician, including chiropractic care,
and including care provided by licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioners, to workers injured during the course of their employment
at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without
discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the
various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of
industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time,
establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms,
rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and
treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the
department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor
are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage
decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker
particular health care services and providers where specialized
treatment is indicated or where cost effective payment levels or rates
are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
department may enter into contracts for goods and services including,
but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide
access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.
(2) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons,
establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be
necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to
be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist,
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, physicians' assistants
as defined in chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a
supervising physician or other agency or person rendering services to
injured workers. The department shall coordinate with other state
purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and
uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into
account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No
service covered under this title, including services provided to
injured workers, whether aliens or other injured workers, who are not
residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services,
shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified
in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall
be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule,
exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as
used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a
"rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).
(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a
record of the commencement of every disability and the termination
thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of
injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the
adopted rules, ((regulations,)) established fee schedules, and
practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof
incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or
the rules((, regulations,)) or the established fee schedules and rules
((and regulations)) adopted under it.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each medical
or vocational provider must submit and receive transactions with the
department electronically in the manner and format prescribed by the
department. For the purposes of this section, "transactions" include,
but are not limited to, billing, receipt of payments and remittance
advice documents, requests for authorization of medical services, and
applications to be a provider who treats injured workers.
(b) The department shall exempt a provider from the requirements of
this section upon a request that demonstrates one or more of the
following circumstances:
(i) For initial transactions for new providers during their first
three months of participation;
(ii) There is a need to provide access to care when other
appropriate options are unavailable or would cause substantial delays;
(iii) The provider engages in minimal transactions with the
department; and
(iv) The provider's community has inadequate internet service or
service interruptions.
(c) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section, including the criteria for any exemptions. The rules must
implement requirements for authorization, billing, payment, and
remittance advice documents in the following phases:
(i) By July 1, 2012, medical and vocational providers must be
required to bill the department electronically;
(ii) By January 1, 2014, medical and vocational providers must be
required to receive payments and remittance advice documents
electronically; and
(iii) By January 1, 2015, medical providers must be required to
submit authorization requests electronically for services requiring
preauthorization.
(iv) The department must work in good faith with contractors,
providers, and vendors that have not obtained waivers to allow each
sufficient time to transition to the electronic submissions considering
their circumstances including size, transaction volume, and available
financial and labor resources.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.68.030 and 2009 c 479 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the director to establish and
administer a program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts
within the terms and limitations of this chapter. In so doing, the
director shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules and
regulations necessary to the administration of this chapter, and the
provisions contained in chapter 51.04 RCW, including but not limited to
RCW 51.04.020, 51.04.030, 51.04.040, 51.04.050 and 51.04.100 as now or
hereafter amended, shall apply where appropriate in keeping with the
intent of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to
appropriation, expend federal funds under Public Law 98-473 and any
other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime
victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in
the state general fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized
by applicable federal law.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, each medical
provider must submit and receive transactions with the department
electronically in the manner and format prescribed by the department.
For the purposes of this section, "transactions" include, but are not
limited to, billing, receipt of payments and remittance advice
documents, and applications to be a provider who treats crime victims.
(b) The department shall exempt a provider from the requirements of
this section upon a written request that demonstrates one or more of
the following circumstances:
(i) For initial transactions for new providers during their first
three months of participation;
(ii) There is a need to provide access to care when other
appropriate options are unavailable or would cause substantial delays;
(iii) The provider engages in minimal transactions with the
department; and
(iv) The provider's community has inadequate internet service or
service interruptions.
(c) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section, including the criteria for any exemptions. The rules must
implement requirements for authorization, billing, payment, and
remittance advice documents in the following phases:
(i) By July 1, 2012, medical providers must be required to bill the
department electronically; and
(ii) By January 1, 2014, medical providers must be required to
receive payments and remittance advice documents electronically.
(iii) The department shall work in good faith with contractors,
providers, and vendors that have not obtained waivers to allow each
sufficient time to transition to the electronic submissions considering
their circumstances including size, transaction volume, and available
financial and labor resources.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.52.050 and 2008 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award,
it shall promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other
person affected thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, ((which shall be
addressed to such person at his or her last known address as shown by
the records of the department)) or if the worker, beneficiary,
employer, or other person affected thereby chooses, the department may
send correspondence and other legal notices by secure electronic means.
Correspondence and notices must be addressed to such a person at his or
her last known postal or electronic address as shown by the records of
the department. Correspondence and notices sent electronically are
considered received on the date sent by the department. The copy, in
case the same is a final order, decision, or award, shall bear on the
same side of the same page on which is found the amount of the award,
a statement, set in black faced type of at least ten point body or
size, that such final order, decision, or award shall become final
within sixty days from the date the order is communicated to the
parties unless a written request for reconsideration is filed with the
department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with
the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia. However, a
department order or decision making demand, whether with or without
penalty, for repayment of sums paid to a provider of medical, dental,
vocational, or other health services rendered to an industrially
injured worker, shall state that such order or decision shall become
final within twenty days from the date the order or decision is
communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries,
Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance
appeals, Olympia.
(2)(a) Whenever the department has taken any action or made any
decision relating to any phase of the administration of this title the
worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may
request reconsideration of the department, or may appeal to the board.
In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the
relief sought in such appeal.
(b) An order by the department awarding benefits shall become
effective and benefits due on the date issued. Subject to (b)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection, if the department order is appealed the order
shall not be stayed pending a final decision on the merits unless
ordered by the board. Upon issuance of the order granting the appeal,
the board will provide the worker with notice concerning the potential
of an overpayment of benefits paid pending the outcome of the appeal
and the requirements for interest on unpaid benefits pursuant to RCW
51.52.135. A worker may request that benefits cease pending appeal at
any time following the employer's motion for stay or the board's order
granting appeal. The request must be submitted in writing to the
employer, the board, and the department. Any employer may move for a
stay of the order on appeal, in whole or in part. The motion must be
filed within fifteen days of the order granting appeal. The board
shall conduct an expedited review of the claim file provided by the
department as it existed on the date of the department order. The
board shall issue a final decision within twenty-five days of the
filing of the motion for stay or the order granting appeal, whichever
is later. The board's final decision may be appealed to superior court
in accordance with RCW 51.52.110. The board shall grant a motion to
stay if the moving party demonstrates that it is more likely than not
to prevail on the facts as they existed at the time of the order on
appeal. The board shall not consider the likelihood of recoupment of
benefits as a basis to grant or deny a motion to stay. If a
self-insured employer prevails on the merits, any benefits paid may be
recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.
(i) If upon reconsideration requested by a worker or medical
provider, the department has ordered an increase in a permanent partial
disability award from the amount reflected in an earlier order, the
award reflected in the earlier order shall not be stayed pending a
final decision on the merits. However, the increase is stayed without
further action by the board pending a final decision on the merits.
(ii) If any party appeals an order establishing a worker's wages or
the compensation rate at which a worker will be paid temporary or
permanent total disability or loss of earning power benefits, the
worker shall receive payment pending a final decision on the merits
based on the following:
(A) When the employer is self-insured, the wage calculation or
compensation rate the employer most recently submitted to the
department; or
(B) When the employer is insured through the state fund, the
highest wage amount or compensation rate uncontested by the parties.
Payment of benefits or consideration of wages at a rate that is
higher than that specified in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection is
stayed without further action by the board pending a final decision on
the merits.
(c) In an appeal from an order of the department that alleges
willful misrepresentation, the department or self-insured employer
shall initially introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any such
person aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may thereafter
appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any action taken by an agency to implement
the provisions of this act must be accomplished within existing
resources.

--- END ---