BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A student who fulfills the requirements specified in subsection
(3) of this section toward completion of an international baccalaureate
diploma programme is considered to have satisfied state minimum
requirements for graduation from a public high school, except that:
(a) The provisions of RCW 28A.655.061 regarding the certificate of
academic achievement or RCW 28A.155.045 regarding the certificate of
individual achievement apply to students under this section; and
(b) The provisions of RCW 28A.230.170 regarding study of the United
States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution apply to
students under this section.
(2) School districts may require students under this section to
complete local graduation requirements that are in addition to state
minimum requirements before issuing a high school diploma under RCW
28A.230.120. However, school districts are encouraged to waive local
requirements as necessary to encourage students to pursue an
international baccalaureate diploma.
(3) To receive a high school diploma under this section, a student
must complete and pass all required international baccalaureate diploma
programme courses as scored at the local level; pass all internal
assessments as scored at the local level; successfully complete all
required projects and products as scored at the local level; and
complete the final examinations administered by the international
baccalaureate organization in each of the required subjects under the
diploma programme.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2009 c 548 s 111 and 2009 c 223 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in section 1 of this act and except those equivalencies
established by local high schools or school districts under RCW
28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that
a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a
lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.170 and 2006 c 263 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The study of the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a condition
prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high schools of
this state. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide by
rule for the implementation of this section. The superintendent of
public instruction may adopt a rule permitting students who meet the
criteria in section 1 of this act to meet the prerequisite through
noncredit-based study.

--- END ---