BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall convene a work group including
representatives from each of the institutions of higher education to
establish a single set of common course numbers and common course
descriptions for all common lower division courses at all institutions
of higher education. Lower division courses are those first and second
year courses numbered between ninety-nine and three hundred, including
internships, cooperative learning, field experiences, individual
research, special seminars, and independent studies.
(2) A course shall be identified as common between institutions of
higher education if the course descriptions in the official college
course catalogs are similar enough to be accepted as equivalent for
transfer purposes to meet degree requirements. Once identified as
common, a course must have the same course number and be accepted as
equivalent at each institution.
(3) By August 2013, each institution of higher education shall
formally adopt the common course numbers and specifically identify them
in all course catalogs and publications. Unique courses with no
equivalent at another institution or at some but not all institutions
must have common course numbers at all institutions that do have
equivalent courses and the limitations shall be noted in all course
catalogs and publications.

--- END ---