BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.257 and 1991 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a landlord uses a tenant screening service, then the
landlord may only charge for the costs incurred for using the tenant
screening service under this section. If a landlord conducts his or
her own screening of tenants, then the landlord may charge his or her
actual costs in obtaining the background information, but the amount
may not exceed the customary costs charged by a screening service in
the general area. The landlord's actual costs include costs incurred
for long distance phone calls and for time spent calling landlords,
employers, and financial institutions.
(2) A landlord may not charge a prospective tenant for the cost of
obtaining background information or using a tenant screening service
under this section unless the landlord first notifies the prospective
tenant in writing of what a tenant screening entails, the prospective
tenant's rights to dispute the accuracy of information provided by the
tenant screening service or provided by the entities listed on the
tenant application who will be contacted for information concerning the
tenant, and the name and address of the tenant screening service used
by the landlord.
(3) ((Nothing in this section requires a landlord to disclose
information to a prospective tenant that was obtained from a tenant
screening service or from entities listed on the tenant application
which is not required under the federal fair credit reporting act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(4))) A landlord must provide a prospective tenant with all of the
screening criteria that may be used to determine tenancy before
charging the prospective tenant any fee for using a tenant screening
service or obtaining background information used in the screening
process. Screening criteria may include:
(a) Whether the information obtained could not be verified or was
different than what was provided by the prospective tenant;
(b) Whether the information obtained was inadequate because the
prospective tenant did not provide all of the required information;
(c) Employment history;
(d) Rental history;
(e) Income standards or affordability tests;
(f) Credit history;
(g) Criminal history;
(h) Information in public records; or
(i) Any other factor, unless prohibited by law, explained in
writing to the prospective tenant.
(4)(a) A landlord must provide any prospective tenant who is denied
housing with a notice that informs the prospective tenant of the reason
or reasons that the prospective tenant's application was denied.
(b) The landlord must specify one or more of the screening criteria
provided to the prospective tenant under subsection (3) of this section
as a basis for the denial.
(c) The landlord must also inform the prospective tenant of the
source of the information used as the basis for denial of the
application and contact information for that source, unless the source
was provided by the prospective tenant. Categories of sources include:
(i) A consumer reporting agency;
(ii) A tenant screening service;
(iii) Public records searched by the landlord;
(iv) Persons or businesses provided by the prospective tenant in
the application and contacted by the landlord; and
(v) Other sources as specified by the landlord in the notice.
(5) Any landlord who violates this section may be liable to the
prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars.
The prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
A tenant screening service shall not include in a tenant screening
report provided to a landlord a qualified victim protection record
pertaining to the prospective tenant. For the purposes of this
section, "qualified victim protection record" means a record or
information concerning any judicial or administrative proceeding in
which the person about whom the record or information pertains sought
to obtain any no-contact order or order of protection from domestic
violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or other violent crime,
including any petition or proceeding for a no-contact order or
protection order under chapter 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26, or
26.50 RCW.

--- END ---