BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.37.015 and 1987 c 202 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person shall be held to answer in any court for an alleged
crime or offense, unless upon an information filed by the prosecuting
attorney, or upon an indictment by a grand jury, except in cases of
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor before a district or municipal judge,
or before a court martial, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Violations of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) shall be held to answer
in any court only upon an information filed by the prosecuting
attorney.

--- END ---