BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.015 and 1999 c 319 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a parent enrolls a child who is six or seven years of age in
a public school, the child is required to attend and that parent has
the responsibility to ensure the child attends for the full time that
school is in session. An exception shall be made to this requirement
for children whose parents formally remove them from enrollment if the
child is less than eight years old and a petition has not been filed
against the parent under subsection (3) of this section. The
requirement to attend school under this subsection does not apply to a
child enrolled in a public school part-time for the purpose of
receiving ancillary services. A child required to attend school under
this subsection may be temporarily excused upon the request of his or
her parent for purposes agreed upon by the school district and parent.
(2) If a six or seven year-old child is required to attend public
school under subsection (1) of this section and that child has
unexcused absences, the public school in which the child is enrolled
shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year;
(b) Request a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps ((shall)) may include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's
school program or school or course assignment, providing more
individualized or remedial instruction, offering assistance in
enrolling the child in available alternative schools or programs, or
assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that may
help eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from
school.
(3) If a child required to attend public school under subsection
(1) of this section has seven unexcused absences in a month or ten
unexcused absences in a school year, the school district ((shall)) may
file a petition for civil action as provided in RCW 28A.225.035 against
the parent of the child.
(4) This section does not require a six or seven year old child to
enroll in a public or private school or to receive home-based
instruction. This section only applies to six or seven year old
children whose parents enroll them full time in public school and do
not formally remove them from enrollment as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the
potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the
custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English, the
preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent;
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps ((shall)) may include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's
school program or school or course assignment, providing more
individualized or remedial instruction, providing appropriate
vocational courses or work experience, referring the child to a
community truancy board, if available, requiring the child to attend an
alternative school or program, or assisting the parent or child to
obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the
cause or causes for the absence from school. If the child's parent
does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference may be
conducted with the student and school official. However, the parent
shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the
child's absence.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that
a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during
the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include
the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the
previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW 28A.225.030,
and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.025 and 2009 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means
a board composed of members of the local community in which the child
attends school. Juvenile courts may establish and operate community
truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree,
a school district may establish and operate a community truancy board
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Juvenile courts may
create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist
or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or
other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.
Duties of a community truancy board shall include, but not be limited
to, recommending methods for improving school attendance such as
assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services that
might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or suggesting
to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an
alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a
dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational
program.
(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy
boards, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function, is
the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods of notice
and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps to eliminate or
reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the
child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and
support the development and expansion of community truancy boards and
other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school
attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by
the court. ((Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a
district from the obligation of filing a petition within the
requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).))

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
and ((if the actions taken by a)) the school district takes actions
under RCW 28A.225.020 that are not successful in substantially reducing
an enrolled student's absences from public school, not later than the
seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during the
current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence
during the current school year the school district ((shall)) may file
a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the
juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the
parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the child. Except
as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed
with the petition.
(2) The district ((shall not later than)) may, after the fifth
unexcused absence in a month:
(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if available, as
defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter
into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce
the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district ((fails to)) does not file a petition
under this section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused
absences in any month during the current school year or upon the tenth
unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition
with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.151 and 1996 c 134 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As required under subsection (2) of this section, ((each)) if
a school takes additional actions provided in RCW 28A.225.030, it shall
document the actions taken ((under RCW 28A.225.030)) and report this
information to the school district superintendent who shall compile the
data for all the schools in the district and prepare an annual school
district report for each school year and submit the report to the
superintendent of public instruction. The reports shall be made upon
forms furnished by the superintendent of public instruction and shall
be transmitted as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused
absences;
(b) Documentation of the steps taken by the school district under
each subsection of RCW 28A.225.020 at the request of the superintendent
of public instruction. Each year, by May 1st, the superintendent of
public instruction shall select ten school districts to submit the
report at the end of the following school year. The ten districts
shall represent different areas of the state and be of varied sizes.
In addition, the superintendent of public instruction shall require any
district that fails to keep appropriate records to submit a full report
to the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection. All
school districts shall document steps taken under RCW 28A.225.020 in
each student's record, and make those records available upon request
consistent with the laws governing student records;
(c) The number of enrolled students with ten or more unexcused
absences in a school year or five or more unexcused absences in a month
during a school year;
(d) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve
students who have had five or more unexcused absences in a month or ten
in a year including information about the number of students in the
program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students
during and after participation in the program. The school district
shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian
school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW
28A.225.090; and
(e) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the
juvenile court.
(3) A report required under this section shall not disclose the
name or other identification of a child or parent.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect these
reports from all school districts and prepare an annual report for each
school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than December
15th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---