BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.200 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose
of obtaining money, goods, or services on credit.
(b) "Customer" means any person who is or may be required to pay
for goods or services.
(c) "Debit card" means a card or device used to obtain money,
goods, or services by a transaction that debits a cardholder's account,
rather than extending credit.
(d) "Seller" means any person who provides, offers to provide, or
arranges for others to provide goods or services to a customer in
exchange for consideration.
(2) When a customer is making a payment on an existing account, a
seller may not require as a condition of payment by credit or debit
card that the customer consent to authorizing any future charges
against the customer's credit or debit card.
(3) This section does not prohibit a seller from charging future
payments against the customer's credit or debit card if the customer
consents.
(4) This section does not prohibit a seller from requiring that a
customer provide credit or debit card information to the seller for
future charges at the initiation of an account.

--- END ---