BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.055 and 2010 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of twenty dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction
((or)); offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by
the department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW; or offered by a
parent or guardian as authorized under section 3 of this act, that
includes practice driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); ((or))
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280; or
(c) A parent or guardian-guided traffic safety education course as
authorized under section 3 of this act.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit;
(b) The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Application. The application of a person under the age of
eighteen years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must
be signed by a parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the
person under the age of eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian,
then the application must be signed by the minor's employer.
(2) Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the
age of eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet
the traffic safety education requirements of this subsection.
(a) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's
license, the applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety
education course as defined in RCW 28A.220.020 for a course offered by
a school district, a parent or guardian-guided traffic safety education
course authorized in section 3 of this act, or as defined by the
department of licensing for a course offered by a driver training
school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW. The course offered by a
school district or an approved private school must meet the standards
established by the office of the state superintendent of public
instruction. The course offered by a driver training school or a
parent or guardian must meet the standards established by the
department of licensing. The traffic safety education course may be
provided by:
(i) A recognized secondary school; ((or))
(ii) A driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW that
is annually approved by the department of licensing; or
(iii) A parent or guardian approved by the department to teach a
traffic safety education course to a minor within the parent or
guardian's custody.
(b) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a
motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must successfully complete a
motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards established
by the department of licensing.
(c) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement for a driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the
department's satisfaction that:
(i) He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety
education course;
(ii) A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle;
and
(iii) He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such
a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons or property.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) in
concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(d) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement if the applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or
motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that he or she has had
education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A parent or guardian may provide a guided traffic safety
education course to a minor within the parent or guardian's custody if
the parent or guardian submits a declaration on a form provided by the
department that the parent or guardian meets the criteria specified in
subsection (2) of this section, agrees to use curriculum approved by
the department, and receives approval from the department to provide a
parent or guardian-guided traffic safety education course.
(2) To be approved by the department to provide a parent or
guardian-guided traffic safety education course, the parent or guardian
must:
(a) Have a valid driver's license issued to Washington residents
under this chapter;
(b) Be at least twenty-five years of age;
(c) Have not been convicted of driving under the influence under
RCW 46.61.502; and
(d) Have not been issued a notice of traffic infraction within the
past three years or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of submitting the declaration.
(3) The department must review and approve curriculum for use in a
parent or guardian-guided traffic safety education course.
(4) The department may charge a fee to a parent or guardian to
apply for approval from the department to provide the parent or
guardian-guided traffic safety education course. The amount of the fee
may not exceed the department's actual cost to review applicants'
driving records and to review course curriculum.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---