BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.17.200 and 2010 c 161 s 518 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Reflectivity $ ((2.00))
1.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $ ((10.00))
5.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement,
motorcycle $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(a)(iii), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes to retain
the current license plate number upon license plate replacement, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The twenty dollar
fee must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---