BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every person who possesses, gives, or lends any device designed
to bypass the factory installed ignition of a motorcycle in order to
start the engine of a motorcycle without a manufacturer's key, with the
intent to unlawfully take or drive, or to facilitate the unlawful
taking or driving of, a motorcycle without the consent of the owner is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) Every person who possesses, gives, or lends any item of
hardware including, but not limited to, bolt cutters, electrical tape,
wire cutters, wire strippers, or allen wrenches, with the intent to
unlawfully take or drive, or to facilitate the unlawful taking or
driving of, a motorcycle without the consent of the owner is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(3) For purposes of this section, "device" includes any motorcycle
ignition, or any part thereof, an altered motorcycle ignition known as
a pigtail, and a secondary ignition.

--- END ---