BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.510 and 2002 c 352 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Motorcycle instruction permit. A person holding a valid
driver's license who wishes to learn to ride a motorcycle may apply for
a motorcycle instruction permit. The department may issue a motorcycle
instruction permit after the applicant has successfully passed all
parts of the motorcycle examination other than the driving test. The
director shall collect a fee of fifteen dollars for the motorcycle
instruction permit or renewal, and deposit the fee in the motorcycle
safety education account of the highway safety fund.
(2) Effect of motorcycle instruction permit. A person holding a
motorcycle instruction permit may drive a motorcycle upon the public
highways if the person has immediate possession of the permit and a
valid driver's license. An individual with a motorcyclist's
instruction permit may not carry passengers and may not operate a
motorcycle during the hours of darkness.
(3) Term of motorcycle instruction permit. A motorcycle
instruction permit is valid for ninety days from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional ninety-day permit.
(b) The department may issue a third motorcycle instruction permit
((if it finds after an investigation that the permittee is diligently
seeking to improve driving proficiency)) upon presentation of
documented evidence that the permittee is enrolled in a motorcycle
skills education program as authorized in RCW 46.81A.020 with a class
start date prior to the expiration of the third permit. The department
may not issue more than three motorcycle instruction permits to an
applicant within a five-year period.

--- END ---