BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) School district boards of directors should be encouraged to
grant schools of the district maximum possible flexibility to meet the
needs of students and the communities in which they live; and
(b) Particularly in schools and communities that are struggling to
improve student academic outcomes and close the educational opportunity
gap, there is a critical need for innovative models of public education
that are tailored to the unique circumstances and needs of the students
in those schools and communities.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to create a framework for
change that includes:
(a) Leveraging community assets;
(b) Improving staff capacity and effectiveness;
(c) Developing family, school, and higher education partnerships;
(d) Implementing evidence-based practices proven to be effective in
reducing demographic disparities in student achievement; and
(e) Enabling educators and parents of selected schools and school
districts to restructure school operations and develop model school
programs that will improve student performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop a process for school districts to
apply to have one or more schools within the district designated as an
innovation school. A group of schools that share common interests,
such as geographical location or educational focus, or that
sequentially serve classes of students as they progress through
elementary and secondary grades may be designated as an innovation
zone. An innovation zone may include all schools within a school
district. Consortia of multiple districts may also apply for
designation as an innovation zone, to include all schools within the
participating districts.
(2) Applications requesting designation of innovation schools or
innovation zones must be developed by the educators, parents, and
communities of participating schools in collaboration with the school
district administration. School districts must ensure that each school
has substantial opportunity to participate in the development of the
innovation plan under section 4 of this act.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop common criteria for reviewing applications and for evaluating
the need for waivers of state statutes and administrative rules as
provided under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Applications to designate innovation
schools and innovation zones must be submitted by school district
boards of directors to their respective educational service districts
by February 1, 2012, to be implemented beginning in the 2012-13 school
year. Innovation plans must be able to be implemented without
supplemental state funds.
(2) Each educational service district boards of directors shall
review applications from within the district using the common criteria
developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Each educational service district shall recommend approval by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction of no more than
three applications in each district. At least one of the recommended
applications in each educational service district must propose an
innovation zone, as long as the application meets the review criteria.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
verify that the innovation plans of the applicants recommended by the
educational service districts contain the required elements under
section 4 of this act before approving the applications and designating
the innovation schools and innovation zones.
(4) Designation of innovation schools and innovation zones under
this section shall be for a six-year period, beginning in the 2012-13
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each application for designation of an
innovation school or innovation zone must include a proposed plan that:
(a) Defines the scope of the innovation school or innovation zone
and describes why designation would enhance the ability of the school
or schools to improvement student achievement and close the educational
opportunity gap;
(b) Enumerates specific, research-based activities and innovations
to be carried out under the designation;
(c) Justifies each request for waiver of state statutes or
administrative rules as provided under section 5 of this act;
(d) Justifies any requests for waiver of state statutes or
administrative rules that are in addition to the waivers authorized
under section 5 of this act that are necessary to carry out the
proposed innovations;
(e) Identifies the improvements in student achievement that are
expected to be accomplished through the innovations;
(f) Includes budget plans and anticipated sources of funding,
including private grants and contributions, if any;
(g) Identifies the technical resources desired, the potential costs
of those resources, and the institutions of higher education,
educational service districts, or consultants available to provide such
services;
(h) Identifies the evaluation and accountability processes to be
used to measure student and innovation school or innovation zone
performance;
(i) Includes a written statement that school directors and
administrators are willing to exempt the designated school or schools
from specifically identified local rules, as needed;
(j) Includes a written statement that school directors and local
bargaining agents will modify those portions of their local agreements
as applicable for the designated school or schools;
(k) Includes written statements of support from the district's
board of directors, the superintendent, the principal and staff of
schools seeking designation, each local employee association affected
by the proposal, the local parent organization, and statements of
support, willingness to participate, or concerns from any interested
parent, business, institution of higher education, or community
organization; and
(l) Commits all parties to work cooperatively during the term of
the pilot project.
(2) A plan to designate an innovation school or innovation zone
must be approved by a majority of the staff assigned to the school or
schools participating in the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board of education, each within the scope of
their statutory authority, may grant waivers of state statutes and
administrative rules for designated innovation schools and innovation
zones as follows:
(i) Waivers may be granted under RCW 28A.655.180 and 28A.305.140;
(ii) Waivers may be granted to permit the commingling of funds
appropriated by the legislature on a categorical basis for such
programs as, but not limited to, highly capable students, transitional
bilingual instruction, and learning assistance; and
(iii) Waivers may be granted of other administrative rules that in
the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction or the state
board of education are necessary to be waived to implement an
innovation school or innovation zone.
(b) State administrative rules dealing with public health, safety,
and civil rights, including accessibility for individuals with
disabilities, may not be waived.
(2) At the request of a school district, the superintendent of
public instruction may petition the United States department of
education or other federal agencies to waive federal regulations
necessary to implement an innovation school or innovation zone.
(3) The state board of education may grant waivers for innovation
schools or innovation zones of administrative rules pertaining to
calculation of course credits for high school courses.
(4) Waivers may be granted under this section for a period not to
exceed the duration of the designation of the innovation school or
innovation zone.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education shall provide an expedited review of requests for waivers for
designated innovation schools and innovation zones. Requests may be
denied if the superintendent of public instruction or the state board
of education conclude that the waiver:
(a) Is likely to result in a decrease in academic achievement in
the innovation school or innovation zone;
(b) Would jeopardize the receipt of state or federal funds that a
school district would otherwise be eligible to receive, unless the
school district submits a written authorization for the waiver
acknowledging that receipt of these funds could be jeopardized; or
(c) Would violate state or federal laws or rules that are not
authorized to be waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the education committees of the
legislature on the progress of the designated innovation schools and
innovation zones by January 15, 2013, and January 15th of each odd-numbered year thereafter. The report must include recommendations for
waiver of state laws and administrative rules in addition to the
waivers authorized under section 5 of this act, as identified in
innovation plans submitted by school districts.
(2) Each innovation school and innovation zone must submit an
annual report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
on their progress.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, through
the center for the improvement of student learning, must collect and
disseminate to all school districts and other interested parties
information about the innovation schools and innovation zones.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to:
(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students
in the district an effective education system that is designed to
enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may
include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for
students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;
or
(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated
under section 3 of this act.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2009 c 543 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and
other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of
education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district or to implement an innovation
school or innovation zone designated under section 3 of this act.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.630 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---