BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.685 and 1993 c 419 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of this section, any alien offender
committed to the custody of the department under the sentencing reform
act of 1981, chapter 9.94A RCW, who has been found by the United States
attorney general to be subject to a final order of deportation or
exclusion, may be placed on conditional release status and released to
the immigration and ((naturalization service)) customs enforcement
agency for deportation at any time prior to the expiration of the
offender's term of confinement. Conditional release shall continue
until the expiration of the statutory maximum sentence provided by law
for the crime or crimes of which the offender was convicted. If the
offender has multiple current convictions, the statutory maximum
sentence allowed by law for each crime shall run concurrently.
(2) No offender may be released under this section unless the
secretary or the secretary's designee ((find [finds] that such release
is in the best interests of the state of Washington. Further, releases
under this section may occur only with the approval of the sentencing
court and the prosecuting attorney of the county of conviction)) has
reached an agreement with the immigration and customs enforcement
agency that the alien offender placed on conditional release status
will be detained in total confinement at a facility operated by the
immigration and customs enforcement agency pending the offender's
return to the country of origin or other location designated in the
final deportation or exclusion order.
(((3))) No offender may be released under this section who is
serving a sentence for a violent offense or sex offense, as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030, or any other offense that is a crime against a person as
provided in RCW 9.94A.411.
(((4))) (3) The unserved portion of the term of confinement of any
offender released under this section shall be tolled at the time the
offender is released to the immigration and ((naturalization service))
customs enforcement agency for deportation. Upon the release of an
offender to the immigration and ((naturalization service)) customs
enforcement agency, the department shall issue a warrant for the
offender's arrest within the United States. This warrant shall remain
in effect until the expiration of the offender's conditional release.
(((5))) (4) Upon arrest of an offender, the department ((shall))
may seek extradition as necessary and the offender ((shall)) may be
returned to the department for completion of the unserved portion of
the offender's term of total confinement. If returned, the offender
shall also be required to fully comply with all the terms and
conditions of the sentence.
(((6))) (5) Alien offenders released to the immigration and
((naturalization service)) customs enforcement agency for deportation
under this section are not thereby relieved of their obligation to pay
restitution or other legal financial obligations ordered by the
sentencing court.
(((7))) (6) Any offender released pursuant to this section who
returns illegally to the United States may not thereafter be released
again pursuant to this section.
(((8))) (7) The secretary is authorized to take all reasonable
actions to implement this section and shall assist federal authorities
in prosecuting alien offenders who may illegally reenter the United
States and enter the state of Washington.
(8) The provisions of this section apply to persons convicted
before, on, or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 15, 2011.

--- END ---