BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date and in no event later than thirty
days before an offender is released from confinement, the department
shall provide notice to the school district board of directors and
superintendent of the district in which the offender last attended
school if the offender:
(a) Is twenty-one years of age or younger at the time of release;
and
(b) Has been convicted of a violent offense, a sex offense, or
stalking.
(2) This section applies whenever an offender is being released
from total confinement, regardless if the release is to parole,
community custody, work release placement, or furlough.

--- END ---