BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.283 and 1995 c 399 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that the development and applied
commercialization of new technology is a vital part of economic
development.
The legislature also finds that it is in the interests of the state
of Washington to provide a public-private mechanism to transfer and
apply research and technology as developed at the institutions of
higher education to the private sector in order to create new products
((and technologies which provide job opportunities in advanced
technology)) and new businesses that will provide sustainable private
sector job opportunities for the citizens of this state.
It is the intent of the legislature that the University of
Washington, the Washington State University, ((and the department of
community, trade, and economic development work cooperatively with the
private sector in the development and implementation of a world class
technology transfer program)) the regional universities, The Evergreen
State College, the community and technical college centers of
excellence, and the department of commerce work collaboratively with
the private sector in the development and implementation of a
sustained, competitive, world class, higher education research,
development, application of invention, and technology transfer program
that creates and sustains private sector jobs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.285 and 2004 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A Washington technology center is created ((to be a
collaborative effort between the state's universities, private
industry, and government. The technology center shall be headquartered
at the University of Washington. The mission of the technology center
shall be to perform and commercialize research on a statewide basis
that benefits the intermediate and long-term economic vitality of the
state of Washington, and to develop and strengthen university-industry
relationships through the conduct of research that is primarily of
interest to Washington-based companies or state economic development
programs. The technology center shall:
(1) Perform and/or)) in two locations, one west of the Cascade
mountains in a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand, and one east of the Cascade mountains in a county
with a population greater than four hundred thousand, to be a
collaborative effort between state universities, regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical college
centers of excellence, private industry, and state government. The
mission of the technology center shall be to assist in the applied
commercialization of research on a statewide and regional basis that
creates private sector jobs, benefits the intermediate and long-term
economic vitality of the state of Washington, and develops and
strengthens postsecondary education industry relationships. The
technology center shall:
(a) Facilitate research supportive of state science and technology
objectives, particularly as they relate to state and regional
industries;
(((2))) (b) Provide leading edge collaborative research and
technology transfer opportunities primarily to state and regional
industries;
(((3))) (c) Provide substantial opportunities for training upper
division undergraduate and graduate students in science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics related degree fields through direct
involvement in research and industry interactions;
(((4))) (d) Emphasize and develop nonstate ((support of the
technology center's research)), nonprofit, and private financial
support of the community and technical college centers of excellence
and the state's higher education research development and
commercialization activities;
(((5))) (e) Administer the investing in innovation grants
program((;
(6) Through its northwest energy technology collaborative, carry
out the activities required by RCW 28B.20.296)); and
(((7))) (f) Provide a forum for effective interaction between the
state's technology-based industries and its academic research
institutions through promotion of faculty collaboration with industry,
particularly within the state and region.
(2) Functions and operations previously performed by the Spokane
intercollegiate research and technology institute must be transferred,
to the extent practicable, to the Washington technology center.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.289 and 2003 c 403 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The technology center shall be administered by the board of
directors of the technology center.
(2) The board shall consist of the following members: ((Fourteen))
Seven members from among individuals who are associated with or
employed by ((technology-based industries and have broad business
experience and an understanding of high technology; eight members from
the state's universities with graduate science and engineering
programs; the executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate
Research and Technology Institute or his or her designated
representative; the provost of the University of Washington or his or
her designated representative; the provost of the Washington State
University or his or her designated representative; and the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development or his or
her designated representative. The term of office for each board
member, excluding the executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate
Research and Technology Institute, the provost of the University of
Washington, the provost of the Washington State University, and the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, shall be three years. The executive director of the
technology center shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the
board. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Board members shall
be appointed by the governor based on the recommendations of the
existing board of the technology center, and the research
universities.)) science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
related industries and have broad business experience and an
understanding of research, development, and commercialization in these
fields; six members from the state's institutions of higher education,
as follows: Two representatives of the University of Washington; two
representatives of the Washington State University; one representative
from the community and technical colleges on behalf of the centers of
excellence; one representative of the regional universities; and the
director of the department of commerce or the director's designated
representative. The representative of the regional universities shall
serve in rotating terms among the regional universities, beginning with
the largest regional university in the state. The term of office for
each board member shall be four years in staggered terms. The director
of the department of commerce shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the board. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Board
members shall be appointed by the governor subject to confirmation by
the senate, based on the recommendations of the existing board of the
technology center. The governor shall stagger the terms of the first
group of appointees to ensure the long term continuity of the board.
(3) The duties of the board include:
(a) Developing the general operating policies for the technology
center;
(b) Appointing the executive director of the technology center;
(c) Approving the annual operating budget of the technology center;
(d) Establishing ((priorities)) a competitive process for the
selection and funding of research projects that guarantee the greatest
potential return on the state's investment, which includes private
sector job creation;
(e) ((Approving and allocating funding for research projects
conducted by the technology center, based on the recommendations of the
advisory committees for each of the research centers;
(f))) In cooperation with the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, developing a biennial work plan and
((five-year)) six-year strategic plan for the technology center that
are consistent with the statewide technology development and
commercialization goals;
(((g))) (f) Coordinating with the University of Washington,
Washington State University, and other participating institutions of
higher education in the development of training, research, and
development programs to be conducted at the technology center that
shall be targeted to meet ((industrial needs)) private sector needs for
job creation;
(((h))) (g) Assisting the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce in the department's efforts to develop
state science and technology public policies and coordinate publicly
funded programs;
(((i))) (h) Performing the duties required under chapter 70.210 RCW
relating to the investing in innovation grants program;
(((j))) (i) Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research
projects that are prepared by the temporary advisory committees ((for
each of the research centers)) assigned to each project as necessary;
(((k))) (j) Providing an annual report to the governor and the
legislature detailing the activities and performance of the technology
center; and
(((l))) (k) Submitting annually to the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) commerce an updated strategic plan
((and a statement)) outlining clearly identifiable performance metrics
for funded research projects, as well as identifying barriers that may
exist to technology transfer to the private sector and recommendations
as to how such barriers could be overcome, plus an overall assessment
of performance measured against the mission, roles, and contractual
obligations of the technology center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The executive director of the technology center shall serve as
its chief executive officer and administer the provisions of this
chapter, employ such personnel as may be necessary to implement the
purposes of this chapter, and utilize staff of partnering institutions
of higher education to the fullest extent possible.
(2) The executive director of the technology center must report
solely to the board of the technology center on matters pertaining to
center operations.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.20.291 and 1992 c 142 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((University of Washington, Washington State University, and
other)) participating state institutions of higher education, including
community and technical college centers of excellence as outlined in
RCW 28B.50.902, shall provide the affiliated staff, faculty, and
facilities required to support the operation of the technology center.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.20.293 and 1995 c 399 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development
shall)) commerce may contract with ((the University of Washington)) a
qualified, private sector or nonprofit, independent third party for the
expenditure of state-appropriated funds for the operation of the
Washington technology center. The department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce shall provide guidance to the
technology center regarding expenditure of state-appropriated funds and
the development of the center's strategic plan. The director of the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
shall not withhold funds appropriated for the technology center if the
technology center complies with the provisions of and attains the
performance specified in its contract with the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce.
(2) The department shall be responsible to the legislature for the
contractual performance of the center. Performance metrics in the
contract must include, but are not limited to:
(a) Number of net direct new private sector jobs created;
(b) Median wage of jobs created;
(c) Amount of directly related nonstate additional investment
leveraged;
(d) Amount of state revenue generated through taxes and fees;
(e) Number of undergraduate and graduate students trained through
research and industry interactions; and
(f) Number of faculty and industry collaborations fostered,
including the number of postsecondary institutions and businesses
involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The likelihood of in-state or regional private sector job
creation is a key factor the technology center must use in evaluating
proposals for funding. The expectation is that job opportunities
stemming from technology center investments are developed and retained
in Washington.
(2) For each job created outside of Washington that exceeds the
number of jobs created in Washington or in the Pacific Northwest
economic region as defined in RCW 43.147.010, for an eight-year time
period beginning with the closing date of the last grant made to an
entity, grantees must repay an amount to the Washington technology
center equal to ten percent of salary and benefits for those positions.
(3) The total repayment amount under subsection (2) of this section
may not exceed the amount invested by the technology center.
(4) Each grant recipient must submit a report to the technology
center every two years, beginning two years after the closing date of
the last grant, until the eighth year after the closing date of the
last grant. The report must contain information, as required by the
technology center, from which the technology center may determine
whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of this section or if
repayment is required.
(5) The employment security department must provide such
information as needed for the technology center to certify all
determinations of employment under this section.
(6) The requirements of subsections (2) through (4) of this section
must be included in the grant agreement.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.20.295 and 1992 c 142 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The facilities and resources of the technology center shall be made
available to other participating institutions of higher education
within the state when this would benefit specific program needs. The
technology center, in consultation with participating institutions of
higher education, shall develop a written process for making its
facilities and resources available in a consistent and transparent
manner that prioritizes scarce resources.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.20.287 and 2004 c 151 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28B.20.285 ((and)), 28B.20.289
through 28B.20.295, and sections 4 and 7 of this act.
(1) "Technology center" means the Washington technology center,
including the affiliated staff, faculty, facilities, and research
centers operated by the technology center.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
technology center.
(3) "High technology" or "technology" includes but is not limited
to the modernization, miniaturization, integration, and computerization
of electronic, hydraulic, pneumatic, laser, mechanical, robotics,
nuclear, chemical, telecommunication, and other technological
applications to enhance productivity in areas including but not limited
to manufacturing, communications, medicine, bioengineering, renewable
energy and energy efficiency, and commerce.
(4) "Region" or "regional" means the Pacific Northwest economic
region as defined in RCW 43.147.010.
(5) "Private sector" means the part of an economy in which goods
and services are produced and distributed by individuals and
organizations that are not part of federal, state, or local government.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.52.010 and 2005 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(4) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(5) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(6) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general
public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.
(7) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more
persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(8) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the
legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.
(9) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW
((42.17.020)) 42.17A.005.
(10) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17A RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(11) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state
officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state
employee's official role.
(12) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope
of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.
(13) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not
operated for profit.
(15) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial
branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue
permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified
persons.
(16) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving
the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through
subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct
state action in respect of such transaction.
(17) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(18) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office
of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court,
judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members
of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective
offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive
officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or
committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(19) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an
agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(20) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional
universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any
research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, ((the Spokane Intercollegiate Research
and Technology Institute and)) the Washington Technology Center.
(21) "University research employee" means a state officer or state
employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state
officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer,
approved consulting activities related to research and technology
transfer, or other incidental activities.
(22) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(23)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination,
contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer,
state employee, or former state officer or state employee in question
believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.52.030 and 2005 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, may be beneficially interested,
directly or indirectly, in a contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant
that may be made by, through, or is under the supervision of the
officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept, directly or
indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other person
beneficially interested in the contract, sale, lease, purchase, or
grant.
(2) No state officer or state employee may participate in a
transaction involving the state in his or her official capacity with a
person of which the officer or employee is an officer, agent, employee,
or member, or in which the officer or employee owns a beneficial
interest, except that an officer or employee of an institution of
higher education ((or the Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute)) may serve as an officer, agent, employee, or
member, or on the board of directors, board of trustees, advisory
board, or committee or review panel for any nonprofit institute,
foundation, or fund-raising entity; and may serve as a member of an
advisory board, committee, or review panel for a governmental or other
nonprofit entity.

Sec. 12 RCW 42.52.110 and 1996 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
No state officer or state employee may, directly or indirectly, ask
for or give or receive or agree to receive any compensation, gift,
reward, or gratuity from a source for performing or omitting or
deferring the performance of any official duty, unless otherwise
authorized by law except: (1) The state of Washington; or (2) in the
case of officers or employees of institutions of higher education ((or
of the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute)), a
governmental entity, an agency or instrumentality of a governmental
entity, or a nonprofit corporation organized for the benefit and
support of the state employee's agency or other state agencies pursuant
to an agreement with the state employee's agency.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.210.050 and 2003 c 403 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may accept grant proposals and establish a
competitive process for the awarding of grants.
(2) The board shall establish a peer review committee to include
board members, scientists, engineers, and individuals with specific
recognized expertise. The peer review committee shall provide to the
board an independent peer review of all proposals determined to be
competitive for a grant award that are submitted to the board.
(3) In the awarding of grants, priority shall be given to proposals
that leverage additional private and public funding resources.
(4) Up to fifty percent of available funds from the investing in
innovation account may be used to support commercialization
opportunities for research in Washington state through an organization
with commercialization expertise ((such as the Spokane intercollegiate
research and technology institute)).
(5) The center may not be a direct recipient of grant awards under
chapter 403, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.20.296 (Washington technology center -- Renewable energy
and energy efficiency business development -- Strategic plan) and 2004 c
151 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.20.298 (Clean energy research, development,
manufacturing, and marketing -- Findings -- Policy) and 2004 c 151 s 1;
(3) RCW 28B.38.010 (Spokane intercollegiate research and technology
institute) and 2004 c 275 s 55 & 1998 c 344 s 9;
(4) RCW 28B.38.020 (Administration -- Board of directors -- Powers and
duties) and 1998 c 344 s 10;
(5) RCW 28B.38.030 (Support from participating institutions) and
1998 c 344 s 11;
(6) RCW 28B.38.040 (Operating staff -- Cooperative agreements for
programs and research) and 1998 c 344 s 12;
(7) RCW 28B.38.050 (Role of department of community, trade, and
economic development) and 1998 c 344 s 13;
(8) RCW 28B.38.060 (Availability of facilities to other
institutions) and 1998 c 344 s 14;
(9) RCW 28B.38.070 (Authority to receive and expend funds) and 1998
c 344 s 15; and
(10) RCW 28B.38.900 (Captions not law) and 1998 c 344 s 16.

--- END ---