BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.502 and 2008 c 282 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person drives a vehicle within
this state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(c) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor and any drug.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against a charge of violating this
section.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause
the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two
hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this
defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the
omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to
assert the affirmative defense.
(4) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in
any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above
0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of
or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of
subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) It is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or
chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if: (a) The person has
((four)) two or more prior offenses within ten years as defined in RCW
46.61.5055; or (b) the person has ever previously been convicted of (i)
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), (ii) vehicular assault while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
(iii) an out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in
(b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.504 and 2008 c 282 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug if the person has actual physical control of a vehicle within this
state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(c) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor and any drug.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does
not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
No person may be convicted under this section if, prior to being
pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has moved the vehicle
safely off the roadway.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual physical control
of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of the
person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration
to be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control. The
court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant
notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in
the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.
(4) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle
may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in
such control, a person had an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in
violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be
used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or
(c) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) It is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or
chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if: (a) The person has
((four)) two or more prior offenses within ten years as defined in RCW
46.61.5055; or (b) the person has ever previously been convicted of (i)
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), (ii) vehicular assault while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
(iii) an out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in
(b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2010 c 269 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) ((Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4))) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if: (a) The person
has ((four)) two or more prior offenses within ten years; or (b) the
person has ever previously been convicted of: (i) A violation of RCW
46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug; (ii) a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug; or (iii) an out-of-state
offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
(((5))) (4)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local
ordinance to apply for an ignition interlock driver's license from the
department and to have a functioning ignition interlock device
installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(b) The installation of an ignition interlock device is not
necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer
and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary
responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a
person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours.
The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to
RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's
employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the
employer or other persons during working hours.
(c) An ignition interlock device imposed under this section shall
be calibrated to prevent a motor vehicle from being started when the
breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.
(d) The court may waive the requirement that a person apply for an
ignition interlock driver's license if the court makes a specific
finding in writing that:
(i) The person lives out-of-state and the devices are not
reasonably available in the person's local area;
(ii) The person does not operate a vehicle; or
(iii) The person is not eligible to receive an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 because the person is not a
resident of Washington, is a habitual traffic offender, has already
applied for or is already in possession of an ignition interlock
driver's license, has never had a driver's license, has been certified
under chapter 74.20A RCW as noncompliant with a child support order, or
is subject to any other condition or circumstance that makes the person
ineligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license.
(e) If a court finds that a person is not eligible to receive an
ignition interlock driver's license under this section, the court is
not required to make any further subsequent inquiry or determination as
to the person's eligibility.
(f) If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any
alcohol and requires the person to apply for an ignition interlock
driver's license, and the person states that he or she does not operate
a motor vehicle or the person is ineligible to obtain an ignition
interlock driver's license, the court shall order the person to submit
to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device,
transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect
alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost.
(g) The period of time for which ignition interlock use or alcohol
monitoring is required will be as follows:
(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(i)
of this subsection, a period of five years;
(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(ii)
of this subsection, a period of ten years.
(((6))) (5) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under
the age of sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(((7))) (6) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties
within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly
consider the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(((8))) (7) An offender punishable under this section is subject to
the alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(((9))) (8) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a
person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (((9))) (8), the department shall
refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when
determining the existence of prior offenses.
(((10))) (9) After expiration of any period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege
to drive required by this section, the department shall place the
offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW
46.20.355.
(((11))) (10)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and
nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the
court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also suspend
but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding
five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that
include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a
valid license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the
future; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having
an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after
driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her
breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the
person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor.
The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the
probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised
probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence
may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(((12))) (11) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring
requirements of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(((13))) (12) An offender serving a sentence under this section,
whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(3).
(((14))) (13) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and
46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (((14))) (13)(a),
the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of
the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current
offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current
offense.

--- END ---