BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares the following:
(1) Due to the recent economic crisis and the bursting of the
housing bubble, many homeowners find themselves in houses that are
worth less than their mortgages. The number of foreclosures in
Washington has increased dramatically and will likely continue to
increase.
(2) Houses are worth more to banks, owners, and communities if they
are kept or sold by their owners than if they were foreclosed. When a
bank forecloses on a house, the house typically loses a great deal of
value, as much as thirty percent to fifty percent, not including the
loss that the house has already suffered because of the general
economic downturn. Foreclosure can be a time-consuming process, and
empty houses are often difficult to maintain. One badly maintained
house can bring down the value of the houses around it, leading to more
homeowners having houses that are worth less than the mortgages and new
issues for already resource-constrained local governments. In
addition, lenders generally would rather manage financial instruments
instead of managing real estate; therefore, there is incentive to avoid
foreclosure when possible for many parties.
(3) The legislature intends to create incentives for lenders to
renegotiate loans for borrowers who have negative equity but who have
the ability to pay a lower mortgage that reflects the actual value of
the house, thus preventing foreclosure and costs associated with
foreclosure.
(4) It is in the state's interest to be prepared for federal action
on shared appreciation mortgages, if any federal action takes place
following the study to be released by the housing and urban development
department in 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For the purposes of this section, a shared appreciation loan
modification is a tool for homeowners whose residential home values
have fallen below the amount the homeowner owes on the loan. Through
a shared appreciation loan modification, a beneficiary and homeowner
may renegotiate a home loan to reflect the market value of the home in
exchange for the beneficiary receiving up to fifty percent of the
future appreciation of the home.
(b) The future appreciation of the residential real property is
determined by the actual sale price of the residential real property
when it is sold. The amount of appreciation to be shared is the amount
of the actual sale price that exceeds the modified loan, minus the
borrower's original down payment and closing costs paid by the borrower
when the borrower purchased the residential real property. The
beneficiary may not add any special fees or charges for processing or
making a shared appreciation loan modification.
(2) At least thirty days before the recording of a notice of sale
pursuant to RCW 61.24.040, a beneficiary must inform the borrower of
the option for a shared appreciation loan modification if:
(a) The debt under the borrower's current deed of trust on the
owner-occupied residential real property is greater than the property's
market value as estimated by a certified appraiser; and
(b) The deed of trust is secured by the residential real property.
(3)(a) If the borrower does not request a shared appreciation loan
modification within thirty days of being informed by the beneficiary of
the shared appreciation loan modification option, the beneficiary may
record the notice of sale and proceed with the foreclosure.
(b) If the borrower requests a shared appreciation loan
modification, the beneficiary must contact the borrower within thirty
days of the borrower's request and review with the borrower the
decision whether or not to enter into a shared appreciation loan
modification. Failure of the beneficiary to contact the borrower if
the borrower requests a shared appreciation loan modification under
this section is a defense to any foreclosure.
(4) A shared appreciation loan modification under this section is
not a sale or transfer for the purpose of the real estate excise tax
under chapter 82.45 RCW when the borrower on the shared appreciation
loan modification is the same borrower on the previous loan being
modified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A shared appreciation loan modification under section 2 of this act
is not a sale or transfer for the purpose of the real estate excise tax
when the borrower on the shared appreciation loan modification is the
same borrower on the previous loan being modified.

--- END ---