BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.115 and 2011 c 336 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A covenant, promise, agreement, or understanding in, or in
connection with or collateral to, a contract or agreement relative to
the construction, alteration, repair, addition to, subtraction from,
improvement to, or maintenance of, any building, highway, road,
railroad, excavation, or other structure, project, development, or
improvement attached to real estate, including moving and demolition in
connection therewith, or a motor carrier transportation contract,
purporting to indemnify, including the duty and cost to defend, against
liability for damages arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage
to property:
(a) Caused by or resulting from the sole negligence of the
indemnitee, his or her agents or employees is against public policy and
is void and unenforceable;
(b) Caused by or resulting from the concurrent negligence of (i)
the indemnitee or the indemnitee's agents or employees, and (ii) the
indemnitor or the indemnitor's agents or employees, is valid and
enforceable only to the extent of the indemnitor's negligence and only
if the agreement specifically and expressly provides therefor, and may
waive the indemnitor's immunity under industrial insurance, Title 51
RCW, only if the agreement specifically and expressly provides therefor
and the waiver was mutually negotiated by the parties. This subsection
applies to agreements entered into after June 11, 1986.
(2) A covenant, promise, agreement, or understanding in, or in
connection with or collateral to, a contract or agreement with an
agency under chapter 39.80 RCW for architectural, landscape
architectural, engineering, or land surveying services, purporting to
indemnify, including the duty and cost to defend, the agency by the
architect, landscape architect, engineer, or land surveyor, against
liability for claims against the agency, is enforceable only to the
extent of the negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct of the
architect, landscape architect, engineer, or land surveyor, or those
for whom they are legally responsible. This subsection does not limit
the liability of the architect, landscape architect, engineer, or land
surveyor, for patent or copyright claims that arise from the
performance of professional services under the contract or agreement.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, this
section may not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or
omission of the parties.
(4) As used in this section, a "motor carrier transportation
contract" means a contract, agreement, or understanding covering: (a)
The transportation of property for compensation or hire by the motor
carrier; (b) entrance on property by the motor carrier for the purpose
of loading, unloading, or transporting property for compensation or
hire; or (c) a service incidental to activity described in (a) or (b)
of this subsection, including, but not limited to, storage of property,
moving equipment or trailers, loading or unloading, or monitoring
loading or unloading. "Motor carrier transportation contract" shall
not include agreements providing for the interchange, use, or
possession of intermodal chassis, containers, or other intermodal
equipment.

--- END ---