BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47A.020 and 2008 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Board" means the health insurance partnership board
established in RCW 70.47A.100.
(3) "Eligible partnership participant" means a partnership
participant who:
(a) Is a resident of the state of Washington; and
(b) Has family income that does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level, as determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(5) "Participating small employer" means a small employer that has
entered into an agreement with the partnership to purchase health
benefits through the partnership. To participate in the partnership,
an employer must attest to the fact that (((a))) the employer does not
currently offer health insurance to its employees((, and (b) at least
fifty percent of the employer's employees are low-wage workers)).
(6) "Partnership" means the health insurance partnership
established in RCW 70.47A.030.
(7) "Partnership participant" means a participating small employer
and employees of a participating small employer, and, except to the
extent provided otherwise in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e), a former employee of
a participating small employer who chooses to continue receiving
coverage through the partnership following separation from employment.
(8) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(9) "Subsidy" or "premium subsidy" means payment or reimbursement
to an eligible partnership participant toward the purchase of a health
benefit plan, and may include a net billing arrangement with insurance
carriers or a prospective or retrospective payment for health benefit
plan premiums.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47A.030 and 2009 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent funding is appropriated in the operating budget
for this purpose or obtained through federal resources, the health
insurance partnership is established. The administrator shall be
responsible for the implementation and operation of the health
insurance partnership, directly or by contract. The administrator
shall offer premium subsidies to eligible partnership participants
under RCW 70.47A.040.
(2) Consistent with policies adopted by the board under RCW
70.47A.110, the administrator shall, directly or by contract:
(a) Establish and administer procedures for enrolling small
employers in the partnership, including publicizing the existence of
the partnership and disseminating information on enrollment, and
establishing rules related to minimum participation of employees in
small groups purchasing health insurance through the partnership.
Opportunities to publicize the program for outreach and education of
small employers on the value of insurance shall explore the use of
online employer guides((. As a condition of participating in the
partnership, a small employer must agree to establish a cafeteria plan
under section 125 of the federal internal revenue code that will enable
employees to use pretax dollars to pay their share of their health
benefit plan premium. The partnership shall provide technical
assistance to small employers for this purpose));
(b) Establish and administer procedures for health benefit plan
enrollment by employees of small employers during open enrollment
periods and outside of open enrollment periods upon the occurrence of
any qualifying event specified in the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 or applicable state law((.
Except to the extent authorized in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e), neither the
employer nor the partnership shall limit an employee's choice of
coverage from among the health benefit plans offered through the
partnership));
(c) Establish and manage a system of collecting and transmitting to
the applicable carriers all premium payments or contributions made by
or on behalf of partnership participants, including employer
contributions, automatic payroll deductions for partnership
participants, premium subsidy payments, and contributions from
philanthropies;
(d) Establish and manage a system for determining eligibility for
and making premium subsidy payments under chapter 259, Laws of 2007;
(e) Establish a mechanism to apply a surcharge to each health
benefit plan purchased through the partnership, which shall be used
only to pay for administrative and operational expenses of the
partnership. The surcharge must be applied uniformly to all health
benefit plans purchased through the partnership. Any surcharge amount
may be added to the premium, but shall not be considered part of the
small group community rate, and shall be applied only to the coverage
purchased through the partnership. Surcharges may not be used to pay
any premium assistance payments under this chapter. The surcharge
shall reflect administrative and operational expenses remaining after
any appropriation provided by the legislature or resources received
from the federal government to support administrative or operational
expenses of the partnership during the year the surcharge is assessed;
(f) Design a schedule of premium subsidies that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members based on a benchmark health benefit plan
designated by the board. The amount of an eligible partnership
participant's premium subsidy shall be determined by applying a sliding
scale subsidy schedule with the percentage of premium similar to that
developed for subsidized basic health plan enrollees under RCW
70.47.060. The subsidy shall be applied to the employee's premium
obligation for his or her health benefit plan, so that employees
benefit financially from any employer contribution to the cost of their
coverage through the partnership.
(3) The administrator may enter into interdepartmental agreements
with the office of the insurance commissioner, the department of social
and health services, and any other state agencies necessary to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47A.050 and 2007 c 260 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Enrollment in the health insurance partnership is not an
entitlement and shall not result in expenditures that exceed the amount
that has been appropriated for the program in the operating budget or
resources received from the federal government. If it appears that
continued enrollment will result in expenditures exceeding the
appropriated level for a particular fiscal year, the administrator may
freeze new enrollment in the program and establish a waiting list of
eligible employees who shall receive subsidies only when sufficient
funds are available.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47A.110 and 2008 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health insurance partnership board shall:
(a) Develop policies for enrollment of small employers in the
partnership, including minimum participation rules for small employer
groups. The small employer shall determine the criteria for
eligibility and enrollment in his or her plan and the terms and amounts
of the employer's contributions to that plan, consistent with any
minimum employer premium contribution level established by the board
under (d) of this subsection;
(b) Designate health benefit plans that are currently offered in
the small group market that will be offered to participating small
employers through the health insurance partnership and those plans that
will qualify for premium subsidy payments. Up to five health benefit
plans shall be chosen, with multiple deductible and point-of-service
cost-sharing options. The health benefit plans shall range from
catastrophic to comprehensive coverage, and one health benefit plan
shall be a high deductible health plan accompanied by a health savings
account. Every effort shall be made to include health benefit plans
that include components to maximize the quality of care provided and
result in improved health outcomes, such as preventive care, wellness
incentives, chronic care management services, and provider network
development and payment policies related to quality of care;
(c) Approve a mid-range benefit plan from those selected to be used
as a benchmark plan for calculating premium subsidies;
(d) Determine whether there should be a minimum employer premium
contribution on behalf of employees, and if so, how much;
(e) Develop policies related to partnership participant enrollment
in health benefit plans. The board may focus its initial efforts on
access to coverage and affordability of coverage for participating
small employers and their employees. To the extent necessary for
successful implementation of the partnership, ((during a start-up phase
of partnership operation,)) the board may:
(i) Limit partnership participant health benefit plan choice; and
(ii) Offer former employees of participating small employers the
opportunity to continue coverage after separation from employment to
the extent that a former employee is eligible for continuation coverage
under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq((.
The start-up phase may not exceed two years from the date the
partnership begins to offer coverage));
(f) Determine appropriate health benefit plan rating methodologies.
The methodologies shall be based on the small group adjusted community
rate as defined in Title 48 RCW. The board shall evaluate the impact
of applying the small group adjusted community rating methodology to
health benefit plans purchased through the partnership on the principle
of allowing each partnership participant to choose his or her health
benefit plan, and may implement one or more risk adjustment or
reinsurance mechanisms to reduce uncertainty for carriers and provide
for efficient risk management of high-cost enrollees;
(g) Determine whether the partnership should be designated as the
administrator of a participating small employer health benefit plan and
undertake the obligations required of a plan administrator under
federal law in order to minimize administrative burdens on
participating small employers;
(h) Conduct analyses and provide recommendations as requested by
the legislature and the governor, with the assistance of staff from the
health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner.
(2) The board may authorize one or more limited health care service
plans for dental care services to be offered by limited health care
service contractors under RCW 48.44.035. However, such plan shall not
qualify for subsidy payments.
(3) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the board shall
consult with small employers, the office of the insurance commissioner,
members in good standing of the American academy of actuaries, health
carriers, agents and brokers, and employees of small business.

--- END ---