BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislative task force on maternal
and child health is established with members as provided in this
subsection:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) The following members appointed jointly by the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate:
(i) One member representing the march of dimes;
(ii) One member representing the American Indian health commission
for Washington;
(iii) One member representing a statewide association representing
midwives;
(iv) One member representing the American congress of obstetricians
and gynecologists;
(v) One member representing the Washington state medical
association;
(vi) One member representing the Washington state pharmacy
association;
(vii) One member representing the Washington chapter of the
American academy of pediatrics; and
(viii) One member representing the Washington state perinatal
collaborative; and
(d) The following members appointed by the governor:
(i) One member representing the medicaid purchasing administration;
and
(ii) One member representing the department of health.
(2) The task force shall select its chair from among its
legislative membership.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the current status of the maternity and child health
system including, but not limited to, the following information sorted
by income and source of insurance coverage:
(i) Access to care during the first trimester of a pregnancy;
(ii) Caesarean section rates;
(iii) Infant mortality rates;
(iv) Low birth weight rates; and
(v) Other relevant birth outcome data; and
(b) Develop strategies to lower the number of preterm births in the
state of Washington.
(4) The task force shall report its findings to the relevant
committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2011.
(5) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the
office of program research and senate committee services.
(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members,
except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(7) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---