BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
has long been sensitive to the privacy concerns associated with
personal health care information. As early as 1973, Washington
established protections from disclosure for mental health information
and records. In 1988, the AIDS omnibus act included protections for
individuals receiving testing for HIV, AIDS, and other sexually
transmitted diseases.
The legislature further finds that in 1991 Washington enacted
comprehensive health care information privacy standards for all health
information and the federal government subsequently adopted similar
national protections with the passage of the health insurance
portability and accountability act. As privacy protections have
evolved, so has the ability for health technology to facilitate
communication among multiple providers in diverse practice settings.
Health care providers continue to adopt electronic health records
technology which allows them to share patient medical information with
other providers to better coordinate medical care through initiatives
such as medical homes and accountable care organizations. The
existence, however, of multiple privacy standards for physical and
mental health information impedes these efforts to integrate care.
The legislature, therefore, intends to improve the coordination of
care to these people by establishing a single standard for the
protection of all health care information.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.02.050 and 2007 c 156 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care provider or health care facility may disclose
health care information about a patient without the patient's
authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the information,
if the disclosure is:
(a) To a person who the provider or facility reasonably believes is
providing health care to the patient;
(b) To any other person who requires health care information for
health care education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer
review, or administrative, legal, financial, actuarial services to, or
other health care operations for or on behalf of the health care
provider or health care facility; or for assisting the health care
provider or health care facility in the delivery of health care and the
health care provider or health care facility reasonably believes that
the person:
(i) Will not use or disclose the health care information for any
other purpose; and
(ii) Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care
information;
(c) To any other health care provider or health care facility
reasonably believed to have previously provided health care to the
patient, to the extent necessary to provide health care to the patient,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(d) To any person if the health care provider or health care
facility reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an
imminent danger to the health or safety of the patient or any other
individual, however there is no obligation under this chapter on the
part of the provider or facility to so disclose;
(e) To immediate family members of the patient, including a
patient's state registered domestic partner, or any other individual
with whom the patient is known to have a close personal relationship,
if made in accordance with good medical or other professional practice,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(f) To a health care provider or health care facility who is the
successor in interest to the health care provider or health care
facility maintaining the health care information;
(g) For use in a research project that an institutional review
board has determined:
(i) Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the
privacy of the patient that would result from the disclosure;
(ii) Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health
care information in individually identifiable form;
(iii) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information
from redisclosure;
(iv) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying,
directly or indirectly, any patient in any report of the research
project; and
(v) Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest
opportunity, consistent with the purposes of the project, information
that would enable the patient to be identified, unless an institutional
review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project;
(h) To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit,
if that person agrees in writing to:
(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with
the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to
be identified; and
(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish
the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in
payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other
unlawful conduct by the health care provider;
(i) To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in
which the patient is detained;
(j) To provide directory information, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider or health care facility not to make
the disclosure;
(k) To fire, police, sheriff, or another public authority, that
brought, or caused to be brought, the patient to the health care
facility or health care provider if the disclosure is limited to the
patient's name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis,
estimated or actual discharge date, or extent and location of injuries
as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious
when admitted;
(l) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities and the
health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor
believes in good faith that the health care information disclosed
constitutes evidence of criminal conduct that occurred on the premises
of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor;
(m) To another health care provider, health care facility, or
third-party payor for the health care operations of the health care
provider, health care facility, or third-party payor that receives the
information, if each entity has or had a relationship with the patient
who is the subject of the health care information being requested, the
health care information pertains to such relationship, and the
disclosure is for the purposes described in RCW 70.02.010(8) (a) and
(b); ((or))
(n) For payment;
(o) To persons authorized to receive information regarding the
identity of the subject of an HIV antibody test or test for any other
sexually transmitted disease, the results of such a test, and the
diagnosis or treatment of a patient for HIV infection as permitted
under RCW 70.24.105; or
(p) To persons authorized under chapter 71.05 RCW to receive
information and records regarding recipients of mental health-related
services.
(2) A health care provider shall disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure
is:
(a) To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the
extent the health care provider is required by law to report health
care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or
federal licensure, certification or registration rules or laws; or when
needed to protect the public health;
(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the
extent the health care provider is required by law;
(c) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon
receipt of a written or oral request made to a nursing supervisor,
administrator, or designated privacy official, in a case in which the
patient is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound,
gunshot wound, powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by
the discharge of a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, an ice
pick, or any other sharp or pointed instrument which federal, state, or
local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe to have been
intentionally inflicted upon a person, or a blunt force injury that
federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe
resulted from a criminal act, the following information, if known:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition;
(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a health care provider;
(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;
(viii) The name of the health care provider making the
determination in (c)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility;
and
(x) The patient's discharge time and date;
(d) To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations
of deaths;
(e) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW
70.02.060.
(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing
their record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are
consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.24.105 and 1997 c 345 s 2 and 1997 c 196 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the
identity of any person who has investigated, considered, or requested
a test or treatment for a sexually transmitted disease, except as
authorized by this chapter.
(2) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity
of any person upon whom an HIV antibody test is performed, or the
results of such a test, nor may the result of a test for any other
sexually transmitted disease when it is positive be disclosed. This
protection against disclosure of test subject, diagnosis, or treatment
also applies to any information relating to diagnosis of or treatment
for HIV infection and for any other confirmed sexually transmitted
disease.)) Information regarding the identity of the subject of an HIV
antibody test or test for any other sexually transmitted disease, the
results of such a test, and the diagnosis or treatment of a patient for
HIV infection must be considered "health care information" as that term
is defined in RCW 70.02.010 and subject to the same regulations
established under chapter 70.02 RCW, except as otherwise provided in
this chapter. In addition to the provisions of chapter 70.02 RCW, the
following persons((, however,)) may receive such information:
(a) ((The subject of the test or the subject's legal representative
for health care decisions in accordance with RCW 7.70.065, with the
exception of such a representative of a minor child over fourteen years
of age and otherwise competent;
(b) Any person who secures a specific release of test results or
information relating to HIV or confirmed diagnosis of or treatment for
any other sexually transmitted disease executed by the subject or the
subject's legal representative for health care decisions in accordance
with RCW 7.70.065, with the exception of such a representative of a
minor child over fourteen years of age and otherwise competent;
(c) The state public health officer, a local public health officer,
or the centers for disease control of the United States public health
service in accordance with reporting requirements for a diagnosed case
of a sexually transmitted disease;
(d))) A health facility or health care provider that procures,
processes, distributes, or uses: (i) A human body part, tissue, or
blood from a deceased person with respect to medical information
regarding that person; (ii) semen, including that provided prior to
March 23, 1988, for the purpose of artificial insemination; or (iii)
blood specimens;
(((e))) (b) Any state or local public health officer conducting an
investigation pursuant to RCW 70.24.024, provided that such record was
obtained by means of court ordered HIV testing pursuant to RCW
70.24.340 or 70.24.024;
(((f) A person allowed access to the record by a court order
granted after application showing good cause therefor. In assessing
good cause, the court shall weigh the public interest and the need for
disclosure against the injury to the patient, to the physician-patient
relationship, and to the treatment services. Upon the granting of the
order, the court, in determining the extent to which any disclosure of
all or any part of the record of any such test is necessary, shall
impose appropriate safeguards against unauthorized disclosure. An
order authorizing disclosure shall: (i) Limit disclosure to those
parts of the patient's record deemed essential to fulfill the objective
for which the order was granted; (ii) limit disclosure to those persons
whose need for information is the basis for the order; and (iii)
include any other appropriate measures to keep disclosure to a minimum
for the protection of the patient, the physician-patient relationship,
and the treatment services, including but not limited to the written
statement set forth in subsection (5) of this section;
(g) Local law enforcement agencies)) (c) Prosecuting attorneys and
superior courts, to the extent provided in RCW 70.24.034;
(((h))) (d) Persons who, because of their behavioral interaction
with the infected individual, have been placed at risk for acquisition
of a sexually transmitted disease, as provided in RCW 70.24.022, if the
health officer or authorized representative believes that the exposed
person was unaware that a risk of disease exposure existed and that the
disclosure of the identity of the infected person is necessary;
(((i))) (e) A law enforcement officer, firefighter, health care
provider, health care facility staff person, department of correction's
staff person, jail staff person, or other persons as defined by the
board in rule pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), who has requested a test of
a person whose bodily fluids he or she has been substantially exposed
to, pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), if a state or local public health
officer performs the test;
(((j) Claims management personnel employed by or associated with an
insurer, health care service contractor, health maintenance
organization, self-funded health plan, state-administered health care
claims payer, or any other payer of health care claims where such
disclosure is to be used solely for the prompt and accurate evaluation
and payment of medical or related claims. Information released under
this subsection shall be confidential and shall not be released or
available to persons who are not involved in handling or determining
medical claims payment;)) and
(((k))) (f) A department of social and health services worker, a
child placing agency worker, or a guardian ad litem who is responsible
for making or reviewing placement or case-planning decisions or
recommendations to the court regarding a child, who is less than
fourteen years of age, has a sexually transmitted disease, and is in
the custody of the department of social and health services or a
licensed child placing agency; this information may also be received by
a person responsible for providing residential care for such a child
when the department of social and health services or a licensed child
placing agency determines that it is necessary for the provision of
child care services.
(((3))) (2) No person to whom the results of a test for a sexually
transmitted disease have been disclosed pursuant to subsection (((2)))
(1) of this section may disclose the test results to another person
except as authorized by that subsection.
(((4))) (3) The release of sexually transmitted disease information
regarding an offender or detained person, except as provided in
subsection (((2)(e))) (1)(b) of this section, shall be governed as
follows:
(a) The sexually transmitted disease status of a department of
corrections offender who has had a mandatory test conducted pursuant to
RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 shall be made available by
department of corrections health care providers and local public health
officers to the department of corrections health care administrator or
infection control coordinator of the facility in which the offender is
housed. The information made available to the health care
administrator or the infection control coordinator under this
subsection (((4))) (3)(a) shall be used only for disease prevention or
control and for protection of the safety and security of the staff,
offenders, and the public. The information may be submitted to
transporting officers and receiving facilities, including facilities
that are not under the department of corrections' jurisdiction
according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.
(b) The sexually transmitted disease status of a person detained in
a jail who has had a ((mandatary)) mandatory test conducted pursuant to
RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 shall be made available by
the local public health officer to a jail health care administrator or
infection control coordinator. The information made available to a
health care administrator under this subsection (((4))) (3)(b) shall be
used only for disease prevention or control and for protection of the
safety and security of the staff, offenders, detainees, and the public.
The information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving
facilities according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this
subsection.
(c) Information regarding the sexually transmitted disease status
of an offender or detained person is confidential and may be disclosed
by a correctional health care administrator or infection control
coordinator or local jail health care administrator or infection
control coordinator only as necessary for disease prevention or control
and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders,
and the public. Unauthorized disclosure of this information to any
person may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties
prescribed in RCW 70.24.080 or any other penalties as may be prescribed
by law.
(d) Notwithstanding the limitations on disclosure contained in (a),
(b), and (c) of this subsection, whenever any member of a jail staff or
department of corrections staff has been substantially exposed to the
bodily fluids of an offender or detained person, then the results of
any tests conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or
70.24.370, shall be immediately disclosed to the staff person in
accordance with the Washington Administrative Code rules governing
employees' occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. Disclosure
must be accompanied by appropriate counseling for the staff member,
including information regarding follow-up testing and treatment.
Disclosure shall also include notice that subsequent disclosure of the
information in violation of this chapter or use of the information to
harass or discriminate against the offender or detainee may result in
disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties prescribed in RCW
70.24.080, and imposition of other penalties prescribed by law.
(e) The staff member shall also be informed whether the offender or
detained person had any other communicable disease, as defined in RCW
72.09.251(3), when the staff person was substantially exposed to the
offender's or detainee's bodily fluids.
(f) The test results of voluntary and anonymous HIV testing or HIV-related condition may not be disclosed to a staff person except as
provided in subsection (((2)(i))) (1)(e) of this section and RCW
70.24.340(4). A health care administrator or infection control
coordinator may provide the staff member with information about how to
obtain the offender's or detainee's test results under subsection
(((2)(i))) (1)(e) of this section and RCW 70.24.340(4).
(((5))) (4) Whenever disclosure is made pursuant to this section,
except for subsection((s (2)(a) and (6))) (5) of this section, it shall
be accompanied by a statement in writing which includes the following
or substantially similar language: "This information has been
disclosed to you from records whose confidentiality is protected by
state law. State law prohibits you from making any further disclosure
of it without the specific written ((consent)) authorization of the
person to whom it pertains, or as otherwise permitted by state law.
((A general authorization for the release of medical or other
information is NOT sufficient for this purpose.")) An oral disclosure
shall be accompanied or followed by such a notice within ten days.
(((6))) (5) The requirements of this section shall not apply to the
customary methods utilized for the exchange of medical information
among health care providers in order to provide health care services to
the patient, nor shall they apply within health care facilities where
there is a need for access to confidential medical information to
fulfill professional duties.
(((7))) (6) Upon request of the victim, disclosure of test results
under this section to victims of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44
RCW shall be made if the result is negative or positive. The county
prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the right to such
disclosure. Such disclosure shall be accompanied by appropriate
counseling, including information regarding follow-up testing.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.390 and 2009 c 320 s 3 and 2009 c 217 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, RCW 71.05.445, 71.05.630,
70.96A.150, 71.05.385, 70.02.050, or pursuant to a valid release under
RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission and all information and records
compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services
to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or
private agencies shall be ((confidential)) considered "health care
information" as that term is defined in RCW 70.02.010 and subject to
the same regulations established under chapter 70.02 RCW, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter.
In addition to any disclosures permitted under chapter 70.02 RCW,
information and records may be disclosed ((only)):
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The ((consent)) authorization of the person, or his or her personal
representative or guardian, shall be obtained before information or
records may be disclosed by a professional person employed by a
facility unless provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a facility in which the patient resides or will reside.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Such other information requested by the next of kin or
attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings
should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) ((To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or
for a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(6)))(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(((7))) (5)(a) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or
provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the
mental health professional shall, if requested to do so, advise the
representative in writing of the results of the investigation including
a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person
investigated. Such written report shall be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from
the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs
later.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(((8))) (6) To the attorney of the detained person.
(((9))) (7) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(((10))) (8)(a) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a
person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or
private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is
known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may
designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure
shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public or
private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or
unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only such other
information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good
faith and without gross negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(((11))) (9)(a) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement
agencies all necessary and relevant information in the event of a
crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk
to the public. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in
civil liability for the mental health service provider or its employees
so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(((12))) (10) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 and
71.05.385 for the purposes described in those sections.
(((13))) (11) Civil liability and immunity for the release of
information about a particular person who is committed to the
department under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(3)(c) after dismissal
of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW
4.24.550.
(((14))) (12) Upon the death of a person, his or her next of kin,
personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be
notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(((15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.
(16))) (13) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients
interred at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and
health services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date
of death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years
after the death of a patient.
(((17))) (14) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting
attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The
extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(((18))) (15) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the
provisions of this section and disclosure is necessary for the
protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized
disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown,
notice of such disappearance, along with relevant information, may be
made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is
under the supervision of the department, and governmental law
enforcement agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric
advanced registered nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the
professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her
professional designee.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform health
care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records and
information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(((19))) (16) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter and which may be held by a health care
provider or health care facility shall not be admissible as evidence in
any legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written
((consent)) authorization of the person who was the subject of the
proceeding except as provided in RCW 71.05.385, in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(3)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor,
a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files
maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter and held by
a court shall be confidential and available subsequent to such
proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding or
his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent
release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if
the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained.
(17) Copies of documents from court proceedings maintained or held
by a health care provider or health care facility, such as petitions,
orders of detention, and affidavits, as well as records of services or
treatment provided to persons as a result of proceedings under chapter
71.05, 71.34, or 10.77 RCW shall be considered "health care
information," as that term is defined in RCW 70.02.010 and shall not be
considered subject to subsection (16) of this section except as
explicitly stated.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.630 and 2009 c 398 s 1, 2009 c 320 s 5, and 2009
c 217 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records
shall remain confidential pursuant to chapter 70.02 RCW and may be
released only to the persons designated in this section, to persons
authorized to receive the records under chapter 70.02 RCW, or to other
persons designated in ((an informed written consent)) a disclosure
authorization of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of a person may be released without
((informed written consent)) a disclosure authorization of the patient
in the following circumstances:
(a) ((To a person, organization, or agency as necessary for
management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation.
Information obtained under this subsection shall remain confidential
and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other
identifying information about the person whose records are being
released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c))) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(((d))) (b) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(((e))) (c) To qualified staff members of the department, to the
director of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(((f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties.
(g))) (d) Within the department as necessary to coordinate
treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism,
or drug abuse of persons who are under the supervision of the
department.
(((h) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered
nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the
person is in danger and that treatment without the information
contained in the treatment records could be injurious to the patient's
health. Disclosure shall be limited to the portions of the records
necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) Consistent with the requirements of the health information
portability and accountability act, to a licensed mental health
professional, as defined in RCW 71.05.020, or a health care
professional licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.71A, 18.57, 18.57A,
18.79, or 18.36A RCW who is providing care to a person, or to whom a
person has been referred for evaluation or treatment, to assure
coordinated care and treatment of that person. Psychotherapy notes, as
defined in 45 C.F.R. Sec. 164.501, may not be released without
authorization of the person who is the subject of the request for
release of information.
(j) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain
medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (i) of this
subsection.
(k))) (e) To a facility that is to receive a person who is
involuntarily committed under this chapter ((71.05 RCW)), or upon
transfer of the person from one treatment facility to another. The
release of records under this subsection shall be limited to the
treatment records required by law, a record or summary of all somatic
treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include
a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of
treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future
treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record.
(((l))) (f) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under this chapter ((71.05 RCW)).
(((m))) (g) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency
or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose
of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental
disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services
may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county
of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient
was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and
place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of
a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's
appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional
information shall notify the patient's resource management services in
writing of the request and of the resource management services' right
to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the
guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain
the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not
obtain the additional information.
(((n) For purposes of coordinating health care, the department may
release without informed written consent of the patient, information
acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in (b) of
this subsection to all current treating providers of the patient with
prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient
within the last twelve months. The department shall notify the patient
that billing and collection information has been released to named
providers, and provide the substance of the information released and
the dates of such release. The department shall not release
counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol
treatment information without a signed written release from the
client.))
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 70.24.450 (Confidentiality -- Reports--Unauthorized disclosures) and 1999 c 391 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---