BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that civil domestic
violence protection orders are an essential tool for interrupting an
abuser's ability to perpetrate domestic violence. The legislature has
authorized courts to enter permanent or fixed term domestic violence
protection orders if the court finds that the respondent is likely to
resume acts of domestic violence when the order expires. However, the
legislature has not established procedures or guidelines for
terminating or modifying a protection order after it is entered.
The legislature finds that some of the factors articulated in the
Washington supreme court's decision in In re Marriage of Freeman, 169
Wn.2d 664, 239 P.3d 557 (2010), for terminating or modifying domestic
violence protection orders do not demonstrate that a restrained person
is unlikely to resume acts of domestic violence when the order expires,
and place an improper burden on the person protected by the order. By
this act, the legislature establishes procedures and guidelines for
determining whether a domestic violence protection order should be
terminated or modified.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.50.130 and 2008 c 287 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon ((application)) a motion with notice to all parties and
after a hearing, the court may modify the terms of an existing order
for protection or may terminate an existing order for protection.
(2) A respondent's motion to modify or terminate an order for
protection that is permanent or issued for a fixed period exceeding two
years must include a declaration setting forth facts supporting the
requested order for termination or modification. The motion and
declaration must be served according to subsection (7) of this section.
The nonmoving parties to the proceeding may file opposing declarations.
The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate cause for
hearing the motion is established by the declarations. If the court
finds that the respondent established adequate cause, the court shall
set a date for hearing the respondent's motion.
(3)(a) The court may not terminate an order for protection that is
permanent or issued for a fixed period exceeding two years upon a
motion of the respondent unless the respondent proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change
in circumstances such that the respondent is not likely to resume acts
of domestic violence against the petitioner or those persons protected
by the protection order if the order is terminated. In a motion by the
respondent for termination of an order for protection that is permanent
or issued for a fixed period exceeding two years, the petitioner bears
no burden of proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of
imminent harm by the respondent.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, a court shall determine
whether there has been a "substantial change in circumstances" by
considering only factors which address whether the respondent is likely
to commit future acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or
those persons protected by the protection order.
(c) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in
circumstances the court may consider the following unweighted factors,
and no inference is to be drawn from the order in which the factors are
listed:
(i) Whether the respondent has committed or threatened domestic
violence, sexual assault, stalking, or other violent acts since the
protection order was entered;
(ii) Whether the respondent has violated the terms of the
protection order, and the time that has passed since the entry of the
order;
(iii) Whether the respondent has exhibited suicidal ideation or
attempts since the protection order was entered;
(iv) Whether the respondent has been convicted of criminal activity
since the protection order was entered;
(v) Whether the respondent has either acknowledged responsibility
for the acts of domestic violence that resulted in entry of the
protection order or successfully completed domestic violence
perpetrator treatment or counseling since the protection order was
entered;
(vi) Whether the respondent has a continuing involvement with drug
or alcohol abuse, if such abuse was a factor in the protection order;
(vii) Whether the petitioner consents to terminating the protection
order, provided that consent is given voluntarily and knowingly;
(viii) Whether the respondent or petitioner has relocated to an
area more distant from the other party, giving due consideration to the
fact that acts of domestic violence may be committed from any distance;
(ix) Other factors relating to a substantial change in
circumstances.
(d) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in
circumstances, the court may not base its determination solely on: (i)
The fact that time has passed without a violation of the order; or (ii)
the fact that the respondent or petitioner has relocated to an area
more distant from the other party.
(e) Regardless of whether there is a substantial change in
circumstances, the court may decline to terminate a protection order if
it finds that the acts of domestic violence that resulted in the
issuance of the protection order were of such severity that the order
should not be terminated.
(4) The court may not modify an order for protection that is
permanent or issued for a fixed period exceeding two years upon a
motion of the respondent unless the respondent proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that the requested modification is
warranted. If the requested modification would reduce the duration of
the protection order or would eliminate provisions in the protection
order restraining the respondent from harassing, stalking, threatening,
or committing other acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or
the petitioner's children or family or household members or other
persons protected by the order, the court shall consider the factors in
subsection (3)(c) of this section in determining whether the protection
order should be modified. Upon a motion by the respondent for
modification of an order for protection that is permanent or issued for
a fixed period exceeding two years, the petitioner bears no burden of
proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of imminent harm
by the respondent.
(5) Upon a motion by a petitioner, the court may modify or
terminate an existing order for protection. The court shall hear the
motion without an adequate cause hearing.
(6) A court may require the respondent to pay court costs and
service fees, as established by the county or municipality incurring
the expense and to pay the petitioner for costs incurred in responding
to a motion to terminate or modify a protection order, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7) Except as provided in RCW 26.50.085 and 26.50.123, ((personal
service shall be made upon)) a motion to modify or terminate an order
for protection must be personally served on the nonmoving party not
less than five court days prior to the hearing ((to modify)).
(a) If a moving party seeks to modify or terminate an order for
protection that is permanent or issued for a fixed period exceeding two
years, the sheriff of the county or the peace officers of the
municipality in which the nonmoving party resides or a licensed process
server shall serve the nonmoving party personally except when a
petitioner is the moving party and elects to have the nonmoving party
served by a private party.
(b) If the sheriff, municipal peace officer, or licensed process
server cannot complete service upon the nonmoving party within ten
days, the sheriff, municipal peace officer, or licensed process server
shall notify the moving party. The moving party shall provide
information sufficient to permit notification by the sheriff, municipal
peace officer, or licensed process server.
(c) If timely personal service cannot be made, the court shall set
a new hearing date and shall either require an additional attempt at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
in RCW 26.50.085 or service by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123.
(((b))) (d) The court shall not require more than two attempts at
obtaining personal service and shall permit service by publication or
by mail unless the moving party requests additional time to attempt
personal service.
(((c))) (e) If the court permits service by publication or by mail,
the court shall set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days
from the date of the order permitting service by publication or by
mail.
(((3))) (8) Municipal police departments serving documents as
required under this chapter may recover from a respondent ordered to
pay fees under subsection (6) of this section the same fees for service
and mileage authorized by RCW 36.18.040 to be collected by sheriffs.
(10) In any situation where an order is terminated or modified
before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward on or
before the next judicial day a true copy of the modified order or the
termination order to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified
in the modified or termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the
law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it in the law enforcement
information system.

--- END ---