BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that decisions made by
governing boards of each respective college greatly impact the lives of
students and that student participation in the decision-making process
can provide insight into the impacts of actions by trustees that are
not always measurable through reports and statistics. Students are on
campus every day using services and experiencing aspects of the college
that board members may see only on paper, providing a unique and
valuable perspective that should not be overlooked.
Students serving on governing boards of institutions of higher
education have proven effective in Washington and in over thirty other
states. For over ten years students at Washington's four-year
institutions of higher education have served as voting members on the
board of trustees, regents, and the higher education coordinating
board; providing greater depth in board deliberations and a well-educated conduit for students to voice ideas and concerns.
The student perspective at community colleges also brings the board
closer to the student community. Student populations at community
colleges are the most diverse of any institution of higher education in
the state. Being on campus and in class every day, students are
exposed to a more diverse group than any member of the board
representing any one group of the community.
Student positions on governing boards are also a valuable tool for
developing leadership through experiential learning. Student members
learn processes of institutional governance, become involved in campus
projects, analyze policy proposals, participate in board discussions
and decision making.
It is the intent of the legislature to enhance community college
governance by fostering a more dynamic relationship between students
and the colleges through the encouragement of student participation in
policy development and decision making at the district and state level.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.100 and 1991 c 238 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, except as provided in section 3 of this act,
who shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st
of the year in which appointed. In making such appointments the
governor shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and
representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities,
in the membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees
for districts containing technical colleges shall include at least one
member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chairman
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, each board of trustees for each
college district, by majority vote, may establish a sixth trustee that
shall be filled by a student. The governor shall select each student
member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the associated student government or its equivalent
of the college district. The student member shall hold his or her
office for a term of one year, beginning July 1st and ending June 30th,
or until the student member's successor is appointed and qualified,
whichever is later. The student member must be a student in good
standing at the community college at the time of appointment and
throughout the term of service. The student trustee should be enrolled
as a full-time or part-time student in good academic standing
throughout the student's term on the board of trustees, except summer
term. Should the student trustee fail to be enrolled at the college or
forfeit his or her academic standing, the trustee appointment
terminates and a new appointment must be made in the same manner as the
original appointment.
(2) A student appointed under this section must excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.050 and 1991 c 238 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the "state board for community and
technical colleges", to consist of ((nine)) ten members who represent
the geographic diversity of the state, one of whom must be a student,
and who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate. Not including the student member, at least two members shall
reside east of the Cascade mountains. The addition of the student
member shall be done within existing resources. In making these
appointments, the governor shall attempt to provide geographic balance
and give consideration to representing labor, business, women, and
racial and ethnic minorities, among the membership of the board. At
least one member of the board shall be from business and at least one
member of the board shall be from labor. The current members of the
state board for community college education on September 1, 1991, shall
serve on the state board for community and technical colleges until
their terms expire. Successors to these members shall be appointed
according to the terms of this section. A ninth member shall be
appointed by September 1, 1991, for a complete term.
The successors of the members initially appointed shall be
appointed for terms of four years except that a person appointed to
fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be
appointed only for the remainder of such term. The student member
shall hold his or her office for a term of one year, beginning July 1st
and ending June 30th, or until the student member's successor is
appointed and qualified, whichever is later. Each member shall serve
until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor. All
members shall be citizens and bona fide residents of the state.
Members of the college board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each day actually
spent in attending to the duties as a member of the college board.
The members of the college board may be removed by the governor for
inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office, in the manner
provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

--- END ---