BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
No local health jurisdiction may establish standards for freezing
food that requires a business to purchase a specified type of freezing
equipment if the freezing equipment that the business uses:
(1) Is capable of complying with the temperature standards adopted
by the state board of health; and
(2) Was manufactured after January 1, 2000.

--- END ---