BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.52.010 and 2007 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public utility district may include along with, or as part
of, its regular customer billings((,)) a request for voluntary
contributions to assist qualified low-income residential customers of
the district in paying their electricity bills. All funds received by
the district in response to such requests shall be (((1))) (a)
transmitted (((a))) (i) to the grantee of the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs for the state
in the district's service area or (((b))) (ii) to a charitable
organization within the district's service area; or (((2))) (b)
retained by the district. All such funds shall be used solely to
supplement assistance to low-income residential customers of the
district in paying their electricity bills. The grantee, charitable
organization, or district is responsible to determine which of the
district's customers are qualified for low-income assistance and the
amount of assistance to be provided to those who are qualified.
(2) A public utility district may include with or as part of its
regular customer billings, a request for voluntary contributions to
assist qualified low-income residential customers of the district in
paying their water and sewer bills. All funds received by the district
as a result of these requests shall be transmitted to a charitable
organization within the district's service area or retained by the
district and distributed solely to assist qualified low-income
residential customers in paying their water and sewer bills. The
charitable organization or district is responsible for determining
which of the district's customers are qualified to receive low-income
assistance and the amount of assistance provided to qualified
customers.

--- END ---