BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Mineral" means rock, stone, sand, and gravel.
(2) "Person" means "person" as defined in RCW 82.04.030.
(3) "Producer" means any person subject to tax under chapter 82.04
RCW who, from the person's own land or from the land of another under
a right or license granted by lease or other contract, either directly
or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical
services, severs minerals for sale or for commercial or industrial use.
(4) "Severance" or "sever" means the taking of or producing from
the lands or waters of this state any mineral by whatever means used.
(5) "Value" means "value of products" as determined under RCW
82.04.450.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative body of any county, by
ordinance, may impose an excise tax upon the privilege of severing
minerals from the land or waters within the county. The tax is imposed
upon the entire production in the county regardless of the place of
sale or that delivery may be made outside the county or the state. The
tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law.
(2) The tax imposed by this chapter on the severance of minerals is
the liability of the producer.
(3) The rate of the tax imposed is up to five percent.
(4) The measure of the tax is the value of the minerals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Counties must contract, no less than
seventy-five days prior to the effective date of an ordinance imposing
the severance tax, for the administration and collection of the tax by
the department. A county must provide the department with at least
seventy-five days' notice prior to the expiration of the tax in section
2 of this act and the department must notify affected taxpayers before
the expiration. The department must deduct an amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department must be deposited in the county severance
taxation account created in the state treasury.
(2) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute moneys in the
county severance taxation account to counties imposing a county
severance tax authorized in section 2 of this act. Fifty percent of
the moneys must be deposited in the county general fund and fifty
percent must be deposited into the county road fund. Except as
provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in
the county severance taxation account must be credited to the county
severance taxation account and distributed monthly to the counties
imposing the tax. The state treasurer must make the distribution under
this section without appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The taxes imposed under this chapter are
due and payable monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the
month in which the taxable activity occurs. The department may relieve
any taxpayer from the obligation of filing a monthly return and may
require the return to cover other periods, but in no event may periodic
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. In such cases tax
returns and payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return. The
department must assign a reporting frequency for the tax authorized in
this chapter that coincides with the taxpayer's reporting frequency for
the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(2) The taxpayer must file a return, upon the forms, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.080, setting forth the
information, as the department may require, showing the amount of tax
for which the taxpayer is liable for the reporting period. The
taxpayer must transmit the return and remit payment of the amount due
to the department by the due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following are exempt from the taxes
imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any minerals severed from the land or waters by a
person and incorporated into a construction project located on the site
where the minerals were severed;
(2) The value of any minerals owned by a producer:
(a) Regulated by chapters 78.56 and 78.44 RCW; or
(b) Exempt from tax by reason of federal law or a compact
negotiated by the state with a tribal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax
authorized in section 2 of this act. The department may adopt any
administrative rules necessary for the effective administration of this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the county severance taxation account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of licensing services account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multiagency permitting team account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state
patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties
account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---