BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.260.010 and 2007 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Close supervision" means that a supervising dentist whose
patient is being treated has personally diagnosed the condition to be
treated and has personally authorized the procedures to be performed.
The supervising dentist is continuously on-site and physically present
in the treatment facility while the procedures are performed by the
assistive personnel and capable of responding immediately in the event
of an emergency. The term does not require a supervising dentist to be
physically present in the operatory.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state dental quality
assurance commission created in chapter 18.32 RCW.
(3) "Dental anesthesia assistant" means a dental assistant or
expanded function dental auxiliary who is authorized to perform
functions under sections 3 and 4 of this act under the direct visual
supervision of a oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthetist.
(4) "Dental assistant" means a person who is registered by the
commission to provide supportive services to a licensed dentist to the
extent provided in this chapter and under the close supervision of a
dentist.
(((4))) (5) "Dentist" means an individual who holds a license to
practice dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the department of health.
(((6))) (7) "Direct visual supervision" means supervision by an
oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist by verbal
command and under direct line of sight.
(8) "Expanded function dental auxiliary" means a person who is
licensed by the commission to provide supportive services to a licensed
dentist to the extent provided in this chapter and under the specified
level of supervision of a dentist.
(((7))) (9) "General supervision" means that a supervising dentist
has examined and diagnosed the patient and provided subsequent
instructions to be performed by the assistive personnel, but does not
require that the dentist be physically present in the treatment
facility.
(((8))) (10) "Oral and maxillofacial surgeon" has the same meaning
as in RCW 18.32.020.
(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((9))) (12) "Supervising dentist" means a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW that is responsible for providing the appropriate
level of supervision for dental assistants and expanded function dental
auxiliaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW
to read as follows:
No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
certified dental anesthesia assistant by use of any title or
description without being certified by the commission as having met the
standards established for certification under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall certify as a dental anesthesia assistant
any dental assistant or expanded function dental auxiliary who provides
the commission with:
(a) An application, on a form provided by the department, with the
applicant's name, address, and name and location of the oral and
maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist where the assistant
will be performing his or her services;
(b) An application fee, as determined by the secretary of health as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280; and
(c) Satisfactory evidence of:
(i) Completion of a commission-approved dental anesthesia assistant
training course, to include intravenous access or phlebotomy;
(ii) Completion of a commission-approved basic life support/cardiac
pulmonary resuscitation course; and
(iii) The valid general anesthesia permit of the oral and
maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist where the assistant
will be performing his or her services.
(2) The commission may adopt rules for the requirements for renewal
of the certification, including continuing education requirements
consistent with national oral and maxillofacial surgery requirements.
(3) The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of registrations as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any dental anesthesia assistant certified pursuant to this
chapter shall perform the functions authorized in this chapter only by
delegation of authority from the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or
dental anesthesiologist and under the supervision, as described in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, of the oral and maxillofacial
surgeon or dental anesthesiologist acting within the scope of his or
her license.
(2) Under close supervision, the dental anesthesia assistant may:
(a) Initiate and discontinue an intravenous line for a patient
being prepared to receive intravenous medications, sedation, or general
anesthesia; and
(b) Adjust the rate of intravenous fluids infusion.
(3) Under direct visual supervision, the dental anesthesia
assistant may:
(a) Draw up and prepare medications;
(b) Follow instructions to deliver medications into an intravenous
line upon verbal command;
(c) Adjust an electronic device to provide medications, such as an
infusion pump;
(d) Administer emergency medications to a patient in order to
assist the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist in
an emergency.
(4) Any oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist
delegating duties under this section must have a valid general
anesthesia permit.
(5) The responsibility for monitoring a patient and determining the
selection of the drug, dosage, and timing of all anesthetic medications
rests solely with the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental
anesthesiologist.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.32.030 and 2007 c 269 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the
operation of the provisions of this chapter:
(1) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases in the
practice of his or her profession by a physician or surgeon, licensed
as such and registered under the laws of this state, unless the
physician or surgeon undertakes to or does reproduce lost parts of the
human teeth in the mouth or to restore or to replace in the human mouth
lost or missing teeth;
(2) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of official duties
by dentists in the United States federal services on federal
reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast
guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian
affairs;
(3) Dental schools or colleges approved under RCW 18.32.040, and
the practice of dentistry by students in accredited dental schools or
colleges approved by the commission, when acting under the direction
and supervision of Washington state-licensed dental school faculty;
(4) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states
or countries while appearing as clinicians at meetings of the
Washington state dental association, or component parts thereof, or at
meetings sanctioned by them, or other groups approved by the
commission;
(5) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiographs or
similar records of dental or oral tissues, under the supervision of a
licensed dentist or physician;
(6) The making, repairing, altering, or supplying of artificial
restorations, substitutions, appliances, or materials for the
correction of disease, loss, deformity, malposition, dislocation,
fracture, injury to the jaws, teeth, lips, gums, cheeks, palate, or
associated tissues or parts; providing the same are made, repaired,
altered, or supplied pursuant to the written instructions and order of
a licensed dentist which may be accompanied by casts, models, or
impressions furnished by the dentist, and the prescriptions shall be
retained and filed for a period of not less than three years and shall
be available to and subject to the examination of the secretary or the
secretary's authorized representatives;
(7) The removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the
teeth, the application of topical preventative or prophylactic agents,
and the polishing and smoothing of restorations, when performed or
prescribed by a dental hygienist licensed under the laws of this state;
(8) A qualified and licensed physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon extracting teeth or performing oral surgery
pursuant to the scope of practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(9) The performing of dental operations or services by registered
dental assistants, certified dental anesthesia assistants, and licensed
expanded function dental auxiliaries holding a credential issued under
chapter 18.260 RCW when performed under the supervision of a licensed
dentist, or by other persons not licensed under this chapter if the
person is licensed pursuant to chapter 18.29, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.79
RCW as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse
practitioners, each while acting within the scope of the person's
permitted practice under the person's license: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That
such persons shall in no event perform the following dental operations
or services unless permitted to be performed by the person under this
chapter or chapters 18.29, 18.57, 18.71, 18.79 as it applies to
registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners, and
18.260 RCW:
(a) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity;
(b) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human
teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;
(c) Any administration of general or injected local anaesthetic of
any nature in connection with a dental operation, including intravenous
sedation;
(d) Any oral prophylaxis;
(e) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.120.020 and 2010 c 286 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental
health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW;
dental anesthesia assistants certified under chapter 18.260 RCW; and
nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.040 and 2010 c 286 s 18 and 2010 c 65 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter
18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered and
advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiv) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(xxv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; and
(xxvi) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses, certifications, and registrations issued under chapter 18.260
RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---