BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.350 and 2009 c 369 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the
secretary of state the following information from the records of each
individual who requested a voter registration or transfer at a driver's
license facility: The name, address, date of birth, gender of the
applicant, the driver's license number, citizenship status, and the
date on which the application for voter registration or transfer was
submitted. The secretary of state shall process the registrations and
transfers as an electronic application and only register those
individuals whose eligibility is established. If United States
citizenship has not been established, the secretary may not issue a
voter registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must adopt rules within ninety days after the
effective date of this section to establish procedures for verifying
that a driver's license or identicard applicant is a United States
citizen or that the applicant's presence in the United States is
authorized under federal law, including determining which documents are
adequate to provide proof of citizenship or legal presence. The
department may not accept a driver's license or identicard issued by
another state as documentation if the other state does not require its
driver's license or identicard applicants to provide proof of United
States citizenship or proof of authorized presence in the United States
under federal law.
(2) The department must indicate in its records the citizenship
status of each driver's license and identicard applicant who is issued
a driver's license or identicard under this chapter.
(3) Unless the department chooses to issue a driver's license
marked "not valid for identification purposes" under section 3 of this
act, the department must not issue a driver's license if it is unable
to verify that the applicant is a United States citizen or that the
applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal
law.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.035 and 2008 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may not issue an identicard or a Washington state
driver's license that is valid for identification purposes unless the
applicant meets the identification requirements of subsection (1), (2),
or (3) of this section and the identification requirements of
subsection (4) of this section.
(1) A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide the
department with at least one of the following pieces of valid
identifying documentation that contains the signature and a photograph
of the applicant:
(a) A valid or recently expired driver's license or instruction
permit that includes the date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A Washington state identicard or an identification card issued
by another state;
(c) An identification card issued by the United States, a state, or
an agency of either the United States or a state, of a kind commonly
used to identify the members or employees of the government agency;
(d) A military identification card;
(e) A United States passport; or
(f) ((An immigration and naturalization)) A citizenship and
immigration services form.
(2) An applicant who is a minor may establish identity by providing
an affidavit of the applicant's parent or guardian. The parent or
guardian must accompany the minor and display or provide:
(a) At least one piece of documentation in subsection (1) of this
section establishing the identity of the parent or guardian; and
(b) Additional documentation establishing the relationship between
the parent or guardian and the applicant.
(3) A person unable to provide identifying documentation as
specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may request that the
department review other available documentation in order to ascertain
identity. The department may waive the requirement if it finds that
other documentation clearly establishes the identity of the applicant.
Notwithstanding the requirements in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue an identicard to an applicant for whom it
receives documentation pursuant to RCW 74.13.283.
(4) A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide the
department with documentation that the applicant is a United States
citizen or that the applicant's presence in the United States is
authorized under federal law.
(5) An identicard or a driver's license that includes a photograph
that has been renewed by mail or by electronic commerce is valid for
identification purposes if the applicant met the identification
requirements of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section at the time
of previous issuance.
(((5))) (6) The form of an applicant's name, as established under
this section, is the person's name of record for the purposes of this
chapter.
(((6))) (7) If the applicant is unable to prove his or her identity
under this section or if the department has not verified citizenship or
legal presence under section 2 of this act, the department shall
plainly label the license "not valid for identification purposes."

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity and proves that he or she is a
United States citizen or is authorized under federal law to be present
in the United States, as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance or on the date the applicant's authorization to be
within the United States expires, whichever occurs first. If there is
no definite end to the period of authorized stay, the identicard
expires one year after the date of issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.155 and 2009 c 369 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a
license or identicard under this chapter and if an applicant provides
proof of United States citizenship as required under RCW 46.20.035(4),
the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant wants to register
to vote or transfer his or her voter registration by asking the
following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(2) "Are you or will you be eighteen years of age on or before the
next election?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then submit the registration or transfer. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit
a voter registration application.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.181 and 1999 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
driver's license expires on the fifth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license or on the date the
licensee's authorization to be within the United States expires,
whichever occurs first. If there is no definite end to the period of
authorized stay, the driver's license expires one year after the date
of issuance.
(2) A person may renew his or her license on or before the
expiration date by submitting an application as prescribed by the
department and paying a fee of twenty-five dollars. This fee includes
the fee for the required photograph.
(3) A person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty
days after the license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten
dollars in addition to the renewal fee, unless his or her license
expired when:
(a) The person was outside the state and he or she renews the
license within sixty days after returning to this state; or
(b) The person was incapacitated and he or she renews the license
within sixty days after the termination of the incapacity.
(((4) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other
than five years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been
issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the
yearly renewal rate of licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's
license issued or renewed for a period other than five years, or that
has been extended by mail, is five dollars for each year that the
license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any
rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receiving satisfactory proof that the applicant's presence in
the United States has been reauthorized, extended, or continues without
definite end, the department may adjust the term of a driver's license
or identicard that was issued to expire on the expiration date of an
applicant's authorization to be within the United States or was issued
to expire one year from the date of issuance. The expiration date of
a driver's license or identicard may be adjusted up to the date the
applicant's authorization to be within the United States expires or up
to the full period that the driver's license or identicard could have
originally been issued, whichever occurs first. If there is no
definite end to the period of authorized stay, the expiration date may
be extended for one year. There is no additional fee for a driver's
license or identicard term adjusted under this section.

--- END ---