BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
To renew a vehicle registration, an applicant must provide proof of
being insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability
limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, a self-insurance certificate as provided in RCW 46.29.630, or proof of
coverage under a liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the motor vehicle liability insurance policy, self-insurance certificate, or liability bond required under section 1 of
this act is not renewed or is canceled, whether the nonrenewal or
cancellation is initiated by the insured, the insurance company, or the
bonding company, the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles shall
immediately notify the department. Failure to provide notice as
required under this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon learning of or receiving notice that a registered owner no
longer carries a liability insurance policy, self-insurance
certificate, or liability bond, the department shall immediately notify
the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles formerly covered under
the policy, certificate, or bond, that the registration for the vehicle
or vehicles will be canceled within thirty days from the day of the
notice unless the person in whose name the registration appears
furnishes proof to the department within that time that replacement
insurance has been obtained, or that the requirements of some other
method of proof of financial responsibility allowed under RCW 46.30.020
have been met. If that proof is not timely supplied, the department
shall immediately cancel the registration.
(3) The department shall not refund any part of a registration fee
in the event of a registration canceled under this section.

--- END ---