BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A law enforcement agency, and its officers, agents, and employees,
shall not be liable for injuries to persons or property resulting from
any act or omission of the agency, officer, agent, or employee, while
acting in the course and scope of official duties, unless the act or
omission constitutes intentional, or willful and wanton, misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections, and its agents, officers, and
employees, and the department of social and health services, and its
agents, officers, and employees, shall not be liable for injuries to
persons or property resulting from an act or omission of the agency,
officer, agent, or employee, while acting in the course and scope of
official duties, unless the act or omission constitutes intentional, or
willful and wanton, misconduct.

--- END ---