BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assistance" means emergency responders and resources provided
by a responding member jurisdiction in response to a request from a
requesting member jurisdiction.
(2) "Department" means the state military department.
(3) "Emergency" means an event or set of circumstances that: (a)
Demand immediate action to preserve public health, protect life,
protect public property, or to provide relief to any stricken community
overtaken by such occurrence; or (b) reach such a dimension or degree
of destructiveness as to warrant the governor declaring a state of
emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(4) "Emergency responder" means an employee of a responding member
jurisdiction who is designated in writing by that responding member
jurisdiction as possessing skills, qualifications, training, knowledge,
or experience that may be needed, pursuant to a request for assistance
under this chapter, for: (a) Response, mitigation, or recovery
activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in drills or
exercises in preparation for an emergency.
(5) "Operational control" means the limited authority to direct
tasks, assignments, and use of assistance provided pursuant to a
request for assistance under this chapter to address: (a) Response,
mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b)
participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.
"Operational control" does not include any right, privilege, or benefit
of ownership or employment such as disposition, compensation, wages,
salary, pensions, health benefits, leave, seniority, discipline,
promotion, hiring, or firing.
(6) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, or town in the
state of Washington.
(7) "Requesting member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
that requests assistance from another member jurisdiction under this
chapter.
(8) "Resources" includes supplies, materials, equipment,
facilities, energy, services, information, systems, and other assets
except for emergency responders that may be needed, pursuant to a
request for assistance under this chapter, for: (a) Response,
mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b)
participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.
(9) "Responding member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
providing or intending to provide assistance to a requesting member
jurisdiction under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The intrastate mutual aid system is
established to provide for mutual assistance in an emergency among
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes that
choose to participate as member jurisdictions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, member
jurisdictions of the intrastate mutual aid system include:
(a) A political subdivision; and
(b) Any federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
boundaries of the state of Washington upon receipt by the department of
a tribal government resolution declaring its intention to be a member
jurisdiction in the intrastate mutual aid system under this chapter.
(3)(a) A member jurisdiction is released from membership in the
intrastate mutual aid system established under this chapter upon
receipt by the department of a resolution or ordinance declaring that
the member jurisdiction elects not to participate in the system.
(b) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to affect other mutual
aid systems or agreements otherwise authorized by law, including the
Washington state fire services mobilization plan and the law
enforcement mobilization plan under chapter 43.43 RCW, nor preclude a
political subdivision or Indian tribe from entering or participating in
those mutual aid systems or agreements.
(4) Mutual assistance may be requested by, and provided to, member
jurisdictions under this chapter for: (a) Response, mitigation, or
recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in
drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A member jurisdiction may request assistance
from other member jurisdictions under the intrastate mutual aid system
for response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to an
emergency, or to participate in drills or exercises in preparation for
an emergency, subject to each of the following provisions:
(1) Prior to requesting assistance, a requesting member
jurisdiction must: (a) Have determined an emergency exists within its
territorial limits consistent with applicable law, rule, regulation,
code, ordinance, resolution, or other applicable legal authority; or
(b) anticipate undertaking drills or exercises in preparation for an
emergency.
(2) The chief executive officer of a requesting member
jurisdiction, or authorized designee, must request assistance directly
from the chief executive officer, or authorized designee, of another
member jurisdiction. If this request is verbal, it must be confirmed
in writing within thirty days after the date of the request.
(3) A responding member jurisdiction may withhold or withdraw
requested assistance at any time and for any reason, in its sole
discretion.
(4) A responding member jurisdiction shall designate in writing all
assistance it provides to a requesting member jurisdiction at the time
provided consistent with the guidelines and procedures developed by the
intrastate mutual aid committee, and deliver copies of this
documentation to the requesting member jurisdiction within thirty days
after the assistance is provided.
(5) The requesting member jurisdiction only has operational control
of assistance provided under this chapter, which may not interfere with
a responding member jurisdiction's right to withdraw assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An emergency responder holding a license,
certificate, or other permit evidencing qualification in a
professional, mechanical, or other skill, issued by the state of
Washington or a political subdivision thereof, is deemed to be
licensed, certified, or permitted in the requesting member jurisdiction
for the duration of the emergency, drill, or exercise, subject to any
limitations and conditions the chief executive officer of the
requesting member jurisdiction may prescribe in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An emergency responder designated by a
responding member jurisdiction under section 3(4) of this act, who dies
or sustains an injury while providing assistance to a requesting member
jurisdiction as an emergency responder under this chapter, is entitled
to receive only the benefits otherwise authorized by law for death or
injury sustained in the course of employment with the responding member
jurisdiction. Any such benefits provided by a responding member
jurisdiction to an emergency responder must be included in the true and
full value of assistance provided for purposes of reimbursement under
section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An emergency responder is not an employee of
the requesting member jurisdiction and is not entitled to any right,
privilege, or benefit of employment from the requesting member
jurisdiction, including but not limited to, compensation, wages,
salary, leave, pensions, health, or other advantage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A requesting member jurisdiction shall
reimburse a responding member jurisdiction for the true and full value
of all assistance provided under this chapter. However, if authorized
by law, a responding member jurisdiction may donate assistance provided
under this chapter to a requesting member jurisdiction.
(2) If a dispute regarding reimbursement arises between member
jurisdictions, the member jurisdiction asserting the dispute shall
provide written notice to the other identifying the reimbursement
issues in dispute. If the dispute is not resolved within ninety days
after receipt of the dispute notice by the other party, either party to
the dispute may invoke binding arbitration to resolve the reimbursement
dispute by giving written notice to the other party. Within thirty
days after receipt of the notice invoking binding arbitration, each
party shall furnish the other a list of acceptable arbitrators. The
parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree on an arbitrator,
each party shall select one arbitrator and the two arbitrators shall
select a third arbitrator for an arbitration panel. Costs of the
arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrator's services, must
be borne equally by the parties participating in the arbitration and
each party bears its own costs and expenses, including legal fees and
witness expenses, in connection with the arbitration proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 For purposes of tort liability or immunity,
an emergency responder of a responding member jurisdiction is
considered an agent of the requesting member jurisdiction. No
responding member jurisdiction or its officers or employees providing
assistance under this chapter is liable for any act or omission while
providing or attempting to provide assistance under this chapter in
good faith. For purposes of this section, good faith does not include
willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

Sec. 9 RCW 38.52.040 and 1995 c 269 s 1202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the emergency management council
(hereinafter called the council), to consist of not more than seventeen
members who shall be appointed by the governor. The membership of the
council shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of city
and county governments, sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington
state patrol, the military department, the department of ecology, state
and local fire chiefs, seismic safety experts, state and local
emergency management directors, search and rescue volunteers, medical
professions who have expertise in emergency medical care, building
officials, and private industry. The representatives of private
industry shall include persons knowledgeable in emergency and hazardous
materials management. The council members shall elect a chairman from
within the council membership. The members of the council shall serve
without compensation, but may be reimbursed for their travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.
(2) The emergency management council shall advise the governor and
the director on all matters pertaining to state and local emergency
management. The council may appoint such ad hoc committees,
subcommittees, and working groups as are required to develop specific
recommendations for the improvement of emergency management practices,
standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall ensure that the
governor receives an annual assessment of statewide emergency
preparedness including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard
mitigation and reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety
improvements, reduction of flood hazards, and coordination of hazardous
materials planning and response activities. The council or a
subcommittee thereof shall periodically convene in special session and
serve during those sessions as the state emergency response commission
required by P.L. 99-499, the emergency planning and community right-to-know act. When sitting in session as the state emergency response
commission, the council shall confine its deliberations to those items
specified in federal statutes and state administrative rules governing
the coordination of hazardous materials policy. The council shall
review administrative rules governing state and local emergency
management practices and recommend necessary revisions to the director.
(3)(a) The intrastate mutual aid committee is created and is a
subcommittee of the emergency management council. The intrastate
mutual aid committee consists of not more than five members who must be
appointed by the council chair from council membership. The chair of
the intrastate mutual aid committee is the military department
representative appointed as a member of the council. Meetings of the
intrastate mutual aid committee must be held at least annually.
(b) In support of the intrastate mutual aid system established in
chapter 38.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act),
the intrastate mutual aid committee shall develop and update guidelines
and procedures to facilitate implementation of the intrastate mutual
aid system by member jurisdictions, including but not limited to the
following: Projected or anticipated costs; checklists and forms for
requesting and providing assistance; recordkeeping; reimbursement
procedures; and other implementation issues. These guidelines and
procedures are not subject to the rule making requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 38 RCW.

--- END ---