BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.42.120 and 2003 c 144 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall transfer a water right or portion thereof
being administered for water banking purposes from the trust water
(([rights])) rights program to a third party upon occurrence of all of
the following:
(a) The department receives a request for transfer of a water right
or portion thereof currently administered by the department for water
banking purposes;
(b) The request is consistent with any previous review under RCW
90.03.380 of the water right and future temporary or permanent
beneficial uses;
(c) The request is consistent with any condition, limitation, or
agreement affecting the water right, including but not limited to any
trust water right transfer agreement executed at the time the water
right was transferred to the trust water rights program; and
(d) The request is accompanied by and is consistent with an
assignment of interest or portion thereof from a person or entity
retaining an interest in the trust water right or portion thereof to
the party requesting transfer of the water right or portion thereof.
(2) The priority date of the water right or portion thereof
transferred by the department from the trust water (([rights])) rights
program for water banking purposes shall be the priority date of the
underlying water right.
(3) The department shall issue documentation for that water right
or portion thereof to the new water right holder based on the
requirements applicable to the transfer of other water rights from the
trust water rights program. Such documentation shall include a
description of the property to which the water right will be
appurtenant after the water right or portion thereof is transferred
from the trust water (([rights])) rights program to a third party.
(4) The department shall review an application for transfer or
other utilization of a water right from the trust water rights program
under this section. In the Yakima basin, the director shall approve,
condition, or deny the application within forty-five days of receipt.
The forty-five day time period may be extended for an additional thirty
days by the department at the request of the applicant. If the
department fails to act within the prescribed time period, the
application is deemed approved.
(5) The department's decision on the transfer of a water right or
portion thereof from the trust water (([rights])) rights program for
water banking purposes may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230, or to a superior court conducting
a general adjudication under RCW 90.03.210.

--- END ---