BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The requirements of this chapter for counties and cities are
suspended and have no applicability if the average rate of total
unemployment in the county, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the
Washington state employment security department, exceeds seven percent
for three consecutive months. A suspension under this section:
(a) Is effective for five years, or until the average rate of total
unemployment in the county, seasonally adjusted, as determined by the
Washington state employment security department, is equal to or less
than seven percent for three consecutive months, whichever is later;
and
(b) Takes effect immediately upon the public release of the
applicable unemployment data by the Washington state employment
security department.
(2) Comprehensive land use plans and development regulations
adopted in accordance with the requirements of this chapter are
suspended and have no applicability in counties and cities in which the
requirements of this chapter are suspended.
(3) State agencies may take no action to enforce the requirements
of this chapter in counties and cities in which the requirements of
this chapter are suspended.

--- END ---