BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a growing
body of research indicates that successful school leadership plays a
highly significant role in improving student learning. School
leadership is second only to classroom instruction among all school-related factors that contribute to what students learn in school. The
role of the school leader has progressively shifted from building
manager to instructional leader. Effective school leaders create
vision, develop and support teachers and school staff, and strengthen
school culture. Leadership also involves direction-setting, management
of personnel and resources, and redesigning the organization when
necessary. Principals should be held accountable for these leadership
qualities.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage highly capable
individuals with qualities of leadership to become principals through
field-based, rigorous, but flexible preparation programs offered in
close collaboration with school districts. The legislature also
intends to encourage school districts to provide principals with
increased decision-making authority, including over personnel decisions
and allocation of financial resources. Finally, the legislature
intends to hold principals accountable to demonstrate the qualities
essential to lead a school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The professional educator standards
board shall establish a residency provisional principal certification
as provided under this section and sections 3 through 6 of this act.
(2) Applicants for residency provisional principal certification
must:
(a) Document professional managerial and leadership experience that
meets the standards established by the professional educator standards
board under this section;
(b) Complete a record check as required under RCW 28A.410.010;
(c) Have been admitted to an alternative route principal
certification program approved under section 6 of this act; and
(d) Be recommended for certification by a school district
superintendent as provided under section 3 of this act.
(3)(a) The professional educator standards board shall adopt
standards that define a scope and level of professional managerial and
leadership experience for residency provisional principal certification
that include at a minimum:
(i) Strategic planning;
(ii) Supervision and evaluation of personnel;
(iii) Budgeting and allocation of resources; and
(iv) Employee professional development.
(b) The standards must also include a consistent record of
satisfactory performance in previous employment.
(c) The managerial and leadership experience for residency
provisional principal certification is not required to have occurred in
a school setting.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review the qualifications of applicants and recommendations for
certification submitted by school district superintendents. If the
office determines that the requirements of this section have been met,
the office shall issue a residency provisional principal certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) School district superintendents may
recommend candidates for residency provisional principal certification.
(2) Before recommending a candidate for certification, a school
district superintendent must:
(a) Conduct a publicly announced search for the principalship of a
specific school and accept applications from individuals who are
seeking residency provisional principal certificates and from
individuals who hold continuing, residency, or professional principal
certificates issued by the professional educator standards board;
(b) Verify that the candidate meets the standards adopted by the
professional educator standards board under section 2 of this act; and
(c) Offer the candidate the principalship of the school, contingent
on the candidate receiving residency provisional principal
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The holder of a residency provisional
principal certificate must be enrolled in and demonstrate progress
toward completion of an alternative route principal certification
program approved under section 6 of this act.
(2) The holder of a residency provisional principal certificate may
serve as a school principal only in one school district for not more
than three years.
(3) Residency provisional principal certificates expire:
(a) After three years;
(b) If the program provider determines that the holder has failed
to demonstrate progress toward completion of the alternative route
principal certification program; or
(c) If the holder's employment with the school district is
terminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a residency principal certificate to a holder
of a residency provisional principal certificate if the certificate
holder has successfully completed an alternative route principal
certification program approved under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The professional educator standards
board shall adopt standards for approval of alternative route principal
certification programs, which may be offered by higher education
institutions or nonhigher education program providers.
(2) To receive approval to offer an alternative route principal
certification program, a program provider must:
(a) Operate the program in partnership with one or more
participating school districts and the Washington state leadership
academy;
(b) Design, develop, and use a principal development plan for each
candidate. The plan must specify the coursework and training required
of each candidate and must be developed by comparing the candidate's
prior experience and coursework with the performance standards for
residency principal certification. The alternative route program may
give significant weight to a candidate's prior experience;
(c) Require candidates to demonstrate competencies in the knowledge
and skills required for residency principal certification as adopted by
the professional educator standards board;
(d) Provide intensive mentoring for at least one full school year
for candidates, and an additional significant amount of time if
necessary, progressing to increasingly less intensive monitoring and
assistance as the candidate demonstrates the skills necessary to manage
and lead a school; and
(e) Demonstrate a record of success in principal preparation and
certification. If the program provider has not previously offered a
principal preparation program, the provider may submit a record of
success in preparation and certification of other educators and
evidence of appropriate knowledge and experience of the faculty and
instructors in the proposed principal certification program.
(3) The professional educator standards board may approve an
alternative route principal certification program under this section
for up to five years.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.400.100 and 2002 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School districts may employ public school principals and/or
vice principals to supervise the operation and management of the school
to which they are assigned. Such persons shall hold valid
administrative certificates and, except for persons certificated under
sections 4 and 5 of this act, shall hold or have held either valid
teacher certificates or valid educational staff associate certificates.
Persons who hold or have held valid educational staff associate
certificates must also have demonstrated successful school-based
experience in an instructional role with students. Persons whose
certificates were revoked, suspended, or surrendered may not be
employed as public school principals or vice principals.
(2) In addition to such other duties as shall be prescribed by law
and by the job description adopted by the board of directors, each
principal shall:
(((1))) (a) Assume administrative authority, responsibility and
instructional leadership, under the supervision of the school district
superintendent, and in accordance with the policies of the school
district board of directors, for the planning, management, supervision
and evaluation of the educational program of the attendance area for
which he or she is responsible((.));
(((2))) (b) Submit recommendations to the school district
superintendent regarding appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer
and dismissal of all personnel assigned to the attendance area for
which he or she is responsible((.));
(((3))) (c) Submit recommendations to the school district
superintendent regarding the fiscal needs to maintain and improve the
instructional program of the attendance area for which he or she is
responsible((.)); and
(((4))) (d) Assume administrative authority and responsibility for
the supervision, counseling and discipline of pupils in the attendance
area for which he or she is responsible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.410 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an analysis of alternative route principal
certification programs across the country. The analysis shall include
comparisons to the program established in sections 2 through 6 of this
act; the impact of the programs on student learning; and the extent
that the programs result in nontraditional principal candidates and
increased flexibility and innovation for school districts. The
institute shall submit a report to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2011, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---