BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.051 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
Applicants for licensure to practice medicine who have graduated
from a school of medicine located outside of the states, territories,
and possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the
Dominion of Canada, shall file an application for licensure with the
commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the
commission. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the
commission of the following:
(1) That he or she has completed in a school of medicine a resident
course of professional instruction equivalent to that required in this
chapter for applicants generally;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, that he or she
meets all the requirements which must be met by graduates of the United
States and Canadian school of medicine except that he or she need not
have graduated from a school of medicine approved by the commission;
(b) An applicant for licensure under this section is not required
to meet the requirements of RCW 18.71.050(1)(b) if he or she furnishes
proof satisfactory to the commission that he or she has:
(i)(A) Been admitted as a permanent immigrant to the United States
as a person of exceptional ability in sciences pursuant to the rules of
the United States department of labor; or
(B) Been issued a permanent immigration visa; and
(ii) Received multiple sclerosis certified specialist status from
the consortium of multiple sclerosis centers; and
(iii) Successfully completed at least twenty-four months of
training in multiple sclerosis at an educational institution in the
United States with an accredited residency program in neurology or
rehabilitation;
(3) That he or she has satisfactorily passed the examination given
by the educational council for foreign medical graduates or has met the
requirements in lieu thereof as set forth in rules adopted by the
commission;
(4) That he or she has the ability to read, write, speak,
understand, and be understood in the English language.

--- END ---