BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Providing students with the opportunity to graduate from high
school with the knowledge and skills to be successful in today's world
is now clearly part of Washington's definition of a basic education.
Some students will only achieve this objective with supplemental
interventions, support, and counseling;
(b) Dropout prevention is a fundamental strategy for strengthening
society, building the economy, reducing crime, reducing government
spending, and increasing individual freedom and opportunity;
(c) There are known and proven strategies to reduce the dropout
rate, including ones that are successful for high-risk and troubled
students. For example, the opportunity internship program, the jobs
for America's graduates program, the building bridges program, and
individualized student support services provided by the college success
foundation have all had a measurable impact on helping at-risk students
be successful in school. In addition, the Everett school district
successfully increased its extended graduation rate from fifty-three
percent in 2003 to ninety percent in 2010 by tracking the progress
toward graduation of each student and assigning success coordinators to
ensure students pursued all possible avenues to complete and make up
credits. The Renton school district, through a combination of
leadership, community partnerships and resources, and high expectations
for all students, has increased its graduation rate to ninety percent,
with ninety-six percent of graduating seniors in 2010 meeting
proficiency on the state high school assessments. However, these types
of models have never been brought to scale; and
(d) For every dropout prevented, the chances of that person
committing a crime are reduced by twenty percent, and that person
stands to increase his or her lifetime earnings by three hundred
thousand dollars in today's dollars. In addition, for every dropout
prevented, taxpayers save an estimated ten thousand five hundred
dollars per year for each year of the individual's life between the
ages of twenty and sixty-five.
(2) Therefore, the state should use a dual strategy of making
front-end investments in proven programs in order to expand them into
an effective dropout prevention and intervention system, while
simultaneously recognizing and rewarding actual success in reducing the
dropout rate by investing a portion of the savings generated from each
prevented dropout in the public schools.
(3) The legislature recognizes that the current fiscal climate in
the state is a likely contributing factor to an increase in dropout
rates. Reductions in state funding for schools are often felt first in
student support services, counseling, supplemental instruction and
tutoring, and increased class size, all of which affect struggling
students. A poor economy negatively affects families through
unemployment, uncertainty, and reduced public services, and students
bring these stresses with them to school. If allowed to go
unaddressed, these economic and fiscal circumstances are likely to slow
or reverse progress on improving high school completion rates.
Therefore, a concentrated effort at improvement is required at this
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The pay for actual student success (PASS) program is created
under this section and sections 3 through 8 of this act to invest in
proven dropout prevention and intervention programs as provided in
section 3 of this act and provide a financial award for high schools
that demonstrate improvement in the dropout prevention indicators
established under section 4 of this act. The legislature finds that
increased accumulation of credits and reductions in incidents of
student discipline lead to improved graduation rates.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the building
bridges working group, the higher education coordinating board, and the
college scholarship organization under section 3(4) of this act shall
collaborate to assure that the programs under section 3 of this act
operate systematically and are expanded to include as many additional
students and schools as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, funds shall be
allocated as specified in the omnibus appropriations act to support the
PASS program through the following programs:
(1) The opportunity internship program under RCW 28C.18.160 through
28C.18.168;
(2) The jobs for America's graduates program administered through
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(3) The building bridges program under RCW 28A.175.025, to be used
to expand programs that have been implemented by building bridges
partnerships and determined by the building bridges work group to be
successful in reducing dropout rates, or to replicate such programs in
new partnerships; and
(4) Individualized student support services provided by a college
scholarship organization with expertise in managing scholarships for
low-income, high potential students and foster care youth under
contract with the higher education coordinating board, including but
not limited to college and career advising, counseling, tutoring,
community mentor programs, and leadership development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, must:
(a) Calculate the annual extended graduation rate for each high
school, which is the rate at which a class of students enters high
school as freshmen and graduates with a high school diploma, including
students who receive a high school diploma after the year they were
expected to graduate. The office may statistically adjust the rate for
student demographics in the high school, including the number of
students eligible for free and reduced price meals, special education
and English language learner students, students of various racial and
ethnic backgrounds, and student mobility;
(b) Annually calculate the proportion of students at grade level
for each high school, which shall be measured by the number of credits
a student has accumulated at the end of each school year compared to
the total number required for graduation. For the purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), the office shall adopt a standard definition of "at
grade level" for each high school grade;
(c) Annually calculate the proportion of students in each high
school who are suspended or expelled from school, as reported by the
high school. In-school suspensions shall not be included in the
calculation. Improvement on the indicator under this subsection (1)(c)
shall be measured by a reduction in the number of students suspended or
expelled from school; and
(d) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, annually measure
student attendance in each high school as provided under section 10 of
this act.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may add
dropout prevention indicators to the list of indicators under
subsection (1) of this section, such as student grades, state
assessment mastery, or student retention.
(3) To the maximum extent possible, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall rely on data collected
through the comprehensive education data and research system to
calculate the dropout prevention indicators under this section and
shall minimize additional data collection from schools and school
districts unless necessary to meet the requirements of this section.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a metric for measuring the performance of each high school on
the indicators under subsection (1) of this section that assigns points
for each indicator and results in a single numeric dropout prevention
score for each high school. The office shall weight the extended
graduation rate indicator within the metric so that a high school does
not qualify for an award under section 5 of this act without an
increase in its extended graduation rate. The metric used through the
2012-13 school year shall include the indicators in subsection (1)(a)
through (c) of this section and shall measure improvement against the
2010-11 school year as the baseline year. Beginning in the 2013-14
school year, the metric shall also include the indicator in subsection
(1)(d) of this section, with improvement in this indicator measured
against the 2012-13 school year as the baseline year. The office may
establish a minimum level of improvement in a high school's dropout
prevention score for the high school to qualify for a PASS program
award under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose or otherwise
available in the account established in section 7 of this act,
beginning in the 2011-12 school year and each year thereafter, a high
school that demonstrates improvement in its dropout prevention score
compared to the baseline school year as calculated under section 4 of
this act may receive a PASS program award as provided under this
section. The legislature intends to recognize and reward continuous
improvement by using a baseline year for calculating eligibility for
PASS program awards so that a high school retains previously earned
award funds from one year to the next unless its performance declines.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
determine the amount of PASS program awards based on appropriated funds
and eligible high schools. The intent of the legislature is to provide
an award to each eligible high school commensurate with the degree of
improvement in the high school's dropout prevention score and the size
of the high school. The office must establish a minimum award amount.
If funds available for PASS program awards are not sufficient to
provide an award to each eligible high school, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish objective criteria
to prioritize awards based on eligible high schools with the greatest
need for additional dropout prevention and intervention services. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall encourage and
may require a high school receiving a PASS program award to demonstrate
an amount of community matching funds or an amount of in-kind community
services to support dropout prevention and intervention.
(c) Ninety percent of an award under this section must be allocated
to the eligible high school to be used for dropout prevention
activities in the school as specified in subsection (2) of this
section. The principal of the high school shall determine the use of
funds after consultation with parents and certificated and classified
staff of the school.
(d) Ten percent of an award under this section must be allocated to
the school district in which the eligible high school is located to be
used for dropout prevention activities as specified in subsection (2)
of this section in the high school or in other schools in the district.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
withhold distribution of award funds under this section to an otherwise
eligible high school or school district if the superintendent of public
instruction issues a finding that the school or school district has
willfully manipulated the dropout prevention indicators under section
4 of this act, for example by expelling, suspending, transferring, or
refusing to enroll students at risk of dropping out of school or at
risk of low achievement.
(2) High schools and school districts may use PASS program award
funds for any programs or activities that support the development of a
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system as described
in RCW 28A.175.074, offered directly by the school or school district
or under contract with education agencies or community-based
organizations, including but not limited to educational service
districts, workforce development councils, and boys and girls clubs.
Such programs or activities may include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Strategies to close the achievement gap for disadvantaged
students and minority students;
(b) Use of graduation coaches as defined in section 6 of this act;
(c) Opportunity internship activities under RCW 28C.18.164;
(d) Dropout reengagement programs provided by community-based
organizations or community and technical colleges;
(e) Comprehensive guidance and planning programs as defined under
RCW 28A.600.045, including but not limited to the navigation 101
program;
(f) Reduced class sizes, extended school day, extended school year,
and tutoring programs for students identified as at risk of dropping
out of school, including instruction to assist these students in
meeting graduation requirements in mathematics and science;
(g) Outreach and counseling targeted to students identified as at
risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped out of school, to
encourage them to consider learning alternatives such as
preapprenticeship programs, skill centers, running start, technical
high schools, and other options for completing a high school diploma;
(h) Preapprenticeship programs or running start for the trades
initiatives under RCW 49.04.190;
(i) Mentoring programs for students;
(j) Development and use of dropout early warning data systems;
(k) Counseling, resource and referral services, and intervention
programs to address social, behavioral, and health factors associated
with dropping out of school;
(l) Implementing programs for in-school suspension or other
strategies to avoid excluding middle and high school students from the
school whenever possible;
(m) Parent engagement activities such as home visits and off-campus
parent support group meetings related to dropout prevention and
reengagement; and
(n) Early learning programs for prekindergarten students.
(3) High schools and school districts are encouraged to implement
dropout prevention and reengagement strategies in a comprehensive and
systematic manner, using strategic planning, school improvement plans,
evaluation and feedback, and response to intervention tools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of section 5 of this act, a "graduation coach"
means a staff person assigned to identify and provide intervention
services to students who have dropped out or are at risk of dropping
out of school or of not graduating on time through the following
activities:
(1) Monitoring and advising on individual student progress toward
graduation;
(2) Providing student support services and case management;
(3) Motivating students to focus on a graduation plan;
(4) Encouraging parent and community involvement;
(5) Connecting parents and students with appropriate school and
community resources;
(6) Securing supplemental academic services for students;
(7) Implementing schoolwide dropout prevention programs and
interventions; and
(8) Analyzing data to identify at-risk students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The high school completion account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to make investments in
proven dropout prevention and intervention programs under section 3 of
this act and to make PASS program awards under section 5 of this act.
Revenues to the account include any appropriations made by the
legislature for the purposes of sections 3 and 5 of this act, federal
funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or foundations, and
other sources. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
regularly inform high schools and school districts about the
opportunities under section 3 of this act to receive funding to
implement programs that have been proven to reduce dropout rates and
increase graduation rates, as well as the opportunities under section
5 of this act for high schools to receive a financial incentive for
success. Within available funds, the office shall develop systemic,
ongoing strategies for identifying and disseminating successful dropout
prevention and reengagement programs and strategies and for
incorporating dropout prevention and reengagement into high school and
school district strategic planning and improvement. The office may
offer support and assistance to schools and districts through regional
networks. The office shall make every effort to keep dropout
prevention and reduction of the dropout rate a top priority for school
directors, administrators, and teachers.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.175.035 and 2007 c 408 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Identify criteria for grants and evaluate proposals for funding
in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board;
(b) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(i) Identify students who both fail the Washington assessment of
student learning and drop out of school;
(ii) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(iii) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(iv) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing the building bridges program; and
(v) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about the building
bridges program to the local community;
(c) In setting the requirements under (b) of this subsection,
encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in implementing the
local building bridges program;
(d) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(e) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(i) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster youth or youth involved in the juvenile
justice system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language
spoken at a student's home;
(ii) Washington assessment of student learning scores;
(iii) Dropout rates;
(iv) On-time graduation rates;
(v) Extended graduation rates;
(vi) Credentials obtained;
(vii) Absenteeism rates;
(viii) Truancy rates; and
(ix) Credit retrieval;
(f) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership. The third-party
contractor shall also evaluate the performance and effectiveness of the
partnerships relative to the type of entity, as identified in RCW
28A.175.045, serving as the lead agency for the partnership; and
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(2) In performing its duties under this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consult with the
work group identified in RCW 28A.175.075.
(3) In selecting recipients for grant funds appropriated under
section 3 of this act, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall use a streamlined and expedited application and
review process for those programs that have already proven to be
successful in dropout prevention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing a standard definition of student absence from school. In
adopting the definition, the superintendent shall review current
practices in Washington school districts, definitions used in other
states, and any national standards or definitions used by the national
center for education statistics or other national groups. The
superintendent shall also consult with the building bridges work group
established under RCW 28A.175.075.
(b) Using the definition of student absence adopted under this
section, the superintendent shall establish an indicator for measuring
student attendance in high schools for purposes of the PASS program
under section 2 of this act.
(2)(a) The K-12 data governance group under RCW 28A.300.507 shall
establish the parameters and an implementation schedule for statewide
collection through the comprehensive education and data research system
of: (i) Student attendance data using the definitions of student
absence adopted under this section; and (ii) student discipline data
with a focus on suspensions and expulsions from school.
(b) At a minimum, school districts must collect and submit student
attendance data and student discipline data for high school students
through the comprehensive education and data research system for
purposes of the PASS program under section 2 of this act beginning in
the 2012-13 school year.

--- END ---