BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that significant
changes have been made in recent years to improve Washington's
mathematics standards. Additional mathematics coursework, at a more
rigorous level, will be required for high school graduation. Efforts
to increase the rigor of high school mathematics will ultimately not be
successful unless students in elementary and middle school are better
prepared in mathematics. Successful preparation is more likely to
occur if students have the opportunity to receive instruction from a
teacher with proficiency in both mathematics content and effective
instructional methods in mathematics for elementary and middle school
students. It is the legislature's intent to encourage elementary
teachers who enjoy and excel in mathematics to become specialists, and
to encourage school districts to assign these specialists to teach
elementary and middle school mathematics, thereby transmitting both
their expertise and their enthusiasm for the subject to their students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, an elementary mathematics
specialist is a certificated teacher who has demonstrated at least the
following knowledge and skills:
(a) Enhanced mathematics content knowledge and skills necessary to
provide students in grades kindergarten through eight a deep
understanding of the essential academic learning requirements and
performance expectations in mathematics;
(b) Knowledge and skills in a variety of instructional strategies
for teaching mathematics content; and
(c) Knowledge and skills in instructional strategies targeted for
students struggling with mathematics.
(2) The legislature encourages the professional educator standards
board to develop standards for and adopt a specialty endorsement for
elementary mathematics specialists as defined under this section.
(3) School districts may work with local colleges and universities,
educator preparation programs, and educational service districts to
develop and offer training and professional development opportunities
in the knowledge and skills necessary for a teacher to be considered an
elementary mathematics specialist under this section.
(4) School districts are encouraged to use elementary mathematics
specialists for direct instruction of students using an itinerant
teacher model where the specialist rotates from classroom to classroom
within the school.

--- END ---