BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.070 and 1994 c 245 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The life-threatening dangers of acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome (AIDS) and its prevention shall be taught in the public
schools of this state. AIDS prevention education shall be limited to
the discussion of the life-threatening dangers of the disease, its
spread, and prevention. Students shall receive such education at least
once each school year beginning no later than the fifth grade.
(2) Each district board of directors shall adopt an AIDS prevention
education program which is developed in consultation with teachers,
administrators, parents, and other community members including, but not
limited to, persons from medical, public health, and mental health
organizations and agencies so long as the curricula and materials
developed for use in the AIDS education program either (a) are the
model curricula and resources under subsection (3) of this section, or
(b) are developed by the school district and approved for medical
accuracy by the office on AIDS established in RCW 70.24.250. If a
district elects to use curricula developed by the school district, the
district shall submit to the office on AIDS a copy of its curricula and
an affidavit of medical accuracy stating that the material in the
district-developed curricula has been compared to the model curricula
for medical accuracy and that in the opinion of the district the
district-developed materials are medically accurate. Upon submission
of the affidavit and curricula, the district may use these materials
until the approval procedure to be conducted by the office of AIDS has
been completed.
(3) Model curricula and other resources available from the
superintendent of public instruction may be reviewed by the school
district board of directors, in addition to materials designed locally,
in developing the district's AIDS education program. The model
curricula shall be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS
established in RCW 70.24.250 within the department of social and health
services.
(4) Each school district shall, at least one month before teaching
AIDS prevention education in any classroom, conduct at least one
presentation during weekend and evening hours for the parents and
guardians of students concerning the curricula and materials that will
be used for such education. The parents and guardians shall be
notified by the school district of the presentation and that the
curricula and materials are available for inspection. ((No student may
be required to participate in AIDS prevention education if the
student's parent or guardian, having attended one of the district
presentations, objects in writing to the participation.)) A public
school student may attend or participate in AIDS prevention education
only if the school or school district has on file a signed confirmation
from the student's parent or legal guardian that the parent or legal
guardian has received notification of planned instruction in AIDS
prevention education, has been offered the opportunity to attend a
presentation and inspect the curricula and materials, and approves of
the student's attendance or participation.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction with the
assistance of the office on AIDS shall update AIDS education curriculum
material as newly discovered medical facts make it necessary.
(6) The curriculum for AIDS prevention education shall be designed
to teach students which behaviors place a person dangerously at risk of
infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and methods to
avoid such risk including, at least:
(a) The dangers of drug abuse, especially that involving the use of
hypodermic needles; and
(b) The dangers of sexual intercourse, with or without condoms.
(7) The program of AIDS prevention education shall stress the life-threatening dangers of contracting AIDS and shall stress that
abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain means for the
prevention of the spread or contraction of the AIDS virus through
sexual contact. It shall also teach that condoms and other artificial
means of birth control are not a certain means of preventing the spread
of the AIDS virus and reliance on condoms puts a person at risk for
exposure to the disease.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.475 and 2007 c 265 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, every public school that offers sexual
health education must assure that sexual health education is medically
and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, appropriate for students
regardless of gender, race, disability status, or sexual orientation,
and includes information about abstinence and other methods of
preventing unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases. All
sexual health information, instruction, and materials must be medically
and scientifically accurate. Abstinence may not be taught to the
exclusion of other materials and instruction on contraceptives and
disease prevention. A school may choose to use separate, outside
speakers or prepared curriculum to teach different content areas or
units within the comprehensive sexual health program as long as all
speakers, curriculum, and materials used are in compliance with this
section. Sexual health education must be consistent with the January
2005 guidelines for sexual health information and disease prevention
developed by the department of health and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) As used in ((chapter 265, Laws of 2007)) this section,
"medically and scientifically accurate" means information that is
verified or supported by research in compliance with scientific
methods, is published in peer-review journals, where appropriate, and
is recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations
and agencies with expertise in the field of sexual health including but
not limited to the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists,
the Washington state department of health, and the federal centers for
disease control and prevention.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction and the department of
health shall make the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health
information and disease prevention available to school districts,
teachers, and guest speakers on their web sites. Within available
resources, the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health shall make any related information, model policies,
curricula, or other resources available as well.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the department of health, shall develop a list of sexual health
education curricula that are consistent with the 2005 guidelines for
sexual health information and disease prevention. This list shall be
intended to serve as a resource for schools, teachers, or any other
organization or community group, and shall be updated no less
frequently than annually and made available on the web sites of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health.
(5) Public schools that offer sexual health education are
encouraged to review their sexual health curricula and choose a
curriculum from the list developed under subsection (4) of this
section. Any public school that offers sexual health education may
identify, choose, or develop any other curriculum, if the curriculum
chosen or developed complies with the requirements of this section.
(6) ((Any parent or legal guardian who wishes to have his or her
child excused from any planned instruction in sexual health education
may do so upon filing a written request with the school district board
of directors or its designee, or the principal of the school his or her
child attends, or the principal's designee.)) A public school student
may attend or participate in sexual health education only if the school
or school district has on file a signed confirmation from the student's
parent or legal guardian that the parent or legal guardian has received
notification of planned instruction in sexual health education and
approves of the student's attendance or participation. A school or
school district may comply with the notification requirement in this
section by providing written notice of planned instruction in sexual
health education to parents and legal guardians at least once per
school year. In addition, any parent or legal guardian may review the
sexual health education curriculum offered in his or her child's school
by filing a written request with the school district board of
directors, the principal of the school his or her child attends, or the
principal's designee.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
through its Washington state school health profiles survey or other
existing reporting mechanism, ask public schools to identify any
curricula used to provide sexual health education, and shall report the
results of this inquiry to the legislature on a biennial basis,
beginning with the 2008-09 school year.
(8) The requirement to report harassment, intimidation, or bullying
under RCW 28A.600.480(2) applies to this section.

--- END ---