BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that disabled veterans
are individuals who were willing to risk their lives serving in the
armed forces of the United States, and who had the misfortune to suffer
injury during their service. Every citizen of the United States
benefits from the presence of our military personnel and their
willingness to put their country and the lives of others before their
own.
Despite the boundless debt of gratitude owed to them by their
fellow countrymen, veterans are over represented amongst the homeless
population. More than ninety-nine thousand disabled veterans reside in
Washington. The legislature finds that, if a disabled veteran is in
need of housing and the taxpayers are providing government subsidized
housing, disabled veterans should benefit from the opportunity to
reside in such housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.540 and 2009 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any
city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may enact or expand
affordable housing incentive programs providing for the development of
low-income housing units through development regulations or conditions
on rezoning or permit decisions, or both, on one or more of the
following types of development: Residential; commercial; industrial;
or mixed-use. An affordable housing incentive program may include, but
is not limited to, one or more of the following:
(i) Density bonuses within the urban growth area;
(ii) Height and bulk bonuses;
(iii) Fee waivers or exemptions;
(iv) Parking reductions; or
(v) Expedited permitting.
(b) The city or county may enact or expand such programs whether or
not the programs may impose a tax, fee, or charge on the development or
construction of property.
(c) If a developer chooses not to participate in an optional
affordable housing incentive program adopted and authorized under this
section, a city, county, or town may not condition, deny, or delay the
issuance of a permit or development approval that is consistent with
zoning and development standards on the subject property absent
incentive provisions of this program.
(2) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section shall comply with the following:
(a) The incentives or bonuses shall provide for the development of
low-income housing units;
(b) Jurisdictions shall establish standards for low-income renter
or owner occupancy housing, including income guidelines consistent with
local housing needs, to assist low-income households that cannot afford
market-rate housing. Low-income households are defined for renter and
owner occupancy program purposes as follows:
(i) Rental housing units to be developed shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of fifty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size;
(ii) Owner occupancy housing units shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of eighty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size. The legislative
authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a public hearing, may
establish lower income levels; and
(iii) The legislative authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a
public hearing, may also establish higher income levels for rental
housing or for owner occupancy housing upon finding that higher income
levels are needed to address local housing market conditions. The
higher income level for rental housing may not exceed eighty percent of
the county area median family income. The higher income level for
owner occupancy housing may not exceed one hundred percent of the
county area median family income. These established higher income
levels are considered "low-income" for the purposes of this section;
(c) The jurisdiction shall establish a maximum rent level or sales
price for each low-income housing unit developed under the terms of a
program and may adjust these levels or prices based on the average size
of the household expected to occupy the unit. For renter-occupied
housing units, the total housing costs, including basic utilities as
determined by the jurisdiction, may not exceed thirty percent of the
income limit for the low-income housing unit;
(d) Where a developer is utilizing a housing incentive program
authorized under this section to develop market rate housing, and is
developing low-income housing to satisfy the requirements of the
housing incentive program, the low-income housing units shall be
provided in a range of sizes comparable to those units that are
available to other residents. To the extent practicable, the number of
bedrooms in low-income units must be in the same proportion as the
number of bedrooms in units within the entire development. The
low-income units shall generally be distributed throughout the
development and have substantially the same functionality as the other
units in the development;
(e) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program shall be committed to continuing affordability for at
least fifty years. A local government, however, may accept payments in
lieu of continuing affordability. The program shall include measures
to enforce continuing affordability and income standards applicable to
low-income units constructed under this section that may include, but
are not limited to, covenants, options, or other agreements to be
executed and recorded by owners and developers;
(f) Any government entity providing incentives under subsection
(1)(a) of this section must adopt policies and enforcement mechanisms
to ensure that at least ten percent of all housing units developed
using such incentives are offered to qualified disabled veterans who
meet the qualifications of the housing incentive programs. Housing
units need not be required to remain empty if there are not sufficient
qualified disabled veteran applicants at the time a unit becomes
available.
(g) Programs authorized under subsection (1) of this section may
apply to part or all of a jurisdiction and different standards may be
applied to different areas within a jurisdiction or to different types
of development. Programs authorized under this section may be modified
to meet local needs and may include provisions not expressly provided
in this section or RCW 82.02.020;
(((g))) (h) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable
housing incentive program are encouraged to be provided within
developments for which a bonus or incentive is provided. However,
programs may allow units to be provided in a building located in the
general area of the development for which a bonus or incentive is
provided; and
(((h))) (i) Affordable housing incentive programs may allow a
payment of money or property in lieu of low-income housing units if the
jurisdiction determines that the payment achieves a result equal to or
better than providing the affordable housing on-site, as long as the
payment does not exceed the approximate cost of developing the same
number and quality of housing units that would otherwise be developed.
Any city or county shall use these funds or property to support the
development of low-income housing, including support provided through
loans or grants to public or private owners or developers of housing.
(3) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section may be applied within the jurisdiction to address the need
for increased residential development, consistent with local growth
management and housing policies, as follows:
(a) The jurisdiction shall identify certain land use designations
within a geographic area where increased residential development will
assist in achieving local growth management and housing policies;
(b) The jurisdiction shall provide increased residential
development capacity through zoning changes, bonus densities, height
and bulk increases, parking reductions, or other regulatory changes or
other incentives;
(c) The jurisdiction shall determine that increased residential
development capacity or other incentives can be achieved within the
identified area, subject to consideration of other regulatory controls
on development; and
(d) The jurisdiction may establish a minimum amount of affordable
housing that must be provided by all residential developments being
built under the revised regulations, consistent with the requirements
of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "qualified disabled veteran"
means a person who:
(a) Meets the definition of "veteran" in RCW 41.04.007;
(b) Is rated as disabled by the United States department of
veterans affairs; and
(c) Meets the income limitations of this section.
(5)(a) After January 1, 2012, a jurisdiction may not enact, expand,
or apply an affordable housing incentive program unless the
jurisdiction has adopted a policy concerning affordable housing for
qualified disabled veterans. At a minimum, such policy must provide
for a tracking mechanism to monitor compliance with the requirement
that an application preference apply for qualified disabled veterans.
(b) The jurisdiction shall file with the Washington state
department of veterans affairs a report of compliance with its policy
concerning affordable housing for qualified disabled veterans. The
report must be prepared in the form and within the time frame
prescribed by the director of the department of veterans affairs. The
information in the report must be provided as of the date of the
report, and must set forth:
(i) The jurisdiction's current policy concerning affordable housing
for qualified disabled veterans;
(ii) The number of housing units in the jurisdiction that were
developed utilizing the housing incentive program;
(iii) The number of qualified disabled veterans who applied for
housing in the jurisdiction in housing units developed utilizing the
housing incentive program; and
(iv) The number of qualified disabled veterans provided housing in
the jurisdiction in housing units developed utilizing the housing
incentive program.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.22.178 and 2007 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surcharge provided for in this section shall be named the
affordable housing for all surcharge.
(1) Except as provided in subsections (((3))) (4) and (5) of this
section, a surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by
the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in
addition to any other charge authorized by law. The county may retain
up to five percent of these funds collected solely for the collection,
administration, and local distribution of these funds. Of the
remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through this
surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who will
deposit the funds into the affordable housing for all account created
in RCW 43.185C.190. The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce must use these funds to provide housing and
shelter for extremely low-income households, including but not limited
to grants for building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
extremely low-income households with incomes at or below thirty percent
of the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income
to cover ongoing operating expenses.
(2) All of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge will be
retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must be used
by the county and its cities and towns for eligible housing activities
as described in this subsection that serve very low-income households
with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income. The
portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be allocated to
eligible housing activities that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county
according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities
within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs
and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities
that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities
to be funded by these county funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the
area median income and that provide an application preference for
qualified disabled veterans for a minimum of ten percent of the units
funded in full or part by revenue generated by the surcharge, including
units for homeownership, rental units, seasonal and permanent farm
worker housing units, and single room occupancy units;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing
trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income and that
provide an application preference for qualified disabled veterans for
a minimum of ten percent of the units funded in full or part by revenue
generated by the surcharge, and that require a supplement to rent
income to cover ongoing operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are
affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the area median income, to be administered by a local public
housing authority or other local organization that has an existing
rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the
United States department of housing and urban development's section 8
rental assistance voucher program standards; and
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(3) For purposes of this section, "qualified disabled veteran"
means a person who:
(a) Meets the definition of "veteran" in RCW 41.04.007;
(b) Is rated as disabled by the United States department of
veterans affairs; and
(c) Meets the income limitations of this section.
(4)(a) After January 1, 2012, the county auditor may not impose the
surcharge under this section unless the county has adopted a policy
concerning affordable housing for qualified disabled veterans. At a
minimum, such policy must provide for a tracking mechanism to monitor
compliance with the requirement that an application preference apply
for qualified disabled veterans for a minimum of ten percent of the
housing units funded in full or part by funds generated by the
surcharge.
(b) The county auditor shall file with the Washington state
department of veterans affairs a report of compliance with its policy
concerning affordable housing for qualified disabled veterans. The
report must be prepared in the form and within the time frame
prescribed by the director of the department of veterans affairs. The
information in the report must be provided as of the date of the
report, and must set forth:
(i) The county's current policy concerning affordable housing for
qualified disabled veterans;
(ii) The number of housing units in the county funded in full or
part by funds generated by the surcharge;
(iii) The number of qualified disabled veterans who applied for
housing in the county in housing units funded in full or part by funds
generated by the surcharge; and
(iv) The number of qualified disabled veterans provided housing in
the county in housing units funded in full or part by funds generated
by the surcharge.
(5) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.185.060 and 1994 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
organizations that may receive assistance from the department under
this chapter are local governments, local housing authorities, regional
support networks established under chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit
community or neighborhood-based organizations, federally recognized
Indian tribes in the state of Washington, and regional or statewide
nonprofit housing assistance organizations.
(2) For organizations that are included in subsection (1) of this
section and that provide housing units directly to low and very low-income citizens, only those organizations that provide an application
preference favoring qualified disabled veterans are eligible to receive
assistance from the department under this chapter. The application
preference must apply to a minimum of ten percent of all housing units
developed under the program by these organizations. For purposes of
this subsection, "qualified disabled veteran" means a person who:
(a) Meets the definition of "veteran" in RCW 41.04.007;
(b) Is rated as disabled by the United States department of
veterans affairs; and
(c) Has an adjusted income of less than fifty percent of the median
family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the
housing unit is located.
(3) Eligibility for assistance from the department under this
chapter also requires compliance with the revenue and taxation laws, as
applicable to the recipient, at the time the grant is made.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.185A.040 and 1994 c 160 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
organizations that may receive assistance from the department under
this chapter are local governments, local housing authorities,
nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations, federally
recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington, and regional or
statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations.
(2) For organizations that are included in subsection (1) of this
section and that provide housing units directly to low and very low-income citizens, only those organizations that provide an application
preference favoring qualified disabled veterans are eligible to receive
assistance from the department under this chapter. The application
preference must apply to a minimum of ten percent of all housing units
developed under the program by these organizations. For purposes of
this subsection, "qualified disabled veteran" means a person who:
(a) Meets the definition of "veteran" in RCW 41.04.007;
(b) Is rated as disabled by the United States department of
veterans affairs; and
(c) Meets the definition of "low-income household" in RCW
43.185A.010.
(3) Eligibility for assistance from the department under this
chapter also requires compliance with the revenue and taxation laws, as
applicable to the recipient, at the time the grant is made.

--- END ---