BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.545 and 2006 c 265 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of early learning shall:
(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and
referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child
care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may
carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training,
technical assistance, and parent information and training;
(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as
grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to
existing or potential local child care resource and referral
organizations;
(3) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of
grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The
rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for
achieving the following objectives:
(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources,
including location of services and subsidies;
(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training
programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;
(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars,
toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;
(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply
and demand;
(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources
devoted to child care;
(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee
child care services; and
(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and
working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of one
hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty line;
(4) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the statewide
child care resource and referral network and local child care resource
and referral organizations;
(5) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and work
with department licensors to provide information to local child care
resource and referral organizations about licensed child care providers
in the state;
(6) Through the statewide child care resource and referral network
and local resource and referral organizations, compile data about local
child care needs and availability for future planning and development;
(7) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and referral
network and local child care resource and referral organizations for
the provision of training and technical assistance to child care
providers. Such training and technical assistance must include a
quality improvement consultation program which supports child care
centers in their efforts to improve quality and address problems as
identified by the child care provider;
(a) The quality improvement consultation program must be a separate
process from the facility licensing and compliance agreement process
and must be offered to child care centers on a voluntary basis;
(b) As part of the quality improvement consultation program, the
department may, within available funding, and at the request of the
child care center, conduct on-site visits and telephone consultations;
(c) Any records or information gained as a result of a child care
center's work under the quality improvement consultation program may
not be disclosed to or shared with nonmanagerial department licensing
or complaint investigation staff, unless necessary to carry out duties
described under chapter 26.44 RCW. The emphasis should be on problem
prevention. Nothing in this subsection limits or interferes with the
consultant's mandated reporting duties under chapter 26.44 RCW; and
(8) Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of
insurance and of federal and other child care funding to assist state
and local agencies, businesses, and other child care providers in
offering child care services.

--- END ---