BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each individual and group health plan that is issued or renewed
on or after January 1, 2012, that provides coverage for hospital or
medical expenses shall provide coverage for benefits for prosthetics
and orthotics that are at least equivalent to the coverage provided by
the federal medicare program, and no less favorable than the terms and
conditions for the medical and surgical benefits in the policy.
(a) "Orthotic device" means a rigid or semirigid device supporting
a weak or deformed leg, foot, arm, hand, back, or neck, or restricting
or eliminating motion in a diseased or injured leg, foot, arm, hand,
back, or neck.
(b) "Prosthetic device" means an artificial limb device or
appliance designed to replace in whole or in part an arm or a leg.
(2) Coverage required under this section includes all services and
supplies determined medically necessary by the treating physician to
restore functionality to optimal levels. The coverage includes all
services and supplies necessary for the effective use of a prosthetic
or orthotic device, including formulating its design, fabrication,
material and component selection, measurements, fittings, static and
dynamic alignments, and instructing the patient in the use of the
device. The coverage includes all materials and components necessary
to use the device.
(3) The reimbursement rate for prosthetic and orthotic devices must
be at least equivalent to that currently provided by the federal
medicare program and no more restrictive than other benefits in the
policy and must be comparable to coverage of restorative internal
devices without arbitrary caps or lifetime restrictions.
(4) The coverage must include any repair or replacement of a
prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined medically necessary to
restore or maintain the ability to complete activities of daily living
or essential job-related activities and that is not solely for comfort
or convenience.
(5) Prosthetic and orthotic benefits may not be subject to separate
financial requirements or limitations. A health plan may impose
copayment or coinsurance amounts on prosthetics, however financial
requirements may be no more restrictive than the financial requirements
applicable to the medical and surgical benefits, including those for
internal devices.
(6) A health plan may limit the benefits or alter the financial
requirements for out-of-network coverage of prosthetic and orthotic
devices. However, the restrictions and requirements applicable to the
benefits may be no more restrictive than the financial requirements
applicable to the out-of-network coverage for the medical and surgical
benefits.
(7) A health plan may not impose any annual or lifetime dollar
maximum on coverage for prosthetics other than an annual or lifetime
dollar maximum that applies in the aggregate to all terms and services
covered under the policy.
(8) If coverage is provided through a managed care plan, the
insured must have access to medically necessary clinical care and to
prosthetic and orthotic devices and technology from not less than two
distinct prosthetic and orthotic providers in the plan's provider
network.

--- END ---