BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.04.050 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to chapter 48.62 RCW, any public utility district
engaged in the operation of electric or water utilities may enter into
contracts of group insurance for the benefit of its employees, and pay
all or any part of the premiums for such insurance. Such premiums
shall be paid out of the revenues derived from the operation of such
properties: PROVIDED, That if the premium is to be paid by the
district and employees jointly, and the benefits of the policy are
offered to all eligible employees, not less than seventy-five percent
of such employees may be so insured.
(2) A public utility district ((whose employees or officials are
not members of the state retirement system)) engaged in the operation
of electric or water utilities may ((contract for individual annuity
contracts, retirement income policies or group annuity contracts,
including prior service, to provide a retirement plan, or any one or
more of them, and pay all or any part of the premiums therefor))
establish and maintain for the benefit of its eligible employees and
officials any plan of deferred compensation or supplemental savings
plan for retirement, and make contributions or pay benefits thereunder
out of the revenue derived from the operation of its properties. For
purposes of this section, "contributions" includes contributions on
behalf of an eligible employee equal to the amount by which the
employee agrees to a reduction in salary or wages and also includes
contributions made by the public utility district separate from amounts
otherwise intended as salary or wages. Coverage of an employee under
a plan under this section does not render the employee or official
ineligible for simultaneous membership and participation in any pension
system for public employees.
(3) Contributions must be deposited in designated accounts, held in
trust, or remitted to an insurer. When deposited to an account or held
in trust, the account or trust fund is considered a public retirement
fund within the meaning of Article XXIX, section 1 of the state
Constitution, for the purpose of determining eligible investments and
deposits of money into the account or trust.
(4) Contributions may be deposited or invested in a credit union,
savings and loan association, bank, mutual savings bank, purchase life
insurance, shares of an investment company, or fixed or variable
annuity contracts from any insurance company or any investment company
licensed to contract business in this state. To the extent a plan is
an individual account plan, participants in the plan may be permitted
to self-direct the investment of assets allocated to their account
through the selection of investment options authorized under the plan,
and an employee, official, or commissioner of the district is not
liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from participant
investments. An "individual account plan" is a plan that provides for
an individual account for each participant and for benefits based upon
the amount contributed to the participant's account, and any income,
expenses, gains and losses, and any forfeitures of accounts or other
participants which may be allocated to that participant's account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is intended to clarify existing
authority of public utility districts to provide deferred compensation
and supplemental savings plans for retirement for their employees,
commissioners, and other officials.

--- END ---