BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person
may operate an all-terrain vehicle upon a roadway of this state having
a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less if:
(a) The person does not operate an all-terrain vehicle upon state
highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate an all-terrain vehicle upon a
roadway of this state without first having obtained and having in full
force and effect a current and proper vehicle registration and display
vehicle license plates in compliance with chapter 46.16A RCW;
(c) The person does not operate an all-terrain vehicle upon a
roadway of this state without (i) first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW, or (ii) possessing a valid driver's license issued by the state of
the person's residence if the person is a nonresident;
(d) The person does not operate an all-terrain vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16A RCW on a roadway of this state unless
the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy in
compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW;
(e) The person operating an all-terrain vehicle does not cross a
roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per hour,
unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed limit of
thirty-five miles per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of
approximately ninety degrees, except that the operator of an all-terrain vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled intersection of streets
and highways that are part of the state highway system subject to Title
47 RCW unless that intersection has been authorized by local
authorities under subsection (4) of this section; and
(f) The person operating an all-terrain vehicle with a solid rear
axle does not operate the vehicle on a roadway that is paved with
concrete or asphalt.
(2) Any all-terrain vehicle operated under this section must have
a headlight, taillight, and brake light, and a mirror both on the left
and right handlebar.
(3) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(4) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of all-terrain vehicles on streets and highways under their
jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing body, if the
regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of all-terrain vehicles on streets and highways that are part of the state
highway system subject to Title 47 RCW; and
(b) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration of all-terrain vehicles.

--- END ---