BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.532 and 2005 c 509 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW ((74.15.030)) 43.215.020, counties with a
population of three thousand or less may adopt and enforce ordinances
and regulations as provided in this section for family day-care
providers as defined in RCW ((74.15.020(1)(f))) 43.215.010 as a twelve-month pilot project. Before a county may regulate family day-care
providers in accordance with this section, it shall adopt ordinances
and regulations that address, at a minimum, the following: (a) The
size, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises; (b)
the plan of operation; (c) the character, suitability, and competence
of a family day-care provider and other persons associated with a
family day-care provider directly responsible for the care of children
served; (d) the number of qualified persons required to render care;
(e) the provision of necessary care, including food, clothing,
supervision, and discipline; (f) the physical, mental, and social well-
being of children served; (g) educational and recreational
opportunities for children served; and (h) the maintenance of records
pertaining to children served.
(2) The county shall notify the department ((of social and health
services)) in writing sixty days prior to adoption of the family day-care regulations required pursuant to this section. The transfer of
jurisdiction shall occur when the county has notified the department in
writing of the effective date of the regulations, and shall be limited
to a period of twelve months from the effective date of the
regulations. Regulation by counties of family day-care providers as
provided in this section shall be administered and enforced by those
counties. The department shall not regulate these activities nor shall
the department bear any civil liability ((under chapter 74.15 RCW)) for
the twelve-month pilot period. Upon request, the department shall
provide technical assistance to any county that is in the process of
adopting the regulations required by this section, and after the
regulations become effective.
(3) Any county regulating family day-care providers pursuant to
this section shall report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature concerning the outcome of the pilot
project upon expiration of the twelve-month pilot period. The report
shall include the ordinances and regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section and a description of how those
ordinances and regulations address the specific areas of regulation
identified in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.555 and 1988 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that a severe shortage of child care
exists to the detriment of all families and employers throughout the
state. Many workers are unable to enter or remain in the workforce due
to a shortage of child care resources. The high costs of starting a
child care business create a barrier to the creation of new slots,
especially for children with special needs.
(2) A child care expansion grant fund is created in the custody of
the ((secretary of the department of social and health services))
director. Grants shall be awarded on a one-time only basis to persons,
organizations, or schools needing assistance to start a child care
center or mini-center as defined by the department by rule, or to
existing licensed child care providers, including family home
providers, for the purpose of making capital improvements in order to
accommodate ((handicapped)) children with disabilities as defined under
chapter 72.40 RCW, sick children, or infant care, or children needing
night time care. No grant may exceed ten thousand dollars. Start-up
costs shall not include operational costs after the first three months
of business.
(3) Child care expansion grants shall be awarded on the basis of
need for the proposed services in the community, within appropriated
funds.
(4) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
setting forth criteria, application procedures, and methods to assure
compliance with the purposes described in this section.

--- END ---