BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that:
(1) A multifaceted approach to growth management is required to
address the conversion of farms, forests, and rural areas to other
uses, and to manage residential development in rural areas;
(2) Current provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW provide few
alternatives for counties to manage growth in the rural areas outside
of limited areas of more intense rural development under RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), and fully contained communities under RCW 36.70A.350,
other than traditional large lot subdivisions (e.g. five-lot and ten-lot subdivisions) and "rural cluster" subdivisions;
(3) The legislature desires to create a mechanism on a
demonstration basis to allow certain counties to authorize a
sustainable development alternative for residential development in
rural areas as an alternative to limited areas of more intense rural
development, fully contained communities and existing, traditional
subdivision techniques in order to facilitate management of residential
growth in rural areas, to promote preservation of open space, and to
minimize and/or reduce the conversion of designated resource lands;
(4) The implementation of a local, region-wide and/or statewide
transfer of development rights program can play a significant role in
developing sustainable development options for residential development
in the rural areas. The most important component in building a
successful transfer of development rights program is creating adequate
receiving area capacity. Increasing receiving area capacity will
accommodate dramatic expected population growth while meeting resource
conservation goals over the next one hundred years; and
(5) The demonstration projects authorized by this act are intended
to explore the use of rural receiving areas to support strategies for
transfer of development rights and to provide certain counties options
for authorizing sustainable residential development in the rural areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.011 and 2002 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that this chapter is intended to recognize
the importance of rural lands and rural character to Washington's
economy, its people, and its environment, while respecting regional
differences. Rural lands and rural-based economies enhance the
economic desirability of the state, help to preserve traditional
economic activities, and contribute to the state's overall quality of
life.
The legislature finds that to retain and enhance the job base in
rural areas, rural counties must have flexibility to create
opportunities for business development. Further, the legislature finds
that rural counties must have the flexibility to retain existing
businesses and allow them to expand. The legislature recognizes that
not all business developments in rural counties require an urban level
of services; and that many businesses in rural areas fit within the
definition of rural character identified by the local planning unit.
((Finally,)) The legislature finds that in defining its rural
element under RCW 36.70A.070(5), a county should foster land use
patterns and develop a local vision of rural character that will: Help
preserve rural-based economies and traditional rural lifestyles;
encourage the economic prosperity of rural residents; foster
opportunities for small-scale, rural-based employment and
self-employment; permit the operation of rural-based agricultural,
commercial, recreational, and tourist businesses that are consistent
with existing and planned land use patterns; be compatible with the use
of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat; foster the
private stewardship of the land and preservation of open space; and
enhance the rural sense of community and quality of life.
The legislature further finds that rural conservation development
demonstration projects as authorized by section 4 of this act are
consistent with the findings of this section and will promote
sustainable residential development as a means of managing residential
growth in the rural areas and protecting designated resource lands of
long-term commercial significance.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.030 and 2009 c 565 s 22 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(9) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of
their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other
geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(10) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.
(11) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.
(12) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(13) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental
protection, and other governmental services.
(14) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW
36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was
designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance
under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and
supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played
on grass playing fields.
(15) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and groundwater and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(16) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban
growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource
lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can
consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including
clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with
the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural
element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry
activities that may be conducted in rural areas. A rural conservation
development demonstration project as provided under section 4 of this
act is a permitted form of rural development.
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with
urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers,
except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(18) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(19) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of
land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(20) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(21) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited
to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals,
detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and
landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that
were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate
conversion of wetlands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county in the Puget Sound basin with a population between
five hundred thousand and seven hundred fifty thousand, and which is
required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, may designate one
rural conservation development demonstration project that meets the
criteria set forth in this section. For the purposes of this section,
"rural conservation development demonstration project" and
"demonstration project" mean a compact rural development created using
transfer of development rights as identified in this section, and
established by the authorizing county's comprehensive plan policies and
development regulations.
(2) A demonstration project shall be located in the rural area, and
be designed as provided in this section to co-exist with traditional
rural land uses such as farming and forestry. A demonstration project
meeting the criteria of this section shall neither constitute "urban
growth," nor lands "characterized by urban growth" for purposes of
citing adjacent or nearby lands as new urban growth areas pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.110(2), nor do they violate rural character provisions of
RCW 36.70A.070(5)(c)(iii). A demonstration project meeting the
requirements of this section, and meeting the comprehensive plan
policies and development regulation of an authorizing county, shall
constitute a permitted form of "rural development" under RCW
36.70A.030(16).
(a) Location. A county may approve a demonstration project on a
site in the rural area, outside of limited areas of more intensive
rural development established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), with a
minimum of seven hundred fifty contiguous acres. A portion of the
proposed site of a demonstration project site must be located within
three miles of a state or federal highway. The county's comprehensive
plan policies and/or development regulations for a demonstration
project should favor sites that are capable of limiting visual impacts
of the development to the general public and adjoining uses, enjoy
proximity to existing transportation networks that have capacity or can
be made concurrent through the proposal, demonstrate limited need for
public service improvements, and are outside areas identified as high
priority for protection and restoration by the department of ecology's
watershed characterization process. A demonstration project shall not
be allowed on lands designated by a county pursuant to chapter 36.70A
RCW as either agricultural, forest, or mineral lands of long-term
commercial significance. A county may not simultaneously process a
request to de-designate designated resource lands of long-term
commercial significance and a proposal for those same lands to be
considered for a demonstration project.
(b) Residential development. A demonstration project may include
a combination of two or more of the following types of residential
dwelling units: Single-family detached housing; single-family attached
housing; multifamily housing; and accessory dwelling units. A
demonstration project may include age-restricted residential housing.
The average lot size for single-family detached housing units within a
demonstration project shall not exceed seven thousand square feet.
(c) Nonresidential development. The demonstration project may
include nonresidential development that is designed and sized to serve
only the projected population of the demonstration project and nearby
existing and projected rural residential population.
(d) Authorized number of residential development units. A county
may authorize a demonstration project containing up to one thousand six
hundred residential dwelling units. The total number of authorized
residential dwelling units shall include the number of development
rights vested by the property owner under the applicable base zoning,
approved prior plats, vested subdivision/permit applications, and/or
existing legal subdivisions and shall be referred to as the "base
number of units." Any additional residential units in a demonstration
project above the base number of units and up to the total number of
dwelling units approved by the authorizing county, not to exceed the
total residential units authorized for a demonstration project under
this section, shall be allowed only through the transfer of development
rights as provided in this section. At least one-third of the units
authorized in a demonstration project must originate from rural-zoned
property, which may include the base number of units associated with
the demonstration project property.
(e) Transfer of development rights. For purposes of this section,
the authorizing county's transfer of development rights program must
identify rural-zoned lands or lands designated as natural resource
lands of long-term commercial significance that are eligible as
transfer of development rights sending sites. A demonstration project
authorized under this section shall be an authorized receiving area for
transfer of development rights from certified sending sites. For
purposes of this section, each demonstration project residential unit
that exceeds the base number of units as provided under this section
shall require the transfer of one development right from a certified
sending site.
(f) Conservation easements. Development rights transferred from
sending sites shall be extinguished by a conservation easement recorded
against the sending property. The conservation easement shall be held
by either a nonprofit organization, the county authorizing the
demonstration project, or jointly by a nonprofit organization and the
authorizing county, as may be provided by the enabling county's
transfer of development rights program. The conservation easement
shall permanently restrict development of the sending property, but
must allow for typical rural and resource land uses, including but not
limited to agriculture and working forestry. A stewardship fund
established by endowment or other mechanism established by the county
authorizing a demonstration project shall be created to monitor and
enforce the conservation easement or easements for all sending
properties to ensure capacity for stewardship of such conservation
easement lands.
(g) Process. A county authorized to approve a demonstration
project shall adopt such comprehensive plan policies and development
regulations to supplement the requirements of this act as the county
deems necessary and appropriate. Any comprehensive plan policies
and/or development regulations adopted by a county pursuant to this
section may consider and reflect local circumstances for determining
how to implement this section in a manner that preserves existing rural
character. A county authorized to approve a demonstration project
under this act may designate a demonstration project receiving site
either in the rural element of its comprehensive plan, through adoption
of a subarea plan for the demonstration project, and/or through a
development agreement, and it may enact and rely upon comprehensive
plan policies, development regulations, and/or development agreements
as provided under chapter 36.70B RCW, expressly for the purpose of
approving a demonstration project. The demonstration project must
comply with all relevant development regulations, including critical
areas regulations and transportation concurrency requirements;
provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall control
over conflicting provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW, if any; provided,
further, that through a development agreement a county may approve
development standards particular to the demonstration project, and
different from the county's existing development regulations, if the
county finds that such regulations will facilitate preservation of
rural character and will not adversely impact the public health,
safety, and welfare.
(h) External boundaries. Clear external boundaries shall be
delineated for each demonstration project and shall not be expanded.
The demonstration project shall provide a perimeter buffer within the
boundaries of the demonstration project for the benefit of surrounding
land uses along the external boundary, which buffer may consist of
physical features upon or abutting the demonstration project site, such
as a river or undeveloped bluff or ravine, or a designated corridor of
undeveloped land that must be permanently conserved. The perimeter
buffer around the demonstration project must average at least two
hundred feet wide, and at no point may be less than one hundred feet
wide; provided, however, that the authorizing county may approve a
reduction in the minimum average buffer width in response to a buffer
enhancement and stewardship plan demonstrating that the reduced buffers
provide an equivalent buffer function and value to that of the standard
buffer width. Nothing in this section obviates the need to comply with
all applicable critical area regulations and preexisting riparian
buffer requirements. Perimeter buffers shall be permanently conserved
by conservation easement recorded as provided for in the same manner as
conservation easements for transferred development rights.
(i) Public services and public facilities.
(i) Design and size--in general. Public services and public
facilities shall be designed and sized for the demonstration project
consistent with the definition of "rural governmental services" as
provided in RCW 36.70A.030(17).
(ii) Provision for required infrastructure. The county's
development regulations, or any development agreement authorizing a
demonstration project, shall address how new and/or improved
infrastructure necessary to serve the demonstration project shall be
provided, which may include how such infrastructure is to be provided
by either the applicant, the county, or by a public-private
partnership.
(iii) Transportation. A demonstration project must comply with the
county's applicable transportation concurrency requirements to ensure
that the demonstration project will not result in roads operating below
adopted levels of service. Legal instruments shall be recorded
granting to the general public the right to access and utilize the
transportation facilities described in (i)(iii) (A) through (C) of this
subsection to the extent such facilities are included as part of a
demonstration project. A covenant shall be recorded on title to land
included within a demonstration project that prohibits an owner or
owners from protesting annexation to a transit service district. A
county's approval of a demonstration project should call for a
transportation management plan to encourage the reduction in potential
greenhouse gas emissions that addresses, at a minimum, the following
components: (A) A multimodal implementation plan that may include, but
is not necessarily limited to, neighborhood circulators; bicycle paths;
electric vehicle charging stations; and park and ride, community
vanpool, and car-share parking spaces; (B) a pedestrian and
nonmotorized transportation network of trails and walkways that shall
connect residences to public services and open spaces within and
adjacent to the demonstration project. For the purposes of this
section, walkways are lanes for pedestrians and nonmotorized vehicles
that provide a space to travel within the public right-of-way or within
easements/tracts that is separated from roadway vehicles; (C) road
capacity that meet the county's applicable growth management act
concurrency requirements; and (D) innovative road standards developed
by the county for a demonstration project that the county determines
are compatible with rural character and minimize impervious surfaces
and storm water runoff.
(iv) Water supply. A demonstration project must be served by an
existing public water purveyor.
(v) Wastewater treatment. Counties are encouraged to authorize
innovative techniques for wastewater treatment in a demonstration
project, including, but not limited to, the use of membrane bioreactor
systems. The demonstration project should encourage water conservation
and grey water reuse for flushing, irrigation, and/or other appropriate
uses.
(vi) Storm water management. The authorizing county shall include
in its development regulations, or in a development agreement approving
a demonstration project, storm water management standards that are
consistent with the then most current department of ecology storm water
manual or the equivalent standard adopted by the county. The
authorizing county shall require "low impact development" techniques as
appropriate and feasible for the site, which may include, but are not
limited to, bio swales and other natural storm water management systems
and alternative uses for storm water that encourage water reuse,
groundwater infiltration, or both.
(vii) Critical areas regulations. A demonstration project shall be
subject to the county's then current, adopted critical areas
regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW.
(j) Open space. The demonstration project shall contain community
open space for public use, which may include community gathering space,
village green, parks, trails, a community farm, a community forest,
and/or a farmers' market space. A minimum of seventy percent of the
gross site area of a demonstration project shall be set aside as
designated open space. Instruments shall be recorded against the
property as necessary to ensure that open space is retained in
perpetuity, and must be open and accessible to the public. A
stewardship fund established by endowment, homeowners' association
fees, perpetual resale fees, or other mechanism as may be authorized by
a county approving a demonstration project, shall be created to monitor
and ensure capacity for stewardship of such publicly open and
accessible open space within a demonstration project.
(k) Green building and energy. A county authorizing a
demonstration project should encourage the incorporation of "green"
building standards, such as the national association of home builders'
gold-level green building guidelines or substantial equivalent. To the
maximum extent practicable, a demonstration project shall use building
materials sourced from Washington state. A county authorizing a
demonstration project should also encourage the utilization of
renewable on-site energy generation, renewable energy credits, and/or
other means to reduce green house gas emissions, when compared to
typical rural cluster developments.
(l) Native vegetation. The authorizing county shall include in its
development regulations or in a development agreement authorizing a
demonstration project, provisions to minimize and mitigate for the
clearing of native vegetation within a demonstration project. Native
plant species for landscaping of nonlawn areas of private residences
shall be used. Public rights-of-way, street planting strips, and
common areas shall be replanted with a regionally appropriate native
plant community and structure, except in situations where native
species conflict with power lines and other utilities, in which case
noninvasive nonnative species shall be used as a substitute.
(m) Design standards. The authorizing county shall include in its
development regulations or in a development agreement authorizing a
demonstration project design standards to protect the rural character
of the area and design standards to foster interaction among residents
and a sense of place. At a minimum, design standards to protect rural
character should address how to minimize and mitigate impacts from the
following: (i) Utilities; (ii) roadways and transportation; (iii)
visual impacts to sensitive viewsheds, such as roadways, ridgelines,
hillsides, etc.; and (iv) lighting and the preservation of dark skies.
Design standards to foster interaction and a sense of place may include
elements to encourage multimodal transportation options, public
gathering spaces, views of the surrounding landscape, use of local
materials, and attention to historic features.
(n) Notice on title. A county designating a demonstration project
shall require that all plats, short plats, site plans, development
permits, building permits, and/or other permits/approvals issued or
granted for development activities within a demonstration project
contain a notice that the subject property is located in a rural area
where a variety of traditional rural activities may occur that may
generate sights, sounds, and smells associated with farming, forestry,
and other traditional rural uses. In addition, the notice for lands
within a demonstration project shall advise that services in rural
areas are often limited and consist of rural governmental services
rather than urban governmental services. The notice shall run with the
land.
(o) Environmental review. A county's review and approval of a
demonstration project shall address and provide for environmental
protection consistent with the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. A county may process a demonstration
project as a "planned action" under chapter 43.21C RCW as authorized by
this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)) shall be prepared on proposals for
legislation and other major actions having a probable significant,
adverse environmental impact. The environmental impact statement may
be combined with the recommendation or report on the proposal or issued
as a separate document. The substantive decisions or recommendations
shall be clearly identifiable in the combined document. Actions
categorically exempt under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) do not require
environmental review or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter. In a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040, a planned action, as provided for in subsection
(2) of this section, does not require a threshold determination or the
preparation of an environmental impact statement under this chapter,
but is subject to environmental review and mitigation as provided in
this chapter.
An environmental impact statement is required to analyze only those
probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant.
Beneficial environmental impacts may be discussed. The responsible
official shall consult with agencies and the public to identify such
impacts and limit the scope of an environmental impact statement. The
subjects listed in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) need not be treated as separate
sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions of
significant short-term and long-term environmental impacts, significant
irrevocable commitments of natural resources, significant alternatives
including mitigation measures, and significant environmental impacts
which cannot be mitigated should be consolidated or included, as
applicable, in those sections of an environmental impact statement
where the responsible official decides they logically belong.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, a planned action means one or
more types of project action that:
(i) Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(ii) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW,
((or)) (B) a fully contained community, a master planned resort, a
master planned development, or a phased project, or (C) a rural
conservation development demonstration project as authorized under
section 4 of this act;
(iii) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW
36.70A.030 except in the case of a rural conservation development
demonstration project as authorized under section 4 of this act;
(v) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200; and
(vi) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW.
(b) A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain
types of development or to specific geographical areas that are less
extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or
town and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in the
environmental impact statement or the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.145.020 and 2010 c 7 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Community facilities districts are authorized to be formed for
the purposes authorized under this chapter. Community facilities
districts may ((only)) include either (a) land within urban growth
areas designated under the state growth management act, located in
portions of one or more cities, towns, or counties when created in
accordance with this chapter. A district may include one or more
noncontiguous tracts, lots, parcels, or other properties meeting the
requirements of this chapter, or (b) land within counties that is
outside of designated urban growth areas but which has been included
within the boundaries of a rural conservation development demonstration
project approved by a county pursuant to section 4 of this act when the
district is created in accordance with this chapter.
(((1))) (2) To form a community facilities district, a petition
must be presented to the applicable legislative authorities. The
petition must:
(a) Designate and describe the boundaries of the district by metes
and bounds or reference to United States townships, ranges, and legal
subdivisions;
(b) Be executed by one hundred percent of all owners of private
property located within the boundaries of the proposed district. The
property owners must include a request to subject their property to the
assessments, up to the amount included in the petition and authorized
under this chapter;
(c) Include a certification by the petitioners that they want to
voluntarily submit their property to the authority of the district
under this chapter to approve the petitioner's request to submit their
property to the assessments, up to the amount included in the petition
and authorized under this chapter;
(d) Include a general explanation of the objective and plan of the
district and describe the specific facilities that the district
anticipates financing;
(e) Declare the district will be conducive to public health,
safety, and welfare;
(f) Assert that the purpose for forming the district will be a
benefit to the land located in the district;
(g) Be accompanied by an "obligation" signed by at least two
petitioners who agree to pay the costs of the formation process;
(h) Include a list of petitioners or representatives thereof who
are willing and able to serve on the board of supervisors. All
petitioners within a proposed district who are natural persons, or
natural persons who are designated representatives of petitioners, are
eligible to include their name on the list of eligible supervisors.
The petitioners may nominate qualified professions to serve on the
board of supervisors in lieu of the petitioners or representatives of
the petitioners;
(i) If it proposes a special assessment, include: (i) A diagram
showing each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in
the district; (ii) the acreage of the property; (iii) the name and
address of the owner or reputed owner of each lot, tract, parcel of
land, or other property as shown on the tax rolls of the county
assessor; (iv) a preliminary assessment roll showing the special
assessment proposed to be imposed on each lot, tract, parcel of land,
or other property; and (v) a proposed method or combination of methods
for computing special assessments, determining the benefit to assessed
property or use from facilities or improvements funded directly or
indirectly by special assessments under this chapter; and
(j) Include an explanation of what security will be provided to
ensure the timely payment of assessments and the timely payment of
bonds issued by the district.
(((2))) (3) The petition must be filed with the auditor of each
county in which property included within the proposed district is
located. The auditor for the county in which the largest geographic
portion of the proposed district is located must be the lead auditor
for the purposes of this section. Within thirty days of the lead
auditor's receipt of the petition, the lead auditor must confirm that
the petition has been validly executed by one hundred percent of all
owners of the property located within the proposed district, including
confirmation by the auditors of all other counties with whom the
petition was filed. Within ten days of the lead auditor's finding that
the petition either does or does not contain the required signatures,
the lead auditor must either (a) transmit the petition, together with
a certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to each legislative
authority petitioned for formation of the district; or (b) return the
petition to the petitioners with a list of property owners who must
sign the petition in order to comply with this section. There are no
restrictions on the number of petitions that may be submitted by one or
more property owners.
(((3))) (4) A petition may be amended for any reason if the
amendment is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of property
located within the district proposed in the amended petition.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.145.100 and 2010 c 7 s 501 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Through the use of district revenue derived through special
assessments and bonds authorized under this chapter, and((,))
consistent with the terms and conditions of a petition approved in
accordance with this chapter, a community facilities district may
finance all or a portion of the following costs, expenses, and
facilities whether located inside or outside the boundaries of an
approved district:
(a) The cost, or any portion thereof, of the purchase, finance,
lease, sublease, construction, expansion, improvement, or
rehabilitation of any facility with an estimated life of five years or
longer;
(b) The planning and design work that is directly related to the
purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of a
facility, including engineering, architectural, planning, and
inspection costs;
(c) Facilities listed in RCW 35.43.040 to the extent not specified
in this section;
(d) Sanitary sewage systems, including collection, transport,
storage, treatment, dispersal, effluent use, and discharge;
(e) Drainage and flood control systems, including collection,
transport, diversion, storage, detention, retention, dispersal, use,
and discharge;
(f) Water systems for domestic, industrial, irrigation, municipal,
or community facilities purposes, including production, collection,
storage, treatment, transport, delivery, connection, and dispersal;
(g) Highways, streets, roadways, and parking facilities, including
all areas for vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(h) Areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or other nonmotor
vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(i) Pedestrian malls, parks, recreational facilities, and open-space facilities for the use of members of the public for
entertainment, assembly, and recreation;
(j) Landscaping, including earthworks, structures, lakes, and other
water features, plants, trees, and related water delivery systems;
(k) Public buildings, public safety facilities, and community
facilities;
(l) Publicly owned natural gas transmission and distribution
facilities, facilities for the transmission or distribution of
electrical energy, and limited communications facilities, specifically
poles, trenches, and conduits, for use of any communications provider;
(m) Street lighting;
(n) Traffic control systems and devices, including signals,
controls, markings, and signage;
(o) Systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of mass transportation facilities,
including passenger, terminal, station parking, and related facilities
and areas for passenger and vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress,
and parking;
(p) Library, educational, and cultural facilities; ((and))
(q) Facilities similar to those listed in this section; and
(r) Transferable development rights.
(2) The district may not finance public or private residential
dwellings, nonprofit facilities as defined in RCW 43.180.300, health
care facilities as defined in RCW 70.37.020, higher education
institutions as defined in RCW 28B.07.020, or economic development
activities as defined in RCW 43.163.010.

--- END ---