BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that one goal of
the growth management act is to encourage development in urban areas
where adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided
in an efficient manner.
A second goal of the growth management act is to encourage the
availability of affordable housing to all economic segments of the
population, to promote a variety of residential densities and housing
types, and to encourage the preservation of existing housing stock.
The legislature recognizes also that these goals can be promoted
through efforts to thoughtfully and efficiently foster residential
infrastructure development in urban growth areas, the locally
designated population and activity centers to which local governments
are encouraged to direct growth. The legislature, therefore, intends
to establish new policies for promoting residential infrastructure in
urban growth areas designated under the growth management act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Affordable residential development"
means:
(a) For ownership housing, sales price affordable to a household up
to one hundred twenty percent of median income adjusted by the
household size presumed to occupy the unit based on the number of
bedrooms, using conventional or federal housing administration lending
standards, and taking into account mortgage principal and interest,
property taxes, homeowner's insurance, and condominium dues, if
applicable.
(b) For rental housing, housing costs, including rent and basic
utilities, do not exceed thirty percent of eighty percent of median
income for the average size household presumed to occupy the unit based
on the number of bedrooms using United States department of housing and
urban development guidelines.
(2) "Comparable replacement housing" means any dwelling that is (a)
decent, safe, and sanitary; (b) adequate in size to accommodate the
occupants; (c) within the financial means of the displaced person; (d)
functionally equivalent; (e) in an area not subject to unreasonably
adverse environmental conditions; and (f) in a location generally not
less desirable than the location of the displaced person's dwelling
with respect to public utilities, facilities, services, and the
displaced person's place of employment.
(3) "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for
wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor.
(4) "Dense" means the same as transit-supportive density.
(5) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(7) "Eligible jurisdiction" means a county or city planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 or a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of
Washington.
(8) "High capacity transit station" means a stop or station for
public transportation that operates on a fixed guideway rail system or
designated bus rapid transit line.
(9) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income, adjusted for household
size, is no more than eighty percent of median income.
(10) "Major transit stop" means a stop for a bus or other transit
mode providing fixed route service in intervals of at least every
thirty minutes during peak hours of operation.
(11) "Market rate" means the current average market interest rate
that is determined at the time an individual loan is closed upon, or
grant is awarded, using a widely recognized current market interest
rate measurement to be selected for use by the department. This
interest rate must be noted in an attachment to the closing documents
for any loan and in any grant contract for reference if the loan or
grant must be repaid with interest.
(12) "Median income" has the same meaning as determined annually by
the United States department of housing and urban development for the
metropolitan area or county in which an individual resides.
(13) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is tax
exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, or similar successor
provisions.
(14) "Residential development" means a unit of housing that is
contained within a single, multifamily, or mixed use development.
(15) "Rural and resource land transfer of development rights" or
"transfer of development rights" includes methods for protecting land
from development by voluntarily removing the development rights from a
transfer of development rights sending site and transferring them to a
transfer of development receiving site for the purpose of increasing
development density in the receiving site. Methods for protecting
sending sites and increasing the development density in receiving sites
include awarding bonuses or regulatory flexibility to receiving sites
when persons within a receiving site purchase development rights from
a sending site through a transfer of development rights bank or from a
landowner who is a willing development rights seller. Bonuses include,
but are not limited to, increased height, density, or floor area ratio.
Options for regulations on which a jurisdiction could award increased
flexibility include, but are not limited to, parking requirements,
impervious surface limits, or setbacks.
(16) "Transfer of development rights receiving site" or "transfer
of development rights sending site" means an area that a city or county
has designated as either a receiving site or sending site in accordance
with a rural and resource land transfer of development rights program.
(17) "Transit-proximate" means within one-half mile walking
distance of a high capacity transit station or within one-quarter mile
of another major transit stop.
(18) "Transit-supportive density" means a minimum average of fifty
units of development for each acre of land within one-half mile walking
distance of a high capacity transit station, and a minimum of ten
development units for each acre of land within one-quarter mile of
another major transit stop.
(19) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income, adjusted for household
size, is no more than fifty percent of median income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the residential infrastructure
program is created in the department to provide loans to eligible
jurisdictions and grants to nonprofit organizations for public
infrastructure that supports increased capacity for dense, affordable
residential development in transit-proximate areas.
(2) The department may provide direct loans to eligible
jurisdictions for projects meeting the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section or provide grants to nonprofit organizations for
projects meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
Funds appropriated through the program must be used to pay for the cost
of public infrastructure projects that support increased capacity for
dense, affordable residential development in transit-proximate areas,
including the planning, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of sidewalks, streets and
roads, bridges, publicly owned utilities, drinking water systems, and
storm and sanitary sewage systems. The department may also provide
loans to eligible jurisdictions or grants to nonprofit organizations
for the acquisition of real property when the acquisition is directly
related to the development of public infrastructure projects to support
dense, affordable residential development in transit-proximate areas.
(3) An eligible jurisdiction seeking funding from the residential
infrastructure program must:
(a) Designate a project area within its urban growth area
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 and demonstrate with official plans
that overall development within the project area will increase the
supply of dense, affordable residential development units and that the
project area currently, or will within eight years of the loan award,
meets the definitions of transit-proximate and will achieve minimum
transit-supportive density;
(b) Demonstrate that designated infrastructure projects, for which
an eligible jurisdiction seeks funding:
(i) Are contained in the eligible jurisdictions' capital facilities
element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070;
(ii) Maximize the use of existing infrastructure; and
(iii) Will increase existing system capacity to accommodate
projected population growth in a manner that supports infill and
redevelopment of existing urban areas;
(c) Demonstrate a commitment to promoting affordable residential
development within the designated project area through:
(i) Local funding commitments to affordable residential housing
projects in the proposed project area; or
(ii) The official adoption and implementation of policies and
ordinances that include affordable housing incentive initiatives, such
as those outlined within RCW 36.70A.540, or other policies and programs
intended to promote the creation of affordable housing;
(d) Include a plan to construct, or pay for the construction of,
comparable replacement housing within the eligible jurisdiction when
housing units are lost as a direct result of the public infrastructure
projects funded under this program. The plan must include the
following:
(i) A residential unit lost as a result of the infrastructure
project must be replaced one-for-one with a unit at an equal or better
affordability rate;
(ii) Households that are displaced must receive priority for
obtaining replacement units, by being provided with a forty-five day
option to obtain a replacement unit prior to the unit being made
available to nondisplaced households. If a household rejects a unit
prior to the forty-fifth day, the priority option period will conclude
for that household. All displaced households interested in the
replacement units must be given priority before any such units are made
available to non-displaced households;
(iii) Relocation assistance must be paid to any displaced
households; and
(iv) Projects receiving financing from the residential
infrastructure program must comply with any relocation standards and
requirements and real property acquisition policies established by the
department as a condition of residential infrastructure program
assistance; and
(e) Commit to complying with the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.
(4) A nonprofit organization seeking funding from the residential
infrastructure program must:
(a) Demonstrate that the funding will support public infrastructure
projects or the acquisition of property related to the development of
infrastructure projects, as described in subsection (2) of this
section, related to a specific affordable residential development that
has also received a commitment of funding from the Washington housing
trust fund under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW or the Washington state
housing finance commission under chapter 43.180 RCW;
(b) Demonstrate that the area in which the infrastructure project
will take place is within an urban growth area designated by a local
jurisdiction under RCW 36.70A.110, and demonstrate with official plans
from the jurisdiction that overall development within the project area
will increase the supply of dense, affordable residential development
and that the project area currently, or will within eight years of the
grant award, meets the definitions of transit-proximate and will
achieve minimum transit-supportive density;
(c) Demonstrate that the specific affordable housing development
described in (a) of this subsection will, within eight years of the
grant award, contribute to an increase in the supply of dense,
affordable residential development within the area referenced in (b) of
this subsection; and
(d) Comply with the requirements of subsection (3)(d) of this
section, related to the provision of comparable replacement housing and
relocation standards and requirements.
(5) The department must determine each year the total amount of
funding available in loans and grants and must establish the total
amount of financial assistance to be awarded to eligible jurisdiction
and nonprofit organization applicants based on (a) the total amount of
money appropriated to the program; (b) the quality of applications
received; and (c) the best available projections of total revenue
likely to be available for the program for the subsequent three years.
The total amount of financial assistance allocated must not exceed ten
million dollars per project for eligible jurisdictions and not exceed
one million dollars per project for nonprofit organizations. The
maximum project funding limits established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every
other year beginning July 1, 2012, based upon changes in the consumer
price index during the time period since the last adjustment. If the
bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price
index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest
number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of
the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments
for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must
calculate the new maximum project funding limits and transmit those new
limits to the department.
(6) Loan interest rates must not exceed one-half of one percent a
year. The department shall establish policies, priorities, and
procedures by which all or part of a loan may be forgiven if an
eligible jurisdiction:
(a) Creates a significantly greater number of affordable
residential housing units within the project area than the number
agreed to during loan contract negotiations;
(b) Creates a significant number of residential units that are
available and affordable to households of income levels significantly
below the maximum income levels allowable under the program; or
(c) Significantly exceeds program expectations in other ways to be
identified by the department.
(7) During each fiscal year in which funds are available for use by
the department for the residential infrastructure program, the
department shall announce to all known interested parties a competitive
application period of at least ninety days' duration. This
announcement must be made as often as the director deems appropriate
for proper utilization of resources.
(8) The department shall establish a competitive process for loan
and grant awards and shall review and prioritize proposals in
consultation with the public works board and the transportation
improvement board or designees selected by those boards to represent
them.
(a) Priority must be awarded to projects that include plans to:
(i) Maximize capacity to accommodate growth;
(ii) Maximize residential density;
(iii) Maximize the number of affordable housing units;
(iv) Maintain the affordability of the housing for the longest
period of time;
(v) Maximize affordability to low-income households and very low-income households;
(vi) Maximize access to public transit; and
(vii) Demonstrate readiness to proceed.
(b) In awarding loans and grants from the program established in
subsection (1) of this section, the department must consider whether
the jurisdiction has completed a Washington state quality award program
assessment of management systems.
(c) The department shall give additional consideration to
jurisdictions that demonstrate a commitment to creating receiving areas
for rural and resource land transfer of development rights, which may
be demonstrated through one of the following actions, listed in order
of highest value and priority:
(i) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction and an interlocal agreement with a sending site
jurisdiction that enables transfers from rural and resource lands;
(ii) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction; or
(iii) The jurisdiction states in its comprehensive plan at the time
of application a commitment to consider the development and
implementation of a rural and resource land transfer of development
rights program.
(9) Eligible jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive
support from the residential infrastructure program must report to the
department annually by December 31st of each year following the date of
the receipt of the loan or grant until ten years after the completion
of the infrastructure project.
(a) Reporting before and during the construction of the
infrastructure project must include information on the status of the
project, the estimated completion date, and any variations from the
approved proposal.
(b) Reporting after completion of the project must include a
description of how the project area is transit-proximate and has
achieved transit-supportive density requirements or how the eligible
jurisdiction or nonprofit organization is working toward complying with
those requirements. The report must also include information about the
status of the residential development occurring within the project
area, including:
(i) The total number of residential units developed or under
construction; and
(ii) The total number of residential units meeting the definition
of affordable residential development.
(10)(a) If an infrastructure project funded by the residential
infrastructure program is not completed by the agreed upon date or
varies substantially from the approved proposal in a way that will
result in the creation of less affordable residential development than
that agreed to at the time of the project funding award as a condition
of the funding, the eligible jurisdiction or nonprofit organization
associated with the project shall make the necessary project
adjustments as determined by the department or refund all or a portion
of the loan or grant amount.
(b) If an eligible jurisdiction rescinds its public commitment to
promoting affordable residential development within the designated
project area by changing officially adopted policies and ordinances or
failing to implement these policies and ordinances, eligible
jurisdictions may be required to refund all or a portion of the
principal loan amount plus compounded interest calculated at the
current market rate.
(c) If a nonprofit organization fails to produce the agreed upon
number of affordable residential units within its designated project,
the nonprofit organizations may be required to refund all or a portion
of its grant amount plus compounded interest calculated at the current
market rate.
(d) The department may grant a partial or total exemption from the
repayment requirement under this section if the department determines
that a project is substantially complete or that the property has been
substantially used in keeping with the original affordable residential
housing purpose of the loan or grant.
(11)(a) Jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive more
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in total loans or grants in a
calendar year from the program established in subsection (1) of this
section or other state housing-related funding sources, including the
housing trust fund, programs of the housing finance commission, and
surcharges established in RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179, must apply to
the Washington state quality award program for an assessment of
management systems.
(b) Jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that receive more
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in total loans or grants in a
calendar year from the program established in subsection (1) of this
section or other state housing-related funding sources, including the
housing trust fund, programs of the housing finance commission, and
surcharges established in RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179, for three or
more consecutive calendar years must apply to the Washington state
quality award program for an assessment of management systems every
three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---