BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.150 and 1994 c 216 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, upon review of any proposed action, shall take such of
the following actions as it deems necessary to best carry out the
intent of this chapter:
(1) Approve the proposal as submitted.
(2) Subject to RCW 35.02.170, modify the proposal by adjusting
boundaries to add or delete territory. ((However, any proposal for
annexation of territory to a town shall be subject to RCW 35.21.010 and
the board shall not add additional territory, the amount of which is
greater than that included in the original proposal.)) Subject to the
requirements of this chapter, a board may modify a proposal by adding
territory that would increase the total area of the proposal before the
board. However, a board may not modify a proposal for annexation of
less than one hundred acres to a city or town by adding an amount of
territory that constitutes more than one hundred percent of the total
area of the proposal before the board. A board may not modify a
proposal for annexation of one hundred acres or more to a city or town
by adding an amount of territory that constitutes more than fifteen
percent of the total area of the proposal before the board. Any
modifications shall not interfere with the authority of a city, town,
or special purpose district to require or not require preannexation
agreements, covenants, or petitions. A board shall not modify the
proposed incorporation of a city with an estimated population of seven
thousand five hundred or more by removing territory from the proposal,
or adding territory to the proposal, that constitutes ten percent or
more of the total area included within the proposal before the board.
However, a board shall remove territory in the proposed incorporation
that is located outside of an urban growth area or is annexed by a city
or town, and may remove territory in the proposed incorporation if a
petition or resolution proposing the annexation is filed or adopted
that has priority over the proposed incorporation, before the area is
established that is subject to this ten percent restriction on removing
or adding territory. A board shall not modify the proposed
incorporation of a city with a population of seven thousand five
hundred or more to reduce the territory in such a manner as to reduce
the population below seven thousand five hundred.
(3) Determine a division of assets and liabilities between two or
more governmental units where relevant.
(4) Determine whether, or the extent to which, functions of a
special purpose district are to be assumed by an incorporated city or
town, metropolitan municipal corporation, or another existing special
purpose district.
(5) Disapprove the proposal except that the board shall not have
jurisdiction: (a) To disapprove the dissolution or disincorporation of
a special purpose district which is not providing services but shall
have jurisdiction over the determination of a division of the assets
and liabilities of a dissolved or disincorporated special purpose
district; (b) over the division of assets and liabilities of a special
purpose district that is dissolved or disincorporated pursuant to
chapter 36.96 RCW; nor (c) to disapprove the incorporation of a city
with an estimated population of seven thousand five hundred or more,
but the board may recommend against the proposed incorporation of a
city with such an estimated population.
Unless the board disapproves a proposal, it shall be presented
under the appropriate statute for approval of a public body and, if
required, a vote of the people. A proposal that has been modified
shall be presented under the appropriate statute for approval of a
public body and if required, a vote of the people. If a proposal,
other than that for a city, town, or special purpose district
annexation, after modification does not contain enough signatures of
persons within the modified area, as are required by law, then the
initiating party, parties or governmental unit has thirty days after
the modification decision to secure enough signatures to satisfy the
legal requirement. If the signatures cannot be secured then the
proposal may be submitted to a vote of the people, as required by law.
The addition or deletion of property by the board shall not
invalidate a petition which had previously satisfied the sufficiency of
signature provisions of RCW 35.13.130 or 35A.14.120. When the board,
after due proceedings held, disapproves a proposed action, such
proposed action shall be unavailable, the proposing agency shall be
without power to initiate the same or substantially the same as
determined by the board, and any succeeding acts intended to or tending
to effectuate that action shall be void, but such action may be
reinitiated after a period of twelve months from date of disapproval
and shall again be subject to the same consideration.
The board shall not modify or deny a proposed action unless there
is evidence on the record to support a conclusion that the action is
inconsistent with one or more of the objectives under RCW 36.93.180.
The board may not increase the area of a city or town annexation unless
it holds a separate public hearing on the proposed increase and
provides sixty or more days' notice of the hearing to the registered
voters and property owners residing within the area subject to the
proposed increase. Additionally, if the annexation would result in
additional indebtedness or excess tax levies, or both, for property
owners in the area subject to the proposed increase, the board may not
increase the area of a city or town annexation without first obtaining
written consent from at least sixty percent of the registered voters
residing within the area subject to the proposed increase.
Additionally, if the annexation would result in modifications to zoning
ordinances governing the area subject to the proposed increase, the
board may not increase the area of a city or town annexation without
first obtaining written consent from the owners of property equaling at
least sixty percent of the assessed valuation within the area subject
to the proposed increase. Every such determination to modify or deny
a proposed action shall be made in writing pursuant to a motion, and
shall be supported by appropriate written findings and conclusions,
based on the record.
If the board increases the total area of a proposed city or town
annexation, property owners residing in the increased area may, after
annexation, continue to own and possess pets and livestock lawfully in
their possession at the time of the annexation. For purposes of this
section, "pets" means domesticated or tamed animals that are not owned
for commercial, breeding, or business purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
If a boundary review board increases the total area of a proposed
city or town annexation, property owners residing in the increased area
may, after annexation, continue to own and possess pets and livestock
lawfully in their possession at the time of the annexation. For
purposes of this section, "pets" means domesticated or tamed animals
that are not owned for commercial, breeding, or business purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
If a boundary review board increases the total area of a proposed
code city annexation, property owners residing in the increased area
may, after annexation, continue to own and possess pets and livestock
lawfully in their possession at the time of the annexation. For
purposes of this section, "pets" means domesticated or tamed animals
that are not owned for commercial, breeding, or business purposes.

--- END ---