BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.12.040 and 1988 c 176 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
Services that the secretary may provide or arrange with others to
provide under this title include, but are not limited to:
(1) Applied behavior analysis services;
(2) Architectural services;
(((2))) (3) Case management services;
(((3))) (4) Early childhood intervention;
(((4))) (5) Employment services;
(((5))) (6) Family counseling;
(((6))) (7) Family support;
(((7))) (8) Information and referral;
(((8))) (9) Health services and equipment;
(((9))) (10) Legal services;
(((10))) (11) Residential services and support;
(((11))) (12) Respite care;
(((12))) (13) Therapy services and equipment;
(((13))) (14) Transportation services; and
(((14))) (15) Vocational services.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.24.020 and 2009 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Intensive behavior support services under the program
authorized in RCW 71A.24.010 shall be provided through a core team of
highly trained individuals, either directly or by contract.
(2) The intensive behavior support services shall be designed to
enhance the child's and parent's skills to manage behaviors, increase
family and personal self-sufficiency, improve functioning of the
family, reduce stress on children and families, and assist the family
to locate and use other community services.
(3) The core team shall have the following characteristics and
responsibilities:
(a) Expertise in behavior management, therapies, and children's
crisis intervention, or the ability to access such specialized
expertise;
(b) Ability to coordinate the array of services and supports needed
to stabilize the family;
(c) Ability to conduct transition planning as an individual and the
individual's family leave the program; and
(d) Ability to authorize and coordinate the services in the
family's home and other environments, such as schools and
neighborhoods.
(4) The following types of services constitute intensive behavior
support services:
(a) Behavior management and consultation;
(b) Environmental adaptations;
(c) Motor vehicle adaptations;
(d) Therapy equipment and supplies;
(e) Personal care;
(f) Specialized diet goods and services;
(g) In-home respite and planned out-of-home respite;
(h) Intensive training to intervene effectively with the child for
families and other individuals and partners working with the child in
all domains, including the school and individualized education plan
team; and
(i) Coordination and planning.
(5) Applied behavior analysis services may be provided by a state
or nationally certified behavior analyst, a licensed mental health
counselor, or a licensed psychologist.

--- END ---