BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may develop a comprehensive program that allows
private entities to operate state-owned safety rest areas.
(2) The program to allow private entities to operate state-owned
safety rest areas must meet the following criteria:
(a) In addition to commercial services offered, privately operated
safety rest areas must also offer equivalent services, at no charge,
currently provided by state-operated safety rest areas;
(b) The department must lease the rights to operate safety rest
areas for a commercially reasonable period of time, but no longer than
twenty years;
(c) The department may lease the right to operate either individual
safety rest areas, or groups of safety rest areas, or both, to a
private entity;
(d) Before entering into a lease with an entity, the department
must contact food or beverage retailers, restaurants, grocery and
convenience stores, lodging, and service station businesses within one
mile from the highway exits immediately before and after the rest stop
location, in each direction of traffic, and allow these businesses an
opportunity to bid or otherwise negotiate with the department to
operate the facility. If no business responds with a reasonable bid or
offer within sixty days, the department must open up the bid or
negotiation process to all interested entities;
(e) The department must take all necessary action to ensure the
most favorable lease rates for the state, whether by bid or other
reasonable manner, and to require the lessee to enter into any other
contract or agreement to protect the state and its citizens from
commercial harm or other type of harm; and
(f) A lease must allow a nonprofit organization that had previously
conducted fund-raising activities on the premises to continue such
activities. Alternatively, at the election of the nonprofit
organizations, one percent of gross sales must be divided between all
of the nonprofit organizations that had conducted fund-raising
activities on the premises within the twenty-four months prior to the
effective date of the lease. Payments must be calculated and paid
every six months on a pro rata basis, whereby each nonprofit
organization is entitled to a share of the sales equal to the
percentage of time that organization actually spent working on the
premises relative to any other nonprofit organization that also
conducted fund-raising activities on the premises for the twenty-four
months prior to the effective date of the lease.

--- END ---