BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the community and
technical colleges offer high quality, cost-effective instructional
programs to the citizens of the state. The legislature finds that
academic employee morale and willingness to invest in professional
development, and academic employee recruitment and retention, are
improved by consistent and predictable salary increases that recognize
two-year college academic employees who upgrade their skills and
professional experience. It is the intent of the legislature that
state appropriations be adjusted to an amount that, together with
academic employee turnover savings, provides for consistent and
predictable funding of academic employee salary increments for
qualifying academic employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
section 3 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Associated benefits" means those compensation benefits that
are based on a percent of an employee's salary, such as retirement and
old age survivors insurance.
(2) "Academic employee" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.52.020,
which means any teacher, counselor, librarian, or department head, who
is employed by any college district, whether full or part time, with
the exception of the chief administrative officer or, and any
administrator in, each college district.
(3) "General salary increase" means the salary adjustment granted
by the legislature for cost-of-living increases as provided in RCW
28B.50.465.
(4) "Increments" means an increase in the base salary of an
academic employee. Increments may be based on time, such as completing
another year of employment, completing specific requirements, such as
certification, or a combination of time and requirements.
(5) "Turnover savings" is the ongoing permanent difference between
the compensation level of an academic employee who is no longer
employed and the compensation level of the academic employee
replacement. Full-time faculty turnover savings may only be captured
when a full-time faculty member is replaced by a full-time faculty
member. Similarly, part-time faculty turnover savings may only be
captured when a part-time faculty member is replaced by a part-time
faculty member. Turnover savings exclude temporary savings such as
vacant positions or academic employees on leave, reassignment, or
sabbatical.
(6) "Salary base" is the prior year's total state-funded
expenditures for all academic employees' ending salary levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each biennium, the college board shall submit in its biennial
budget request an amount of funds, which together with academic
employee turnover savings, is sufficient to cover the projected state-
funded costs of increments for the community and technical college
system.
(2) The basis for the biennial budget request shall be eight-tenths
of one percent of the academic employees' salary base plus the value of
associated benefits.
(3) The college board shall determine the method of allocating to
the community and technical colleges the appropriations granted for
academic employee increments, provided that the amount of the
appropriation generated from the proportionate share of the part-time
faculty salary base shall only be accessible for part-time faculty. In
addition, all part-time faculty turnover savings, as defined in section
2(5) of this act, shall only be accessible for part-time faculty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Boards of trustees shall award academic employee salary
increments based on local agreements developed under chapter 28B.52
RCW. In years when the legislature does not provide funding for
faculty salary increments, a board of trustees may use additional funds
that exceed those provided by the legislature.
(2) Funds allocated by the college board to local boards of
trustees for part-time faculty under the provisions of section 3 of
this act may be used for general salary increases for part-time
faculty.
(3) Boards of trustees may combine appropriations allocated by the
college board for academic employee salary increments with general
salary increase funding to increase academic employee increments. To
the extent that general salary increase funding is used to pay academic
employee increments, the general salary increase shall be reduced by
the same amount.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2010 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3);
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Except as provided in section 4 of this
act, compensation and salary increases under this subsection shall not
exceed the amount or percentage established for those purposes in the
state appropriations act by the legislature as allocated to the board
of trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules
defining the permissible elements of compensation under this
subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules of the college
board; each board of trustees operating a community and technical
college may enter into agreements, subject to rules of the college
board, with owners of facilities to be used for housing regarding the
management, operation, and government of such facilities, and any board
entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules for the government, management and operation of such
housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the rules of the state college
board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the
proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on
property owned, operated, or maintained by the district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, degree, or certificate under the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges that are
appropriate to their mission. The purposes of these diplomas,
certificates, and degrees are to lead individuals directly to
employment in a specific occupation or prepare individuals for a
bachelor's degree or beyond. Technical colleges may only offer
transfer degrees that prepare students for bachelor's degrees in
professional fields, subject to rules adopted by the college board. In
adopting rules, the college board, where possible, shall create
consistency between community and technical colleges and may address
issues related to tuition and fee rates; tuition waivers; enrollment
counting, including the use of credits instead of clock hours; degree
granting authority; or any other rules necessary to offer the associate
degrees that prepare students for transfer to bachelor's degrees in
professional areas. Only ((pilot)) colleges under RCW 28B.50.810 may
award baccalaureate degrees. The board, upon recommendation of the
faculty, may also confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon
persons other than graduates of the community college, in recognition
of their learning or devotion to education, literature, art, or
science. No degree may be conferred in consideration of the payment of
money or the donation of any kind of property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules prescribed by the state board for
community and technical colleges for the government of community and
technical colleges, students and teachers, and adopt such rules and
perform all other acts not inconsistent with law or rules of the state
board for community and technical colleges as the board of trustees may
in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration
of college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules shall include, but not
be limited to, rules relating to housing, scholarships, conduct at the
various community and technical college facilities, and discipline:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board of trustees may suspend or expel from
community and technical colleges students who refuse to obey any of the
duly adopted rules;
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules adopted by the state
board for community and technical colleges: PROVIDED, That the whole
of such special fee shall go to the college district and be not less
than the full instructional costs of such services including any salary
increases authorized by the legislature for community and technical
college employees during the term of the agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That enrollments generated hereunder shall not be counted toward the
official enrollment level of the college district for state funding
purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230;
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule of the state board; and
(21) May confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon persons who
request an honorary degree if they were students at the college in 1942
and did not graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp.
The honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of
deceased persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this
subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which
persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066,
signed on February 19, 1942.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.52.035 and 1991 c 238 s 148 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the conclusion of any negotiation processes as provided for in
RCW 28B.52.030, any matter upon which the parties have reached
agreement shall be reduced to writing and acted upon in a regular or
special meeting of the boards of trustees, and become part of the
official proceedings of said board meeting. Except as provided in
section 4 of this act, provisions of written contracts relating to
salary increases shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
by the legislature in the appropriations act and allocated to the board
of trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges.
The length of term of any such agreement shall be for not more than
three fiscal years. Any provisions of these agreements pertaining to
salary increases will not be binding upon future actions of the
legislature. If any provision of a salary increase is changed by
subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the legislature,
both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for the
sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the
modified provision.

--- END ---