BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.050 and 2009 c 495 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050;
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1st
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1st of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules for group A public water systems, as defined in RCW
70.119A.020, necessary to assure safe and reliable public drinking
water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall establish
requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants;
(b) Adopt rules as necessary for group B public water systems, as
defined in RCW 70.119A.020. The rules shall, at a minimum, establish
requirements regarding the initial design and construction of a public
water system. The state board of health rules may waive some or all
requirements for group B public water systems with fewer than five
connections;
(c) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(d) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(e) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(f) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; and
(g) Adopt rules for accessing existing databases for the purposes
of performing health related research.
(3) The state board shall adopt rules consistent with section 3 of
this act for the design, construction, installation, operation, and
maintenance of those on-site sewage systems with design flows of less
than three thousand five hundred gallons per day.
(4) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(5) All local boards of health, health authorities and officials,
officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs, constables,
and all other officers and employees of the state, or any county, city,
or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by the state board
of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the part of any
member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned in this
section to so act, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not less
than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one
hundred dollars upon second conviction.
(6) The state board may advise the secretary on health policy
issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.118.120 and 1999 c 263 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local board of health shall ensure that individuals who
conduct inspections of on-site wastewater treatment systems or who
otherwise conduct reviews of such systems are qualified in the
technology and application of on-site sewage treatment principles. A
certificate of competency issued by the department of licensing is
adequate demonstration that an individual is competent in the
engineering aspects of on-site wastewater treatment system technology.
(2) A local board of health may allow noncertified individuals to
review designs of, and conduct inspections of, on-site wastewater
treatment systems for a maximum of two years after the date of hire, if
a certified individual reviews or supervises the work during that time.
(3) This section does not apply to inspections performed under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department or a local board of health may not require
periodic maintenance and operation inspections of on-site sewage
disposal systems more than once every three years if the on-site sewage
disposal system:
(a) Has a design flow of less than three thousand five hundred
gallons per day; and
(b) Is a gravity flow system, pressure distribution system, mound
system, sand filter system, or biofilter system.
(2) For on-site sewage disposal systems meeting the criteria under
subsection (1) of this section, inspections may be conducted by the
owner of the system or the owner's designee.
(3) With the advice of the secretary of the department, local
boards of health shall adopt policies to determine the qualifications
for the on-site sewage disposal system owner, or the owner's designee,
to perform an inspection. The system owner or designee must be
certified as a qualified inspector by the local board of health before
the owner or designee is authorized to perform an inspection.
(4) A certificate of competency issued by the department of
licensing to demonstrate that an individual is competent to perform
inspections under RCW 70.118.120 is not required under this section.

--- END ---