BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2009 c 373 s 1 and 2009 c 271 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of
Washington; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling
its products within the United States in accordance with a written
agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or
winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced
licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor
are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(16) "Domestic winery" means a ((place where wines are manufactured
or produced within the state of Washington)) premises licensed under
RCW 66.24.170.
(17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the
sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains
a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist
during all hours the drug store is open.
(18) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and
is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in
carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to
chapter 18.64 RCW.
(19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having
facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept,
used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous
liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous,
vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a
part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or
otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other
substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer,
and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures
capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or
other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by
weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or
less of alcohol by weight.
(26) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract
of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure
water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and
not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the
purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight
percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."
(27) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the production or
other preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(28) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides entertainment
and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of alcohol for
consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c) both, and has an
occupancy load of one hundred or more.
(29) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding
liquor.
(30) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.
(31) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this
title.
(32) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.
(33) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(34) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and
given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this
title for medicinal purposes.
(35) "Production" with respect to wine means the creation of wine
by fermentation in or on the premises licensed under RCW 66.24.170(2).
The term includes wine produced by a predecessor in interest at such
licensed premises.
(36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may
be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings,
public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels,
restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are
open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is
permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to
unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or
similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of
access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((36))) (37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((37))) (38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((38))) (39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((39))) (40) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((40))) (41) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((41))) (42) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((42))) (43) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((43))) (44)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((44))) (45) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((45))) (46) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.
(((46))) (47) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.170 and 2009 c 373 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be ((a)) licenses for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) ((The)) Class A license. A class A domestic winery license
allows for the ((manufacture)) production of wine in Washington state
from grapes or other agricultural products. A class A licensee must
produce at least two hundred gallons of wine annually. Wine purchased
from another class A domestic winery under (a) of this subsection does
not apply to the two hundred gallon production requirement.
(a) A class A domestic winery may purchase for wholesale or retail
sale wine produced by one or more other class A domestic wineries.
(((3))) (b) Any class A domestic winery licensed under this section
may also act as a retailer of wine ((of its own production)) produced
or purchased by it. Any class A domestic winery licensed under this
section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a class A
domestic winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred
cases of ((its own production)) wine produced or purchased by it, in
the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. ((A
domestic winery may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments
to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production.)) Except as
provided in this section, any class A domestic winery operating as a
distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the
applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers,
except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain a
warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine
((of its own production)) produced or purchased by it provided that:
(((a))) (i) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW
66.24.010; and (((b))) (ii) the number of warehouses off the premises
of the winery does not exceed one.
(((4) A)) (c) A class A domestic winery licensed under this
section, at locations separate from any of its production ((or
manufacturing)) sites, may serve samples of ((its own products)) wine
produced or purchased by it, with or without charge, and sell wine ((of
its own production)) at retail produced or purchased by it, provided
that: (((a))) (i) Each additional location has been approved by the
board under RCW 66.24.010; (((b))) (ii) the total number of additional
locations does not exceed two; (((c))) (iii) a winery may not act as a
distributor at any such additional location; and (((d))) (iv) any
person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premise
consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.
Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery license for
the purpose of this title. At additional locations operated by
multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot connect a
violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee, the board
may hold all licensees operating the additional location jointly
liable. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a
domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery licenses.
(((5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The
winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the
winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6))) (d) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery
licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into
sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such
wine shall be deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for
the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.
(3)(a) Class B license. A class B domestic winery license allows
for the purchase of wine for resale produced from grapes or other
agricultural products by:
(i) A class A domestic winery; or
(ii) A certificate of approval holder in an American viticultural
area located within both Washington and an adjoining state, from grapes
or other agricultural products. A class B domestic winery license does
not allow for the production of wine.
(b) A class B domestic winery may:
(i) Sell wine produced for or purchased by it at wholesale or
retail for off-premises consumption. Any class B licensee operating as
a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with
the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers; and
(ii) Serve samples of wine produced for or purchased by it at its
licensed premises, with or without charge. Any person selling or
serving samples must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server
permit.
(4) For purposes of this section, "American viticultural area" has
the same meaning as provided in RCW 66.28.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process and such additional rules as are necessary to
implement RCW 66.24.170.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A class A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply
to the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in RCW
66.24.170(2)(c).
(2) For each month during which the licensee will sell wine at a
qualifying farmers market, the licensee must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the licensee may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(3) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in Washington or an American viticultural
area located within both Washington and an adjoining state or from
other agricultural products grown in this state.
(4) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this section do
not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The winery
may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery
offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor
from a farmers market location.
(5) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this section to sell
bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application shall
include, at a minimum: (a) A map of the farmers market showing all
booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (b) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(6) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(7) For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(i) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(ii) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(iii) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(iv) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(v) No vendor is a franchisee.
(b) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(c) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(d) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.310 and 1997 c 321 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no person
shall canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders for the purchase or
sale of liquor, nor contact any licensees of the board in goodwill
activities, unless such person shall be the accredited representative
of a person, firm, or corporation holding a certificate of approval
issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer distributor's
license, a microbrewer's license, a domestic brewer's license, a beer
importer's license, a domestic winery license, a wine importer's
license, or a wine distributor's license within the state of
Washington, or the accredited representative of a distiller,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor, or foreign
produced beer or wine, and shall have applied for and received a
representative's license((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the provisions)).
(b) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not apply to:
(i) Drivers who deliver beer or wine; or
(ii) Stockholders, partners, members, and other owners who are
natural persons engaged in the operation of any domestic winery and all
full and part-time employees of any domestic winery.
(2) Every representative's license issued under this title shall be
subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by
the rules and regulations of the board; the board, for the purpose of
maintaining an orderly market, may limit the number of representative's
licenses issued for representation of specific classes of eligible
employers((;)).
(3) Every application for a representative's license must be
approved by a holder of a certificate of approval issued pursuant to
RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a licensed beer distributor, a licensed
domestic brewer, a licensed beer importer, a licensed microbrewer, a
licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine importer, a licensed wine
distributor, or by a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor
of spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer or wine, as the rules
and regulations of the board shall require((;)).
(4) The fee for a representative's license shall be twenty-five
dollars per year((;)).
(5) An accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor may, after he or she has
applied for and received a representative's license, contact retail
licensees of the board only in goodwill activities pertaining to
spirituous liquor products.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.20.300 and 2010 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350.
(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.
(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her
employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages
for on-premise consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular
requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons
eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this
state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.
(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(4) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations,
independent contractors, private persons, and private or public
schools, that have been certified by the board.
(5) "Retail licensed premises" means any:
(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink,
or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as
authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400,
66.24.425, 66.24.450, and 66.24.570;
(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is
authorized to serve samples of its own production;
(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and
selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(((4))) (2)(c); and
(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with
respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting
activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.36.020 and 2010 c 186 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property is exempt from taxation:
(1) All lands, buildings, and personal property required for
necessary administration and maintenance, used, or to the extent used,
exclusively for public burying grounds or cemeteries without
discrimination as to race, color, national origin or ancestry;
(2) All churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding
five acres in area, upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized
religious denomination is or will be built, together with a parsonage,
convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of such property. The area exempted in any case
includes all ground covered by the church, parsonage, convent, and
buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and
safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground necessary
for street access, parking, light, and ventilation, but the area of
unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with church,
parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, does not exceed the
equivalent of one hundred twenty by one hundred twenty feet except
where additional unoccupied land may be required to conform with state
or local codes, zoning, or licensing requirements. The parsonage and
convent need not be on land contiguous to the church property. Except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, to be exempt the property
must be wholly used for church purposes. The loan or rental of
property otherwise exempt under this subsection to a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation, or school for use for an
eleemosynary activity or for use for activities related to a farmers
market, does not nullify the exemption provided in this subsection if
the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the
operation and maintenance of the property. However, activities related
to a farmers market may not occur on the property more than fifty-three
days each assessment year. For the purposes of this section, "farmers
market" has the same meaning as "qualifying farmers market" as defined
in ((RCW 66.24.170)) section 4 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.36.037 and 2010 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Real or personal property owned by a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation in connection with the operation of a
public assembly hall or meeting place is exempt from taxation. The
area exempt under this section includes the building or buildings, the
land under the buildings, and an additional area necessary for parking,
not exceeding a total of one acre. When property for which exemption
is sought is essentially unimproved except for restroom facilities and
structures and this property has been used primarily for annual
community celebration events for at least ten years, the exempt
property shall not exceed twenty-nine acres.
(2) To qualify for this exemption the property must be used
exclusively for public gatherings and must be available to all
organizations or persons desiring to use the property, but the owner
may impose conditions and restrictions which are necessary for the
safekeeping of the property and promote the purposes of this exemption.
Membership shall not be a prerequisite for the use of the property.
(3) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities, except as provided in this section, nullifies the exemption
otherwise available for the property for the assessment year. The
exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if all funds collected are
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the use of
the property for pecuniary gain, for business activities for periods of
not more than fifteen days each assessment year so long as all income
received from rental or use of the exempt property is used for capital
improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the
exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(ii) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities if the property is used for activities related to a
qualifying farmers market, as defined in ((RCW 66.24.170)) section 4 of
this act, for not more than fifty-three days each assessment year, and
all income received from rental or use of the exempt property is used
for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or exempt purposes.
(d) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
use of the property to promote the following business activities:
Dance lessons, art classes, or music lessons.
(e) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(4) The department of revenue must narrowly construe this
exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 7 and 8 of this act expire December
31, 2020.

--- END ---