BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.020 and 2005 c 516 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of
the Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(5) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(7) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate;
(8) "Property" means property included in the gross estate;
(9) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(10) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this
chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120;
(11) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code. However, "transfer" does not include a
qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a
deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for
farming purposes;
(12) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110A.010, the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005;
(13) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable estate,
less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents
dying before January 1, 2006; ((and)) (b) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006((; and (c))), and before
the effective date of this section; (c) five million dollars for
decedents dying on or after the effective date of this section; and (d)
the amount of any deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046; and
(14) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the Internal Revenue Code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---