BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2009 c 238 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under RCW 28B.92.084, for a student to be eligible for a state
need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((3))) (2) and (((4)))
(5);
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year;
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment ((on at least a half-time basis)) for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent
semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((1))) (4); and
(4) ((Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions
specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled or accepted
for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent
semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.92.030(1); and
(5))) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the board for the
administration of this chapter.

--- END ---