BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that although social
networking web sites and online bulletin boards provide valuable
opportunities for networking, there are also opportunities for conduct
that can cause harm to other persons. There are civil and criminal
remedies for certain types of fraud, impersonation, and appropriation
of a person's personality for commercial purposes. However, how these
traditional legal remedies extend to wrongful impersonation over the
internet to mislead, deceive, harass, threaten, or intimidate is
relatively new and unclear. Courts have recognized the tort of
invasion of privacy, and one of the four categories of an invasion of
privacy claim is the misappropriation of another person's name or
likeness. It is the intent of the legislature to specify that the tort
of invasion of privacy may include the misappropriation of a person's
name or likeness through social networking web sites and online
bulletin boards with the intent to mislead, deceive, harass, threaten,
or intimidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Actual person" means a living individual.
(b) "Blog" means a web site that is created primarily for the
writer to maintain an online personal journal with reflections,
comments, or hyperlinks provided by the writer.
(c) "Impersonates" or "impersonation" means using an actual
person's name or likeness to create an impersonation that another
person would reasonably believe or did reasonably believe was or is the
actual person being impersonated.
(d) "Interactive computer service" means any information service,
system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically
a service or system that provides access to the internet and such
systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational
institutions.
(e) "Online bulletin board" means a web site that is designed
specifically for internet users to post and respond to online
classified advertisements that are viewable by other internet users.
(f) "Social networking web site" means a web site that allows a
user to create an account or profile for the user for the purposes of,
among other things, connecting the user's account or profile to other
users' accounts or profiles. A blog is not a social networking web
site.
(2) A person may be liable in a civil action based on a claim of
invasion of privacy when:
(a) The person impersonates another actual person on a social
networking web site or online bulletin board;
(b) The impersonation was intentional and without the actual
person's consent;
(c) The person intended to deceive or mislead for the purpose of
harassing, threatening, intimidating, humiliating, or defrauding
another; and
(d) The impersonation proximately caused injury to the actual
person. Injury may include injury to reputation or humiliation, injury
to professional or financial standing, or physical harm.
(3)(a) The actual person who suffered injury by an impersonation in
violation of this section may bring an action to recover actual
damages, injunctive relief, and declaratory relief. The court may
award actual damages, injunctive relief, and declaratory relief as
necessary.
(b) The court may award the prevailing party costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(4) This section does not apply when the impersonation was:
(a) For a use set forth in RCW 63.60.070, including for matters of
cultural, historical, political, religious, educational, newsworthy, or
public interest including, but not limited to, use in works of art,
commentary, satire, and parody;
(b) For a use that would violate chapter 63.60 RCW;
(c) Insignificant, de minimis, or incidental use; or
(d) Performed by a law enforcement agency as part of a lawful
criminal investigation.
(5) A court of this state may exercise jurisdiction in a suit
brought by a Washington resident or against a defendant who is a
Washington resident. Jurisdiction over any person who is not a
Washington resident may be exercised in a manner consistent with the
laws and Constitution of the state of Washington, including RCW
4.28.185, and the Constitution of the United States.
(6)(a) This section may not be construed to impose any liability on
a social networking web site, online bulletin board, internet service
provider, interactive computer service, computer hardware or software
provider, or web site operator or administrator or its employees,
unless the provider, operator, administrator, or employee is the person
impersonating an actual person. Nothing in this section is intended to
preclude other common law causes of action against these entities.
(b) This section may not be construed to limit any other civil
cause of action available to a person under statute or common law or
any criminal prosecution.
(7) For the purposes of this section, parental liability is limited
pursuant to RCW 4.24.190.

--- END ---