BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 86.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a watershed comprises territory within two or more
counties or reservations of federally recognized Indian tribes, the
boards of any or all of those counties, together with the appropriate
authorities of any federally recognized Indian tribes choosing to
participate, may create a multijurisdiction zone by execution of a
formation agreement that specifies the following:
(a) The boundaries of the multijurisdiction zone;
(b) The general flood control needs or requirements within the
multijurisdiction zone;
(c) The number of supervisors, the qualifications for supervisors,
the length of their terms, and whether supervisors will be appointed or
elected by district voters, or a combination of both, including:
(i) The method of appointing any supervisor; and
(ii) For elected supervisors, whether (A) a supervisor shall be
elected by all the voters within the multijurisdiction zone; (B)
whether a supervisor shall be elected by the voters of voting districts
with substantially equal numbers of voters; or (C) whether voting
districts with substantially equal numbers of voters shall each
nominate a candidate to be voted upon by all the voters within the
multijurisdiction zone;
(d) Manner in which actions are taken by the supervisors;
(e) The treasurer of a county participating in the
multijurisdiction zone that will hold the funds of the
multijurisdiction zone and carry out the responsibilities described in
RCW 86.15.130;
(f) The engineer of the multijurisdiction zone who, subject to
subsection (10) of this section, must be the engineer of a county
participating in the multijurisdiction zone and who must carry out the
responsibilities described in RCW 86.15.060 if so provided in the
agreement;
(g) The size, composition, and method of selecting members of the
advisory committee provided for pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section;
(h) The time and manner in which the supervisors adopt a budget
and, if desired, the policies and processes governing the adoption of
rates, charges, taxes and assessments, and policies governing
expenditures;
(i) If the boundaries of a multijurisdiction zone will overlap
another zone that is not a multijurisdiction zone, a provision
prescribing how any ad valorem property tax levies are to be
established so that the combined levies in the overlapping zones will
never exceed the amount authorized under RCW 86.15.160(3);
(j) Any other provisions deemed necessary and appropriate by the
jurisdictions executing the formation agreement.
The failure of a formation agreement to include each and every one
of the elements described in subsection (1) of this section shall not
render the agreement invalid. As soon as practicable after becoming
aware of the missing element or elements, the jurisdictions
participating within a multijurisdiction zone provide for the missing
elements by amending the formation agreement in the manner described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The formation agreement described in subsection (1) of this
section must be approved by resolution of the board of each of the
counties participating in the multijurisdiction zone after holding a
public hearing on that formation, which must be not more than thirty
days after the adoption of such resolution setting the hearing date.
Thereafter, a board may by resolution accept or reject the agreement
and the formation of the multijurisdiction zone. Any federally
recognized Indian tribe choosing to participate in a multijurisdiction
zone may approve its participation by action of the appropriate
authority of that tribe. The formation agreement may be amended from
time to time by resolution of the board of each county participating in
the multijurisdiction zone and by appropriate tribal-authorizing
action, except that amendments to boundaries must be made pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section.
(3) Any federally recognized Indian tribe with reservation land
located in the proposed multijurisdiction zone must be provided the
option to participate in the multijurisdiction zone, and each tribe
that chooses to participate may appoint a supervisor to the
multijurisdiction board. Land held in trust for any federally
recognized Indian tribe or enrolled tribal member that is within the
boundaries of a multijurisdiction zone shall not be treated as part of
that multijurisdiction zone for any purpose unless that tribe has
chosen to participate in the multijurisdiction zone.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 86.15.023, the boundaries of a
multijurisdiction zone may overlap another zone that is not a
multijurisdiction zone, but the combined annual ad valorem property tax
levy must not exceed the amount authorized under RCW 86.15.160(3).
(5) The board of supervisors of a multijurisdiction zone will
consist of a number of members provided in the formation agreement,
including any tribal supervisors. The length of terms of elected
supervisors must be determined substantially in accordance with RCW
86.15.050(7). Appointed supervisors serve at the pleasure of the
authority that appointed such supervisor. Members of the boards of the
counties may serve as supervisors. If an appointed supervisor is not
a member of the board of the county, then that appointed supervisor may
be compensated pursuant to the provisions of RCW 86.15.055.
(6) Each elected supervisor of a multijurisdiction zone serves
until his or her successor is elected and qualified and assumes office.
Vacancies in elected supervisor positions may occur and must be filled
as provided by chapter 42.12 RCW and the formation agreement. The
costs and expenses directly related to the election of supervisors must
be borne by the multijurisdiction zone.
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section, RCW 86.15.001,
86.15.020, 86.15.023, 86.15.025, 86.15.030, 86.15.050, 86.15.070,
86.15.130, and 86.15.200 do not apply to multijurisdiction zones. All
other provisions, powers, and limitations that apply to zones or flood
control zone districts under this chapter or other applicable law apply
to multijurisdiction zones.
(8) The funds of the multijurisdiction zone must be held by the
county treasurer designated in the agreement and such treasurer has the
duties and authority of a zone treasurer as set forth in RCW 86.15.130.
The administration of the affairs of a multijurisdiction zone are
placed in the county engineer, also designated in the agreement, who
has the duties of a zone engineer as set forth in RCW 86.15.060. If
the county with the designated treasurer or engineer of the
multijurisdiction zone withdraws from the multijurisdiction zone
pursuant to this section or is not designated in the formation
agreement, then the county treasurer or the county engineer of the
county remaining with the largest amount of area in the
multijurisdiction zone are the treasurer or engineer of the
multijurisdiction zone until the remaining counties participating in
the multijurisdiction zone approve a new treasurer or engineer.
(9) The supervisors may also provide for administration of the
affairs of the zone by other than the designated county engineer,
pursuant to the authority established in RCW 86.15.095, to hire
employees, staff, and services and to enter into contracts. The
multijurisdiction zone engineer or other administrator may appoint such
deputies and engage such employees, specialists, and technicians as may
be required by the multijurisdiction zone and as authorized by the
multijurisdiction zone's budget. Subject to the approval of the
supervisors, the engineer or other administrator may organize, or
reorganize as required, the zone into such departments, divisions, or
other administrative relationships as he or she deems necessary to its
efficient operation.
(10) The budget adopted by the supervisors of a multijurisdiction
zone must be in accordance with the provisions of RCW 86.15.140 unless
otherwise provided in the formation agreement.
(11) As set forth in the formation agreement, the supervisors of a
multijurisdiction zone and/or the boards of jurisdictions participating
in a multijurisdiction zone must appoint members of a multijurisdiction
zone advisory committee if the committee is established in the
agreement. Members of an advisory committee serve without pay and
shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.
(12) Subject to the terms of the formation agreement, and subject
to the terms of any other contract or bond covenant, the board of each
jurisdiction participating in a multijurisdiction zone may withdraw
pursuant to a resolution adopted by such board. A federally recognized
tribe may withdraw by action of the appropriate authority of that
tribe. Before withdrawing, the board of any county must conduct a
public hearing notice of which shall be given as provided by RCW
36.32.120(7). If all jurisdictions participating within a
multijurisdiction zone withdraw, the multijurisdiction zone is then
abolished. Any indebtedness of a multijurisdiction zone must not be
impaired by any withdrawal, and any county withdrawing must continue to
levy and collect all necessary taxes and assessments until such debts
are retired from property within the multijurisdiction zone.
(13) Territory within a watershed but within a county or within the
jurisdiction of a federally recognized tribe that did not initially
participate in formation of a multijurisdiction zone may later be
included within a multijurisdiction zone upon approval of the board of
that county or upon approval by the appropriate authority of that tribe
consistent with subsection (2) of this section, together with an
amendment of the agreement approved by the boards of all of the
counties and the appropriate authorities of all the tribes within the
multijurisdiction zone. Prior to inclusion of that territory, the
public hearing described in subsection (2) of this section is required
only in a county that did not initially participate in formation of the
multijurisdiction zone.
(14) Existing zones formed under this chapter may become combined
into and become a new multijurisdiction zone and be entitled to all the
powers and privileges available under this section if: (a) The zones
have entered into an interlocal agreement under RCW 86.15.035 or
86.15.080(8) and, if necessary, amend, restate, or replace the
interlocal agreement so that it materially complies with the
requirements of this section; (b) the boards of counties participating
in the agreement have passed resolutions approving the conversion of
the county zone into the new multijurisdiction zone; and (c) the
resolutions and amended, restated, or replaced agreements also provide
that all rights and obligations of the zone formally existing under
this chapter shall thereafter be the obligations of the new
multijurisdiction zone created under this section. Upon compliance
with those requirements, the new multijurisdiction zone is a successor
of the former zone for all purposes, and all rights and obligations of
the former zone shall transfer to the new multijurisdiction zone and
the obligations are treated as having been incurred, entered into, or
issued by the new multijurisdiction zone; those obligations remain in
full force and effect and continue to be enforceable in accordance with
their terms.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.93.020 and 1999 c 153 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used herein:
(1) "Governmental unit" means any incorporated city or town,
metropolitan municipal corporation, or any special purpose district as
defined in this section.
(2) "Special purpose district" means any water-sewer district, fire
protection district, drainage improvement district, drainage and diking
improvement district, flood control zone district (other than a
multijurisdiction flood control zone district), irrigation district,
metropolitan park district, drainage district, or public utility
district engaged in water distribution.
(3) "Board" means a boundary review board created by or pursuant to
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 86.15.010 and 1983 c 315 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply through this
chapter.
(1) "Board" means the county legislative authority.
(2) "Flood control improvement" means any works, projects, or other
facilities necessary for the control of flood waters within the county
or any zone or zones.
(3) "Flood waters" and "storm waters" means any storm waste or
surplus waters, including surface water, wherever located within the
county or a zone or zones where such waters endanger public highways,
streams and water courses, harbors, life, or property.
(4) "Participating zones" means two or more zones found to benefit
from a single flood control improvement or storm water control
improvement.
(5) "Storm water control improvement" means any works, projects, or
other facilities necessary to control and treat storm water within the
county or any zone or zones.
(6) "Supervisors" means the board of supervisors, or governing
body, of a zone.
(7) "Zones" and "multijurisdiction zones" mean((s)) flood control
zone districts ((which)) and multijurisdiction flood control zone
districts, respectively, and are quasi-municipal corporations of the
state of Washington created by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.15.035 and 2003 c 327 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in this chapter, flood
control zone districts may participate in and expend revenue on
cooperative watershed management arrangements and actions, including
((watershed management partnerships)) without limitation those under
chapter 39.34 RCW ((39.34.210)), under this act, and under other
intergovernmental agreements authorized by law, for purposes of water
supply, water quality, and water resource and habitat protection and
management.

Sec. 5 RCW 86.15.080 and 2010 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A zone or participating zone may:
(1) Exercise all the powers and immunities vested in a county for
flood water or storm water control purposes under the provisions of
chapters 86.12, 86.13, 36.89, and 36.94 RCW: PROVIDED, That in
exercising such powers, all actions shall be taken in the name of the
zone and, unless otherwise provided by agreement with a county or other
public entity, title to all property or property rights shall vest in
the zone;
(2) Plan, construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and operate all
necessary equipment, facilities, improvements, and works to control,
conserve, and remove flood waters and storm waters and to otherwise
carry out the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to,
protection of the quality of water sources;
(3) Take action necessary to protect life and property within the
district from flood water damage, including in the context of an
emergency, as defined in RCW 38.52.010, using covered volunteer
emergency workers, as defined in RCW 38.52.010 and 38.52.180(5)(a),
subject to and in accordance with the terms of RCW 38.52.180;
(4) Control, conserve, retain, reclaim, and remove flood waters and
storm waters, including waters of lakes and ponds within the district,
and dispose of the same for beneficial or useful purposes under such
terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, subject to the
acquisition by the board of appropriate water rights in accordance with
the statutes;
(5) Acquire necessary property, property rights, facilities, and
equipment necessary to the purposes of the zone by purchase, gift, or
condemnation pursuant to chapter 8.08 RCW: PROVIDED, That property of
municipal corporations may not be acquired without the consent of such
municipal corporation;
(6) Sue and be sued in the name of the zone;
(7) Acquire or reclaim lands when incidental to the purposes of the
zone and dispose of such lands as are surplus to the needs of the zone
in the manner provided for the disposal of county property in chapter
36.34 RCW;
(8) Cooperate with ((or)), join with, or contract with the state of
Washington, United States, another state, any agency, corporation or
political subdivision of the United States or any state, Canada, any
federally recognized Indian tribe, or any private corporation or
individual for the purposes of this chapter;
(9) Accept funds ((or)), property, property rights or other assets
or franchise rights by loan, grant, gift, or otherwise from the United
States, the state of Washington, or any other public or private source;
(10) Remove debris, logs, or other material which may impede the
orderly flow of waters in streams or water courses: PROVIDED, That
such material shall become property of the zone and may be sold for the
purpose of recovering the cost of removal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
valuable material or minerals removed from public lands shall remain
the property of the state;
(11) Provide grant funds to political subdivisions of the state
that are located within the boundaries of the zone, so long as the use
of the grant funds is within the purposes authorized under this
chapter;
(12) Lease, convey, transfer, assign, or otherwise make available
any real or personal property or property rights, other assets, or
franchise rights, with or without compensation, to the state of
Washington or to any city, county, special purpose district, other
local government entity, or federally recognized Indian tribe, to carry
out the purposes authorized under this chapter.

--- END ---