BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.178 and 2007 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surcharge provided for in this section shall be named the
affordable housing for all surcharge.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The county may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected solely for the collection,
administration, and local distribution of these funds. Of the
remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through this
surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who will
deposit the funds into the affordable housing for all account created
in RCW 43.185C.190. The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce must use these funds to provide housing and
shelter for extremely low-income households with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income, including ((but not limited
to)) using a minimum of twenty-six percent of the funds for rental
vouchers in locations where a majority of the dwelling units occupied
by the tenants using these vouchers are privately owned units that are
not operating under any program licensed by the state of Washington.
The remaining funds must be used for grants for building operation and
maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing projects
that are affordable to extremely low-income households with incomes at
or below thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a
supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses.
(2) All of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge will be
retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must be used
by the county and its cities and towns for eligible housing activities
as described in this subsection that serve very low-income households
with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income. The
portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be allocated to
eligible housing activities that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county
according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities
within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs
and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities
that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities
to be funded by these county funds are limited ((to)) as follows:
(a) A minimum of twenty-six percent of funds received must be (i)
allocated for rental vouchers for housing units that are affordable to
very low-income households with incomes at or below fifty percent of
the area median income, and (ii) administered by a local public housing
authority or other local organization that has an existing rental
assistance voucher program or the authority to offer a voucher program,
which provides vouchers for as long as necessary, as opposed to
providing vouchers for a limited period of time, in order to provide
renters with consistency and an opportunity to live where they desire.
The rental vouchers must be payable to the landlord, including vouchers
for first and last month's rent and security and other required
deposits, except pet deposits, required of all other new tenants. The
administering authority or organization must ensure that a majority of
the dwelling units occupied by tenants using these vouchers are
privately owned units that are not operating under any program licensed
by the state of Washington;
(b) The remaining funds may be used for:
(i) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the
area median income, including units for homeownership, rental units,
seasonal and permanent farm worker housing units, and single room
occupancy units;
(((b))) (ii) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of
housing projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive
housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households
with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, and
that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating
expenses((;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are
affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the area median income, to be administered by a local public
housing authority or other local organization that has an existing
rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the
United States department of housing and urban development's section 8
rental assistance voucher program standards)); and
(((d))) (iii) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed
overnight youth shelters.
(3) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.22.179 and 2009 c 462 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an additional
surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. During the 2009-11 and 2011-13 biennia, the surcharge
shall be thirty dollars. The funds collected pursuant to this section
are to be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee,
and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns to accomplish the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of 2005, (i)
six percent of which may be used by the county for administrative costs
related to its homeless housing plan, (ii) a minimum of twenty-six
percent of which must be used for rental vouchers to provide housing
for homeless people in locations where a majority of the dwelling units
occupied by the tenants using these vouchers are privately owned units
that are not operating under any program licensed by the state of
Washington, and (iii) the remainder for programs which directly
accomplish the goals of the county's local homeless housing plan,
except that for each city in the county which elects as authorized in
RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a
percentage of the surcharge assessed under this section equal to the
percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax
collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the
city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs,
for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the
goals of the city's local homeless housing plan; of the funds received
by the city, it may use six percent for administrative costs for its
homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local
governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program. A
minimum of twenty-six percent of the remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent is to be used by the department to((:
(i))) provide housing and shelter for homeless people through the
use of rental vouchers. The remaining moneys must be used to (i)
provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but not
limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants to
operate transitional housing; ((partial payments for rental
assistance;)) consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance((;)), and (ii) fund the
homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to (a)
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust, or
(b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death or any
documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee under state law.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.22.1791 and 2007 c 427 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharges authorized in RCW 36.22.178 and
36.22.179, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the county auditor shall charge an additional surcharge of eight
dollars for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other
charge allowed by law. The funds collected under this section are to
be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall remit ninety percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund, (i) six percent of which may be used by the
county for administrative costs related to its homeless housing plan,
(ii) a minimum of twenty-six percent of which must be used for rental
vouchers to provide housing for homeless people in locations where a
majority of the dwelling units occupied by the tenants using these
vouchers are privately owned units that are not operating under any
program licensed by the state of Washington, and (iii) the remainder
for programs that directly accomplish the goals of the county's local
homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county that
elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local
homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under
this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the
real estate excise tax collected by the county must be transmitted at
least quarterly to the city treasurer for use by the city for program
costs that directly contribute to the goals of the city's local
homeless housing plan.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department ((may use the funds)) must use a minimum of twenty-six
percent of the funds for rental vouchers to provide housing for
homeless people, and the remaining funds must be used:
(i) For administering the program established in RCW 43.185C.020,
including the costs of creating and updating the statewide homeless
housing strategic plan, measuring performance, providing technical
assistance to local governments, and managing the homeless housing
grant program((. Remaining funds may also be used to:
(i)));
(ii) To provide housing and shelter for homeless people including,
but not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters;
grants to operate transitional housing; ((partial payments for rental
assistance;)) consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(((ii))) (iii) To fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
In calculating the rental voucher payment amount under RCW
36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791, the department of commerce, local
public housing authorities, and other local organizations administering
the rental voucher program must use the method specified by the United
States department of housing and urban development in 24 C.F.R. Part
982 on the effective date of this section, or a subsequent date as may
be provided by the United States department of housing and urban
development by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.185.020 and 2009 c 565 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(3) "Life-cycle cost analysis" means a method of calculating the
total cost of an asset over its useful life by comparing the calculated
present discounted values for rental income, development subsidies,
forgiven property taxes, and residual land values converted to monthly
equivalents to allow direct comparison to monthly voucher costs as
described and used by the joint legislative audit and review committee
in report 09-1, "Comparing Costs and Characteristics of Housing
Assistance Programs."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and counties shall place a high priority on cost
control and house the greatest number of qualified individuals within
existing funds as part of the decision-making process in awarding state
resources and funds by performing the following actions:
(a) Develop per unit and per project measures to compare past award
rounds to current award rounds with the goal of achieving cost
reduction;
(b) Document efforts by the housing trust fund to publicize cost
reduction and cost-effectiveness strategies;
(c) Track and report on costs of projects funded in each funding
cycle;
(d) Require developers to submit an audited final cost
certification detailing total development costs and all sources of
permanent financing. The analysis must include direct comparisons of
differences in costs between developments applying for financing from
state administered sources and vouchers;
(e) For every dollar funded and expended, maximize the number of
homeless and severely rent-burdened individuals housed and place
qualified individuals in the most deconcentrated settings;
(f) Move, as expediently as possible, waiting lists for housing.
The waiting lists may not be controlled by endeavors to keep publicly
funded housing projects fully populated;
(g) Ensure that administrators of these funds make concentrated
efforts to locate small private rental units under twenty units to
place qualified individuals with vouchers as these units are typically
not surveyed for vacancies and provide the greatest opportunity for
localized housing; and
(h) Ensure that voucher programs provide vouchers for as long as
necessary, as opposed to providing vouchers for a limited period of
time, in order to provide renters with consistency and an opportunity
to live where they desire.
(2) The administration of the cost-saving devices under this
section and efforts to maximize the number of qualified individuals
housed must be funded within existing program resources, including:
The funds allocated for administrative costs; administrative costs for
the homeless housing program; and the housing trust fund and other
legislative appropriations.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.185.050 and 2006 c 371 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall use moneys from the housing trust fund and
other legislative appropriations to finance in whole or in part any
loans or grant projects that will provide housing for persons and
families with special housing needs and with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median family income for the county or standard
metropolitan statistical area where the project is located. At least
thirty percent of these moneys used in any given funding cycle shall be
for the benefit of projects located in rural areas of the state as
defined by the department. If the department determines that it has
not received an adequate number of suitable applications for rural
projects during any given funding cycle, the department may allocate
unused moneys for projects in nonrural areas of the state.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund
and other legislative appropriations include, but are not limited to:
(a) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of low and
very low-income housing units;
(b) Rent subsidies;
(c) Matching funds for social services directly related to
providing housing for special-need tenants in assisted projects;
(d) Technical assistance, design and finance services and
consultation, and administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community
or neighborhood-based organizations;
(e) Administrative costs for housing assistance groups or
organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the
recipient's access to housing funds other than those available under
this chapter;
(f) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including
emergency shelters and overnight youth shelters;
(g) Mortgage subsidies, including temporary rental and mortgage
payment subsidies to prevent homelessness;
(h) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects;
(i) Down payment or closing cost assistance for eligible first-time
home buyers;
(j) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation as
low-income or very low-income housing; and
(k) Projects making housing more accessible to families with
members who have disabilities((; and
(l) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, a manufactured/mobile
home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict resolution and park
registration program.
(3) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, revenues generated under
RCW 36.22.178 may be used for the development of affordable housing
projects and other activities funded in section 108, chapter 371, Laws
of 2006)).
(((4))) (3) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds
may be used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection
(2)(a), (i), and (j) of this section, and not for the administrative
costs of the department.
(((5))) (4) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from
capital bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the
proper functioning of the housing assistance program except for
activities authorized under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.
(((6))) (5) Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed
five percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program.
(6) The department shall include a life-cycle cost analysis in its
process for evaluating proposals for state funding. This requirement
does not apply to proposals funded by legislative appropriations from
capital bond proceeds.
(7) By December 1st of each year, beginning December 1, 2011, the
department shall prepare a report to the legislature and the office of
financial management compiling the reports required under this
subsection and section 8 of this act. The report must detail the
distribution of funds, except for proposals funded by legislative
appropriations from capital bond proceeds, for the preceding fiscal
year, including:
(a) A description of the process used by the department for
allocating funds;
(b) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(c) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 30th of each year, beginning September 30, 2011, a
county receiving funding authorized under RCW 36.22.178 (1) and (2),
36.22.179(1) (a) and (b), and 36.22.1791(1) (a) and (b) shall:
(1) Include a life-cycle cost analysis as one of the criteria in
deciding which proposals to award funds; and
(2) Submit to the department of commerce a report describing the
distribution of funds for the preceding fiscal year. The report must
include:
(a) A description of the process used by the county for allocating
funds;
(b) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(c) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties must place a high priority on cost control and house
the greatest number of qualified individuals within existing funds as
part of the decision-making process in awarding public resources and
funds by performing the following actions:
(a) Document efforts by the county to publicize cost reduction and
cost-effectiveness strategies;
(b) Track and report on costs of projects funded by recording
surcharge fees;
(c) Require developers to submit an audited final cost
certification detailing total development costs and all sources of
permanent financing. The analysis must include direct comparisons of
differences in costs between developments applying for financing from
publicly administered sources and vouchers;
(d) For every dollar funded and expended, maximize the number of
homeless and severely rent-burdened individuals housed and place
qualified individuals in the most deconcentrated settings;
(e) Move, as expediently as possible, waiting lists for housing.
The waiting lists may not be controlled by endeavors to keep publicly
funded housing projects fully populated;
(f) Ensure that administrators of these funds make concentrated
efforts to locate small private rental units under twenty units to
place qualified individuals with vouchers as these units are typically
not surveyed for vacancies and provide the greatest opportunity for
localized housing; and
(g) Ensure that voucher programs provide vouchers for as long as
necessary, as opposed to providing vouchers for a limited period of
time, in order to provide renters with consistency and an opportunity
to live where they desire.
(2) The administration of the cost-saving devices under this
section and efforts to maximize the number of qualified individuals
housed must be funded within existing program resources.

--- END ---