BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
Washington state bar association, as an administrative arm of the
Washington state supreme court, is currently the sole statewide bar
association of Washington state that administers the admissions,
licensing, and discipline functions for lawyers practicing in the state
of Washington. The Washington state bar association also acts as the
exclusive statewide professional association for all lawyers licensed
to practice law in active status, and as a mandatory bar association,
membership in the Washington state bar association is required in order
to practice law in the state of Washington.
The legislature recognizes that from its creation in 1888, the
Washington bar association, or the Washington state bar association, as
it was named in 1890, was a voluntary organization that did not include
all lawyers admitted to practice. In 1930, it was proposed that the
Washington state bar association be incorporated, and eventually it was
proposed that the bar association be an agency of the state. In 1933,
after much debate, the legislature enacted the state bar act, chapter
2.48 RCW.
The legislature recognizes that although the state supreme court
has never specifically held that the state bar act is an
unconstitutional infringement on the separation of powers between the
legislative and judicial branches of state government, it has found
several of its provisions to be contrary to the inherent power of the
supreme court to regulate the judiciary and the bar, Graham v. State
Bar Association, 86 Wn.2d 624, 548 P.2d 310 (1976), and WSBA v. State
of Washington, 125 Wn.2d 901, 890 P.2d 1047 (1995). In Graham, the
court held that, ". . . the source of the court's power to admit,
enroll, disbar, and discipline is exclusively in the Supreme Court as
one of its inherent powers . . . It was not necessary, therefore, for
the legislature to act to accomplish the purposes achieved by the 1933
legislation [chapter 2.48 RCW]. The power to accomplish the
integration of the bar, its supervision and regulation is found in this
court, not the legislature." In WSBA v. Washington, the court held,
"This court's control over Bar Association functions is not limited to
admissions and discipline of lawyers. The control extends to ancillary
administrative functions as well . . . . The ultimate power to
regulate court-related functions, including the administration of the
Bar Association, belongs exclusively to this court."
The legislature recognizes that mandatory bar associations such as
the Washington state bar association exist at the present time in a
slight majority of states. The Washington state bar association has
always been funded by member dues and other fees. In 2007, the
Washington state bar association dues and fees ranked twelfth highest
in the nation at four hundred fourteen dollars per year, up from
twenty-seventh highest in the nation in 1995, and have been raised even
higher for 2011 at the level of four hundred eighty dollars per year.
There is currently before the supreme court for approval a Washington
state bar association recommendation to increase the annual members'
assessment of dues and fees to an even higher level.
The legislature recognizes that the Washington state bar
association has adopted as part of its bylaws the following:
"ACTIVITIES NOT AUTHORIZED. The Washington State Bar Association will
not: . . . [t]ake positions on political or social issues which do not
relate to or affect the practice of law or the administration of
justice." Over the past several years the Washington state bar
association, a mandatory bar association, has begun to take positions
on political and social issues which do not relate to or affect the
practice of law or the administration of justice by officially
endorsing and lobbying for highly controversial and divisive social and
political causes. The Washington state bar association's official
endorsement and support for such factious social, political, and
partisan causes are far beyond any reasonable, fair, or just
understanding of what constitutes the practice of law or the
administration of justice, or the purview of what a professional
mandatory membership bar association should engage in. Positions the
Washington state bar association, a mandatory bar association, and
administrative arm of the Washington state supreme court, have taken in
recent years on contentious social, political, and partisan issues not
only have been in knowing, willful, and intentional contradiction to
the opinions and beliefs of numerous members of the Washington state
bar association, but also matters of conscience. Thus, a professional
organization that once promoted only issues of interest to the bar in
general, or issues of interest to lawyers engaged in certain areas of
practice, is now clearly taking the side of special interests in
disputatious social, political, and partisan causes.
The legislature recognizes that voluntary bar associations are
private organizations of lawyers, each voluntary bar association
choosing its own purposes regarding social, educational, and lobbying
functions, and that voluntary bar associations do not regulate the
practice of law, admit, enroll, disbar, or discipline lawyers. There
is a voluntary bar association in every state that has no mandatory bar
association, and many voluntary bar associations throughout most
states, including Washington, organized by city, county, or other
communities. Voluntary bar associations are most often focused on
common professional interests. Minnesota does not require bar
association membership and the Minnesota state bar association, one of
the oldest state bar associations in the United States having been
organized in 1883, is a purely voluntary professional association with
a membership of nearly sixteen thousand legal professionals consisting
of lawyers, judges, and other legal practitioners, such as clerks,
registrars, and paralegals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interests of the practice of law, the administration of justice, the
professionalism of the legal community, and the maintenance of the
integrity and rightful respect due to the legal profession as a whole
to eliminate a mandatory state bar association, to transfer all the
mandatory, regulatory, licensing, and disciplinary functions of the
Washington state bar association to the Washington state supreme court
where those powers belong, and to authorize voluntary bar associations
that best represent the diverse professional and personal interests,
values, ideals, and principles, of their individual memberships.
The legislature finds that voluntary bar associations will best
demonstrate the value of diversity, equality, and fairness within and
without the legal community; aid the courts in the administration of
justice; promote programs which develop high standards of competence;
professionalism, and ethics; foster collegiality among their members
and goodwill between the legal profession and the public; provide
quality programs of continuing legal education; provide lower costs for
memberships and continuing legal education; apply the knowledge and
experience of the profession to the public good; provide varied forums
for the discussion of subjects pertaining to law, jurisprudence, and
legal reform; cooperate with other bar associations and organizations;
and be a positive and constructive force for justice in society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is the clear, unambiguous, and express
intent of the legislature by this act to transfer and place all
mandatory, regulatory, licensing, and disciplinary functions regarding
the practice of law and the administration of justice in this state
currently administered by the Washington state bar association
exclusively in the Washington state supreme court and that all
mandatory fees currently paid by licensees to the Washington state bar
association shall cease and be transferred and placed exclusively in
the Washington state supreme court. The Washington state supreme court
is encouraged to utilize such fees solely for the mandatory,
regulatory, licensing, and disciplinary functions regarding the
practice of law and the administration of justice and to adjust fees
downwardly accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 All mandatory, regulatory, licensing, and
disciplinary functions regarding the practice of law and the
administration of justice in this state currently administered by the
Washington state bar association are hereby transferred to and placed
exclusively in the Washington state supreme court. Judicial
legislative policies and functions pertaining to the practice of law
and the administration of justice should be reasonably related to the
following subjects: Regulating and disciplining lawyers; improving the
functioning of the courts, including issues of judicial independence,
fairness, efficacy, and efficiency; making legal services available to
society; regulating lawyer trust accounts; the education, ethics,
competence, integrity, and regulation of the legal profession;
providing law improvement assistance to elected and appointed
government officials; issues involving the structure, organization, and
operation of federal, state, and local courts in or affecting
Washington; issues involving the rules of practice, procedure, and
evidence in federal, state, or local courts in or affecting Washington;
or issues involving the duties and functions of judges and lawyers in
federal, state, and local courts in or affecting Washington. All
mandatory fees currently paid by licensees to the Washington state bar
association shall cease and be transferred and placed exclusively in
the Washington state supreme court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The Washington state supreme court is
respectfully requested to adopt rules necessary for the transfer to the
court of all mandatory, regulatory, licensing, and disciplinary
functions regarding the practice of law and the administration of
justice in this state currently administered by the Washington state
bar association. Court rules should establish an annual assessment of
member dues and fees reasonably related to the costs necessary for the
administration of functions pertaining to the practice of law and the
administration of justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Voluntary, nonmandatory bar associations are
hereby authorized as incorporated under chapter 24.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this act is intended, nor shall
be construed, to transfer, compromise, or otherwise diminish in any
way, any constitutional prerogatives of the legislature or its inherent
legislative power, to establish law, including substantive, remedial,
evidentiary, and procedural law, as originally intended by, and
implemented in accordance with, the provisions of the Washington state
Constitution. Nothing in this act is intended, nor shall be construed,
to interfere, intrude, or otherwise assume any of the constitutional
prerogatives of the judiciary or its inherent judicial power, to
regulate the practice of law and the administration of justice as
originally intended by, and implemented in accordance with, the
provisions of the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 2.48.010 (Objects and powers) and 1933 c 94 s 2;
(2) RCW 2.48.020 (First members) and 1933 c 94 s 3;
(3) RCW 2.48.021 (New members) and 1933 c 94 s 4;
(4) RCW 2.48.030 (Board of governors) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 1,
1972 ex.s. c 66 s 1, & 1933 c 94 s 5;
(5) RCW 2.48.035 (Board of governors -- Membership -- Effect of
creation of new congressional districts or boundaries) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 30 s 2;
(6) RCW 2.48.040 (State bar governed by board of governors) and
1933 c 94 s 6;
(7) RCW 2.48.050 (Powers of governors) and 1933 c 94 s 7;
(8) RCW 2.48.060 (Admission and disbarment) and 1933 c 94 s 8;
(9) RCW 2.48.070 (Admission of veterans) and 1945 c 181 s 1;
(10) RCW 2.48.080 (Admission of veterans -- Establishment of
requirements if in service) and 1945 c 181 s 2;
(11) RCW 2.48.090 (Admission of veterans -- Establishment of
requirements if discharged) and 1945 c 181 s 3;
(12) RCW 2.48.100 (Admission of veterans -- Effect of disability
discharge) and 1945 c 181 s 4;
(13) RCW 2.48.110 (Admission of veterans -- Fees of veterans) and
1945 c 181 s 5;
(14) RCW 2.48.130 (Membership fee -- Active) and 1957 c 138 s 1, 1953
c 256 s 1, & 1933 c 94 s 9;
(15) RCW 2.48.140 (Membership fee -- Inactive) and 1955 c 34 s 1 &
1933 c 94 s 10;
(16) RCW 2.48.150 (Admission fees) and 1933 c 94 s 11;
(17) RCW 2.48.160 (Suspension for nonpayment of fees) and 1933 c 94
s 12;
(18) RCW 2.48.165 (Disbarment or license suspension -- Nonpayment or
default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 1;
(19) RCW 2.48.166 (Admission to or suspension from practice--Noncompliance with support order -- Rules) and 1997 c 58 s 810;
(20) RCW 2.48.170 (Only active members may practice law) and 1933
c 94 s 13;
(21) RCW 2.48.180 (Definitions -- Unlawful practice a crime -- Cause
for discipline -- Unprofessional conduct -- Defense -- Injunction -- Remedies--Costs -- Attorneys' fees -- Time limit for action) and 2003 c 53 s 2 & 2001
c 310 s 2;
(22) RCW 2.48.190 (Qualifications on admission to practice) and
1987 c 202 s 107 & 1921 c 126 s 4;
(23) RCW 2.48.200 (Restrictions on practice by certain officers)
and 1992 c 225 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 19 s 3, 1971 c 81 s 13, & 1921 c
126 s 5;
(24) RCW 2.48.210 (Oath on admission) and 1921 c 126 s 12;
(25) RCW 2.48.220 (Grounds of disbarment or suspension) and 1921 c
126 s 14 & 1909 c 139 s 7; and
(26) RCW 2.48.230 (Code of ethics) and 1921 c 126 s 15.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act shall be
codified and are each added to chapter 2.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect December 1, 2011.

--- END ---