BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GOALS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, the four-year
institutions of higher education, while maintaining quality, shall work
toward achieving the following initial degree completion targets by
2018:
(a) Increasing the number of bachelor's degrees earned by
Washington's resident students from the 2010 levels by at least six
thousand degrees completed or by twenty-seven percent;
(b) Consistent with the priority for growing the number of
enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics, at least
two thousand of the additional degrees in (a) of this subsection would
be awarded in the areas of science, which includes the health sciences,
technology, engineering, mathematics, natural resources/conservation,
biology, life sciences, and interdisciplinary sciences; and
(c) Attaining parity in degree attainment for students from
underrepresented groups, which would mean that at least nineteen
percent of the degrees awarded would include students who are low
income or are the first in their families to attend college.
(2) The bachelor degree completion targets in subsection (1) of
this section shall be updated by the higher education coordinating
board by September 1, 2012, and by September 1st every two years
thereafter based upon the state's changing population and economic
needs. Targets shall be set for five-year periods following the 2018
target.

PART II
FUNDING
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) Beginning with the 2013-14 academic year, reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at the
community and technical colleges shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(c) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, the governing boards
of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may set tuition for resident undergraduates as follows:
(i) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2008,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(ii) If state funding for a college or university is at least at
the level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal
year 2008, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits
set in (d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain
the actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2008 or increase
enrollments as required in the omnibus appropriations act; and
(iii) If state funding is increased so that combined with tuition
the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student funding at similar
public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states
under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing board shall decrease
tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at
the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068.
(d) The amount of tuition for resident undergraduate students set
by the governing board for an institution under this subsection (2) may
not exceed the sixtieth percentile of the tuition for resident
undergraduate students of similar public institutions of higher
education in the global challenge states.
(3)(a) ((Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with
the 2012-13 academic year,)) The governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including summer school students and students in other
self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time
tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or
increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs,
campuses, courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement
program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and
a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(((7))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.))

Sec. 202 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year,)) Tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students((, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,)) may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous
academic year ((in any institution of higher education)) at community
and technical colleges. Annual reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be as provided
in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent increase
limit established in this section. ((For academic years 2009-10 and
2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition increases
greater than seven percent.)) To the extent that state appropriations
combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the
total per-student funding goals established in subsection (((2))) (3)
of this section, the legislature may revisit state appropriations,
authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition fees for any given
fiscal year.
(2) Tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students who enroll or are accepted to be enrolled in public interest
degrees in RCW 28B.76.020, may increase no greater than five percent
over the previous academic year in any institution of higher education.
(3) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. ((The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole.)) The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(((3))) (4) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the total per-student funding
level that represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(((4))) (5) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2011, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, the boards of regents or trustees of the
four-year institutions of higher education, and appropriate committees
of the legislature with updated estimates of the undergraduate resident
tuition that represents the sixtieth percentile of tuition for the
comparable institutions of higher education in the global challenge
states.
(6) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(((5) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,)) The
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of available federal tax credits
((available through the American opportunity tax credit provided in the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009)).

PART III
WASHINGTON PLEDGE SCHOLARSHIP
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The Washington pledge scholarship program
is established. The purpose of the program is to create an endowed
scholarship program that will help low and middle-income Washington
residents earn an undergraduate college education at Washington's two
and four-year institutions of higher education. The goal is to create
an endowment of one billion dollars by 2021. The program shall be
designed for both students starting at a two-year institution of higher
education and intending to transfer to a four-year institution of
higher education and students starting at a four-year institution of
higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Program administrator" means the private nonprofit corporation
that is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt
entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.
(3) "Resident student" means resident student as defined in RCW
28B.15.012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 An eligible student is a student who:
(1) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012;
(2) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family at the time the student applies;
(3) Has declared the intention to earn a baccalaureate degree; and
(4) Is enrolled in an institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 The Washington pledge scholarship program
is created. The program shall be administered by the program
administrator under contract with the board. In administering the
program, the program administrator shall:
(1) Select students to receive a scholarship and in making the
selection the program administrator may establish an advisory
committee;
(2) Work with the board to adopt necessary rules and guidelines
including, but not limited to, setting the maximum amount of a
scholarship;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Accept and deposit donations into the endowment fund created in
section 306 of this act;
(5) Request from the state investment board and accept from the
state treasurer moneys earned from the endowment fund created in
section 306 of this act;
(6) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program; and
(7) Carry out other duties necessary to implement the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The program administrator may award
scholarships to eligible students from moneys earned from the endowment
fund created in section 306 of this act, or from funds appropriated to
the program administrator for this purpose. An eligible recipient may
receive a Washington pledge scholarship for the equivalent of up to one
hundred eighty quarter credits, or the semester equivalent. A student
may receive a scholarship for a maximum of five years. The length of
the scholarship shall be determined by the program administrator. The
amount of the award may vary, but for an undergraduate student the
amount of the scholarship may not exceed the student's demonstrated
financial need. In calculating a student's need, the program
administrator must consider the student's costs for tuition, fees,
books, supplies, transportation, room, board, personal expenses, and
child care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 (1) The Washington pledge endowment fund
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The investment of
the endowment fund shall be managed by the state investment board.
(2) Private donations for the Washington pledge endowment fund
shall be deposited into the endowment fund. Funds received from any
other source may be deposited in the fund. Private moneys received as
a gift subject to conditions may be deposited into the endowment fund
if the conditions are consistent with the goals in section 101 of this
act and do not otherwise violate state or federal law.
(3) At the request of the program administrator, the state
investment board shall release earnings from the endowment fund to the
state treasurer. The state treasurer shall then release those funds at
the request of the program administrator for scholarships. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from the endowment fund.
(4) The program administrator may disburse grants to eligible
students from the Washington pledge endowment fund. No appropriation
is required for expenditures from the endowment fund.
(5) When notified by court order that a condition attached to a
gift of private moneys from the Washington pledge endowment fund has
failed, the program administrator shall release those moneys to the
donors according to the terms of the conditional gift.
(6) The principal of the Washington pledge endowment fund may not
be invaded. The release of funds under subsection (5) of this section
shall not be considered an invasion of the principal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to the Washington pledge endowment fund created in section 306
of this act. No credit may be claimed under this section for a
contribution if a credit has been claimed for that contribution under
section 308 of this act.
(2)(a) Credits may be earned under this section for contributions
made beginning July 1, 2011.
(b) The amount of the credit earned during a fiscal year is equal
to fifty percent of the taxpayer's total contribution during that
fiscal year.
(c)(i) Credits are earned on a first-come basis based on the time
a contribution is received as determined by the program administrator.
No credit may be earned under this section after the earlier of June
30, 2021, or when one billion dollars in total contributions have been
received by the Washington pledge endowment fund.
(ii) If a contribution to the Washington pledge endowment fund
causes the total contributions received by the Washington pledge
endowment fund to exceed one billion dollars, only that portion of the
contribution that causes the total contributions received by the
Washington pledge endowment fund to equal one billion dollars may be
considered a contribution for purposes of this section. The program
administrator must notify the department as soon as the total
contributions received by the Washington pledge endowment fund reach
one billion dollars.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c) and subsection (9)(a)
of this section, "total contributions" means the cumulative amount of
all funds deposited into the Washington pledge endowment fund, from
whatever private or public sources, since July 1, 2011, as confirmed by
the program administrator.
(3) Credits earned under this section may only be claimed beginning
the later of January 1, 2014, or January 1st next following the end of
the fiscal year in which collections of state retail sales and use tax,
state business and occupation tax, and state public utility tax exceed,
by ten percent, the amounts collected from these tax sources in the
fiscal year that ended June 30, 2008, as determined by the department.
The department must post on its web site the date that credit may begin
to be claimed as prescribed in this subsection, at least sixty days
before such date. For purposes of this subsection (3), "state retail
sales and use tax" means the tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) and the
tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1).
(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, credits under this
section may only be claimed on a tax return filed electronically with
the department in a manner provided or approved by the department.
Amounts due on returns filed electronically as required by this
subsection must be paid electronically in a manner required or
authorized under RCW 82.32.080. Failure to comply with this subsection
does not result in the loss of the credit but will result in the
disallowance of the credit for the reporting period for which the
taxpayer failed to comply with this subsection. The department may
waive the electronic filing and payment requirements in this subsection
for the reasons provided in RCW 82.32.080(8).
(b) The amount of credit claimed for a reporting period may not
exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for that reporting
period.
(5) Credits are available on a first-come basis based on the time
a tax return is received by the department on which the credit is
claimed, regardless of when the credit was earned. The department must
disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
cumulative amount of credits claimed under this section and section 308
of this act during any fiscal year to exceed fifty million dollars.
(6)(a) If credits are claimed in excess of the dollar limits in
subsection (2)(c)(ii) or (5) of this section, the department must
provide written notice to any person that has claimed tax credits in
excess of these limits. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due
and provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of
such notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount of tax due if:
(i) The person would have otherwise been entitled to the credit if
not for the limit in either subsection (2)(c)(ii) or (5) of this
section; and
(ii) The amount due is paid by the due date specified in the
initial notice, or any extension granted by the department.
(b) RCW 82.32.135 applies to the notice required by (a) of this
subsection.
(7) Subject to subsection (10) of this section, unused credit may
be carried forward and claimed in subsequent tax years until used. No
refunds may be granted for any unused credits.
(8) No application is necessary for the tax credit provided by this
section. Persons claiming credit under this section must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section.
(9)(a) Annually, the program administrator must provide the
department with a list of contributors to the Washington pledge
endowment fund during the preceding fiscal year. The list must include
the following information about each contributor: The contributor's
name; unified business identifier number or department of revenue tax
registration number, if available; address; telephone number; contact
person; and the amount and date of the donation. The list is due by
September 1st of each year, beginning in 2012 and continuing until the
earlier of September 1, 2021, or September 1st next following the
fiscal year in which total contributions received by the Washington
pledge endowment fund reach one billion dollars.
(b) The program administrator must also provide the department,
upon request, any other information needed to verify claims for credit
under this section or section 308 of this act.
(10) No credit under this section may be claimed after June 30,
2023, including on any original or amended tax return filed after June
30, 2023, for a reporting period beginning before July 1, 2023.
(11) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contribution" means a monetary contribution.
(b) "Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 82.16
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to all of the same conditions and limitations
applicable to the tax credit in section 307 of this act, a credit is
allowed against the tax imposed by this chapter for contributions made
by a person to the Washington pledge endowment fund created in section
306 of this act.
(2) No credit may be claimed under this section for a contribution
if a credit has been claimed for that contribution under section 307 of
this act.

PART IV
PERFORMANCE AND ACCOUNTABILITY
Sec. 401 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) ((Based on guidelines prepared by the board, each four-year
institution and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide and institution-specific
performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board along with
the biennial budget requests from the institutions and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Performance measures established
for the community and technical colleges shall reflect the role and
mission of the colleges.
(3) The board shall approve biennial performance targets for each
four-year institution and for the community and technical college
system and shall review actual achievements annually. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall set biennial performance
targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(4))) To provide consistent easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported annually and at a
minimum include data recommended by a national organization
representing state chief executives. This data must include the
following for the four-year institutions of higher education and the
board may change the data requirements to be consistent with best
practices across the country:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Degrees awarded in the physical and health sciences,
technology, engineering, mathematics, natural resources/conservation,
biology, life sciences, and interdisciplinary sciences;
(c) Graduate/professional degrees awarded;
(d) STEM participation and completion: Program participation and
degree completion rates in bachelor and advanced degree programs in the
sciences, technology, engineering, and mathematics disciplines,
including participation and completion rates of students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(e) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(f) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(g) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(h) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(i) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(j) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(k) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(l) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(m) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher
education;
(n) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time undergraduate
students enrolled in an institution of higher education;
(o) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate degrees and
certificates, of at least one year in expected length, awarded per one
hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at the state level;
and
(p) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate degrees and
certificates, of at least one year in program length, awarded relative
to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four years old with a
high school diploma.
(3) Each four-year institution of higher education shall report the
data required under this section to the board and submit the plan
required under section 406 of this act.
(4) The board shall review the data, analyze the data including
changes over time, and prepare reports based upon that data. The board
shall report each institution's performance improvement under the
baccalaureate degree incentive program under section 405 of this act.
(5) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(((5))) (6) The board, in collaboration with the four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(((6))) (7) The board shall develop measurable indicators and
benchmarks for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, quality,
and timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.

Sec. 402 RCW 28B.76.020 and 2010 c 245 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.
(3) "Major expansion" means expansion of the higher education
system that requires significant new capital investment, including
building new institutions, campuses, branches, or centers or conversion
of existing campuses, branches, or centers that would result in a
mission change.
(4) "Mission change" means a change in the level of degree awarded
or institutional type not currently authorized in statute.
(5) "Public interest degrees" means associate, baccalaureate, or
graduate degrees in the following fields: Science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics fields that include agriculture and
natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences, computer and
information sciences, engineering and engineering technologies, health
professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and statistics, and
physical sciences and science technologies.

Sec. 403 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2010 c 245 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
Board recommendations regarding proposed major expansion shall be
limited to determinations of whether the major expansion is within the
scope indicated in the most recent strategic master plan for higher
education or most recent system design plan. Recommendations regarding
existing capital prioritization processes are not within the scope of
the evaluation of major expansion. Major expansion and proposed
mission changes may be proposed by the board, any public institution of
higher education, or by a state or local government.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery;
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Recommendations from the technology transformation task force
created in chapter 407, Laws of 2009, and institutions of higher
education relative to the strategic and operational use of technology
in higher education. These and other reports, reviews, and audits
shall allow for: The development of enterprise-wide digital
information technology across educational sectors, systems, and
delivery methods; the integration and streamlining of administrative
tools including but not limited to student information management,
financial management, payroll, human resources, data collection,
reporting, and analysis; and a determination of the costs of multiple
technology platforms, systems, and models.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number and type
of higher education and training credentials required to match employer
demand for a skilled and educated workforce. The assessment shall
include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level of
higher education and training and the number of credentials needed to
match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) Before enrolling students each academic year, the board shall
identify which programs qualify as public interest degrees in RCW
28B.76.020 for which students may enroll at reduced tuition rates in
RCW 28B.15.068.
(5) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(((5))) (6) The following activities are subject to approval by the
board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(((6))) (7) Institutions seeking board approval under this section
must demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(((7))) (8) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(((8))) (9) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.
(((9))) (10) In the case of a proposed major expansion or mission
change, the needs assessment process under subsection (2) of this
section constitutes a threshold inquiry. If the board determines that
the need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has not
been justified, the inquiry is concluded. If the board determines that
the need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has been
sufficiently established, the board, in consultation with any directly
involved institutions and other interested agencies and individuals,
shall proceed to examine the viability of the proposal using criteria
including, but not limited to:
(a) The specific scope of the project including the capital
investment requirements, the number of full-time equivalent students
anticipated, and the number of academic programs planned;
(b) The existence of an efficient and sustainable financial plan;
(c) The extent to which existing resources can be leveraged;
(d) The current and five-year projected student population,
faculty, and staff to support the proposed programs, institution, or
innovation;
(e) The plans to accommodate expected growth over a twenty-year
time frame;
(f) The extent to which new or existing partnerships and
collaborations are a part of the proposal; and
(g) The feasibility of any proposed innovations to accelerate
degree production.
(((10))) (11) After the board completes its evaluation of the
proposed major expansion or mission change using the needs assessment
under subsection (2) of this section and viability determination under
subsection (((9))) (10) of this section, the board shall make a
recommendation to either proceed, modify, or not proceed with the
proposed major expansion or mission change. The board's recommendation
shall be presented to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 (1)(a) The task force on public interest
degrees is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The governor shall appoint four members representing the
higher education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, and the
workforce training and education coordinating board.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership.
(2) The task force shall review and make recommendations on the
following:
(a) Modifications to public interest degrees in RCW 28B.76.020; and
(b) Policies that increase the ability of public and private
institutions of higher education to prepare Washington citizens with
the higher education qualifications that are in the public interest.
(3) Senate committee services and house of representatives office
of program research shall provide staff support for the task force.
(4) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
The board shall establish a baccalaureate degree incentive program.
To the extent funds are available, awards shall be made beginning with
the 2012-2013 fiscal year. The board, in collaboration with the
institutions of higher education, the council of presidents, and the
education data center, shall design the program to provide awards for
four-year institutions of higher education based upon each
institution's individual performance improvement goals on a set of
measures. The measures must initially include:
(1) The total number of undergraduate degrees completed;
(2) Increases in the number of degrees awarded in the physical and
health sciences, technology, engineering, mathematics, natural
resources/conservation, biology, life sciences, and interdisciplinary
sciences;
(3) Increases in the retention of first-year students receiving
need-based assistance not including students who transfer to another
institution of higher education; and
(4) The number of excess credits taken beyond what is required to
earn a bachelor's degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
Each four-year institution of higher education must develop
specific action plans to reach the goals under section 101 of this act
and to improve cost-effectiveness and efficiency. The individual
institutions must develop their campus plans recognizing the role of
their campus as part of the system of public higher education. The
plan and the results shall be reported biennially to the governor, the
legislature, and the higher education coordinating board. Institutions
must report on innovations used, which may include but are not limited
to:
(1) The innovative use of technology in instruction, particularly
for large introductory courses;
(2) Increasing administrative efficiencies among the institutions
and campuses;
(3) Eliminating underused majors and courses;
(4) Creating three-year bachelor degree programs;
(5) Increasing tuition for students taking credits beyond those
needed to earn a degree;
(6) Recognizing prior learning experiences based on competency
assessments; and
(7) Recognizing transfer credits, particularly credits earned in
academic programs at two-year and four-year institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A graduate of a community or technical college in this state
who has earned a transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree
when admitted to a four-year institution of higher education shall have
junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of that institution.
(2) A student who has earned the equivalent of ninety quarter
credit hours and has completed the general education requirements at
that four-year institution of higher education in Washington when
admitted to another four-year institution of higher education shall
have junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of the institution to which the student
transfers.
(3) The community and technical colleges, jointly with the four-year institutions of higher education, must develop a list of academic
courses that are equivalent to one-year's worth of general education
credit and that would transfer for that purpose to any other two or
four-year institution of higher education. If a student completes one-year's worth of general education credits, that student may be issued
a one-year academic completion certificate. This certificate shall be
accepted at any transferring two or four-year institution of higher
education.
(4) Each institution of higher education must develop a minimum of
one degree within the arts and sciences disciplines that can be
completed within the equivalent of ninety quarter upper division
credits by any student who enters an institution of higher education
with junior status and lower division general education requirements
completed.
(5) Each four-year institution of higher education must publish a
list of recommended courses for each academic major designed to help
students who are planning to transfer design their course of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Community and technical colleges must identify and publish in
their admissions materials the college level courses that are
recognized by all four-year institutions of higher education as
transferring to the four-year institutions of higher education.
Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and
accessible on the college's web site.
(2) Community and technical colleges must create a list of courses
that satisfy the basic requirements, distribution requirements, and
approved electives for:
(a) A one-year academic completion certificate as provided for
under section 407 of this act; and
(b) A transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree as
provided for under section 407 of this act.
(3) To the extent possible, each community and technical college
must develop links between the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section and its list of courses, and develop methods to encourage
students to check the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
when the students are registering for courses.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.920 (Performance agreements--Generally) and 2008 c
160 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.921 (Performance agreements -- Contents) and 2008 c
160 s 3; and
(3) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee--Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 301 through 306 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---