BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that between the years
2000 and 2005, three hundred twenty-six initiatives were filed with the
secretary of state's office and twenty-one initiatives were certified
to the ballot. Each initiative filed requires the state to invest, at
a minimum, the time and resources to process the filed initiative in
the secretary of state's office and allow the code reviser to review
draft initiatives for errors, review for potential conflict with
existing statutes, and prepare a certificate of review for the
initiative sponsor. Additionally, the secretary of state's office
assigns a serial number to all initiatives and forwards the initiative
to the attorney general for formulation of the ballot title and
summary. After an initiative sponsor obtains and submits signatures,
the secretary of state must check the signatures to ascertain whether
there are sufficient signatures to qualify the measure for the ballot.
The legislature finds that the current initiative filing fee of five
dollars, which was set decades ago, is insufficient to offset the
administrative costs involved in the initiative process. Therefore, to
more adequately provide for the administrative costs involved in the
initiative process, it is the intent of the legislature to increase the
initiative filing fee. The filing fee shall be refunded in part upon
the initiative being certified by the secretary of state for the
general election ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.005 and 2010 c 204 s 101 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency before its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political
party by the secretary of state;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(8) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(9) "Circulator" means an individual who is a paid or volunteer
signature gatherer who obtains the signatures of voters on petitions.
A "circulator" does not include a person who only submits the signed
petitions to the secretary of state.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(((10))) (11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17A.100.
(((11))) (12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower
meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or
services of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17A.710, "compensation" does not include per diem allowances or
other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public
official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the
official business of the governmental entity.
(((12))) (13) "Continuing political committee" means a political
committee that is an organization of continuing existence not
established in anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((13))) (14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which
the individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(((13))) (14)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or
committee as long as he or she has no authority to authorize
expenditures or make decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(((14))) (15) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, or credit union doing business in this
state.
(((15))) (16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a
general or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.
(((16))) (17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special
election for public office and any election in which a ballot
proposition is submitted to the voters. An election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(((17))) (18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of
or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(((18))) (19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the
first day of January after the date of the last previous general
election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on December
31st after the next election for the office. In the case of a special
election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the
period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December
31st after the special election.
(((19))) (20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast,
cable, or satellite television or radio transmission, United States
postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(((20))) (21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(((21))) (22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution,
subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or
anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure.
"Expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer
of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property,
facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting,
benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting
in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of
this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises
to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made. "Expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((22))) (23) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17A.235(2).
(((23))) (24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
or local office. It does not include a primary.
(((24))) (25) "Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.
(((25))) (26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic
partner, dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living
in the household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary"
in this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or
domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the
individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person
and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of
any such person.
(((26))) (27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(((27))) (28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of eight hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under eight hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is eight hundred dollars or more.
(((28))) (29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family,
or an association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((29))) (30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((30))) (31) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of
the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the
state senate.
(((31))) (32) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((32))) (33) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((33))) (34) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((34))) (35) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried
out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise
of personal judgment or discretion.
(((35))) (36) "Paid signature gatherer" means an individual who is
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration,
by a signature gathering business, to obtain signatures on a state or
local initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(37) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((36))) (38) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((37))) (39) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((38))) (40) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((39))) (41) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means
the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under
chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((40))) (42) "Prime sponsor or sponsors" means the registered
voter or voters who complete the affidavit for proposed initiative or
referendum or files a recall petition under chapter 29A.56 RCW as well
as any persons who hold themselves out publicly as the sponsor of an
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(43) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(((41))) (44) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.
(((42))) (45) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((43))) (46) "Signature gathering business" means a business
whose primary activity or primary source of revenue is gathering
signatures for ballot measures, initiatives, or recall petitions.
(47) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications, independent
expenditures, or political advertising" means the person paying for the
electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political
advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed
by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor.
(((44))) (48) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((45))) (49) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((46))) (50) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of
a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.
(((47))) (51) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the
individuals appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant
to RCW 42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Registration with the secretary of state
is required for:
(a) All businesses operating in this state engaged in the activity
of collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions and that are using paid signature gatherers; and
(b) All paid signature gatherers.
(2) Registration is valid for:
(a) Only one state or local initiative, referendum, or recall
petition in the case of a paid signature gatherer. In the event a paid
signature gatherer is gathering signatures for more than one state or
local initiative, referendum, or recall petition, registration and a
separate registration number is required for each petition. The
secretary of state shall provide each registered signature gatherer
with an individual registration number for each state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition on which signatures will be
gathered; and
(b) One calendar year in the case of a business operating in this
state engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for state or
local initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions and that are using
paid signature gatherers. In the event that a business becomes
involved with the collection of signatures for any state or local
initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions that are using paid
signature gatherers that were not listed on their original registration
for that calendar year, the business must notify the secretary of state
within five working days of becoming involved in the new petition.
(3) To register with the secretary of state, a paid signature
gatherer must provide:
(a) His or her full name and assumed name, if any;
(b) The street address of his or her permanent residence;
(c) His or her signature;
(d) A list of the state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions on which the paid signature gatherer will gather signatures;
(e) A signed statement attesting that the paid signature gatherer:
(i) Has not been convicted of a criminal offense involving fraud,
forgery, or identification theft within the past five years; (ii) has
not been convicted of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its
equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; and (iii)
has not been found in violation of elections law under chapter 29A.84
RCW, or its equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years;
(f) A signed statement acknowledging that the paid signature
gatherer has read and understands Washington law applicable to the
gathering of signatures on state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions; and
(g) A conventional photograph showing the paid signature gatherer's
head, neck, and shoulders, and is appropriate for copying and
processing by the secretary of state; and
(h) A statement signed by the business operating in the state
engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for the state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition, which hired the paid
signature gatherer to gather signatures acknowledging that the business
is liable for violations of law or rule committed by the paid signature
gatherer obtaining signatures as provided in RCW 29A.84.220 and
29A.84.250.
(4) To register with the secretary of state, a business operating
in this state engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for
state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions that is
using paid signature gatherers must provide:
(a) The name of the business as registered with the applicable
state agency depending on the business structure, which may include the
department of revenue or the department of licensing, as well as any
other names under which the business is doing business or any trade
names;
(b) The street address of the main office in the state, the mailing
address, if different, the office phone number, and the business e-mail
address, if any. If the business is operated out of a residence, the
residence shall be considered the main office for the purposes of this
subsection;
(c) The full name of the business owner or owners and any assumed
names;
(d) A signature of the business owner or owners;
(e) A signed statement attesting that the business owner or owners:
(i) Have not been convicted of a criminal offense involving fraud,
forgery, or identification theft within the past five years; (ii) have
not been convicted of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its
equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; and (iii)
have not been found in violation of elections law under chapter 29A.84
RCW, or its equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years;
(f) A list of the state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions on which the business will be involved with the gathering of
signatures; and
(g) A signed statement acknowledging the business owner or owners
have read and understand Washington law applicable to the gathering of
signatures on state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions.
(5) A person, including a business owner, is ineligible for
registration under this section if he or she: (a) Has been convicted
of a criminal offense involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft
in any jurisdiction within the past five years; (b) has been convicted
of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent in another
jurisdiction, in the past five years; or (c) has been found in
violation of elections law under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent
in another jurisdiction, in the past five years.
(6) When gathering signatures, a paid signature gatherer must carry
on his or her person evidence of registration including the paid
signature gatherer's photograph and registration number. If requested,
the paid signature gatherer shall produce the evidence of registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of state shall adopt rules
necessary to implement sections 3 and 6 of this act, including rules
establishing procedures for registering persons for obtaining
signatures of electors on state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a person obtains signatures of electors
on a state or local initiative, referendum, or recall petition, and the
paid signature gatherer was not registered as required by section 3 of
this act at the time the signatures were obtained, the signatures shall
not be invalidated because of the failure of the signature gatherer.
Any petition with an unsigned declaration or declaration that is
circulated by an unregistered signature gatherer is subject to a full
signature check by the secretary of state. Paid signature gatherers
found to have not registered with the secretary of state within
seventy-two hours of collecting their first signature shall be subject
to a fine in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars. Fines
collected are expressly designated for deposit in the secretary of
state's revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A registered paid signature gatherer who
knowingly submits an invalid signature will have his or her
registration number revoked and he or she is prohibited from
registering for five years from the date of the secretary of state's
revocation order. This subsection applies when:
(a) The paid signature gatherer provides a petition that contains
an invalid signature as determined by the secretary of state; and
(b) The secretary of state determines that the signature was
obtained by that paid signature gatherer and the paid signature
gatherer knew or should have known the signature was invalid. However,
this subsection does not apply when the paid signature gatherer had no
knowledge or reason to know that the signature was invalid including,
but not limited to, the paid signature gatherer did not know and had no
reason to know the signature was a duplicate, that the person's
signature had changed over time and no longer matched the signature on
file with the relevant election official, that the person had moved to
a new residence but failed to update his or her voter registration form
before signing the petition, and the signature did not match a valid
registered voter in Washington.
(2) When the secretary of state is informed that a registered paid
signature gatherer has been convicted of any of the crimes described in
(a) through (d) of this subsection, or the secretary of state makes a
finding under (e) of this subsection, the paid signature gatherer will
have his or her registration number revoked and he or she is prohibited
from applying for future registrations for five years from the date of
the secretary of state's revocation order. This subsection applies to
a paid signature gatherer who:
(a) Has been convicted of violating RCW 9.44.080 or 9A.46.020;
(b) Has been convicted of violating a provision of chapter 29A.84
RCW or the felonies or misdemeanors referenced therein;
(c) Has been convicted of any other election-related crime in any
state or federal court;
(d) Has been convicted in any state or federal court of a criminal
offense involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft; or
(e) Has been determined by the secretary of state to have submitted
false information on his or her registration application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The failure to register under section 3 of
this act by a business operating in this state engaged in the activity
of collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions using paid signature gatherers does not invalidate any
signatures gathered by the business and its paid signature gatherers.
Any business that fails to register under section 3 of this act and
submits petitions will be subject to a full signature check on all
submitted petitions by the secretary of state. Additionally, any
business operating in this state engaged in the activity of collecting
signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions found to have not registered within seventy-two hours of
collecting their first signatures shall be subject to a fine of not
less than ten thousand dollars or the cost of conducting a full
signature check, whichever is greater, as determined by the secretary
of state. Fines collected are expressly designated for deposit into
the secretary of state's revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The definitions in this section apply to
sections 5 and 7 of this act:
(1) "Circulator" means an individual who is a paid or volunteer
signature gatherer who obtains the signatures of voters on petitions.
A "circulator" does not include a person who only submits the signed
petitions to the secretary of state.
(2) "Paid signature gatherer" means an individual who is
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration,
by a signature gathering business, to obtain signatures on a state or
local initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(3) "Prime sponsor or sponsors" means the registered voter or
voters who complete the affidavit for proposed initiative or referendum
or files a recall petition under chapter 29A.56 RCW as well as any
persons who hold themselves out publicly as the sponsor of an
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(4) "Signature gathering business" means a business whose primary
activity or primary source of revenue is gathering signatures for
ballot measures, initiatives, or recall petitions.
(5) "Volunteer signature gatherer" means an individual who is not
compensated through payments of money to obtain signatures on a state
or local initiative, referendum, or recall petition and is not required
to register under sections 3 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The secretary of state, by rule, may
collect a fee for businesses operating in the state engaged in the
activity of paid signature gathering to cover the costs of registration
incurred by the secretary of state, and to cover the costs associated
with conducting a full signature check on any petition that is not
signed by a signature gatherer. Additionally, a signature gathering
business is responsible for paying the costs of a full signature check
when that business fails to register within seventy-two hours of
collecting the first signature. Otherwise, a political committee of a
ballot measure, initiative, or recall petition is responsible for
covering the costs of a full signature check on petitions with unsigned
declarations.
(2) The fees collected under this section must be deposited into
the secretary of state's revolving fund established under RCW
43.07.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 through 7 of this act do not
apply to individuals who volunteer to engage in the activity of
collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf
of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a
proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a legible copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is
desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a legal voter
and a filing fee ((prescribed under RCW 43.07.120)) of five hundred
dollars. If the measure is certified by the secretary of state for the
general election ballot, the sponsor shall receive a refund of four
hundred fifty dollars. Any sponsor who lacks sufficient assets or
income at the time of filing to pay the filing fee required by this
section shall submit at least one thousand valid signatures of
registered voters in order to be exempt from the filing fee.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.72.110 and 2005 c 239 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature
at its next regular session must be substantially in the following
form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature

Date of Signature

Print Name

Print Street Address

Print City, State, Zip Code

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.72.120 and 2005 c 239 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for
their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election must
be substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition
only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature

Date of Signature

Print Name

Print Street Address

Print City, State, Zip Code

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2005 c 239 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW 29A.36.071) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the last regular
(special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to the people
of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular (special)
election to be held on the . . . . day of November, (year); and each of
us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city
(or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is
correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature

Date of Signature

Print Name

Print Street Address

Print City, State, Zip Code

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A political committee of an initiative or
referendum petition must check each petition sheet to ensure the
declaration required in RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130 is
signed by the signature gatherer and must sign an affidavit attesting
the representative of the political committee verified that the
declaration on each petition sheet submitted to the secretary of state
has been completed and signed. The affidavit must accompany the
petition at the time of filing with the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 3, 4, 6, and 10 of this act are
each added to chapter 42.17A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 5, 7 through 9, and 15 of this act
are each added to chapter 29A.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---