BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.198 and 2009 c 548 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Public education in Washington state has evolved since the
enactment of the Washington basic education act of 1977. Decisions by
the courts have played a part in this evolution, as have studies and
research about education practices and education funding. The
legislature finds ample evidence of a need for continuing to refine the
program of basic education that is funded by the state and delivered by
school districts.
(2) The legislature reaffirms the work of Washington Learns and
other educational task forces that have been convened over the past
four years and their recommendations to make bold reforms to the entire
educational system in order to educate all students to a higher level;
to focus on the individualized instructional needs of students; to
strive towards closing the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap
and reducing dropout rates; and to prepare students for a constantly
evolving workforce and increasingly demanding global economy. In
enacting this legislation, the legislature intends to continue to
review, evaluate, and revise the definition and funding of basic
education in order to continue to fulfill the state obligation under
Article IX of the state Constitution. The legislature also intends to
continue to strengthen and modify the structure of the entire K-12
educational system, including nonbasic education programmatic elements,
in order to build the capacity to anticipate and support potential
future enhancements to basic education as the educational needs of our
citizens continue to evolve.
(3) The legislature recognizes that the first step in revising the
definition and funding of basic education is to create a transparent
funding system for both allocations and expenditures so that not only
policymakers and educators understand how the state supports basic
education but also taxpayers. An adequate data system that enables the
legislature to make rational, data-driven decisions on which
educational programs impact student learning in order to more
effectively and efficiently deliver the resources necessary to provide
an ample program of basic education is also a necessity. A new
prototypical funding system will allow the legislature to better
understand how current resources are being used. A more complete and
accurate educational data system will allow the legislature to
understand whether current basic education programs are supporting
student learning. Only with both of these systems in place can the
legislature make informed decisions on how to best implement a dynamic
and evolving system of basic education.
(4) For practical and educational reasons, major changes of the
program of basic education and the funding formulas to support it
cannot occur instantaneously. The legislature intends to build upon
the previous efforts of the legislature and the basic education task
force in order to develop a realistic implementation strategy for a new
instructional program after technical experts develop the details of
the prototypical schools funding formulas and the data and reporting
system that will support a new instructional program. The legislature
also intends to establish a formal structure for monitoring the
implementation by the legislature of an evolving program of basic
education and the financing necessary to support such a program. The
legislature intends that the redefined program of basic education and
funding for the program be fully implemented by 2018.
(5) It is the further intent of the legislature to also address
additional issues that are of importance to the legislature but are not
part of basic education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.175.025 and 2007 c 408 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a
grant program and award grants to local partnerships of schools,
families, and communities to begin the phase in of a statewide
comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and retrieval system.
This program shall be known as the building bridges program.
(1) For purposes of RCW 28A.175.025 through 28A.175.075, a
"building bridges program" means a local partnership of schools,
families, and communities that provides all of the following programs
or activities:
(a) A system that identifies individual students at risk of
dropping out from middle through high school based on local predictive
data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth grade, and
provides timely interventions for such students and for dropouts,
including a plan for educational success as already required by the
student learning plan as defined under RCW 28A.655.061. Students
identified shall include foster care youth, youth involved in the
juvenile justice system, and students receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(b) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(c) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(d) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(e) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs
and online learning opportunities.
(2) One of the grants awarded under this section shall be for a
two-year demonstration project focusing on providing fifth through
twelfth grade students with a program that utilizes technology and is
integrated with state standards, basic academics, cross-cultural
exposures, and age-appropriate preemployment training. The project
shall:
(a) Establish programs in two western Washington and one eastern
Washington urban areas;
(b) Identify at-risk students in each of the distinct communities
and populations and implement strategies to close the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap;
(c) Collect and report data on participant characteristics and
outcomes of the project, including the characteristics and outcomes
specified under RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(d) Submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2010 c 236 s 15 and 2010 c 234 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap and reduce student dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning; and
(d) One nonlegislative representative from the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee
established under RCW 28A.300.136, to be selected by the members of the
committee.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by January
1, 2012, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan for a
voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the report, the
council shall seek input from the early learning advisory council
created in RCW 43.215.090.
(7) The council shall submit a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2010, that includes:
(a) Recommendations for specific strategies, programs, and funding,
including funding allocations through the funding distribution formula
in RCW 28A.150.260, that are designed to close the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap and increase the high school graduation
rate in Washington public schools. The council shall consult with the
((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee and the building bridges work group in
developing its recommendations; and
(b) Recommendations for assuring adequate levels of state-funded
classified staff to support essential school and district services.
(8) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the council. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(9) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.300.136 and 2010 c 235 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee is created to synthesize the findings and
recommendations from the 2008 achievement gap studies into an
implementation plan, and to recommend policies and strategies to the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and the state board of education to close the
((achievement)) educational opportunity gap.
(2) The committee shall recommend specific policies and strategies
in at least the following areas:
(a) Supporting and facilitating parent and community involvement
and outreach;
(b) Enhancing the cultural competency of current and future
educators and the cultural relevance of curriculum and instruction;
(c) Expanding pathways and strategies to prepare and recruit
diverse teachers and administrators;
(d) Recommending current programs and resources that should be
redirected to narrow the gap;
(e) Identifying data elements and systems needed to monitor
progress in closing the gap;
(f) Making closing the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap
part of the school and school district improvement process; and
(g) Exploring innovative school models that have shown success in
closing the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap.
(3) Taking a multidisciplinary approach, the committee may seek
input and advice from other state and local agencies and organizations
with expertise in health, social services, gang and violence
prevention, substance abuse prevention, and other issues that
disproportionately affect student achievement and student success.
(4) The ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate
education committees, or their designees;
(b) One additional member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house and one additional member of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the office of the education ombudsman;
(d) A representative of the center for the improvement of student
learning in the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(e) A representative of federally recognized Indian tribes whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington
state, designated by the federally recognized tribes; and
(f) Four members appointed by the governor in consultation with the
state ethnic commissions, who represent the following populations:
African-Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Pacific
Islander Americans.
(5) The governor and the tribes are encouraged to designate members
who have experience working in and with schools.
(6) The committee may convene ad hoc working groups to obtain
additional input and participation from community members. Members of
ad hoc working groups shall serve without compensation and shall not be
reimbursed for travel or other expenses.
(7) The chair or cochairs of the committee shall be selected by the
members of the committee. Staff support for the committee shall be
provided by the center for the improvement of student learning.
Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but must be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative
members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the quality
education council shall work collaboratively with the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee to
close the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.1361 and 2009 c 468 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall take all actions
necessary to secure federal funds to support enhancing data collection
and data system capacity in order to monitor progress in closing the
((achievement)) educational opportunity gap and to support other
innovations and model programs that align education reform and address
disproportionality in the public school system.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.300.137 and 2009 c 468 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning in January 2010, the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee shall report
annually to the superintendent of public instruction, the state board
of education, the professional educator standards board, the governor,
and the education committees of the legislature on the strategies to
address the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap and on the
progress in improvement of education performance measures for African-American, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, and Pacific
Islander/Hawaiian Native students.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.345.070 and 2005 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2006, and at least once annually through 2010, the
Washington state school directors' association is encouraged to convene
regional meetings and invite the tribal councils from the region for
the purpose of establishing government-to-government relationships and
dialogue between tribal councils and school district boards of
directors. Participants in these meetings should discuss issues of
mutual concern, and should work to:
(a) Identify the extent and nature of the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap and strategies necessary to close it;
(b) Increase mutual awareness and understanding of the importance
of accurate, high-quality curriculum materials about the history,
culture, and government of local tribes; and
(c) Encourage school boards to identify and adopt curriculum that
includes tribal experiences and perspectives, so that Indian students
are more engaged and learn more successfully, and so that all students
learn about the history, culture, government, and experiences of their
Indian peers and neighbors.
(2) By December 1, 2008, and every two years thereafter through
2012, the school directors' association shall report to the education
committees of the legislature regarding the progress made in the
development of effective government-to-government relations, the
narrowing of the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap, and the
identification and adoption of curriculum regarding tribal history,
culture, and government. The report shall include information about
any obstacles encountered, and any strategies under development to
overcome them.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.405.100 and 2010 c 235 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910, and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and (([the])) the school community; and
(viii) exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on
improving instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
When student growth data, if available and relevant to the teacher and
subject matter, is referenced in the evaluation process it must be
based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, it
shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her designee to
evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school. During each
school year all classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged satisfactory based on district evaluation criteria shall be
notified in writing of the specific areas of deficiencies along with a
reasonable program for improvement. During the period of probation,
the employee may not be transferred from the supervision of the
original evaluator. Improvement of performance or probable cause for
nonrenewal must occur and be documented by the original evaluator
before any consideration of a request for transfer or reassignment as
contemplated by either the individual or the school district. A
probationary period of sixty school days shall be established. The
establishment of a probationary period does not adversely affect the
contract status of an employee within the meaning of RCW 28A.405.300.
The purpose of the probationary period is to give the employee
opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her areas of
deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and the
giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency; such additional
certificated employee shall be immune from any civil liability that
might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith
performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer and shall constitute grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(b) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. This reassignment may
not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect the
probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of
the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible,
the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term.
(5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria
and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established by
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrating commitment to closing the
((achievement)) educational opportunity gap; (iii) providing for school
safety; (iv) leading the development, implementation, and evaluation of
a data-driven plan for increasing student achievement, including the
use of multiple student data elements; (v) assisting instructional
staff with alignment of curriculum, instruction, and assessment with
state and local district learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting,
and evaluating effective instruction and assessment practices; (vii)
managing both staff and fiscal resources to support student achievement
and legal responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school
community to promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. When available,
student growth data that is referenced in the evaluation process must
be based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-
based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, and parents, shall create models for implementing the
evaluation system criteria, student growth tools, professional
development programs, and evaluator training for certificated classroom
teachers and principals. Human resources specialists, professional
development experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted.
Due to the diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental
levels of students, classroom teachers and principals must be
prominently represented in this work. The models must be available for
use in the 2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (c) of this subsection
and implemented in all school districts beginning with the 2013-14
school year.
(c) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction data that is used in
evaluations and all district-collected student achievement, aptitude,
and growth data regardless of whether the data is used in evaluations.
If the data is not available electronically, the district may submit it
in nonelectronic form. The superintendent of public instruction must
analyze the districts' use of student data in evaluations, including
examining the extent that student data is not used or is underutilized.
The superintendent of public instruction must also consult with
participating districts and stakeholders, recommend appropriate
changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012. In the
July 1, 2011, report, the superintendent shall include recommendations
for whether a single statewide evaluation model should be adopted,
whether modified versions developed by school districts should be
subject to state approval, and what the criteria would be for
determining if a school district's evaluation model meets or exceeds a
statewide model. The report shall also identify challenges posed by
requiring a state approval process.
(8) Each certificated classroom teacher and certificated support
personnel shall have the opportunity for confidential conferences with
his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions in each
school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.
(9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause
the evaluation or supervision of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her
specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be
sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract
under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator under RCW
28A.405.300.
(10) After a certificated classroom teacher or certificated support
personnel has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section or has received one of the two top ratings for four
years under subsection (2) of this section, a school district may use
a short form of evaluation, a locally bargained evaluation emphasizing
professional growth, an evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, or any combination thereof. The short form of evaluation
shall include either a thirty minute observation during the school year
with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation based on
the criteria in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at
least two observation periods during the school year totaling at least
sixty minutes without a written summary of such observations being
prepared. A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing
professional growth must provide that the professional growth activity
conducted by the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked
to one or more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation
criteria. However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1)
or (2) of this section shall be followed at least once every three
years unless this time is extended by a local school district under the
bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or
evaluator may require that the evaluation process set forth in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section be conducted in any given school
year. No evaluation other than the evaluation authorized under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be used as a basis for
determining that an employee's work is not satisfactory under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as probable cause for the
nonrenewal of an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an
evaluation process developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines
otherwise.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.410.260 and 2009 c 468 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board, in consultation and
collaboration with the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap
oversight and accountability committee established under RCW
28A.300.136, shall identify a list of model standards for cultural
competency and make recommendations to the education committees of the
legislature on the strengths and weaknesses of those standards.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cultural competency"
includes knowledge of student cultural histories and contexts, as well
as family norms and values in different cultures; knowledge and skills
in accessing community resources and community and parent outreach; and
skills in adapting instruction to students' experiences and identifying
cultural contexts for individual students.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.415.370 and 2007 c 402 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The recruiting Washington teachers program is established to
recruit and provide training and support for high school students to
enter the teaching profession, especially in teacher shortage areas and
among underrepresented groups and multilingual, multicultural students.
The program shall be administered by the professional educator
standards board.
(2) The program shall consist of the following components:
(a) Targeted recruitment of diverse students, including but not
limited to students from underrepresented groups and multilingual,
multicultural students in grades nine through twelve through outreach
and communication strategies. The focus of recruitment efforts shall
be on encouraging students to consider and explore becoming future
teachers in mathematics, science, bilingual education, special
education, and English as a second language. Program enrollment is not
limited to students from underrepresented groups or multilingual,
multicultural students;
(b) A curriculum that provides future teachers with opportunities
to observe classroom instruction at all grade levels; includes
preteaching internships at all grade levels with a focus on shortage
areas; and covers such topics as lesson planning, learning styles,
student learning data and information, the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap, cultural competency, and education policy;
(c) Academic and community support services for students to help
them overcome possible barriers to becoming future teachers, such as
supplemental tutoring; advising on college readiness, applications, and
financial aid processes; and mentoring; and
(d) Future teacher camps held on college campuses where students
can attend workshops and interact with college faculty and current
teachers.
(3) As part of its administration of the program, the professional
educator standards board shall:
(a) Develop the curriculum and program guidelines in consultation
with an advisory group of teachers, representatives of teacher
preparation programs, teacher candidates, students, and representatives
of diverse communities;
(b) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, allocate grant
funds through a competitive process to partnerships of high schools,
teacher preparation programs, and community-based organizations to
design and deliver programs that include the components under
subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of current
strategies and programs for recruiting teachers, especially
multilingual, multicultural teachers, in Washington and in other
states. The board shall use the findings from the evaluation to revise
the recruiting Washington teachers program as necessary and make other
recommendations to teacher preparation programs or the legislature.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.642.005 and 2010 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that in 1975 legislation was adopted,
codified as chapter 28A.640 RCW, recognizing the deleterious effect of
discrimination on the basis of sex, specifically prohibiting such
discrimination in Washington public schools, and requiring the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to monitor and enforce
compliance. The legislature further finds that, while numerous state
and federal laws prohibit discrimination on other bases in addition to
sex, the common school provisions in this title ((28A RCW)) do not
include specific acknowledgment of the right to be free from
discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin,
honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation,
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use
of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability,
nor do any common school provisions specifically direct the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to monitor and enforce
compliance with these laws. The legislature finds that one of the
recommendations made to the legislature by the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee
created in chapter 468, Laws of 2009, was that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction should be specifically authorized
to take affirmative steps to ensure that school districts comply with
all civil rights laws, similar to what has already been authorized in
chapter 28A.640 RCW with respect to discrimination on the basis of sex.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.655.115 and 2010 c 235 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, each school shall
conduct outreach and seek feedback from a broad and diverse range of
parents, other individuals, and organizations in the community
regarding their experiences with the school. The school shall
summarize the responses in its annual report under RCW 28A.655.110.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a working group with representatives of organizations
representing parents, teachers, and principals as well as diverse
communities. The working group shall also include a representative
from the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee. By September 1, 2010, the working group
shall develop model feedback tools and strategies that school districts
may use to facilitate the feedback process required in subsection (1)
of this section. The model tools and strategies are intended to
provide assistance to school districts. School districts are
encouraged to adapt the models or develop unique tools and strategies
that best fit the circumstances in their communities.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.657.070 and 2010 c 235 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A required action plan review panel shall be established to
offer an objective, external review of a request from a school district
for reconsideration of the state board of education's rejection of the
district's required action plan. The review and reconsideration by the
panel shall be based on whether the state board of education gave
appropriate consideration to the unique circumstances and
characteristics identified in the academic performance audit of the
local school district whose required action plan was rejected.
(2)(a) The panel shall be composed of five individuals with
expertise in school improvement, school and district restructuring, or
parent and community involvement in schools. Two of the panel members
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; two
shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and one shall be
appointed by the governor.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives, president of the
senate, and governor shall solicit recommendations for possible panel
members from the Washington association of school administrators, the
Washington state school directors' association, the association of
Washington school principals, the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, and
associations representing certificated teachers, classified school
employees, and parents.
(c) Members of the panel shall be appointed no later than December
1, 2010, but the superintendent of public instruction shall convene the
panel only as needed to consider a school district's request for
reconsideration. Appointments shall be for a four-year term, with
opportunity for reappointment. Reappointments in the case of a vacancy
shall be made expeditiously so that all requests are considered in a
timely manner.
(3) The required action plan review panel may reaffirm the decision
of the state board of education, recommend that the state board
reconsider the rejection, or recommend changes to the required action
plan that should be considered by the district and the state board of
education to secure approval of the plan. The state board of education
shall consider the recommendations of the panel and issue a decision in
writing to the local school district and the panel. If the school
district must submit a new required action plan to the state board of
education, the district must submit the plan within forty days of the
board's decision.
(4) The state board of education and superintendent of public
instruction must develop timelines and procedures for the deliberations
under this section so that school districts can implement a required
action plan within the time frame required under RCW 28A.657.060.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.657.110 and 2010 c 235 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools, that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions.
(2) The state board of education shall develop an accountability
index to identify schools and districts for recognition, for continuous
improvement, and for additional state support. The index shall be
based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent.
Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators
including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from
statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as
to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and
districts, as well as parents and community members. It is the
legislature's intent that the index provide feedback to schools and
districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification
of schools with exemplary student performance and those that need
assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve exemplary student
performance.
(3) The state board of education, in cooperation with the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall annually recognize
schools for exemplary performance as measured on the state board of
education accountability index. The state board of education shall
have ongoing collaboration with the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee regarding the
measures used to measure the closing of the ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gaps and the recognition provided to the school districts
for closing the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gaps.
(4) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(5) The state board of education shall work with the education data
center established within the office of financial management and the
technical working group established in section 112, chapter 548, Laws
of 2009 to determine the feasibility of using the prototypical funding
allocation model as not only a tool for allocating resources to schools
and districts but also as a tool for schools and districts to report to
the state legislature and the state board of education on how the state
resources received are being used.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.215.005 and 2010 c 232 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Parents are their children's first and most important teachers
and decision makers;
(b) Research across disciplines now demonstrates that what happens
in the earliest years makes a critical difference in children's
readiness to succeed in school and life;
(c) Washington's competitiveness in the global economy requires a
world-class education system that starts early and supports life-long
learning;
(d) Washington state currently makes substantial investments in
voluntary child care and early learning services and supports, but
because services are fragmented across multiple state agencies, and
early learning providers lack the supports and incentives needed to
improve the quality of services they provide, many parents have
difficulty accessing high quality early learning services;
(e) A more cohesive and integrated voluntary early learning system
would result in greater efficiencies for the state, increased
partnership between the state and the private sector, improved access
to high quality early learning services, and better employment and
early learning outcomes for families and all children.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The early years of a child's life are critical to the child's
healthy brain development and that the quality of caregiving during the
early years can significantly impact the child's intellectual, social,
and emotional development;
(b) A successful outcome for every child obtaining a K-12 education
depends on children being prepared from birth for academic and social
success in school. For children at risk of school failure, the
((achievement)) educational opportunity gap often emerges as early as
eighteen months of age;
(c) There currently is a shortage of high quality services and
supports for children ages birth to three and their parents and
caregivers; and
(d) Increasing the availability of high quality services for
children ages birth to three and their parents and caregivers will
result in improved school and life outcomes.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a robust birth-to-three continuum of services for parents and caregivers of young
children in order to provide education and support regarding the
importance of early childhood development.
(4) The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To establish the department of early learning;
(b) To coordinate and consolidate state activities relating to
child care and early learning programs;
(c) To safeguard and promote the health, safety, and well-being of
children receiving child care and early learning assistance, which is
paramount over the right of any person to provide care;
(d) To provide tools to promote the hiring of suitable providers of
child care by:
(i) Providing parents with access to information regarding child
care providers;
(ii) Providing parents with child care licensing action histories
regarding child care providers; and
(iii) Requiring background checks of applicants for employment in
any child care facility licensed or regulated under current law;
(e) To promote linkages and alignment between early learning
programs and elementary schools and support the transition of children
and families from prekindergarten environments to kindergarten;
(f) To promote the development of a sufficient number and variety
of adequate child care and early learning facilities, both public and
private; and
(g) To license agencies and to assure the users of such agencies,
their parents, the community at large and the agencies themselves that
adequate minimum standards are maintained by all child care and early
learning facilities.
(5) This chapter does not expand the state's authority to license
or regulate activities or programs beyond those licensed or regulated
under existing law.

--- END ---