BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.338.040 and 2008 c 315 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate
receiving funding under the program shall collect and submit to the
department annually data on the number of clients served, the scope of
services provided, and outcomes achieved during the previous calendar
year. By December 1 of the year following any calendar year in which
funding was received under the program, the department must evaluate
the data submitted and use it in a ((biennial)) report on the program
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.409 (Manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension service program -- Termination) and 2008 c 315 s 7; and
(2) RCW 43.131.410 (Manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension service program -- Repeal) and 2008 c 315 s 8.

--- END ---