BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has enacted laws which
require the state and local governments to supervise criminal offenders
after their release from correctional facilities. These laws have been
interpreted by our courts as giving rise to a duty that creates tort
liability. The courts have expanded this duty to create liability for
offender behavior that is unrelated to the criminal behavior for which
the offender was placed on supervision. As the duty has expanded,
claims for failure to supervise have increased, and these claims have
become unrelated or minimally connected to the offense for which the
offender is being supervised. The legislature intends to rebalance
this interplay between duty and liability by focusing the state's duty
on supervision of the offender for the actual criminal behavior that
brought the offender into the criminal justice system and for which it
may be properly said that the state has an identifiable duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state, local governments, and their agencies, officers, and
employees, are not liable for injuries caused by an offender under
supervision if the offender's act causing the injuries does not have a
substantial connection with the criminal act for which the offender is
being supervised. A substantial connection exists only if the act
resulting in the injury would constitute a criminal act prosecutable
under the same chapter of the revised code of Washington as the crime
for which the offender is being supervised, or if both the act
resulting in the injury and the crime for which the offender is being
supervised constitute serious violent offenses as defined by RCW
9.94A.030.
(2) For the purposes of this section, supervision includes any type
of community-based supervision including, but not limited to,
probation, parole, community custody, community placement, community
supervision, and postrelease supervision.
(3) Nothing in this section diminishes any immunity or defense that
may otherwise be applicable to the governmental entity or its past or
present employees.

--- END ---