BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that judicial interpretation of child abuse
investigation statutes has imposed potentially irreconcilable duties on
the department of social and health services and governmental entities
that are obligated to investigate child abuse and neglect referrals.
Courts have ruled that investigators of child abuse allegations have
the obligation to protect children by removing them from unsafe homes
but also have ruled that these same statutes establish an equal duty to
protect the family unit, even where the parent is the alleged abuser.
The legislature finds that concerns about tort liability arising from
these conflicting duties impair investigators' ability to perform their
statutory obligations. While recognizing the rights of parents and the
importance of the family unit, the legislature finds that the paramount
purpose of this chapter is to benefit children. When the child's
interests of basic nurture, physical and mental health, and safety
conflict with the parents' interests, the interests of the child should
prevail. In conducting investigations under this chapter, safety of
the child during or immediately after the investigation shall be the
department's paramount concern.
The legislature expressly intends to:
(1) Overrule Tyner v. DSHS and other cases in which the courts have
held that this chapter creates an implied right of action for parents
or other caretakers who are alleged abusers;
(2) Codify the portions of the holdings in M.W. v. DSHS and
Roberson v. Perez that tort liability arising out of this chapter is
confined to the initial placement decision and not the manner in which
the investigation was conducted;
(3) Clarify that (a) child abuse investigators are entitled to the
same witness immunity as other witnesses in court proceedings; and (b)
liability shall not be imposed on the state in cases where the
department or child abuse investigators are following orders of the
court.
(4) Have the interests of the parents protected through the
judicial review and other procedures established pursuant to RCW
26.44.100 through 26.44.125 and chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.010 and 1999 c 176 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state legislature finds and declares: The bond
between a child and his or her parent, custodian, or guardian is of
paramount importance, and any intervention into the life of a child is
also an intervention into the life of the parent, custodian, or
guardian; however, instances of nonaccidental injury, neglect, death,
sexual abuse and cruelty to children by their parents, custodians or
guardians have occurred, and in the instance where a child is deprived
of his or her right to conditions of minimal nurture, health, and
safety, the state is justified in emergency intervention based upon
verified information; and therefore the Washington state legislature
hereby provides for the reporting of such cases to the appropriate
public authorities. It is the intent of the legislature that, as a
result of such reports, protective services shall be made available in
an effort to prevent further abuses, and to safeguard the general
welfare of such children((: PROVIDED, That such)). When the child's
interests of basic nurture, physical and mental health, and safety
conflict with the parents' interests, the interests of the child should
prevail. When determining whether a parent and child should be
separated during or immediately following an investigation of alleged
child abuse or neglect, the safety of the child shall be the
department's paramount concern. Reports of child abuse and neglect
shall be maintained and disseminated with strictest regard for the
privacy of the subjects of such reports and so as to safeguard against
arbitrary, malicious or erroneous information or actions((: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)). This chapter shall not be construed to authorize
interference with child-raising practices, including reasonable
parental discipline, which are not proved to be injurious to the
child's health, welfare and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Governmental entities, and their officers, agents, employees,
and volunteers, are not liable in tort to alleged perpetrators of abuse
or neglect for acts or omissions in investigation of reports of child
abuse under chapter 26.44 RCW.
(2) The duty to conduct a reasonable investigation of child abuse
or neglect upon a referral runs only to children who are the subject of
a referral under chapter 26.44 RCW and is limited to the duty to act
reasonably when making a placement decision during or immediately
following the investigation.
(3) The department and its employees shall comply with the orders
of the court, including shelter care and other dependency orders, and
are not liable for acts performed to comply with such court orders. In
providing reports and recommendations to the court, caseworkers are
entitled to the same witness immunity as would be provided to any other
witness.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.125 and 1998 c 314 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is named as an alleged perpetrator after October
1, 1998, in a founded report of child abuse or neglect has the right to
seek review and amendment of the finding as provided in this section.
Nothing in this chapter creates any other cause of action or right of
review for a person who is named as an alleged perpetrator of child
abuse or neglect.
(2) Within twenty calendar days after receiving written notice from
the department under RCW 26.44.100 that a person is named as an alleged
perpetrator in a founded report of child abuse or neglect, he or she
may request that the department review the finding. The request must
be made in writing. If a request for review is not made as provided in
this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the
finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative
hearing or judicial review of the finding.
(3) Upon receipt of a written request for review, the department
shall review and, if appropriate, may amend the finding. Management
level staff within the children's administration designated by the
secretary shall be responsible for the review. The review must be
conducted in accordance with procedures the department establishes by
rule. Upon completion of the review, the department shall notify the
alleged perpetrator in writing of the agency's determination. The
notification must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested,
to the person's last known address.
(4) If, following agency review, the report remains founded, the
person named as the alleged perpetrator in the report may request an
adjudicative hearing to contest the finding. The adjudicative
proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and this section. The
request for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed within thirty
calendar days after receiving notice of the agency review
determination. If a request for an adjudicative proceeding is not made
as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further
challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an
adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding.
(5) Reviews and hearings conducted under this section are
confidential and shall not be open to the public. Information about
reports, reviews, and hearings may be disclosed only in accordance with
federal and state laws pertaining to child welfare records and child
protective services reports.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---