BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the decision of
the supreme court in Rahman v. State creates an unreasonable standard
for employers by imposing liability for actions of employees in
circumstances that are beyond the ability of employers to control. An
employee is not acting within the scope of his or her employment when
the employee, without actual, implied, or apparent authority,
transports a passenger or invites a passenger to ride in a vehicle
being used for the employer's purposes. The legislature intends by
this act to overrule the holding in Rahman v. State that an employer is
liable under the doctrine of respondeat superior for negligent acts of
its employees that result in injuries to unauthorized occupants of
vehicles used for the employer's purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer is not liable for civil damages under the doctrine
of respondeat superior for the negligence of its employees or agents
resulting from the operation of an employer vehicle, for injuries to a
third party who occupies or operates the vehicle, if the employee or
agent permitted the third party to occupy or operate the vehicle either
in violation of any express policy, rule, order, or other instruction
of the employer, or without the express or implied authorization of the
employer. This section applies even where the conduct that immediately
caused the harm is within the scope of the employee's employment.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" means any employer, including private employers, the
state, and political subdivisions of the state.
(b) "Employer vehicle" means a vehicle owned, leased, or rented, or
otherwise used by or for the benefit of the employer, and includes
employee-owned or other private vehicles when such vehicle is operated
for the express benefit of the employer.
(c) "Third party" means a person who is not an employee or agent of
the employer.

--- END ---