BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds no greater evidence of
the need for financial education than the mortgage and banking crisis
that has occurred in the United States in recent years. The
legislature further finds that it is difficult to imagine a high school
graduate being prepared for postsecondary education, career, and
citizenship without financial education. Therefore the legislature
intends to make available to all public high school students the
opportunity to learn fundamental financial skills such as managing
checking and savings accounts and understanding the implications and
basic operation of contracts, compound interest, loans, mortgages,
payment plans, credit cards, fair credit laws, and other credit issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction,
through the digital learning department, shall make available to all
school districts an online course in financial education with
sufficient content to be equivalent to one-half of one high school
credit.
(b) The office shall select the course with input from the
financial education public-private partnership established in RCW
28A.300.450 to ensure that the course meets financial education
learning standards endorsed by the partnership.
(c) The office shall seek federal and private funds to support the
online financial education course.
(2) School districts shall provide all students in grades nine
through twelve the opportunity to complete the online financial
education course under this section, whether through a regularly
scheduled class period; before or after school; during class period
breaks, lunch periods, or library and study time; at home; or other
opportunities. School districts shall publicize the availability and
importance of the online financial education course to students and
their families. School districts are encouraged to grant credit toward
high school graduation to students who successfully complete the online
financial education course.

--- END ---