BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director is authorized to provide funding from the medical
aid fund established under RCW 51.44.020, by grant or contract, for
safety and health investment projects for workplaces insured for
workers' compensation through the department's state fund. This shall
include projects to: Prevent workplace injuries, illnesses, and
fatalities; create early return-to-work programs; and to reduce long-term disability through the cooperation of employers and employees or
their representatives.
(2) Awards may be granted to organizations such as, but not limited
to, trade associations, business associations, employers, employees,
labor unions, employee organizations, joint labor and management
groups, and educational institutions in collaboration with state fund
employer and employee representatives.
(3) Awards may not be used for lobbying or political activities;
supporting, opposing, or developing legislative or regulatory
initiatives; any activity not designed to reduce workplace injuries,
illnesses, or fatalities; or reimbursing employers for the normal costs
of complying with safety and health rules.
(4) Awards should foster the development and implementation of
innovative and effective return-to-work programs that lead to improved
outcomes for injured workers. Funds for awards shall be distributed as
follows: Twenty-five percent for projects designed to develop and
implement innovative and effective return-to-work programs for injured
workers; twenty-five percent for projects that specifically address the
needs of small businesses; and fifty percent for projects that foster
workplace injury and illness prevention by addressing priorities
identified by the department in cooperation with the Washington
industrial safety and health act advisory committee and the workers'
compensation advisory committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.04.110 and 2010 c 8 s 14001 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall appoint a workers' compensation advisory
committee composed of ten members: Three representing subject workers,
three representing subject employers, one representing self-insurers,
one representing workers of self-insurers, and two ex officio members,
without a vote, one of whom shall be the chair of the board of
industrial appeals and the other the representative of the department.
The member representing the department shall be chair. This committee
shall conduct a continuing study of any aspects of workers'
compensation as the committee shall determine require their
consideration and shall assist in the identification of priorities for
safety and health investment projects as provided in chapter 49.17 RCW.
The committee shall report its findings to the department or the board
of industrial insurance appeals for such action as deemed appropriate.
The members of the committee shall be appointed for a term of three
years commencing on July 1, 1971 and the terms of the members
representing the workers and employers shall be staggered so that the
director shall designate one member from each such group initially
appointed whose term shall expire on June 30, 1972 and one member from
each such group whose term shall expire on June 30, 1973. The members
shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or
hereafter amended. The committee may hire such experts, if any, as it
shall require to discharge its duties, and may utilize such personnel
and facilities of the department and board of industrial insurance
appeals as it shall need without charge. All expenses of this
committee shall be paid by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.060 and 2007 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine
that permanent total disability results from the injury, the worker
shall receive monthly during the period of such disability:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages.
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages.
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages.
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages.
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages.
(2) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes.
(3) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the
injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to
require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(4) Should any further accident result in the permanent total
disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to
which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a
lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(5)(a) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(((a))) (i) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly
wage in the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as
follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(((b))) (ii) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after
July 1, 2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage
in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten
dollars per month if a worker is married and an additional ten dollars
per month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five
children. However, if the monthly payment computed under this
subsection (5)(((b))) (a)(ii) is greater than one hundred percent of
the wages of the worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly
payment due to the worker shall be equal to the greater of the monthly
wages of the worker or the minimum benefit set forth in this section on
June 30, 2008.
(b) For a worker who has been awarded a permanent total disability
pension, but retains a limited ability to work, the department may not
reduce the worker's pension payments if the wages or money the worker
receives from working equal ten percent or less of the average monthly
wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018. If the worker's
wages are more than ten percent of the average monthly wage in the
state, the department shall reduce the worker's monthly pension
payments by one dollar for every two dollars earned in excess of this
amount. Workers must report every year to the department any earnings,
wages, or employment on a form prescribed by the department. The
department may not reduce benefits for wages when a worker's total
permanent disability pension is due to the loss of both legs, or arms,
or one leg and one arm, total loss of eyesight, or paralysis.
(c) The limitations under this subsection (5) shall not apply to
the payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or
reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached
to the workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(7) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.
(8)(a) When the medical residuals of the industrial injury or
occupational disease are not the predominant factor causing the
worker's inability to perform employment or be retrained, compensation
must continue until the worker reaches full federal retirement age as
defined by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 416(1).
(b) The medical residuals of the industrial injury or occupational
disease are the predominant factor when, considering the worker's
entire circumstances, the worker would be able to perform employment or
be retrained but for the medical residuals.
(9) The department shall develop rules as necessary to implement
this section.
(10) The provisions of subsection (8) of this section apply to all
determinations of total permanent disability made by the department on
or after July 1, 2011.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.067 and 2006 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After a worker elects one of the options in (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection, that option shall apply only if the worker dies during
a period of permanent total disability from a cause unrelated to the
injury, leaving a surviving spouse, child, children, or other
dependent. If, after making an election under this subsection, a
worker dies from a cause related to the injury during a period of
permanent total disability, his or her beneficiaries shall receive
benefits under RCW 51.32.050 (2) through (5).
(a) Option I. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive the benefits provided by RCW 51.32.060, with no benefits being
paid to the worker's surviving spouse, children, or others.
(b) Option II. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive an actuarially reduced benefit which upon death shall be
((continued throughout the life of and)) paid to the surviving spouse,
child, or other dependent as the worker has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. The benefit
is payable to the designated beneficiary through their life or through
the period the injured worker would have been entitled to permanent
total disability benefits, whichever ends first.
(c) Option III. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive an actuarially reduced benefit and, upon death, one-half of the
reduced benefit shall be ((continued throughout the life of and)) paid
to the surviving spouse, child, or other dependent as the worker has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. The benefit is payable to the designated beneficiary
through their life or through the period the injured worker would have
been entitled to permanent total disability benefits, whichever ends
first.
(2) The worker shall make the election in writing and the worker's
spouse, if any, shall consent in writing as a prerequisite to the
election of Option I.
(3) If the worker's nominated beneficiary is the worker's spouse,
and the worker and spouse enter into a dissolution of marriage after
the nomination has been made, the worker may apply to receive benefits
as calculated under Option I if the period of the worker's entitlement
to permanent total disability benefits has not ended. This change is
effective the date of the decree of dissolution of marriage, but no
more than one year prior to the date application for the change is
received in the department, provided the worker submits legally
certified documentation of the decree of dissolution of marriage.
(4) If the worker's nominated beneficiary dies, the worker may
apply to receive benefits as calculated under Option I if the period of
the worker's entitlement to permanent total disability benefits has not
ended. This change is effective the date of death, but no more than
one year prior to the date application for the change is received in
the department, provided the worker submits a certified copy of the
death certificate.
(5) The change in benefits authorized by subsections (3) and (4) of
this section is a one-time adjustment and will be permanent for the
((life of the worker)) period of the worker's entitlement to permanent
total disability benefits.
(6) The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.080 and 2007 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning with injuries on or after July 1, 2011, for the
permanent partial disabilities here specifically described, the injured
worker shall receive compensation as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short thigh
stump (3" or less below the tuberosity
of ischium) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,533.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with functional
stump . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,480.00

Of leg below knee joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,427.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,373.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,187.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,512.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,707.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,369.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of
metatarsal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,774.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,247.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,888.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $984.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or
by disarticulation at the shoulder . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,533.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid
insertion to below the elbow joint at the
insertion of the biceps tendon . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,507.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow
joint distal to the insertion of the biceps
tendon to and including mid-metacarpal
amputation of the hand . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,480.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at
metacarpophalangeal joints . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,888.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or
with resection of carpometacarpal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,592.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,296.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal joint
or with resection of metacarpal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $31.620.00

Of index finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,296.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,913.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,296.00

Of middle finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,237.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,383.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal joint
or with resection of metacarpal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,648.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,118.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,324.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal joint
or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,324.00

Of little finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,059.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of one eye by enucleation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,213.00

Loss of central visual acuity in one eye . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,844.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,482.00

Complete loss of hearing in one ear . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,414.00

(b) Until July 1, 1993, for the permanent partial disabilities here
specifically described, the injured worker shall receive compensation
as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short
thigh stump (3" or less below the
tuberosity of ischium) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with
functional stump . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of leg below knee joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme) . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,800.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,900.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,340.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,804.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,600.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of
metatarsal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,140.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,016.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,494.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 378.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or
by disarticulation at the shoulder . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,000.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid
insertion to below the elbow joint at
the insertion of the biceps tendon . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,300.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow
joint distal to the insertion of the
biceps tendon to and including
mid-metacarpal amputation of the
hand . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at
metacarpophalangeal joints . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,160.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or
with resection of carpometacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,440.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,150.00

Of index finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,346.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of middle finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,776.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,374.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,860.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,888.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,944.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 972.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of one eye by enucleation . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,600.00

Loss of central visual acuity in one eye . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,000.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Complete loss of hearing in one ear . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,200.00

(((b))) (c) Beginning on July 1, 1993, compensation under this
subsection shall be computed as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (((a))) (b) of this subsection shall
be increased by thirty-two percent; ((and))
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1st thereafter until
July 1, 2011, the compensation amounts for the specified disabilities
listed in (((a))) (b) of this subsection, as adjusted under (((b)))
(c)(i) of this subsection, shall be readjusted to reflect the
percentage change in the consumer price index, calculated as follows:
The index for the calendar year preceding the year in which the July
calculation is made, to be known as "calendar year A," is divided by
the index for the calendar year preceding calendar year A, and the
resulting ratio is multiplied by the compensation amount in effect on
June 30 immediately preceding the July 1st on which the respective
calculation is made. For the purposes of this subsection, "index"
means the same as the definition in RCW 2.12.037(1); and
(iii) Beginning with injuries on July 1, 2012, and for those
occurring each July 1st thereafter, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection shall be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated under the formula provided in (c)(ii) of this
subsection.
(2) Compensation for amputation of a member or part thereof at a
site other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section, and
for loss of central visual acuity and loss of hearing other than
complete, shall be in proportion to that which such other amputation or
partial loss of visual acuity or hearing most closely resembles and
approximates. Compensation shall be calculated based on the adjusted
schedule of compensation in effect for the respective time period as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Compensation for any other permanent partial disability not
involving amputation shall be in the proportion which the extent of
such other disability, called unspecified disability, shall bear to the
disabilities specified in subsection (1) of this section, which most
closely resembles and approximates in degree of disability such other
disability, and compensation for any other unspecified permanent
partial disability shall be in an amount as measured and compared to
total bodily impairment. To reduce litigation and establish more
certainty and uniformity in the rating of unspecified permanent partial
disabilities, the department shall enact rules having the force of law
classifying such disabilities in the proportion which the department
shall determine such disabilities reasonably bear to total bodily
impairment. In enacting such rules, the department shall give
consideration to, but need not necessarily adopt, any nationally
recognized medical standards or guides for determining various bodily
impairments.
(b) Beginning with injuries on July 1, 2011, for purposes of
calculating monetary benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount
payable for total bodily impairment shall be deemed to be two hundred
thirty-four thousand two hundred twenty-two dollars. Beginning with
injuries on July 1, 2012, for purposes of calculating monetary benefits
under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total bodily
impairment shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (1)(c)(iii) of
this section.
(c) Until July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be deemed to be ninety thousand dollars.
Beginning on July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be adjusted as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the amount payable for total bodily
impairment under this section shall be increased to one hundred
eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the
amount payable for total bodily impairment prescribed in (((b))) (c)(i)
of this subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection
(1)(((b))) (c)(ii) of this section.
(((c))) (d) Until July 1, 1993, the total compensation for all
unspecified permanent partial disabilities resulting from the same
injury shall not exceed the sum of ninety thousand dollars. Beginning
on July 1, 1993, total compensation for all unspecified permanent
partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall not exceed a
sum calculated as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the sum shall be increased to one
hundred eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the sum
prescribed in (((b))) (c)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as
provided in subsection (1)(((b))) (c)(ii) of this section.
(4) If permanent partial disability compensation is followed by
permanent total disability compensation, ((any portion of the permanent
partial disability compensation which exceeds the amount that would
have been paid the injured worker if permanent total disability
compensation had been paid in the first instance)) all permanent
partial disability compensation paid to the worker under the claim or
claims for which total permanent disability compensation is awarded
shall be, at the choosing of the injured worker, either: (a) Deducted
from the worker's monthly pension benefits ((in an amount not to exceed
twenty-five percent of the monthly amount due from the department or
self-insurer or one-sixth of the total overpayment, whichever is less))
until the total award or awards paid are recovered; or (b) deducted
from the pension reserve of such injured worker and his or her monthly
compensation payments shall be reduced accordingly. Any interest paid
on any permanent partial disability compensation may not be deducted
from the pension benefits or pension reserve. The provisions of this
subsection apply to all permanent total disability determinations
issued on or after July 1, 2011.
(5) Should a worker receive an injury to a member or part of his or
her body already, from whatever cause, permanently partially disabled,
resulting in the amputation thereof or in an aggravation or increase in
such permanent partial disability but not resulting in the permanent
total disability of such worker, his or her compensation for such
partial disability shall be adjudged with regard to the previous
disability of the injured member or part and the degree or extent of
the aggravation or increase of disability thereof.
(6) When the compensation provided for in subsections (1) through
(3) of this section exceeds three times the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, payment shall
be made in monthly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments set forth in RCW 51.32.090 until
such compensation is paid to the injured worker in full, except that
the first monthly payment shall be in an amount equal to three times
the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions
of RCW 51.08.018((, and interest shall be paid at the rate of eight
percent on the unpaid balance of such compensation commencing with the
second monthly payment. However,)). Upon application of the injured
worker or survivor the monthly payment may be converted, in whole or in
part, into a lump sum payment, in which event the monthly payment shall
cease in whole or in part. Such conversion may be made only upon
written application of the injured worker or survivor to the department
((and)) or self-insurer. A decision to deny the application to the
worker of a self-insurer, or to either grant or deny the application to
the worker of an employer insured by the department, shall rest in the
discretion of the department depending upon the merits of each
individual application. Upon the death of a worker all unpaid
installments accrued shall be paid according to the payment schedule
established prior to the death of the worker to the widow or widower,
or if there is no widow or widower surviving, to the dependent children
of such claimant, and if there are no such dependent children, then to
such other dependents as defined by this title.
(7) Awards payable under this section are governed by the schedule
in effect on the date of injury.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.090 and 2007 c 284 s 3 and 2007 c 190 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(c) The prior closure of the claim or the receipt of permanent
partial disability benefits shall not affect the rate at which loss of
earning power benefits are calculated upon reopening the claim.
(4)(a) ((Whenever)) The legislature finds that long-term disability
and the cost of injuries is significantly reduced when injured workers
remain at work following their injury. To encourage employers at the
time of injury to provide light duty or transitional work for their
workers, wage subsidies and other incentives are made available to
employers insured with the department.
(b) The employer of injury ((requests that)) may provide light duty
or transitional work to a worker who is entitled to temporary total
disability under this chapter ((be certified by a physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner as able to perform available
work other than his or her usual work,)). The employer or the
department shall obtain from the physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner a statement confirming the light duty or
transitional work is consistent with the worker's medical restrictions
related to the injury. This statement should be obtained before the
start of the light duty or transitional work unless the worker has
already returned to work with the employer of injury in which case the
statement may be obtained following the start date of the job. The
employer shall furnish to the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner, with a copy to the worker, a statement describing
the work ((available)) with the employer of injury in terms that will
enable the physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner
to relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's
disability. The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner shall ((then determine)) confirm whether the worker is
physically able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary
total disability payments shall ((continue until the worker is released
by his or her physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If)) stop effective the date the light duty or transitional
job starts. Temporary total disability payments shall resume if the
work ((thereafter)) comes to an end before the worker's recovery is
sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner to permit him or her to return to his or
her usual job, or to perform other available work offered by the
employer of injury((, the worker's temporary total disability payments
shall be resumed)). Should the available work described, once
undertaken by the worker, impede his or her recovery to the extent that
in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner he or she should not continue to work, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed when the worker
ceases such work at the direction of the physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner.
(((b))) (c) To further encourage employers to maintain the
employment of their injured workers, an employer insured with the
department and that offers work to a worker pursuant to this subsection
(4) shall be eligible for reimbursement of the injured worker's wages
for light duty or transitional work equal to fifty percent of the
basic, gross wages paid for that work, for a maximum of sixty-six work
days within a consecutive twenty-four month period. In no event may
the wage subsidies paid to an employer on a claim exceed ten thousand
dollars. Wage subsidies shall be calculated using the worker's basic
hourly wages or basic salary, and no subsidy shall be paid for any
other form of compensation or payment to the worker such as tips,
commissions, bonuses, board, housing, fuel, health care, dental care,
vision care, per diem, reimbursements for work-related expenses, or any
other payments. An employer may not, under any circumstances, receive
a wage subsidy for a day in which the worker did not actually perform
any work, regardless of whether or not the employer paid the worker
wages for that day.
(d) If an employer offers a worker work pursuant to this subsection
(4) and the worker must be provided with training or instruction to be
qualified to perform the offered work, the employer shall be eligible
for a reimbursement from the department for any tuition, books, fees,
and materials required for that training or instruction, up to a
maximum of one thousand dollars. Reimbursing an employer for the costs
of such training or instruction does not constitute a determination by
the department that the worker is eligible for vocational services
authorized by RCW 51.32.095 and 51.32.099.
(e) If an employer offers a worker work pursuant to this subsection
(4), and the employer provides the worker with clothing that is
necessary to allow the worker to perform the offered work, the employer
shall be eligible for reimbursement for such clothing from the
department, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That an employer shall not receive reimbursement for any
clothing it provided to the worker that it normally provides to its
workers. The clothing purchased for the worker shall become the
worker's property once the work comes to an end.
(f) If an employer offers a worker work pursuant to this subsection
(4) and the worker must be provided with tools or equipment to perform
the offered work, the employer shall be eligible for a reimbursement
from the department for such tools and equipment and related costs as
determined by department rule, up to a maximum of two thousand five
hundred dollars. An employer shall not be reimbursed for any tools or
equipment purchased prior to offering the work to the worker pursuant
to this subsection (4). An employer shall not be reimbursed for any
tools or equipment that it normally provides to its workers. The tools
and equipment shall be the property of the employer.
(g) An employer may offer work to a worker pursuant to this
subsection (4) more than once, but in no event may the employer receive
wage subsidies for more than sixty-six days of work in a consecutive
twenty-four month period under one claim. An employer may continue to
offer work pursuant to this subsection (4) after the worker has
performed sixty-six days of work, but the employer shall not be
eligible to receive wage subsidies for such work.
(h) An employer shall not receive any wage subsidies or
reimbursement of any expenses pursuant to this subsection (4) unless
the employer has completed and submitted the reimbursement request on
forms developed by the department, along with all related information
required by department rules. No wage subsidy or reimbursement shall
be paid to an employer who fails to submit a form for such payment
within one year of the date the work was performed. In no event shall
an employer receive wage subsidy payments or reimbursements of any
expenses pursuant to this subsection (4) unless the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner has restricted him
or her from performing his or her usual work and the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner has released him or
her to perform the work offered.
(i) Payments made under (b) through (g) of this subsection are
subject to penalties under RCW 51.32.240(5) in cases where the funds
were obtained through willful misrepresentation.
(j) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the ((worker's written
consent, or without prior review and)) approval ((by)) of the worker's
physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner. An
employer who directs a claimant to perform work other than that
approved by the attending physician and without the approval of the
worker's physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner
shall not receive any wage subsidy or other reimbursements for such
work.
(((c))) (k) If the worker returns to work under this subsection
(4), any employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was
receiving at the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the
level provided at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be
continued or resumed if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the
benefit program, or with the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement currently in force.
(((d))) (l) In the event of any dispute as to the validity of the
work offered or as to the worker's ability to perform the available
work offered by the employer, the department shall make the final
determination pursuant to an order that contains the notice required by
RCW 51.52.060 and that is subject to appeal subject to RCW 51.52.050.
(5) An employer's experience rating shall not be affected by the
employer's request for or receipt of wage subsidies.
(6) The department shall create a Washington stay-at-work account
which shall be funded by assessments of employers insured through the
state fund for the costs of the payments authorized by subsection (4)
of this section and for the cost of creating a reserve for anticipated
liabilities. Employers may collect up to one-half the fund assessment
from workers.
(7) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(((6))) (8) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and
should his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay
him or her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such
injury, such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages: PROVIDED, That holiday pay, vacation pay,
sick leave, or other similar benefits shall not be deemed to be
payments by the employer for the purposes of this subsection.
(((7))) (9) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if the worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (((7)))
(9)(b) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker
as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the
worker shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker
or the minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
(((8))) (10) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines
that the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the
workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to the options listed in RCW 51.32.099(4), a
worker who is found eligible for vocational plan development and who is
age fifty-five or older on the date the vocational rehabilitation plan
is submitted to the department or self-insurer, can select a disability
settlement option. Under this option, the worker declines further
vocational services under the claim and elects to receive a disability
settlement in an amount equal to one-third of the value of the pension
annuity. The pension annuity shall be calculated as if the worker had
been found totally and permanently disabled effective the date the
worker was found eligible for vocational plan development services.
All prior permanent partial disability awards and any permanent partial
disability award to be paid at claim closure shall be deducted from the
pension annuity forming the basis of the disability settlement. For
purposes of communicating this option to a worker, the department may
estimate the amount of the permanent partial disability award. This
estimate is not binding on any party.
(b) The disability settlement selection can be made by an eligible
worker at any time during plan development services until the plan is
submitted to the department. The worker will have a minimum of sixty
days to make this selection. The worker's selection and award amount
will be established by order of the department pursuant to RCW
51.52.050. The department shall thereafter close the claim or claims
including any permanent partial disability award to which the worker is
entitled.
(c) The worker will continue to receive temporary total disability
benefits until this order and the order closing the claim become final
and binding on all parties. The disability settlement award will be
paid in a lump sum within ten days of these orders becoming final, less
the amount paid in temporary total disability benefits after the date
the disability settlement order was issued.
(i) A worker who has received disability settlement benefits can
reopen the claim or claims for which the disability settlement was paid
upon a showing of worsening of the related medical conditions under RCW
51.32.160 for medical treatment only. Further temporary total,
temporary partial, permanent partial, or permanent total benefits are
not payable under the same claim or claims for which a disability
settlement was selected and paid.
(ii) If a worker who has received disability settlement benefits is
subsequently injured or suffers an occupational disease, and vocational
rehabilitation is found both necessary and likely to enable the injured
worker to become employable at gainful employment under RCW
51.32.095(1), vocational rehabilitation will only be provided at the
discretion of the director or the director's designee.
(iii) If a worker who has received disability settlement benefits
becomes entitled to total permanent disability benefits under another
claim, the disability settlement benefits will be deducted from the
pension annuity calculated under the subsequent claim and pension
benefits reduced accordingly.
(iv) A disability settlement is not available to a worker who has
suffered the loss of both legs, or arms, or one leg and one arm, total
loss of eyesight, or paralysis.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply to all
claims where the worker is age fifty-five or older and is found
eligible for vocational plan development on or after July 1, 2011.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.32.160 and 1995 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability
takes place, the director may, upon the application of the beneficiary,
made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes
final, or at any time upon his or her own motion, readjust the rate of
compensation in accordance with the rules in this section provided for
the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment: PROVIDED, That
the director may, upon application of the worker made at any time,
provide proper and necessary medical and surgical services as
authorized under RCW 51.36.010. The department shall promptly mail a
copy of the application to the employer at the employer's last known
address as shown by the records of the department.
(b) "Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on
factors which include medical recommendation, advice, or examination.
(c) Applications for benefits where the claim has been closed
without medical recommendation, advice, or examination are not subject
to the seven year limitation of this section. The preceding sentence
shall not apply to any closing order issued prior to July 1, 1981.
First closing orders issued between July 1, 1981, and July 1, 1985,
shall, for the purposes of this section only, be deemed issued on July
1, 1985. The time limitation of this section shall be ten years in
claims involving loss of vision or function of the eyes.
(d) If an order denying an application to reopen filed on or after
July 1, 1988, is not issued within ninety days of receipt of such
application by the self-insured employer or the department, such
application shall be deemed granted. However, for good cause, the
department may extend the time for making the final determination on
the application for an additional sixty days.
(2) If a worker receiving ((a pension for)) permanent total
disability benefits returns to ((gainful)) any employment for wages or
earnings, the director ((may)) shall suspend ((or)), terminate ((the
rate of compensation established for the disability)), or reduce the
amount of compensation without producing medical evidence that shows
that a diminution of the disability has occurred. A reduction in the
amount of compensation must be in accordance with RCW 51.32.060(5)(b).
(3) No act done or ordered to be done by the director, or the
department prior to the signing and filing in the matter of a written
order for such readjustment shall be grounds for such readjustment.

Sec. 9 RCW 51.36.010 and 2007 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that high quality medical treatment and
adherence to occupational health best practices can prevent disability
and reduce loss of family income for workers, and lower labor and
insurance costs for employers. Injured workers deserve high quality
medical care in accordance with current health care best practices. To
this end, the department shall establish minimum standards for
providers who treat workers from both state fund and self-insured
employers. The department shall establish a health care provider
network to treat injured workers, and shall accept providers into the
network who meet those minimum standards. The department shall
convene an advisory group made up of representatives from or designees
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and the industrial
insurance medical and chiropractic advisory committees to consider and
advise the department related to implementation of this section,
including development of best practices treatment guidelines for
providers in the network. Network providers must be required to follow
department coverage decisions, policies, treatment guidelines, and to
consider other industry treatment guidelines appropriate for their
patient. The department shall also establish additional best practice
standards for providers to qualify for a second tier within the
network, based on demonstrated use of occupational health best
practices. This second tier is separate from and in addition to the
centers for occupational health and education established under
subsection (5) of this section.
(2)(a) Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to
compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall
receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands
of a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner of
his or her own choice, if conveniently located, in the health care
provider network established under this section, and proper and
necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her
disability from such injury.
(b) Once the provider network is established in the worker's
geographic area, an injured worker may receive care from a nonnetwork
provider only for an initial office or emergency room visit. However,
the department or self-insurer may limit reimbursement to the
department's standard fee for the services. The provider must comply
with all applicable billing policies and must accept the department's
fee schedule as payment in full.
(c) The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall
adopt policies for the development, credentialing, accreditation, and
continued oversight of a network of health care providers approved to
treat injured workers. Health care providers shall apply to the
network by completing the department's provider application which shall
have the force of a contract with the department to treat injured
workers. The advisory group shall recommend minimum network standards
for the department to approve a provider's application or to remove a
provider from the network including, but not limited to:
(i) Current malpractice insurance coverage;
(ii) Previous malpractice judgments or settlements that do not
exceed a dollar amount threshold recommended by the advisory group, or
a specific number or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific
time frame;
(iii) No licensing or disciplinary action in any jurisdiction or
loss of treating or admitting privileges by any board, commission,
agency, public or private health care payer, or hospital;
(iv) For some specialties such as surgeons, privileges in at least
one hospital;
(v) Whether the provider has been credentialed by another health
plan that follows national quality assurance guidelines; and
(vi) Alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed
by another health plan.
The department shall develop alternative criteria for providers
that are not credentialed by another health plan or as needed to
address access to care concerns in certain regions.
(d) In order to monitor quality of care and assure efficient
management of the provider network, the department may establish
additional criteria and terms for network participation including, but
not limited to, requiring compliance with administrative and billing
policies.
(e) The advisory group shall recommend best practices standards to
the department to use in determining second tier network providers.
The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial
incentives for network providers who qualify for the second tier. The
department is authorized to certify and decertify second tier
providers.
(3) The department shall work with self-insurers and the department
utilization review provider to implement utilization review for the
self-insured community to ensure consistent quality, cost-effective
care for all injured workers and employers, and to reduce
administrative burden for providers.
(4) The department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance
with the department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a
worker files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in
relation to that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's
claim for benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall
be limited in point of duration as follows:
In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond
the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the
worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is
made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly
allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability
not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her
shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to
his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be
continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by
the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her
more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to
extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him
or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely
in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical
treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when
such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the
supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or
provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures
including payment of prescription medications, but not including those
controlled substances currently scheduled by the state board of
pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50
RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results
from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued
treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance
issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.
The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee,
or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize
inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a
potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such
treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any
adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary
for an occupational disease.
(5)(a) The legislature finds that the department and its business
and labor partners have collaborated in establishing centers for
occupational health and education to promote best practices and prevent
preventable disability by focusing additional provider-based resources
during the first twelve weeks following an injury. The centers for
occupational health and education represent innovative accountable care
systems in an early stage of development consistent with national
health care reform efforts. Many Washington workers do not yet have
access to these innovative health care delivery models.
(b) To expand evidence-based occupational health best practices,
the department shall establish additional centers for occupational
health and education, with the goal of extending access to at least
fifty percent of injured and ill workers by December 2013 and to all
injured workers by December 2015. The department shall also develop
additional best practices and incentives that span the entire period of
recovery, not only the first twelve weeks.
(c) The department shall certify and decertify centers for
occupational health and education based on criteria including
institutional leadership and geographic areas covered by the center for
occupational health and education, occupational health leadership and
education, mix of participating health care providers necessary to
address the anticipated needs of injured workers, health services
coordination to deliver occupational health best practices, indicators
to measure the success of the center for occupational health and
education, and agreement that the center's providers shall, if
feasible, treat certain injured workers if referred by the department
or a self-insurer.
(d) Health care delivery organizations may apply to the department
for certification as a center for occupational health and education.
These may include, but are not limited to, hospitals and affiliated
clinics and providers, multispecialty clinics, health maintenance
organizations, and organized systems of network physicians.
(e) The centers for occupational health and education shall
implement benchmark quality indicators of occupational health best
practices for individual providers, developed in collaboration with the
department. A center for occupational health and education shall
remove individual providers who do not consistently meet these quality
benchmarks.
(f) The department shall develop and implement financial and
nonfinancial incentives for center for occupational health and
education providers that are based on progressive and measurable gains
in occupational health best practices, and that are applicable
throughout the duration of an injured or ill worker's episode of care.
(g) The department shall develop electronic methods of tracking
evidence-based quality measures to identify and improve outcomes for
injured workers at risk of developing prolonged disability. In
addition, these methods must be used to provide systematic feedback to
physicians regarding quality of care, to conduct appropriate objective
evaluation of progress in the centers for occupational health and
education, and to allow efficient coordination of services.
(6) If a provider fails to meet the minimum network standards
established in subsection (2) of this section, the department is
authorized to remove the provider from the network or take other
appropriate action regarding a provider's participation. The
department may also require remedial steps as a condition for a
provider to participate in the network. The department shall establish
waiting periods that may be imposed in the department's discretion
before a provider who has been denied or removed from the network may
reapply.
(7) The department may permanently remove a provider from the
network or take other appropriate action when the provider exhibits a
pattern of conduct of low quality care that exposes patients to risk of
physical or psychiatric harm or death. Patterns that qualify as risk
of harm include, but are not limited to, poor health care outcomes
evidenced by increased, chronic, or prolonged pain or decreased
function due to treatments that have not been shown to be curative,
safe, or effective or for which it has been shown that the risks of
harm exceed the benefits that can be reasonably expected based on peer-reviewed opinion.
(8) The department may not remove a health care provider from the
network for an isolated instance of poor health and recovery outcomes
due to treatment by the provider.
(9) When the department terminates a provider from the network, the
department or self-insurer shall assist an injured worker currently
under the provider's care in identifying a new network provider or
providers from whom the worker can select an attending or treating
provider. In such a case, the department or self-insurer shall notify
the injured worker that he or she must choose a new attending or
treating provider.
(10) The department may adopt rules related to this section.
(11) The department shall report to the workers' compensation
advisory committee and to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on each December 1st, beginning in 2012 and ending in 2016, on the
implementation of the provider network and expansion of the centers for
occupational health and education. The reports must include a summary
of actions taken, progress toward long-term goals, outcomes of key
initiatives, access to care issues, results of disputes or
controversies related to new provisions, and whether any changes are
needed to further improve the occupational health best practices care
of injured workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Utilization, worker satisfaction and outcomes, and system and
employer costs related to RCW 51.32.060, 51.32.080, and section 7 of
this act will be studied and a report issued to the appropriate
legislative committees, the department, and the workers' compensation
advisory committee by December 1, 2014. The workers' compensation
advisory committee shall recommend to the department any legislation
needed to ensure the appropriate utilization of disability benefits at
reasonable cost to the system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---