BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part" means a
replacement for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts
that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including
inner and outer panels, that was not made for or by the manufacturer of
that motor vehicle.
(b) "Original equipment manufacturer crash part" means a
replacement part for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic
parts that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle,
including inner and outer panels, that was manufactured by or for the
original manufacturer of that motor vehicle.
(2) An automotive repair facility may not use nonoriginal equipment
manufacturer crash parts in the repair of a motor vehicle for a period
of five years running from the production month and year the motor
vehicle was manufactured or while the vehicle is under manufacturer's
warranty unless the customer or customer's designee consents in writing
at the time of the repair. If the customer or customer's designee
consents to the use of nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash parts,
the repair facility must specify on the repair estimate which parts are
original equipment manufacturer crash parts and which parts are
nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash parts and must include with
the estimate a disclosure document containing the following information
in no smaller than twelve-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF NONORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED
NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE NOR
BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY MOTOR VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED
USING NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER CRASH PARTS AS
SPECIFIED IN THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE REPAIR
FACILITY TO INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

CUSTOMER SIGNATURE DATE

--- END ---