BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.070 and 1959 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ((sheriff, coroner, keeper or superintendent of a county
poorhouse, public hospital, county jail, or state institution shall))
public agency required to provide for the disposition of human remains
in any legal manner at public expense must surrender the ((dead bodies
of persons required to be buried at the public expense,)) human remains
to:
(a) Any physician or surgeon, to be ((by him)) used for the
advancement of anatomical science, preference being given to medical
schools in this state, for their use in the instruction of medical
students; or
(b) An accredited educational institution offering funeral services
and embalming programs for use in training embalming students under the
supervision of an embalmer licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW.
(2) If the deceased person ((during his last sickness)) requested
to be buried, or if ((within thirty days after his death)) some person
claiming to be a relative or a responsible officer of a ((church))
religious organization with which the deceased at the time of ((his))
death was affiliated requires the ((body)) remains to be buried, ((his
body shall)) the remains must be buried, subject to the requirements of
RCW 68.50.110 and 68.50.230.

--- END ---