BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not assume, under this chapter, the
jurisdiction of all or part of a water-sewer district serving a
population greater than one thousand residents and containing, within
its boundaries, the territory of two or more cities or towns, or one
city or town and unincorporated territory, unless voters of the entire
water-sewer district approve a ballot proposition authorizing the
assumption under general election law. The cost of the election shall
be borne by the city or town seeking approval to assume jurisdiction of
a water-sewer district.
(2) A city or town may assume jurisdiction over a water-sewer
district located within its boundaries without seeking approval of the
voters, as required under subsection (1) of this section, if the board
of commissioners of the water-sewer district consent to the assumption
of jurisdiction by the city or town. The feasibility study required
under subsection (3) of this section is not required if the board of
commissioners of the water-sewer district consents to the assumption of
jurisdiction by the city or town.
(3) Following the passage of a resolution by a city or town to
assume all or part of a special purpose water-sewer district under this
chapter, a feasibility study of such assumption shall be conducted,
unless the board of commissioners of the water-sewer district consents
to the assumption of jurisdiction by the city or town as provided under
subsection (2) of this section. The study shall be jointly and equally
funded by the city or town and the district through a mutually agreed
contract with a qualified independent consultant with professional
expertise involving public water and sewer systems. The study shall
address the impact of the proposed assumption on both the city or town
and district. Issues to be considered shall be mutually agreed to by
the city or town and the district and shall include, but not be limited
to, engineering and operational impacts, costs of the assumption to the
city or town and the district including potential impacts on future
water-sewer rates, bond ratings and future borrowing costs, status of
existing water rights, and other issues jointly agreed to. The
findings of the joint study shall be presented as a public record that
is available to the registered voters of the district, both within and
without the boundary of the city or town conducting the assumption,
prior to a vote on the proposed assumption by all the voters in the
district. The study shall be completed within six months of the
passage of the resolution to assume the district. No vote shall take
place until such study has been completed and the results have been
made available to the registered voters of the district.
(4) This section is applicable to assumptions of jurisdiction of
water-sewer districts by cities or towns that have been initiated prior
to the effective date of this section and that are pending as of that
date, as well as those assumptions of jurisdiction that are initiated
on or after the effective date of this section.
(5) Once the voters in a water-sewer district have approved or
disapproved an assumption through the ballot proposition process
required under subsection (1) of this section, a boundary review board
does not have jurisdiction, under chapter 36.93 RCW, to conduct a
review of such assumption where the attempted or completed assumption
involves not more than one city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Nothing in this act may be construed to
preempt or modify any existing interlocal agreement, franchise, or
contract between a city or town and a water-sewer district in effect on
the effective date of this section.

--- END ---