BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.290 and 2010 c 211 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All requests for review to the growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication ((by the legislative bodies of the county or city))
as provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the ((local government)) department of ecology shall
publish a notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto
has been approved or disapproved ((by the department of ecology)). For
purposes of this section, the date of publication for the adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program is the date the ((local
government)) department of ecology publishes notice that the shoreline
master program or amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved
((by the department of ecology)).
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.090 and 2003 c 321 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A master program, segment of a master program, or an amendment
to a master program shall become effective when approved by the
department as provided in subsection (7) of this section. Within the
time period provided in RCW 90.58.080, each local government shall have
submitted a master program, either totally or by segments, for all
shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction to the department for
review and approval.
(2) Upon receipt of a proposed master program or amendment, the
department shall:
(a) Provide notice to and opportunity for written comment by all
interested parties of record as a part of the local government review
process for the proposal and to all persons, groups, and agencies that
have requested in writing notice of proposed master programs or
amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or issue.
The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the department
determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;
(b) In the department's discretion, conduct a public hearing during
the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction proposing the master
program or amendment;
(c) Within fifteen days after the close of public comment, request
the local government to review the issues identified by the public,
interested parties, groups, and agencies and provide a written response
as to how the proposal addresses the identified issues;
(d) Within thirty days after receipt of the local government
response pursuant to (c) of this subsection, make written findings and
conclusions regarding the consistency of the proposal with the policy
of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, provide a response to
the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and either approve the
proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the
proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be
consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines. The written findings and conclusions shall be provided to
the local government, and made available to all interested persons,
parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposal;
(e) If the department recommends changes to the proposed master
program or amendment, within thirty days after the department mails the
written findings and conclusions to the local government, the local
government may:
(i) Agree to the proposed changes((. The receipt by the department
of the written notice of agreement constitutes final action by the
department approving the amendment)) by written notice to the
department; or
(ii) Submit an alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the
department, the alternative is consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes originally submitted by the department and with this
chapter it shall approve the changes and provide ((written)) notice to
all recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If the
department determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose
and intent of the changes proposed by the department, the department
may resubmit the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this
section or reject the proposal.
(3) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to shorelines unless it determines that the submitted segments
are not consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(4) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to critical areas as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5) provided the
master program segment is consistent with RCW 90.58.020 and applicable
shoreline guidelines, and if the segment provides a level of protection
of critical areas at least equal to that provided by the local
government's critical areas ordinances adopted and thereafter amended
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(2).
(5) The department shall approve those segments of the master
program relating to shorelines of statewide significance only after
determining the program provides the optimum implementation of the
policy of this chapter to satisfy the statewide interest. If the
department does not approve a segment of a local government master
program relating to a shoreline of statewide significance, the
department may develop and by rule adopt an alternative to the local
government's proposal.
(6) In the event a local government has not complied with the
requirements of RCW 90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice to
the department elect to adopt a master program for the shorelines
within its jurisdiction, in which event it shall comply with the
provisions established by this chapter for the adoption of a master
program for such shorelines.
Upon approval of such master program by the department it shall
supersede such master program as may have been adopted by the
department for such shorelines.
(7) A master program or amendment to a master program takes effect
when and in such form as approved or adopted by the department. The
effective date is fourteen days from the date of the department's
written notice of final action to the local government stating the
department has approved or rejected the proposal. For master programs
adopted by rule, the effective date is governed by RCW 34.05.380. The
department's written notice to the local government must conspicuously
and plainly state that it is the department's final decision and that
there will be no further modifications to the proposal.
(a) Shoreline master programs that were adopted by the department
prior to July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions of this
section then in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in
accordance with the provisions of this section that became effective on
that date.
(b) The department shall maintain a record of each master program,
the action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the
master program, and any appeal of the department's action. The
department's approved document of record constitutes the official
master program.
(8) Promptly after approval or disapproval of a local government's
shoreline master program or amendment, the department shall publish a
notice consistent with RCW 36.70A.290 that the shoreline master program
or amendment has been approved or disapproved. This notice must be
filed for all shoreline master programs or amendments, including local
governments not planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.140 and 2010 c 210 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date ((of receipt)) the permit decision was filed as
provided in subsection (6) of this section; or until all review
proceedings are terminated if the proceedings were initiated within
twenty-one days from the date of ((receipt)) filing as defined in
subsection (6) of this section except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b) Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after
the date of the appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is
granted by the local government and (i) the granting of the permit is
appealed to the shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the
date of ((receipt)) filing, (ii) the hearings board approves the
granting of the permit by the local government or approves a portion of
the substantial development for which the local government issued the
permit, and (iii) an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board
decision is filed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may
request, within ten days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a
hearing before the court to determine whether construction pursuant to
the permit approved by the hearings board or to a revised permit issued
pursuant to the order of the hearings board should not commence. If,
at the conclusion of the hearing, the court finds that construction
pursuant to such a permit would involve a significant, irreversible
damaging of the environment, the court shall prohibit the permittee
from commencing the construction pursuant to the approved or revised
permit until all review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant
to a permit revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin
only on that portion of the substantial development for which the local
government had originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant
to such a revised permit on other portions of the substantial
development may not begin until after all review proceedings are
terminated. In such a hearing before the court, the burden of proving
whether the construction may involve significant irreversible damage to
the environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or
would not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(c) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date ((of receipt)) the permit decision was filed as provided
in subsection (6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to ((subsections)) (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the
permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts
order the removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration
of any portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of
any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a
permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government
that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or
intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
((transmitted to)) filed with the department and the attorney general.
This shall be accomplished by return receipt requested mail. A
petition for review of such a decision must be commenced within twenty-one days from the date of ((receipt)) filing of the decision.
(a) With regard to a permit other than a permit governed by
subsection (10) of this section, "date of ((receipt" as used herein
refers to the date that the applicant receives written notice from the
department that the department has received the decision. With regard
to a permit for a variance or a conditional use, "date of receipt"
means the date a local government or applicant receives the written
decision of the department rendered on the permit pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection,
the term "date of receipt" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.21B.001)) filing" as used in this section refers to the date of
actual receipt by the department of the local government's decision.
(b) With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional use
governed by subsection (10) of this section, "date of filing" means the
date the decision of the department is transmitted by the department to
the local government.
(c) When a local government simultaneously transmits to the
department its decision on a shoreline substantial development with its
approval of either a shoreline conditional use permit or variance, or
both, "date of filing" has the same meaning as defined in (b) of this
subsection.
(d) The department shall notify the local government and the
applicant on the date of filing by telephone or electronic means,
followed by written communication as necessary, to ensure that the
applicant has received the full written decision.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use issued with
approval by a local government under their approved master program((s))
must be submitted to the department for its approval or disapproval.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.180 and 2010 c 210 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of
a permit on shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may((,
except as otherwise provided in chapter 43.21L RCW,)) seek review from
the shorelines hearings board by filing a petition for review within
twenty-one days of the date of ((receipt)) filing of the decision as
((provided for)) defined in RCW 90.58.140(6).
Within seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the
board as provided in this section pertaining to a final decision of a
local government, the petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on
the department, the office of the attorney general, and the local
government. The department and the attorney general may intervene to
protect the public interest and ensure that the provisions of this
chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen days from the date
of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of a copy of
the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. The shorelines
hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or
the attorney general to intervene has or has not expired.
(2) The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any
final decision granting a permit, or granting or denying an application
for a permit issued by a local government by filing a written petition
with the shorelines hearings board and the appropriate local government
within twenty-one days from the date ((of receipt)) the final decision
was filed as provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).
(3) The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
pertaining to procedures in adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review
of such proceedings of the shorelines hearings board is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall issue its decision on the appeal
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one
hundred eighty days after the date the petition is filed with the board
or a petition to intervene is filed by the department or the attorney
general, whichever is later. The time period may be extended by the
board for a period of thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may
be waived by the parties.
(4) Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines
adopted or approved by the department within thirty days of the date of
the adoption or approval. The board shall make a final decision within
sixty days following the hearing held thereon.
(5) The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be
valid and enter a final decision to that effect unless it determines
that the rule, regulation, or guideline:
(a) Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or
(b) Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions; or
(c) Is arbitrary and capricious; or
(d) Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all
material submitted to the department during public review and comment;
or
(e) Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.
(6) If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a)
through (e) of this section, it shall enter a final decision declaring
the rule, regulation, or guideline invalid, remanding the rule,
regulation, or guideline to the department with a statement of the
reasons in support of the determination, and directing the department
to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the affected local
government and any other interested party, a new rule, regulation, or
guideline consistent with the board's decision.
(7) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation,
or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court, if
authorized pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the
decision of the shorelines hearings board on a rule, regulation, or
guideline shall be filed within thirty days after the date of final
decision by the shorelines hearings board.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.58.190 and 2010 c 211 s 14 and 2010 c 210 s 38 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The appeal of the department's decision to adopt a master
program or amendment pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(5) is
governed by RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(2)(a) The department's final decision to approve or reject a
proposed master program or master program amendment by a local
government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
growth management hearings board by filing a petition ((within sixty
days from the date of the department's written notice to the local
government of the department's final decision to approve or reject a
proposed master program or master program amendment,)) as provided in
RCW 36.70A.290. ((The department's written notice must conspicuously
and plainly state that it is the department's final decision and that
there will be no further modifications under RCW 90.58.090(2).))
(b) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
shorelines, the growth management hearings board shall review the
proposed master program or amendment solely for compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the
applicable guidelines, the internal consistency provisions of RCW
36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), 35.63.125, and 35A.63.105, and chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs and
amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.
(c) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
a shoreline of statewide significance, the board shall uphold the
decision by the department unless the board, by clear and convincing
evidence, determines that the decision of the department is
inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(d) The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the
growth management hearings board under this subsection.
(e) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the growth
management hearings board under this subsection may appeal the decision
to superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.300.
(3)(a) The department's final decision to approve or reject a
proposed master program or master program amendment by a local
government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
shorelines hearings board by filing a petition within thirty days of
the date ((of the department's written notice to the local government
of the department's final decision to approve or reject a proposed
master program or master program amendment. The department's written
notice must conspicuously and plainly state that it is the department's
final decision and that there will be no further modifications under
RCW 90.58.090(2))) that the department publishes notice of its final
decision under RCW 90.58.090(8).
(b) In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings
board shall review the proposed master program or master program
amendment and, after full consideration of the presentations of the
local government and the department, shall determine the validity of
the local government's master program or amendment in light of the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(c) In an appeal relating to shorelines of statewide significance,
the shorelines hearings board shall uphold the decision by the
department unless the board determines, by clear and convincing
evidence that the decision of the department is inconsistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(d) Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act. The aggrieved local government shall have the burden of
proof in all such reviews.
(e) Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board
shall be heard within the county where the land subject to the proposed
master program or master program amendment is primarily located. The
department and any local government aggrieved by a final decision of
the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A master program amendment shall become effective after the
approval of the department or after the decision of the shorelines
hearings board to uphold the master program or master program
amendment, provided that the board may remand the master program or
master program adjustment to the local government or the department for
modification prior to the final adoption of the master program or
master program amendment.

--- END ---