BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.105.005 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds the sheltered waters of Puget Sound
(waters east of the Sekiu river) have historically provided the
citizens of the state with the safest and most convenient access to
productive marine recreational fishing.
(2) The legislature ((finds that recreational fishing opportunities
for salmon and marine bottomfish have been dwindling in recent years.
It is important to restore diminished recreational fisheries and to
enhance the salmon and marine bottomfish resource to assure sustained
productivity)) further recognizes the economic value in restoring and
rebuilding the recreational fishing opportunities in Puget Sound for
salmon and marine bottomfish, and that these opportunities have
declined in the past two decades. Investments made in recreational
fishing programs will repay the people of the state many times over in
increased economic activity and in an improved quality of life.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to improve recreational
fishing opportunities in Puget Sound and Lake Washington from current
levels and increase the economic benefits from the fishery,
particularly recognizing the unique recreational experience provided by
the winter salmon fishery. In addition, the legislature has determined
that the number of angler trips expended in these waters is the measure
of fishing opportunity.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.105.020 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 84 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Consistent with available revenue, commission policies, tribal
comanager agreements, and limitations of the endangered species act,
the department, in consultation with the oversight committee created in
RCW 77.105.160, shall adaptively manage the Puget Sound recreational
salmon and marine fish enhancement program to maximize the benefits to
the Puget Sound recreational fishery.
(2) The department has the following duties:
(a) The department shall((: Develop a short-term)) utilize a
program of hatchery-based salmon enhancement ((using freshwater pond
sites for the final rearing phase;)) and solicit support from
cooperative projects, regional enhancement groups, and other supporting
organizations((;)) to improve recreational salmon fishing in Puget
Sound.
(b) The department may conduct comprehensive research on resident
and migratory salmon production opportunities((; and conduct research))
on marine bottomfish production limitations, and on methods for
artificial propagation of depleted marine bottomfish.
((Long-term responsibilities of the department are to: Fully
implement enhancement efforts for Puget Sound and Hood Canal resident
salmon and marine bottomfish; identify opportunities to reestablish
salmon runs into areas where they no longer exist; encourage naturally
spawning salmon populations to develop to their fullest extent; and
fully utilize hatchery programs to improve recreational fishing.))
(c) The program must facilitate continued and improved recreational
fishing opportunities in Puget Sound and Lake Washington as measured by
increased angler trips of participation. The coordinator, as
identified in RCW 77.105.010, shall assist the oversight committee with
development of recommendations for outcome-based goals and objectives
to assess the effectiveness of the program.
(d) The director shall meet with the oversight committee each year
to review and approve these goals and objectives.
(e) The director and oversight committee shall report annually to
the commission on the goals of the program and the effectiveness of the
program in meeting those goals. Objectives include, but are not
limited to, an increase in salmon and bottomfish angler trips.
(f) The department and the oversight committee shall seek to reach
consensus regarding program activities and expenditures. The
department shall provide the oversight committee with a written
explanation when the department expends funds from the recreational
fisheries enhancement account that differs substantially from oversight
committee recommendations.
(g) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the department and oversight
committee shall make a joint report to the legislature on the
effectiveness of this program in biennial reports. Reports must
include the goals and objectives of the previous biennium and a
determination of whether the goals and objectives were met and an
explanation if the department did not meet these specific objectives.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.105.030 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 85 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((shall)) may seek recommendations from persons who
are expert on the planning and operation of programs for enhancement of
recreational fisheries. The department ((shall fully)) may use the
expertise of the University of Washington ((college of fisheries))
school of aquatic and fishery sciences and the sea grant program to
develop research and enhancement programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall utilize artificial rearing of salmon to
improve recreational salmon fishing in Puget Sound. In managing
salmon, the department shall seek to develop and implement methods that
will increase recreational angling opportunities. These methods may
include, but are not limited to, the following tools:
(1) Utilization of salmon artificial rearing techniques that
contribute to the recreational fisheries in Puget Sound, especially
winter salmon fishing.
(2) Optimum use of hatchery salmon through expanded recreational
mark-selective fisheries.
(3) Utilization of recreational salmon and marine fish enhancement
program funds for catch monitoring when required to increase
recreational mark-selective fisheries.
(4) Consideration of new catch and release recreational fisheries
utilizing gear and methods known to minimize hooking mortality.
(5) Providing public information regarding angling opportunities
and fishing methods.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.105.050 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 87 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((shall)) may conduct research, develop methods, and
implement programs for the artificial rearing and release of marine
bottomfish species. ((Lingcod, halibut, rockfish, and Pacific cod
shall be the species of primary emphasis due to their importance in the
recreational fishery.)) Marine bottomfish species of importance in the
recreational fishery are the primary emphasis. The department may use
artificial habitats to restore and mitigate for degraded rockfish
habitats and enhance recreational opportunities.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.105.160 and 2003 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement oversight
committee is created. The director shall appoint at least seven
members representing sport fishing ((organizations)) interests to the
committee from a list of applicants, ensuring broad representation from
the sport fishing community. Each member shall serve for a term of two
years, and may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms at the
discretion of the director. Members of the committee serve without
compensation.
(2) The Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement oversight
committee has the following duties:
(a) Advise the department on all aspects of the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(b) Develop recommendations, with assistance from the coordinator,
for outcome-based goals and objectives to assess the effectiveness of
the program;
(c) Meet with the director each year to review these goals and
objectives;
(d) Report annually with the director to the commission on the
goals of the program and the effectiveness of the program in meeting
those goals;
(e) Review and provide guidance on the annual budget for the
recreational fisheries enhancement account;
(((c))) (f) Select a chair of the committee. It is the chair's
duty to coordinate with the department on all issues related to the
Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(((d))) (g) Meet at least quarterly with the department's
coordinator as identified in RCW 77.105.010 of the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(((e))) (h) Review and comment on program documents and proposed
production of salmon and other species; ((and
(f))) (i) Address other issues related to the purposes of the Puget
Sound recreational fisheries enhancement program that are of interest
to recreational fishers in Puget Sound; and
(j) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, make a joint report with the
department to the legislature each biennium on the status of the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.105.040 (Delayed-release chinook salmon -- Freshwater
rearing) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 86;
(2) RCW 77.105.060 (Additional research) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 88;
(3) RCW 77.105.070 (Siting process for enhancement projects--Cooperation with other entities) and 1994 c 264 s 47 & 1993 sp.s. c 2
s 89;
(4) RCW 77.105.080 (Public awareness program) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s
90;
(5) RCW 77.105.090 (Management of predators) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s
91;
(6) RCW 77.105.100 (Plans to target hatchery-produced fish--Participation by fishing interests -- Feasibility of increased survival
and production of chinook and coho salmon) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 92;
(7) RCW 77.105.110 (Coordination of sport fishing program with wild
stock initiative) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 93;
(8) RCW 77.105.120 (Increased recreational access to salmon and
marine fish resources -- Plans) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 94; and
(9) RCW 77.105.130 (Recreational fishing projects -- Contracting with
entities) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 95.

--- END ---