BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
Washington state department of transportation shall provide for the
needs of drivers, public transportation vehicles and patrons,
bicyclists, and pedestrians of all ages and abilities in all planning,
programming, design, construction, reconstruction, retrofit,
operations, and maintenance activities and products.
It is also the intent of the legislature that the department shall
view all transportation improvements as opportunities to improve
safety, access, and mobility for all travelers in Washington and
recognize bicycle, pedestrian, and transit modes as integral elements
of the transportation system.
The increase in Washington's older adult population, which is up to
forty percent of total population in some counties, increases the need
for locally based transportation options and a statewide transportation
system less reliant on the automobile.
Washington is committed to providing community-based options for
individuals with disabilities who require access to a broader range of
transportation options.
Washington believes the full integration of all modes in the design
of streets and roadways will increase the capacity and efficiency of
the road network, reduce traffic congestion, improve mobility options,
and limit greenhouse gas emissions.
Washington believes regular walking and bicycling improves physical
health, increases mental well-being, and helps reduce the risk of
cardiovascular disease, Type 2 diabetes, some cancers, and other
chronic diseases. Increased physical activity is also critical to
combating the obesity crisis in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.75.060 and 1982 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any city or town may use any funds available for street or road
construction, maintenance, or improvement for building, improving, and
maintaining bicycle paths, lanes, roadways, and routes, and for
improvements to make existing streets and roads more suitable and safe
for bicycle traffic: PROVIDED, That any such paths, lanes, roadways,
routes, or streets for which any such street or road funds are expended
shall be suitable for bicycle transportation purposes and not solely
for recreation purposes. Bicycle facilities constructed or modified
after ((June 10, 1982)) July 1, 2011, shall meet or exceed the
standards ((of the state department of transportation)) adopted by the
design standards committee under RCW 35.78.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.78 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town may use any funds available for street or road
construction, maintenance, or improvement for building, improving, and
maintaining a pedestrian right-of-way and for improvements to make
existing streets and roads more suitable and safe for pedestrian
travel. Any such paths, lanes, roadways, routes, or streets for which
any such street or road funds are expended must be suitable for
pedestrian travel purposes and not solely for recreation purposes. A
pedestrian right-of-way constructed or modified after July 1, 2011,
must meet or exceed the standards adopted by the design standards
committee under RCW 35.78.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.78.030 and 1965 c 7 s 35.78.030 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The design standards committee shall from time to time adopt
uniform design standards for major arterial and secondary arterial
streets.
(2) By December 31, 2011, and from time to time thereafter, the
design standards committee shall adopt standards for bicycle and
pedestrian facilities.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.82.145 and 1982 c 55 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any funds deposited in the county road fund may be used for the
construction, maintenance, or improvement of bicycle paths, lanes,
routes, and roadways, and for improvements to make existing streets and
roads more suitable and safe for bicycle traffic. Bicycle facilities
constructed or modified after ((June 10, 1982)) July 1, 2011, shall
meet or exceed the standards ((of the state department of
transportation)) adopted by the design standards committee under RCW
43.32.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.32.020 and 1965 c 8 s 43.32.020 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On or before January 1, 1950, and from time to time thereafter,
the design standards committee shall adopt uniform design standards for
the county primary road systems.
(2) By December 31, 2011, and from time to time thereafter, the
design standards committee shall adopt standards for bicycle and
pedestrian facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When constructing, reconstructing, or making major improvements to
streets described in RCW 47.24.010, the department must, for street
projects initially planned or scoped after July 1, 2011:
(1) Consult with local jurisdictions in the scoping, design, and
planning phases for the purpose of clarifying community goals as
developed in the comprehensive planning process. Consultation must
seek opportunities to coordinate and integrate planned community
improvements and road construction through partnerships with local
jurisdictions; and
(2) Consider the needs of all users by applying design solutions
consistent with peer-reviewed, context sensitive solutions guides,
reports, and publications, including the "Context Sensitive Solutions
in Designing Major Urban Thoroughfares for Walkable Communities" from
the institute of transportation engineers, or the American association
of state highway and transportation officials geometric design of
highways and streets, as each exists on the effective date of this
section or a subsequent date as may be provided by the department by
rule, consistent with the purposes of this section. For the purposes
of this subsection, "all users" means bicyclists, pedestrians, transit
users, and motorists of all ages and abilities, including children,
youth, families, older adults, seniors, individuals with disabilities,
and movers of commercial goods.

--- END ---