BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state loses
over one hundred million dollars a year in taxes due to underground
economy construction activity, causing great inequity to law-abiding
businesses and taxpayers. The legislature further finds that an
employer in construction is required to pay industrial insurance and
unemployment taxes for a worker unless a seven-part independent
contractor test is met, which test includes that the worker is free
from direction and control and has his or her own books and records.
The legislature finds that some contractors avoid taxes by engaging
multiple contractors to work on the same task and treating the
contractors as exempt independent contractors rather than hiring and
paying taxes on these persons as covered workers. The legislature
finds, however, that if multiple contractors are working on the same
task on a job site, the contractors must be working under direction and
control such that they are not exempt independent contractors but are,
in fact, covered workers.
The legislature finds that the seven-part test is and should
continue to be applied in investigations of underground economy
activity in the construction industry. However, the legislature also
finds that prohibiting up front certain contracting which by its nature
creates a situation in which taxes due are not paid will provide
clarity to contractors and provide an additional cost-effective means
to reduce the underground economy. By enacting section 2 of this act,
the legislature intends to define the prohibited contracting narrowly
to assure no legitimate contracting is prohibited. The legislature
intends that nothing in section 2 of this act prohibits a contractor
from engaging more than two independent contractors who have no covered
workers to work on the same task so long as those contractors are
treated as covered workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a violation under this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to engage more than two independent contractors to work on
or in a single building who:
(a) Are working on the same task involving a similar material;
(b) Bring no workers to work on or in the building subject to the
mandatory coverage of Title 51 RCW; and
(c) Are not being treated by the contractor as covered workers
under Title 51 RCW.
(2) No more than two independent contractors, as covered by
subsection (1) of this section, may be under contract at the same time.
It is not a violation of this act, if more than two independent
contractors work on or in a single building if proof is provided, both
in written contract and in fact, that any independent contractors
beyond the first two are not working as independent contractors during
the same time period.
(3) The exemptions provided by subsection (2) of this section are
broad and in no way exempt independent contractors from industrial
insurance coverage under Title 51 RCW. Each and every independent
contractor must separately pass the tests provided in RCW 51.08.180 or
51.08.181 to be exempt from coverage under Title 51 RCW.
(4)(a) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under
this section shall be assessed a fine of:
(i) Five hundred dollars for a first offense. However, the
director shall waive the fine if the contractor registers for a
department-approved training class within ten days of receiving a
notice of infraction, completes the class within one hundred twenty
days of receiving the notice of infraction, and pays the class fees
upon class registration;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars for a second offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars for a third or subsequent offense.
(b) For a third or subsequent offense under this section, the
director shall also suspend the contractor's certificate of
registration for one year.
(c) In addition to any other penalty, the director shall suspend
the registration of the contractor until payment of penalties assessed
under this section that have become final are paid in full.
(5) For purposes of this section, "task" means a single risk
classification as defined in rule under Title 51 RCW.
(6) Classes offered under subsection (4) of this section may be
conducted or approved by the department. Registrants must pay a fee to
cover the cost of administering the class.
(7) This section does not apply to work performed on residential
wood frame construction up to four stories in height.

Sec. 3 2009 c 432 s 13 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
The department of labor and industries, the employment security
department, and the department of revenue shall coordinate and report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of
each year on the effectiveness of efforts implemented since July 1,
2008, to address the underground economy. Beginning on December 1,
2012, the report shall include the effectiveness of section 2 of this
act. The agencies shall use benchmarks and measures established by the
institute for public policy and other measures it determines
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act is codified as a new
section in chapter 18.27 RCW.

--- END ---