BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.010 and 2010 c 13 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Group disability insurance is that form of disability
insurance, including stop loss insurance as defined in RCW 48.11.030,
provided by a master policy issued to an employer, to a trustee
appointed by an employer or employers, or to an association of
employers formed for purposes other than obtaining such insurance,
covering, with or without their dependents, the employees, or specified
categories of the employees, of such employers or their subsidiaries or
affiliates, or issued to a labor union, or to an association of
employees formed for purposes other than obtaining such insurance,
covering, with or without their dependents, the members, or specified
categories of the members, of the labor union or association, or issued
pursuant to RCW 48.21.030. Group disability insurance includes the
following groups that qualify for group life insurance:
RCW 48.24.020, 48.24.035, 48.24.040, 48.24.045, 48.24.050,
48.24.060, 48.24.070, 48.24.080, 48.24.090, and 48.24.095. A group
under RCW 48.24.027 does not qualify as a group for the purposes of
this chapter.
(2) Group disability insurance for lines of coverage identified in
RCW 48.43.005(19)(e), (h), and (k) offered to a resident of this state
under a group disability insurance policy may be issued to a group
other than the groups described in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the requirements in this subsection.
(a) A group disability insurance policy offered under this
subsection may not be delivered in this state unless the commissioner
finds that:
(i) The issuance of the group policy is not contrary to the best
interest of the public;
(ii) The issuance of the group policy would result in economies of
acquisition or administration; and
(iii) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premium
charged.
(b) A group disability insurance coverage may not be offered under
this subsection in this state by an insurer under a policy issued in
another state unless the commissioner or the insurance commissioner of
another state having requirements substantially similar to those
contained in this subsection has made a determination that the
requirements have been met.

--- END ---