BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are areas
of the state that are not being served with telecommunications or
broadband services. The legislature further finds that many public
utility districts in the state maintain telecommunications facilities
in these underserved or unserved areas but are restricted from
providing telecommunications services directly to retail, end-use
customers. In an effort to reach those areas of the state that are
unserved or underserved, it is the intent of the legislature to grant
public utility districts the authority to provide retail
telecommunications services, including broadband, with the expectation
that these services will be subject to the same telecommunications
taxes, fees, and surcharges that are applicable to other
telecommunications providers in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.16.005 and 2000 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(2) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as that contained in
RCW 80.04.010.
(3) "Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts,
poles, wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters, instruments,
machines, appliances, instrumentalities and all devices, real estate,
easements, apparatus, property, and routes used, operated, owned, or
controlled by any entity to facilitate the provision of
telecommunications services.
(4) "Wholesale telecommunications services" means the provision of
telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an entity
authorized to provide telecommunications services to the general public
and internet service providers.
(5) "Public agency" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.34.020.
(6) "Retail telecommunications services" means the sale or lease of
telecommunications services or facilities directly to public agencies,
individuals, nonprofit organizations, libraries, schools, institutions
of higher education, or other public or private entities.

Sec. 3 RCW 54.16.330 and 2004 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public utility district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
((without)) outside of the district's limits for the following
purposes:
(a) For the district's internal telecommunications needs; ((and))
(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
within or adjacent to the district and by contract with another public
utility district; and
(c) For the provision of retail telecommunications services within
or adjacent to the district.
((Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize public
utility districts to provide telecommunications services to end
users.))
(2) A public utility district providing wholesale or retail
telecommunications services shall ensure that rates, terms, and
conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale or retail
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) A public utility district providing wholesale or retail
telecommunications services shall not be required to but may establish
a separate utility system or function for such purpose. In either
case, a public utility district providing wholesale or retail
telecommunications services shall separately account for any revenues
and expenditures for those services according to standards established
by the state auditor pursuant to its authority in chapter 43.09 RCW and
consistent with the provisions of this title. Any revenues received
from the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services
must be dedicated to costs incurred to build and maintain any
telecommunications facilities constructed, installed, or acquired to
provide such services, including payments on debt issued to finance
such services, until such time as any bonds or other financing
instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance such
telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.
(4) When a public utility district provides wholesale or retail
telecommunications services, all telecommunications services rendered
to the district for the district's internal telecommunications needs
shall be allocated or charged at its true and full value. A public
utility district may not charge its nontelecommunications operations
rates that are preferential or discriminatory compared to those it
charges entities purchasing wholesale or retail telecommunications
services.
(5) If a person or entity receiving retail telecommunications
services from a public utility district under this chapter has a
complaint regarding the reasonableness of the rates, terms, conditions,
or service provided, the person or entity may file a complaint with the
public utility district.
(6) A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(((6))) (7) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public
utility district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under
this title and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers
authorized under this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000
limits any existing authority of a public utility district under this
title.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.08.005 and 2000 c 81 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(2) "Rural port district" means a port district formed under
chapter 53.04 RCW and located in a county with an average population
density of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile.
(3) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as contained in RCW
80.04.010.
(4) "Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts,
poles, wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters, instruments,
machines, appliances, instrumentalities and all devices, real estate,
easements, apparatus, property, and routes used, operated, owned, or
controlled by any entity to facilitate the provision of
telecommunications services.
(5) "Wholesale telecommunications services" means the provision of
telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an entity
authorized to provide telecommunications services to the general public
and internet service providers.
(6) "Public agency" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.34.020.
(7) "Retail telecommunications services" means the sale of
telecommunications services or facilities directly to public agencies,
individuals, nonprofit organizations, libraries, schools, institutions
of higher education, or other public or private entities.

Sec. 5 RCW 53.08.370 and 2000 c 81 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A rural port district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
((without)) outside of the district's limits for the following
purposes:
(a) For the district's own use; and
(b) For the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications
services within or adjacent to the district's limits. ((Nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to authorize rural port districts to
provide telecommunications services to end users.))
(2) A rural port district providing wholesale or retail
telecommunications services under this section shall ensure that rates,
terms, and conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a rural port district offering such
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale or retail
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) When a rural port district establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications
services, it shall account for any and all revenues and expenditures
related to its wholesale or retail telecommunications facilities and
services separately from revenues and expenditures related to its
internal telecommunications operations. Any revenues received from the
provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services must be
dedicated to the utility function that includes the provision of
wholesale or retail telecommunications services for costs incurred to
build and maintain the telecommunications facilities until such time as
any bonds or other financing instruments executed after June 8, 2000,
and used to finance the telecommunications facilities are discharged or
retired.
(4) When a rural port district establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications
services, all telecommunications services rendered by the separate
function to the district for the district's internal telecommunications
needs shall be charged at its true and full value. A rural port
district may not charge its nontelecommunications operations rates that
are preferential or discriminatory compared to those it charges
entities purchasing wholesale or retail telecommunications services.
(5) If a person or entity receiving retail telecommunications
services from a rural port district under this chapter has a complaint
regarding the reasonableness of the rates, terms, conditions, or
service provided, the person or entity may file a complaint with the
rural port district.
(6) A rural port district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(((6))) (7) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a rural port
district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title
and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under
this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing
authority of a rural port district under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town may construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance,
lease, license, provide, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve,
repair, operate, and maintain telecommunications services or facilities
for the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants with
telecommunications services. The city or town has full authority to
regulate and control the use, distribution, and price of the service.

Sec. 7 RCW 35A.80.010 and 1988 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A code city may provide utility service within and without its
limits and exercise all powers to the extent authorized by general law
for any class of city or town. The cost of such improvements may be
financed by procedures provided for financing local improvement
districts in chapters 35.43 through 35.54 RCW and by revenue and
refunding bonds as authorized by chapters 35.41, 35.67 and 35.89 RCW
and Title 85 RCW. A code city may protect and operate utility services
as authorized by chapters 35.88, 35.91, 35.92, and 35.94 RCW and may
acquire and damage property in connection therewith as provided by
chapter 8.12 RCW and shall be governed by the regulations of the
department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.48.110.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "utility service" may include
water, sewer, solid waste, electricity, or telecommunications services.

--- END ---