BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
As funds are available, upon implementation of a biometric matching
system program to verify the identity of applicants for, and holders
of, drivers' licenses and identicards, the department of licensing
shall make the biometric matching system program available to official
governmental enforcement agencies to assist in the investigation by the
agencies of suspected criminal activity or for the purposes of
verifying identity when a law enforcement officer is authorized by law
to request identification from an individual.

--- END ---