BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
well known as the espresso capital of the country. The coffee industry
is a vital part of the Washington state economy that provides jobs and
morning motivation for many state citizens. Over half of the states in
the country have established a state beverage. The official
designation is a desirable promotional tool that Washington businesses
can use when sharing their product with customers throughout the world.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Coffee is designated as the official beverage of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
official Washington state beverage act.

--- END ---