BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) The market price of gold has increased significantly in recent
years and there has been a proliferation of secondhand dealers,
including temporary, transient secondhand businesses, engaging in "cash
for gold" type precious metal transactions. Frequently, these "cash
for gold" type operations are operated by persons desiring to exploit
unsuspecting consumers based on current market conditions;
(2) The increasing number of "cash for gold" type transactions in
communities and neighborhoods throughout Washington has been linked to
increased crimes involving the theft of gold and other precious metal
objects, including home burglaries, robberies, and other crimes,
resulting in depressed home values and other threats to the health,
safety, and welfare of Washington state residents; and
(3) With the growing number of precious metal transactions, there
is a corresponding significant increase in the number of "cash for
gold" type storefront businesses, including temporary, transient
secondhand businesses, in Washington state which may not be consistent
with the quality of life and personal security sought by communities
and neighborhoods and the state as a whole.
Therefore, to better protect legitimate owners, consumers, and
secondhand dealers, the legislature intends to establish and implement
stricter standards relating to transactions involving property
consisting of gold and other precious metals.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.60.010 and 1995 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Melted metals" means metals derived from metal junk or
precious metals that have been reduced to a melted state from other
than ore or ingots which are produced from ore that has not previously
been processed.
(2) "Metal junk" means any metal that has previously been milled,
shaped, stamped, or forged and that is no longer useful in its original
form, except precious metals.
(3) "Nonmetal junk" means any nonmetal, commonly discarded item
that is worn out, or has outlasted its usefulness as intended in its
original form except nonmetal junk does not include an item made in a
former period which has enhanced value because of its age.
(4) "Pawnbroker" means every person engaged, in whole or in part,
in the business of loaning money on the security of pledges of personal
property, or deposits or conditional sales of personal property, or the
purchase or sale of personal property.
(5) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.
(6) "Secondhand dealer" means every person engaged in whole or in
part in the business of purchasing, selling, trading, consignment
selling, or otherwise transferring for value, secondhand property
including metal junk, melted metals, precious metals, whether or not
the person maintains a fixed place of business within the state.
Secondhand dealer also includes persons or entities conducting
business, more than three times per year, at flea markets or swap
meets((, more than three times per year)).
(7) "Secondhand precious metal dealer" means any person or entity
engaged in whole or in part in the commercial activity or business of
purchasing, selling, trading, consignment selling, or otherwise
transferring for value, more than three times per year, secondhand
property that is a precious metal, whether or not the person or entity
maintains a permanent or fixed place of business within the state, or
engages in the business at flea markets or swap meets. Secondhand
property, for purposes of transactions by a secondhand precious metal
dealer, does not include: (a) Gold, silver, and platinum coins or
other precious metal coins that are legal tender or precious metal
coins that have numismatic or precious metal value or (b) gold, silver,
platinum, or other precious metal bullions.
(8) "Secondhand property" means any item of personal property
offered for sale which is not new, including metals in any form, except
postage stamps, coins that are legal tender, bullion in the form of
fabricated hallmarked bars, used books, and clothing of a resale value
of seventy-five dollars or less, except furs.
(((8))) (9) "Transaction" means a pledge, or the purchase of, or
consignment of, or the trade of any item of personal property by a
pawnbroker or a secondhand dealer from a member of the general public.
(((9))) (10) "Loan period" means the period of time from the date
the loan is made until the date the loan is paid off, the loan is in
default, or the loan is refinanced and new loan documents are issued,
including all grace or extension periods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For any transaction involving property
consisting of a precious metal bought or received from an individual,
every secondhand precious metal dealer doing business in this state
shall maintain wherever that business is conducted a record in which
shall be legibly written in the English language, at the time of each
transaction, the following information:
(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(b) The time and date of the transaction;
(c) The name of the person or employee or the identification number
of the person or employee conducting the transaction;
(d) The name, date of birth, sex, height, weight, race, and
residential address and telephone number of the person with whom the
transaction is made;
(e) A complete description of the precious metal property pledged,
bought, or consigned, including the brand name, serial number, model
number or name, any initials or engraving, size, pattern, and color of
stone or stones;
(f) The price paid;
(g) The type and identifying number of identification used by the
person with whom the transaction was made, which shall consist of a
valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state or
two pieces of identification issued by a governmental agency, one of
which shall be descriptive of the person identified, and a full copy of
both sides of each piece of identification used by the person with whom
the transaction was made. At all times, one piece of current
government issued picture identification will be required; and
(h) The nature of the transaction, a number identifying the
transaction, the store identification as designated by the applicable
law enforcement agency, or the name and address of the business or
location, including the street address, and room number if appropriate,
and the name of the person or employee conducting the transaction, and
the location of the property.
(2) The records required in subsection (1) of this section shall at
all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times
if ordinary hours of business are not kept, be open to the inspection
by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its
political subdivisions, and shall be maintained wherever that business
is conducted for three years following the date of the transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Property consisting of a precious metal
bought or received from an individual on consignment by any secondhand
precious metal dealer with a permanent place of business in the state
may not be removed from that place of business except consigned
property returned to the owner, for a total of thirty days after the
receipt of the property. Property shall at all times during the
ordinary hours of business be open to inspection to any commissioned
law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political
subdivisions.
(2) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received from
an individual on consignment by any secondhand precious metal dealer
without a permanent place of business in the state must be stored and
held within the city or county in which the property was received,
except consigned property returned to the owner, for a total of thirty
days after receipt of the property. The property shall be available
within the appropriate jurisdiction for inspection at reasonable times
by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its
political subdivisions.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply when the
property consisting of a precious metal was bought or received from a
pawn shop, jeweler, secondhand dealer, or secondhand precious metal
dealer who must provide a signed declaration showing the property is
not stolen. The declaration may be included as part of the
transactional record required under this subsection, or on a receipt
for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the
following: "I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the
property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my
knowledge stolen property."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If the applicable chief of police or the
county's chief law enforcement officer has compiled and published a
list of persons who have been convicted of any crime involving theft,
then a secondhand precious metal dealer shall utilize such a list for
any transaction involving property other than property consisting of a
precious metal as required by the applicable chief of police or the
county's chief law enforcement officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No secondhand precious metal dealer doing
business in this state may operate a business without first obtaining
a business license from the local government in which the business is
situated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) It is a gross misdemeanor for:
(a) A secondhand precious metal dealer to knowingly make, cause, or
allow to be made any false entry or misstatement of any material matter
in any book, record, or writing required to be kept under sections 3
through 6 and 9 of this act involving property consisting of precious
metal;
(b) A secondhand precious metal dealer to receive any precious
metal property from any person known to the secondhand precious metal
dealer as having been convicted of burglary, robbery, theft, or
possession of or receiving stolen property within the past ten years
whether the person is acting in his or her own behalf or as the agent
of another; or
(c) A secondhand precious metal dealer to knowingly violate any
other provision relating to precious metals under sections 3 through 6
and 9 of this act.
(2) It is a class C felony for a secondhand precious metal dealer
to commit a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this
section involving property consisting of a precious metal.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.60.085 and 2000 c 171 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to transactions
conducted by the following:
(1) Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(2) Vehicle wreckers ((or)), hulk haulers, and scrap processors
licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW;
(3) Persons giving an allowance for the trade-in or exchange of
secondhand property on the purchase of other merchandise of the same
kind of greater value; and
(4) Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and
beverage containers or metal or nonmetal junk, in compliance with
chapter 19.290 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) For purposes of this section, "hosted
home party" means a gathering of persons at a private residence where
a host or hostess has invited friends or other guests into his or her
residence where individual person-to-person sales of precious metals
occur.
(2) A host or hostess must be the owner, renter, or lessee of the
private residence where the hosted home party takes place.
(3) A secondhand precious metal dealer who attends a hosted home
party and purchases or sells precious metals from the invited guests
must issue a receipt for each item sold or purchased at the hosted home
party.
(4) The secondhand precious metal dealer must include on every
receipt the following: (a) The name, residential address, telephone
number, and driver's license number of the person hosting the home
party; (b) The name, residential address, telephone number, and
driver's license number of the person selling the item; (c) the name,
residential address, telephone number, and driver's license number of
the person purchasing the item; (d) a complete description of the item
being sold, including the brand name, serial number, model number or
name, any initials or engraving, size, pattern, and color of stone or
stones; (e) time and date of the transaction; and (f) the amount and
form of any consideration paid for the item.
(5) The secondhand precious metal dealer must make four copies of
each transaction receipt: One for the seller, one for the host or
hostess, one for the purchaser, and one for local authorities, if they
should ask. The secondhand precious metal dealer and the host shall
maintain copies of all transaction receipts and records for three years
following the date of the precious metal transaction.
(6) A secondhand precious metal dealer of a hosted home party who
purchases precious metals at a hosted home party and complies with this
section is otherwise exempt from sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 through 7 and 9 of this act are
each added to chapter 19.60 RCW.

--- END ---