BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.28.180 and 2005 c 504 s 501 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate mental health courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "mental health court" means
a court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and symptoms of mental illness among
nonviolent, ((mentally ill)) felony and nonfelony offenders with mental
illnesses and recidivism among nonviolent felony and nonfelony
offenders who have developmental disabilities as defined in RCW
71A.10.020 or who have suffered a traumatic brain injury by increasing
their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through early,
continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment including drug
treatment for persons with co-occurring disorders; mandatory periodic
reviews, including drug testing if indicated; and the use of
appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
mental health court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its mental health court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for mental health court programs with local cash or in-kind resources.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, and local funds for mental health court
operations and associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a mental health court pursuant to
this section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation
of offenders in the program. The mental health court may adopt local
requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum
requirements are:
(i) The offender would benefit from psychiatric treatment or
treatment related to his or her developmental disability or traumatic
brain injury;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
When a jail has determined that a person in custody has or may have
a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 or a traumatic
brain injury, upon transfer of the person to a department of
corrections facility or other jail facility, every reasonable effort
shall be made by the transferring jail staff to communicate to
receiving staff the nature of the disability, as determined by the jail
and any necessary accommodation for the person as identified by the
transferring jail staff.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.555 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 30 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and policies providing that
when persons with a mental disorder, a developmental disability as
defined in RCW 71A.10.020, or a traumatic brain injury, who were
enrolled in medical assistance immediately prior to confinement, are
released from confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be
fully reinstated on the day of their release, subject to any expedited
review of their continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage
that is required under federal or state law.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, and the regional support networks, shall establish
procedures for coordination between department field offices,
institutions for mental disease, and correctional institutions, as
defined in RCW 9.94.049, that result in prompt reinstatement of
eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are
likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from
confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services
applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of their
release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services identity
cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services immediately
upon their release from confinement; and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of
applications on behalf of confined persons.
(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution or institution for mental diseases shall provide the
department with that information for purposes of making medical
assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the
person's release from confinement. The department shall, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in making
its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible for
medical assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means
incarcerated in a correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049,
or admitted to an institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R.
part 435, Sec. 1009 on July 24, 2005.
(5) For purposes of this section, "likely to be eligible" means
that a person:
(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or the
disability lifeline program immediately before he or she was confined
and his or her enrollment was terminated during his or her confinement;
or
(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or the
disability lifeline program at any time during the five years before
his or her confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations during
the person's confinement indicate that the person continues to be
disabled and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months
following release.
(6) The economic services administration shall adopt standardized
statewide screening and application practices and forms designed to
facilitate the application of a confined person who is likely to be
eligible for medicaid.

--- END ---