BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Coal tar" means a material that contains coal tar identified
by chemical abstract number 8007-45-2.
(2) "Coal tar pavement product" means a material that contains coal
tar that is intended for use as a pavement sealant.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) After January 1, 2012, no person may
sell at wholesale or retail a coal tar pavement product that is labeled
as containing coal tar.
(2) After July 1, 2012, a person may not apply a coal tar pavement
product on a driveway or parking area.
(3) The department may issue a notice of corrective action to a
person in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
(4) A city or county may adopt an ordinance providing for
enforcement of the requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. A city or county adopting an ordinance has jurisdiction
concurrent with the department to enforce this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---