BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.010 and 2010 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.
(2) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(3) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting firefighters, a firefighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include
emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation
in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to
periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(5) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
firefighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(6) "Firefighter" includes any firefighter or emergency worker who
is a member of any fire department of any municipality ((but shall))
who responds to emergencies, has assigned tasks in the mitigation of
emergency incidents, has tasks at emergency incidents contained within
the incident command system, and participates in ongoing emergency
services training, but does not include firefighters who are eligible
for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(7) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, ((or)) any emergency medical service district or
other special district, or any regional fire protection service
authority formed under chapter 52.26 RCW, authorized by law to protect
life or property within its boundaries through a fire department,
emergency workers, or reserve officers.
(8) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or
any firefighter or emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of retirement
pension, any firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer who is
or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type under the
retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary may be
eligible to receive any such benefit.
(9) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his
or her duties as a firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer
such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations,
court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department;
being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated
officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of
business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of
fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or
any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(10) "Principal fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW
41.24.030.
(11) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits
available under this chapter that are made necessary from death,
sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty,
including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160,
41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement
pensions provided under this chapter.
(12) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for
participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(13) "Retired participant" means any participant who is at least
sixty-five years of age and has been retired by the board of trustees
under RCW 41.24.170 and has been in receipt of a monthly pension for no
less than three months.
(14) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the
performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(15) "State board" means the state board for volunteer firefighters
and reserve officers.

--- END ---