BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty
or countywide communications network, including an enhanced 911
emergency communications system, which provides rapid public access for
coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and
facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(2) "Enhanced 911 emergency communications system" means a public
communications system consisting of a network, database, and on-premises equipment that is accessed by dialing or accessing 911 and
that enables reporting police, fire, medical, or other emergency
situations to a public safety answering point. The system includes the
capability to selectively route incoming 911 voice or data to the
appropriate public safety answering point that operates in a defined
911 service area and the capability to automatically display the name,
address, and telephone number of incoming 911 voice or data at the
appropriate public safety answering point. "Enhanced 911 emergency
communications system" includes the modernization to next generation
911 systems.
(3) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service" has the
same meaning as provided by the federal communications commission in 47
C.F.R. Sec. 9.3 on January 1, 2009, or a subsequent date determined by
the department.
(4) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service line"
means an interconnected voice over internet protocol service that
offers an active telephone number or successor dialing protocol
assigned by a voice over internet protocol provider to a voice over
internet protocol service customer that has inbound and outbound
calling capability, which can directly access a public safety answering
point when such a voice over internet protocol service customer has a
place of primary use in the state.
(5) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.
(6) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the subscriber's use of the radio access line or
interconnected voice over internet protocol service line occurs, which
must be:
(a) The residential street address or primary business street
address of the subscriber; and
(b) In the case of radio access lines, within the licensed service
area of the home service provider.
(7) "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" has the same
meaning as provided for "prepaid wireless calling service" in RCW
82.04.065.
(8) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(((8))) (9) "Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned
to or used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service
available to the public for hire from a radio communications service
company. Radio access lines include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular telephone service,
personal communications services, and network radio access lines, or
their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not
include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as
wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.
(((9))) (10) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio
paging providers. It does include those persons or entities that
provide commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(((10))) (11) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of
telecommunications service, a competitive telephone service, or
interconnected voice over internet protocol service.
(((11))) (12) "Switched access line" means the telephone service
line which connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding seventy cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each switched access line.
Each county must provide notice of the tax to all local exchange
companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the
date on which the first payment is due. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. The tax must be
deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in
RCW 82.14B.063.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
seventy cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
must be uniform for each radio access line. The county must provide
notice of the tax to all radio communications service companies serving
in the county at least sixty days in advance of the date on which the
first payment is due. The tax imposed under this section must be
remitted to the department by radio communications service companies,
including those companies that resell radio access lines, on a tax
return provided by the department. The tax must be deposited in the
county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in RCW 82.14B.063.
(3)(a) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of interconnected voice over
internet protocol service lines in an amount not exceeding seventy
cents per month for each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must
be levied on no more than the number of voice over internet protocol
service lines on an account that are capable of simultaneous
unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network.
(b) The interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
must use the place of primary use of the subscriber to determine which
county's enhanced 911 excise tax applies to the service provided to the
subscriber.
(c) The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by interconnected voice over internet protocol service
companies on a tax return provided by the department.
(d) The tax must be deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax
account as provided in RCW 82.14B.063.
(e) To the extent that a local exchange carrier and an
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
contractually jointly provide a single service line, only one service
company is responsible for remitting the enhanced 911 excise taxes, and
nothing in this section precludes service companies who jointly provide
service from agreeing by contract which of them ((shall)) must remit
the taxes collected.
(4) Counties imposing a county enhanced 911 excise tax must provide
an annual update to the enhanced 911 coordinator detailing the
proportion of their county enhanced 911 excise tax that is being spent
on:
(a) Efforts to modernize their existing enhanced 911 communications
system; and
(b) Enhanced 911 operational costs.
(5) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-
five cents per month for each switched access line. The tax must be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created
in RCW 38.52.540.
(6) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in an
amount of twenty-five cents per month for each radio access line. The
tax must be uniform for each radio access line. The tax imposed under
this section must be remitted to the department by radio communications
service companies, including those companies that resell radio access
lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds must
be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in
RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section is not subject to
the state sales and use tax or any local tax.
(7) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines in the state.
The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each
interconnected voice over internet protocol service line whose place of
primary use is located in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform
for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of voice
over internet protocol service lines on an account that are capable of
simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched
telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection must be
remitted to the department by interconnected voice over internet
protocol service companies on a tax return provided by the department.
Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(8)(a) For calendar year 2011, the taxes imposed by subsections (5)
and (7) of this section must be set at their maximum rate. By August
31, 2011, and by August 31st of each year thereafter, the state
enhanced 911 coordinator must recommend the level for the next year of
the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by subsections (5) and (7) of
this section, based on a systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the
utilities and transportation commission. The commission must by the
following October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911
excise taxes imposed by subsections (5) and (7) of this section for the
following year.
(b) Beginning in calendar year 2012, the systematic cost and
revenue analysis includes the proceeds of revenues from the tax imposed
by chapter 82.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 8 of this
act).
(9) The excise tax imposed by this section does not apply to
prepaid wireless telecommunications service, which is subject to the
tax imposed under chapter 82.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 8 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Consumer" means a person who purchases prepaid wireless
telecommunications service in a retail transaction.
(2) "Prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise tax" means the tax that
is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer under this
chapter.
(3) "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" has the same
meaning as "prepaid wireless calling service" as provided in RCW
82.04.065.
(4) "Provider" means a person that provides prepaid wireless
telecommunications service pursuant to a license issued by the federal
communications commission.
(5) "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other than
resale.
(6) "Seller" means a person who sells prepaid wireless
telecommunications service to another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) There is imposed a prepaid wireless
enhanced 911 excise tax of two and one-half percent of the sales price
on each retail transaction.
(2)(a) The prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise tax must be
collected by the seller from the consumer with respect to each retail
transaction occurring in this state. The amount of the prepaid
wireless enhanced 911 excise tax must be either separately stated on an
invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the
consumer by the seller, or otherwise disclosed to the consumer.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the transaction occurs in this
state if it is sourced to this state under the provisions of RCW
82.32.520(3)(c).
(3) The prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise tax is the liability
of the consumer and not of the seller or of any provider, except that
the seller is liable to remit all prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise
taxes that the seller collects from consumers as provided in section 5
of this act, including all such excise taxes that the seller is deemed
to collect where the amount of the tax has not been separately stated
on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the
consumer by the seller.
(4) The amount of the prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise tax that
is collected by a seller from a consumer, if such amount is separately
stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to
the consumer by the seller, may not be included in the base for
measuring any tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by
this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any
intergovernmental agency.
(5) When prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with
one or more other products or services for a single, nonitemized price,
then the tax under this chapter is imposed on the entire nonitemized
price unless the seller elects to impose the tax on:
(a) A dollar amount, if the amount of the prepaid wireless
telecommunications service is disclosed to the consumer as a dollar
amount; or
(b) The portion of the price that is attributable to the prepaid
wireless telecommunications service by reasonable and verifiable
standards from its books and records that are kept in the regular
course of business for other purposes including, but not limited to,
nontax purposes, if the seller can identify such portion.
(6) If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications
service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single,
nonitemized price, then the seller may elect not to impose the tax
under this chapter on such sale. For purposes of this subsection,
"minimal" means an amount of service denominated as ten minutes or
less, or five dollars or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise
taxes collected by sellers under this chapter must be remitted to the
department at the times and in the manner provided by chapter 82.08 RCW
with respect to the sales tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW. The
department must establish registration and payment procedures that
substantially coincide with the registration and payment procedures
that apply to the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) A seller is permitted to deduct and retain two percent of
prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise taxes that are collected by the
seller from consumers.
(3) The audit and appeal procedures applicable to the retail sales
tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW apply to prepaid wireless enhanced
911 excise taxes.
(4) The department must establish procedures by which a seller of
prepaid wireless telecommunications service may document that a sale is
not a retail transaction, which procedures must substantially coincide
with the procedures for documenting sale for resale transactions for
purposes of the retail sales tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(5) The department must transfer all remitted prepaid wireless
enhanced 911 excise taxes as directed by this chapter within thirty
days of receipt. Funds must be distributed as follows:
(a) Seventy-three and seven-tenths percent must be transferred to
the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in RCW
82.14B.063. Such funds must be distributed to counties in the same
proportion as the distribution of funds under RCW 82.14B.063 as of
October 1, 2011, and are subject to the provisions of RCW 82.14B.050;
and
(b) Twenty-six and three-tenths percent must be transferred to the
enhanced 911 account created in RCW 38.52.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A provider or seller of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service is not liable for damages to any person
resulting from or incurred in connection with the provision of, or
failure to provide, 911 or enhanced 911 service, or for identifying, or
failing to identify, the telephone number, address, location, or name
associated with any person or device that is accessing or attempting to
access 911 or enhanced 911 service.
(2) A provider or seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications
service is not liable for damages to any person resulting from or
incurred in connection with the provision of any lawful assistance to
any investigative or law enforcement officer of the United States, this
or any other state, or any political subdivision of this or any other
state, in connection with any lawful investigation or other law
enforcement activity by such law enforcement officer.
(3) In addition to the provisions of this chapter, a provider or
seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is subject to the
provisions of RCW 38.52.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The prepaid wireless enhanced 911 excise tax
imposed by this chapter is the only enhanced 911 funding obligation
imposed with respect to prepaid wireless telecommunications service in
this state, and no other tax, fee, surcharge, or charge may be imposed
by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any
intergovernmental agency, for enhanced 911 funding purposes, upon any
provider, seller, or consumer with respect to the sale, purchase, use,
or provision of prepaid wireless telecommunications service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect October 1, 2011.

--- END ---