BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.170 and 2003 c 53 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior
is interfering with the use of a ((dog guide or)) service animal who
continues with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of a ((dog
guide or)) service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user or
his or her ((dog guide or)) service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor,
except as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her
dog to interfere with the use of a ((dog guide or)) service animal by
obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the
((dog guide or)) service animal user or his or her ((dog guide or))
service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of
this subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or
causes the death of a ((dog guide or)) service animal is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a ((dog guide or)) service
animal is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(5) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a ((dog guide or)) service animal is guilty of a class C
felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a ((dog guide or)) service animal with the intent to
deprive the ((dog guide or)) service animal user of his or her ((dog
guide or)) service animal is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW
9A.56.030.
(7)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a
violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full
restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential
expenses incurred by the ((dog guide or)) service animal user and the
((dog guide or)) service animal which arise out of or are related to
the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
((dog guide or)) service animal, the training of a replacement ((dog
guide or)) service animal, or retraining of the affected ((dog guide
or)) service animal and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user,
training of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user, and compensation
for wages or earned income lost by the ((dog guide or)) service animal
user.
(8) Nothing in this section shall affect any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(9) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) (("Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting
hearing impaired persons.
(b))) "Service animal" means ((an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability)) any dog that is individually trained
to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a
disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual,
or other mental disability. Other species of animals, whether wild or
domestic, trained or untrained, are not service animals. The work or
tasks performed by a service animal must be directly related to the
individual's disability. Examples of work or tasks include, but are
not limited to, assisting individuals who are blind or have low vision
with navigation and other tasks, alerting individuals who are deaf or
hard of hearing to the presence of people or sounds, providing
nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, assisting
an individual during a seizure, alerting individuals to the presence of
allergens, retrieving items such as medicine or the telephone,
providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability to
individuals with mobility disabilities, and helping persons with
psychiatric and neurological disabilities by preventing or interrupting
impulsive or destructive behaviors. The crime deterrent effects of an
animaĺs presence and the provision of emotional support, well-being,
comfort, or companionship do not constitute work or tasks.
(((c))) (b) "Notice" means a verbal or otherwise communicated
warning prescribing the behavior of another person and a request that
the person stop their behavior.
(((d))) (c) "Value" means the value to the ((dog guide or)) service
animal user and does not refer to cost or fair market value.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.040 and 2009 c 187 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur.
(2) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission.
(4) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction.
(5) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting
of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more
elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units.
(6) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred.
(7)(a) "Disability" means the presence of a sensory, mental, or
physical impairment that:
(i) Is medically cognizable or diagnosable; or
(ii) Exists as a record or history; or
(iii) Is perceived to exist whether or not it exists in fact.
(b) A disability exists whether it is temporary or permanent,
common or uncommon, mitigated or unmitigated, or whether or not it
limits the ability to work generally or work at a particular job or
whether or not it limits any other activity within the scope of this
chapter.
(c) For purposes of this definition, "impairment" includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) Any physiological disorder, or condition, cosmetic
disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the
following body systems: Neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense
organs, respiratory, including speech organs, cardiovascular,
reproductive, digestive, genitor-urinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin,
and endocrine; or
(ii) Any mental, developmental, traumatic, or psychological
disorder, including but not limited to cognitive limitation, organic
brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning
disabilities.
(d) Only for the purposes of qualifying for reasonable
accommodation in employment, an impairment must be known or shown
through an interactive process to exist in fact and:
(i) The impairment must have a substantially limiting effect upon
the individual's ability to perform his or her job, the individual's
ability to apply or be considered for a job, or the individual's access
to equal benefits, privileges, or terms or conditions of employment; or
(ii) The employee must have put the employer on notice of the
existence of an impairment, and medical documentation must establish a
reasonable likelihood that engaging in job functions without an
accommodation would aggravate the impairment to the extent that it
would create a substantially limiting effect.
(e) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, a limitation is not
substantial if it has only a trivial effect.
(8) (("Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of
assisting hearing impaired persons.
(9))) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof.
(((10))) (9) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by
his or her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person.
(((11))) (10) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest
of an employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more
persons, and does not include any religious or sectarian organization
not organized for private profit.
(((12))) (11) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking
with or without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place
employees for an employer.
(((13))) (12) "Families with children status" means one or more
individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen years being
domiciled with a parent or another person having legal custody of such
individual or individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other
person having such legal custody, with the written permission of such
parent or other person. Families with children status also applies to
any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal
custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen
years.
(((14))) (13) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase
any service, commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold
on, or by, any establishment to the public, and the admission of any
person to accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any
place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
without acts directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular
race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, or with
any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained
((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability, to be
treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or solicited.
(((15))) (14) "Honorably discharged veteran or military status"
means a person who is:
(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.
(((16))) (15) "Labor organization" includes any organization which
exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers
concerning grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for
other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment.
(((17))) (16) "Marital status" means the legal status of being
married, single, separated, divorced, or widowed.
(((18))) (17) "National origin" includes "ancestry."
(((19))) (18) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives,
legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons;
it includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof.
(((20))) (19) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces,
parts, components, or elements of a building, including individual
dwelling units and the public and common use areas of a building.
(((21))) (20) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale,
appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real
property, transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the
provision of brokerage services.
(((22))) (21) "Real property" includes buildings, structures,
dwellings, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real
estate cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein.
(((23))) (22) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint
or amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction.
(((24))) (23) "Service animal" means ((an animal that is trained
for the purpose of assisting or accommodating a sensory, mental, or
physical disability of a person with a disability)) any dog that is
individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an
individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory,
psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability. Other species
of animals, whether wild or domestic, trained or untrained, are not
service animals. The work or tasks performed by a service animal must
be directly related to the individual's disability. Examples of work
or tasks include, but are not limited to, assisting individuals who are
blind or have low vision with navigation and other tasks, alerting
individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to the presence of people
or sounds, providing nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a
wheelchair, assisting an individual during a seizure, alerting
individuals to the presence of allergens, retrieving items such as
medicine or the telephone, providing physical support and assistance
with balance and stability to individuals with mobility disabilities,
and helping persons with psychiatric and neurological disabilities by
preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive behaviors. The
crime deterrent effects of an animaĺs presence and the provision of
emotional support, well-being, comfort, or companionship do not
constitute work or tasks.
(((25))) (24) "Sex" means gender.
(((26))) (25) "Sexual orientation" means heterosexuality,
homosexuality, bisexuality, and gender expression or identity. As used
in this definition, "gender expression or identity" means having or
being perceived as having a gender identity, self-image, appearance,
behavior, or expression, whether or not that gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression is different from that
traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.84.021 and 1997 c 271 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, "service animal" means ((an animal
that is trained for the purposes of assisting or accommodating a
disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical disability)) any dog
that is individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the
benefit of an individual with a disability, including a physical,
sensory, psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability. Other
species of animals, whether wild or domestic, trained or untrained, are
not service animals. The work or tasks performed by a service animal
must be directly related to the individual's disability. Examples of
work or tasks include, but are not limited to, assisting individuals
who are blind or have low vision with navigation and other tasks,
alerting individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to the presence of
people or sounds, providing nonviolent protection or rescue work,
pulling a wheelchair, assisting an individual during a seizure,
alerting individuals to the presence of allergens, retrieving items
such as medicine or the telephone, providing physical support and
assistance with balance and stability to individuals with mobility
disabilities, and helping persons with psychiatric and neurological
disabilities by preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive
behaviors. The crime deterrent effects of an animaĺs presence and the
provision of emotional support, well-being, comfort, or companionship
do not constitute work or tasks.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.642.005 and 2010 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that in 1975 legislation was adopted,
codified as chapter 28A.640 RCW, recognizing the deleterious effect of
discrimination on the basis of sex, specifically prohibiting such
discrimination in Washington public schools, and requiring the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to monitor and enforce
compliance. The legislature further finds that, while numerous state
and federal laws prohibit discrimination on other bases in addition to
sex, the common school provisions in this title ((28A RCW)) do not
include specific acknowledgment of the right to be free from
discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin,
honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation,
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use
of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability, nor do any common school provisions specifically direct the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to monitor and
enforce compliance with these laws. The legislature finds that one of
the recommendations made to the legislature by the achievement gap
oversight and accountability committee created in chapter 468, Laws of
2009, was that the office of the superintendent of public instruction
should be specifically authorized to take affirmative steps to ensure
that school districts comply with all civil rights laws, similar to
what has already been authorized in chapter 28A.640 RCW with respect to
discrimination on the basis of sex.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.642.010 and 2010 c 240 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Discrimination in Washington public schools on the basis of race,
creed, religion, color, national origin, honorably discharged veteran
or military status, sexual orientation including gender expression or
identity, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability,
or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person
with a disability is prohibited. The definitions given these terms in
chapter 49.60 RCW apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.60.010 and 2007 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall be known as the "law against discrimination."
It is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection
of the public welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state,
and in fulfillment of the provisions of the Constitution of this state
concerning civil rights. The legislature hereby finds and declares
that practices of discrimination against any of its inhabitants because
of race, creed, color, national origin, families with children, sex,
marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran
or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by
a person with a disability are a matter of state concern, that such
discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper privileges of
its inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a free
democratic state. A state agency is herein created with powers with
respect to elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment,
in credit and insurance transactions, in places of public resort,
accommodation, or amusement, and in real property transactions because
of race, creed, color, national origin, families with children, sex,
marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran
or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by
a person with a disability; and the commission established hereunder is
hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.60.030 and 2009 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or))
service animal by a person with a disability is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the
purposes of this subparagraph;
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained ((dog guide
or)) service animal by a person with a disability, or national origin
or lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein
contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law
pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices; and
(g) The right of a mother to breastfeed her child in any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.60.120 and 2007 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To appoint an executive director and chief examiner, and such
investigators, examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it
may deem necessary, fix their compensation within the limitations
provided by law, and prescribe their duties.
(2) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all
governmental departments and agencies.
(3) To adopt, amend, and rescind suitable rules to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the
commission in connection therewith.
(4) To receive, impartially investigate, and pass upon complaints
alleging unfair practices as defined in this chapter.
(5) To issue such publications and results of investigations and
research as in its judgment will tend to promote good will and minimize
or eliminate discrimination because of sex, sexual orientation, race,
creed, color, national origin, marital status, age, honorably
discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained ((dog guide
or)) service animal by a person with a disability.
(6) To make such technical studies as are appropriate to effectuate
the purposes and policies of this chapter and to publish and distribute
the reports of such studies.
(7) To cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the
United States or other states, with other Washington state agencies,
commissions, and other government entities, and with political
subdivisions of the state of Washington and their respective human
rights agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter. However,
the powers which may be exercised by the commission under this
subsection permit investigations and complaint dispositions only if the
investigations are designed to reveal, or the complaint deals only
with, allegations which, if proven, would constitute unfair practices
under this chapter. The commission may perform such services for these
agencies and be reimbursed therefor.
(8) To foster good relations between minority and majority
population groups of the state through seminars, conferences,
educational programs, and other intergroup relations activities.

Sec. 9 RCW 49.60.130 and 2007 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission has power to create such advisory agencies and
conciliation councils, local, regional, or statewide, as in its
judgment will aid in effectuating the purposes of this chapter. The
commission may empower them to study the problems of discrimination in
all or specific fields of human relationships or in specific instances
of discrimination because of sex, race, creed, color, national origin,
marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran
or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by
a person with a disability; to foster through community effort or
otherwise good will, cooperation, and conciliation among the groups and
elements of the population of the state, and to make recommendations to
the commission for the development of policies and procedures in
general and in specific instances, and for programs of formal and
informal education which the commission may recommend to the
appropriate state agency.
Such advisory agencies and conciliation councils shall be composed
of representative citizens, serving without pay, but with reimbursement
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as
now existing or hereafter amended, and the commission may make
provision for technical and clerical assistance to such agencies and
councils and for the expenses of such assistance. The commission may
use organizations specifically experienced in dealing with questions of
discrimination.

Sec. 10 RCW 49.60.174 and 2003 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining whether an unfair practice
under this chapter has occurred, claims of discrimination based on
actual or perceived HIV or hepatitis C infection shall be evaluated in
the same manner as other claims of discrimination based on sensory,
mental, or physical disability; or the use of a trained ((dog guide
or)) service animal by a ((disabled)) person with a disability.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to transactions
with insurance entities, health service contractors, or health
maintenance organizations subject to RCW 49.60.030(1)(e) or 49.60.178
to prohibit fair discrimination on the basis of actual HIV or actual
hepatitis C infection status when bona fide statistical differences in
risk or exposure have been substantiated.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) "HIV" means the human immunodeficiency virus, and includes all
HIV and HIV-related viruses which damage the cellular branch of the
human immune system and leave the infected person immunodeficient; and
(b) "Hepatitis C" means the hepatitis C virus of any genotype.

Sec. 11 RCW 49.60.175 and 2007 c 187 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be an unfair practice to use the sex, race, creed, color,
national origin, marital status, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability of any person, or the use of a trained
((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability,
concerning an application for credit in any credit transaction to
determine the credit worthiness of an applicant.

Sec. 12 RCW 49.60.176 and 2007 c 187 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for
himself, herself, or another in connection with any credit transaction
because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, marital status,
honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use
of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability:
(a) To deny credit to any person;
(b) To increase the charges or fees for or collateral required to
secure any credit extended to any person;
(c) To restrict the amount or use of credit extended or to impose
different terms or conditions with respect to the credit extended to
any person or any item or service related thereto;
(d) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this
section.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit
transaction from considering the credit history of any individual
applicant.
(3) Further, nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a
credit transaction from considering the application of the community
property law to the individual case or from taking reasonable action
thereon.

Sec. 13 RCW 49.60.178 and 2006 c 4 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for himself,
herself, or another in connection with an insurance transaction or
transaction with a health maintenance organization to cancel or fail or
refuse to issue or renew insurance or a health maintenance agreement to
any person because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race,
creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service
animal by a ((disabled)) person with a disability: PROVIDED, That a
practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or
48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of
this section. For the purposes of this section, "insurance
transaction" is defined in RCW 48.01.060, health maintenance agreement
is defined in RCW 48.46.020, and "health maintenance organization" is
defined in RCW 48.46.020.
The fact that such unfair practice may also be a violation of
chapter 48.30, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW does not constitute a defense to an
action brought under this section.
The insurance commissioner, under RCW 48.30.300, and the human
rights commission, under chapter 49.60 RCW, shall have concurrent
jurisdiction under this section and shall enter into a working
agreement as to procedure to be followed in complaints under this
section.

Sec. 14 RCW 49.60.180 and 2007 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any employer:
(1) To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital
status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin,
honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog
guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability, unless based
upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the
prohibition against discrimination because of such disability shall not
apply if the particular disability prevents the proper performance of
the particular worker involved: PROVIDED, That this section shall not
be construed to require an employer to establish employment goals or
quotas based on sexual orientation.
(2) To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age,
sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national
origin, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability.
(3) To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other
terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status,
sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, honorably
discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or))
service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That it shall
not be an unfair practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or
locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other terms and
conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the commission
by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the
employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of
equality of opportunity between the sexes.
(4) To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated
any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of
application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with
prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification,
or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation,
race, creed, color, national origin, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by
a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation,
specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide
occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall
prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 15 RCW 49.60.190 and 2007 c 187 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any labor union or labor organization:
(1) To deny membership and full membership rights and privileges to
any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation,
race, creed, color, national origin, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by
a person with a disability.
(2) To expel from membership any person because of age, sex,
marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national
origin, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability.
(3) To discriminate against any member, employer, employee, or
other person to whom a duty of representation is owed because of age,
sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national
origin, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability.

Sec. 16 RCW 49.60.200 and 2007 c 187 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any employment agency to fail or
refuse to classify properly or refer for employment, or otherwise to
discriminate against, an individual because of age, sex, marital
status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin,
honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog
guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability, or to print or
circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement,
advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for
employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective
employment, which expresses any limitation, specification or
discrimination as to age, sex, race, sexual orientation, creed, color,
or national origin, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use
of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification,
or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational
qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit
advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 17 RCW 49.60.215 and 2009 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent
or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in
any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable
to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military
status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained ((dog
guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED,
That this section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person
with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That
behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons
can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

Sec. 18 RCW 49.60.222 and 2007 c 187 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for
himself, herself, or another, because of sex, marital status, sexual
orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, families with
children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a
disability:
(a) To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;
(b) To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of
facilities or services in connection therewith;
(c) To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer
to engage in a real estate transaction from a person;
(d) To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a
person;
(e) To represent to a person that real property is not available
for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available,
or to fail to bring a property listing to his or her attention, or to
refuse to permit the person to inspect real property;
(f) To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make
unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing
in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or
made available; or to any person associated with the person buying or
renting;
(g) To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so
made or published a statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form
of application for a real estate transaction, or to make a record or
inquiry in connection with a prospective real estate transaction, which
indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to make a limitation,
specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;
(h) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real
property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated
against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities
or services in connection therewith;
(i) To expel a person from occupancy of real property;
(j) To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or
financing a real estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust,
contract, or other instrument imposing a lien or other security in real
property, or in negotiating or executing any item or service related
thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan
guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this section
shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in
credit transactions; or
(k) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this
section.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person who is blind,
deaf, or physically disabled includes:
(a) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with a
disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or
to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to
afford such person full enjoyment of the dwelling, except that, in the
case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so,
condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to
restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;
(b) To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies,
practices, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to
afford a person with the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability and/or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal
by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or
(c) To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings
and premises in conformance with the federal fair housing amendments
act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws
or regulations pertaining to access by persons with any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or use of a trained ((dog guide or))
service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or
regulations differ, the requirements which require greater
accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical
disability shall govern.
Nothing in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A
single-family house rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not
own or have an interest in the proceeds of the rental or lease of more
than three such single-family houses at one time, the rental or lease
occurred without the use of a ((real estate)) broker, designated
broker, or ((salesperson)) managing broker, as defined in RCW
((18.85.010)) 18.85.011, and the rental or lease occurred without the
publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or
statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii)
rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or
intended to be occupied by no more than four families living
independently of each other if the owner maintains and occupies one of
the rooms or units as his or her residence.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall
not be an unfair practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or
private educational institution to separate the sexes or give
preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls, or other
student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the
basis of marital or families with children status.
(4) Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this
section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make facilities accessible to a person
with a disability except as otherwise required by law. Nothing in this
section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords
and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right
to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all
tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW
are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the
nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this
section limits the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or
local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted
to occupy a dwelling.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall
not be an unfair practice for any public establishment providing for
accommodations offered for the full enjoyment of transient guests as
defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make distinctions on the basis of
families with children status. Nothing in this section shall limit the
effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in places of
public accommodation.
(6) Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on
families with children status applies to housing for older persons as
defined by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older
persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.
Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for older
persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing
amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as
amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as
enacted on December 28, 1995.
(7) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to real estate transactions
involving the sharing of a dwelling unit, or rental or sublease of a
portion of a dwelling unit, when the dwelling unit is to be occupied by
the owner or subleasor. For purposes of this section, "dwelling unit"
has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.

Sec. 19 RCW 49.60.223 and 2007 c 187 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any person, for profit, to induce or
attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any real property by
representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the
neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, creed, color,
sex, national origin, sexual orientation, families with children
status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or with any
sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained
((dog guide or)) service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or
physically disabled.

Sec. 20 RCW 49.60.224 and 2007 c 187 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every provision in a written instrument relating to real
property which purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance,
encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to individuals of a specified
race, creed, color, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, families
with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status,
or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person who is blind, deaf,
or physically disabled, and every condition, restriction, or
prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter,
which directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real
property on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, national origin,
sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged
veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service
animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled is void.
(2) It is an unfair practice to insert in a written instrument
relating to real property a provision that is void under this section
or to honor or attempt to honor such a provision in the chain of title.

Sec. 21 RCW 49.60.225 and 2007 c 187 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a reasonable cause determination has been made under RCW
49.60.240 that an unfair practice in a real estate transaction has been
committed and a finding has been made that the respondent has engaged
in any unfair practice under RCW 49.60.250, the administrative law
judge shall promptly issue an order for such relief suffered by the
aggrieved person as may be appropriate, which may include actual
damages as provided by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), and injunctive or other equitable
relief. Such order may, to further the public interest, assess a civil
penalty against the respondent:
(a) In an amount up to ten thousand dollars if the respondent has
not been determined to have committed any prior unfair practice in a
real estate transaction;
(b) In an amount up to twenty-five thousand dollars if the
respondent has been determined to have committed one other unfair
practice in a real estate transaction during the five-year period
ending on the date of the filing of this charge; or
(c) In an amount up to fifty thousand dollars if the respondent has
been determined to have committed two or more unfair practices in a
real estate transaction during the seven-year period ending on the date
of the filing of this charge, for loss of the right secured by RCW
49.60.010, 49.60.030, 49.60.040, and 49.60.222 through 49.60.224, as
now or hereafter amended, to be free from discrimination in real
property transactions because of sex, marital status, race, creed,
color, national origin, sexual orientation, families with children
status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person who is blind,
deaf, or physically disabled. Enforcement of the order and appeal
therefrom by the complainant or respondent may be made as provided in
RCW 49.60.260 and 49.60.270. If acts constituting the unfair practice
in a real estate transaction that is the object of the charge are
determined to have been committed by the same natural person who has
been previously determined to have committed acts constituting an
unfair practice in a real estate transaction, then the civil penalty of
up to fifty thousand dollars may be imposed without regard to the
period of time within which any subsequent unfair practice in a real
estate transaction occurred. All civil penalties assessed under this
section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the
general fund.
(2) Such order shall not affect any contract, sale, conveyance,
encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of an order that
involves a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant who does not
have actual notice of the charge filed under this chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons
awarded damages under this section may not receive additional damages
pursuant to RCW 49.60.250.

Sec. 22 RCW 49.60.370 and 1997 c 271 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who negligently or maliciously kills or injures a
((dog guide or)) service animal is liable for a penalty of one thousand
dollars, to be paid to the user of the animal. The penalty shall be in
addition to and not in lieu of any other remedies or penalties, civil
or criminal, provided by law.
(2) A user or owner of a ((dog guide or)) service animal, whose
animal is negligently or maliciously injured or killed, is entitled to
recover reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in pursuing any
civil remedy.
(3) The commission has no duty to investigate any negligent or
malicious acts referred to under this section.

Sec. 23 RCW 49.60.380 and 1997 c 271 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county, city, or town shall honor a request by a ((blind)) person
((or hearing impaired person not to be charged a fee to license his or
her dog guide, or a request by a physically disabled person)) with a
disability not to be charged a fee to license his or her service
animal.

Sec. 24 RCW 64.38.028 and 2006 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The association, acting through a simple majority vote of its
board, may amend the association's governing documents for the purpose
of removing:
(a) Every covenant, condition, or restriction that purports to
forbid or restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease
thereof to individuals of a specified race, creed, color, sex, or
national origin; families with children status; individuals with any
sensory, mental, or physical disability; or individuals who use a
trained ((dog guide or)) service animal because they are blind or deaf
or have a physical disability; and
(b) Every covenant, condition, restriction, or prohibition,
including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, that directly or
indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the basis of
race, creed, color, sex, national origin; families with children
status; the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability; or
the use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with
a physical disability or who is blind or deaf.
(2) Upon the board's receipt of a written request by a member of
the association that the board exercise its amending authority granted
under subsection (1) of this section, the board must, within a
reasonable time, amend the governing documents, as provided under this
section.
(3) Amendments under subsection (1) of this section may be executed
by any board officer.
(4) Amendments made under subsection (1) of this section must be
recorded in the public records and state the following:

"This amendment strikes from these covenants,
conditions, and restrictions those provisions that are void
under RCW 49.60.224. Specifically, this amendment strikes:

(a) Those provisions that forbid or restrict use,
occupancy, conveyance, encumbrance, or lease of real property
to individuals of a specified race, creed, color, sex, or
national origin; families with children status; individuals
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability; or
individuals who use a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal
because they are blind or deaf or have a physical disability;
and

(b) Every covenant, condition, restriction, or
prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of
reverter, that directly or indirectly limits the use or
occupancy of real property on the basis of race, creed, color,
sex, national origin; families with children status; the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability; or the
use of a trained ((dog guide or)) service animal by a person
with a physical disability or who is blind or deaf."

(5) Board action under this section does not require the vote or
approval of the owners.
(6) As provided in RCW 49.60.227, any owner, occupant, or tenant in
the association or board may bring an action in superior court to have
any provision of a written instrument that is void pursuant to RCW
49.60.224 stricken from the public records.
(7) Nothing in this section prohibiting discrimination based on
families with children status applies to housing for older persons as
defined by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older
persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.
Nothing in this section authorizes requirements for housing for older
persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing
amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as
amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as
enacted on December 28, 1995.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
(a) nothing in this section creates a duty on the part of owners,
occupants, tenants, associations, or boards to amend the governing
documents as provided in this section, or to bring an action as
authorized under this section and RCW 49.60.227; and (b) an owner,
occupant, tenant, association, or board is not liable for failing to
amend the governing documents or to pursue an action in court as
authorized under this section and RCW 49.60.227.

Sec. 25 RCW 70.84.040 and 2010 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The driver of a vehicle approaching a totally or partially blind
pedestrian who is carrying a cane predominantly white in color (with or
without a red tip), a ((totally or partially blind or hearing impaired
pedestrian using a dog guide, a)) person with ((physical disabilities))
a disability using a service animal, or a person with a disability
using a wheelchair or a power wheelchair as defined in RCW 46.04.415
shall take all necessary precautions to avoid injury to such pedestrian
or wheelchair user. Any driver who fails to take such precaution shall
be liable in damages for any injury caused such pedestrian or
wheelchair user. It shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle
to drive into or upon any crosswalk while there is on such crosswalk
such pedestrian or wheelchair user crossing or attempting to cross the
roadway, if such pedestrian or wheelchair user is using a white cane,
((using a dog guide,)) using a service animal, or using a wheelchair or
a power wheelchair as defined in RCW 46.04.415. The failure of any
such pedestrian or wheelchair user so to signal shall not deprive him
or her of the right-of-way accorded him or her by other laws.

Sec. 26 RCW 70.84.050 and 1997 c 271 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
A totally or partially blind pedestrian not carrying a white cane
or a totally or partially blind or hearing impaired pedestrian not
using a ((dog guide)) service animal in any of the places,
accommodations, or conveyances listed in RCW 70.84.010, shall have all
of the rights and privileges conferred by law on other persons.

Sec. 27 RCW 70.84.060 and 1997 c 271 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any pedestrian who is not totally or
partially blind to use a white cane or any pedestrian who is not
totally or partially blind or is not hearing impaired to use a ((dog
guide)) service animal or any pedestrian who is not otherwise
physically disabled to use a service animal in any of the places,
accommodations, or conveyances listed in RCW 70.84.010 for the purpose
of securing the rights and privileges accorded by the chapter to
totally or partially blind, hearing impaired, or otherwise physically
disabled people.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 RCW 70.84.020 ("Dog guide" defined) and
1997 c 271 s 18, 1980 c 109 s 2, & 1969 c 141 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---