BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.60.215 and 2009 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's
agent or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results
in any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable
to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military
status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That
this section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person
with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That
behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons
can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.
(2) This section does not apply to food establishments, as defined
in section 2 of this act, with respect to the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a person with a disability. Food
establishments are subject to section 2 of this act with respect to
trained dog guides and service animals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's
agent or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results
in any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any food establishment, except for conditions and limitations
established by law and applicable to all persons, on the basis of the
use of a dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:
PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require
structural changes, modifications, or additions to make any place
accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required
by law: PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to
property or other persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not
constitute an unfair practice.
(2) A food establishment shall make reasonable modifications in
policies, practices, or procedures to permit the use of a miniature
horse by an individual with a disability in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section if the miniature horse has been individually
trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of the individual
with a disability. In determining whether reasonable modifications in
policies, practices, or procedures can be made to allow a miniature
horse into a facility, a food establishment shall act in accordance
with all applicable laws and regulations.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Service animal" means any dog that is individually trained to
do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a
disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual,
or other mental disability. Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, other species of animals, whether wild or domestic,
trained or untrained, are not service animals. The work or tasks
performed by a service animal must be directly related to the
individual's disability. Examples of work or tasks include, but are
not limited to, assisting individuals who are blind or have low vision
with navigation and other tasks, alerting individuals who are deaf or
hard of hearing to the presence of people or sounds, providing
nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, assisting
an individual during a seizure, alerting individuals to the presence of
allergens, retrieving items such as medicine or the telephone,
providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability to
individuals with mobility disabilities, and helping persons with
psychiatric and neurological disabilities by preventing or interrupting
impulsive or destructive behaviors. The crime deterrent effects of an
animal's presence and the provision of emotional support, well-being,
comfort, or companionship do not constitute work or tasks.
(b) "Food establishment" means a place of business that sells or
serves food for human consumption with a North American industry
classification system code within "445110," "445120," "445210,"
"445220," "445230," "445291," "445292," "445299," "452910," "722110,"
"722211," "722212," "722213," or "722410."

--- END ---