BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the Eddie
Ryan public safety act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A governmental agency that purchases,
receives, possesses, uses, or issues a firearm must ensure that the
firearm includes or is accompanied with a firearms safety device or gun
safe that is identified as appropriate for that firearm by reference to
either the manufacturer or the model of the firearm.
(b) A government agent who receives, possesses, or uses a firearm
issued to the agent by the agency must ensure that the firearm includes
or is accompanied with a firearms safety device or gun safe that is
identified as appropriate for that firearm by reference to either the
manufacturer or the model of the firearm.
(c) A governmental agency or government agent has until July 31,
2014, to comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) All firearms safety devices and gun safes acquired under
subsection (1) of this section must meet the minimum standards for
firearms safety devices and gun safes as determined by the attorney
general.
(3)(a) The attorney general shall certify laboratories to verify
compliance with standards for firearms safety devices and gun safes.
The attorney general may charge any laboratory that is seeking
certification to test firearms safety devices or gun safes a fee not
exceeding the costs of certification.
(b) The certified laboratory shall, at the manufacturer's or
dealer's expense, test the firearms safety device or gun safe and
submit a copy of the final test report directly to the attorney general
along with the firearms safety device or gun safe. The attorney
general shall notify the manufacturer or dealer of its receipt of the
final test report and the attorney general's determination as to
whether the firearms safety device or gun safe tested may be sold or
transferred in this state for use by any governmental agency or
government agent in this state.
(c) By July 1, 2012, the attorney general shall compile, publish,
and thereafter maintain a roster listing all of the firearms safety
devices and gun safes that have been tested by a certified testing
laboratory, and have been determined to meet the attorney general's
standards for firearms safety devices or gun safes that may be sold in
this state for possession or use in this state by a governmental agency
or a government agent as issued by the agency. The roster shall list,
for each firearms safety device or gun safe, the manufacturer, model
number, and model name.
(d) The attorney general may randomly retest samples obtained from
sources other than directly from the manufacturer of the firearms
safety device or gun safe listed on the roster to ensure compliance
with the requirements of this section.
(4) Firearms safety devices and gun safes used for random sample
testing and obtained from sources other than the manufacturer shall be
in new, unused condition and still in the manufacturer's original and
unopened package.
(5) A gun safe must:
(a) Be able to fully contain firearms and provide for their secure
storage;
(b) Be capable of repeated use;
(c) Have a locking system consisting of at minimum a mechanical or
electronic combination lock. The mechanical or electronic combination
lock utilized by the safe shall have at least ten thousand possible
combinations consisting of a minimum three numbers, letters, or
symbols. The lock shall be protected by a case-hardened (Rc 60+)
drill-resistant steel plate, or drill-resistant material of equivalent
strength;
(d) Have boltwork that consists of a minimum of three steel locking
bolts of at least half an inch thickness that intrude from the door of
the safe into the body of the safe or from the body of the safe into
the door of the safe, which are operated by a separate handle and
secured by the lock;
(e) Have exterior walls constructed of a minimum twelve gauge thick
steel for a single-walled safe, or the sum of the steel walls add up to
at least .100 inches for safes with two walls, and have doors
constructed of a minimum of two layers of twelve gauge steel, or one
layer of seven gauge steel compound construction;
(f) Have door hinges that prevent the removal of the door, and
protective features that include, but are not limited to: Hinges not
exposed to the outside, interlocking door designs, dead bars, jeweler's
lugs, and active or inactive locking bolts.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Firearms safety device" means a device other than a gun safe
that locks and is designed to prevent children and unauthorized users
from firing a firearm. The device may be installed on a firearm, be
incorporated into the design of the firearm, or prevent access to the
firearm.
(b) "Gun safe" means a locking container that fully contains and
secures one or more firearms, and that meets the standards for gun
safes in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a class C
felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---