BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.020 and 2006 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional fire protection
service authority.
(2) "Regional fire protection service authority" or "authority"
means a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
adjacent fire protection jurisdictions and that has been created by a
vote of the people under this chapter to implement a regional fire
protection service authority plan.
(3) "Regional fire protection service authority planning committee"
or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created under RCW
52.26.030 to create and propose to fire protection jurisdictions a
regional fire protection service authority plan to design, finance, and
develop fire protection and emergency service projects.
(4) "Regional fire protection service authority plan" or "plan"
means a plan to develop and finance a fire protection service authority
project or projects, including, but not limited to, specific capital
projects, fire operations and emergency service operations pursuant to
RCW 52.26.040(3)(b), and preservation and maintenance of existing or
future facilities.
(5) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire district, city,
town, port district, municipal airport, or Indian tribe.
(6) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.
(7) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection jurisdiction participating in the formation or operation of
a regional fire protection service authority.
(8) "Elected official" means an elected official of a participating
fire protection jurisdiction or a regional fire protection district
commissioner created under RCW 52.26.080.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.26.040 and 2006 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional fire protection service authority planning committee
shall adopt a regional fire protection service authority plan providing
for the governance, design, financing, and development of fire
protection and emergency services. The planning committee may consider
the following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria; and
(b) The input of cities and counties located within, or partially
within, a participating fire protection jurisdiction.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with
neighboring cities, towns, and other local governments that engage in
fire protection planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Create opportunities for public input in the development of the
plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a regional fire
protection service authority and recommending governance, design,
financing, and development of fire protection and emergency service
facilities and operations, including maintenance and preservation of
facilities or systems. The plan may authorize the authority to
establish a system of ambulance service to be operated by the authority
or operated by contract after a call for bids. However, the authority
shall not provide for the establishment of an ambulance service that
would compete with any existing private ambulance service, unless the
authority determines that the region served by the authority, or a
substantial portion of the region served by the authority, is not
adequately served by an existing private ambulance service. In
determining the adequacy of an existing private ambulance service, the
authority shall take into consideration objective generally accepted
medical standards and reasonable levels of service which must be
published by the authority. Following the preliminary conclusion by
the authority that the existing private ambulance service is
inadequate, and before establishing an ambulance service or issuing a
call for bids, the authority shall allow a minimum of sixty days for
the private ambulance service to meet the generally accepted medical
standards and accepted levels of service. In the event of a second
preliminary conclusion of inadequacy within a twenty-four-month period,
the authority may immediately issue a call for bids or establish its
own ambulance service and is not required to afford the private
ambulance service another sixty-day period to meet the generally
accepted medical standards and reasonable levels of service. A private
ambulance service that is not licensed by the department of health or
whose license is denied, suspended, or revoked is not entitled to a
sixty-day period within which to demonstrate adequacy and the authority
may immediately issue a call for bids or establish an ambulance
service; and
(c) In the plan, recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW
52.26.050, identify the portions of the plan that may be amended by the
board of the authority without voter approval, consistent with RCW
52.26.050, and recommend a financing plan to fund selected fire
protection and emergency services and projects.
(4) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the participating
fire protection jurisdictions' governing bodies to initiate the
election process under RCW 52.26.060.
(5) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected regional fire protection service authority
projects, financing plan, and the ballot measure. The fire protection
jurisdictions' governing bodies may approve the new plan and ballot
measure, and may then submit the revised proposition to the voters at
a subsequent election or a special election. If a ballot measure is
not approved by the voters by the third vote, the planning committee is
dissolved.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.26.080 and 2004 c 129 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules for the conduct of business. The
board shall adopt bylaws to govern authority affairs, which may
include:
(a) The time and place of regular meetings;
(b) Rules for calling special meetings;
(c) The method of keeping records of proceedings and official acts;
(d) Procedures for the safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and
(e) Any other provisions the board finds necessary to include.
(2) The governing board shall be determined by the plan ((and
consist solely of elected officials)). However, only elected officials
of participating fire protection jurisdictions and elected
commissioners of the authority as provided in subsection (3) of this
section are eligible to serve on the board.
(3)(a) A regional fire protection service authority plan may create
one or more regional fire protection service authority commissioner
positions to serve on a governing board. The following provisions
define the qualifications, compensation, terms, and responsibilities of
regional fire protection service authority commissioner positions:
(i) RCW 52.14.010 governs the compensation, qualifications, and
ability to serve as a volunteer firefighter;
(ii) RCW 52.14.030 governs the polling places for elections; and
(iii) RCW 52.14.050 governs commissioner vacancies.
(b) The terms of office for regional fire protection service
authority commissioner positions may be established by the plan,
however, no single term may exceed six years and the terms of multiple
positions must be staggered.
(c) Regional fire protection service authority commissioners shall
take an oath of office in the manner specified by RCW 52.14.070.
(4)(a) A regional fire protection service authority plan may create
commissioner districts. If commissioner districts are created, the
population of each commissioner district must be approximately equal.
Commissioner districts must be redrawn as provided in chapter 29A.76
RCW.
(b) Commissioner districts shall be used as follows: (i) Only a
registered voter who resides in a commissioner district may be a
candidate for, or serve as, a commissioner of the commissioner
district; and (ii) only voters of a commissioner district may vote at
a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the commissioner
district. All voters of the proposed authority must be eligible to
vote at a general election to elect a commissioner of the commissioner
district. If a plan includes elected officials from participating fire
protection jurisdictions, the commissioner districts may be based, in
part, on the jurisdictional boundaries of the participating
jurisdictions.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.044 and 2004 c 129 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a fire protection district is a participating fire
protection jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service
authority, the regular property tax levies of the fire protection
district are limited as follows:
(a) The regular levy of the district under RCW 52.16.130 shall not
exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the
authority under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a);
(b) The levy of the district under RCW 52.16.140 shall not exceed
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property
in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the authority
under RCW 52.26.140(1)(b); and
(c) The levy of the district under RCW 52.16.160 shall not exceed
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property
in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the authority
under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c).
(2) If a city or town is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service authority, the
regular levies of the city or town shall not exceed the applicable
rates provided in RCW 27.12.390, 52.04.081, and 84.52.043(1) less the
aggregate rates of any regular levies made by the authority under RCW
52.26.140(1).
(3) If a port district is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service authority, the
regular levy of the port district under RCW 53.36.020 shall not exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the aggregate rates of any regular levies
imposed by the authority under RCW 52.26.140(1).
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority or annexed into a regional fire protection service
authority.

--- END ---