BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
"clean water jobs act of 2011."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that contaminated
storm water runoff is a major water pollution problem in the state
creating a significant burden on the rivers, aquifers, lakes, and
streams across Washington. Mitigating the burdens of storm water and
storm water pollution is one of the Puget Sound partnership's top
strategic priorities for Puget Sound recovery.
(2) The legislature finds that activities that address storm water
contamination, including building and retrofitting urban, suburban, and
rural infrastructure, generate significant job growth, especially in
the construction industry and other related trades.
(3) The legislature recognizes that the burden of storm water
pollution is a function of both increased volumes of storm water runoff
due to the expansion of impervious surfaces and the toxic substances
that pollute the runoff. Local governments address the burdens created
by increased impervious surface through storm water utility fees, but
it has been difficult to regulate the toxic substances that contaminate
storm water runoff and result in nonpoint source pollution.
(4) The legislature finds that toxic storm water pollutants,
including petroleum products, fertilizers, herbicides and pesticides,
are responsible for a significant portion of the contaminated runoff
going into Puget Sound and other waters of the state.
(5) The legislature recognizes that a recent Puget Sound
partnership analysis shows that future expenditures for required storm
water remediation in the Puget Sound region alone will require billions
of dollars in new investments. To meet federal storm water permit
requirements and complete other storm water project activities
necessary to improve water quality recovery goals, more than two
hundred fifty million dollars will need to be spent by cities,
counties, ports, and the state department of transportation every year.
(6) The legislature finds that the burden of environmental
degradation from toxic storm water pollutants is difficult to offset
because the source of pollution is not a single physical point, but
occurs wherever the products containing these substances are purchased,
consumed, or used. Nonpoint sources pollute storm water through a
multitude of pathways. For example, combustion of gasoline, diesel,
residual fuel oil, and other petroleum products emit pollutants such as
hydrocarbons, polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, zinc, and arsenic,
which then disperse and deposit on the ground. Oil and grease drip
from vehicles and equipment onto roads and parking lots. Even when
properly applied, pesticides, herbicides, and fertilizers leave
residues that are environmental contaminants. When rainwater flows
across impervious surfaces, these contaminants are mobilized and
transported to water bodies.
(7) The legislature finds that surface runoff of fertilizers,
pesticides, and herbicides into water bodies changes natural ecosystems
by killing or damaging a wide variety of organisms. These substances
collect and accumulate in the food chain, becoming more harmful than
their ambient concentration would suggest. Fertilizer can also disrupt
natural biological communities by increasing plant and microbial
growth, damaging natural water ecosystems, and creating new pollution
conditions.
(8) The legislature further finds that the possession of petroleum
and petroleum by-products such as asphalt and road oil, lubricants,
motor vehicle fuel, and motor diesel fuel, as well as pesticides,
herbicides, fertilizers, and other toxic storm water pollutants,
directly contributes to storm water contamination. Once these products
are present in the state, the immediate, foreseeable, and unavoidable
consequences of their distribution and use are emissions and residues
that significantly contribute to storm water pollution.
(9) The legislature finds that the federal government and the state
of Washington have identified control of pollutants in storm water
runoff through national pollutant discharge elimination system phases
I and II municipal storm water permits as a requirement for the state
and local jurisdictions. Impacts from the polluted storm water may be
prevented or controlled through retrofit projects for existing
infrastructure.
(10) The legislature finds that current resources being devoted to
offset the direct burdens of waterways contaminated by toxic storm
water pollutants are insufficient to meet existing needs. Existing
funding is raised largely by local governments and is
disproportionately borne by fees levied on individual developers and
property owners.
(11) Therefore, the legislature determines that imposing a fee on
the first possession of toxic storm water pollutants that contribute to
nonpoint storm water contamination is an appropriate means of
regulation that proportionally allocates the costs of offsetting the
burdens that these products place upon the quality of the state's
waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Low-impact development" means a storm water management and
land use strategy applied at the parcel, subdivision, or drainage area
level, that emphasizes conservation and use of on-site natural features
integrated with engineered, small scale hydrologic controls to more
closely mimic predevelopment hydrologic functions.
(3) "Pesticide" means any product required to be registered under
the federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. Sec.
136 et seq., as it exists on the effective date of this section.
(4) "Fertilizer" means all commercial fertilizers required to be
registered prior to distribution in the state under the provisions of
chapter 15.54 RCW.
(5) "Herbicide" means any product intended to prevent, destroy,
repel, or mitigate any weed, and which is required to be registered
under the federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C.
Sec. 136 et seq., as it exists on the effective date of this section.
(6) "Petroleum product" means any plant condensate, lubricating
oil, crankcase motor oil, gasoline, aviation fuel, kerosene, diesel
motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil, residual fuel, asphalt base, liquefied or
liquefiable gases, such as butane, ethane, and propane, and every other
product derived from the refining of crude oil, but the term does not
include crude oil.
(7) "Possession" means the act of taking control of a substance
subject to the fee imposed in section 5 of this act within this state,
whether the person taking control does so by bringing, receiving,
creating, or extracting the petroleum product in this state, and
includes both actual and constructive possession. "Actual possession"
occurs when the person with control obtains physical possession.
"Constructive possession" occurs when the person with control does not
obtain physical possession.
(8) "Retrofit" means renovation or improvements associated with and
constructed adjacent to or near an existing site, subdivision, or
development in order to reduce or eliminate municipal storm water
runoff to receiving water bodies.
(9) "Storm water facilities" includes, but is not limited to,
ponds, biofiltration swales, storm water treatment tanks, detention
vaults, oil water separators, dry wells, catch basins, and filters.
(10) "Toxic storm water pollutant" means petroleum products,
pesticides, herbicides, and fertilizers. It also includes other
substances that are determined by rule by the department to be
significant contributors to the contamination of surface water runoff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The storm water pollution account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from the storm water
pollution fee must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation to the department for
activities or projects that mitigate or prevent contamination of storm
water by toxic storm water pollutants.
(2)(a) Of the moneys appropriated to the department in the omnibus
and capital appropriations acts for storm water grant programs the
department may spend no more than four percent for its administrative
costs. The department must distribute the remaining moneys annually as
provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b)(i) Seventy-five thousand dollars must be provided to each local
government that is subject to the national pollutant discharge
elimination system phase I or phase II municipal storm water
requirements for the purpose of addressing contamination of storm water
by toxic storm water pollutants.
(ii) Eleven million dollars must be provided to the Washington
state department of transportation and may be used only to fund
transportation infrastructure projects that address toxic storm water
pollution related to transportation infrastructure through the
implementation of the department of transportation's national pollutant
discharge elimination system programs permitted under the national
pollution discharge elimination system. These moneys may not be used
for construction of storm water facilities associated with new road
construction or new road alignment construction, but may be used for
construction that adds to or replaces an existing roadway.
(iii) Three million dollars must be provided as grants to a
nonprofit organization or organizations that develop storm water
prevention and treatment technologies, and assist businesses and
governmental entities in testing, monitoring, adopting, and
implementing new practices and technologies that will cost-effectively
reduce the impact of toxic storm water pollution.
(iv)(A) Forty-five percent of the moneys remaining after allocation
under (b)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (2) must be
distributed annually by the department through grants to local
governments covered by national pollutant discharge elimination system
municipal phase I or phase II permits. The grants must be used to fund
local government projects or activities that mitigate or prevent
contamination from toxic storm water pollutants or the recontamination
by toxic storm water pollutants of receiving waters previously
remediated under federal or state-approved activities. To be eligible,
local governments must provide fifty percent of project or activity
costs in matching funds from other nonstate fund sources.
(B) To qualify for funding under this subsection (2)(b)(iv), the
applicant must demonstrate:
(I) That the project or activity will address contamination of
surface waters by toxic storm water pollutants covered under this
chapter;
(II) The water quality outcomes planned for the project or
activity; and
(III) For capital improvement project proposals greater than one
million dollars, that at least fifteen percent of the labor hours will
be performed by apprentices.
(v)(A) Forty-five percent of the moneys remaining after allocation
under (b)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (2) must be allocated
annually by the department through grants to local governments for
retrofit projects that address contamination of storm water by toxic
storm water pollutants, or projects that directly reduce emissions that
result in air deposition of toxins from storm water pollutants. The
grants for retrofit projects must be prioritized for projects that
utilize low-impact development retrofit strategies; except that grants
may be awarded for other retrofit projects if the site does not lend
itself to low-impact development techniques or if other retrofit
techniques are shown to be more effective in terms of addressing water
quality problems associated with the site or the receiving water body.
(B) To qualify for funding, the applicant must demonstrate:
(I) That the project or activity will address contamination of
waterways by toxic storm water pollutants covered under this chapter;
(II) The water quality outcomes planned for the project or
activity; and
(III) For capital improvement project proposals greater than one
million dollars, that at least fifteen percent of the labor hours will
be performed by apprentices.
(vi) Ten percent of the moneys remaining after distributions have
been made under (b)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (2) must be
distributed to projects eligible under (b)(iv) or (v) of this
subsection (2). These moneys should be allocated to the highest
priority projects based upon ecological and water quality benefits as
determined by the department, and may be allocated to meet the matching
requirements under (b)(iv) of this subsection (2) to local governments
that demonstrate economic hardship in meeting the matching requirement.
(3) In consultation with stakeholders, the department must develop
criteria for administering the program and ranking projects for funding
based on water quality benefits. In developing criteria applicable to
projects in the Puget Sound basin, the department must consult with the
Puget Sound partnership to ensure the grants awarded will be consistent
with the prioritization of the 2020 action agenda. All activities or
projects approved for funding must demonstrate the potential to achieve
clear ecological or water quality benefits. The department must
endeavor to distribute the moneys within each geographic region of the
state in proportion to the severity of impacts to waterways from
contamination by toxic storm water pollutants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Beginning July 1, 2011, a storm water
pollution fee is charged on the first possession of the following
substances: Petroleum products, pesticides, herbicides, and
fertilizers for the purpose of offsetting the burden of funding
projects and activities that redress state water pollution caused by
the presence of such substances in storm water runoff. The fee is
equal to one percent of the wholesale value of the toxic storm water
pollutant.
(2) The fee must be collected by the department. Fees must be
collected quarterly and must be deposited in the storm water pollution
account created in section 4 of this act.
(3) The department may adopt rules to identify additional toxic
storm water pollutants to be subject to the fee in subsection (1) of
this section that are determined to be significant contributors to the
contamination of storm water runoff in the state. The department may
amend the rules, as deemed necessary, to delete or add toxic storm
water pollutants, but may not add substances by a rule amendment more
than once in a twenty-four month period.
(4) The department may enter into agreements with other state
agencies to facilitate the most efficient collection of the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The storm water pollution fee charged in
this chapter does not apply to the following:
(a) Any possession of fuel carried into this state in the fuel tank
for the motive power of any airplane, ship, truck, or other vehicle;
(b) Any successive possession of a toxic storm water pollutant for
which the fee was previously paid and which has not been remanufactured
or reprocessed in any matter, other than repackaging or recycling for
beneficial reuse, since the fee was paid; and
(c) Any possession of a toxic storm water pollutant by a person
under circumstances where the product is used, or is to be used, for a
personal or domestic purpose by that person or a relative of, or person
residing in the same dwelling as, that person. This exemption does not
apply to any possession by a person of a toxic storm water pollutant if
the product is used or is to be used for a business purpose.
(2) Any person claiming an exemption under subsection (1)(b) of
this section must maintain records to document that the storm water
pollution fee was paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A credit against the storm water pollution
fee charged in this chapter is allowed for:
(1) Fees paid under this chapter on the possession of any toxic
storm water pollutant that is subsequently exported for sale outside
this state;
(2) Fees paid under this chapter on the possession of fuel carried
from this state in the fuel tank of any airplane, ship, truck, or other
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 By December 1, 2013, and every two years
thereafter, the department and the Puget Sound partnership must report
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on
the progress of the program, the water quality and other environmental
quality outcomes of the storm water projects funded under this chapter,
and the suitability of the levels of allocations from the storm water
pollution account specified in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---