BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the affordable
care act requires the states to establish health benefit exchanges.
The legislature intends to establish an exchange, including a
governance structure that will be in place no later than July 1, 2012.
There are many policy decisions associated with establishing an
exchange that need to be made that will take a great deal of effort and
expertise. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to establish
a process through which these policy decisions can be made by the
legislature and the governor by the deadline established in the
affordable care act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The state shall establish, by statute, a health benefit exchange
consistent with the federal affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, to begin
operations no later than January 1, 2014, and intended to:
(1) Increase access to quality affordable health care coverage,
reduce the number of uninsured persons in Washington state, and
increase the availability of health care coverage through the private
health insurance market to qualified individuals and small employers;
(2) Provide consumer choice and portability of health insurance,
regardless of employment status;
(3) Create an organized, transparent, and accountable health
insurance marketplace for Washingtonians to purchase affordable,
quality health care coverage, to claim available federal refundable
premium tax credits and cost-sharing subsidies, and to meet the
personal responsibility requirements for minimum essential coverage as
provided under the federal affordable care act;
(4) Promote consumer literacy and empower consumers to compare
plans and make informed decisions about their health care and coverage;
(5) Effectively and efficiently administer health care subsidies
and determination of eligibility for participation in publicly
subsidized health care programs, including the exchange;
(6) Create a health insurance market that competes on the basis of
price, quality, service, and other innovative efforts;
(7) Operate in a manner compatible with efforts to improve quality,
contain costs, and promote innovation;
(8) Recognize the need for a private health insurance market to
exist outside of the exchange and the need for a regulatory framework
that applies both inside and outside of the exchange; and
(9) Recognize that the regulation of the health insurance market,
both inside and outside the exchange, should continue to be performed
by the insurance commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health benefit exchange board shall be established as a
nonprofit, public-private partnership, composed of nine persons with
expertise in the Washington state health care system and private and
public health care coverage. By July 1, 2012, the governor shall
appoint representatives from each of the following groups:
(a) Two employee benefits specialists;
(b) A health economist or actuary;
(c) Small businesses;
(d) Health care consumer advocates;
(e) The administrator of the health care authority under chapter
41.05 RCW;
(f) The insurance commissioner or designee as a nonvoting ex
officio member; and
(g) Two appointments from a list of recommendations submitted by
the legislature. Each chamber of the legislature shall forward two
recommendations representing mutually agreed on names from each caucus.
Each person appointed to the board under this subsection (1)(g) must
have demonstrated and acknowledged expertise in at least one of the
following areas:
(i) Individual health care coverage;
(ii) Small employer health care coverage;
(iii) Health benefits plan administration;
(iv) Health care finance and economics;
(v) Actuarial science;
(vi) Administering a public or private health care delivery system;
or
(vii) Purchasing health plan coverage.
(2) The board shall elect a chair from among its members.
(3) No board member may be employed by, a consultant to, a member
of the board of directors of, or otherwise a representative of or a
lobbyist for an entity in the business of, or potentially in the
business of, selling items or services of significant value to the
health benefit exchange.
(4) Initial members of the board shall serve staggered terms not to
exceed four years. Initial appointments must be made on or before July
1, 2012. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year terms.
(5) Members of the board must be reimbursed for their travel
expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business. Meetings of the board are at the call of the chair.
(6) The board shall conduct its business consistent with the
provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act.
Consistent with the open public meetings act, the board may hold
executive sessions to consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information.
(7)(a) The board shall establish an advisory committee to allow for
the views of the health care industry and other stakeholders to be
heard in the operation of the health benefit exchange. The advisory
committee shall provide expertise and recommendations to the board, but
shall have no authority to promulgate rules or enter into contracts on
behalf of the health benefit exchange.
(b) The board may establish technical advisory committees or seek
the advice of technical experts when necessary to execute the powers
and duties included in this act.
(8) Members of the board are not civilly or criminally liable and
may not have any penalty or cause of action of any nature arise against
them for any action taken or not taken, including any discretionary
decision or failure to make a discretionary decision, when the action
or inaction is done in good faith and in the performance of the powers
and duties under this act. Nothing in this section prohibits legal
actions against the board to enforce the board's statutory or
contractual duties or obligations.
(9) In recognition of the government to government relationship
between the state of Washington and the federally recognized tribes in
the state of Washington, the board shall consult with the American
Indian health commission on an ongoing basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 and 4 through 6 of this act, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise. Terms and phrases used in sections 1 and
4 through 6 of this act that are not defined in this section must be
defined as consistent with implementation of a state health benefit
exchange pursuant to the affordable care act.
(1) "Affordable care act" means the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the federal health
care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, or federal
regulations or guidance issued under the affordable care act.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority,
established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner, established in
Title 48 RCW.
(4) "Exchange" means a state health benefit exchange pursuant to
the affordable care act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) In collaboration with the joint
select committee on health reform implementation, the authority shall
apply for planning and establishment grants pursuant to the affordable
care act. Whenever possible, planning and establishment grant
applications shall allow for the possibility of partially funding the
activities of the joint select committee on health reform
implementation.
(b) The authority, in collaboration with the joint select committee
on health reform implementation, shall implement provisions of the
planning and establishment grants as approved by the United States
secretary of health and human services.
(2) Consistent with the work plan developed in subsection (3) of
this section, but in no case later than January 1, 2012, the authority,
in collaboration with the joint select committee on health reform
implementation, shall develop a broad range of options for establishing
and implementing a state-administered health benefit exchange. The
options must include analysis and recommendations on the following:
(a) The operations and administration of the exchange, including:
(i) The goals and principles of the exchange;
(ii) The creation and implementation of a single state-administered
exchange for all geographic areas in the state that operates as the
exchange for both the individual and small employer markets by January
1, 2014;
(iii) Whether and under what circumstances the state should
consider establishment of, or participation in, a regionally
administered multistate exchange;
(iv) Whether the role of an exchange includes serving as an
aggregator of funds that comprise the premium for a health plan offered
through the exchange;
(v) The administrative, fiduciary, accounting, contracting, and
other services to be provided by the exchange;
(vi) Coordination of the exchange with other state programs;
(vii) Development of sustainable funding for administration of the
exchange as of January 1, 2015; and
(viii) Recognizing the need for expedience in determining the
structure of needed information technology, the necessary information
technology to support implementation of exchange activities.
(b) Whether to adopt and implement a federal basic health plan
option as authorized in the affordable care act, whether the federal
basic health plan option should be administered by the entity that
administers the exchange or by a state agency, and whether the federal
basic health plan option should merge risk pools for rating with any
portion of the state's medicaid program;
(c) Individual and small group market impacts, including whether
to:
(i) Merge the risk pools for rating the individual and small group
markets in the exchange and the private health insurance markets; and
(ii) Increase the small group market to firms with up to one
hundred employees;
(d) Creation of a competitive purchasing environment for qualified
health plans offered through the exchange, including promoting
participation in the exchange to a level sufficient to provide
sustainable funding for the exchange;
(e) Certifying, selecting, and facilitating the offer of individual
and small group plans through an exchange, to include designation of
qualified health plans and the levels of coverage for the plans;
(f) The role and services provided by producers and navigators;
(g) Effective implementation of risk management methods, including:
Reinsurance, risk corridors, risk adjustment, to include the entity
designated to operate reinsurance and risk adjustment, and the
continuing role of the Washington state health insurance pool;
(h) Participation in innovative efforts to contain costs in
Washington's markets for public and private health care coverage;
(i) Providing federal refundable premium tax credits and reduced
cost-sharing subsidies through the exchange, including the processes
and entity responsible for determining eligibility to participate in
the exchange and the cost-sharing subsidies provided through the
exchange;
(j) The staff, resources, and revenues necessary to operate and
administer an exchange for the first two years of operation; and
(k) Any other areas identified by the joint select committee on
health reform implementation.
(3)(a) In collaboration with the joint select committee on health
reform implementation, the authority shall develop a work plan for the
development of options under subsection (2) of this section in
discrete, prioritized stages.
(b) The joint select committee on health reform implementation may
submit to the authority specific questions pertaining to the
establishment of a health benefit exchange under section 2 of this act.
(4) The authority shall consult with the commissioner, the joint
select committee on health reform implementation, and stakeholders
relevant to carrying out the activities required under this section,
including: (a) Educated health care consumers who are enrolled in
commercial health insurance coverage and publicly subsidized health
care programs; (b) individuals and entities with experience in
facilitating enrollment in health insurance coverage, including health
carriers, producers, and navigators; (c) representatives of small
businesses, employees of small businesses, and self-employed
individuals; (d) advocates for enrolling hard to reach populations and
populations enrolled in publicly subsidized health care programs; (e)
facilities and providers of health care; (f) representatives of
publicly subsidized health care programs; and (g) members in good
standing of the American academy of actuaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The authority may enter into:
(a) Information sharing agreements with federal and state agencies
and other state exchanges to carry out the provisions of this act:
PROVIDED, That such agreements include adequate protections with
respect to the confidentiality of the information to be shared and
comply with all state and federal laws and regulations; and
(b) Interdepartmental agreements with the office of the insurance
commissioner, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, and any other state agencies necessary to
implement this act.
(2) To the extent funding is available, the authority shall:
(a) Provide staff and resources to implement this act;
(b) Manage and administer the grant and other funds; and
(c) Expend funds specifically appropriated by the legislature to
implement the provisions of this act.

--- END ---