BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.074 and 1999 c 359 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A secured party who has a security interest in a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model that is located within a mobile home
park and who has a right to possession of the mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model under RCW ((62A.9-503)) 62A.9A-609, shall be liable
to the landlord from the date the secured party receives written notice
by certified mail, return receipt requested, for rent for occupancy of
the mobile home space under the same terms the tenant was paying prior
to repossession, and any other reasonable expenses incurred after the
receipt of the notice, until disposition of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model under RCW ((62A.9-504)) 62A.9A-610.
The notice of default by a tenant must state the amount of rent and the
amount and nature of any reasonable expenses that the secured party is
liable for payment to the landlord. The notice must also state that
the secured party will be provided a copy of the rental agreement
previously signed by the tenant and the landlord upon request.
(2) This section shall not affect the availability of a landlord's
lien as provided in chapter 60.72 RCW.
(3) As used in this section, "security interest" shall have the
same meaning as this term is defined in RCW 62A.1-201, and "secured
party" shall have the same meaning as this term is defined in RCW
((62A.9-105)) 62A.9A-102.
(4) For purposes of this section, "reasonable expenses" means any
routine maintenance and utility charges for which the tenant is liable
under the rental agreement.
(5) Any rent or other reasonable expenses owed by the secured party
to the landlord pursuant to this section shall be paid to the landlord
prior to the removal of the mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model from the mobile home park.
(6) If a secured party who has a secured interest in a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model that is located in a mobile home park
becomes liable to the landlord pursuant to this section, then the
relationship between the secured party and the landlord shall be
governed by the rental agreement previously signed by the tenant and
the landlord unless otherwise agreed, except that the term of the
rental agreement shall convert to a month-to-month tenancy. No waiver
is required to convert the rental agreement to a month-to-month
tenancy. Either the landlord or the secured party may terminate the
month-to-month tenancy upon giving written notice of thirty days or
more. The secured party and the landlord are not required to execute
a new rental agreement. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
be a waiver of any rights by the tenant.
(7) A secured party who has a right to possession of the mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model under RCW 62A.9A-609 is
responsible for removing the home or park model from the mobile home
park.

--- END ---