BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial directory" means a printed directory compiled for
a fee containing telephone numbers, advertisements, and other
commercial listings that are published and distributed to homes,
businesses, and other locations in Washington.
(2) "Distributor" means a business that delivers commercial
directories to homes, businesses, and other locations.
(3) "Publisher" means a business that produces commercial
directories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A publisher must offer to each
recipient of a commercial directory an opportunity to opt out of
receiving future commercial directories.
(b) A publisher must develop opt out procedures and provide clear
instructions to recipients regarding how they may opt out. Opt out
instructions must be printed on the front or back page of the
commercial directory. Recipients may notify publishers of their
preference to opt out electronically, by telephone, or by mail.
(2) Publishers shall provide the appropriate distributor with a
list of addresses of recipients who have requested to opt out prior to
distribution of the corresponding commercial directory.
(3) A distributor shall be in violation of this chapter if the
distributor delivers a commercial directory to a recipient whose
address appears on list of addresses of recipients who have requested
to opt out from receiving future commercial directories provided by the
publisher.
(4) A publisher shall be in violation of this chapter if (a) the
publisher knowingly omits an address from the list of addresses of
recipients who have requested to opt out from receiving future
commercial directories; and (b) a commercial directory that is produced
by that publisher is delivered by the distributor to that address.
(5) It is a class 2 civil infraction as provided under RCW 7.80.120
for a distributor to deliver a commercial directory to a recipient
after receiving from the publisher opt out notification for the
commercial directory for that recipient as described under this
section.
(6) It is a class 2 civil infraction as provided under RCW 7.80.120
for a publisher to knowingly omit an address from the list of addresses
of recipients who have requested to opt out and a commercial directory
is delivered to that address by the distributor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---