BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person shall be subject to penalties as provided in this
section if the person leaves a dog restrained or tied outside by use of
a tether, chain, rope, cord, pulley, trolley system, or other device
under any of the following circumstances:
(i) Between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m.;
(ii) For more than ten hours consecutively, or more than ten hours
within any twenty-four hour period;
(iii) During any severe weather advisories, warnings, or
emergencies that have been issued or declared by the national weather
service for the location at which the dog is tethered, unless the dog
is provided with natural or manmade shelter that is adequate to keep
the dog safe, dry, and protected under such conditions;
(iv) On the same chain, tether, rope, cord, pulley, trolley system,
or fixed point as another animal;
(v) In a manner that allows the dog to be within ten feet of any
public right-of-way;
(vi) In a manner that prevents the dog from lying, sitting, and
standing comfortably, and without the restraint becoming taut, and that
does not allow the dog a range of movement equal to at least three
times the length of the dog, measured from the tip of its nose to the
base of its tail;
(vii) In a manner that results, or could reasonably result, in the
dog becoming entangled on the restraint or another object;
(viii) If the dog is sick, injured, or in distress, in the advanced
stages of pregnancy, or under six months of age;
(ix) In a manner that results in the dog being left in unsafe or
unsanitary conditions, or that forces the dog to stand, sit, or lie
down in its own excrement or urine; or
(x) In a manner that causes injury or pain to the dog.
(b) A person shall be subject to penalties as provided in this
section if the person leaves a dog restrained or tied under
circumstances that do not meet the following requirements:
(i) Any tether, fastener, chain, tie, or other restraint must weigh
no more than one-eighth the body weight of the dog, and must be
attached to a properly fitted buckle-type harness or collar, not less
than one inch in width, that provides enough room between the collar or
harness and the dog's throat to allow normal breathing and swallowing.
(ii) Choke, pinch, or prong-type collars may not be used in
tethering, fastening, chaining, or tying a dog.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1)(a)(i) through (viii) of this
section do not apply to a dog:
(a) Tethered, chained, tied, or otherwise restrained while the dog
is receiving medical care or treatment under the supervision of a
licensed veterinarian;
(b) Participating temporarily in an exhibition, show, contest, or
other event in which the skill, breeding, or stamina of the dog is
judged or examined;
(c) Being kept temporarily at a camping or recreation area;
(d) Being cared for temporarily after having been picked up as a
stray or as part of a rescue operation;
(e) Being transported in a motor vehicle; or
(f) Being trained or used by a federal, state, or local law
enforcement agency or military or national guard unit.
(3) Each incident involving a violation of this section is a
separate offense. A person who violates this section is subject to the
following penalties:
(a) A first offense is a class 2 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120(1)(b).
(b) A subsequent offense is a misdemeanor under RCW 16.52.165.
(4) This section and section 2 of this act do not preempt
ordinances enacted by local jurisdictions that are more restrictive or
establish greater civil penalties or criminal penalties for unlawful
tethering.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A written exemption to section 1(1)(a) (i) or (ii) of this act,
or both, may be granted to an individual owner at the discretion of the
animal control authority with appropriate jurisdiction upon the owner's
demonstration of the following circumstances, which shall be documented
in writing:
(a) The existence of unusual circumstances that make the tethering
of a dog necessary for a duration, or during a time period, otherwise
prohibited by section 1(1)(a) (i) and (ii) of this act;
(b) That the dog is not tethered for more than sixteen hours in any
twenty-four hour period;
(c) That the dog is provided with necessary food and necessary
water, receives adequate exercise and socialization, and has access to
natural or manmade shelter that is sufficient to keep the dog safe,
dry, and protected from the elements; and
(d) That adequate precautions have been taken to safeguard the
health and safety of the dog, and to prevent the dog from being a
nuisance or danger to the public.
(2) A written exemption to section 1(1)(a) (i) or (ii) of this act,
or both, may be granted to an individual owner by the animal control
authority with the appropriate jurisdiction if the animal control
authority determines the owner has adequately demonstrated the
following circumstances, which shall be documented in writing:
(a) That the dog is an arctic breed, and the dog is used regularly
in competitive or recreational sled dog activities, or in training for
such activities;
(b) That the dog is provided with necessary food and necessary
water, receives adequate exercise and socialization, and has access to
natural or manmade shelter that is sufficient to keep the dog safe,
dry, and protected from the elements; and
(c) That adequate precautions have been taken to safeguard the
health and safety of the dog, and to prevent the dog from being a
nuisance or danger to the public.
(3) An exemption issued under this section may be revoked in
writing at any time by the animal control authority when the animal
control authority determines, in its discretion, that:
(a) The conditions required to obtain the exemption no longer
exist; or
(b) A well-founded complaint has been made alleging that the dog is
abused or neglected, has created a nuisance, or poses a threat to the
safety of people or domestic animals.
(4) Exemptions authorized under this section may be granted only on
a case-by-case basis to individual owners of dogs and shall not be
granted as blanket exemptions to multiple owners or groups of owners.
(5) Local jurisdictions may use a permitting or licensing process
to implement the exemptions authorized by this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 16.52.165 and 1982 c 114 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person convicted of any misdemeanor under RCW 16.52.080
((or)), 16.52.090, or section 1 of this act shall be punished by a fine
of not exceeding one hundred and fifty dollars, or by imprisonment in
the county jail not exceeding sixty days, or both such fine and
imprisonment, and shall pay the costs of the prosecution.

--- END ---