BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.260 and 2006 c 265 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency shall make application for a license or ((renewal
of)) the continuation of a full license to the department on forms
prescribed by the department. Upon receipt of such application, the
department shall either grant or deny a license or continuation of a
full license within ninety days. A license or continuation shall be
granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in this
chapter and the departmental requirements consistent with ((the
[this])) this chapter, except that an initial license may be issued as
provided in RCW 43.215.280. Full licenses provided for in this chapter
shall ((be issued for a period of three years)) continue to remain
valid so long as the licensee meets the requirements for a nonexpiring
license in subsection (2) of this section. The licensee, however,
shall advise the director of any material change in circumstances which
might constitute grounds for reclassification of license as to
category. The license issued under this chapter is not transferable
and applies only to the licensee and the location stated in the
application. For licensed family day care homes having an acceptable
history of child care, the license may remain in effect for two weeks
after a move.
(2) In order to qualify for a nonexpiring full license, a licensee
must meet the following requirements on an annual basis as established
from the date of initial licensure:
(a) Submit the annual licensing fee;
(b) Submit a declaration to the department indicating the
licensee's intent to continue operating a licensed child care program,
or the intent to cease operation on a date certain;
(c) Submit a declaration of compliance with all licensing rules;
and
(d) Submit background check applications on the schedule
established by the department.
(3) A licensee who fails to meet the requirements in subsection (2)
of this section for continuation of a full license will cause the
license to expire and must submit a new application for licensure under
this chapter.
(4) The department shall establish time frames for monitoring
visits of nonexpiring licensees not less than every eighteen months for
family day care providers and not less than every twelve months for
child day care centers and school-age programs. It is not the intent
of the legislature to limit more frequent monitoring as determined by
the department. For the purpose of this section, an agency is
considered to be in good standing if in the intervening period between
monitoring visits that agency does not have any of the following:
Valid complaints, a history of noncompliance related to those valid
complaints or pending from prior monitoring visits, or other
information that when evaluated would result in a finding of
noncompliance with this section. The department shall consider whether
an agency is in good standing when determining the most appropriate
approach and process for monitoring visits, for the purposes of
administrative efficiency while protecting children consistent with
this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.270 and 2006 c 265 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a licensee desires to apply for a renewal of its license, a
request for a renewal shall be filed ninety days before the expiration
date of the license. If the department has failed to act at the time
of the expiration date of the license, the license shall continue in
effect until such time as the department acts.
(2) License renewal under this section does not apply to
nonexpiring licenses described in RCW 43.215.260.

--- END ---