BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
qualified plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) As used in this subsection, "qualified plug-in hybrid electric
vehicles" means passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty
passenger vehicles that:
(a) Draw propulsion power from:
(i) A rechargeable traction battery with at least four kilowatt-hours of capacity; and
(ii) Directly or indirectly, an internal combustion engine; and
(b) Use an off-board source of energy to recharge such battery.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of RCW 82.12.020 do not apply in respect to the
use of new qualified plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.
(2) The term "qualified plug-in hybrid electric vehicles" has the
same meaning as in section 1 of this act.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The expiration of sections 1 and 2 of this
act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under the expired sections or under any rule or
order adopted under those statutes nor do they affect any proceeding
instituted under them.

--- END ---