BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The auditor shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance. Areas to
be assessed shall include quality management, productivity, fiscal
efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and oversight,
internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction, statutory
and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and online services.
As part of this program, the auditor shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees including front-line employees, and professionals with a
background in performance management for establishing the grading
standards. In developing the criteria, the auditor shall consider
already developed best practices and audit criteria used by government
or nongovernment organizations. Before the assessment, the agencies
must be given the criteria for the assessment and the standards for
grading;
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in either public sector reviews or technical expertise, or
both, in individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and
grading of all state agencies. The auditor may contract or partner
with more than one entity for different assessment areas; and
(3) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading must be posted on the
internet.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2010 c 106 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
((off-road and)) nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW ((46.09.020))
46.09.310, and snowmobiles ((as defined in RCW 46.10.010)) regulated
under chapter 46.10 RCW.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470
and the performance assessments and scorecard program in section 1 of
this act. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited
in the performance audits of government account created in RCW
43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0201 and 2006 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected
under RCW 82.12.020 based on the rate in RCW 82.08.020(1) shall be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits under RCW
43.09.470 and the performance assessments and scorecard program under
section 1 of this act. Revenue identified in this section shall be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.

--- END ---