BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.390 and 2009 c 564 s 931 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Starting in 2012, and at least once every three years
thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state quality
award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment of its
quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.
(2) Each agency shall provide the governor's office with an
electronic copy of its independent assessment application and any
feedback provided by the independent assessor.

--- END ---