BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.030 and 1995 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain
a private security guard license:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;
(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private
security guard, and the director determines that the license should be
withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director
shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment
rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(4) ((Be employed by or have an employment offer from a licensed
private security company or be licensed as a private security company;
(5))) Satisfy the training requirements established by the
director;
(((6))) (5) Submit a set of fingerprints;
(((7))) (6) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each
application; and
(((8))) (7) Submit a fully completed application that includes
proper identification on a form prescribed by the director ((for each
company of employment)).

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.105 and 2007 c 306 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote the safety of persons and the security of property,
the director shall ((meet)) convene and consult with interested parties
to develop ((lists of suggested)) a Washington state private security
training manual and a required curriculum for preassignment,
postassignment, and postassignment refresher training by rule.
(2) All security guards licensed on or after July 1, 2005, must
complete at least eight hours of preassignment training, comprised of
at least four hours of classroom instruction and an additional four
hours of classroom instruction or individual instruction, or both. The
preassignment training may be waived for any individual who was most
recently employed full time as a sworn peace officer or as a licensed
security guard not more than five years prior to applying to become
licensed as a private security guard and who passes the examination
typically administered to applicants at the conclusion of the
preassignment training.
(3)(a) All security guards licensed on or after July 1, 2005, must
complete at least eight hours of initial postassignment training that
shall be administered to each security guard. The initial
postassignment training must be in the topic areas established by the
director and may be classroom instruction or individual instruction, or
both. A company may waive the initial postassignment training for
security guards already licensed who transfer from another company, if
the security guard presents appropriate training records signed by a
department-certified trainer from the previous company, or a signed
affidavit that the individual has already completed the required
initial postassignment training provided by his or her previous
company.
(b) Security guards who received their temporary security guard
registration card on or before July 22, 2007, must receive their
initial postassignment training before June 30, 2008. Security guards
who received their temporary security guard registration card after
July 22, 2007, must receive their initial postassignment training as
specified in (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(c) Security guards licensed between January 1st and June 30th of
any calendar year may receive eight hours of initial postassignment
training any time between the day following the issuance of a temporary
security guard registration card with their company and June 30th of
the year following initial issuance of their license by the department.
(d) Security guards initially licensed between July 1st and
December 31st of any calendar year may receive eight hours of initial
postassignment training at any time between the day following the
issuance of a temporary security guard registration card with their
company and December 31st of the year following initial issuance of
their license by the department.
(4) Following completion of the preassignment and postassignment
training, at least four total hours of annual refresher training shall
be administered to security guards each subsequent year. The
subsequent year begins, for refresher training purposes, the day
following the last date the security guard is required to receive the
eight hours of initial postassignment training. No more than one hour
per year of annual refresher training may focus directly on customer
service-related skills or topics and the remaining three hours per year
of annual refresher training must focus on emergency response concepts,
skills, or topics including but not limited to knowledge of site post
orders or life safety.
(5) Companies must maintain records regarding the training hours
completed by each employee. All such records are subject to inspection
by the department. The training requirements and test results must be
recorded and attested to by a department-certified trainer. Training
records must contain a description of the topics covered, the name and
signature of the trainer, and the name and signature of the security
guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 18.170.110 (Required notice of certain occurrences) and
2000 c 171 s 39, 1995 c 277 s 8, & 1991 c 334 s 11; and
(2) RCW 18.170.165 (Transfer of license) and 1995 c 277 s 2.

--- END ---