BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.179 and 2009 c 462 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an additional
surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. ((During the 2009-11 and 2011-13 biennia)) Beginning
in the 2011-2013 biennium and continuing through the 2017-2019
biennium, the surcharge shall be ((thirty)) thirty-five dollars. The
funds collected pursuant to this section are to be distributed and used
as follows:
(a) The auditor ((shall)) must retain two percent for collection of
the fee, and of the remainder ((shall)) must remit ((sixty)) fifty-two
percent to the county to be deposited into a fund that must be used by
the county and its cities and towns to accomplish the purposes of
chapter ((484, Laws of 2005)) 43.185C RCW, six percent of which may be
used by the county for administrative costs related to its homeless
housing plan, and the remainder for programs which directly accomplish
the goals of the county's local homeless housing plan, except that for
each city in the county which elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080
to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the
surcharge assessed under this section equal to the percentage of the
city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the
county ((shall)) must be transmitted at least quarterly to the city
treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for
use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the
goals of the city's local homeless housing plan; of the funds received
by the city, it may use six percent for administrative costs for its
homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor ((shall)) must remit the remaining funds to the
state treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local
governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program. The
remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent is to be used by the
department to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to (a)
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust, or
(b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death or any
documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee under state law.

--- END ---