BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.230 and 2003 c 111 s 815 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor or, if applicable, the city clerk of a first-class or code city shall, in consultation with the participating
jurisdictions, adopt and publish administrative rules necessary to
facilitate the provisions of any ordinance authorizing production of a
local voters' pamphlet. Any amendment to such a rule shall also be
adopted and published. Copies of the rules shall identify the date
they were adopted or last amended and shall be made available to any
person upon request. One copy of the rules adopted by a county auditor
and one copy of any amended rules shall be submitted to the county
legislative authority. One copy of the rules adopted by a city clerk
and one copy of any amended rules shall be submitted to the city
legislative authority. These rules shall include but not be limited to
the following:
(1) Deadlines for decisions by cities, towns, or special taxing
districts on being included in the pamphlet;
(2) Limits on the length and deadlines for submission of arguments
for and against each measure;
(3) The basis for rejection of any explanatory or candidates'
statement or argument deemed to be libelous or otherwise inappropriate.
((Any statements by a candidate shall be limited to those about the
candidate himself or herself)) A candidate's statement submitted for
inclusion in the local voters' pamphlet shall not contain false or
misleading statements about the candidate's opponent;
(4) Limits on the length and deadlines for submission of
candidates' statements;
(5) An appeal process in the case of the rejection of any statement
or argument.

--- END ---