BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that voting by mail
has many advantages. However, the legislature also finds that the
postage, while only a small amount, amounts to the poll tax for many of
our citizens. The legislature finds that many citizens lack the
necessary funds to purchase the necessary postage to return his or her
ballot. The legislature further finds that in order to increase
participation in our democracy, we must lower all barriers to
participation in the democratic process. The legislature finds that
voting should be free for all citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.420 and 2003 c 111 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a
prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.
(2) The state shall reimburse counties for the cost of return
postage on mail and absentee ballots for primary and general elections.
(3) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy
election.
(((3))) (4) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of
these expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and
shall file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(((4))) (5) The secretary of state shall include in his or her
biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2010 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope in
which to return the security envelope, and instructions on how to mark
the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany a ballot for a partisan primary must
include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The voter's name and address must be
printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain a
declaration by the voter reciting his or her qualifications and stating
that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this
election, together with a summary of the penalties for any violation of
any of the provisions of this chapter. The declaration must clearly
inform the voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she is not a
United States citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has been
convicted of a felony and has not had his or her voting rights
restored; and, except as otherwise provided by law, it is illegal to
cast a ballot or sign a return envelope on behalf of another voter.
The return envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath.
It must also contain a space so that the voter may include a telephone
number. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The
return envelope may provide secrecy for the voter's signature and
optional telephone number. For overseas and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first-class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate
county auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued. Return envelopes for primary and general
election ballots shall include prepaid postage.
If the county auditor chooses to forward ballots, he or she must
include with the ballot a clear explanation of the qualifications
necessary to vote in that election and must also advise a voter with
questions about his or her eligibility to contact the county auditor.
This explanation may be provided on the ballot envelope, on an enclosed
insert, or printed directly on the ballot itself. If the information
is not included, the envelope must clearly indicate that the ballot is
not to be forwarded and that return postage is guaranteed.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2006 c 206 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be postmarked
not later than the date of the primary or election. Return envelopes
for primary and general election ballots shall include prepaid postage.
Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the office of the county
auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on
the date of the primary or election. All personnel assigned to verify
signatures on the return envelope must receive training on statewide
standards for signature verification.

--- END ---