BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 37.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state must retrocede to the United States the criminal
jurisdiction previously acquired by the state over Indians and Indian
territory, reservations, country, and lands in accordance with the
requirements of this section.
(2) To initiate the criminal jurisdiction retrocession process, a
majority of any tribe, tribal council, or other governing body that is
duly recognized by the United States bureau of Indian affairs must
submit a retrocession resolution to the governor. The resolution must
express the desire of the tribe, community, band, or group for the
retrocession by the state of all or any measures or provisions of the
criminal jurisdiction acquired by the state under RCW 37.12.010 and
37.12.030 over the Indians and Indian territory, reservations, country,
and lands of such Indian tribe, community, band, or group.
(3) Upon receiving a resolution under this section, the governor
must issue within sixty days a proclamation retroceding to the United
States the criminal jurisdiction previously acquired by the state over
the Indians and Indian territory, reservations, country, and lands
subject to the retrocession resolution.
(4) The proclamation for retrocession does not become effective
until it is accepted by a duly designated officer of the United States
government and in accordance with the procedures established by the
United States for the acceptance of such retrocession of jurisdiction.

--- END ---