BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.020 and 2010 c 181 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the
following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy
classes; counseling, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs,
outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education
or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other
services; or attendance at school or other educational programs
appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district.
Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;
(2) "Community-based sanctions" may include one or more of the
following:
(a) A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;
(b) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of
community restitution;
(3) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews;
(4) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the
court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an
order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order
for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other
offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the
mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to
inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community
supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of
the following:
(a) Community-based sanctions;
(b) Community-based rehabilitation;
(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;
(d) Posting of a probation bond;
(5) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of
social and health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may
operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention
facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate
detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days
imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served
consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;
(6) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the
juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);
(7) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the
respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:
(a) The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent
is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of
conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an
offense for the purposes of this chapter; or
(b) The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after
an advisement to the respondent that the criminal complaint would be
considered as part of the respondent's criminal history. A
successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before
July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of
the respondent's criminal history;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the
county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have
committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a
disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes
county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic
training camps, and electronic monitoring;
(10) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into
a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other
person, community accountability board, youth court under the
supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity except a law
enforcement official or entity, with whom the juvenile court
administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements
pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability
board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange
and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements
of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community
accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local
community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court
shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include
a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law
enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school
student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural
diversity of the local community;
(11) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family
home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by
the department, or other legally authorized care;
(12) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant
to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;
(13) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that
requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of
individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes
community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a
juvenile offender will commit further offenses;
(14) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is
under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not been
previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless
the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the
charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW
13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;
(15) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by
the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person
eighteen years of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended
under RCW 13.40.300;
(16) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which
contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to
bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;
(17) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; (c)
0-150 hours of community restitution; or (d) $0-$500 fine;
(18) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either
impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious,
and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;
(19) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of
the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work,
or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours;
restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas;
requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to
remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions
or limitations as the court may require which may not include
confinement;
(20) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if
committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance
of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under
the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;
(21) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or
physical intervention to control a juvenile offender or limit a
juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve
a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary
periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person
contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with
limited force and designed to:
(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would
result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;
(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave
the area voluntarily; or
(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another;
(22) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic;
(23) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security
by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the
offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with
court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered
pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of
cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by
the court;
(24) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;
(25) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to
the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for
injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical
treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from
physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably
related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement
for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible
losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies
or defenses available to the victim or offender;
(26) "Restorative justice" means practices, policies, and programs
informed by and sensitive to the needs of crime victims that are
designed to encourage offenders to accept responsibility for repairing
the harm caused by their offense by providing safe and supportive
opportunities for voluntary participation and communication between the
victim, the offender, their families, and relevant community members.
(27) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a
person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;
(((27))) (28) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant
secretary for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;
(((28))) (29) "Services" means services which provide alternatives
to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been
adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement
pursuant to this chapter;
(((29))) (30) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex
offense in RCW 9.94A.030;
(((30))) (31) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of
his or her sexual gratification;
(((31))) (32) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state
insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write
corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified
and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of
the case;
(((32))) (33) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means,
of an incarcerated pregnant youth from the institution or detention
facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution
or detention facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and
includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated youth from the
institution or detention facility to a transport vehicle and from the
vehicle to the other location;
(((33))) (34) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if
committed by an adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is
punishable by sanctions which do not include incarceration;
(((34))) (35) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030;
(((35))) (36) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the
supervision of the juvenile court.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.080 and 2004 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile
accused of an offense and a diversion unit whereby the juvenile agrees
to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements
may be entered into only after the prosecutor, or probation counselor
pursuant to this chapter, has determined that probable cause exists to
believe that a crime has been committed and that the juvenile committed
it. Such agreements shall be entered into as expeditiously as
possible.
(2) A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the
following:
(a) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours,
not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending
school;
(b) Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by
any victim;
(c) Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty
hours of educational or informational sessions at a community agency.
The educational or informational sessions may include sessions relating
to respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work ethics; good
citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For purposes of this section,
"community agency" may also mean a community-based nonprofit
organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The state shall not
be liable for costs resulting from the diversion unit exercising the
option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at up to
ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions;
(d) A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars;
(e) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school,
or work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical
areas; and
(f) Upon request of any victim or witness, requirements to refrain
from any contact with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the
juvenile.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, youth courts are not limited to the conditions imposed by
subsection (2) of this section in imposing sanctions on juveniles
pursuant to RCW 13.40.630.
(4) In assessing periods of community restitution to be performed
and restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a
diversion agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned
shall consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or
guardian. To the extent possible, the court officer shall advise the
victims of the juvenile offender of the diversion process, offer victim
impact letter forms and restitution claim forms, and involve members of
the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the
juvenile and advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion
agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.
(5)(a) A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months
and may include a period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of
the divertee.
(b) If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete
restitution to a victim, the time period limitations of this subsection
may be extended by an additional six months.
(c) If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by
the end of the additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be
referred to the juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the
amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In this order, the
court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the restitution,
including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full
restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection
(5)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a
maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile
court may extend the judgment for restitution an additional ten years.
The court may relieve the juvenile of the requirement to pay full or
partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court that
he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution
and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over
a ten-year period. If the court relieves the juvenile of the
requirement to pay full or partial restitution, the court may order an
amount of community restitution that the court deems appropriate. The
county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the order.
The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile
under obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for
modification of the restitution order.
(6) The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court
at any time prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.
(7) Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process
in all contacts with a diversion unit regardless of whether the
juveniles are accepted for diversion or whether the diversion program
is successfully completed. Such due process shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all
conditions in clearly understandable language;
(b) Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only
grounds for termination;
(c) No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without
being given a court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:
(i) Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the
diversion program; and
(ii) Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;
(d) The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall
include:
(i) Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;
(ii) The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;
(iii) A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on
and the reasons for termination, should that be the decision; and
(iv) Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially
violated the terms of his or her diversion agreement.
(e) The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which
the divertee was diverted:
(i) In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of
age; or
(ii) In superior court or the appropriate court of limited
jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen years of age or older.
(8) The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be
responsible for providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters
to effectively communicate during diversion unit hearings or
negotiations.
(9) The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee
of his or her rights as provided in this chapter.
(10) The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to a restorative
justice program, community-based counseling, or treatment programs.
(11) The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial
interview for purposes of advising the juvenile as to whether he or she
desires to participate in the diversion process or to appear in the
juvenile court. The juvenile may be represented by counsel at any
critical stage of the diversion process, including intake interviews
and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be fully advised at the
intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services
an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section, intake
interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.
The juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be
obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the
diversion unit together with the diversion agreement, and a copy of
both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language.
(12) When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the
juvenile court may receive only the following information for
dispositional purposes:
(a) The fact that a charge or charges were made;
(b) The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;
(c) The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;
(d) Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations
under such agreement; and
(e) The facts of the alleged offense.
(13) A diversion unit may refuse to enter into a diversion
agreement with a juvenile. When a diversion unit refuses to enter a
diversion agreement with a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such
juvenile to the court for action and shall forward to the court the
criminal complaint and a detailed statement of its reasons for refusing
to enter into a diversion agreement. The diversion unit shall also
immediately refer the case to the prosecuting attorney for action if
such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion agreement.
(14) A diversion unit may, in instances where it determines that
the act or omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to
it involved no victim, or where it determines that the juvenile
referred to it has no prior criminal history and is alleged to have
committed an illegal act involving no threat of or instance of actual
physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars in property
loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person or
firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such
a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this
subsection includes the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment programs or a restorative justice
program. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised
that the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been
referred shall constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as
defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such
advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall
be maintained by the unit, and a copy of the document shall be
delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The
supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content of such
advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversion unit for release as provided in this subsection shall
retain the same right to counsel and right to have his or her case
referred to the court for formal action as any other juvenile referred
to the unit.
(15) A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion
agreement entered into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and
which includes a period extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth
birthday.
(16) If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably
be paid due to a change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be
modified at the request of the divertee and with the concurrence of the
diversion unit to convert an unpaid fine into community restitution.
The modification of the diversion agreement shall be in writing and
signed by the divertee and the diversion unit. The number of hours of
community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted
at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.
(17) Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid
into the county general fund in accordance with procedures established
by the juvenile court administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used
only for juvenile services. In the expenditure of funds for juvenile
services, there shall be a maintenance of effort whereby counties
exhaust existing resources before using amounts collected under this
section.

--- END ---