BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that some licensed
child care centers seeking to operate in publicly owned or operated
buildings, such as public schools or municipal centers, incur
substantial costs to renovate spaces which have otherwise been deemed
safe for children to use for other purposes, such as public education.
Consequently, families have been forced to seek before or after school
child care outside of the school building, resulting in additional
transitions for students.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to allow licensed child care
centers to operate in facilities that have otherwise been deemed safe
and healthy for children to use for other purposes, such as public
education. With respect to section 2(2) of this act, the legislature
intends that the development of any related child care licensing
requirements shall:
(a) Ensure safe and healthy environments for children;
(b) Utilize existing rule-making processes and resources;
(c) Utilize existing requirements as a starting point rather than
create an entirely new set of requirements; and
(d) Not overburden child care centers with additional licensing
requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.200 and 2007 c 415 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the director's duty with regard to licensing:
(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to
designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed, including child care centers
under subsection (2) of this section, as may be appropriate whether
because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the
children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or
size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any
other factor relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the
director shall use an interagency process to address requirements for
child care centers operated in publicly owned or operated buildings,
such as public schools or municipal centers, in which there are
existing prekindergarten or school age educational programs;
(3) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents
or guardians, and persons representative of the various type agencies
to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing
applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed
under this chapter;
(((3))) (4) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the
director shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of
each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other
persons having unsupervised access to children in care;
(((4))) (5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant
to this chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an
agency is authorized to render and the ages and number of children to
be served;
(((5))) (6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents
of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to
require regular reports from each licensee;
(((6))) (7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether
or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements
adopted under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at
least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after
consultation with affected groups for child day care requirements; and
(((8))) (9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to
help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early
learning of children.

--- END ---