BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
agriculture industry is vital to the health and well-being of the state
and its residents. This industry employs one hundred sixty thousand
persons, has an economic value of thirty-eight billion dollars, and
represents twelve percent of the state's economy. Additionally, the
legislature recognizes that the agricultural community has a deeply
vested interest in protecting the natural functions of the land, as
clean water and a healthy environment are essential to the community's
livelihood.
The legislature finds also that agricultural production has been
decreasing in recent years and that many production and production-related businesses have either closed or relocated to other locations
with more favorable regulatory environments. These trends are
especially troubling, as the agriculture industry provides fresh and
nutritious foods for our residents and prevents Washingtonians from
relying upon products produced in other states and nations.
The legislature further finds that twelve state agencies and twelve
federal agencies have jurisdiction over agricultural activities.
Additionally, water quality is regulated by five state agencies and two
federal agencies. Although the legislature may not have intended to
overburden the agriculture industry with government regulation, the
industry, with its many small and family businesses, has seen the
number of applicable regulations and regulators steadily increase. The
legislature, therefore, intends to provide relief to the agriculture
industry by extending a moratorium on the amendment or adoption of
development regulations adopted under the growth management act to
protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural
activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.560 and 2010 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the period beginning May 1, 2007, and concluding July 1,
((2011)) 2012, counties and cities may not amend or adopt critical area
ordinances under RCW 36.70A.060(2) as they specifically apply to
agricultural activities. Nothing in this section:
(a) Nullifies critical area ordinances adopted by a county or city
prior to May 1, 2007, to comply with RCW 36.70A.060(2);
(b) Limits or otherwise modifies the obligations of a county or
city to comply with the requirements of this chapter pertaining to
critical areas not associated with agricultural activities; or
(c) Limits the ability of a county or city to adopt or employ
voluntary measures or programs to protect or enhance critical areas
associated with agricultural activities.
(2) Counties and cities subject to deferral requirements under
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Should implement voluntary programs to enhance public resources
and the viability of agriculture. Voluntary programs implemented under
this subsection (2)(a) must include measures to evaluate the successes
of these programs; and
(b) Must review and, if necessary, revise critical area ordinances
as they specifically apply to agricultural activities to comply with
the requirements of this chapter by December 1, ((2012)) 2013.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 36.70A.5601, "agricultural
activities" means agricultural uses and practices currently existing or
legally allowed on rural land or agricultural land designated under RCW
36.70A.170 including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or
increasing agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural
crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in
which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, when the replacement
facility is no closer to a critical area than the original facility;
and maintaining agricultural lands under production or cultivation.
(4) This section expires December 1, 2013.

Sec. 3 2010 c 203 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
((This act)) RCW 36.70A.5601 expires December 1, 2012.

--- END ---