BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Billing entity" means the landlord or third-party billing
agent responsible for billing multiunit building tenants for master
metered or unmetered utility services.
(2) "Billing practices" means the practices of a billing entity
that apportions and bills multiunit building tenants for master metered
or unmetered utility services provided to the multiunit building as a
whole by an apportioning methodology.
(3) "Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030, and has
the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030 with regard to mobile home parks.
(4) "Master metered utility services" means utility services
supplied to more than one unit in a multiunit building and measured
through a single, inclusive metering system.
(5) "Methodology" means any method, technique, or criterion used to
apportion to tenants charges billed to the landlord by the utility for
master metered or unmetered utility services including, but not limited
to, ratio utility billing systems, submetering systems, and hot water
metering systems.
(6) "Multiunit building" means a residential building, group of
buildings, or mobile home park, with three or more dwelling units, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or mobile home lots, as defined in RCW
59.20.030, with master metered or unmetered utility services that are
provided to the building or group of buildings as a whole.
(7) "Ratio utility billing system" means any method by which the
cost of master metered or unmetered utility services provided to
tenants and common areas of a multiunit building are apportioned to
tenants through the use of a formula that estimates the utility usage
of each rental unit in the multiunit building.
(8) "Rental agreement" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.
(9) "Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030, and has the
same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030 with regard to mobile home parks.
(10) "Third-party billing agent" means any entity retained or
authorized by a landlord as a billing entity.
(11) "Unmetered utility services" means utilities provided to more
than one unit of a multiunit building, in which the bill from the
utility is based on a method other than a meter and includes, but is
not limited to, sewer and solid waste services.
(12) "Utilities" or "utility services" means water, sewer, and
solid waste services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A landlord of a multiunit building shall
not bill tenants for utility services separately from rent except as
permitted in this chapter. Utility services for common areas of the
multiunit building may not be included in any separate billing for
utility services under this chapter.
(2) This chapter does not prevent a landlord from including a
tenant's cost of master metered or unmetered utility services within
the rent set forth in a rental agreement, and the practice of including
that cost within a tenant's rent is not a billing practice or
methodology affected by this chapter.
(3) This chapter does not affect the practices used by public
utilities to bill and collect residential multiunit building owners or
landlords for master metered or unmetered utility services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A landlord may, or may authorize a third-party billing agent to, bill tenants of a multiunit building for master
metered or unmetered utility services provided to the tenants, only if
the following requirements are met:
(1) Billing practices may be adopted only upon advance written
notice to a tenant as part of a new or renewed rental agreement.
Tenants must receive written notice of the billing practices at least
thirty days before expiration of their rental agreements or, in the
case of month-to-month tenancies, at least thirty days before the
billing practices become effective. If billing practices are already
in place on the effective date of this section, written notice must be
given within thirty days of the effective date of this section. An
additional written notice must also be given at least thirty days prior
to the due date of the next rental payment in order to implement a
change in billing agents, apportionment methodology, fees, or other
terms and conditions of the billing practices.
(2) The notice required under subsection (1) of this section must
include a detailed written disclosure of the methodology used by the
billing entity to allocate the charges to each tenant, along with all
other terms and conditions of the billing arrangement. If submetering
is used, the notice must also include descriptions of the location of
the submeter and any access requirements to tenant dwelling units or
mobile home lots for submeter installation, reading, repair,
maintenance, or inspections, including removal of the submeter for
testing. Access requirements must be consistent with RCW 59.18.150, or
RCW 59.20.130 for mobile home parks.
(3) A landlord shall post in a conspicuous location in a common
area of the multiunit building copies of the three most current utility
bills for master metered or unmetered utility services provided to the
building as a whole, with a written description of the methodology used
to allocate the utility service charges to each tenant. Landlords
shall keep records of the utility bills on file in the building for at
least two years and shall make such records available to tenants for
inspection and copying upon request. When it is physically
impracticable to keep the records on file in the building, the landlord
may store the records in another location and must make the records
available within five business days upon request.
(4)(a) The total of all charges for any utility services included
in the bills sent to all units may not cumulatively exceed the amount
of the bill sent by the utility to the landlord for the multiunit
building or the covered dwelling units or mobile home lots in the
multiunit building as a whole, less any late charges, interest, or
other penalties owed by the landlord, with the exception of the
following, which may be included in each bill covering an individual
dwelling unit or mobile home lot:
(i) A service charge;
(ii) Late payment charges; and
(iii) Insufficient funds check charges for dishonored checks.
(b) Service charges, late payment charges, and insufficient funds
check charges must be reasonable, and must be a flat fee or schedule of
fees disclosed in the billing practices notices. Late payment charges
may not accrue until at least twenty-one days after the date the bill
was mailed to the tenant or until twenty-one days after the bill was
delivered to the tenant if the bill was not mailed.
(5) Any third-party billing agent must be properly registered and
licensed to do business in this state and must be in compliance with
all applicable state laws and rules, and all applicable state license
identification numbers, if any, must be disclosed upon request.
(6) Each billing statement sent to a tenant by a billing entity
must disclose all required information in a clear and conspicuous
manner and at minimum must:
(a) Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the
billing entity;
(b) Identify the basis for each separate charge, including service
charges and late charges, if any, as a line item, and show the total
amount of the bill;
(c) If the building units are submetered, include the current and
previous meter readings, the current read date, and the amount
consumed, or the amount estimated to have been consumed if the utility
has provided the landlord with an estimated bill;
(d) Specify the due date, the date upon which the bill becomes
overdue, the amount of any late charges or penalties that may apply,
and the date upon which the late charges or penalties may be imposed;
(e) Identify any past due dollar amounts;
(f) Identify a mailing address and telephone number for billing
inquiries and dispute resolution, identify the entity responsible for
resolving billing inquiries and disputes and its business hours and
days of availability, and describe the process used to resolve disputes
related to bills as set forth in this chapter; and
(g) Include a statement to the effect that "this bill is from
(landlord name) and not from (utility company name)."
(7) If a utility company has billed the landlord using an estimate
of utility services consumed, the billing agent may estimate the
charges to be billed to tenants until billing based on actual
consumption resumes.
(8) If the billing entity uses a ratio utility billing system as
the methodology of allocating utility services to each tenant, each
occupant as listed on the lease must be counted as one occupant. A
ratio utility billing system may not allocate the utilities based on
square footage of the dwelling units.
(9) If submetering is used as a way of allocating master metered
utility services to tenants, individual submeters must be accurate and
regularly maintained and must be read on a monthly basis prior to each
billing.
(10) A dispute resolution process must be available for a tenant to
contest and resolve billing disputes. No dispute resolution provision
may require a tenant to pursue a remedy in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2012, the state building code council shall adopt
rules requiring the installation of water submeters in all residential
multiunit buildings that are occupied or are likely to be occupied by
persons who rent or lease individual dwelling units.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must:
(a) Apply to all new construction of residential multiunit
buildings, existing residential multiunit buildings, and conversions of
buildings to residential multiunit buildings;
(b) Require the installation of water submeters in all newly
constructed residential multiunit buildings, and conversions of
buildings to residential multiunit buildings, by January 1, 2014;
(c) Require the installation of water submeters in all existing
residential multiunit buildings by January 1, 2018, except as provided
in (d) of this subsection;
(d) Require the installation of water submeters in existing
residential multiunit buildings as part of any substantial renovation
or remodel of the building, or as part of a renovation or remodel that
includes the replacement of plumbing fixtures; and
(e) Allow the installation of water submeters in complexes with
multiple residential multiunit buildings to occur one building at a
time.
(3) For purposes of this section, "residential multiunit building"
means common wall residential buildings or group of buildings that
consists of three or more dwelling units.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Residential rental property meeting the requirements of this
section is exempt from property taxation as specified in subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) To qualify for a property tax exemption under this section,
water submetering must be installed throughout the entire residential
rental property between the effective date of this section and January
1, 2018. Residential real property meeting the requirements of this
section is exempt from one hundred percent of real property taxes
payable in the year following the year in which the water submetering
is fully installed.
(3) A property owner seeking an exemption must submit an
application to the county assessor on forms prescribed by the
department and provided by the county assessor. A property owner must
submit the application to the county assessor by December 31st for
taxes payable in the following year. A property owner may not submit
an application until the installation of all water submetering is
complete, and the application must be submitted in the same year the
water submetering installation is completed.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Residential multiunit building" means common wall residential
buildings or group of buildings that consists of three or more dwelling
units.
(b) "Residential rental property" means a residential multiunit
building or buildings on a contiguous parcel of land that constitutes
a single rental complex and includes the land upon which the dwelling
unit or units stand.
(c) "Water submetering" means a system that allows a property owner
of residential multiunit buildings to bill tenants for individual
measured water usage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect January
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---