BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.105.060 and 2005 c 155 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout chapters 79.105
through 79.145 RCW unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas,
and the beds of navigable waters.
(2) "Beds of navigable waters" means those lands lying waterward of
and below the line of navigability on rivers and lakes not subject to
tidal flow, or extreme low tide mark in navigable tidal waters, or the
outer harbor line where harbor area has been created.
(3) "First-class shorelands" means the shores of a navigable lake
or river belonging to the state, not subject to tidal flow, lying
between the line of ordinary high water and the line of navigability,
or inner harbor line where established and within or in front of the
corporate limits of any city or within two miles of either side.
(4) "First-class tidelands" means the shores of navigable tidal
waters belonging to the state, lying within or in front of the
corporate limits of any city, or within one mile of either side and
between the line of ordinary high tide and the inner harbor line; and
within two miles of the corporate limits on either side and between the
line of ordinary high tide and the line of extreme low tide.
(5) "Harbor area" means the area of navigable waters determined as
provided in Article XV, section 1 of the state Constitution, which
shall be forever reserved for landings, wharves, streets, and other
conveniences of navigation and commerce.
(6) "Improvements" when referring to state-owned aquatic lands
means anything considered a fixture in law placed within, upon, or
attached to aquatic lands that has changed the value of those lands, or
any changes in the previous condition of the fixtures that changes the
value of the land.
(7) "Inflation rate" means for a given year the percentage rate of
change in the previous calendar year's all commodity producer price
index of the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department
of commerce. If the index ceases to be published, the department shall
designate by rule a comparable substitute index.
(8) "Inner harbor line" means a line located and established in
navigable waters between the line of ordinary high tide or ordinary
high water and the outer harbor line, constituting the inner boundary
of the harbor area.
(9) "Log booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of
the water, assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their
movement in water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting
activities taking place in the water, and the temporary holding of logs
to be taken directly into a processing facility. "Log booming" does
not include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel.
(10) "Log storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or
otherwise prepared for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not
include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel or processing facility.
(11) "Nonwater-dependent use" means a use that can operate in a
location other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail
stores, and warehouses not part of a marine terminal or transfer
facility.
(12) "Outer harbor line" means a line located and established in
navigable waters as provided in Article XV, section 1 of the state
Constitution, beyond which the state shall never sell or lease any
rights whatever to private persons.
(13) "Person" means any private individual, partnership,
association, organization, cooperative, firm, corporation, the state or
any agency or political subdivision thereof, any public or municipal
corporation, or any unit of government, however designated.
(14) "Port district" means a port district created under Title 53
RCW.
(15) "Public utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar
facilities for distribution of water, electricity, natural gas,
telephone, other electronic communication, and sewers, including sewer
outfall lines.
(16) "Real rate of return" means the average for the most recent
ten calendar years of the average rate of return on conventional real
property mortgages as reported by the federal home loan bank board or
any successor agency, minus the average inflation rate for the most
recent ten calendar years.
(17) "Second-class shorelands" means the shores of a navigable lake
or river belonging to the state, not subject to tidal flow, lying
between the line of ordinary high water and the line of navigability,
and more than two miles from the corporate limits of any city.
(18) "Second-class tidelands" means the shores of navigable tidal
waters belonging to the state, lying outside of and more than two miles
from the corporate limits of any city, and between the line of ordinary
high tide and the line of extreme low tide.
(19) "Shorelands," where not preceded by "first-class" or "second-class," means both first-class shorelands and second-class shorelands.
(20) "State-owned aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, the beds of navigable waters, and waterways owned by the
state and administered by the department or managed under RCW
79.105.420 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not
include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of,
state agencies other than the department.
(21) "Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with
facilities for care and handling of either cargo or passengers, or
both.
(22) "Tidelands," where not preceded by "first-class" or "second-class," means both first-class tidelands and second-class tidelands.
(23) "Valuable materials" when referring to state-owned aquatic
lands means any product or material within or upon lands, such as
forest products, forage, stone, gravel, sand, peat, agricultural crops,
and all other materials of value except mineral, coal, petroleum, and
gas as provided for under chapter 79.14 RCW. However, RCW 79.140.190
and 79.140.200 also apply to materials provided for under chapter 79.14
RCW.
(24) "Water-dependent use" means a use that cannot logically exist
in any location but on the water. Examples include, but are not
limited to: Water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities;
ferry terminals; watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft construction, repair, and maintenance;
moorage and launching facilities; aquaculture; log booming; houseboats
and houseboat moorages; and public fishing piers and parks.
(25) "Water-oriented use" means a use that historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could
be located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish
processing, petroleum refining, sand and gravel processing, and log
storage((, and house boats)). For the purposes of determining rent
under this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on state-owned
aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted on
the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October
1, 1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use
other than a water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as
a nonwater-dependent use. If continuation of the existing use requires
leasing additional state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the
shoreline management act of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may
allow reasonable expansion of the water-oriented use.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.270 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 27 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this statute shall constitute authority for
requiring or ordering the removal of any structures, improvements,
docks, fills, or developments placed in navigable waters prior to
December 4, 1969, and the consent and authorization of the state of
Washington to the impairment of public rights of navigation, and
corollary rights incidental thereto, caused by the retention and
maintenance of said structures, improvements, docks, fills or
developments are hereby granted: PROVIDED, That the consent herein
given shall not relate to any structures, improvements, docks, fills,
or developments placed on tidelands, shorelands, or beds underlying
said waters which are in trespass or in violation of state statutes.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or
abridging any private right of action, other than a private right which
is based upon the impairment of public rights consented to in
subsection (1) hereof.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or
abridging the authority of the state or local governments to suppress
or abate nuisances or to abate pollution.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to any case pending
in the courts of this state on June 1, 1971, relating to the removal of
structures, improvements, docks, fills, or developments based on the
impairment of public navigational rights.
(5) Houseboats and houseboat moorages permitted or legally
established prior to January 1, 2011, shall be classified as conforming
water-dependent uses.

--- END ---