BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.16.050 and 2007 c 218 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established in the treasury of each
municipality a fund which shall be known and designated as the
firefighters' pension fund, which shall consist of: (((1))) (a) All
bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid thereto;
(((2))) (b) twenty-five percent of all moneys received by the state
from taxes on fire insurance premiums; (((3))) (c) taxes paid pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 41.16.060; (((4))) (d) interest on the
investments of the fund; and (((5))) (e) contributions by firefighters
as provided for herein.
(2) The moneys received from the tax on fire insurance premiums
under the provisions of this chapter shall be distributed in the
proportion that the number of paid firefighters in the city, town, or
fire protection district bears to the total number of paid firefighters
throughout the state to be ascertained in the following manner: The
secretary of the firefighters' pension board of each city, town, and
fire protection district now or hereafter coming under the provisions
of this chapter shall within thirty days after June 7, 1961, and on or
before the fifteenth day of January thereafter, certify to the state
treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the fire department in
such city, town, or fire protection district.
(a) For any city or town annexed by a fire protection district at
any time before, on, or after June 9, 1994, the city or town shall
continue to certify to the state treasurer the number of paid
firefighters in the city or town fire department immediately before
annexation until all obligations against the firefighters' pension fund
in the city or town have been satisfied. For the purposes of the
calculation in this ((section)) subsection, the state treasurer shall
subtract the number certified by the annexed city or town from the
number of paid firefighters certified by an annexing fire protection
district.
(b) For any city or town that enters into a regional fire
protection service authority formed under chapter 52.26 RCW, the city
or town shall continue to certify to the state treasurer the number of
paid firefighters in the city or town fire department immediately
before entering into the regional fire protection service authority
until all obligations against the firefighters' pension fund in the
city or town have been satisfied.
(3) The state treasurer shall on or before the first day of June of
each year deliver to the treasurer of each city, town, and fire
protection district coming under the provisions of this chapter his or
her warrant, payable to each city, town, or fire protection district
for the amount due such city, town or fire protection district
ascertained as herein provided and the treasurer of each such city,
town, or fire protection district shall place the amount thereof to the
credit of the firefighters' pension fund of such city, town, or fire
protection district.

--- END ---