BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to phase out the use
of copper-based antifouling paints used on recreational water vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative antifouling paint" means a pesticide, adjuvant,
solvent, resin, or pigment containing coating or compound applied to
the submerged portion of a recreational water vessel's hull to prevent
growth of marine organisms. Alternative antifouling paints must use
active ingredients other than copper-based pesticides to control
biofouling.
(2) "Antifouling paint" means a pesticide, adjuvant, solvent,
resin, or pigment containing copper coating or a copper-based compound
applied to the submerged portion of a recreational water vessel's hull
to prevent growth of marine organisms.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(5) "Recreational water vessel" means a watercraft intended for use
on the water for recreational purposes that is sixty-five feet in
length or less and includes chartered recreational watercraft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Beginning January 1, 2017, no manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or distributor may sell or offer for sale in this
state any new recreational water vessel with antifouling paint
containing copper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Beginning January 1, 2027, no manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or distributor may sell or offer for sale in this
state any new or used recreational water vessel with antifouling paint
containing copper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall enforce the
requirements of this chapter.
(2) Enforcement of this chapter by the department must rely on
notification and information exchange between the department and
manufacturers, wholesalers, retailers, and distributors of recreational
water vessels. The department shall issue one warning letter by
certified mail to a manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or distributor
that sells or offers for sale a recreational water vessel with
antifouling paint in violation of this chapter. The department shall
offer information or other appropriate assistance regarding compliance
with this chapter. Once a warning letter has been issued to a
manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or distributor for violations under
subsection (3) of this section, the department need not provide warning
letters for subsequent violations by that manufacturer, wholesaler,
retailer, or distributor. If compliance is not achieved, the
department may assess penalties under this section.
(3) A recreational water vessel manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer,
or distributor that violates this chapter is subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation.
(4)(a) A recreational water vessel manufacturer, wholesaler,
retailer, or distributor that violates this chapter must notify the
registered owner of the recreational water vessel, if any, within six
months of knowledge of the violation and must replace at no cost to the
owner the noncompliant antifouling paint with an alternative
antifouling paint that complies with this chapter.
(b) A recreational water vessel manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer,
or distributor that fails to provide the required notification under
(a) of this subsection within six months of knowledge of the violation
is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand
dollars.
(c) A recreational water vessel manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer,
or distributor that fails to provide the required notification under
(a) of this subsection after twelve months of knowledge of the
violation is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
dollars per recreational water vessel.
(5) Before the effective date of the prohibitions in sections 3 and
4 of this act, the department shall prepare and distribute information
about the prohibitions to manufacturers, wholesalers, retailers, and
distributors to the maximum extent practicable.
(6) All penalties collected under this chapter must be deposited in
the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) On or after January 1, 2016, the
director may establish and maintain a statewide advisory committee to
assist the department in implementing the requirements of this chapter.
(2) If a statewide advisory committee is established by the
director, the director shall appoint a balanced representation of
interests on the committee.
(3) Participation on the statewide advisory committee is voluntary
and members are not eligible for any form of compensation, including
reimbursement for expenses incurred as a result of participating on the
committee.
(4)(a) The department shall review available scientific studies and
other relevant information to determine how antifouling paints and
alternative antifouling paints are affecting marine organisms and water
quality. The department shall report its findings to the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2016.
(b) If the statewide advisory committee is established, the
department may consult with the committee to prepare the report
required under (a) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Beginning January 1, 2024, no antifouling
paint containing more than 0.5 percent of copper may be offered for
sale in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department may adopt rules necessary to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---