BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.02.075 and 1995 c 403 s 1007 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The department shall collect a handling fee ((of fifteen
dollars)) on each master application((. The entire master application
fee shall be deposited in the master license fund.
(2) The department shall collect a fee of nine dollars on)) and
each renewal application filing. ((Renewal application fees shall))
The department shall set the amount of the handling fees by rule, as
authorized by RCW 19.02.030. The handling fees may not exceed nineteen
dollars for each master application, and eleven dollars for each
renewal application filing, and must be deposited in the master license
fund.

--- END ---