BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) One of the goals of the juvenile justice system is to
rehabilitate juvenile offenders and promote their successful
reintegration into society. Without opportunities to reintegrate,
juveniles suffer increased recidivism and decreased economic function.
(2) The unrestricted dissemination of juvenile records can hinder
social reintegration when inaccurate, outdated, or personal information
regarding the juvenile remains in the public realm.
(3) Limiting the number of mechanisms for accessing juvenile
records and the number of places where they may be housed can increase
overall public record accuracy while promoting rehabilitation and
integration.
(4) The public has an interest in accessing information relating to
juvenile records for public safety and research purposes.
(5) The public's legitimate interest in accessing personal
information must be balanced with the rehabilitative goals of the
juvenile justice system. All benefit when former juvenile offenders,
after paying their debt to society, reintegrate and contribute to their
local communities as productive citizens.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature to balance the
rehabilitative and reintegration needs of an effective juvenile justice
system with the public's need to access personal information for public
safety and research purposes.
(7) It is the intent of the legislature that juvenile adjudication
records be automatically restricted from public access when an
individual meets the eligibility requirements set forth in RCW
13.50.050(12).

Sec. 2 RCW 13.50.010 and 2010 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Consumer reporting agency" means a person, or corporation who,
for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly
engages in whole or in part in the business of assembling, aggregating,
or evaluating information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing
consumer reports to third parties, and who uses any means or facility
of commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer
reports. For purposes of this chapter, offices, programs, or
facilities run by the state of Washington or employees therein are not
consumer reporting agencies;
(b) "Deidentified record" means any record in which the name,
address, and personalized identifying markers are removed;
(c) "Disseminate" means to disclose information contained in
juvenile records or the fact of the absence of such information to any
person;
(d) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombudsman,
the department of social and health services and its contracting
agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having
children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight
committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(((b))) (e) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of
the juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(((c))) (f) "Records" or "juvenile records" means the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and records of any other juvenile
justice or care agency in the case;
(((d))) (g) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing
the records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the sentencing guidelines commission records
needed for its research and data-gathering functions under RCW
9.94A.850 and other statutes. Access to records or information for
research purposes shall be permitted only if the anonymity of all
persons mentioned in the records or information will be preserved.
Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile justice or care
agency records for research purposes shall present a notarized
statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles and parents
will remain confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
sentencing guidelines commission under RCW 9.94A.850 upon request. The
commission shall not disclose the names of any juveniles or parents
mentioned in the records without the named individual's written
permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A consumer reporting agency that collects personally
identifiable information pertaining to, or including, juvenile records
about an individual residing in Washington may not disseminate the
information contained within the record, including the existence or
nonexistence of such record, to any third party.
(2) A consumer reporting agency that collects personally
identifiable information pertaining to, or including, juvenile records
about an individual residing in Washington may disseminate deidentified
records for purposes of social science research, trend data, and
generalized aggregation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by section 3 of
this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of section 3 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The administrative office of the courts
shall convene a work group of stakeholders to develop recommendations
that would cost-effectively restrict the public access to juvenile
records where an individual has met the statutory requirements of RCW
13.50.050(12) and without requiring individuals who are the subject of
the records to file a motion to seal in juvenile court. The members of
the work group shall be representatives from the administrative office
of the courts, the judicial information systems data dissemination
committee, the association of clerks, the Washington defender
association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington state patrol, and a member of the Washington state bar
association juvenile law section. The work group shall develop
recommendations and report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2011.

--- END ---