BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in the
knowledge-based, globally interdependent economy of the twenty-first
century, postsecondary education is the most indispensable form of
currency. Public institutions of higher education are drivers of
economic growth and job creation and incubators for innovation. An
educated citizenry is a critical component of our democracy, and a
commitment to provide public funding for public higher education
institutions is imperative. At the same time, the legislature finds
that Washington state is experiencing a profound structural shift in
the funding of higher education. State support has declined
dramatically over the past twenty years, thereby necessitating
increases in tuition to supplant the support of higher education from
general taxpayers. The problem faced by all stakeholders - students
and their families, institutions, and policymakers - is a growing
reliance on tuition dollars and a reduced reliance on state support.
At the same time, there is insufficient visibility into the use of
locally retained tuition dollars. There is little transparency
regarding whether increasing tuition dollars gives students, their
families, and Washington taxpayers a high-value return on investment.
Responding to those concerns, and recognizing that tuition-setting
authority is interrelated to a wide variety of factors including state
funding, student aid, admissions, dual credit, educational
effectiveness, regulatory and reporting requirements, and other
policies and practices, this higher education opportunity act directs
a number of higher education system reforms.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Ensure that tuition dollars are spent to improve student
access, affordability, and the quality of education;
(b) Establish a clear nexus between tuition dollars and improved
productivity and greater accountability of public institutions of
higher education;
(c) Create a modern and robust higher education financial system
that funds outcomes and results rather than input and process; and
(d) Continue a commitment to public funding of higher education
through state appropriations that are essential for providing access,
affordability, and quality in higher education for all students across
the state.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the legislature to set goals for four-year institutions of higher education to increase the number of
students who earn baccalaureate degrees, while maintaining quality, and
achieve the following initial degree completion targets by 2018:
(i) Increasing the number of bachelor's degrees earned by
Washington's resident students from the 2009-10 academic year levels by
at least six thousand degrees completed or by twenty-seven percent;
(ii) Consistent with the priority for expanding the number of
enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics, at least
two thousand of the additional degrees under this subsection (3)(a)
would be awarded in the areas of science, which includes agriculture
and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences, computer and
information sciences, engineering and engineering technologies, health
professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and statistics, and
physical sciences and science technologies; and
(iii) Attaining parity in degree attainment for students from
underrepresented groups, which would mean that at least nineteen
percent of the degrees awarded would include students who are low-income or are the first in their families to attend college.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the bachelor degree
completion targets in (a) of this subsection be updated every two years
based upon the state's changing population and economic needs and that
targets be set for five-year periods following the 2018 target.
(c) It is the intent of the legislature to urge four-year
institutions of higher education to place the highest priority on
achieving the degree completion targets under (a) of this subsection.
The legislature intends to examine the strategies used and progress
made by institutions of higher education to meet the targets in
addition to evidence of increased cost-effectiveness and efficiency.
The legislature recognizes that individual institutions develop their
campus goals recognizing the role of their campus as part of the system
of public higher education and may implement a variety of innovative
methods to achieve these goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.031 and 2003 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the
fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the
state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short
courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine
station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension
courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals,
disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall
have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and
student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income
derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income
from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or
the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be
established by any college or university board of trustees or regents
from time to time. All moneys received as operating fees at any
institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account
containing only operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED,
That a minimum of ((three and one-half)) five percent of operating fees
shall be retained by the four-year institutions of higher education
that increase tuition for resident undergraduate students above assumed
tuition increases in the omnibus appropriations act, a minimum of four
percent of operating fees shall be retained by four-year institutions
of higher education that do not increase tuition for resident
undergraduates above assumed increases in the omnibus appropriations
act, and a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees
shall be retained by the community and technical colleges for the
purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. At least thirty percent of operating fees
required to be retained by the four-year institutions for purposes of
RCW 28B.15.820 shall be used only for the purposes of RCW
28B.15.820(10). Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to
appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) ((Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act)) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions
or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at
community and technical colleges. The governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College;
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students,
and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage
increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor.
The state board for community and technical colleges may pilot or
institute differential tuition models. The board may define scale,
scope, and rationale for the models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2011-12 academic year and
((ending with the 2012-13)) through the end of the 2014-15 academic
year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College((, and the state board
for community and technical colleges)) may reduce or increase full-time
tuition fees for all students ((other than resident undergraduates)),
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
((each college in)) the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. The state board for community
and technical colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of
students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the
percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature)) Beginning with
the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19 academic year, the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College may set tuition for resident undergraduates
as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act; and
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068.
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) ((For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration)) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year,
reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduates at four-year institutions of higher education shall be
as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.0681 and 2009 c 215 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the requirement in RCW 28B.76.300(4),
institutions of higher education shall disclose to their undergraduate
resident students on the tuition billing statement, in dollar figures
for a full-time equivalent student:
(a) The full cost of instruction;
(b) The amount collected from student tuition and fees; and
(c) The difference between the amounts for the full cost of
instruction and the student tuition and fees.
(2) The tuition billing statement shall note that the difference
between the cost and tuition under subsection (1)(c) of this section
was paid by state tax funds and other moneys.
(3) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, the amount determined
in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be labeled an "opportunity
pathway" on the tuition billing statement.
(4) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, institutions of higher
education shall label financial aid awarded to resident undergraduate
students as an "opportunity pathway" on the tuition billing statement
or financial aid award notification. Aid granted to students outside
of the financial aid package provided through the institution of higher
education and loans provided by the federal government are not subject
to the labeling provisions in this subsection. All other aid from all
sources including federal, state, and local governments, local
communities, nonprofit and for-profit organizations, and institutions
of higher education must be included. The disclosure requirements
specified in this section do not change the source, award amount,
student eligibility, or student obligations associated with each award.
Institutions of higher education retain the ability to customize their
tuition billing statements to inform students of the assistance source,
amount, and type so long as provisions of this section are also
fulfilled.
(5) Institutions of higher education shall provide the following
information to all undergraduate resident students either on the
tuition billing statement or via a link to a web site detailing the
following information:
(a) The sources of all institutional revenue received during the
prior academic or fiscal year, including but not limited to state,
federal, local, and private sources;
(b) The uses of tuition revenue collected during the prior academic
or fiscal year by program category as determined by the office of
financial management; and
(c) The accountability and performance data under RCW 28B.76.270.
(6) The tuition billing statement disclosures shall be in twelve-point type and boldface type where appropriate.
(((6))) (7) All tuition billing statements or financial aid award
notifications at institutions of higher education must notify resident
undergraduate students of federal tax credits related to higher
education for which they may be eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To ensure institutional quality, promote access, and advance
the public mission of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, the authority to
increase or decrease tuition rates shall be considered within the
context of performance-based measures and goals for each state
university, regional university, and The Evergreen State College. By
September 1, 2011, and September 1st every two years thereafter, the
state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College shall each negotiate an institutional performance plan with the
office of financial management that includes expected outcomes that
must be achieved by each institution in the subsequent biennium.
(2) At a minimum, an individual institutional performance plan must
include but is not limited to the following expected outcomes:
(a) Time and credits to degree;
(b) Retention and success of students from low-income, diverse, or
underrepresented communities;
(c) Baccalaureate degree production for resident students; and
(d) Degree production in high-employer demand programs of study and
critical state need areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, any four-year
institution of higher education that increases tuition beyond levels
assumed in the omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial
aid requirements included in this section and shall remain subject to
these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, each four-year institution of higher
education that raises tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of
enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions, provide
financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is
equal to the maximum amount of a state need grant award that would be
given to an eligible student with a family income at or below fifty
percent of the state's median family income as determined by the higher
education coordinating board; and
(b) Offset the remainder as follows:
(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive
financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an
institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate
students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income
for a family of four as provided by the higher education coordinating
board;
(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are
greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the
state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to
seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or
greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as
provided by the higher education coordinating board;
(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed
seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's
median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent
of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for
resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the
state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the
higher education coordinating board; and
(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid
equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty
percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of
four as provided by the higher education coordinating board.
(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section
shall:
(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not
including the state need grant;
(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and
(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.
(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income
students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition
waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.
(6) By August 15, 2012, and August 15th every year thereafter,
four-year institutions of higher education shall report to the governor
and relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the
various sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition
increases. A key purpose of these reports is to provide information
regarding the results of the decision to grant tuition-setting
authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether
tuition setting authority should continue to be granted to the
institutions or revert back to the legislature after consideration of
the impacts on students, including educational access, affordability,
and quality. These reports shall include:
(a) The amount of additional financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income students with demonstrated need in the aggregate
and per student;
(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid
provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the
aggregate and per student;
(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax
credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher
education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from
tuition increases;
(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed
in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of
higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its
report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will
mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in
this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and
(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns,
participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and
ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic
status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to
tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for
resident students in the following income brackets:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income.
(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of
Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same
number of resident freshman undergraduate students at the Seattle
campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during the 2009-10
academic year. This requirement shall not apply to nonresident
undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,
may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic
year in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students
shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the
seven percent increase limit established in this section. For academic
years 2009-10 and 2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide
tuition increases greater than seven percent. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3))) By September 1st of each year beginning in ((2008)) 2011, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of:
(a) The total per-student funding level that represents the
sixtieth percentile of funding for ((comparable)) similar institutions
of higher education in the global challenge states((, and the progress
toward that goal that was made for each of the public institutions of
higher education)); and
(b) The tuition that represents the sixtieth percentile of resident
undergraduate tuition for similar institutions of higher education in
the global challenge states.
(((4))) (2) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are
the top performing states on the new economy index published by the
progressive policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy
index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete in the
new economy. At least once every five years, the office of financial
management shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge
states are appropriate. The office of financial management shall
report its findings to the governor and the legislature.
(((5) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of tax credits available through
the American opportunity tax credit provided in the American recovery
and reinvestment act of 2009.)) (3) Institutions of higher education,
in collaboration with relevant student associations, shall aim to have
all students who can benefit from available tax credits that mitigate
the costs of higher education take advantage of these opportunities.
These tax credits include the American opportunity tax credit provided
in the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, the lifetime
learning credit, and other relevant tax credits for as long as they are
available.
(4)(a) Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to
students and their families the benefits of such tax credits and
provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply.
(b) Information about relevant tax credits shall, to the greatest
extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling,
admission information, and individual billing statements.
(c) Institutions shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all
means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online
catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass email messaging,
social media, and outside marketing to ensure information about
relevant tax credits is visible and compelling, and reaches the maximum
amount of student and families that can benefit.
(5) In the event that the economic value of the American
opportunity tax credit is reduced or expires at any time before
December 31, 2012, institutions of higher education shall:
(a) Develop an updated tuition mitigation plan established under
section 6 of this act for the purpose of minimizing, to the greatest
extent possible, the increase in net cost of tuition or total cost of
attendance for students resulting from any such change. This plan
shall include the methods specified by the four-year institution of
higher education to avoid adding additional loan debt burdens to
students regardless of the source of such loans;
(b) Report to the governor and the relevant committees of the
legislature on their plans to adjust their tuition mitigation plans no
later than ninety days after any such change to the American
opportunity tax credit.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported annually by December
1st, and at a minimum include data recommended by a national
organization representing state chief executives. The board may change
the data requirements to be consistent with best practices across the
country. This data must, to the maximum extent possible, be
disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of
origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and include the following for
the four-year institutions of higher education:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes
agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences,
computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering
technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and
statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including
participation and degree completion rates for students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education
including by student level;
(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students
enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;
(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length,
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at
the state level;
(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length,
awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four
years old with a high school diploma;
(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt
load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the
institution;
(q) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation
rates, and debt load shall be disaggregated for students in the
following income brackets to the maximum extent possible:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income; and
(r) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of
undergraduate instruction.
(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time freshmen.
(4) Based on guidelines prepared by the board, each four-year
institution and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide and institution-specific
performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board along with
the biennial budget requests from the institutions and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Performance measures established
for the community and technical colleges shall reflect the role and
mission of the colleges.
(((3))) (5) The board shall approve biennial performance targets
for each four-year institution and for the community and technical
college system and shall review actual achievements annually. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall set biennial
performance targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(((4))) (6) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(((5))) (7) The board, in collaboration with the four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(((6))) (8) The board shall develop measurable indicators and
benchmarks for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, quality,
and timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.
(9) In conjunction with the office of financial management, all
four-year institutions of higher education must display the data
described in subsection (2) of this section in a uniform dashboard
format on the office of financial management's web site no later than
December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by December 1st. To
the maximum extent possible, the information must be viewable by race
and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet the
needs of various target audiences such as students, researchers, and
the general public.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2009 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant. The board, in consultation with four-year
institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and
technical colleges, shall develop award criteria and methods of
disbursement based on level of need, and not solely rely on a first-come, first-served basis.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the board. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(5)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a
grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program that leads
to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(6) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2009 c 450 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school, or to master the essential academic learning requirements.
However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in
participating universities only if the board of directors of the
student's school district has decided to participate in the program.
Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with
school districts, may establish admission standards for these students.
If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil
for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education
shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district
within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course
and hours of enrollment for that pupil.
(2)(a) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020
and 28B.15.041((,)):
(i) Running start students shall pay to the community or technical
college all other mandatory fees as established by each community or
technical college and, in addition, the state board for community and
technical colleges may authorize a fee of up to ten percent of tuition
and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041; and
(ii) All other institutions of higher education operating a running
start program may charge running start students a fee of up to ten
percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041
in addition to technology fees.
(b) The fees charged under this subsection (2) shall be prorated
based on credit load.
(3)(a) The institutions of higher education must make available fee
waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must
establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students
before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low
income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is
currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable
documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited
to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or
reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria
established in the institution's policy.
(b) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with
relevant student associations, shall aim to have students who can
benefit from fee waivers take advantage of these waivers. Institutions
shall make every effort to communicate to students and their families
the benefits of the waivers and provide assistance to students and
their families on how to apply. Information about waivers shall, to
the greatest extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid
counseling, admission information, and individual billing statements.
Institutions also shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all means
of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online
catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass e-mail messaging,
social media, and outside marketing to ensure that information about
waivers is visible, compelling, and reaches the maximum number of
students and families that can benefit.
(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of
higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition
or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher
education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted
for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms
and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges, in
collaboration with the other institutions of higher education that
participate in the running start program and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall identify, assess, and
report on alternatives for providing ongoing and adequate financial
support for the program. Such alternatives shall include but are not
limited to student tuition, increased support from local school
districts, and reallocation of existing state financial support among
the community and technical college system to account for differential
running start enrollment levels and impacts. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall report the assessment of
alternatives to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A graduate of a community or technical college in this state
who has earned a transferable associate of arts or sciences degree when
admitted to a four-year institution of higher education shall have
junior standing. A graduate who has earned the direct transfer
associate of arts degree will be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of the receiving four-year institution
of higher education. A graduate who has earned the associate of
science transfer degree will be deemed to have met most requirements
that prepare the graduate for baccalaureate degree majors in science,
technology, engineering, and math and will be required to complete only
such additional lower division, general education courses at the
receiving four-year institutions of higher education as would have been
required to complete the direct transfer associate of arts degree.
(2) A student who has earned the equivalent of ninety quarter
credit hours and has completed the general education requirements at
that four-year institution of higher education in Washington when
admitted to another four-year institution of higher education shall
have junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of the institution to which the student
transfers.
(3) The community and technical colleges, jointly with the four-year institutions of higher education, must develop a list of academic
courses that are equivalent to one-year's worth of general education
credit and that would transfer for that purpose to any other two or
four-year institution of higher education. If a student completes one-year's worth of general education credits, the student may be issued a
one-year academic completion certificate. This certificate shall be
accepted at any transferring two or four-year institution of higher
education.
(4) Each institution of higher education must develop a minimum of
one degree within the arts and sciences disciplines that can be
completed within the equivalent of ninety quarter upper division
credits by any student who enters an institution of higher education
with junior status and lower division general education requirements
completed.
(5) Each four-year institution of higher education must publish a
list of recommended courses for each academic major designed to help
students who are planning to transfer design their course of study.
Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and
accessible on the institution's web site.
(6) The requirements to publish a list of recommended courses for
each academic major under this section does not apply if an institution
does not require courses or majors to meet specific requirements but
generally applies credits earned towards degree requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Community and technical colleges must identify and publish
in their admissions materials the college level courses that are
recognized by all four-year institutions of higher education as
transferable to the four-year institutions of higher education.
Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and
accessible on the college's web site.
(b) If a four-year institution of higher education does not require
courses of majors for transfer, the community and technical colleges
must identify and publish the transfer policy of the institution in
their admissions materials and make the transfer policy of the
institution easily identifiable on the college's web site.
(2) Community and technical colleges must create a list of courses
that satisfy the basic requirements, distribution requirements, and
approved electives for:
(a) A one-year academic completion certificate as provided for
under section 11 of this act; and
(b) A transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree as
provided for under section 11 of this act.
(3) To the extent possible, each community and technical college
must develop links between the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section and its list of courses, and develop methods to encourage
students to check the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
when the students are registering for courses.

Sec. 13 RCW 39.29.011 and 2009 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
All personal service contracts shall be entered into pursuant to
competitive solicitation, except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) Sole source contracts;
(3) Contract amendments;
(4) Contracts between a consultant and an agency of less than
twenty thousand dollars. However, contracts of five thousand dollars
or greater but less than twenty thousand dollars shall have documented
evidence of competition, which must include agency posting of the
contract opportunity on the state's common vendor registration and bid
notification system. Agencies shall not structure contracts to evade
these requirements; ((and))
(5) Contracts between a consultant and an institution of higher
education of less than one hundred thousand dollars. However,
contracts of ten thousand dollars or greater but less than one hundred
thousand dollars shall have documented evidence of competition, which
must include an institution of higher education's posting of the
contract opportunity on the state's common vendor registration and bid
notification system. Institutions of higher education may not
structure contracts to evade these requirements; and
(6) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of contracts
exempted from the competitive solicitation process by the director of
the office of financial management when it has been determined that a
competitive solicitation process is not appropriate or cost-effective.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.19.1906 and 2008 c 215 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Insofar as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on
competitive bids, and a formal sealed, electronic, or web-based bid
procedure, subject to RCW 43.19.1911, shall be used as standard
procedure for all purchases and contracts for purchases and sales
executed by the state purchasing and material control director and
under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939. This
requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases and
sales executed by agencies, including educational institutions, under
delegated authority granted in accordance with provisions of RCW
43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029. However, formal sealed, electronic,
or web-based competitive bidding is not necessary for:
(1) Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the
sealed bidding procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from
being met appropriately;
(2) Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That the state director of general administration shall
establish procedures to assure that purchases made by or on behalf of
the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial
management, to a lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state
agencies if considered necessary to maintain full disclosure of
competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall state
efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management,
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. The agency shall invite at least one quotation
each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who
shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. Immediately after the
award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A
record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management, shall be documented
for audit purposes. Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made
without competitive bids based on buyer experience and knowledge of the
market in achieving maximum quality at minimum cost;
(3) Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a
single source of supply and purchases involving special facilities,
services, or market conditions, in which instances the purchase price
may be best established by direct negotiation;
(4) Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management
division under RCW 43.41.310;
(5) Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients
of the department of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this
exemption is effective only when the state purchasing and material
control director, after consultation with the director of the division
of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate department of social and
health services procurement personnel, declares that such purchases may
be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;
(6) Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical
teaching or research purposes and by the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010, and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;
(7) Purchases for resale by institutions of higher education to
other than public agencies when such purchases are for the express
purpose of supporting instructional programs and may best be executed
through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers in order to meet
the special needs of the institution;
(8) Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding
((thirty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for
purchases between ((three)) ten thousand dollars and ((thirty-five))
one hundred thousand dollars quotations shall be secured from at least
three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive price and may be
obtained by telephone or written quotations, or both. For purchases
between ((three)) ten thousand dollars and ((thirty-five)) one hundred
thousand dollars, each institution of higher education shall invite at
least one quotation each from a certified minority and a certified
women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform such work.
A record of competition for all such purchases made from ((three)) ten
thousand to ((thirty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars shall be
documented for audit purposes;
(9) Off-contract purchases of Washington grown food when such food
is not available from Washington sources through an existing contract.
However, Washington grown food purchased under this subsection must be
of an equivalent or better quality than similar food available through
the contract and be able to be paid from the agency's existing budget.
This requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases
executed by state agencies, including institutions of higher education,
under delegated authority granted in accordance with RCW 43.19.190 or
under RCW 28B.10.029; and
(10) Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation,
valid until June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to
provide roving service patrols in one or more Washington state patrol
tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators wishing to
participate would cooperatively, with the department of transportation,
develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions negotiated by
the parties.
Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1st of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by
the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of
inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar
figure in subsection((s)) (2) ((and (8))) of this section may not be
adjusted to exceed five thousand dollars.
As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition in
RCW 15.64.060.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.88.160 and 2006 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and
responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The
regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall
provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and
control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition,
such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.
(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor,
through the director of financial management, shall devise and
supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to
the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements,
resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central
accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail
deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial
management. The director of financial management shall adopt and
periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director
adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from
complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted
to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of
financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other
reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any
period.
(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of
financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary
operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload
estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means
to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance
between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget
period.
(3) The director of financial management shall report at least
annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status
of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation
projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are
shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management
shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project
is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated
start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled
claims at the time of completion.
(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of
the governor, shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal
audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency
that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of
its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage
adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and
financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include
criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of
resources at risk.
Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the
responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal
audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of
internal auditors;
(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of
determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of
manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures
for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from
training facilities made available to state employees;
(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care
services;
(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or
lack of coordination among agencies;
(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes
thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED,
That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit
systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established
by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for
recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate
standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the
fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except
that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans
may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies
headed by elective officials;
(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee
years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend
the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the
director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for
the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(5) The treasurer shall:
(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not
expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some
other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those
public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not
subject to appropriation;
(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the
treasurer's supervision or custody;
(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and
disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;
(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and
other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization
under RCW 43.41.180;
(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by
regulations issued pursuant to this law.
It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in
the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed
by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative
means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency
head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered
or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or
grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case
of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance
services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable
under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so
made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than
equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035,
such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such
services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to
the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the
department of general administration but in no case shall such required
cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully
indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of
promise to fully perform such services. Except for institutions of
higher education, no payments shall be made in advance for any
equipment maintenance services to be performed more than twelve months
after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned
that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will
apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for
recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section
shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's designee in
accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance
funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before
services have been rendered or material furnished.
(6) The state auditor shall:
(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits
that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to
this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the
books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with
the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible
in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings
from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a
section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of
this subsection.
(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon
any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.
(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The
report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include
determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied
with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to
perform or participate in performance verifications and performance
audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan
approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The
state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial
compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may
report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by
the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to
the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts
are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a
legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the
agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the
management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor
makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the
committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be
construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis
resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the
appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results
of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only
be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.
(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that
have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other
practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and
to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record,
including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of
financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six
months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of
funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial
management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit
resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state
auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial
management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of
personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped
goods or services.
(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.
(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW.
(((g))) In addition to the authority given to the state auditor in
this subsection (6), the state auditor is authorized to conduct
performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470. Nothing in this
subsection (6) shall limit, impede, or restrict the state auditor from
conducting performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470.
(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:
(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency
and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter
44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To
this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books,
accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.
(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative
committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the
performance and management of state agencies.
(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least
the following:
(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making
expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this
connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial
practices of any agencies; and
(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the
state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and
economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.03.220 and 2011 c 5 s 902 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any part-time board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group which is established by the executive, legislative, or
judicial branch to participate in state government and which functions
primarily in an advisory, coordinating, or planning capacity shall be
identified as a class one group.
(2) Absent any other provision of law to the contrary, no money
beyond the customary reimbursement or allowance for expenses may be
paid by or through the state to members of class one groups for
attendance at meetings of such groups.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class one board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class one groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible. Meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management, except for facilities provided free of charge. Meetings of
class one groups affiliated with institutions of higher education do
not require such approval.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class one groups
that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.03.230 and 2011 c 5 s 903 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any agricultural commodity board or commission established
pursuant to Title 15 or 16 RCW shall be identified as a class two group
for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class two group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends
an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed
duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not
receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the
person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in
nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class two board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class two groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible. Meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management, except for facilities provided free of charge. Meetings of
class two groups affiliated with institutions of higher education do
not require such approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class two groups
that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.03.240 and 2011 c 5 s 904 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group which has rule-making authority, performs quasi
judicial functions, has responsibility for the administration or policy
direction of a state agency or program, or performs regulatory or
licensing functions with respect to a specific profession, occupation,
business, or industry shall be identified as a class three group for
purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class three group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an
official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties
approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive
compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a)
occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any
agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or
Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation
from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class three board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class three groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible. Meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management, except for facilities provided free of charge. Meetings of
class three groups affiliated with institutions of higher education do
not require such approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class three
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.03.250 and 2011 c 5 s 905 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group shall be identified as a class four group for
purposes of compensation if the group:
(a) Has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions,
or has responsibility for the administration or policy direction of a
state agency or program;
(b) Has duties that are deemed by the legislature to be of
overriding sensitivity and importance to the public welfare and the
operation of state government; and
(c) Requires service from its members representing a significant
demand on their time that is normally in excess of one hundred hours of
meeting time per year.
(2) Each member of a class four group is eligible to receive
compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each
day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or
performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of
the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal
government, Washington state government, or Washington state local
government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for
working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class four
groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a
meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and
public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members
to be physically present at one location only when necessary or
required by law. Meetings that require a member's physical presence at
one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible.
Meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management, except for facilities
provided free of charge. Meetings of class four groups affiliated with
institutions of higher education do not require such approval.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.03.265 and 2011 c 5 s 906 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority,
performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy
direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs
regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care
profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class
five group for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the
member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily
prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person
shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section
if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time
in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent
with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class five groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible. Meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management, except for facilities provided free of charge. Meetings of
class five groups affiliated with institutions of higher education do
not require such approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class five
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 21 2010 c 3 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) From March 17, 2010, until July 1, 2011, state agencies of the
legislative, executive, and judicial branches shall not enter into any
contracts or other agreements entered into for the acquisition of
personal services not related to an emergency or other catastrophic
event that requires government action to protect life or public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to personal services contracts or
other agreements for the acquisition of personal services where the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants, where the
costs are for tax and fee collection, where the costs are for revenue
generation and auditing activities, where the costs are for the review
and research conducted by the joint transportation committee pursuant
to RCW 44.04.300, where the costs are necessary to receive or maintain
federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to institutions of higher
education((, where the costs are not funded from state funds or
tuition)). This section also does not apply where costs are related to
hearing officers, where costs are related to real estate appraisals or
habitat assessments, where costs are related to carrying out a court
order, or where costs are related to information technology contracts
related to an information services board approved information
technology project, or where costs are related to judicial information
system technology projects.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010.

Sec. 22 2010 c 3 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) From March 17, 2010, until July 1, 2011, state agencies of the
legislative, executive, and judicial branches shall not enter into any
contracts or other agreements for the acquisition of any item of
equipment the cost of which exceeds five thousand dollars and is not
related to an emergency or other catastrophic event that requires
government action to protect life or public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to the unemployment insurance
program of the employment security department, to costs that are for
tax and fee collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or
for receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to
institutions of higher education((, to costs not funded from state
funds or tuition)). This section also does not apply to costs that are
funded exclusively from private or federal grants, or for equipment
necessary to complete a project funded in the omnibus capital or
transportation appropriation acts, or the operational divisions of the
department of information services, or cost related to the
continuation, renewal, or establishment of maintenance for existing
computer software licensing and existing computer hardware, or for
costs related to the judicial information system.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010.

Sec. 23 2010 c 3 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) State agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial
branches shall not make expenditures for the cost or reimbursement of
out-of-state travel or out-of-state training by state employees where
the travel or training is not related to an emergency or other
catastrophic event that requires government action to protect life or
public safety, or direct service delivery, and the travel or training
occurs after March 17, 2010, and before July 1, 2011.
(2) This section does not apply to travel expenditures when the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants. This
section does not apply to the unemployment insurance program of the
employment security department, to costs that are for tax and fee
collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or for
receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to
institutions of higher education((, to costs not funded from state
funds or tuition)). This section also does not apply to costs related
to carrying out a court order or to costs to travel by air into
Washington state from any airport located in a contiguous state of
which the largest city is part of a metropolitan statistical area with
a city located in Washington state, or to motor vehicle and parking
costs for single day travel to a contiguous state or British Columbia,
Canada.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010.

Sec. 24 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 901 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
(1) From May 4, 2010, until July 1, 2011, state agencies of the
legislative, executive, and judicial branches shall not establish new
staff positions or fill vacant existing staff positions except as
specifically authorized by this section.
(2) The following activities of state agencies are exempt from
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Direct custody, supervision, and patient care in corrections,
juvenile rehabilitation, institutional care of veterans, the mentally
ill, developmentally disabled, state hospitals, the special commitment
center, and the schools for the blind and the deaf;
(b) Direct protective services to children and other vulnerable
populations in the department of social and health services;
(c) Washington state patrol investigative services and field
enforcement;
(d) Hazardous materials response and emergency cleanup;
(e) Emergency public health and patient safety response and the
public health laboratory;
(f) Military operations and emergency management within the
military department;
(g) Firefighting;
(h) Enforcement officers in the department of fish and wildlife,
the liquor control board, the gambling commission, and the department
of natural resources;
(i) Park rangers at the parks and recreation commission;
(j) Seasonal employment by natural resources agencies to the extent
that employment levels do not exceed the prior fiscal year;
(k) Seasonal employment in the department of transportation
maintenance programs to the extent that employment levels do not exceed
the prior fiscal year;
(l) Employees hired on a seasonal basis by the department of
agriculture for inspection and certification of agricultural products
and for insect detection;
(m) Activities directly related to tax and fee collection, revenue
generation, auditing, and recovery;
(n) In institutions of higher education, ((any positions directly
related to academic programs, as well as positions not funded from
state funds or tuition, positions that are filled by enrolled students
at their own institution as student workers, positions in campus police
and security, positions related to emergency management and response,
and positions related to student health care and counseling)) all
positions;
(o) Operations of the state lottery and liquor control board
business enterprises;
(p) The unemployment insurance program of the employment security
department; and
(q) Activities that are necessary to receive or maintain federal
funds by the state.
(3) The exemptions specified in subsection (2) of this section do
not require the establishment of new staff positions or the filling of
vacant staff positions in the activities specified.
(4) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605
((of this act)), chapter 3, Laws of 2010.
(5) Also exempted from this section are positions related to
facility realignments in the department of corrections, positions
related to the transfer of programs between state agencies assumed in
((this act)) chapter 3, Laws of 2010, and disability determination
staff funded solely by federal funds.

Sec. 25 2010 c 1 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding sections 1 through 5, chapter 1, Laws of 2010,
institutions of higher education may grant a wage or salary increase
for additional academic responsibilities during the summer quarter if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources; and
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services.
(2) Notwithstanding sections 1 through 5, chapter 1, Laws of 2010,
and provided that any increase is not funded from state funds,
institutions of higher education may grant a wage or salary increase to
critical academic personnel as needed for retention purposes where the
loss of such personnel would be likely to result in a loss of grant or
other funding.
(3) Any institution granting a wage or salary increase under this
section from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July
31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.920 (Performance agreements--Generally) and 2008 c
160 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.921 (Performance agreements -- Contents) and 2008 c
160 s 3; and
(3) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee--Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The office of financial management shall
work with the appropriate state agencies as determined by the office of
financial management, and the council of presidents to convene an
interagency work group to develop and implement improved administration
and management practices that enhance the efficiency and effectiveness
of operations throughout higher education campuses. The council of
presidents shall appoint a lead higher education institution to provide
administrative support to the work group within that institution's
current resources. The work group shall report to the legislature by
November 15, 2012, and November 15, 2013, on its progress, anticipated
outcomes, policy recommendations, and performance measures for
demonstrating achievement of improved efficiencies and effectiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the council of presidents, the four-year institutions of
higher education, the private independent higher education
institutions, and the private career schools shall collaborate to carry
out the following goals:
(a) Increase the number of students who receive academic credit for
prior learning and the number of students who receive credit for prior
learning that counts towards their major or towards earning their
degree, certificate, or credential, while ensuring that credit is
awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(b) Increase the number and type of academic credits accepted for
prior learning in institutions of higher education, while ensuring that
credit is awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(c) Develop transparent policies and practices in awarding academic
credit for prior learning;
(d) Improve prior learning assessment practices across the
institutions of higher education;
(e) Create tools to develop faculty and staff knowledge and
expertise in awarding credit for prior learning and to share exemplary
policies and practices among institutions of higher education;
(f) Develop articulation agreements when patterns of credit for
prior learning are identified for particular programs and pathways; and
(g) Develop outcome measures to track progress on the goals
outlined in this section.
(2) The board shall convene the academic credit for prior learning
work group.
(a) The work group must include the following members:
(i) One representative from the higher education coordinating
board;
(ii) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges;
(iii) One representative from the council of presidents;
(iv) Two representatives each from faculty from two and four-year
institutions of higher education;
(v) Two representatives from private career schools;
(vi) Two representatives from business; and
(vii) Two representatives from labor.
(b) The purpose of the work group is to coordinate and implement
the goals in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The board shall report progress on the goals and outcome
measures annually by December 31st.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "prior learning" means the
knowledge and skills gained through work and life experience; through
military training and experience; and through formal and informal
education and training from in-state and out-of-state institutions
including foreign institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 (1) The legislature finds that the methods
of providing funds to four-year public institutions of higher education
are based upon factors such as prior years' budget provisos and
inaccurate assumptions about the number of full-time equivalent
enrollments. The bases for these funding assumptions have grown
disconnected to legislative expectations and lack transparency and
accountability.
(2) A joint select legislative task force on the baccalaureate
funding formula is established. The task force shall consist of the
following members:
(a) Two members from each caucus of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, two of the members must be members of the ways
and means committee and two must be members of the higher education and
workforce development committee; and
(b) Two members from each caucus of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, two of the
members must be members of the ways and means committee and two must be
members of the higher education committee.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review statutes and budget provisos which govern public
institutions offering baccalaureate degrees;
(b) Specify the range of public interests and outcomes which are
served by public expenditures for higher education services;
(c) Review the basis for the state funding of public institutions
offering baccalaureate degrees; and
(d) Prepare and approve a recommended state operating budget method
which offers greater efficacy, transparency, and accountability for
baccalaureate institutions which receive public funds.
(4) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house
office of program research. The meetings of the task force shall be
planned for times which coincide with regular meetings of legislative
committees to the maximum extent possible.
(5) Members of the task force shall not be reimbursed for travel
expenses.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January
16, 2012.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 This act may be known and cited as the
higher education opportunity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During calendar year 2018, the joint committee shall complete
a systemic performance audit of the tuition-setting authority in RCW
28B.15.067 granted to the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College. The audit must
include a separate analysis of both the authority granted in RCW
28B.15.067(3) and the authority in RCW 28B.15.067(4). The purpose of
the audit is to evaluate the impact of institutional tuition-setting
authority on student access, affordability, and institutional quality.
(2) The audit must include an evaluation of the following outcomes
for each four-year institution of higher education:
(a) Changes in undergraduate enrollment, retention, and graduation
by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status;
(b) The impact on student transferability, particularly from
Washington community and technical colleges;
(c) Changes in time and credits to degree;
(d) Changes in the number and availability of online programs and
undergraduate enrollments in the programs;
(e) Changes in enrollments in the running start and other dual
enrollment programs;
(f) Impacts on funding levels for state student financial aid
programs;
(g) Any changes in the percent of students who apply for student
financial aid using the free application for federal student aid
(FAFSA);
(h) Any changes in the percent of students who apply for available
tax credits;
(i) Information on the use of building fee revenue by fiscal or
academic year; and
(j) Undergraduate tuition and fee rates compared to undergraduate
tuition and fee rates at similar institutions in the global challenge
states.
(3) The audit must include recommendations on whether to continue
tuition-setting authority beyond the 2018-19 academic year.
(4) In conducting the audit, the auditor shall solicit input from
key higher education stakeholders, including but not limited to
students and their families, faculty, and staff. To the maximum extent
possible, data for the University of Washington and Washington State
University shall be disaggregated by branch campus.
(5) The auditor shall report findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2018.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Sections 21 through 26 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 The higher education coordinating board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the council
of presidents shall convene a work group, with representatives from
higher education institutions, including faculty representatives, to
develop a plan for creating common course numbering for all common
lower division courses at all institutions of higher education. The
plan shall include, but not be limited to the following: (1)
Identification of key issues and barriers to implementing common course
numbering; (2) cost estimates related to implementation of common
course numbering; (3) faculty and staff time required for development
and maintenance of common course numbering; (4) a definition of common
courses; and (5) an implementation timeline. The plan shall be
delivered to the higher education committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 1, 2011.

--- END ---