BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is an
increasing demand for outdoor recreation opportunities and conservation
measures on lands managed by the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of natural resources, and the parks and recreation
commission. Development and maintenance of outdoor recreation
facilities and conservation of lands have not kept pace with this
demand. This demand, combined with shrinking resources for management,
has led to the degradation of our lands to the detriment of the
recreating public and efforts to conserve our natural resources.
(2) The legislature further finds that the recreating public cannot
readily discern which agency of the state is responsible for the
management of particular state lands or which policies apply to those
lands.
(3) It is the intent of this act to reform and improve access to
and management of state lands on a sustainable basis for the recreating
public by: Providing a vehicle access permit and access policies for
state lands; recovering the cost incurred by the state for operations
and management of recreation opportunities; providing resources to
address the growing demand and impacts of outdoor recreationists and
conservation of our natural resources; and providing effective
education and enforcement of state land access policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Day use permit" means the recreational lands access permit
created in section 4 of this act.
(3) "Discover pass" means the pass created in section 3 of this
act.
(4) "Recreational lands" means:
(a) Any designated recreation area or site managed by an agency for
outdoor recreation or fish and wildlife conservation including water
access areas, boat ramps and launches, wildlife areas, parking areas,
roads, trailheads, winter recreational parking areas, water trails, and
other trails under ownership, management, lease, or control of the
agency; or
(b) Areas identified in sections 19, 20, and 21 of this act, if
applicable.
(5) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as "motor vehicle" defined in
RCW 46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter
46.16A RCW. The term "vehicle" does not include:
(a) An otherwise included motor vehicle if the vehicle is being
towed under the power of a motor vehicle satisfying the definition
provided in RCW 46.04.320;
(b) Those motor vehicles exempt from registration under RCW
46.16A.080; and
(c) State and publicly owned vehicles as provided in RCW
46.16A.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The discover pass is created as a
renewable annual pass that is required, except as provided in sections
6 and 9 of this act, to park or drive a vehicle on any recreational
lands. To be valid, a discover pass holder must record the vehicle
license plate number of the associated vehicle on the discover pass
before driving onto or parking on recreational lands.
(2) Except as provided in section 11 of this act and as otherwise
provided in this section, the cost of a discover pass is thirty dollars
per vehicle. The office of financial management must adjust the cost
of a discover pass once every two years for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) A discover pass must be made available for purchase:
(a) Consistent with RCW 77.32.050, through the department of fish
and wildlife's automated licensing system;
(b) If approved by the state parks and recreation commission, from
that agency through its parks reservation system, directly from agency
employees or volunteers at manned state parks, or as otherwise provided
in RCW 79A.05.070;
(c) At state liquor stores and contract liquor stores, as that term
is defined in RCW 66.04.010;
(d) From the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090,
46.10.400, and section 10 of this act; and
(e) From other outlets authorized by law to sell state licenses,
permits, or passes.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two license plate
numbers. Only a vehicle with the license plate number written on the
discover pass may lawfully use the discover pass.
(6) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in one year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be taken to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.
(7) Except as otherwise specifically provided in statute, other
than providing the option for a day use permit under section 4 of this
act, the agencies may not require any additional payment for access to
recreational lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person may purchase a day use permit
that enables the holder to park or drive a vehicle on any recreational
lands without violating the requirements of section 5 of this act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the day use
permit is ten dollars per day for Washington residents and fifteen
dollars for nonresidents. Residency must be determined consistent with
the provisions of establishing residency under Title 77 RCW for hunting
and fishing licenses issued by the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) Day use passes must be available for purchase:
(a) Consistent with RCW 77.32.050, through the department of fish
and wildlife's automated licensing system;
(b) If approved by the state parks and recreation commission, from
that agency through its parks reservation system, directly from agency
employees or volunteers at manned state parks, or as otherwise provided
in RCW 79A.05.070;
(c) At state liquor stores and contract liquor stores, as that term
is defined in RCW 66.04.010; and
(d) From other outlets authorized by law to sell state licenses,
permits, or passes.
(4) The office of financial management must adjust the cost of the
day use permit once every two years for inflation.
(5) The day use permit must contain space for one license plate
number of the vehicle assigned to the day use permit. Only the vehicle
with the license plate number written on the day use permit may
lawfully use the day use permit.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided in statute, other
than providing the option for a discover pass under section 3 of this
act, the agencies may not require any additional payment for access to
recreational lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as provided in section 6 of this
act, a discover pass or a day use permit must be visibly displayed in
the front windshield of any vehicle, or in plain sight on a vehicle
without a windshield when:
(a) Driving on recreational lands; or
(b) Parked on recreational lands.
(2) A discover pass or day use permit is not required on private
lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water access areas, or at
agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities where public business
is conducted.
(3) A discover pass or day use permit is not required for persons
who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed by the agencies for
purposes consistent with a written authorization from the agency,
including but not limited to leases, contracts, and easements.
(4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any vehicle that
fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty is reduced to fifty-nine
dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a discover pass
to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice of
violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A discover pass or a day use permit are
not required for persons who display proof of payment of a camping fee
collected by the state parks and recreation commission under chapter
79A.05 RCW for the day preceding and the day following the night or
nights of camping designated on the proof of payment.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission may provide up to
twelve days a year where a vehicle may enter upon or park at a state
park without having to purchase or display a discover pass or day use
permit. If this authority is utilized, at least three of those days
must be on weekends.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The recreation access pass account is
created in the state treasury. All moneys received from the sale of
discover passes created in section 3 of this act and day use permits
created in section 4 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) Each fiscal biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in
revenue must be distributed to the agencies in the following manner:
(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170;
(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources and
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund created in RCW
43.30.385; and
(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million
dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts
identified in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The agencies, either collectively or through
one agency mutually agreed upon by all of the agencies, may adopt any
rules deemed necessary to administer this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Each agency must, where applicable,
designate a short-term parking area on recreational lands that allows
a vehicle to park on the recreational lands for up to fifteen minutes
without having to display a discover pass or day use permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If a discover pass is obtained from the
department of licensing under RCW 46.16A.090 or 46.10.400, the
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director is not responsible for delivering the
discover pass to the vehicle or snowmobile owner. The discover pass
must instead be delivered by one of the agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must make a discover pass available for purchase
to any person who, in the same transaction, also purchases one of the
following:
(a) A big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450;
(b) A small game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460;
(c) A western Washington pheasant permit issued under RCW
77.32.575;
(d) A trapping license issued under RCW 77.65.450;
(e) A watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
(f) A combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing
license issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) The cost of a discover pass, when purchased during the same
transaction as an item identified in subsection (1) of this section, is
fifty percent of the cost of a discover pass as established in section
3 of this act.
(3) Only one discounted discover pass may be issued per
transaction. Additional discover passes, as well as discover passes
and day use permits sold to an individual purchasing an item other than
those identified in subsection (1) of this section, may be purchased
for the amount established in section 3 of this act.
(4) The fees collected for all discover passes purchased under this
section must be deposited in the recreation access pass account created
in section 7 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section and unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the terms "discover pass" and "day use permit" have
the same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 4.24.210 and 2006 c 212 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) Unless an injured party sustained his or her injuries while
undertaking activities that are in violation of any law or regulation,
nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a landowner or
others in lawful possession and control for injuries sustained to users
by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent condition for which
warning signs have not been conspicuously posted. A fixed anchor used
in rock climbing and put in place by someone other than a landowner is
not a known dangerous artificial latent condition and a landowner under
subsection (1) of this section shall not be liable for unintentional
injuries resulting from the condition or use of such an anchor.
Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or expands in any way
the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by members of the public,
volunteer groups, or other users is permissive and does not support any
claim of adverse possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW; ((and))
(b) A discover pass or day use permit issued under section 3 or 4
of this act; and
(c) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
((46.09.020)) 46.09.310, or other public facility accessed by a
highway, street, or nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road
vehicle use.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.16A.090 and 2010 c 161 s 420 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall provide an opportunity for a vehicle
owner to make a voluntary donation as provided in this section when
applying for an initial or renewal vehicle registration.
(2)(a) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter
may donate one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the uniform anatomical gift act as described in chapter 68.64 RCW. The
donation of one or more dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the
vehicle owner.
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall:
(i) Ask a vehicle owner applying for a vehicle registration if the
owner would like to donate one dollar or more;
(ii) Inform a vehicle owner of the option for organ and tissue
donations as required under RCW 46.20.113; and
(iii) Make information booklets or other informational material
available regarding the importance of organ and tissue donations to
vehicle owners.
(c) All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the
donation program created under this section must be paid proportionally
or by another agreement by a participating Washington state organ
procurement organization established for organ and tissue donation
awareness purposes by the Washington state organ procurement
organizations. For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs"
and "Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same
meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.
(3)(a) The department shall collect from a vehicle owner who pays
a vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (g), (h),
(j), (n), (o), or (q) or who registers a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.455
with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or less a voluntary
donation of five dollars. The donation may not be collected from any
vehicle owner actively opting not to participate in the donation
program. The department shall ensure that the opt-out donation under
this section is clear, visible, and prominently displayed in both paper
and online vehicle registration renewals. Notification of intent to
not participate in the donation program must be provided annually at
the time of vehicle registration renewal. The donation must be
deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account
established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for ((the operation and
maintenance of)) capital improvements at state parks.
(b) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter must
be given the option to purchase a discover pass, as that term is
defined in section 2 of this act, at the time of vehicle registration
renewal. The department must charge the amount established in section
3 of this act for a discover pass offered during registration renewal.
The purchase of a discover pass is voluntary by the vehicle owner and,
if purchased, must be delivered as provided in section 10 of this act.
Any amounts collected by the department for the sales of discover
passes must be deposited in the recreation access pass account created
in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 7.84 RCW
to read as follows:
The director chosen by the state parks and recreation commission,
the commissioner of public lands, and the director of the department of
fish and wildlife are each authorized to delegate and accept
enforcement authority over natural resource infractions to or from the
other agencies through an agreement entered into under the interlocal
cooperation act, chapter 39.34 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 7.84.030 and 2009 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An infraction proceeding is initiated by the issuance and
service of a printed notice of infraction and filing of a printed or
electronic copy of the notice of infraction.
(2) A notice of infraction may be issued by a person authorized to
enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the infraction
is established, or by a person authorized by an interlocal agreement
entered into under section 14 of this act, when the infraction occurs
in that person's presence.
(3) A court may issue a notice of infraction if a person authorized
to enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the
infraction is established, or a person authorized by an interlocal
agreement entered into under section 14 of this act, files with the
court a written statement that the infraction was committed in that
person's presence or that the officer has reason to believe an
infraction was committed.
(4) Service of a notice of infraction issued under subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall be as provided by court rule.
(5) A notice of infraction shall be filed with a court having
jurisdiction within five days of issuance, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays.

Sec. 16 RCW 79A.05.160 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The members of the ((state parks and recreation)) commission
and ((such of)) its designated employees ((as the commission may
designate)) shall be vested with police powers to enforce the laws of
this state.
(2) The director may, under the provisions of section 14 of this
act, enter into an agreement allowing employees of the department of
natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife to enforce
certain civil and natural resources infractions created under this
title.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.12.065 and 2003 c 53 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the promotion of the public safety and the protection of
public property, the department of natural resources may, in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW, issue, ((promulgate,)) adopt, and enforce rules
pertaining to use by the public of state-owned lands and property which
are administered by the department.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a violation
of any rule adopted under this section is a misdemeanor.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the department
may specify by rule, when not inconsistent with applicable statutes,
that violation of such a rule is an infraction under chapter 7.84
RCW((: PROVIDED, That)). However, any violation of a rule relating to
traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses
is a traffic infraction.
(c) Violation of such a rule equivalent to those provisions of
Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.
(3) The commissioner of public lands and ((such of his or her))
those employees as ((he or she)) the commissioner may designate shall
be vested with police powers when enforcing:
(a) The rules of the department adopted under this section; ((or))
(b) The natural resources infractions created under section 5 of
this act; or
(c) The general criminal statutes or ordinances of the state or its
political subdivisions where enforcement is necessary for the
protection of state-owned lands and property.
(4) The commissioner of public lands may, under the provisions of
section 14 of this act, enter into an agreement allowing employees of
the state parks and recreation commission and the department of fish
and wildlife to enforce certain civil and natural resources infractions
created under this title and chapter 79A.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 40 of this act).

Sec. 18 RCW 77.15.020 and 2005 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the commission or director has authority to adopt a rule
that is punishable as a crime under this chapter, then the commission
or director may provide that violation of the rule shall be punished
with notice of infraction under RCW 7.84.030. Neither the commission
nor the director have the authority to adopt a rule providing that a
violation punishable as an infraction shall be a crime.
(2) The director may, under the provisions of section 14 of this
act, enter into an agreement allowing employees of the state parks and
recreation commission and the department of natural resources to
enforce certain civil and natural resources infractions created under
this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities and towns may enact an ordinance or resolution requiring
vehicles parked on property within the jurisdiction of the city, and
within one-half mile of recreational lands, to have a discover pass or
day use permit visibly displayed in the front windshield. Cities may
provide in the ordinance or resolution that the failure to display a
discover pass or day use permit is a parking infraction.
(2) Any penalties assessed by a city or town for a parking
infraction under this section may not exceed the penalties established
in section 5 of this act.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms used
in this section have the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Code cities may enact an ordinance or resolution requiring
vehicles parked on property within the jurisdiction of the code city,
and within one-half mile of recreational lands, to have a discover pass
or day use permit visibly displayed in the front windshield. Code
cities may provide in the ordinance or resolution that the failure to
display a discover pass or day use permit is a parking infraction.
(2) Any penalties assessed by a code city for a parking infraction
under this section may not exceed the penalties established in section
5 of this act.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms used
in this section have the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties may enact an ordinance or resolution requiring
vehicles parked on property within the jurisdiction of the county, and
within one-half mile of recreational lands, to have a discover pass or
day use permit visibly displayed in the front windshield. Counties may
provide in the ordinance or resolution that the failure to display a
discover pass or day use permit is a parking infraction.
(2) Any penalties assessed by a county for a parking infraction
under this section may not exceed the penalties established in section
5 of this act.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms used
in this section have the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 22 RCW 77.32.560 and 2009 c 333 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds
from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the state wildlife
account created in RCW 77.12.170 and must be dedicated to the support
of the department's watchable wildlife activities. The department may
also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for marketing the decal
and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in the state.
(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not
limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly
develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve
wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting
wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing
corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and
offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife
attractions and ways to protect and promote them.
(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable
wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more
than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable
wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities. ((A
person who purchases a watchable wildlife decal must be issued one
vehicle use permit free of charge.))

Sec. 23 RCW 77.32.010 and 2009 c 564 s 956 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A discover pass or day use permit issued ((by the department is
required to park a motor vehicle upon improved department access
facilities)) under section 3 or 4 of this act is required to access,
park a vehicle on, or drive a vehicle on recreational lands, as that
term is defined in section 2 of this act.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 24 RCW 77.15.750 and 2010 c 193 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section
include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot
removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500,
depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license
permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to
RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event
requiring a banquet permit from the liquor control board.
(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include
((fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits)) the discover pass
created in section 3 of this act, the day use permit created in section
4 of this act, commercial use or activity permits, noncommercial use or
activity permits, parking permits, experimental fishery permits, trial
commercial fishery permits, and scientific collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 25 RCW 43.30.385 and 2009 c 354 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department. Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state
parks and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from
transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be
deposited in this fund. Disbursement from the park land trust
revolving fund to acquire replacement property and for operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities shall be on the
authorization of the department.
(b) The proceeds from real property transferred or disposed under
RCW 79.22.060 must be solely used to purchase replacement forest land,
that must be actively managed as a working forest, within the same
county as the property transferred or disposed.
(c) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
section 7 of this act may only be used for the following purposes:
(i) Constructing, operating, and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department;
(ii) Securing public access routes to department lands that do not
have available direct public access through purchased easements or
rights-of-way on adjacent private lands;
(iii) Compensation to satisfy the financial obligations in the
management of trust lands as may be required in RCW 79.10.120; and
(iv) Other uses as necessary to administer public access on
department lands.
(d) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(2) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary
contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use
and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.
The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and
organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions will be
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and used solely for
the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and
maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use
of these facilities.

Sec. 26 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2010 c 161 s 1164 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in
the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16A.090(3), and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account.
(2)(a) Except for the proceeds from the recreation access pass
account created in section 7 of this act, expenditures from the account
may be used for operating state parks, developing and renovating park
facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park
stewardship, and other state park purposes.
(b) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
section 7 of this act must be used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining state parks. Of these proceeds, an amount to be determined
by the commission must be transferred to the winter recreational
program account created in RCW 79A.05.235. The transferred amount must
approximate historic funding levels in the winter recreational program
account.
(c) Expenditures from the account may be made only after
appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 27 RCW 77.12.170 and 2009 c 333 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter ((46.16)) 46.17 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320.
However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered
restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or
wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant
to RCW 77.15.425;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(j) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560.
(2) Moneys received from the recreation access pass account created
in section 7 of this act may only be used for:
(a) The enforcement of this title;
(b) Stewardship, operations, and maintenance of department lands
used for public recreation purposes;
(c) Securing public access to fishing and hunting areas located on,
or requiring access through, private land; and
(d) Other uses as necessary to administer public access on
department lands.
(3) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

Sec. 28 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2006 c 141 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge ((such)) fees for services, utilities, and use of
facilities, except for facilities allowed to be accessed and used by
the holder of a discover pass or day use permit under chapter 79A.---RCW (the new chapter created in section 40 of this act), as the
commission shall deem proper. ((The commission may not charge fees for
general park access or parking)) If deemed appropriate by the
commission, the commission may utilize unstaffed collection stations to
collect any fees or distribute any permits necessary for access to
state parks;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks
and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the
qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be
needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) ((Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated,
the commission shall have)) Utilize such other powers as in the
judgment of a majority of its members are deemed necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the commission ((shall)) does not have power to supervise directly any
local park or recreation district, and no funds shall be made available
for such purpose.

Sec. 29 RCW 79.10.140 and 2007 c 241 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized:
(1) To construct, operate, and maintain ((primitive)) outdoor
recreation and conservation facilities on lands under its jurisdiction
((which are of primitive character)) when deemed necessary by the
department to achieve maximum effective development of such lands and
resources consistent with the purposes for which the lands are held.
This authority shall be exercised only after review by the recreation
and conservation funding board and determination by the recreation and
conservation funding board that the department is the most appropriate
agency to undertake such construction, operation, and maintenance.
Such review is not required for campgrounds designated and prepared or
approved by the department;
(2) To acquire right-of-way and develop public access to lands
under the jurisdiction of the department and suitable for public
outdoor recreation and conservation purposes;
(3) To receive and expend funds from federal and state outdoor
recreation funding measures for the purposes of this section and RCW
79A.50.110; and
(4) To issue licenses for and assess operation use charges for
organized events held on lands owned or managed by the department.

Sec. 30 RCW 66.16.010 and 2005 c 518 s 935 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, shall deem
advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the sale of
liquor in accordance with the provisions of this title and the
regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all liquor shall be fixed by
the board from time to time so that the net annual revenue received by
the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent. Effective no
later than July 1, 2005, the liquor control board shall add an
equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail sales of spirits,
excluding licensee, military, and tribal sales. The intent of this
surcharge is to raise revenue for the general fund-state for the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums. The board shall remove the surcharge
June 30, 2007.
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.
(5) The liquor control board shall provide for the sale of discover
passes and day use permits, as those terms are defined in section 2 of
this act, at state liquor stores and contract liquor stores at the
prices established in sections 3 and 4 of this act. Any amounts
collected by the liquor control board through the sales of discover
passes and day use permits must be deposited in the recreation access
pass account created in section 7 of this act.

Sec. 31 RCW 79A.05.230 and 1990 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The fee for the issuance)) All users of ((special)) designated
winter recreational area parking ((permits shall be determined by the
commission after consultation with the winter recreation advisory
committee. If the person making application therefor is also the owner
of a snowmobile registered pursuant to chapter 46.10 RCW, there shall
be no fee for the issuance of an annual permit. All special winter
recreational area parking permits shall commence and expire on the
dates established by the commission)) spaces must display a discover
pass or day use permit issued under section 3 or 4 of this act.

Sec. 32 RCW 79A.05.225 and 1999 c 249 s 1401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions the
commission may:
(((1))) (a) Plan, construct, and maintain suitable facilities for
winter recreational activities on lands administered or acquired by the
commission or as authorized on lands administered by other public
agencies or private landowners by agreement;
(((2))) (b) Provide and issue upon payment of the proper fee, under
((RCW 79A.05.230, 79A.05.240, and 46.61.585, with the assistance of
such authorized agents as may be necessary for the convenience of the
public, special permits)) sections 3 and 4 of this act, discover passes
and day use permits which, in accordance with RCW 79A.05.230, allows
the holder to park in designated winter recreational area parking
spaces;
(((3))) (c) Administer the snow removal operations for all
designated winter recreational area parking spaces; and
(((4))) (d) Compile, publish, and distribute maps indicating such
parking spaces, adjacent trails, and areas and facilities suitable for
winter recreational activities.
(2) The commission may contract with any public or private agency
for the actual conduct of ((such)) the duties outlined in this section,
but shall remain responsible for the proper administration ((thereof))
of those duties.
(3)(a) The commission is not liable for unintentional injuries to
users of lands administered for winter recreation purposes under this
section or under RCW ((46.10.210)) 46.10.370, whether the lands are
administered by the commission, by other public agencies, or by private
landowners through agreement with the commission. Nothing in this
section prevents the liability of the commission for injuries sustained
by a user by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent condition
for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
(b) A road covered with snow and groomed for the purposes of winter
recreation consistent with this chapter and chapter 46.10 RCW shall not
be presumed to be a known dangerous artificial latent condition for the
purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 33 RCW 79A.05.235 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the winter recreational program account
in the state treasury. ((Special winter recreational area parking
permit fees collected under this chapter shall be remitted to the state
treasurer to)) All funds provided in RCW 79A.05.215 as appropriate for
transfer may be deposited in the winter recreational program account
and ((shall)) be appropriated only to the commission for nonsnowmobile
winter recreation purposes ((including)). These purposes include the
administration, acquisition, development, operation, planning, and
maintenance of winter recreation facilities and the development and
implementation of winter recreation, safety, enforcement, and education
programs. The commission may also accept gifts, grants, donations, or
moneys from any source for deposit in the winter recreational program
account.
(2) Any public agency in this state may develop and implement
winter recreation programs. The commission may make grants to public
agencies and contract with any public or private agency or person to
develop and implement winter recreation programs.

Sec. 34 RCW 46.61.585 and 1990 c 49 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in
compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or official
traffic control device, no person shall park a vehicle in an area
designated by an official sign that it is a winter recreational parking
area unless ((such)) the vehicle displays((, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the parks and recreation commission, a special
winter recreational area parking permit or permits)) a discover pass or
day use permit issued under section 3 or 4 of this act.

Sec. 35 RCW 46.61.587 and 1999 c 249 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any violation of RCW 79A.05.240 or 46.61.585, or any rule adopted
by the parks and recreation commission to enforce the provisions
((thereof)) of RCW 79A.05.240 or 46.61.585, is a ((civil)) natural
resource infraction as provided in ((chapter 7.84 RCW)) section 5 of
this act.

Sec. 36 RCW 46.10.400 and 2010 c 161 s 228 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The application for an original snowmobile registration has the
same requirements as described for original vehicle registrations in
RCW 46.16A.040 and must be accompanied by the annual snowmobile
registration fee required under RCW 46.17.350, in addition to any other
fees and taxes due at the time of application.
(2) The application for renewal of a snowmobile registration has
the same requirements as described for the renewal of vehicle
registrations in RCW 46.16A.110 and must be accompanied by the annual
snowmobile registration fee required under RCW 46.17.350, in addition
to any other fees or taxes due at the time of application.
(3) The snowmobile registration is valid for one year and must be
renewed each year thereafter as determined by the department.
(4) A person who acquires a snowmobile that has a valid snowmobile
registration must:
(a) Apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director for a transfer of the snowmobile
registration within ten days of taking possession of the snowmobile;
and
(b) Pay the snowmobile registration transfer fee required under RCW
46.17.420, in addition to any other fees or taxes due at the time of
application.
(5) The department shall issue a snowmobile registration and
snowmobile decals upon receipt of:
(a) A properly completed application for an original snowmobile
registration; and
(b) The payment of all fees and taxes due at the time of
application.
(6) The snowmobile registration must be carried on the vehicle for
which it was issued at all times during its operation in this state.
(7) Snowmobile decals must be affixed to the snowmobile as provided
in RCW 46.10.440.
(8) Snowmobile registration fees provided in this section and in
RCW 46.17.350 are in lieu of any personal property or excise tax
imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political subdivision. A
state agency, city, county, or other municipality may not impose other
registration fees on a snowmobile in this state.
(9) The department must, consistent with section 10 of this act,
provide each snowmobile registrant, other than the registrant of a
vintage snowmobile, one discover pass as provided in section 3 of this
act.

Sec. 37 RCW 36.38.010 and 1999 c 165 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative
authority, levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents
or fraction thereof to be paid for county purposes by persons who pay
an admission charge to any place, including a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for which
other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same or
similar privileges or accommodations; and require that one who receives
any admission charge to any place shall collect and remit the tax to
the county treasurer of the county((: PROVIDED,)). However, no county
shall impose such tax on persons paying an admission to any activity of
any elementary or secondary school, recreational lands as that term is
defined in section 2 of this act, or any public facility of a public
facility district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW for which a tax is
imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or 36.100.210.
(2) As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes
a charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and
other similar accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments
in any place where any free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided; a charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities
for purpose of recreation or amusement, and where the rental of the
equipment or facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege
for which a general admission is charged, the combined charges shall be
considered as the admission charge. It shall also include any
automobile parking charge where the amount of such charge is determined
according to the number of passengers in any automobile.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax
herein authorized shall not be exclusive and shall not prevent any city
or town within the taxing county, when authorized by law, from imposing
within its corporate limits a tax of the same or similar kind:
PROVIDED, That whenever the same or similar kind of tax is imposed by
any such city or town, no such tax shall be levied within the corporate
limits of such city or town by the county.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county with a population of one million or more may
exclusively levy taxes on events in baseball stadiums constructed on or
after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a public facilities district
under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have seating capacities over forty
thousand at the rates of:
(a) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. If the revenue from the tax exceeds the amount
needed for that purpose, the excess shall be placed in a contingency
fund which may only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the
baseball stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction;
and
(b) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. The tax imposed under this subsection (4)(b) shall
expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the baseball
stadium are retired, but not later than twenty years after the tax is
first collected.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to
develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy
and fix a tax on charges for admission to events in a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, constructed in the
county on or after January 1, 1998, that is owned by a public stadium
authority under chapter 36.102 RCW. The tax shall be exclusive and
shall preclude the city or town within which the stadium and exhibition
center is located from imposing a tax of the same or similar kind on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center,
and shall preclude the imposition of a general county admissions tax on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center.
For the purposes of this subsection, "charges for admission to events"
means only the actual admission charge, exclusive of taxes and service
charges and the value of any other benefit conferred by the admission.
The tax authorized under this subsection shall be at the rate of not
more than one cent on ten cents or fraction thereof. Revenues
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the stadium and
exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until the bonds issued
under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the stadium and exhibition
center are retired. After the bonds issued for the construction of the
stadium and exhibition center are retired, the tax authorized under
this section shall be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and
capital improvement of the stadium and exhibition center. The tax
under this subsection may be levied upon the first use of any part of
the stadium and exhibition center but shall not be collected at any
facility already in operation as of July 17, 1997.

Sec. 38 RCW 35.21.280 and 2002 c 363 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town may levy and fix a tax of not more than one
cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who
pays an admission charge to any place((: PROVIDED,)). However, no
city or town shall impose such tax on persons paying an admission to
any activity of any elementary or secondary school, recreational lands
as that term is defined in section 2 of this act, or any public
facility of a public facility district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100
RCW for which a tax is imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or 36.100.210,
except the city or town may impose a tax on persons paying an admission
to any activity of such public facility if the city or town uses the
admission tax revenue it collects on the admission charges to that
public facility for the construction, operation, maintenance, repair,
replacement, or enhancement of that public facility or to develop,
support, operate, or enhance programs in that public facility.
(2) Tax authorization under this section includes a tax on persons
who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for
which other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the
same privileges or accommodations. A city that is located in a county
with a population of one million or more may not levy a tax on events
in stadia constructed on or after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a
public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have
seating capacities over forty thousand. The city or town may require
anyone who receives payment for an admission charge to collect and
remit the tax to the city or town.
(3) The term "admission charge" includes:
(a) A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;
(b) A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables
reserved or otherwise, and other similar accommodations;
(c) A charge made for food and refreshment in any place where free
entertainment, recreation or amusement is provided;
(d) A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for
purposes of recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or
facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a
general admission is charged, the combined charges shall be considered
as the admission charge;
(e) Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in the automobile.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 Section 13 of this act takes effect October
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 RCW 77.32.380 (Fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permit -- Improved access facility -- Fee -- Youth groups--Display -- Transfer between vehicles -- Penalty) and 2003 c 317 s 4, 2001
c 243 s 1, 2000 c 107 s 271, 1998 c 87 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 77, 1991
sp.s. c 7 s 12, 1988 c 36 s 52, 1987 c 506 s 90, 1985 c 464 s 11, &
1981 c 310 s 15 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 Except for section 13 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---