BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.397 and 1999 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may approve a change of the point of diversion
prescribed in a permit to appropriate surface water for a beneficial
use to an approved intake structure with capacity to transport the
additional diversion to either: (a) A point of diversion that is
located downstream ((and is an existing approved intake structure with
capacity to transport the additional diversion)); or (b) to a point of
diversion located between Columbia river miles 215.6 and 292, if the
ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place of use of the
permit remain the same.
(2) This section may not be construed as limiting in any manner
whatsoever other authorities of the department under RCW 90.03.380 or
other changes that may be approved under RCW 90.03.380 under
authorities existing before July 25, 1999.

--- END ---