BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.90.010 and 2006 c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The Columbia river basin water supply development account is
created in the state treasury. The account may receive direct
appropriations from the legislature, receipts of any funds pursuant to
RCW 90.90.020 and 90.90.030, or funds from any other sources. The
account is intended to fund projects using tax exempt bonds.
(2)(a) Expenditures from the Columbia river basin water supply
development account may be used to assess, plan, and develop new
storage, improve or alter operations of existing storage facilities,
implement conservation projects, develop pump exchanges, or any other
actions designed to provide access to new water supplies within the
Columbia river basin for both instream and out-of-stream uses. Except
for the development of new storage projects and pump exchanges, there
shall be no expenditures from this account for water acquisition or
transfers from one water resource inventory area to another without
specific legislative authority. For purposes of this chapter, "pump
exchanges" means water supply development projects that exchange water
from one source to another or relocate an existing diversion
downstream, with resulting instream benefit.
(b) Two-thirds of the funds placed in the account shall be used to
support the development of new storage facilities and pump exchanges;
the remaining one-third shall be used for the other purposes listed in
this section.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from this account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department of ecology
evaluates the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet those uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of meeting those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which long-term water supply needs can be met using these
alternatives.
(b) The department of ecology may rely on studies and information
developed through compliance with other state and federal permit
requirements and other sources. The department shall compile its
findings and conclusions, and provide a summary of the information it
reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
section, the department of ecology shall make the preliminary
evaluation available to the public. Public comment may be made to the
department within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is
made public.
(4) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account shall be placed in trust in proportion to the state
funding provided to implement a project.
(5) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account developed within the boundaries of the federal Columbia
river reclamation project and directed to the Odessa subarea to reduce
the use of groundwater for existing irrigation is exempt from the
provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The department of ecology may enter into water service
contracts with applicants receiving water from the program to recover
all or a portion of the cost of developing the water supply. Costs
recovered under water service contracts does not include staff time
expended by the department on developing the water supply. With the
applicant's concurrence, the department may receive power revenue
generated by the water supply developed by the department through water
service contracts. The department may deny an application if the
applicant does not enter into a water service contract. Revenue
collected from water service contracts must be deposited into the
Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account created in
section 3 of this act. The department may adopt rules describing the
methodology as to how charges will be established and direct costs
recovered for water supply developed under the Columbia river basin
water supply program. Water service contracts with federal agencies
under RCW 90.42.150 are not required to be established by rule.
(7) Moneys in the Columbia river basin water supply development
account created in this section may be spent only after appropriation.
(((7))) (8) Interest earned by deposits in the account will be
retained in the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from direct
appropriations from the legislature, moneys directed to the account
pursuant to RCW 90.90.020 and 90.90.030, or moneys directed to the
account from any other sources must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The
account is intended to fund projects using taxable bonds. Expenditures
from the account may be used only as provided in this section.
(2)(a) Expenditures from the Columbia river basin taxable bond
water supply development account may be used to assess, plan, and
develop new storage, improve or alter operations of existing storage
facilities, implement conservation projects, develop pump exchanges, or
any other actions designed to provide access to new water supplies
within the Columbia river basin for both instream and out-of-stream
uses. Except for the development of new storage projects and pump
exchanges, there may be no expenditures from the account for water
acquisition or transfers from one water resource inventory area to
another without specific legislative authority. For the purposes of
this section, the term "pump exchanges" means water supply development
projects that exchange water from one source to another or relocate an
existing diversion downstream, with resulting instream benefit.
(b) Two-thirds of the moneys placed in the account must be used to
support the development of new storage facilities and pump exchanges;
the remaining one-third of the moneys must be used for the other
purposes listed in this section.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from the account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department of ecology
evaluates the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet those uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of meeting those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which long-term water supply needs can be met using these
alternatives.
(b) The department of ecology may rely on studies and information
developed through compliance with other state and federal permit
requirements and other sources. The department shall compile its
findings and conclusions, and provide a summary of the information it
reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
section, the department of ecology shall make the preliminary
evaluation available to the public. Public comment may be made to the
department within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is
made public.
(4) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account shall be placed in trust in proportion to the state
funding provided to implement a project.
(5) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account developed within the boundaries of the federal Columbia
river reclamation project and directed to the Odessa subarea to reduce
the use of groundwater for existing irrigation is exempt from the
provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The department of ecology may enter into water service
contracts with applicants receiving water from the program to recover
all or a portion of the cost of developing the water supply. Costs
recovered under water service contracts does not include staff time
expended by the department on developing the water supply. With the
applicant's concurrence, the department may receive power revenue
generated by the water supply developed by the department through water
service contracts. The department may deny an application if the
applicant does not enter into a water service contract. Revenue
collected from water service contracts must be deposited into the
Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account created in
section 3 of this act. The department may adopt rules describing the
methodology as to how charges will be established and direct costs
recovered for water supply developed under the Columbia river basin
water supply program. Water service contracts with federal agencies
under RCW 90.42.150 are not required to be established by rule.
(7) Interest earned by deposits in the account will be retained in
the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account
is created in the state treasury. All receipts from direct
appropriations from the legislature, moneys directed to the account
pursuant to RCW 90.90.020 and 90.90.030, revenue from water service
contracts described in this chapter, or moneys directed into the
account from any other sources must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) Expenditures from the Columbia river basin water supply
revenue recovery account may be used to assess, plan, and develop new
storage, improve or alter operations of existing storage facilities,
implement conservation projects, develop pump exchanges, or any other
actions designed to provide access to new water supplies within the
Columbia river basin for both instream and out-of-stream uses. Except
for the development of new storage projects and pump exchanges, there
may be no expenditures from the account for water acquisition or
transfers from one water resource inventory area to another without
specific legislative authority. For the purposes of this section, the
term "pump exchanges" means water supply development projects that
exchange water from one source to another or relocate an existing
diversion downstream, with resulting instream benefit.
(b) Two-thirds of the moneys placed in the account must be used to
support the development of new storage facilities and pump exchanges;
the remaining one-third of the moneys must be used for the other
purposes listed in this section.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from the account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department of ecology
evaluates the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet those uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of meeting those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which long-term water supply needs can be met using these
alternatives.
(b) The department of ecology may rely on studies and information
developed through compliance with other state and federal permit
requirements and other sources. The department shall compile its
findings and conclusions, and provide a summary of the information it
reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
section, the department of ecology shall make the preliminary
evaluation available to the public. Public comment may be made to the
department within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is
made public.
(4) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account shall be placed in trust in proportion to the state
funding provided to implement a project.
(5) Net water savings achieved through conservation measures funded
by the account developed within the boundaries of the federal Columbia
river reclamation project and directed to the Odessa subarea to reduce
the use of groundwater for existing irrigation is exempt from the
provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The department of ecology may enter into water service
contracts with applicants receiving water from the program to recover
all or a portion of the cost of developing the water supply. Costs
recovered under water service contracts does not include staff time
expended by the department on developing the water supply. With the
applicant's concurrence, the department may receive power revenue
generated by the water supply developed by the department through water
service contracts. The department may deny an application if the
applicant does not enter into a water service contract. Revenue
collected from water service contracts must be deposited into the
Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account created in
this section. The department may adopt rules describing the
methodology as to how charges will be established and direct costs
recovered for water supply developed under the Columbia river basin
water supply program. Water service contracts with federal agencies
under RCW 90.42.150 are not required to be established by rule.
(7) Interest earned by deposits in the account will be retained in
the account.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.90.020 and 2006 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) Water supplies secured through the development of new
storage facilities made possible with funding from the Columbia river
basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, and the Columbia river
basin water supply revenue recovery account shall be allocated as
follows:
(i) Two-thirds of active storage shall be available for
appropriation for out-of-stream uses; and
(ii) One-third of active storage shall be available to augment
instream flows and shall be managed by the department of ecology. The
timing of releases of this water shall be determined by the department
of ecology, in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife and
fisheries comanagers, to maximize benefits to salmon and steelhead
populations.
(b) Water available for appropriation under (a)(i) of this
subsection but not yet appropriated shall be temporarily available to
augment instream flows to the extent that it does not impair existing
water rights.
(2) Water developed under the provisions of this section to offset
out-of-stream uses and for instream flows is deemed adequate mitigation
for the issuance of new water rights provided for in subsection (1)(a)
of this section and satisfies all consultation requirements under state
law related to the issuance of new water rights.
(3) The department of ecology shall focus its efforts to develop
water supplies for the Columbia river basin on the following needs:
(a) Alternatives to groundwater for agricultural users in the
Odessa subarea aquifer;
(b) Sources of water supply for pending water right applications;
(c) A new uninterruptible supply of water for the holders of
interruptible water rights on the Columbia river mainstem that are
subject to instream flows or other mitigation conditions to protect
stream flows; and
(d) New municipal, domestic, industrial, and irrigation water needs
within the Columbia river basin.
(4) The one-third/two-thirds allocation of water resources between
instream and out-of-stream uses established in this section does not
apply to applications for changes or transfers of existing water rights
in the Columbia river basin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.90 RCW
to read as follows:
Two-thirds of the water made available through reoperation of
Sullivan lake funded from the Columbia river basin water supply
development account created in RCW 90.90.010 must be used to supply or
offset out-of-stream uses described in RCW 90.90.020(3) in Douglas,
Ferry, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties. At least
one-half of this quantity must be made available for municipal,
domestic, and industrial uses.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.90.040 and 2006 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) To support the development of new water supplies in the
Columbia river and to protect instream flow, the department of ecology
shall work with all interested parties, including interested county
legislative authorities and watershed planning groups((, adjacent to))
in the Columbia river basin, and affected tribal governments, to
develop a Columbia river water supply inventory and a long-term water
supply and demand forecast. The inventory must include:
(a) A list of conservation projects that have been implemented
under this chapter and the amount of water conservation they have
achieved; and
(b) A list of potential water supply and storage projects in the
Columbia river basin, including estimates of:
(i) Cost per acre-foot;
(ii) Benefit to fish and other instream needs;
(iii) Benefit to out-of-stream needs; and
(iv) Environmental and cultural impacts.
(2) The department of ecology shall complete the first Columbia
river water supply inventory by November 15, 2006, and shall update the
inventory annually thereafter.
(3) The department of ecology shall complete the first Columbia
river long-term water supply and demand forecast by November 15, 2006,
and shall update the report every five years thereafter.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of ecology shall, within
existing resources and in consultation with stakeholders, evaluate
options for aggregating projects to achieve the instream and out-of-stream allocation under RCW 90.90.020. The department of ecology shall
report its findings to the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036,
by September 15, 2011.

--- END ---