BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) On March 23, 2010, President Barack Obama signed into law the
patient protection and affordable care act and the health care and
education reconciliation act of 2010, collectively known as the
affordable care act;
(b) The affordable care act requires massive new spending
commitments at a time when the growing federal government debt
threatens private sector economic growth. Revenue to pay for the
affordable care act is based on increased taxes and fees coupled with
unrealistic assumptions regarding purported future cost-savings;
(c) Uncertainty surrounds the future of the affordable care act.
Several lawsuits have been filed by state attorneys general challenging
the constitutionality of some provisions of the affordable care act.
Furthermore, the November 2, 2010, elections resulted in the
Republicans becoming the majority party in the United States house of
representatives and in gaining seats in the United States senate. The
composition of the new United States congress, coupled with the
public's opinion of the affordable care act and the large federal
deficit, may result in the repeal of or significant changes to the
affordable care act;
(d) In its present form, many of the provisions in the affordable
care act will require state action and state resources to implement.
As currently written, the majority of requirements in the affordable
care act are not effective until 2014; and
(e) The state currently has a multibillion dollar deficit projected
for the 2011-2013 budget, which will likely result in reductions in
current health care programs.
(2) The legislature intends to prohibit state agencies and the
executive branch from spending any state resources on the
implementation of the affordable care act, unless the federal
government is providing one hundred percent funding or the effective
date of the provision of the law is within six months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2013, the authority is prohibited from spending any
state funds on either planning or implementation of the patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the
health care and education affordability and reconciliation act of 2010,
P.L. 111-152.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2013, the secretary is prohibited from spending any
state funds on either planning or implementation of the patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the
health care and education affordability and reconciliation act of 2010,
P.L. 111-152.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2013, the director is prohibited from spending any
state funds on either planning or implementation of the patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the
health care and education affordability and reconciliation act of 2010,
P.L. 111-152.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2013, the secretary is prohibited from spending any
state funds on either planning or implementation of the patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the
health care and education affordability and reconciliation act of 2010,
P.L. 111-152.

--- END ---