BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.180 and 1994 c 92 s 290 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who violates or participates in the violation of any
provision of the rules or orders of the director or any provision of
this chapter, except RCW 31.45.105(1)(d), is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who violates or participates in the violation of any
provision of RCW 31.45.105(1)(d) is guilty of a class B felony.

--- END ---