BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.555 and 2009 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this section apply to the construction and
industrial storm water general permits issued by the department
pursuant to the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.,
and this chapter.
(1) Effluent limitations shall be included in construction and
industrial storm water general permits as required under the federal
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and its implementing
regulations. In accordance with federal clean water act requirements,
pollutant specific, water quality-based effluent limitations shall be
included in construction and industrial storm water general permits if
there is a reasonable potential to cause or contribute to an excursion
of a state water quality standard.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, both technology and
water quality-based effluent limitations may be expressed as:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations;
(b) Narrative effluent limitations; or
(c) A combination of numeric and narrative effluent discharge
limitations.
(3) The department must condition storm water general permits for
industrial and construction activities issued under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system of the federal clean water act
to require compliance with numeric effluent discharge limits when such
discharges are subject to:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations established in federally adopted,
industry-specific effluent guidelines;
(b) State developed, industry-specific performance-based numeric
effluent limitations;
(c) Numeric effluent limitations based on a completed total maximum
daily load analysis or other pollution control measures; or
(d) A determination by the department that:
(i) The discharges covered under either the construction or
industrial storm water general permits have a reasonable potential to
cause or contribute to violation of state water quality standards; and
(ii) Effluent limitations based on nonnumeric best management
practices are not effective in achieving compliance with state water
quality standards.
(4) In making a determination under subsection (3)(d) of this
section, the department shall use procedures that account for:
(a) Existing controls on point and nonpoint sources of pollution;
(b) The variability of the pollutant or pollutant parameter in the
storm water discharge; and
(c) As appropriate, the dilution of the storm water in the
receiving waters.
(5) Narrative effluent limitations requiring both the
implementation of best management practices, when designed to satisfy
the technology and water quality-based requirements of the federal
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and compliance with water
quality standards, shall be used for construction and industrial storm
water general permits, unless the provisions of subsection (3) of this
section apply.
(6) Compliance with water quality standards shall be presumed,
unless discharge monitoring data or other site specific information
demonstrates that a discharge causes or contributes to violation of
water quality standards, when the permittee is:
(a) In full compliance with all permit conditions, including
planning, sampling, monitoring, reporting, and recordkeeping
conditions; and
(b)(i) Fully implementing adaptive storm water ((best management))
mechanisms, including practices contained in storm water technical
manuals approved by the department, or practices that are demonstrably
equivalent to practices contained in storm water technical manuals
approved by the department, including the proper selection,
implementation, and maintenance of all applicable and appropriate best
management practices for on-site pollution control.
(ii) For the purposes of this section, "demonstrably equivalent"
means that the technical basis for the selection of all storm water
best management practices are documented within a storm water pollution
prevention plan. The storm water pollution prevention plan must
document:
(A) The method and reasons for choosing the storm water best
management practices selected;
(B) The pollutant removal performance expected from the practices
selected;
(C) The technical basis supporting the performance claims for the
practices selected, including any available existing data concerning
field performance of the practices selected;
(D) An assessment of how the selected practices will comply with
state water quality standards; and
(E) An assessment of how the selected practices will satisfy both
applicable federal technology-based treatment requirements and state
requirements to use all known, available, and reasonable methods of
prevention, control, and treatment.
(7)(a) By November 1, 2009, the department shall modify or reissue
the industrial storm water general permit to require compliance with
appropriately derived numeric water quality-based effluent limitations
for existing discharges to water bodies listed as impaired according to
33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d) (Sec. 303(d) of the federal clean water act, 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).
(b) The industrial storm water general permit must require
permittees to comply with appropriately derived numeric limit water
quality-based effluent limitations in the permit, as described in (a)
of this subsection, by no later than six months after the effective
date of the modified or reissued industrial storm water general permit.
(c) For permittees that the department determines are unable to
comply with the numeric water quality-based effluent limitations
required by (a) of this subsection, within the timeline established in
(b) of this subsection, the department shall establish a compliance
schedule as follows:
(i) Any compliance schedule provided by the department must require
compliance as soon as possible, and must require compliance by no later
than twenty-four months, or two complete wet seasons, after the
effective date of the industrial storm water general permit. For
purposes of this subsection (7)(c)(i), "wet seasons" means October 1st
through June 30th.
(ii) The department shall post on its web site the name, location,
industrial storm water permit number, and the reason for requesting a
compliance schedule for each permittee who requests a compliance
schedule according to this subsection (7)(c). The department shall
post this information no later than thirty days after receiving a
permittee's request for a compliance schedule under this subsection
(7)(c). The department shall also prepare a list of organizations and
individuals seeking to be notified when such requests for compliance
schedules are made, and notify them within thirty days after receiving
a permittee's request for a compliance schedule. Notification under
this subsection may be accomplished electronically.
(d) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature specifying how the appropriately derived numeric
effluent limitation in (a) of this subsection would be implemented.
The report shall identify the number of dischargers to impaired water
bodies and provide an assessment of anticipated compliance with the
appropriately derived numeric effluent limitation established by (a) of
this subsection.
(8)(((a))) Construction and industrial storm water general permits
issued by the department shall include an enforceable adaptive
((management)) storm water mechanism using benchmarks and action levels
as goals, that includes ((appropriate monitoring, evaluation, and
reporting. The adaptive management mechanism shall include elements
designed to result in permit compliance and shall include, at a
minimum, the following elements:
(i) An adaptive management indicator, such as monitoring
benchmarks;
(ii) Monitoring;
(iii) Review and revisions to the storm water pollution prevention
plan;
(iv) Documentation of remedial actions taken; and
(v) Reporting to the department.
(b) Construction and industrial storm water general permits issued
by the department also shall include the timing and mechanisms for
implementation of treatment best management practices)):
(a) Appropriate monitoring;
(b) Evaluation review and revisions to the storm water pollution
prevention plan;
(c) Reporting;
(d) Documentation of remedial actions taken; and
(e) Timelines for implementing storm water pollution prevention
plan revisions in as short a period as practical.
(9)(a) Construction and industrial storm water discharges
authorized under general permits must ((not cause or have the
reasonable potential to cause or contribute to a violation of)) be
controlled as necessary to meet an applicable water quality standard.
Where a discharge has already been authorized under a national
pollutant discharge elimination system storm water permit and it is
later determined ((to cause or have the reasonable potential to cause
or contribute to the violation of an applicable water quality
standard)) that the necessary controls have not met applicable water
quality standards, the department may notify the permittee ((of such a
violation)) that they will not be renewed under the next release of the
general permit unless corrective actions under (b)(i) of this
subsection are successful.
(((10))) (b) Once notified by the department ((of a determination
of reasonable potential to cause or contribute to the violation of an
applicable water quality standard)), the permittee must:
(i) Take all necessary actions to ensure future discharges do not
cause or contribute to the violation of a water quality standard
((and));
(ii) Document those actions in the storm water pollution prevention
plan; and ((a report timely submitted to the department. If violations
remain or recur,))
(iii) Submit a timely report to the department on actions taken and
expected results.
(c) If controls remain ineffective, the department may issue an
appropriately derived effluent limit, or coverage under the
construction or industrial storm water general permits may be
terminated by the department, and:
(i) An alternative special or general permit may be issued: or
(ii) An individual permit may be issued.
(d) Compliance with the requirements of this subsection does not
preclude any enforcement activity provided by the federal clean water
act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., for the underlying violation.
(((11))) (10) Receiving water sampling shall not be a requirement
of an industrial or construction storm water general permit except to
the extent that it can be conducted without endangering the health and
safety of persons conducting the sampling.
(((12))) (11) The department may authorize mixing zones only in
compliance with and after making determinations mandated by the
procedural and substantive requirements of applicable laws and
regulations.
(12) The department shall, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, provide to the legislature a
comprehensive risk based storm water regulatory plan that, at a
minimum, details:
(a) Goals and objectives for storm water integration among the
existing permits, including:
(i) A list of priority waterbodies for storm water pollution
control;
(ii) A description of scientific information that will be collected
to support permit development;
(iii) A description of data collection approaches that demonstrate
improvements in water quality;
(iv) Appropriate metrics to demonstrate improvement in the state's
water quality from storm water permitting activities; and
(v) A schedule to implement the primary actions in the storm water
regulatory plan; and
(b) A sustainable funding mechanism with options beyond fees.
(13) The department is directed to conduct a survey based on
standard industrial classification/North American industrial
classification system primary and secondary codes of all potential
industrial storm water general permit permittees who do not already
have coverage. Those permittees determined to need an industrial storm
water general permit must be given fifty-nine days to seek coverage
from date of notification by the department without being subject to
department enforcement for failure to submit a notice of intent. New
permittees must have their permit fees prorated through the permit
period from date of notification.
(14)(a) A general permittee may apply to the director for:
(i) The development of an appropriately derived numeric limit of
effluent for one or more parameters applicable to the permittees
industrial storm water general permit;
(ii) Coverage under an applicable special general permit; or
(iii) An individual permit.
(b) The director shall make a determination on the application and
provide a response within ninety days from application. The director's
decision is a final agency action, subject to appeal. The permittee's
existing general permit remains in effect during this period unless the
permittee has previously been notified of termination.
(15) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Adaptive storm water mechanisms" means an iterative process by
which the permittee uses available data to identify best practices or
engineering practices to determine those additional actions necessarily
designed to result in permit compliance.
(b) "Appropriately derived numeric limit" means a process in which
the department considers the data associated with the storm water
discharge and receiving water to determine at what level or if the
storm water discharge is routinely creating a risk of the receiving
water exceeding water quality standards. The data considered will, at
a minimum, consist of:
(i) Parameter discharge mass to receiving water from storm water;
(ii) Discharge variability;
(iii) Receiving water characteristics affecting water quality for
the parameter of concern; and
(iv) Mitigating factors, such as dissolved carbon, hardness, ligand
bonding, mixing zones, and natural background as applicable.
(A) The department may utilize commonly recognized modeling
techniques to determine appropriately derived limits.
(B) Where it would be extremely difficult to show a direct
relationship between storm water discharges and impairments, the
department may substitute technology-based limits established for
benchmarks for that parameter in lieu of water quality-based limits.
The department may not use surrogates for establishing effluent limits
unless a direct algorithmic connection can be demonstrated between the
surrogate and parameter of concern.
(c) "Benchmark" means a parameter specific technology-based value
representing the expected discharge levels for the best available
technology economically achievable.
(i) The department shall use stakeholder reviewed scientific,
engineering, and economic data in setting a benchmark value.
(ii) Exceeding the benchmark value is not a violation of effluent
limits.
(iii) Exceeding the benchmark value is not an indication of
exceeding water quality standards.
(iv) The department may establish action levels that denote
statistically derived ranges of expectation for compliance with
benchmarks.
(16) This section expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---