BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.010 and 2008 c 130 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality
notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the
state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to enter
into a contract with the bidder.
(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after
advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district,
district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the
execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts,
diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement
districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and
drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement
districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation
districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or
development of waste or undeveloped lands.
(4) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair,
or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of
the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge
on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when
performed by contract shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. "Public
work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW
36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW
36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).
(5) "Resident contractor" means a contractor certified by the
department of general administration as:
(a) Registered as a contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed
as an electrical contractor under chapter 19.28 RCW;
(b) Maintaining a place of business within the state staffed by the
contractor or an employee of the contractor for a period of six months
immediately preceding the date of the bid;
(c)(i) Paying residents of the state at least eighty-five percent
of its payroll, in dollar volume; or
(ii) Employing residents of the state as at least eighty-five
percent of its employees; and
(d)(i) Incorporated or qualified to do business under Title 25 RCW;
(ii) A sole proprietorship and the proprietor is a resident of the
state;
(iii) A limited liability company organized under chapter 25.15 RCW
and all members are residents of the state;
(iv) A partnership under chapter 25.05 or 25.10 RCW and all
partners are residents of the state; or
(v) If a joint venture, composed entirely of ventures that qualify
under (c) of this subsection.
(6) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria
in RCW 39.04.350.
(((6))) (7) "State" means the state of Washington and all
departments, supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state or municipality shall award a contract to the
responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid after a resident
contractor preference of seven percent has been applied.
(2) A contractor shall be considered a resident contractor only if
the contractor is certified as a resident contractor by the department.
The procedure for application and certification is as follows:
(a) The department shall prepare an application form for
certification as a resident contractor, and require such information
and proof as the department deems necessary to certify the applicant as
a resident contractor;
(b) The contractor seeking certification as a resident contractor
shall complete the application form and submit it to the department
prior to the submission of a bid on which the contractor desires to be
given a preference;
(c) The department shall examine the application and may seek
additional information or proof if necessary;
(d) The department shall issue the contractor a certification
number which shall be valid until revoked and which, when used on a bid
for a contract, entitles the contractor to be considered as a resident
contractor; and
(e) The department shall revoke the certification number issued to
a contractor upon making a determination that the contractor no longer
meets the definition of resident contractor in RCW 39.04.010.
(3)(a) A contractor that receives the resident contractor
preference provided for in this section based on false information,
whether that information was provided or withheld, and which by reason
of the information has been awarded a contract to which it would not
otherwise have been entitled:
(i) Must pay the state an assessment equal to the difference
between the contract amount and what the state's cost would have been
if the contract had been properly awarded;
(ii) In addition to the amount specified in this subsection (3)(a)
and except as provided in (b) of this subsection, must pay a civil
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contract involved or one
thousand dollars, whichever is less; and
(iii) Is ineligible to directly or indirectly transact any business
with the state for a period of not less than six months and not more
than three years, as determined by the director of the department.
This ineligibility applies to the principals of the business and any
subsequent businesses formed by those principals.
(b) In addition to being subject to the penalties under (a)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, a contractor that knowingly and with intent
to defraud makes a false statement or fails to provide or conceals, or
attempts to conceal, material information for the purpose of obtaining,
or aiding another in obtaining, a preference under this section is
subject to a civil penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contract
involved or ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(c)(i) A contractor subject to sanction under this subsection may
request, within thirty days of the date of issuance of the notice of
sanction, a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(ii) If a contractor fails to pay an assessment or civil penalty
after it has become final and not subject to further appeal, or after
the court has entered final judgment in favor of the state, the
attorney general may recover the assessment or penalty by action in the
appropriate superior court. In such action, the validity and
appropriateness of the final order imposing the assessment or penalty
is not subject to review.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "department" means the
department of general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All contracts entered into under this
chapter on or after the effective date of this section are subject to
the requirements established under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---