BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185C.180 and 2006 c 349 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to improve services for the homeless, the department,
within amounts appropriated by the legislature for this specific
purpose, shall implement the Washington homeless client management
information system for the ongoing collection and updates of
information about all homeless individuals in the state.
(2) Information about homeless individuals for the Washington
homeless client management information system shall come from the
Washington homeless census and from state agencies and community
organizations providing services to homeless individuals and families.
(a) Personally identifying information about homeless individuals
for the Washington homeless client management information system may
only be collected after having obtained informed, reasonably time
limited (i) written consent from the homeless individual to whom the
information relates, or (ii) telephonic consent from the homeless
individual, provided that written consent is obtained at the first time
the individual is physically present at an organization with access to
the Washington homeless client management information system.
Safeguards consistent with federal requirements on data collection must
be in place to protect homeless individuals' rights regarding their
personally identifying information.
(b) Data collection under this subsection shall be done in a manner
consistent with federally informed consent guidelines regarding human
research which, at a minimum, require that individuals be informed
about the expected duration of their participation((,)) in the
Washington homeless client management information system. An
explanation of whom to contact for answers to pertinent questions about
the data collection and their rights regarding their personal
identifying information, an explanation regarding whom to contact in
the event of injury to the individual related to the Washington
homeless client ((survey)) management information system, a description
of any reasonably foreseeable risks to the homeless individual, and a
statement describing the extent to which confidentiality of records
identifying the individual will be maintained.
(c) The department must adopt policies governing the appropriate
process for destroying Washington homeless client management
information system paper documents containing personally identifying
information when the paper documents are no longer needed. The
policies must not conflict with any federal data requirements.
(3) The Washington homeless client management information system
shall serve as an online information and referral system to enable
local governments and providers to connect homeless persons in the
database with available housing and other support services. Local
governments shall develop a capacity for continuous case management,
including independent living plans, when appropriate, to assist
homeless persons.
(4) The information in the Washington homeless client management
information system will also provide the department with the
information to consolidate and analyze data about the extent and nature
of homelessness in Washington state, giving emphasis to information
about the extent and nature of homelessness in Washington state among
families with children.
(5) The system may be merged with other data gathering and
reporting systems and shall:
(a) Protect the right of privacy of individuals;
(b) Provide for consultation and collaboration with all relevant
state agencies including the department of social and health services,
experts, and community organizations involved in the delivery of
services to homeless persons; and
(c) Include related information held or gathered by other state
agencies.
(6) Within amounts appropriated by the legislature, for this
specific purpose, the department shall evaluate the information
gathered and disseminate the analysis and the evaluation broadly, using
appropriate computer networks as well as written reports.
(7) The Washington homeless client management information system
shall be implemented by December 31, 2009, and updated with new
homeless client information at least annually.

--- END ---