BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.14.010 and 1993 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until January 1, 2012, whenever unincorporated territory is annexed
by a city or town pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35.13 RCW, or
whenever unincorporated territory is annexed to a code city pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 35A.14 RCW, community municipal corporations
may be organized for the territory comprised of all or a part of an
unincorporated area annexed to a city or town pursuant to chapter 35.13
or 35A.14 RCW, if: (1) The service area is such as would be eligible
for incorporation as a city or town; or (2) the service area has a
minimum population of not less than three hundred inhabitants and ten
percent of the population of the annexing city or town; or (3) the
service area has a minimum population of not less than one thousand
inhabitants.
Until January 1, 2012, whenever two or more cities are consolidated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35.10 RCW, a community municipal
corporation may be organized within one or more of the consolidating
cities.
No territory shall be included in the service area of more than one
community municipal corporation. Whenever a new community municipal
corporation is formed embracing all of the territory of an existing
community municipal corporation, the prior existing community municipal
corporation shall be deemed to be dissolved on the effective date of
the new corporation.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.14.060 and 2009 c 549 s 2013 are each amended to
read as follows:
The original terms of existence of any community municipal
corporation shall be for at least four years and until the first Monday
in January next following a regular municipal election held in the
city.
Any such community municipal corporation may be continued
thereafter for additional periods of four years' duration with the
approval of the voters at an election held and conducted in the manner
provided for in this section.
Authorization for a community municipal corporation to continue its
term of existence for each additional period of four years may be
initiated pursuant to a resolution or a petition in the following
manner:
(1) A resolution praying for such continuation may be adopted by
the community council and shall be filed not less than seven months
prior to the end of the term of existence of such corporation with the
city council or other legislative body of the city in which the service
area is located.
(2) A petition for continuation shall be signed by at least ten
percent of the registered voters residing within the service area and
shall be filed not less than six months prior to the end of the term of
existence of such corporation with the city council or other
legislative body of the city in which the service area is located.
At the same election at which a proposition is submitted to the
voters of the city in which the service area is located for the
continuation of the community municipal corporation for an additional
period of four years, the community councilmembers of such municipal
corporation shall be elected. The positions on such council shall be
the same in number as the original or initial council and shall be
numbered consecutively and elected at large. Declarations of candidacy
and withdrawals shall be in the same manner as is provided for members
of the city council or other legislative body of the city.
Upon receipt of a petition, the city clerk shall ((examine the
signatures thereon and certify to the sufficiency thereof.)) transmit
the signatures to the appropriate officer or officers for a
determination of sufficiency as provided in RCW 35.21.005. Except as
provided in RCW 35.21.005(4), no person may withdraw his or her name
from a petition after it has been filed.
Upon receipt of a valid resolution or upon ((duly certifying))
receiving a certificate of sufficiency for a petition for continuation
of a community municipal corporation, the city clerk with whom the
resolution or petition was filed shall cause a proposition on
continuation of the term of existence of the community municipal
corporation to be placed on the ballot at the next city general
election. ((No)) A person ((shall be)) is not eligible to vote on such
proposition at such election unless he or she is a qualified voter and
resident of the city in which the service area is located.
The ballots shall contain the words "For continuation of community
municipal corporation" and "Against continuation of community municipal
corporation" or words equivalent thereto, and shall also contain the
names of the candidates to be voted for to fill the positions on the
community council. The names of all candidates to be voted upon shall
be printed on the ballot alphabetically in groups under the numbered
position on the council for which they are candidates.
If the results of the election as certified by the county
canvassing board reveal that a majority of the votes cast are for
continuation, the municipal corporation shall continue in existence for
an additional period of four years, and certificates of election shall
be issued to the successful candidates who shall assume office at the
same time as members of the city council or other legislative body of
the city.

--- END ---