BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
TUITION AND STATE FUNDING
Sec. 101 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the ((2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act)) 2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges may
reduce or increase tuition fees for resident undergraduates and
resident graduate students as follows:
(a) For resident undergraduates with fewer than ninety quarter
credits, or the equivalent semester credits, tuition fees may be no
more than forty-five percent of the total cost of attendance;
(b) For resident undergraduates with ninety or more quarter
credits, or the equivalent semester credits, tuition fees may be no
more than fifty-five percent of the total cost of attendance;
(c) For resident graduate students, tuition fees may be no more
than fifty percent of the total cost of attendance.
(3)(a) Beginning with the ((2003-04 academic year and ending with
the)) 2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates and resident graduate students, including summer school
students and students in other self-supporting degree programs.
Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal
growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions
of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the cost of instruction, the total costs of
attendance, the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement
program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and
a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(((7))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that in making appropriations
from the state's general fund to institutions of higher education, each
appropriation shall conform to the following:
(1) The state shall adopt the following funding goals:
(a) For resident undergraduates with fewer than ninety quarter
credits, or the equivalent semester credits, fifty-five percent of the
total cost of attendance;
(b) For resident undergraduates with ninety or more quarter
credits, or the equivalent semester credits, forty-five percent of the
total cost of attendance;
(c) For resident graduate students, fifty percent of the total cost
of attendance.
(2) The state shall not reduce state-supported enrollment levels
below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to improve or alter the
per student funding amount at any four-year institution of higher
education or the community and technical college system as a whole.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
In any academic year, the number of full-time equivalent students
charged tuition and fees by an institution pursuant to RCW
28B.15.067(2) may not exceed the annual average state-supported
enrollment provided for that institution in the omnibus appropriations
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.15.066 (General fund appropriations to institutions of
higher education) and 2003 c 232 s 3, 2000 c 152 s 2, 1999 c 309 s 932,
1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3, & 1993 c 379 s 205; and
(2) RCW 28B.15.068 (Tuition fees increase limitations -- State
funding goals -- Reports -- "Global challenge states" -- Notification of
availability of American opportunity tax credit) and 2009 c 540 s 1 &
2007 c 151 s 1.

PART II
WASHINGTON HIGHER EDUCATION INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 It is the intent of the legislature to
support a robust and diversified economy with a well-trained and
educated workforce. It is also the intent of the legislature to help
enable individuals who receive their postsecondary education in
Washington to find employment and remain in the state upon graduation.
Further, in order for Washington business to prosper in a highly
competitive global economy, business must have the necessary employee
talent, and it is the intent of the legislature to help business meet
its employment needs through the Washington higher education internship
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A qualifying internship must meet the
following requirements:
(1) A written plan for the internship experience must be developed
and approved jointly by the intern, a representative on behalf of the
institution of higher education, and a representative of the
participating employer.
(2) The intern must be:
(a) An undergraduate with at least ninety quarter credits, or the
equivalent semester credits, or a graduate student; and
(b) Currently enrolled in an institution of higher education in the
state of Washington.
(3) The plan must:
(a) Provide the intern with the opportunity to learn current
practices in business, industry, or government;
(b) Identify the skills and knowledge that will be enhanced and any
practical applications of those skills and knowledge in the intern's
major or career field; and
(c) Indicate that the internship is directly related to the
intern's major or career field.
(4) Upon completion of the internship, the intern shall submit to
the institution of higher education a report that includes the
following information:
(a) A summary evaluation of the internship experience, prepared and
signed by the intern; and
(b) A summary evaluation of the intern's experience, prepared and
signed by a representative of the participating employer.
(5) Upon receipt of the report in subsection (4) of this section,
the institution of higher education must provide written certification
to the department of revenue and the participating employer as to
whether the internship meets the qualifying requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed to participants in the Washington higher education internship
program created in section 202 of this act for wages and benefits paid
to interns in qualifying internships.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is equal to eighty-five
percent of the value of a participant's payments of wages and benefits
to interns in qualifying internships. Internship wage and benefit
calculations shall not exceed the state median entry level wage as
determined by the employment security department. If an internship
does not meet the requirements of section 202 of this act, the
participant must remit to the department the value of any credits taken
plus interest. The credit earned by a participant in one calendar year
may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in the
subsequent six calendar years.
(3) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

PART III
FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
In order to allow the greatest flexibility and latitude to align
financial aid with demand for programs, the institutions of higher
education and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall each administer state and federal financial aid for their
students according to such rules as the state board for community and
technical colleges may adopt and pursuant to guidelines developed by
the council of presidents for the four-year public institutions of
higher education.

Sec. 302 RCW 28B.76.030 and 2004 c 275 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the board is to:
(1) Develop a statewide strategic master plan for higher education
and continually monitor state and institution progress in meeting the
vision, goals, priorities, and strategies articulated in the plan;
(2) Based on objective data analysis, develop and recommend
statewide policies to enhance the availability, quality, efficiency,
and accountability of public higher education in Washington state;
(3) Administer ((state and federal financial aid and)) other
education services programs in a cost-effective manner;
(4) Serve as an advocate on behalf of students and the overall
system of higher education to the governor, the legislature, and the
public;
(5) Represent the broad public interest above the interests of the
individual colleges and universities; and
(6) Coordinate with the governing boards of the two and four-year
institutions of higher education, the state board for community and
technical colleges, ((the workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) and the superintendent of public instruction to create a
seamless system of public education for the citizens of Washington
state geared toward student success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 43.08
RCW to read as follows:
The state treasurer, working with the institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, shall develop and provide a
one-stop financial aid web-based portal that displays all student
financial aid programs available at each of those institutions of
higher education and community and technical colleges in a uniform
manner that allows students and their parents to compare the various
financial aid programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.12.010 (Created) and 1994 c 130 s 1 & 1974 ex.s. c 177
s 1;
(2) RCW 28B.12.020 (Purpose) and 1994 c 130 s 2 & 1974 ex.s. c 177
s 2;
(3) RCW 28B.12.030 (Definitions) and 2002 c 187 s 2, 1994 c 130 s
3, & 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 3;
(4) RCW 28B.12.040 (Board to develop and administer program--Agreements authorized, limitation) and 2009 c 560 s 21, 1994 c 130 s 4,
1993 c 385 s 3, 1985 c 370 s 58, & 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 4;
(5) RCW 28B.12.050 (Disbursal of state work-study funds -- Criteria)
and 1994 c 130 s 5, 1987 c 330 s 201, 1985 c 370 s 59, & 1974 ex.s. c
177 s 5;
(6) RCW 28B.12.055 (Work-study opportunity grant for high-demand
occupations) and 2009 c 215 s 12;
(7) RCW 28B.12.060 (Rules -- Mandatory provisions) and 2009 c 172 s
1, 2005 c 93 s 4, 2002 c 354 s 224, & 1994 c 130 s 6;
(8) RCW 28B.12.070 (Annual report of institutions to higher
education coordinating board) and 1994 c 130 s 7, 1985 c 370 s 61, &
1974 ex.s. c 177 s 7;
(9) RCW 28B.92.010 (State need grant program established -- Purpose)
and 2004 c 275 s 34, 1999 c 345 s 2, 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 2, & 1969 ex.s.
c 222 s 7;
(10) RCW 28B.92.020 (State need grant program -- Findings -- Intent)
and 2003 c 19 s 11 & 1999 c 345 s 1;
(11) RCW 28B.92.030 (Definitions) and 2009 c 238 s 7, 2009 c 215 s
5, 2004 c 275 s 35, 2002 c 187 s 1, 1989 c 254 s 2, 1985 c 370 s 56,
1979 ex.s. c 235 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 16, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s
8;
(12) RCW 28B.92.040 (Board, guidelines in performance of duties)
and 2004 c 275 s 36, 1999 c 345 s 3, 1995 c 269 s 801, & 1969 ex.s. c
222 s 10;
(13) RCW 28B.92.050 (Powers and duties of board) and 1999 c 345 s
4, 1989 c 254 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 11;
(14) RCW 28B.92.060 (State need grant awards) and 2009 c 215 s 4,
2007 c 404 s 2, 2005 c 93 s 3, 2004 c 275 s 37, 1999 c 345 s 5, 1991 c
164 s 4, 1989 c 254 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 12;
(15) RCW 28B.92.070 (Persian Gulf veterans -- Limited application of
RCW 28B.92.060) and 2004 c 275 s 38 & 1991 c 164 s 3;
(16) RCW 28B.92.080 (Eligibility for state need grant) and 2009 c
238 s 9, 2007 c 404 s 1, 2004 c 275 s 39, 1999 c 345 s 6, 1989 c 254 s
5, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 13;
(17) RCW 28B.92.082 (Enhanced need grants -- Eligibility) and 2009 c
215 s 3;
(18) RCW 28B.92.084 (Eligibility of opportunity internship
graduates) and 2009 c 238 s 8;
(19) RCW 28B.92.085 (Part-time students -- Review of financial aid
policies and procedures) and 2007 c 404 s 3;
(20) RCW 28B.92.086 (Dual credit programs -- Review of financial aid
policies and programs) and 2009 c 215 s 10;
(21) RCW 28B.92.090 (Aid granted without regard to applicant's
race, creed, color, religion, sex, or ancestry) and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s
14;
(22) RCW 28B.92.100 (Theology student denied aid) and 1969 ex.s. c
222 s 15;
(23) RCW 28B.92.110 (Application of award) and 2009 c 238 s 10,
2004 c 275 s 40, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 16;
(24) RCW 28B.92.120 (Board to determine how funds disbursed) and
2004 c 275 s 41 & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 17;
(25) RCW 28B.92.130 (Grants, gifts, bequests and devises of
property) and 2004 c 275 s 42 & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 18;
(26) RCW 28B.92.140 (State educational trust fund -- Deposits--Expenditures) and 1997 c 269 s 1, 1996 c 107 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 12,
1985 c 57 s 10, & 1981 c 55 s 1;
(27) RCW 28B.92.150 (Board rules) and 2004 c 275 s 43, 1999 c 345
s 7, 1973 c 62 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 19;
(28) RCW 28B.97.010 (Washington higher education loan program) and
2009 c 215 s 13;
(29) RCW 28B.97.020 (Definitions) and 2009 c 215 s 14;
(30) RCW 28B.102.010 (Intent -- Legislative findings) and 2004 c 58
s 1 & 1987 c 437 s 1;
(31) RCW 28B.102.020 (Definitions) and 2004 c 58 s 2, 1996 c 53 s
1, 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 36, & 1987 c 437 s 2;
(32) RCW 28B.102.030 (Program created -- Powers and duties of board)
and 2004 c 58 s 3 & 1987 c 437 s 3;
(33) RCW 28B.102.040 (Selection of participants -- Processes--Criteria) and 2008 c 170 s 306 & 2005 c 518 s 918;
(34) RCW 28B.102.045 (Satisfactory progress required) and 2004 c 58
s 5 & 1988 c 125 s 7;
(35) RCW 28B.102.050 (Award of conditional scholarships and loan
repayments -- Amount -- Duration) and 2004 c 58 s 6 & 1987 c 437 s 5;
(36) RCW 28B.102.055 (Loan repayment agreements -- Rules) and 2004 c
58 s 8;
(37) RCW 28B.102.060 (Repayment obligation) and 2004 c 58 s 7, 1996
c 53 s 2, 1993 c 423 s 1, 1991 c 164 s 6, & 1987 c 437 s 6;
(38) RCW 28B.102.080 (Future teachers conditional scholarship
account) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 917, 2007 c 396 s 9, & 2004 c 58 s
9;
(39) RCW 28B.103.010 (Definitions) and 2006 c 71 s 1, 2000 c 159 s
1, & 1994 c 234 s 5;
(40) RCW 28B.103.020 (Program established -- Powers and duties of
office) and 2006 c 71 s 2 & 1994 c 234 s 6;
(41) RCW 28B.103.030 (Repayment obligation) and 1994 c 234 s 7;
(42) RCW 28B.105.010 (GET ready for math and science scholarship
program -- Purpose -- Awards) and 2007 c 214 s 1;
(43) RCW 28B.105.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 214 s 2;
(44) RCW 28B.105.030 (Eligibility) and 2007 c 214 s 3;
(45) RCW 28B.105.040 (Changes in eligibility -- Consequences) and
2007 c 214 s 4;
(46) RCW 28B.105.050 (Repayment obligation -- Conditions) and 2007 c
214 s 5;
(47) RCW 28B.105.060 (Office of the superintendent of public
instruction -- Duties) and 2007 c 214 s 6;
(48) RCW 28B.105.070 (Higher education coordinating board -- Duties)
and 2007 c 214 s 7;
(49) RCW 28B.105.080 (School districts -- Duties) and 2007 c 214 s 8;
(50) RCW 28B.105.090 (Program administrator -- Duties) and 2007 c 214
s 9;
(51) RCW 28B.105.100 (Higher education coordinating board and
program administrator -- Joint duties) and 2007 c 214 s 10;
(52) RCW 28B.105.110 (GET ready for math and science scholarship
account) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 918;
(53) RCW 28B.108.005 (Findings) and 1990 c 287 s 1;
(54) RCW 28B.108.010 (Definitions) and 2004 c 275 s 69, 1991 c 228
s 10, & 1990 c 287 s 2;
(55) RCW 28B.108.020 (Program created -- Duties of the higher
education coordinating board -- Screening committee) and 2009 c 259 s 1
& 1990 c 287 s 3;
(56) RCW 28B.108.030 (Advisory committee) and 1991 c 228 s 11 &
1990 c 287 s 4;
(57) RCW 28B.108.040 (Award of scholarships -- Amount -- Duration) and
1990 c 287 s 5;
(58) RCW 28B.108.060 (Scholarship endowment fund) and 2009 c 259 s
2, 2007 c 73 s 2, 1993 c 372 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 110, & 1990 c 287
s 7;
(59) RCW 28B.109.010 (Definitions) and 1996 c 253 s 401;
(60) RCW 28B.109.020 (Washington international exchange scholarship
program -- Administration by higher education coordinating board) and
1996 c 253 s 402;
(61) RCW 28B.109.030 (Reciprocal agreements to attend foreign
institutions) and 1996 c 253 s 403;
(62) RCW 28B.109.040 (Washington international exchange student
scholarships) and 1996 c 253 s 404;
(63) RCW 28B.109.050 (Washington international exchange trust fund)
and 1996 c 253 s 405;
(64) RCW 28B.109.060 (Washington international exchange scholarship
endowment fund) and 1996 c 253 s 406;
(65) RCW 28B.109.070 (Washington international exchange scholarship
endowment fund -- State matching funds) and 1996 c 253 s 407;
(66) RCW 28B.109.080 (Scholarship recipients -- Service obligation)
and 1996 c 253 s 408;
(67) RCW 28B.115.010 (Legislative findings) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9
s 716;
(68) RCW 28B.115.020 (Definitions) and 1991 c 332 s 15 & 1989 1st
ex.s. c 9 s 717;
(69) RCW 28B.115.030 (Program established -- Duties of board) and
1991 c 332 s 16 & 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 718;
(70) RCW 28B.115.040 (Technical assistance for rural communities)
and 1991 c 332 s 17;
(71) RCW 28B.115.050 (Planning committee -- Criteria for selecting
participants) and 2004 c 275 s 70, 1991 c 332 s 18, & 1989 1st ex.s. c
9 s 719;
(72) RCW 28B.115.060 (Eligible credentialed health care
professions -- Required service obligations) and 1991 c 332 s 19;
(73) RCW 28B.115.070 (Eligible credentialed health care
professions -- Health professional shortage areas) and 2003 c 278 s 3 &
1991 c 332 s 20;
(74) RCW 28B.115.080 (Annual award amount -- Scholarship
preferences -- Required service obligations) and 1993 c 492 s 271 & 1991
c 332 s 21;
(75) RCW 28B.115.090 (Loan repayment and scholarship awards) and
2003 c 278 s 4, 1991 c 332 s 22, & 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 720;
(76) RCW 28B.115.100 (Discrimination by participants prohibited--Violation) and 1991 c 332 s 23;
(77) RCW 28B.115.110 (Participant obligation -- Repayment obligation)
and 1991 c 332 s 24, 1991 c 164 s 8, & 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 721;
(78) RCW 28B.115.120 (Participant obligation -- Scholarships) and
1993 c 423 s 2 & 1991 c 332 s 25;
(79) RCW 28B.115.130 (Health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program fund) and 1991 c 332 s 28;
(80) RCW 28B.115.140 (Transfer of program administration) and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 722;
(81) RCW 28B.116.005 (Findings) and 2005 c 215 s 1;
(82) RCW 28B.116.010 (Definitions) and 2005 c 215 s 2;
(83) RCW 28B.116.020 (Program created--Duties of the higher
education coordinating board) and 2009 c 560 s 20 & 2005 c 215 s 3;
(84) RCW 28B.116.030 (Award of scholarships) and 2005 c 215 s 4;
(85) RCW 28B.116.050 (Foster care endowed scholarship trust fund)
and 2005 c 215 s 6;
(86) RCW 28B.116.060 (Foster care scholarship endowment fund) and
2007 c 73 s 3 & 2005 c 215 s 7;
(87) RCW 28B.116.070 (State matching funds--Transfer of funds from
trust fund to endowment fund) and 2005 c 215 s 8;
(88) RCW 28B.117.005 (Findings -- Intent) and 2007 c 314 s 1;
(89) RCW 28B.117.010 (Program created -- Purpose) and 2007 c 314 s 3;
(90) RCW 28B.117.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 314 s 2;
(91) RCW 28B.117.030 (Program design and implementation -- Student
eligibility -- Scholarships) and 2007 c 314 s 4;
(92) RCW 28B.117.040 (Identification of eligible students and
applicants -- Duties of institutions of higher education -- Duties of the
department of social and health services) and 2007 c 314 s 5;
(93) RCW 28B.117.050 (Internet web site and outreach program) and
2007 c 314 s 6;
(94) RCW 28B.117.060 (Program of supplemental educational
transition planning for youth in foster care -- Contract with
nongovernmental entity) and 2007 c 314 s 7;
(95) RCW 28B.117.070 (Reports -- Recommendations) and 2007 c 314 s 8;
(96) RCW 28B.117.900 (Construction -- 2007 c 314) and 2007 c 314 s 9;
(97) RCW 28B.117.901 (Expiration of chapter) and 2007 c 314 s 10;
(98) RCW 28B.118.005 (Intent -- Finding) and 2007 c 405 s 1;
(99) RCW 28B.118.010 (Program design) and 2008 c 321 s 9 & 2007 c
405 s 2;
(100) RCW 28B.118.020 (Duties of the office of the superintendent
of public instruction) and 2007 c 405 s 3;
(101) RCW 28B.118.030 (Duty of school districts -- Notification) and
2007 c 405 s 4;
(102) RCW 28B.118.040 (Duties of the higher education coordinating
board) and 2007 c 405 s 5;
(103) RCW 28B.118.050 (Grants, gifts, bequests, and devises) and
2007 c 405 s 6;
(104) RCW 28B.118.060 (Rules) and 2007 c 405 s 7;
(105) RCW 28B.119.005 (Intent -- Finding) and 2002 c 204 s 1;
(106) RCW 28B.119.010 (Program design -- Parameters) and 2004 c 275
s 60, 2003 c 233 s 5, & 2002 c 204 s 2;
(107) RCW 28B.119.020 (Implementation and administration) and 2002
c 204 s 3;
(108) RCW 28B.119.030 (Funding for state need grant program not
impaired) and 2004 c 275 s 71 & 2002 c 204 s 4;
(109) RCW 28B.119.040 (Requirements for students receiving home-based instruction not affected) and 2002 c 204 s 5;
(110) RCW 28B.119.050 (Washington promise scholarship account) and
2002 c 204 s 6;
(111) RCW 28B.119.900 (Effective date -- 2002 c 204) and 2002 c 204
s 9;
(112) RCW 28B.121.005 (Findings -- Intent) and 2008 c 208 s 1;
(113) RCW 28B.121.010 (Definitions) and 2008 c 208 s 2;
(114) RCW 28B.121.020 (Program established) and 2008 c 208 s 3;
(115) RCW 28B.121.030 (Selection of participants -- Selection
committee -- Selection criteria) and 2008 c 208 s 4;
(116) RCW 28B.121.040 (Eligibility) and 2008 c 208 s 5;
(117) RCW 28B.121.050 (Award of scholarships -- Amount -- Duration) and
2008 c 208 s 6;
(118) RCW 28B.121.060 (Repayment obligation -- Rules) and 2008 c 208
s 7;
(119) RCW 28B.121.070 (Food animal veterinarian conditional
scholarship account) and 2008 c 208 s 8;
(120) RCW 28B.133.005 (Finding -- Intent) and 2003 c 19 s 1;
(121) RCW 28B.133.010 (Program created) and 2004 c 275 s 72 & 2003
c 19 s 2;
(122) RCW 28B.133.020 (Eligibility) and 2004 c 275 s 73 & 2003 c 19
s 3;
(123) RCW 28B.133.030 (Students with dependents grant account) and
2003 c 19 s 4;
(124) RCW 28B.133.040 (Program administration) and 2003 c 19 s 5;
(125) RCW 28B.133.050 (Use of grants) and 2004 c 275 s 74 & 2003 c
19 s 6;
(126) RCW 28B.133.900 (Short title) and 2003 c 19 s 7;
(127) RCW 28B.133.901 (Captions not law -- 2003 c 19) and 2003 c 19
s 9;
(128) RCW 28B.76.500 (Student financial aid programs--Administration by board -- College information web-based portal) and 2009
c 215 s 7, 1985 c 370 s 23, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 15;
(129) RCW 28B.76.505 (Scholarship endowment programs--Administration of funds) and 2007 c 73 s 1;
(130) RCW 28B.76.525 (State financial aid account) and 2005 c 139
s 1;
(131) RCW 28B.76.526 (Washington opportunity pathways account) and
2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2; and
(132) RCW 28B.76.540 (Administrative responsibilities) and 2004 c
275 s 18, 1998 c 245 s 24, 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 12, 1990 c 33 s 561,
1986 c 136 s 20, & 1985 c 370 s 7.

PART IV
TRANSFER AND ARTICULATION
Sec. 401 RCW 28B.76.240 and 2004 c 275 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board, in conjunction with the institutions of higher education
and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall adopt
and implement a statewide transfer and articulation system and policies
that ensure efficient transfer of credits and courses across public two
and four-year institutions of higher education. ((The intent of the
policies is to create a statewide system of articulation and alignment
between two and four-year institutions. Policies may address but are
not limited to creation of a statewide system of course equivalency,
creation of transfer associate degrees, statewide articulation
agreements, applicability of technical courses toward baccalaureate
degrees, and other issues. The institutions of higher education and
the state board for community and technical colleges shall cooperate
with the board in developing the statewide policies and shall provide
support and staff resources as necessary to assist in maintaining the
policies.)) This system and policies must include common lower division
academic transfer course numbering and a common curriculum content
framework. The board shall submit a progress report to the higher
education committees of the senate and house of representatives by
((December 1, 2006)) September 1, 2012, by which time the legislature
expects ((measurable improvement in alignment and transfer efficiency))
the system to be complete and the policies, including common course
numbering and a common curriculum content framework, implemented for
the 2012-13 academic year. In the event that the implementation date
of September 1, 2012, is not met, for every thirty days beyond this
date the office of financial management shall withhold ten percent of
funding disbursements to the higher education coordinating board, the
institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and
technical colleges.

PART V
COST SAVINGS
Sec. 501 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2010 c 61 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An institution of higher education may exercise
independently those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education.
(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the
department of general administration.
(c) Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of
higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and
43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917,
43.19.1937, 43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and
43.19.560 through 43.19.637.
(d) Purchases under chapter 39.29, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by
institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for
materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into
by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.
(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450.
(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350.
(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily
demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that
the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any
of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW
43.19.685, 43.19.534, and 43.19.637.
(h) Any institution of higher education that chooses to exercise
independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of
commodities shall notify the director of general administration.
Thereafter the director of general administration shall not be required
to provide those services for that institution for the duration of the
general administration contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(5) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.
(6) Cost savings achieved by joint, binding, shared cost-savings
agreements between any four or more combination of two and four-year
institutions of higher education shall be retained by the individual
institutions.

PART VI
RISING JUNIORS EXAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the public institutions of higher
education, the higher education coordinating board shall select a
single rising juniors test to be used by all of the institutions of
higher education. The first rising juniors test shall be administered
in the winter of 2013. Thereafter, the rising juniors test shall be
administered several times each year.
(2) All students pursuing a baccalaureate degree at any institution
of higher education must take the rising juniors test. A student must
have at least sixty and should have no more than ninety quarter
credits, or the equivalent semester credits, at the time of testing.
(3) Students with ninety or more quarter credits, or the equivalent
semester credits, who have not tested at the time of course
registration, may not enroll in upper division coursework. Rising
juniors test results may not prevent a student from taking upper
division coursework.
(4) Students scoring in the top quintile of the rising juniors test
must receive first preference for placement in upper division
coursework and for the advanced higher education loan program.

PART VII
HIGH SCHOOL DUAL CREDIT PROGRAMS
Sec. 701 RCW 28A.600.390 and 1994 c 205 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating
board shall jointly develop and adopt rules governing RCW 28A.600.300
through 28A.600.380, if rules are necessary. The rules shall be
written to encourage the maximum use of the program and shall not
narrow or limit the enrollment options under RCW 28A.600.300 through
28A.600.380.
(2) High school dual credit programs, including but not limited to
running start and advanced placement, shall be integrated to the
greatest extent possible and the top quintile of achievers in these
programs shall be given first preference for lower division course
placement and financial aid by institutions of higher education.

PART VIII
REMEDIAL INSTRUCTION CHARGE BACK
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 The legislature finds that too many
students entering college are unprepared and must take learning
content, such as remedial math, English, and civics that they should
have learned in high school. There are considerable financial and time
costs to the students that are associated with having to take remedial
coursework in college. Students enrolled in remedial courses are more
likely to leave college before earning a degree or certificate.
Furthermore, such students may be deterred from pursuing some programs
of study or careers. There are also considerable financial costs to
the state and the institutions of higher education.

Sec. 802 RCW 28B.10.685 and 1995 c 310 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning in 1997, by September 30th of each year, each state
university, regional university, state college, and, for community
colleges and technical colleges, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall provide a report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and
the commission on student learning under RCW 28A.630.885. The report
shall contain the following information on students who, within three
years of graduating from a Washington high school, enrolled the prior
year in a state-supported precollege level class at the institution:
(1) The number of such students enrolled in a precollege level class in
mathematics, reading, grammar, spelling, writing, or English; (2) the
types of precollege classes in which each student was enrolled; and (3)
the name of the Washington high school from which each student
graduated.
For students who enrolled in a precollege class within three years
of graduating from a Washington high school, each institution of higher
education shall also report to the Washington high school from which
the student graduated. The annual report shall include information on
the number of students from that high school enrolled in precollege
classes, and the types of classes taken by the students.
For each student who enrolled in a precollege class within three
years of graduating from a Washington high school, an institution of
higher education may establish and charge the respective Washington
school district for the cost of instruction of the precollege class.

PART IX
WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD ABOLISHED
TRANSFER OF POWERS, DUTIES, AND FUNCTIONS TO THE STATE BOARD
FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
Sec. 901 RCW 28C.18.010 and 2009 c 151 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this title.
(1) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve
mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and
computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function
effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States,
commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes
English as a second language and preparation and testing service for
the general education development exam.
(2) "Board" means the ((workforce training and education
coordinating board)) state board for community and technical colleges.
(3) "Director" means the director of the ((workforce training and
education coordinating)) board.
(4) "Industry skill panel" means a regional partnership of
business, labor, and education leaders that identifies skill gaps in a
key economic cluster and enables the industry and public partners to
respond to and be proactive in addressing workforce skill needs.
(5) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic
education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the
federal workforce investment act, programs and courses funded by the
federal vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal
adult education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult
literacy education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses
offered by private and public nonprofit organizations that are
representative of communities or significant segments of communities
and provide job training or adult literacy services.
(6) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs
offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the
preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment
in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate
or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based
applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic
knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work
attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific
skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied
technology education.
(7) "Workforce development council" means a local workforce
investment board as established in P.L. 105-220 Sec. 117.
(8) "Workforce skills" means skills developed through applied
learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic
knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and,
thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management
of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.

Sec. 902 RCW 28C.18.070 and 1995 c 130 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature continues to recognize the vital role that
workforce development efforts play in equipping the state's workers
with the skills they need to succeed in an economy that requires higher
levels of skill and knowledge. The legislature also recognizes that
businesses are increasingly relying on the state's workforce
development programs and expect them to be responsive to their changing
skill requirements. The state benefits from a workforce development
system that allows firms and workers to be highly competitive in global
markets.
(2) The establishment of the workforce training and education
coordinating board ((was an)) and the transfer of its powers, duties,
and functions to the state board for community and technical colleges
are integral steps in developing a strategic approach to workforce
development. For the ((coordinating)) board to carry out its intended
role, the board must be able to give unambiguous guidance to operating
agencies, the governor, and the legislature. It is the intent of
chapter 130, Laws of 1995, to clarify the preeminent role intended for
the ((workforce training and education coordinating)) board in
coordination and policy development of the state's workforce
development efforts.
(3) In the event that federal workforce development funds are block
granted to the state, it is the intent of the legislature to seek the
broadest possible input, from local and statewide organizations
concerned with workforce development, on the allocation of the federal
funds.
(4) For purposes of RCW 28C.18.080 through 28C.18.110, the term
"program" shall not refer to the activities of individual institutions
such as individual community or technical colleges, common schools,
service delivery areas, or job service centers; nor shall it refer to
individual fields of study or courses.

Sec. 903 RCW 28C.18.130 and 2008 c 103 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section,
the board, in consultation with ((the state board for community and
technical colleges,)) the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, and the employment security
department, shall allocate grants on a competitive basis to establish
and support industry skill panels.
(2) Eligible applicants for the grants allocated under this section
include, but are not limited to, workforce development councils,
community and technical colleges, economic development councils,
private career schools, chambers of commerce, trade associations, and
apprenticeship councils.
(3) Entities applying for a grant under this section shall provide
an employer match of at least twenty-five percent to be eligible. The
local match may include in-kind services.
(4) It shall be the role of industry skill panels funded under this
chapter to enable businesses in the industry to address workforce skill
needs. Industry skill panels shall identify workforce strategies to
meet the needs in order to benefit employers and workers across the
industry. Examples of strategies include, but are not limited to:
Developing career guidance materials; producing or updating skill
standards and curricula; designing training programs and courses;
developing technical assessments and certifications; arranging employer
mentoring, tutoring, and internships; identifying private sector
assistance in providing faculty or equipment to training providers; and
organizing industry conferences disseminating best practices. The
products and services of particular skill panels shall depend upon the
needs of the industry.

Sec. 904 RCW 28C.18.132 and 2008 c 258 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose ((and in partnership with the state board for community and
technical colleges)), the board shall convene a work group that
includes representatives from the prosperity partnership, the
technology alliance, the higher education coordinating board, a private
career or vocational school, a four-year public institution of higher
education, the council of faculty representatives, the united faculty
of Washington state, community and technical college faculty, and a
community and technical college student, to take the following actions
related to electronically distributed learning:
(a) Identify and evaluate current national private employer
workplace-based educational programs with electronically distributed
learning components provided by public colleges and universities. The
evaluation shall include:
(i) A review of the literature and interviews of practitioners
about promising practices and results;
(ii) An initial determination of feasibility based on targeted
populations served, subject matter, and level of education;
(iii) An overview of technological considerations and adult
learning strategies for distribution of learning to employer sites; and
(iv) An overview of cost factors, including shared costs or
coinvestments by public and private partners;
(b) Review and, to the extent necessary, establish standards and
best practices regarding electronically distributed learning and
related support services including online help desk support, advising,
mentoring, counseling, and tutoring;
(c) Recommend methods to increase student access to electronically
distributed learning programs of study and identify barriers to
programs of study participation and completion;
(d) Determine methods to increase the institutional supply and
quality of open course materials, with a focus on the OpenCourseWare
initiative at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology;
(e) Recommend methods to increase the availability and use of
digital open textbooks; and
(f) Review and report demographic information on electronically
distributed learning programs of study enrollments, retention, and
completions.
(2) The board shall work in cooperation with the state board for
community and technical colleges to report the preliminary results of
the studies to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008, and a final report by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 RCW 28C.18.020 (Workforce training and
education coordinating board) and 2010 c 128 s 6 & 1991 c 238 s 3 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The workforce training and education coordinating board is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the state board for community and technical colleges.
All references to the director or the workforce training and education
coordinating board in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed
to mean the director or the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the workforce training
and education coordinating board shall be delivered to the custody of
the state board for community and technical colleges. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the workforce training and education coordinating
board shall be made available to the state board for community and
technical colleges. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
workforce training and education coordinating board shall be assigned
to the state board for community and technical colleges.
(b) Any appropriations made to the workforce training and education
coordinating board shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the workforce training and education
coordinating board are transferred to the jurisdiction of the state
board for community and technical colleges. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to
the state board for community and technical colleges to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the workforce
training and education coordinating board shall be continued and acted
upon by the state board for community and technical colleges. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the workforce training and education coordinating board shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the workforce training and
education coordinating board assigned to the state board for community
and technical colleges under this section whose positions are within an
existing bargaining unit description at the state board for community
and technical colleges shall become a part of the existing bargaining
unit at the state board for community and technical colleges and shall
be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART X
TRANSFER OF HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD DATA
COLLECTION FUNCTIONS TO THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM
Sec. 1001 RCW 28B.76.280 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 58 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the institutions of higher education and
state education agencies, the ((board)) committee shall identify the
data needed to carry out its responsibilities for policy analysis,
accountability, program improvements, and public information. The
primary goals of the ((board's)) committee's data collection and
research are to describe how students and other beneficiaries of higher
education are being served; to support higher education accountability;
and to assist state policymakers and institutions in making policy
decisions.
(2) The board shall identify the most cost-effective manner for the
((board)) committee to collect data or access existing data. The
((board)) committee shall develop research priorities, policies, and
common definitions to maximize the reliability and consistency of data
across institutions.
(3) Specific protocols shall be developed by the ((board))
committee to protect the privacy of individual student records while
ensuring the availability of student data for legitimate research
purposes.

PART XI
HIGHER EDUCATION LOAN PROGRAM (HELP)
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The HELP investment fund is created within the state investment
board's portfolio of investment pools.
(2) Allocations to the fund shall be made by the state investment
board and shall not exceed three hundred million dollars.
(3) The rate charged to four-year institutions of higher education
for their proportional share of the HELP fund shall be a competitive
market rate determined by the state investment board.
(4) The state treasurer shall by rule oversee the uniformity and
fiscal integrity and transparency of the HELP fund.
(5) Proceeds of the HELP fund are to be exclusively for upper
division undergraduate and graduate students at institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

PART XII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201 Sections 201 and 202 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202 RCW 28B.76.280 is recodified as a section
in chapter 44.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1203 Section 904 of this act expires December
31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1204 Sections 101 through 104, 201 through
203, 301 through 304, 501, 601, 701, 801, 802, 901 through 906, 1001,
and 1101 of this act take effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---