BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.190 and 1984 c 186 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cemetery districts created under this chapter ((shall be)) are
deemed to be municipal corporations within the purview of the
Constitution and laws of the state of Washington. They ((shall))
constitute bodies corporate and possess all the usual powers of
corporations for public purposes. Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, they ((shall)) have full authority to carry out the
objects of their creation, and to that end are empowered to acquire,
hold, lease, manage, occupy, and sell real and personal property or any
interest therein; to enter into and perform any and all necessary
contracts; to appoint and employ necessary officers, agents, and
employees; to contract indebtedness, to borrow money, and to issue
general obligation bonds in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW; to levy
and enforce the collection of taxes against the lands within the
district, and to do any and all lawful acts to effectuate the purposes
of this chapter.
(2) No cemetery district may sell monuments, headstones,
tombstones, or any other memorial marker related to identifying a
gravesite, when a private, for-profit retailer or wholesaler of these
products is located within fifty miles of the boundary of the cemetery
district.

--- END ---