BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.170 (Automated traffic safety
cameras -- Definition) and 2010 c 161 s 1127, 2009 c 470 s 714, 2007 c
372 s 3, & 2005 c 167 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.655 and 2010 c 161 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An owner is relieved of civil or criminal liability for the
operation of a vehicle by another person when the owner has:
(a) Made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle;
(b) Delivered possession of the vehicle to the person acquiring
ownership;
(c) Released interest in the vehicle and provided the certificate
of title and registration certificate to the person acquiring
ownership; and
(d) Filed a report of sale that meets all the requirements in RCW
46.12.650(2).
(2) A person acquiring a vehicle assumes civil or criminal
liability for any traffic violation under this title, whether
designated as a traffic infraction or classified as a criminal offense,
that occurs after the date of sale or transfer of ownership based on
the vehicle's identification including, but not limited to:
(a) Parking infractions; and
(b) High occupancy toll lane violations((; and
(c) Violations recorded by automated traffic safety cameras)).
(3) A person shown as the buyer of a vehicle on an abandoned
vehicle report submitted to the department by a registered tow truck
operator assumes liability for the vehicle. Any previous owner is
relieved of civil or criminal liability for the operation of the
vehicle from the date of sale.
(4) A person who had no knowledge of the filing of the report of
sale is relieved of civil or criminal liability for the operation of
the vehicle. Liability is then transferred to the seller shown on the
report of sale.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.073 and 2007 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the
vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty. For the purpose of this subsection, a "traffic infraction
based on a vehicle's identification" includes, but is not limited to,
parking infractions((,)) and high occupancy toll lane violations((, and
violations recorded by automated traffic safety cameras)).
(2) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued, provide a
written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within thirty days of receiving the written notice, provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the
notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. For the purpose of
this subsection, a "parking infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" is limited to parking infractions occurring on a
private parking facility's premises.

--- END ---