BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
providing employees with meal and rest periods and compensating
employees for all hours worked. The legislature further recognizes,
however, that there are certain industries where an employer cannot
relieve an employee of all duties during a meal or rest period because
the risk of harm to the employee and the public is too great. The
armored vehicle industry is one of these industries where it is
impossible for employers to comply with the meal and rest period
requirements, as currently interpreted by Washington courts. Armored
vehicles are frequent targets of armed robberies and the risk of harm
to the public and the armored vehicle employees are increased when the
vehicles stay stationary for long periods of time. In order to promote
safety and security, it is important that armored vehicle employees
remain vigilant at all times. The employment conditions of the armored
vehicle industry are unique and require a specific statutory treatment.
It is the intent of the legislature to exempt these employers from the
meal and rest period requirements so long as employees are fully
compensated for all hours worked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employers are not required to meet the meal and rest period
requirements under rules adopted by the department under this chapter
for employees in the transportation industry whose work places the
employee inside an armored vehicle in shifts during a workday.
Employers are not required to relieve these employees of all duty and
may require them to be vigilant for the protection of themselves and
the public. Employers shall, however, allow these employees to eat and
take reasonable rest periods while on duty, with pay.
(2) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section does not modify
an employer's responsibility to compensate employees for all hours
worked, to pay overtime compensation required under RCW 49.46.130, or
to comply with all other applicable requirements.

--- END ---