BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) In an action to recover damages arising out of the operation or
use of a motor vehicle, a person may not recover noneconomic losses to
compensate for pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical impairment,
disfigurement, and other nonpecuniary damages if either or both of the
following apply:
(i) The injured person was at the time of the accident operating
the vehicle in violation of RCW 46.61.502 and was convicted of that
offense; or
(ii) The injured person was the owner of a vehicle involved in the
accident, the injured person had been previously cited for not having
proof of liability insurance and the citation was not dismissed under
RCW 46.30.020, and the vehicle was not insured at the time of the
accident as required under chapter 46.30 RCW or the injured person
could not establish financial responsibility as required under this
chapter and RCW 46.30.020.
(b) An insurer is not liable, directly or indirectly, under a
policy of liability or uninsured motorists coverage to indemnify for
noneconomic losses of a person injured as described in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) If a person described in subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section
was injured by a motorist who at the time of the accident was operating
the motorist's vehicle in violation of RCW 46.61.502 and was convicted
of that offense, the injured person is not barred from recovering
noneconomic losses to compensate for pain, suffering, inconvenience,
physical impairment, disfigurement, and other nonpecuniary damages.

--- END ---