BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.280 and 1988 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall administer ((and)), investigate, and enforce
violations of RCW 49.12.270 and ((49.12.275)) 49.12.287.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.12.285 and 1988 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may issue a notice of infraction if the department
reasonably believes that an employer has failed to comply with RCW
49.12.270 or ((49.12.275)) 49.12.287. The form of the notice of
infraction shall be adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An
employer who is found to have committed an infraction under RCW
49.12.270 or ((49.12.275)) 49.12.287 may be assessed a monetary penalty
not to exceed ((two)) five hundred dollars for each violation. An
employer who repeatedly violates RCW 49.12.270 or ((49.12.275))
49.12.287 may be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand
dollars for each violation. For purposes of this section, ((the
failure to comply with RCW 49.12.275 as to an employee or)) the failure
to comply with RCW 49.12.270 as to a period of leave sought by an
employee or the failure to comply with RCW 49.12.287 as to an employee
shall each constitute separate violations. An employer has twenty days
to appeal the notice of infraction. Any appeal of a violation
determined to be an infraction shall be heard and determined by an
administrative law judge. Monetary penalties collected under this
section shall be deposited into the general fund.

--- END ---