BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Ferry service is an integral element of the state's network of
highway, transit, freight, and communications infrastructure vital to
the overall socioeconomic well-being of the state and to the survival
of ferry-dependent communities.
(2) Serious declines in the amount and reliability of ferry service
in recent years have damaged the economic vitality of many ferry
communities. For these businesses and working families, recovery from
the current, severe recession depends directly on the rapid restoration
of better ferry service.
(3) Immediate action is needed to bring ferry system operating
costs under control by downsizing administrative functions, improving
the working climate, and by refocusing the ferry system on its primary
mission of delivering reliable, cost-effective service.
(4) Immediate action is also needed both to begin furnishing new
vessels to our overaged, too small ferry fleet and to bolster the
maintenance of the existing fleet during the decade or more required to
achieve a substantial improvement in fleet size, age, and reliability.
(5) Despite several years of legislative studies, directives,
planning exercises, and the administrative integration of Washington
ferry service into the department of transportation, ferry system
management remains ineffective with key goals for cost-effective
operations, personnel management, vessel construction, and the public
availability of comprehensive budget and related information
unrealized.
(6) Accordingly, the legislature intends to impose on a
transitional, get-well basis a system reform executive board charged
with executive supervision of ferry system managers as the system
implements a series of explicit ferry system reform tasks and prepares
to transition to a new, sustainable management structure with enhanced
public oversight.
(7) Recognizing that restoring public trust in the ferry system
requires confidence that past problems will not be repeated, the
legislature also intends to launch a prompt comprehensive and
independent audit of the series of executive and legislative choices
that have led to the current service and fleet replacement crises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the ferry
reform and accountability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state ferry reform executive board is created.
Unless extended by the legislature, the board must complete its work by
and dissolve June 30, 2013. The board must consist of three members
appointed by the governor with the concurrence of the speaker of the
house of representatives and the majority leader of the senate in
consultation with the minority leaders of the house of representatives
and senate. In order to bring a balance of executive expertise, the
appointees must be an executive with maritime operations experience, an
executive with experience in cultivating positive workplace
environments, and an executive with contracting and construction
experience, each chosen for their proven capacity for innovation and
organizational excellence.
(2) Staffing of the Washington state ferry reform executive board
must be furnished by the Washington state ferries and the department of
transportation staffs as part of their regular support to the ferry
system's executives. The board may hire one full-time executive staff
support per appointed board member, of which one must be designated
transition chief of staff for the ferry system. Support staff must
receive compensation similar to a level two Washington management
services employee.
(3) Appointed board members must be compensated on a per diem basis
at the same rate of pay as the assistant secretary of Washington state
ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state ferry reform executive board shall direct
and oversee the transition of Washington ferry service to the cost-effective performance of the mission prescribed in section 5 of this
act. To that end, the board shall work toward the following key
operational reform goals:
(a) Maximize administrative efficiency so that the fleet operates
with minimum nonafloat staff and administrative costs;
(b) Reform the personnel climate and labor-management relationships
to assure quality service by a healthy career force;
(c) Improve fleet maintenance effectiveness to assure reliable,
cost-effective service from the aging ferry fleet; and
(d) Create a new ferry system management architecture to be fully
functional by June 1, 2013, which incorporates a fully transparent
budget and other management information and participation by ferry
communities and ferry crews in cost control, system efficiency, fare
setting (per transportation commission processes), and service schedule
development.
(2) The Washington state ferry reform executive board shall propose
to the legislature by December 1, 2012:
(a) A revised, long-range plan for cost-effective ferry service,
fleet and terminal maintenance, fleet and terminal modernization, and
ferry system staffing;
(b) A plan for ferry system organization and governance reform; and
(c) A revised strategy for the acquisition of new ferries
consistent with the mission prescribed in section 5 of this act.
(3) The Washington state ferry reform executive board shall
periodically consult with ferry communities and ferry system employees
in public meetings.
(4) The Washington state ferry reform executive board shall provide
quarterly updates on its activities to the Washington state
transportation commission, the legislative standing committees on
transportation, and the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The sole mission of the Washington state ferry system, operating as
a division of the department of transportation and in consonance with
the statutory authorities of the Washington state transportation
commission, is to operate, staff, and maintain a ferry fleet and
terminal system to deliver on marine highway routes designated by the
legislature highly reliable, maximally cost-effective ferry service
integrated with all other elements of the regional transportation
network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The total cost of the Washington state ferry reform executive board
and the accountability audit under section 7 of this act, plus an
additional one million dollars in savings per fiscal biennium, must be
achieved by utilizing existing resources that support the ferry
system's executive and administrative staff costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to assure the lasting reforms directed under sections 1
through 6 of this act, the legislature and the public must be certain
that the lessons of past problems have been learned. To that end, the
state auditor shall conduct an immediate, comprehensive forensic audit
of the series of legislative and executive actions and decisions that
have materially contributed to the current crisis of ferry service and
system viability. In addition to identifying the salient executive and
legislative decisions and their impact on the system's performance, the
auditor shall suggest corrective lessons learned, provide a progress
report to the transportation committees of the legislature in January
2012, and complete the audit by June 2012.

--- END ---