BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 14.08.015 and 1987 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Airport charges" means charges of an airport operator for tie-downs, landing fees, the occupation of a hangar by an aircraft, and all
other charges owing or to become owing under a contract between an
aircraft owner and an airport operator or under an officially adopted
regulation and/or tariff including, but not limited to, the cost of
sale and related expenses.
(2) "Aircraft" means every species of aircraft or other mechanical
device capable of being used for the purpose of aerial flight.
(3) "Airport operator" means any municipality ((as defined in RCW
14.08.010(2))) or state agency which owns and/or operates an airport.
(4) "Airport purposes" means and includes airport, restricted
landing area, and other air navigation facility purposes.
(5) "Awarding authority" means any person, including the
municipality and a contractor or subcontractor, who awards or otherwise
enters into a contract to perform food and beverage, retail, security,
or janitorial services, at an airport in a county with a population of
one million or more.
(6) "Contractor" means any person who enters into a service
contract with the awarding authority and any subcontractors to the
service contract at any tier who employ ten or more persons.
(7) "Employee" means any person engaged to perform services
pursuant to a service contract, but does not include a person who is:
(a) A managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee, including any
person who would be so defined under the federal fair labor standards
act; or (b) employed for less than fifteen hours per week.
(8) "Labor organization" means the same as in 29 U.S.C. Sec.
152(5).
(9) "Labor peace agreement" means an enforceable agreement with a
labor organization that represents or seeks to represent the
contractor's employees working under the contract and that contains
provisions under which the labor organization for itself and its
members agree to refrain from engaging in any picketing, work
stoppages, boycotts, or any other economic interference with the
operations of the contractor under its contract.
(10) "Municipality" means any county, city, town, airport district,
or port district of this state.
(11) "Owner" means (a) every natural person, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, trust, estate, or organization, or agent
thereof with actual or apparent authority, who expressly or impliedly
contracts for use of airport property for landing, parking, or
hangaring aircraft, and (b) includes the registered owner or owners and
lienholders of record with the federal aviation administration.
(12) "Person" means any individual, proprietorship, partnership,
joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust
association, or other entity that may employ or enter into other
contracts, including the state and its political subdivisions.
(13) "Service contract" means a contract for the performance of
food and beverage, retail, security, or janitorial services, at the
airport.
(14) "Successor service contract" means a service contract with the
awarding authority under which substantially the same services to be
performed have previously been rendered to the awarding authority as
part of the same program or at the same facility under another service
contract or have previously been rendered by the awarding authority's
own employees.
(15) "Terminated contractor" means a contractor whose service
contract expires without renewal or whose contract is terminated within
eighteen months before or after the commencement of operations under a
successor service contract, and includes the awarding authority itself
when work previously rendered by the awarding authority's own employees
is the subject of a successor service contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 14.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each contractor and awarding authority that enters into a
service contract to be performed at the airport shall be subject to the
following obligations:
(a) The awarding authority shall give advance notice to a
contractor and the exclusive bargaining representative of any of the
contractor's employees, of the termination or nonrenewal of the service
contract as soon as reasonably practicable after the awarding authority
knows or decides that the contract will be terminated or not renewed,
and shall provide the contractor and the exclusive bargaining
representative with the name, telephone number, and address of the
successor contractor or contractors, if known. The terminated
contractor shall, not later than three days after receipt of the
notice, provide the successor contractor with the name, date of hire,
and employment occupation classification of each person employed by the
terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service
contract as of the date the terminated contractor receives the notice
of termination or nonrenewal.
(b) On the date the service contract terminates, the terminated
contractor shall provide the successor contractor with updated
information concerning the name, date of hire, and employment
occupation classification of each person employed by the terminated
contractor at the site or sites covered by the service contract, to
ensure that the information is current up to the actual date of service
contract termination.
(c) If the awarding authority fails to notify the terminated
contractor of the identity of the successor contractor, as required by
(a) of this subsection, the terminated contractor shall provide the
information described in (b) of this subsection to the awarding
authority not later than three days after receiving notice that the
service contract will be terminated. The awarding authority shall be
responsible for providing the information to the successor contractor
as soon as the successor contractor has been selected.
(d)(i) Except as provided in (d)(iv) of this subsection, a
successor contractor shall retain, for at least ninety days from the
date of first performance of services under the successor service
contract, each of the employees who was continuously employed by the
terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service
contract during the six-month period immediately preceding the
termination or nonrenewal of the service contract, or, if sooner, the
layoff or termination of the employee, including any periods of layoff
or leave with recall rights, and shall offer employment to employees
who have been continuously employed by the terminated contractor at the
site or sites covered by the service contract during the six-month
period immediately preceding commencement of the successor contractor's
operations and who are engaged in operations of the terminated
contractor that have not ceased when the successor contractor commences
operations and retain any employee who accepts the offer for at least
ninety days from the date of first performance of services under the
successor service contract.
(ii) Except as provided in (d)(iv) of this subsection, if the
successor service contract is terminated prior to the expiration of the
ninety-day period, then any contractor awarded a subsequent successor
service contract shall be bound by the requirements set forth in this
subsection to retain, for a new ninety-day period commencing with the
onset of the subsequent successor service contract, all of the
employees who were entitled to retention or employment as provided in
(d)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) At least five days prior to the termination of a service
contract, if the termination occurs before the successor contractor
commences operations, or at least fifteen days prior to the
commencement of the first performance of service under a successor
service contract, the successor contractor shall hand-deliver a written
offer of employment to each employee who is entitled to retention or
employment as provided in (d)(i) of this subsection. The written offer
of employment shall be in substantially the form set forth below and in
the employee's native language or any other language in which the
employee is fluent:

"IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR EMPLOYMENT

To: . . . . . . (Name of employee)

We have received information that you are employed by . . . . . .
(name of predecessor contractor) and are currently performing work at
. . . . . . (address of worksite). . . . . . . (Name of predecessor
contractor's) contract to perform . . . . . . (describe services under
contract) at . . . . . . (address of worksite) will terminate as of .
. . . . . (last day of predecessor contract) and it will no longer be
providing those services as of that date. We are . . . . . . (name of
successor contractor) and have been hired to provide services similar
to those of . . . . . . (name of predecessor contractor) at . . . . .
. (address of worksite). We are offering you a job with us for a
ninety-day probationary period starting . . . . . . (first day of
successor contract) to perform the same type of work that you have
already been doing for . . . . . . (name of predecessor contractor)
under the following terms:

Pay rate (per hour): $ . . . . . .
Hours per shift: . . . . . .
Total hours per week: . . . . . .
Benefits: . . . . . .

You must respond to this offer within the next ten days. If you
want to continue working at . . . . . . (address of worksite) you must
let us know by . . . . . . (no later than ten days after the date of
this letter). If we do not receive your response by the end of
business that day, we will not hire you and you will lose your job. We
can be reached at . . . . . . (successor contractor telephone number).

Washington state law gives you the following rights:
1. You have the right with certain exceptions, to be hired by our
company for the first ninety days that we begin to provide services at
. . . . . . (address of worksite).
2. During this ninety-day period, you cannot be fired without just
cause.
3. If you believe that you have been fired or laid off in
violation of this law, you have the right to sue us and be awarded back
pay, attorneys' fees, and court costs.

From: . . . . . . (Name of successor contractor)
. . . . . . (Address of successor contractor) . . . . . .
(Telephone number of successor contractor)"

Each offer of employment shall state the time within which the
employee must accept the offer, but in no case shall that time be less
than ten days from the date of the offer of employment.
(iv) The provisions of (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall not
be construed to require a successor contractor to retain any employee
whose attendance and performance records, while working under the
terminated service contract, would lead a reasonably prudent employer
to terminate the employee.
(e) If at any time a successor contractor determines that fewer
employees are required to perform the successor service contract than
were required by the terminated contractor, the successor contractor
shall be required to retain the employees by seniority within each job
classification, based upon the employees' total length of service at
the affected site or sites.
(f) During the ninety-day period, the successor contractor shall
maintain a preferential hiring list of employees eligible for retention
pursuant to (d) of this subsection who were not initially retained by
the successor contractor, from which the successor contractor shall
hire additional employees, if necessary.
(g) Except as provided under (e) of this subsection, during the
ninety-day period, the successor contractor shall not discharge without
just cause an employee retained pursuant to this section. For purposes
of this subsection, "just cause" shall be determined solely by the
performance or conduct of the particular employee.
(h) If the performance of an employee retained pursuant to this
section is satisfactory during the ninety-day period, the successor
contractor shall offer the employee continued employment under the
terms and conditions established by the successor contractor, or as
required by law.
(2)(a) An employee displaced or terminated in violation of this
section may bring an action in superior court against the awarding
authority, the terminated contractor, or the successor contractor,
jointly or severally, to recover damages for any violation of the
obligations imposed under this section.
(b) If the employee prevails in the action, the court may award the
employee: (i) Back pay, including the value of benefits, for each day
during which the violation continues, that shall be calculated at a
rate of compensation not less than the higher of: (A) The average
regular rate of pay received by the employee during the last year of
employment in the same job occupation classification, or, if the
employee has been employed for less than one year, the average rate of
pay for the employee's entire employment multiplied by the average
number of hours worked per day over the last four months of employment
preceding the date of the violation; or (B) the final regular rate of
pay received by the employee at the date of termination multiplied by
the average number of hours worked per day over the last four months;
and (ii) reinstatement to the employee's former position at not less
than the most recent rate of compensation received by the employee,
including the value of any benefits.
(c) If the employee prevails in the action, the court shall award
the employee reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit an
employee's right to bring a common law cause of action for wrongful
termination against the awarding authority, the terminated contractor,
or the successor contractor.
(3) Any awarding authority or contractor who knowingly violates the
provisions of this section shall pay a penalty not to exceed one
hundred dollars per employee for each day the violation continues.
(4) Prior to execution of leases or contracts, including renewals
or material amendments, (each of these referred to in this subsection
and subsections (5) through (8) of this section as a "contract") with
the airport or the airport's terminal lessee or managing agent, all
contractors, and any existing subtenants under their contracts, shall
enter into a labor peace agreement. The contract shall require the
contractor to in turn obligate its future subtenants under the contract
to enter into labor peace agreements.
(5) The contractor must provide evidence of the signed labor peace
agreement to the airport prior to execution of its contract with the
airport or the airport's terminal lessee or managing agent.
(6) Where the contractor is selected through a request for
proposals or other procurement process issued by the airport or airport
terminal lessees or their managing agents, notification of the labor
peace agreement requirement shall be included in the procurement
documents. In these cases, the contractor must provide evidence of the
signed labor peace agreement in its response to the request for
proposals or the proposal will be deemed nonresponsive.
(7) The labor peace agreement requirement shall be a material
condition of any contracts with the airport, and each contract shall
provide that the airport shall have the right to impose penalties and
ultimately suspend or terminate the contractor's operations for a
breach of the requirement, and to recover damages for the airport's
losses and expenses incurred as a result of the breach.
(8) The airport shall identify the labor organization(s) that
represent or are likely to seek to represent a contractor's employees
and notify each contractor of this identification along with the labor
organization's contact information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 14.08.010 (Definition -- "Municipality")
and 1987 c 254 s 3 & 1945 c 182 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---