BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.520 and 1998 c 245 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of licensing shall use moneys designated for the
motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety fund to
implement by July 1, 1983, a voluntary motorcycle operator training and
education program. The director may contract with public and private
entities to implement this program.
(2) There is created a motorcycle safety education advisory board
to assist the director of licensing in the development of a motorcycle
operator training education program. The board shall monitor this
program following implementation and report to the director of
licensing as necessary with recommendations including, but not limited
to, administration, application, and substance of the motorcycle
operator training and education program.
The board shall consist of five members appointed by the director
of licensing. Three members of the board, one of whom shall be
appointed chairperson, shall be active motorcycle riders or members of
nonprofit motorcycle organizations which actively support and promote
motorcycle safety education. One member shall be a currently employed
Washington state patrol motorcycle officer with at least five years
experience and at least one year cumulative experience as a motorcycle
officer. One member shall be a member of the public. The term of
appointment shall be two years. The board shall meet at the call of
the director, but not less than ((two times annually and not less than
five times during its term of appointment)) quarterly, and shall
receive no compensation for services but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses while engaged in business of the board in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.
(3) The priorities of the program shall be in the following order
of priority:
(a) Public awareness of motorcycle safety.
(b) Motorcycle safety education programs conducted by public and
private entities.
(c) Classroom and on-cycle training.
(d) Improved motorcycle operator testing.

--- END ---