BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The passage of federal health care reform will have a
destabilizing effect on the individual health benefits market.
Guaranteed issue, elimination of preexisting condition exclusions, low
penalties for failure to comply with the individual mandate, and the
closure of high-risk pools will result in higher premiums to
individuals caused by adverse selection in the market. These higher
premiums will make health benefits coverage prohibitively expensive
both inside and outside the health benefits exchanges established
pursuant to federal law, notwithstanding federal premium subsidies, and
will lead to carriers being forced to cease providing coverage to
individuals in this state.
(b) The state of Washington has a great deal of experience in
providing coverage for high-risk individuals, while also providing
needed stability in the individual market, through its separate high-risk pool, the Washington state health insurance pool.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to ensure
stability and reasonable costs in the individual market both inside and
outside the health benefits exchanges established pursuant to federal
law, while also providing comparable coverage for high-risk individuals
by:
(a) Preserving the ability of health carriers to require certain
high-risk individuals to purchase health benefits coverage through the
Washington state health insurance pool; and
(b) Preserving the ability of health carriers and the Washington
state health insurance pool to impose benefit waiting periods for
preexisting conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No later than January 1, 2012, the
insurance commissioner shall submit a waiver request to the center for
medicaid and medicare services. The waiver request shall preserve the
state of Washington's ability to provide health benefits coverage to
high-risk individuals through the Washington state health insurance
pool after individuals are able to purchase individual health benefit
plans through health benefit exchanges established pursuant the federal
patient protection and affordable care act and the health care and
education reconciliation act of 2010.
(2) The waiver request must contain the following elements:
(a) The state of Washington shall continue to operate the
Washington state health insurance pool;
(b) A health carrier shall continue to have the authority to
require any person applying for an individual health benefit plan to
complete the standard health questionnaire, regardless of whether the
health carrier offers coverage through the health benefits exchange or
through the market outside of the exchange;
(c) The health carrier shall continue to have the authority to
decide not to accept a person's application for enrollment in its
individual health benefit plan if, based upon the results of the
standard health questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under
the Washington state health insurance pool;
(d) Individuals enrolled in the Washington state health insurance
pool shall receive the same federal premium subsidies they would have
been eligible to receive in the health benefits exchange, if any; and
(e) Both the health carrier offering health benefits coverage to
individuals and the Washington state health insurance pool may continue
to impose benefit waiting periods for preexisting health conditions as
authorized under Title 48 RCW on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---