BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.035 and 2000 c 107 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall protect grizzly bears and develop
management programs on publicly owned lands that will encourage the
natural regeneration of grizzly bears in areas with suitable habitat.
Grizzly bears shall not be transplanted or introduced into the state.
Only grizzly bears that are native to Washington ((state)) may be
utilized by the department for management programs. The department is
directed to fully participate in all discussions and negotiations with
federal and state agencies relating to grizzly bear management and
shall fully communicate, support, and implement the policies of this
section.
(2) Any capture and relocation of grizzly bears, wolves, or
cougars, whether done for population management or public safety
concerns, must be conducted consistent with a program that provides for
captured animals to be distributed upon release in the state's various
natural area preserves created in chapter 79.70 RCW and natural
resources conservation areas created in chapter 79.71 RCW equally on
both sides of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

--- END ---