BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
CREATING THE OFFICE OF CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 Information technology is a tool used by
state agencies to improve their ability to deliver public services
efficiently and effectively. Advances in information technology -including advances in hardware, software, and business processes for
implementing and managing these resources - offer new opportunities to
improve the level of support provided to citizens and state agencies
and to reduce the per-transaction cost of these services. These
advances are one component in the process of reengineering how
government delivers services to citizens.
To fully realize the service improvements and cost efficiency from
the effective application of information technology to its business
processes, state government must establish decision-making structures
that connect business processes and information technology in an
operating model. Many of these business practices transcend individual
agency processes and should be worked at the enterprise level. To do
this requires an effective partnership of executive management,
business processes owners, and providers of support functions necessary
to efficiently and effectively deliver services to citizens.
To maximize the potential for information technology to contribute
to government business process reengineering the state must establish
clear central authority to plan, set enterprise standards, and provide
project oversight and management analysis of the various aspects of a
business process.
Establishing the office of chief information officer and partnering
it with the director of financial management will provide state
government with the cohesive structure necessary to develop improved
operating models with agency directors and reengineer business process
to enhance service delivery while capturing savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) The office of the chief information
officer is created within the office of financial management.
(2) Powers, duties, and functions assigned to the department of
information services as specified in this chapter shall be transferred
to the office of chief information officer as provided in this chapter.
(3) The primary duties of the office are:
(a) To prepare and lead the implementation of a strategic direction
and enterprise architecture for information technology for state
government;
(b) To enable the standardization and consolidation of information
technology infrastructure across all state agencies to support
enterprise-based system development and improve and maintain service
delivery;
(c) To establish standards and policies for the consistent and
efficient operation of information technology services throughout state
government;
(d) To establish statewide enterprise architecture that will serve
as the organizing standard for information technology for state
agencies;
(e) Educate and inform state managers and policymakers on
technological developments, industry trends and best practices,
industry benchmarks that strengthen decision making and professional
development, and industry understanding for public managers and
decision makers.
(4) In the case of institutions of higher education, the powers of
the office and the provisions of this chapter apply to business and
administrative applications but do not apply to academic and research
applications.
(5) The legislature and the judiciary, which are constitutionally
recognized as separate branches of government, are strongly encouraged
to coordinate with the office and participate in shared services
initiatives and the development of enterprise-based strategies, where
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the office is the chief information officer. The chief
information officer shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate. The chief information officer shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The chief information officer shall
be paid a salary fixed by the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the
position of chief information officer while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next
meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that
body his or her nomination for the position.
(2) The chief information officer may employ staff members, some of
whom may be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff
members as are necessary to administer this chapter, and such other
duties as may be authorized by law. The chief information officer may
delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter or
other law.
(3) The internal affairs of the office shall be under the control
of the chief information officer in order that the chief information
officer may manage the office in a flexible and intelligent manner as
dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the chief information officer shall have complete
charge and supervisory powers over the office. The chief information
officer may create such administrative structures as the chief
information officer deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law, and the chief information officer may employ staff members as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise
provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 The chief information officer shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the activities of the office of chief
information officer;
(2) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
by law with respect to the administration of this chapter including:
(a) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter; and
(b) Report to the governor any matters relating to abuses and
evasions of this chapter.
(3) In addition to other powers and duties granted, the chief
information officer has the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the
purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;
(c) Apply for grants from public and private entities, and receive
and administer any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of
this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the chief information
officer deems necessary for efficient administration, but the chief
information officer shall be responsible for the official acts of the
officers and employees of the office; and
(f) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network.
(2) "Board" means the information technology advisory board.
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee.
(4) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the board.
(5) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing program for
translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise
change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates,
communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe
the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution.
(6) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, including but not limited to
computers, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment.
(7) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video.
(8) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all
electronic technology systems and services, automated information
handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer
programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications,
requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all
related interactions between people and machines.
(9) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.
(10) "K-20 network" means the network established in section 118 of
this act.
(11) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi-municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.
(12) "Office" means the office of the chief information officer.
(13) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications.
(14) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license.
(15) "State agency" or "agency" means every state office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency,
including offices headed by a statewide elected official.
(16) "Telecommunications" includes, but is not limited to, wireless
or wired systems for transport of voice, video, and data
communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment,
system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all related
interactions between people and machines. "Telecommunications" does
not include public safety communications.

STANDARDS AND POLICIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) The chief information officer shall
establish standards and policies to govern information technology in
the state of Washington.
(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties related
to information services:
(a) To develop statewide standards and policies governing the
acquisition and disposition of equipment, software, and personal and
purchased services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of
state agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(c) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services;
(d) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The office shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary; and
(e) To establish policies for the periodic review by the office of
agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management.
(3) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The office shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems; and
(b) Require agencies to include an evaluation of electronic public
access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of
systems.
In developing these standards, the office is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(4) The office shall perform other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

STRATEGIC PLANNING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) The office shall prepare a state
strategic information technology plan which shall establish a statewide
mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology,
including goals for electronic access to government records,
information, and services. The plan shall be developed in accordance
with the standards and policies established by the office. The office
shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.
The plan shall be updated as necessary and submitted to the
governor and the legislature.
(2) The office shall prepare a biennial state performance report on
information technology based on agency performance reports required
under section 110 of this act and other information deemed appropriate
by the office. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's
information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition,
and capacity;
(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state
strategic information technology plan, including progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have
two-way access to public records, information, and services; and
(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress,
costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology
projects under section 112 of this act. At a minimum, the portion of
the report regarding major technology projects must include:
(i) The total cost data for the entire life-cycle of the project,
including capital and operational costs, broken down by staffing costs,
contracted service, hardware purchase or lease, software purchase or
lease, travel, and training. The original budget must also be shown
for comparison;
(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual
project schedule;
(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals
and performance measures of the project;
(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of
any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases;
and
(v) Identification of benefits generated by major information
technology projects developed under section 112 of this act.
Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor and the legislature. The major technology section of the
report must examine major information technology projects completed in
the previous biennium.

PORTFOLIO MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 Management of information technology
across state government requires managing resources and business
processes across multiple agencies. It is no longer sufficient to
pursue efficiencies within agency or individual business process
boundaries. The state must manage the business process changes and
information technology in support of business processes as a statewide
portfolio. The chief information officer will use agency information
technology portfolio planning as input to develop a statewide portfolio
to guide resource allocation and prioritization decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 An agency information technology portfolio
shall serve as the basis for making information technology decisions
and plans which may include, but are not limited to:
(1) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(2) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology;
(3) Assessments of information processing performance, resources,
and capabilities;
(4) Ensuring the appropriate transfer of technological expertise
for the operation of new systems developed using external resources;
(5) Guiding new investment demand, prioritization, selection,
performance, and asset value of technology and telecommunications; and
(6) Progress toward providing electronic access to public
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) Each agency shall develop an
information technology portfolio consistent with RCW 43.105.172 (as
recodified by this act). The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service
districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services.
(2) Agency portfolios shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology
resources and capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for
subsequent planning and performance measures;
(b) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for
information technology, including goals and objectives for achieving
electronic access to agency records, information, and services;
(c) An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and
objectives for information technology support and conform to the state
strategic information technology plan developed under section 107 of
this act;
(d) An implementation strategy to provide electronic access to
public records and information. This implementation strategy must be
assembled to include:
(i) Compliance with Title 40 RCW;
(ii) Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;
(iii) Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies,
including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard
business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;
(iv) Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the
effective use of access technologies;
(e) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the
portfolio; and
(f) Where feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to
implement identified projects.
(3) Portfolios developed under subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted to the office for review and approval. The chief
information officer may reject, require modification to, or approve
portfolios as deemed appropriate. Portfolios submitted under this
subsection shall be updated and submitted for review and approval as
necessary.
(4) Each agency shall prepare and submit to the office a biennial
performance report that evaluates progress toward the objectives
articulated in its information technology portfolio and the strategic
priorities of the state. The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service
districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The report shall include:
(a) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(b) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency
information technology portfolio;
(c) Progress toward electronic access to public information and
enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information
and services from agencies; and
(d) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.
(5) The office shall establish standards, elements, form, and
format for plans and reports developed under this section.
(6) Agency activities to increase electronic access to public
records and information, as required by this section, must be
implemented within available resources and existing agency planning
processes.
(7) The office may exempt any agency from any or all of the
requirements of this section.

BUDGET REVIEW
NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) At the request of the director of
financial management, the office shall evaluate both state agency
information technology current spending and technology budget requests,
including those proposed by the superintendent of public instruction,
in conjunction with educational service districts, or statewide or
regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
The office shall submit recommendations for funding all or part of such
requests to the director of financial management. The office shall
also submit recommendations regarding consolidation and coordination of
similar proposals or other efficiencies it finds in reviewing
proposals.
(2) The office shall establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation of agency
budget requests under this section. Technology budget requests shall
be evaluated in the context of the state's information technology
portfolio; technology initiatives underlying budget requests are
subject to review by the office. Criteria shall include, but not be
limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the
state strategic information technology plan and the state enterprise
architecture, consistency with information technology portfolios,
appropriate provision for public electronic access to information,
evidence of business process streamlining and gathering of business and
technical requirements, services, duration of investment, costs, and
benefits.

PROJECT MANAGEMENT OVERSIGHT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 (1) The office shall establish standards
and policies governing the planning, implementation, and evaluation of
major information technology projects, including those proposed by the
superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The standards and policies shall:
(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to
this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to,
significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of
the project; and
(b) Establish a model process and procedures which state agencies
shall follow in developing and implementing projects within their
information technology portfolios. This process may include project
oversight experts or panels, as appropriate. Agencies may propose, for
approval by the office, a process and procedures unique to the agency.
The office may accept or require modification of such agency proposals
or the office may reject such agency proposals and require use of the
model process and procedures established under this subsection. Any
process and procedures developed under this subsection shall require
(i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be based,
(ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations and
testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements
identified by the office.
The chief information officer may suspend or terminate a major
project, and direct that the project funds be placed into unallotted
reserve status, if the chief information officer determines that the
project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated
performance standards.
(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and
standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology
management to govern the funding of projects developed under this
section. The policies and standards shall provide for:
(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed
to by the chief information officer, the director of financial
management, and the head of the agency proposing the project. However,
the office of financial management may require incremental funding of
a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of
a project may be released only when the office of financial management
determines, with the advice of the office, that the previous phase is
satisfactorily completed; and
(b) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) Prior to making a commitment to
purchase, acquire, or develop a major information technology project or
service, state agencies must provide a proposal to the office outlining
the business case of the proposed product or service, including the
upfront and ongoing cost of the proposal.
(2) Within sixty days of receipt of a proposal, the office shall
approve the proposal, reject it, or propose modifications.
(3) In reviewing a proposal, the office must determine whether the
product or service is consistent with:
(a) The standards and policies developed by the office pursuant to
section 106 of this act; and
(b) The state's enterprise-based strategy.
(4) If a substantially similar product or service is offered by the
consolidated technology services agency established in RCW 43.105.047,
the office may require the agency to procure the product or service
through the consolidated technology services agency, if doing so would
benefit the state as an enterprise.
(5) The office shall provide guidance to agencies as to what
threshold of information technology spending constitutes a major
information technology product or service under this section.

ENTERPRISE ARCHITECTURE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) The office shall develop an
enterprise-based strategy for information technology in state
government informed by portfolio management planning and information
technology expenditure information collected from state agencies
pursuant to RCW 43.88.092.
(2)(a) The office shall develop an ongoing enterprise architecture
program for translating business vision and strategy into effective
enterprise change. This program will create, communicate, and improve
the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future
state and enable its evolution, in keeping with the priorities of
government and the information technology strategic plan.
(b) The enterprise architecture program will facilitate business
process collaboration among agencies statewide; improving the
reliability, interoperability, and sustainability of the business
processes that state agencies use.
In developing an enterprise-based strategy for the state, the
office is encouraged to consider the following strategies as possible
opportunities for achieving greater efficiency:
(i) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which common
enterprise-wide business processes should become managed as enterprise
services;
(ii) Developing a roadmap of priorities for creating enterprise
services;
(iii) Developing decision criteria for determining implementation
criteria for centralized or decentralized enterprise services;
(iv) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which technology
investments to continue, hold, or drop; and
(v) Performing such other duties as may be assigned by the office
to promote effective enterprise change.
(c) The program will establish performance measurement criteria for
each of its initiatives; will measure the success of those initiatives;
and will assess its quarterly results with the chief information
officer to determine whether to continue, revise, or disband the
initiative.

ADVISORY BOARD--CREATION AND DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 (1) The information technology advisory
board is created within the office of chief information officer. The
board shall be composed of nine members appointed by the governor. The
board members shall consist of:
(a) The chief information officer, who shall serve as the board
chair;
(b) No more than four members who are representatives of state
agencies, at least one of whom must have direct experience using the
software projects overseen by the office or reasonably expects to use
the new software developed under the oversight of the office; and
(c) At least four members who are representatives of the private
sector.
(2)(a) Members shall serve three-year terms. Members may not serve
more than two consecutive terms.
(b) Of the initial members, two must be appointed for a one-year
term, three must be appointed for a two-year term, and three must be
appointed for a three-year term. Thereafter, members must be appointed
for three-year terms.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made for the remainder of the member's term.
(3) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The office shall provide staff support to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 The board shall advise the chief
information officer on information technology related matters and:
(1) Review policies and standards brought by the chief information
officer or requested by a board member, receive comments from agency
executives on the implications of proposed policies and standards, and
provide recommendations to the chief information officer;
(2) Provide a forum to solicit external expertise and perspective
on developments in information technology, enterprise architecture,
standards, and policy development; and
(3) Provide a forum where ideas and issues related to information
technology plans, policies, and standards can be reviewed.

INTEROPERABILITY COMMITTEE--TRANSFER FROM DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 (1) The chief information officer shall
appoint a state interoperability executive committee, the membership of
which must include, but not be limited to, representatives of the
military department, the Washington state patrol, the department of
transportation, the office of the chief information officer, the
department of natural resources, city and county governments, state and
local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs, and state and local
emergency management directors. The chair and legislative members of
the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee.
Voting membership may not exceed fifteen members.
(2) The chief information officer shall appoint the chair of the
committee from among the voting members of the committee.
(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the
following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the office for
technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems,
including emergency communications systems. The standards must
address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking
into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the office the licensing and
use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including
the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and
serve as the point of contact with the federal communications
commission on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of
radio spectrum;
(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;
(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall
be, at a minimum, project-25; and
(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum,
upgradeable to project-25;
(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to
promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;
(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and
emergency response organizations;
(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to
ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response
wireless communications systems; and
(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the office to
promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.
(4) The office shall provide administrative support to the
committee.

K-20 GOVERNANCE AND OPERATIONS OVERSIGHT--TRANSFER FROM
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 (1) The office has the duty to govern and
oversee the technical design, implementation, and operation of the K-20
network including, but not limited to, the following duties:
Establishment and implementation of K-20 network technical policy,
including technical standards and conditions of use; review and
approval of network design; and resolving user/provider disputes.
(2) The office has the following powers and duties:
(a) In cooperation with the educational sectors and other
interested parties, to establish goals and measurable objectives for
the network;
(b) To ensure that the goals and measurable objectives of the
network are the basis for any decisions or recommendations regarding
the technical development and operation of the network;
(c) To adopt, modify, and implement policies to facilitate network
development, operation, and expansion. Such policies may include but
need not be limited to the following issues: Quality of educational
services; access to the network by recognized organizations and
accredited institutions that deliver educational programming, including
public libraries; prioritization of programming within limited
resources; prioritization of access to the system and the sharing of
technological advances; network security; identification and evaluation
of emerging technologies for delivery of educational programs; future
expansion or redirection of the system; network fee structures; and
costs for the development and operation of the network;
(d) To prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature a
coordinated budget for network development, operation, and expansion.
The budget shall include the chief information officer's
recommendations on (i) any state funding requested for network
transport and equipment, distance education facilities and hardware or
software specific to the use of the network, and proposed new network
end sites, (ii) annual copayments to be charged to public educational
sector institutions and other public entities connected to the network,
and (iii) charges to nongovernmental entities connected to the network;
(e) To adopt and monitor the implementation of a methodology to
evaluate the effectiveness of the network in achieving the educational
goals and measurable objectives;
(f) To establish by rule acceptable use policies governing user
eligibility for participation in the K-20 network, acceptable uses of
network resources, and procedures for enforcement of such policies.
The office shall set forth appropriate procedures for enforcement of
acceptable use policies, that may include suspension of network
connections and removal of shared equipment for violations of network
conditions or policies. The office shall have sole responsibility for
the implementation of enforcement procedures relating to technical
conditions of use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 The office shall maintain, in consultation
with the K-20 network users, the K-20 operations cooperative, which
shall be responsible for day-to-day network management, technical
network status monitoring, technical problem response coordination, and
other duties as agreed to by the office and the educational sectors.
Funding for the K-20 operations cooperative shall be provided from the
education technology revolving fund under RCW 43.105.835 (as recodified
by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 The chief information officer, in
conjunction with the K-20 network users, shall maintain a technical
plan of the K-20 telecommunications system and ongoing system
enhancements. The office shall ensure that the technical plan adheres
to the goals and objectives established under section 106 of this act.
The technical plan shall provide for:
(1) A telecommunications backbone connecting educational service
districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the
branch campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses
of community colleges and technical colleges.
(2)(a) Connection to the K-20 network by entities that include, but
need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education off-campus and extension centers, and branch campuses of community colleges
and technical colleges, as prioritized by the chief information
officer; (b) distance education facilities and components for entities
listed in this subsection and subsection (1) of this section; and (c)
connection for independent nonprofit institutions of higher education,
provided that:
(i) The chief information officer and each independent nonprofit
institution of higher education to be connected agree in writing to
terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms and conditions shall
ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20 services does
not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and that
the institution shall adhere to K-20 network policies; and
(ii) The chief information officer determines that inclusion of the
independent nonprofit institutions of higher education will not
significantly affect the network's eligibility for federal universal
service fund discounts or subsidies.
(3) Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to,
connections to public libraries, state and local governments, community
resource centers, and the private sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 (1) In overseeing the technical aspects of
the K-20 network, the office is not intended to duplicate the statutory
responsibilities of the higher education coordinating board, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state librarian, or the
governing boards of the institutions of higher education.
(2) The office may not interfere in any curriculum or legally
offered programming offered over the K-20 network.
(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common
specifications for the K-20 network remains the responsibility of the
office under section 106 of this act.
(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common
schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public
instruction. Except as set forth in section 106(2)(e) of this act, the
office may recommend, but not require, revisions to the
superintendent's telecommunications plans.

Sec. 122 RCW 43.105.835 and 2004 c 276 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under
subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund.
Only the ((director of the department of information services or the
director's designee)) chief information officer or the chief
information officer's designee may authorize expenditures from the
fund. The revolving fund shall be used to pay for K-20 network
operations, transport, equipment, software, supplies, and services,
maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and shared
infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the development,
operation, and administration of shared educational information
technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving
fund shall not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations
of local telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or
depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular
institution or group of institutions.
(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving
fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The
((department of information services)) office shall, ((in consultation
with entities connected to the network under RCW 43.105.820 and))
subject to the review and approval of the office of financial
management, establish and implement a billing structure for network
services identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The ((department)) office shall charge those public entities
connected to the K-20 ((telecommunications [telecommunication system]
under RCW 43.105.820)) telecommunications system under section 120 of
this act an annual copayment per unit of transport connection as
determined by the legislature after consideration of the ((K-20))
board's recommendations. This copayment shall be deposited into the
revolving fund to be used for the purposes in subsection (1) of this
section. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate to the
revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover the costs for
transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data equipment located at
the individual public institutions, maintenance and depreciation of the
K-20 network backbone, and services provided to the network under ((RCW
43.105.815.
(4) During the 2003-05 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the education technology revolving fund to the state
general fund and the data processing revolving fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account)) section 118 of this
act.

GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATED TO OFFICE OF CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter do not apply in the office of the chief information
officer to the chief information officer, the chief information
officer's confidential secretary, assistant directors, and any other
exempt staff members provided for in section 103 of this act.

Sec. 124 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of the chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the
director of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner
of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site
evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance committee, the
director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife,
the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the
director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the ((department of information
services)) consolidated technology services agency, the executive
director of the state investment board, the director of labor and
industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery
commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the director of
personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure commission,
the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of
the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
and each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, ((information services
board,)) state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public
disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines
hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western
Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 125 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the chief
information officer of the office of the chief information officer, the
director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the
director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the ((department of information services)) consolidated technology
services agency, the executive director of the state investment board,
the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the
director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound
partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each
campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, ((information
services board,)) recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 126 RCW 43.105.290 and 1996 c 171 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state library, with the assistance of the ((department of
information services)) office and the state archives, shall establish
a pilot project to design and test an electronic information locator
system, allowing members of the public to locate and access electronic
public records. In designing the system, the following factors shall
be considered: (1) Ease of operation by citizens; (2) access through
multiple technologies, such as direct dial and toll-free numbers,
kiosks, and the internet; (3) compatibility with private online
services; and (4) capability of expanding the electronic public records
included in the system. The pilot project may restrict the type and
quality of electronic public records that are included in the system to
test the feasibility of making electronic public records and
information widely available to the public.

Sec. 127 RCW 28A.650.015 and 2009 c 556 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, to the extent funds
are appropriated, shall develop and implement a Washington state K-12
education technology plan. The technology plan shall be updated on at
least a biennial basis, shall be developed to coordinate and expand the
use of education technology in the common schools of the state. The
plan shall be consistent with applicable provisions of chapter 43.105
RCW. The plan, at a minimum, shall address:
(a) The provision of technical assistance to schools and school
districts for the planning, implementation, and training of staff in
the use of technology in curricular and administrative functions;
(b) The continued development of a network to connect school
districts, institutions of higher learning, and other sources of online
information; and
(c) Methods to equitably increase the use of education technology
by students and school personnel throughout the state.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an
educational technology advisory committee to assist in the development
and implementation of the technology plan in subsection (1) of this
section. The committee shall include, but is not limited to, persons
representing: The ((department of information services)) office of the
chief information officer, educational service districts, school
directors, school administrators, school principals, teachers,
classified staff, higher education faculty, parents, students,
business, labor, scientists and mathematicians, the higher education
coordinating board, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, and the state library.
(3) The plan adopted and implemented under this section may not
impose on school districts any requirements that are not specifically
required by federal law or regulation, including requirements to
maintain eligibility for the federal schools and libraries program of
the universal service fund.

Sec. 128 RCW 39.94.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6015 and 2010
1st sp.s. c 35 s 406 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for itself if the aggregate principal
amount payable thereunder is greater than an amount to be established
from time to time by the state finance committee or participate in a
program providing for the issuance of certificates of participation,
including any contract for credit enhancement, without the prior
approval of the state finance committee. Except as provided in RCW
28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall approve the form of all
financing contracts or a standard format for all financing contracts.
The state finance committee also may:
(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into
master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or
more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state
board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of
higher learning; or to be acquired by an other agency;
(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of
participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other
agencies;
(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master
financing contracts; and
(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under
this chapter.
(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state
finance committee may consult with representatives from the department
of general administration, the office of financial management, and the
((department of information services)) office of the chief information
officer.
(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state
also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing
contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.
(4) Except for financing contracts for real property used for the
purposes described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for real property of the state without
prior approval of the legislature. For the purposes of this
requirement, a financing contract must be treated as used for real
property if it is being entered into by the state for the acquisition
of land; the acquisition of an existing building; the construction of
a new building; or a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or
rebuilding of an existing building. Prior approval of the legislature
is not required under this chapter for a financing contract entered
into by the state under this chapter for energy conservation
improvements to existing buildings where such improvements include:
(a) Fixtures and equipment that are not part of a major remodeling,
renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of the building, or (b) other
improvements to the building that are being performed for the primary
purpose of energy conservation. Such energy conservation improvements
must be determined eligible for financing under this chapter by the
office of financial management in accordance with financing guidelines
established by the state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal
property for the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf
of an other agency without the approval of such a financing contract by
the governing body of the other agency.

Sec. 129 RCW 40.14.020 and 2002 c 358 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
All public records shall be and remain the property of the state of
Washington. They shall be delivered by outgoing officials and
employees to their successors and shall be preserved, stored,
transferred, destroyed or disposed of, and otherwise managed, only in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter. In order to insure the
proper management and safeguarding of public records, the division of
archives and records management is established in the office of the
secretary of state. The state archivist, who shall administer the
division and have reasonable access to all public records, wherever
kept, for purposes of information, surveying, or cataloguing, shall
undertake the following functions, duties, and responsibilities:
(1) To manage the archives of the state of Washington;
(2) To centralize the archives of the state of Washington, to make
them available for reference and scholarship, and to insure their
proper preservation;
(3) To inspect, inventory, catalog, and arrange retention and
transfer schedules on all record files of all state departments and
other agencies of state government;
(4) To insure the maintenance and security of all state public
records and to establish safeguards against unauthorized removal or
destruction;
(5) To establish and operate such state record centers as may from
time to time be authorized by appropriation, for the purpose of
preserving, servicing, screening and protecting all state public
records which must be preserved temporarily or permanently, but which
need not be retained in office space and equipment;
(6) To adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW:
(a) Setting standards for the durability and permanence of public
records maintained by state and local agencies;
(b) Governing procedures for the creation, maintenance,
transmission, cataloging, indexing, storage, or reproduction of
photographic, optical, electronic, or other images of public documents
or records in a manner consistent with current standards, policies, and
procedures of the ((department of information services)) office of the
chief information officer for the acquisition of information
technology;
(c) Governing the accuracy and durability of, and facilitating
access to, photographic, optical, electronic, or other images used as
public records; or
(d) To carry out any other provision of this chapter;
(7) To gather and disseminate to interested agencies information on
all phases of records management and current practices, methods,
procedures, techniques, and devices for efficient and economical
management and preservation of records;
(8) To operate a central microfilming bureau which will microfilm,
at cost, records approved for filming by the head of the office of
origin and the archivist; to approve microfilming projects undertaken
by state departments and all other agencies of state government; and to
maintain proper standards for this work;
(9) To maintain necessary facilities for the review of records
approved for destruction and for their economical disposition by sale
or burning; directly to supervise such destruction of public records as
shall be authorized by the terms of this chapter;
(10) To assist and train state and local agencies in the proper
methods of creating, maintaining, cataloging, indexing, transmitting,
storing, and reproducing photographic, optical, electronic, or other
images used as public records;
(11) To solicit, accept, and expend donations as provided in RCW
43.07.037 for the purpose of the archive program. These purposes
include, but are not limited to, acquisition, accession,
interpretation, and display of archival materials. Donations that do
not meet the criteria of the archive program may not be accepted.

Sec. 130 RCW 42.17.460 and 1999 c 401 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the commission
provide the general public timely access to all contribution and
expenditure reports submitted by candidates, continuing political
committees, bona fide political parties, lobbyists, and lobbyists'
employers. The legislature finds that failure to meet goals for full
and timely disclosure threatens to undermine our electoral process.
Furthermore, the legislature intends for the commission to consult
with the ((department of information services)) office of the chief
information officer as it seeks to implement chapter 401, Laws of 1999,
and that the commission follow the standards and procedures established
by the ((department of information services)) office of the chief
information officer in chapter 43.105 RCW as they relate to information
technology.

Sec. 131 RCW 42.17.467 and 1999 c 401 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
In preparing the information technology plan, the commission shall
consult with affected state agencies, the ((department of information
services)) office of the chief information officer, and stakeholders in
the commission's work, including representatives of political
committees, bona fide political parties, news media, and the general
public.

Sec. 132 RCW 42.17.469 and 1999 c 401 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall submit the information technology plan to the
senate and house of representatives fiscal committees, the governor,
the senate state and local government committee, the house of
representatives state government committee, and the ((department of
information services)) office of the chief information officer by
February 1, 2000. It is the intent of the legislature that the
commission thereafter comply with the requirements of chapter 43.105
RCW with respect to preparation and submission of biennial performance
reports on the commission's information technology.

Sec. 133 RCW 42.17.471 and 1999 c 401 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall prepare and submit to the ((department of
information services)) office of the chief information officer a
biennial performance report ((in accordance with chapter 43.105 RCW)).
The report must include:
(1) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(2) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency
information technology plan;
(3) An analysis of the commission's performance measures, set forth
in RCW 42.17.463, that relate to the electronic filing of reports and
timely public access to those reports via the commission's web site;
(4) A comprehensive description of the methods by which citizens
may interact with the agency in order to obtain information and
services from the commission; and
(5) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.

Sec. 134 RCW 42.17A.060 and 1999 c 401 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the commission
provide the general public timely access to all contribution and
expenditure reports submitted by candidates, continuing political
committees, bona fide political parties, lobbyists, and lobbyists'
employers. The legislature finds that failure to meet goals for full
and timely disclosure threatens to undermine our electoral process.
Furthermore, the legislature intends for the commission to consult
with the ((department of information services)) office of the chief
information officer as it seeks to implement chapter 401, Laws of 1999,
and that the commission follow the standards and procedures established
by the ((department of information services)) office of the chief
information officer in chapter 43.105 RCW as they relate to information
technology.

Sec. 135 RCW 43.88.092 and 2010 c 282 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As part of the biennial budget process, the office of financial
management shall collect from agencies, and agencies shall provide,
information to produce reports, summaries, and budget detail sufficient
to allow review, analysis, and documentation of all current and
proposed expenditures for information technology by state agencies.
Information technology budget detail must be included as part of the
budget submittal documentation required pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.
(2) The office of financial management must collect, and present as
part of the biennial budget documentation, information for all existing
information technology projects as defined by information services
board policy. The office of financial management must work with the
((department of information services)) office of the chief information
officer to maximize the ability to draw this information from the
information technology portfolio management data collected by the
department of information services pursuant to RCW 43.105.170.
Connecting project information collected through the portfolio
management process with financial data developed under subsection (1)
of this section provides transparency regarding expenditure data for
existing technology projects.
(3) The biennial budget documentation submitted by the office of
financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030 must include an
information technology plan identifying proposed large information
technology projects. This plan must be presented using a method
similar to the capital budget, identifying project costs through stages
of the project and across fiscal periods and biennia from project
initiation to implementation. This information must be submitted
electronically, in a format to be determined by the office of financial
management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.
(4) The office of financial management shall also institute a
method of accounting for information technology-related expenditures,
including creating common definitions for what constitutes an
information technology investment.

Sec. 136 RCW 43.105.410 and 2010 c 282 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) State agencies that are purchasing wireless devices or services
must make such purchases through the state master contract, unless the
state agency provides to the office of ((financial management)) the
chief information officer evidence that the state agency is securing
its wireless devices or services from another source for a lower cost
than through participation in the state master contract.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" means any
office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state
government, but does not include a unit of state government headed by
a statewide elected official, an institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the higher education coordinating board, the
state board for community and technical colleges, or agencies of the
legislative or judicial branches of state government.

STATE DATA CENTER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 (1) Except as provided by subsection (2)
of this section, state agencies shall locate all existing and new
servers in the state data center.
(2) Agencies with a service requirement that requires servers to be
located outside the state data center must receive a waiver from the
office. Waivers must be based upon written justification from the
requesting agency citing specific service or performance requirements
for locating servers outside the state's common platform.
(3) The office, in consultation with the office of financial
management, shall continue to develop the business plan and migration
schedule for moving all state agencies into the state data center.
(4) The legislature and the judiciary, which are constitutionally
recognized as separate branches of government, may enter into an
interagency agreement with the office to migrate its servers into the
state data center.
(5) This section does not apply to institutions of higher
education.

MIGRATION TO A CENTRAL SERVICE PROVIDER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 (1) The office shall conduct a needs
assessment and develop a migration strategy to ensure that, over time,
all state agencies are moving towards using the consolidated technology
services agency established in RCW 43.105.047 as their central service
provider for all utility-based infrastructure services, including
centralized PC and infrastructure support. Agency specific application
services shall remain managed within individual agencies.
(2) The office shall develop short-term and long-term objectives as
part of the migration strategy.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "utility-based infrastructure
services" includes personal computer and portable device support,
servers and server administration, security administration, network
administration, telephony, e-mail, and other information technology
services commonly utilized by state agencies.
(4) This section does not apply to institutions of higher
education.

PART II
CREATING THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
To achieve maximum benefit from advances in information technology
the state establishes a centralized provider and procurer of certain
information technology services as an agency to support the needs of
state agencies. This agency shall be known as the consolidated
technology services agency. To ensure maximum benefit to the state,
state agencies shall rely on the consolidated technology services
agency for those services with a business case of broad use,
uniformity, scalability, and price sensitivity to aggregation and
volume.
To successfully meet agency needs and meet its obligation as the
primary service provider for these services, the consolidated
technology services agency must offer high quality services at the
lowest possible price. It must be able to attract an adaptable and
competitive workforce, be authorized to procure services where the
business case justifies it, and be accountable to its customers for the
efficient and effective delivery of critical business services.
The consolidated technology services agency is established as an
agency in state government. The agency is established with clear
accountability to the agencies it serves and to the public. This
accountability will come through enhanced transparency in the agency's
operation and performance. The agency is also established with broad
flexibility to adapt its operations and service catalog to address the
needs of customer agencies, and to do so in the most cost-effective
ways.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.105.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 64 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the department.
(2) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network.
(3) "Board" means the information services board.
(4) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies.
(5) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee.
(6) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(7) "Community technology programs" means programs that are engaged
in diffusing information and communications technology in local
communities, particularly in unserved and underserved areas of the
state. These programs may include, but are not limited to, programs
that provide education and skill-building opportunities, hardware and
software, internet connectivity, digital media literacy, development of
locally relevant content, and delivery of vital services through
technology.
(8) "Council" means the advisory council on digital inclusion
created in RCW 43.105.400.
(9) "Department" means the department of information services.
(10))) "Agency" means the consolidated technology services agency.
(2) "Board" means the consolidated technology services board.
(3) "Customer agencies" means all entities that purchase or use
information technology resources, telecommunications, or services from
the consolidated technology services agency.
(4) "Director" means the director of the ((department))
consolidated technology services agency.
(((11) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board.
(12))) (5) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and
transmission facilities used in information processing, ((such as))
including but not limited to computers, ((word processors,)) terminals,
telephones, wireless communications system facilities, cables, and any
physical facility necessary for the operation of such equipment.
(((13) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(14) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video.
(15) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions.
(16) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems.
(17))) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing program for
translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise
change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates,
communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe
the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution.
(7) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all
electronic technology systems and services, automated information
handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer
programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications,
requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all
related interactions between people and machines.
(8) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.
(((18) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820.
(19))) (9) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi
municipal corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of
such corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.
(((20))) (10) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk
analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information
technology resources and telecommunications.
(((21))) (11) "Proprietary software" means that software offered
for sale or license.
(((22) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing.
(23) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(24) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means.
(25) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
commerce under chapter 43.330 RCW.)) (12) "Telecommunications"
includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for
transport of voice, video, and data communications, network systems,
requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, simulation,
electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and
machines. "Telecommunications" does not include public safety
communications.

Sec. 203 RCW 43.105.047 and 1999 c 80 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the ((department of information services))
consolidated technology services agency, an agency of state government.
The ((department)) agency shall be headed by a director appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve
at the governor's pleasure and shall receive such salary as determined
by the governor. The director shall:
(1) Appoint a confidential secretary and such deputy and assistant
directors as needed to administer the ((department)) agency; and
(2) ((Maintain and fund a strategic planning and policy component
separate from the services component of the department;
(3) Appoint, after consulting with the board, the assistant or
deputy director for the planning component;
(4))) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter((;
(5) Report to the governor and the board any matters relating to
abuses and evasions of this chapter; and
(6) Recommend statutory changes to the governor and the board)).

Sec. 204 RCW 43.105.052 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((department)) agency shall:
(1) ((Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates
to the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2))) Make available information services to state agencies and
local governments and public benefit nonprofit corporations ((on a full
cost-recovery basis)). For the purposes of this section "public
benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state,
or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than
an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state((. These
services may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training.
These services are for discretionary use by customers and customers
may elect other alternatives for service if those alternatives are more
cost-effective or provide better service. Agencies may be required to
use the backbone network portions of the telecommunications services
during an initial start-up period not to exceed three years));
(((3))) (2) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
((department to assure that the services component of the department is
self-supporting)) agency. A billing rate plan shall be developed for
a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate
plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the office of
financial management. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by
each cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as
mutually determined by the ((department)) agency and the office of
financial management. ((The same rate structure will apply to all user
agencies of each cost center.)) The rate plan and any adjustments to
rates shall be approved by the office of financial management((. The
services component shall not subsidize the operations of the strategic
planning and policy component));
(((4))) (3) With the advice of the ((information services)) board
and customer agencies, develop a state strategic information technology
plan and performance reports as required under ((RCW 43.105.160))
section 107 of this act;
(((5))) (4) Develop plans for the ((department's)) agency's
achievement of statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state
strategic information technology plan required under ((RCW 43.105.160.
These plans shall address such services as telecommunications, central
and distributed computing, local area networks, office automation, and
end user computing. The department shall seek the advice of the board
in the development of these plans;
(6) Under direction of the information services board and in
collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies as
may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(7) Identify opportunities for the effective use of information
services and coordinate appropriate responses to those opportunities;
(8) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans, information
technology portfolios, or overall information processing performance as
requested by the board, agencies, the director of financial management,
or the legislature. Agencies may be required to reimburse the
department for agency-requested reviews)) section 107 of this act;
(((9) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(10) Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and
policy review of agency plans for information services;
(11) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and policy
component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(12) Be the lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications
services for all state agencies and develop, pursuant to board
policies, standards and common specifications for leased and purchased
telecommunications equipment. The department shall not evaluate the
merits of school curriculum, higher education course offerings, or
other education and training programs proposed for transmission and/or
reception using video telecommunications resources. Nothing in this
section shall abrogate or abridge the legal responsibilities of
licensees of telecommunications facilities as licensed by the federal
communication commission on March 27, 1990;)) and
(((13))) (5) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 205 RCW 43.105.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 931 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a revolving fund to be known as the data
processing revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer. The
revolving fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment,
software, supplies, and services and the payment of salaries, wages,
and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation,
and administration of information services, telecommunications,
systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects, by the
department, Washington State University's computer services center, the
department of personnel's personnel information systems division, the
office of financial management's financial systems management group,
and other users as jointly determined by the ((department)) agency and
the office of financial management. The revolving fund is subject to
the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.
Disbursements from the revolving fund for the services component of the
department are not subject to appropriation. ((Disbursements for the
strategic planning and policy component of the department are subject
to appropriation.)) All disbursements from the fund are subject to the
allotment procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The
((department)) agency shall establish and implement a billing structure
to assure all agencies pay an equitable share of the costs.
((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the data processing revolving account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance associated
with the information technology pool.))
As used in this section, the word "supplies" shall not be
interpreted to delegate or abrogate the division of purchasing's
responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as described in RCW
43.19.190 and 43.19.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the consolidated technology services
board. The board shall be composed of eleven members appointed by the
governor. Seven of the board members shall consist of customer
representatives either in the position of chief executive officer,
chief financial officer, or chief information officer. Four of the
board members shall be legislators, who serve as ex officio, nonvoting
members of the board.
(2)(a) Nonlegislative members shall serve three-year terms.
Members may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(b) Of the initial nonlegislative members, two must be appointed
for a one-year term, two must be appointed for a two-year term, and
three must be appointed for a three-year term. Thereafter, members
must be appointed for three-year terms.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made for the remainder of the member's term.
(3)(a) Of the initial legislative members, the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall make the
appointments.
(b) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses in the senate.
(c) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(4) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.

Sec. 207 RCW 43.19.190 and 2002 c 200 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of general administration, through the state
purchasing and material control director, shall:
(1) Establish and staff such administrative organizational units
within the division of purchasing as may be necessary for effective
administration of the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939;
(2) Purchase all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of all state institutions,
colleges, community colleges, technical colleges, college districts,
and universities, the offices of the elective state officers, the
supreme court, the court of appeals, the administrative and other
departments of state government, and the offices of all appointive
officers of the state: PROVIDED, That the provisions of RCW 43.19.190
through 43.19.1937 do not apply in any manner to the operation of the
state legislature except as requested by the legislature: PROVIDED,
That the provisions of this section and RCW 43.19.1901 through
43.19.1925 do not apply to the consolidated technology services agency
created in RCW 43.105.047: PROVIDED, That any agency may purchase
material, supplies, services, and equipment for which the agency has
notified the purchasing and material control director that it is more
cost-effective for the agency to make the purchase directly from the
vendor: PROVIDED, That primary authority for the purchase of
specialized equipment, instructional, and research material for their
own use shall rest with the colleges, community colleges, and
universities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That universities operating hospitals
and the state purchasing and material control director, as the agent
for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010, and for health care
programs provided in state correctional institutions as defined in RCW
72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and
72.36.070, may make purchases for hospital operation by participating
in contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That primary authority for the purchase of materials,
supplies, and equipment for resale to other than public agencies shall
rest with the state agency concerned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That authority
to purchase services as included herein does not apply to personal
services as defined in chapter 39.29 RCW, unless such organization
specifically requests assistance from the division of purchasing in
obtaining personal services and resources are available within the
division to provide such assistance: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
authority for the purchase of insurance and bonds shall rest with the
risk manager under RCW ((43.19.1935)) 43.41.310: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That, except for the authority of the risk manager to purchase
insurance and bonds, the director is not required to provide purchasing
services for institutions of higher education that choose to exercise
independent purchasing authority under RCW 28B.10.029: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the authority to purchase interpreter services and
interpreter brokerage services on behalf of limited-English speaking or
sensory-impaired applicants and recipients of public assistance shall
rest with the department of social and health services;
(3) Have authority to delegate to state agencies authorization to
purchase or sell, which authorization shall specify restrictions as to
dollar amount or to specific types of material, equipment, services,
and supplies. Acceptance of the purchasing authorization by a state
agency does not relieve such agency from conformance with other
sections of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939, or from policies
established by the director. Also, delegation of such authorization to
a state agency, including an educational institution to which this
section applies, to purchase or sell material, equipment, services, and
supplies shall not be granted, or otherwise continued under a previous
authorization, if such agency is not in substantial compliance with
overall state purchasing and material control policies as established
herein;
(4) Contract for the testing of material, supplies, and equipment
with public and private agencies as necessary and advisable to protect
the interests of the state;
(5) Prescribe the manner of inspecting all deliveries of supplies,
materials, and equipment purchased through the division;
(6) Prescribe the manner in which supplies, materials, and
equipment purchased through the division shall be delivered, stored,
and distributed;
(7) Provide for the maintenance of a catalogue library,
manufacturers' and wholesalers' lists, and current market information;
(8) Provide for a commodity classification system and may, in
addition, provide for the adoption of standard specifications;
(9) Provide for the maintenance of inventory records of supplies,
materials, and other property;
(10) Prepare rules and regulations governing the relationship and
procedures between the division of purchasing and state agencies and
vendors;
(11) Publish procedures and guidelines for compliance by all state
agencies, including those educational institutions to which this
section applies, which implement overall state purchasing and material
control policies;
(12) Advise state agencies, including educational institutions,
regarding compliance with established purchasing and material control
policies under existing statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
The board has the following powers and duties:
(1) Approve rates for services offered by the agency;
(2) Approve the budget proposal to the office of financial
management for the agency;
(3) Approve the catalog of services to be provided or procured for
client agencies;
(4) Prepare and submit an annual performance evaluation of the
director to the governor;
(5) Prepare and submit a performance assessment of the agency to
the governor annually; and
(6) Advise the director on operational issues and plans brought
before the board by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
The director in consultation with the board shall set performance
targets and approve plans for achieving measurable and specific goals
for the agency. By January 2012, the appropriate organizational
performance and accountability measures and performance targets shall
be submitted to the governor. These measures and targets shall include
measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable
improvements related to service delivery and costs, operational
efficiencies, and overall customer satisfaction. The agency shall
develop a dashboard of key performance measures that will be updated
quarterly and made available on the agency public web site.
The director shall report to the governor on agency performance at
least quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agency's web
site and accessible to the public.

Sec. 210 RCW 43.105.057 and 1992 c 20 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department of information services and the information
services board, respectively,)) agency shall adopt rules as necessary
under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 211 RCW 43.105.060 and 1987 c 504 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
State and local government agencies are authorized to enter into
any contracts with the ((department or its successor)) agency which may
be necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes and policies of
this chapter or for maximum utilization of facilities and services
which are the subject of this chapter.

Sec. 212 RCW 39.29.040 and 2002 c 260 s 11 and 2002 c 200 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Contracts specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars
if the total of the contracts from that agency with the contractor
within a fiscal year does not exceed five thousand dollars;
(2) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the
tariff is established by the utilities and transportation commission or
other public entity;
(3) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental
entity, whether federal, state, or local and any department, division,
or subdivision thereof;
(4) Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard
fee, when the standard fee is established by the contracting agency or
any other governmental entity and a like contract is available to all
qualified applicants;
(5) Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of
collaborative research if prior approval is granted by the funding
source;
(6) Contracts for client services except as otherwise indicated in
this chapter;
(7) Contracts for architectural and engineering services as defined
in RCW 39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;
(8) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the
purposes of litigation;
(9) Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040;
((and))
(10) Contracts for interpreter services and interpreter brokerage
services on behalf of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired
applicants and recipients of public assistance; and
(11) Contracts awarded by the consolidated technology services
agency.

Sec. 213 RCW 19.34.231 and 1999 c 287 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a signature of a unit of state or local government,
including its appropriate officers or employees, is required by
statute, administrative rule, court rule, or requirement of the office
of financial management, that unit of state or local government shall
become a subscriber to a certificate issued by a licensed certification
authority for purposes of conducting official public business with
electronic records.
(2) A city or county may become a licensed certification authority
under RCW 19.34.100 for purposes of providing services to local
government, if authorized by ordinance adopted by the city or county
legislative authority.
(3) A unit of state government, except the secretary ((and the
department of information services)), may not act as a certification
authority.

Sec. 214 RCW 19.34.420 and 1998 c 33 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following information, when in the possession of the
secretary((, the department of information services,)) or the state
auditor for purposes of this chapter, shall not be made available for
public disclosure, inspection, or copying, unless the request is made
under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction based upon an
express written finding that the need for the information outweighs any
reason for maintaining the privacy and confidentiality of the
information or records:
(a) A trade secret, as defined by RCW 19.108.010; and
(b) Information regarding design, security, or programming of a
computer system used for purposes of licensing or operating a
certification authority or repository under this chapter.
(2) The state auditor, or an authorized agent, must be given access
to all information referred to in subsection (1) of this section for
the purpose of conducting audits under this chapter or under other law,
but shall not make that information available for public inspection or
copying except as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 215 RCW 43.19A.022 and 2009 c 356 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2009, all state agencies shall purchase one
hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper used in
office printers and copiers. State agencies are encouraged to give
priority to purchasing from companies that produce paper in facilities
that generate energy from a renewable energy source.
(2) State agencies that utilize office printers and copiers that,
after reasonable attempts, cannot be calibrated to utilize such paper
referenced in subsection (1) of this section, must for those models of
equipment:
(a) Purchase paper at the highest recycled content that can be
utilized efficiently by the copier or printer;
(b) At the time of lease renewal or at the end of the life-cycle,
either lease or purchase a model that will efficiently utilize one
hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper;
(3) Printed projects that require the use of high volume production
inserters or high-speed digital devices, such as those used by the
state printer((, department of information services,)) and the
department of general administration, are not required to meet the one
hundred percent recycled content white cut sheet bond paper standard,
but must utilize the highest recycled content that can be utilized
efficiently by such equipment and not impede the business of agencies.
(4) The state printer((,)) and the department of general
administration((, and department of information services)) shall work
together to identify for use by agencies one hundred percent recycled
paper products that process efficiently through high-speed production
equipment and do not impede the business of agencies.

Sec. 216 RCW 46.20.157 and 1999 c 6 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall annually provide to the ((department of information
services)) consolidated technology services agency an electronic data
file. The data file must:
(a) Contain information on all licensed drivers and identicard
holders who are eighteen years of age or older and whose records have
not expired for more than two years;
(b) Be provided at no charge; and
(c) Contain the following information on each such person: Full
name, date of birth, residence address including county, sex, and most
recent date of application, renewal, replacement, or change of driver's
license or identicard.
(2) Before complying with subsection (1) of this section, the
department shall remove from the file the names of any certified
participants in the Washington state address confidentiality program
under chapter 40.24 RCW that have been identified to the department by
the secretary of state.

Sec. 217 RCW 2.36.054 and 1993 c 408 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise specified by rule of the supreme court, the jury
source list and master jury list for each county shall be created as
provided by this section.
(1) The superior court of each county, after consultation with the
county clerk and county auditor of that jurisdiction, shall annually
notify the ((department of information services)) consolidated
technology services agency not later than March 1 of each year of its
election to use either a jury source list that is merged by the county
or a jury source list that is merged by the ((department of information
services)) consolidated technology services agency. The ((department
of information services)) consolidated technology services agency shall
annually furnish at no charge to the superior court of each county a
separate list of the registered voters residing in that county as
supplied annually by the secretary of state and a separate list of
driver's license and identicard holders residing in that county as
supplied annually by the department of licensing, or a merged list of
all such persons residing in that county, in accordance with the annual
notification required by this subsection. The lists provided by the
((department of information services)) consolidated technology services
agency shall be in an electronic format mutually agreed upon by the
superior court requesting it and the department of information
services. The annual merger of the list of registered voters residing
in each county with the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders
residing in each county to form a jury source list for each county
shall be in accordance with the standards and methodology established
in this chapter or by superseding court rule whether the merger is
accomplished by the ((department of information services)) consolidated
technology services agency or by a county.
(2) Persons on the lists of registered voters and driver's license
and identicard holders shall be identified by a minimum of last name,
first name, middle initial where available, date of birth, gender, and
county of residence. Identifying information shall be used when
merging the lists to ensure to the extent reasonably possible that
persons are only listed once on the merged list. Conflicts in
addresses are to be resolved by using the most recent record by date of
last vote in a general election, date of driver's license or identicard
address change or date of voter registration.
(3) The ((department of information services)) consolidated
technology services agency shall provide counties that elect to receive
a jury source list merged by ((department of information services)) the
consolidated technology services agency with a list of names which are
possible duplicates that cannot be resolved based on the identifying
information required under subsection (2) of this section. If a
possible duplication cannot subsequently be resolved satisfactorily
through reasonable efforts by the county receiving the merged list, the
possible duplicate name shall be stricken from the jury source list
until the next annual jury source list is prepared.

Sec. 218 RCW 29A.08.760 and 2009 c 369 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall provide a duplicate copy of the master
statewide computer file or electronic data file of registered voters to
the ((department of information services)) consolidated technology
services agency for purposes of creating the jury source list without
cost. Restrictions as to the commercial use of the information on the
statewide computer tape or data file of registered voters, and
penalties for its misuse, shall be the same as provided in RCW
29A.08.720 and 29A.08.740.

Sec. 219 RCW 43.63A.550 and 1998 c 245 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall assist in the process of inventorying and
collecting data on public and private land for the acquisition of data
describing land uses, demographics, infrastructure, critical areas,
transportation corridors physical features, housing, and other
information useful in managing growth throughout the state. For this
purpose the department ((shall)) may contract with the ((department of
information services)) consolidated technology services agency and
shall form an advisory group consisting of representatives from state,
local, and federal agencies, colleges and universities, and private
firms with expertise in land planning, and geographic information
systems.
(2) The department shall establish a sequence for acquiring data,
giving priority to rapidly growing areas. The data shall be retained
in a manner to facilitate its use in preparing maps, aggregating with
data from multiple jurisdictions, and comparing changes over time.
Data shall further be retained in a manner which permits its access via
computer.
(3) The department shall work with other state agencies, local
governments, and private organizations that are inventorying public and
private lands to ensure close coordination and to ensure that
duplication of efforts does not occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 A new section is added to chapter 41.80
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The bargaining units of employees at the department of
information services existing on the effective date of this section
shall be considered appropriate units at the consolidated technology
services agency and will be so certified by the public employment
relations commission.
(2) The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as
representing the bargaining units of employees at the department of
information services existing on the effective date of this section
shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the
transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

PART III
NECESSARY FOR IMPLEMENTATION
Sec. 301 RCW 43.105.370 and 2009 c 509 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The broadband mapping account is established in the custody of
the state treasurer. The department shall deposit into the account
such funds received from legislative appropriation, federal ((grants
authorized under the federal broadband data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, Title I)) funding, and donated funds from private and public
sources. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of RCW 43.105.372 through 43.105.376 (as recodified by this
act). Only the director of the department or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.
(2) The department ((of information services)) is the single
eligible entity in the state for purposes of the federal broadband
((data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, Title I)) mapping activities.
(3) Federal funding received by the department ((under the federal
broadband data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, Title I,)) for broadband
mapping activities must be used in accordance with ((the)) any federal
requirements ((of that act)) and, subject to those requirements, may be
distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities
in the state ((to achieve the purposes of that act)).
(4) The department ((of information services)) shall consult with
((the department of community, trade, and economic development or its
successor agency,)) the office of financial management((,)) and the
utilities and transportation commission in coordinating broadband
mapping activities. In carrying out any broadband mapping activities,
the provisions of P.L. 110-385, Title I, regarding trade secrets,
commercial or financial information, and privileged or confidential
information submitted by the federal communications commission or a
broadband provider are deemed to encompass the consulted agencies.

Sec. 302 RCW 43.105.372 and 2009 c 509 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding, the
department may:
(a) Develop an interactive web site to allow residents to self-report whether high-speed internet is available at their home or
residence and at what speed; and
(b) Conduct a detailed survey of all high-speed internet
infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies and ((creating
[create])) create a geographic information system map of all high-speed
internet infrastructure owned or leased by the state.
(2) State agencies responding to a survey request from the
department under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall respond in a
reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed one hundred twenty days.
The department shall request of state agencies, at a minimum:
(a) The total bandwidth of high-speed internet infrastructure owned
or leased;
(b) The cost of maintaining that high-speed internet
infrastructure, if owned, or the price paid for the high-speed internet
infrastructure, if leased; and
(c) The leasing entity, if applicable.
(3) The department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency.

Sec. 303 RCW 43.105.374 and 2009 c 509 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized, through a competitive bidding
process, to procure on behalf of the state a geographic information
system map detailing high-speed internet infrastructure, service
availability, and adoption. This geographic information system map may
include adoption information, availability information, type of high-speed internet deployment technology, and available speed tiers for
high-speed internet based on any publicly available data.
(2) The department may procure this map either by:
(a) Contracting for and purchasing a completed map or updates to a
map from a third party; or
(b) Working directly with the federal communications commission to
accept publicly available data.
(3) The department shall establish an accountability and oversight
structure to ensure that there is transparency in the bidding and
contracting process and full financial and technical accountability for
any information or actions taken by a third-party contractor creating
this map.
(4) In contracting for purchase of the map or updates to a map in
subsection (2)(a) of this section, the department may take no action,
nor impose any condition on the third party, that causes any record
submitted by a public or private broadband service provider to the
third party to meet the standard of a public record as defined in RCW
42.56.010. This prohibition does not apply to any records delivered to
the department by the third party as a component of the ((completed))
map. For the purpose of RCW 42.56.010(((2))) (3), the purchase by the
department of a completed map or updates to a map may not be deemed use
or ownership by the department of the underlying information used by
the third party to complete the map.
(5) Data or information that is publicly available as of July 1,
2009, will not cease to be publicly available due to any provision of
chapter 509, Laws of 2009.

Sec. 304 RCW 43.105.376 and 2009 c 509 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, in coordination with ((the department of
community, trade, and economic development and)) the utilities and
transportation commission, and such advisors as the department chooses,
may prepare regular reports that identify the following:
(a) The geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of
advanced telecommunications infrastructure in the state;
(b) A detailed explanation of how any amount of funding received
from the federal government for the purposes of broadband mapping,
deployment, and adoption will be or have been used; and
(c) A determination of how nonfederal sources may be utilized to
achieve the purposes of broadband mapping, deployment, and adoption
activities in the state.
(2) To the greatest extent possible, the initial report should be
based upon the information identified in the geographic system maps
developed under the requirements of this chapter.
(3) The initial report should be delivered to the appropriate
committees of the legislature as soon as feasible, but no later than
January 18, 2010.
(4) Any future reports prepared by the department based upon the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section should be delivered to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 15th of each
year.

Sec. 305 RCW 43.105.380 and 2009 c 509 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The community technology opportunity program is created to support
the efforts of community technology programs throughout the state. The
community technology opportunity program must be administered by the
department ((of information services)). The department may contract
for services in order to carry out the department's obligations under
this section.
(1) In implementing the community technology opportunity program
the ((administrator)) director must, to the extent funds are
appropriated for this purpose:
(a) Provide organizational and capacity building support to
community technology programs throughout the state, and identify and
facilitate the availability of other public and private sources of
funds to enhance the purposes of the program and the work of community
technology programs. No more than fifteen percent of funds received by
the ((administrator)) director for the program may be expended on these
functions;
(b) Establish a competitive grant program and provide grants to
community technology programs to provide training and skill-building
opportunities; access to hardware and software; internet connectivity;
digital media literacy; assistance in the adoption of information and
communication technologies in low-income and underserved areas of the
state; and development of locally relevant content and delivery of
vital services through technology.
(2) Grant applicants must:
(a) Provide evidence that the applicant is a nonprofit entity or a
public entity that is working in partnership with a nonprofit entity;
(b) Define the geographic area or population to be served;
(c) Include in the application the results of a needs assessment
addressing, in the geographic area or among the population to be
served: The impact of inadequacies in technology access or knowledge,
barriers faced, and services needed;
(d) Explain in detail the strategy for addressing the needs
identified and an implementation plan including objectives, tasks, and
benchmarks for the applicant and the role that other organizations will
play in assisting the applicant's efforts;
(e) Provide evidence of matching funds and resources, which are
equivalent to at least one-quarter of the grant amount committed to the
applicant's strategy;
(f) Provide evidence that funds applied for, if received, will be
used to provide effective delivery of community technology services in
alignment with the goals of this program and to increase the
applicant's level of effort beyond the current level; and
(g) Comply with such other requirements as the ((administrator))
director establishes.
(3) The ((administrator)) director may use no more than ten percent
of funds received for the community technology opportunity program to
cover administrative expenses.
(4) The ((administrator)) director must establish expected program
outcomes for each grant recipient and must require grant recipients to
provide an annual accounting of program outcomes.

Sec. 306 RCW 43.105.382 and 2009 c 509 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington community technology opportunity account is
established in the state treasury. The governor or the governor's
designee and the director or the director's designee shall deposit into
the account federal grants to the state ((authorized under Division B,
Title VI of the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009)),
legislative appropriations, and donated funds from private and public
sources for purposes related to broadband deployment and adoption,
including matching funds required by the act. Donated funds from
private and public sources may be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as matching funds for
federal and other grants to fund the operation of the community
technology opportunity program under this chapter, and to fund other
broadband-related activities authorized in chapter 509, Laws of 2009.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account.

Sec. 307 RCW 43.105.390 and 2009 c 509 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor may take all appropriate steps to ((carry out the
purposes of Division B, Title VI of the American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009, P.L. 111-5, and)) seek federal funding in
order to maximize investment in broadband deployment and adoption in
the state of Washington ((consistent with chapter 509, Laws of 2009)).
Such steps may include the designation of a broadband deployment and
adoption coordinator; review and prioritization of grant applications
by public and private entities as directed by the national
telecommunications and information administration, the rural utility
services, and the federal communications commission; disbursement of
block grant funding; and direction to state agencies to provide
staffing as necessary to carry out this section. The authority for
overseeing broadband adoption and deployment efforts on behalf of the
state is vested in the department.
(2) The department may apply for federal funds and other grants or
donations, may deposit such funds in the Washington community
technology opportunity account created in RCW 43.105.382 (as recodified
by this act), may oversee implementation of federally funded or
mandated broadband programs for the state and may adopt rules to
administer the programs. These programs may include but are not
limited to the following:
(a) Engaging in periodic statewide surveys of residents,
businesses, and nonprofit organizations concerning their use and
adoption of high-speed internet, computer, and related information
technology for the purpose of identifying barriers to adoption;
(b) Working with communities to identify barriers to the adoption
of broadband service and related information technology services by
individuals, nonprofit organizations, and businesses;
(c) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by
working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies,
and businesses;
(d) Creating, implementing, and administering programs to improve
computer ownership, technology literacy, digital media literacy, and
high-speed internet access for populations not currently served or
underserved in the state. This may include programs to provide low-income families, community-based nonprofit organizations, nonprofit
entities, and public entities that work in partnership with nonprofit
entities to provide increased access to computers and broadband, with
reduced cost internet access;
(e) Administering the community technology opportunity program
under RCW 43.105.380 and 43.105.382 (as recodified by this act);
(f) Creating additional programs to spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the state;
(g) Establishing technology literacy and digital inclusion programs
and establishing low-cost hardware, software, and internet purchasing
programs that may include allowing participation by community
technology programs in state purchasing programs; and
(h) Developing technology loan programs targeting small businesses
or businesses located in unserved and underserved areas.

Sec. 308 RCW 43.105.400 and 2009 c 509 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding,
the department may ((reconvene the high-speed internet work group
previously established by chapter 262, Laws of 2008. The work group is
renamed the advisory council on digital inclusion, and is)) convene an
advisory group ((to the department)) on digital inclusion and
technology planning. The ((council must)) advisory group may include,
but is not limited to, volunteer representatives from community
technology organizations, telecommunications providers, higher
education institutions, K-12 education institutions, public health
institutions, public housing entities, and local government and other
governmental entities that are engaged in community technology
activities.
(((2) The council shall prepare a report by January 15th of each
year and submit it to the department, the governor, and the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must contain:
(a) An analysis of how support from public and private sector
partnerships, the philanthropic community, and other not-for-profit
organizations in the community, along with strong relationships with
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and higher education institutions, could
establish a variety of high-speed internet access alternatives for
citizens;
(b) Proposed strategies for continued broadband deployment and
adoption efforts, as well as further development of advanced
telecommunications applications;
(c) Recommendations on methods for maximizing the state's research
and development capacity at universities and in the private sector for
developing advanced telecommunications applications and services, and
recommendations on incentives to stimulate the demand for and
development of these applications and services;
(d) An identification of barriers that hinder the advancement of
technology entrepreneurship in the state; and
(e) An evaluation of programs designed to advance digital literacy
and computer access that are made available by the federal government,
local agencies, telecommunications providers, and business and
charitable entities.))

PART IV
ADMINISTRATIVE AND MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Sections 101 through 121, 137, and 138 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW to be codified as
chapter 43.41A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 RCW 43.105.172, 43.105.250, 43.105.260,
43.105.270, 43.105.280, 43.105.290, 43.105.310, 43.105.835, and
43.105.410 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.--- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 401 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 RCW 43.105.370, 43.105.372, 43.105.374,
43.105.376, 43.105.380, 43.105.382, 43.105.390, 43.105.400, and
43.105.905 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.330 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 2.36.057 (Expanded jury source list -- Court rules) and 1993
c 408 s 1;
(2) RCW 2.36.0571 (Jury source list -- Master jury list -- Adoption of
rules for implementation of methodology and standards by agencies) and
1993 c 408 s 2;
(3) RCW 41.06.094 (Department of information services -- Certain
personnel exempted from chapter) and 1987 c 504 s 7;
(4) RCW 43.105.005 (Purpose) and 1990 c 208 s 1 & 1987 c 504 s 1;
(5) RCW 43.105.013 (Finding -- Intent) and 2010 c 282 s 1;
(6) RCW 43.105.019 (Enterprise-based strategy -- Coordination with
legislative and judicial branches) and 2010 c 282 s 10;
(7) RCW 43.105.032 (Information services board -- Members--Chairperson -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Compensation and travel expenses) and
2007 c 158 s 1, 1999 c 241 s 2, 1996 c 137 s 10, 1992 c 20 s 8, 1987 c
504 s 4, 1984 c 287 s 86, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 128, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 219 s 5;
(8) RCW 43.105.041 (Powers and duties of board) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 65, 2009 c 486 s 13, 2003 c 18 s 3, & 1999 c 285 s 5;
(9) RCW 43.105.095 (Management and oversight structure) and 1999 c
80 s 3;
(10) RCW 43.105.105 (Information technology decisions and plans)
and 1999 c 80 s 4;
(11) RCW 43.105.160 (Strategic information technology plan--Biennial state performance report on information technology) and 2010
c 282 s 9, 2005 c 319 s 110, 1999 c 80 s 9, 1998 c 177 s 3, 1996 c 171
s 9, & 1992 c 20 s 1;
(12) RCW 43.105.170 (Information technology portfolios -- Contents--Performance reports) and 1999 c 80 s 10;
(13) RCW 43.105.178 (Information technology assets -- Inventory) and
2010 c 282 s 12;
(14) RCW 43.105.180 (Evaluation of budget requests for information
technology projects) and 2010 c 282 s 6 & 1999 c 80 s 11;
(15) RCW 43.105.190 (Major information technology projects
standards and policies -- Project evaluation and reporting) and 2005 c
319 s 111, 1999 c 80 s 12, 1998 c 177 s 4, 1996 c 137 s 15, & 1992 c 20
s 4;
(16) RCW 43.105.200 (Application to institutions of higher
education) and 1992 c 20 s 5;
(17) RCW 43.105.210 (Data processing expenditures -- Authorization--Penalties) and 1993 sp.s. c 1 s 903;
(18) RCW 43.105.300 (Education in use of technology encouraged)
and 1996 c 171 s 14;
(19) RCW 43.105.320 (Departmental authority as certification
authority for electronic authentication) and 1999 c 287 s 18 & 1997 c
27 s 29;
(20) RCW 43.105.330 (State interoperability executive committee)
and 2006 c 76 s 2 & 2003 c 18 s 4;
(21) RCW 43.105.340 (Consumer protection web site) and 2008 c 151
s 2;
(22) RCW 43.105.360 (Web directory -- Public community technology
programs) and 2008 c 262 s 5;
(23) RCW 43.105.805 (Information services board -- Powers and duties)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1, 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 66, & 1999 c 285 s 3;
(24) RCW 43.105.815 (K-20 operations cooperative -- Ongoing
management) and 1999 c 285 s 8;
(25) RCW 43.105.820 (K-20 telecommunication system -- Technical plan)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 67, 1999 c 285 s 11, & 1996 c 137 s 8; and
(26) RCW 43.105.825 (K-20 network -- Oversight -- Coordination of
telecommunications planning) and 2004 c 275 s 62 & 1999 c 285 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Section 124 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 Section 125 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 Sections 130 through 133 of this act
expire January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 Section 134 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 Except for sections 124 and 134 of this
act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---