BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A shortage of high-quality laboratory
equipment in the community and technical colleges of this state,
including the Northwest Indian college and vocational skills centers,
is a limiting factor on the modern instruction needed in technology-related fields to maintain industrial competitiveness and spur economic
development in the state. This problem can be at least partially
addressed by encouraging donations of modern laboratory equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to the fair market value of donations made
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) After issuing a need statement and accepting a donation of
modern laboratory equipment useful in one or more technology-related
fields, the recipient institution must promptly have the fair market
value of such equipment assessed by a qualified, independent expert;
however, when the price of the donated equipment is listed in current
catalogs or price lists, an independent expert need not be used. The
assessed fair market value of such equipment or the listed value must
then be reported by the recipient community or technical college to the
donor and the department, along with such other information as the
department deems necessary. The credit under this section must be
earned, and claimed against taxes due under this chapter, for the tax
reporting period in which the contribution was made by the person
claiming credit under this section. The credit may not exceed the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the tax reporting period. Unused
credit may be carried over and used in subsequent tax reporting
periods. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Donation" means an unencumbered transfer.
(b) "Institution" means a community or technical college as defined
in RCW 28B.50.030, a vocational skills center, or the Northwest Indian
college.
(c) "Modern laboratory equipment" means laboratory equipment that
is useful in the course of institution instruction, training or
research, and is comparable to laboratory equipment currently used in
private industry, not-for-profit organizations, or government
laboratories. Such laboratory equipment must retain at least one-half
of its useful life at the time of donation.
(d) "Technology-related fields" means the fields of engineering,
physical sciences, biological sciences, computer sciences, agriculture
and food processing, or other fields established by rule by the higher
education coordinating board.

--- END ---