BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.108.050 and 2002 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) An individual giving massage to members of his or her immediate
family;
(2) The practice of a profession by individuals who are licensed,
certified, or registered under other laws of this state and who are
performing services within their authorized scope of practice;
(3) Massage practiced at the athletic department of any institution
maintained by the public funds of the state, or any of its political
subdivisions;
(4) Massage practiced at the athletic department of any school or
college approved by the department by rule using recognized national
professional standards;
(5) Students enrolled in an approved massage school, approved
program, or approved apprenticeship program, practicing massage
techniques, incidental to the massage school or program and supervised
by the approved school or program. Students must identify themselves
as a student when performing massage services on members of the public.
Students may not be compensated for the massage services they provide;
(6) Individuals who have completed a somatic education training
program approved by the secretary;
(7) Persons who limit their practice to reflexology. For purposes
of this chapter, the practice of reflexology is limited to the hands,
feet, and outer ears. The services provided by those who limit their
practice to reflexology are not designated or implied to be massage or
massage therapy;
(8) Persons who limit their practice to Bowen therapy. The
services provided by those who limit their practice to Bowen therapy
are not designated or implied to be massage or massage therapy.

--- END ---