BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aerospace training or educational program" means a course in
the aerospace industry offered either by the Washington aerospace
training and research center or the Spokane aerospace technology
center.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for an
aerospace training or educational program, is making satisfactory
progress as defined by the program, and has a declared intention to
work in the aerospace industry in the state of Washington.
(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received an
aerospace training student loan.
(5) "Student loan" means a loan that is approved by the board and
awarded to an eligible student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The aerospace training student loan
program is established.
(2) The program shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of aerospace employers, aerospace workers, and
aerospace training or educational programs.
(3) The program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board has the following powers and
duties:
(a) To screen and select, in coordination with representatives of
aerospace training or educational programs, eligible students to
receive an aerospace training student loan;
(b) To consider an eligible student's financial inability to meet
the total cost of the aerospace training or educational program in the
selection process;
(c) To issue low-interest student loans;
(d) To establish an annual loan limit equal to the cost of
attendance minus any other financial aid received;
(e) To define the terms of repayment, including applicable interest
rates, fees, and deferments;
(f) To collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter;
(g) To solicit and accept grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program; and
(h) To adopt necessary rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) To remain an aerospace training or
educational program in which a participant may be registered, the
program must have an advisory committee that includes at least one
member representing aerospace employers and at least one member from
organized labor representing aerospace workers.
(2) To remain an eligible student and receive continuing
disbursements under the program, a participant must be considered by
the aerospace training or educational program to be making satisfactory
progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board may award aerospace training
student loans to eligible students from the funds available in the
aerospace training student loan account for this program. The amount
of the student loan awarded an individual may not exceed tuition and
fees for the program of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The aerospace training student loan
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No
appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account
for student loans. An appropriation is required for expenditures of
funds from the account for costs associated with program administration
by the board. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all moneys received
for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of
moneys received for the program by the board, and receipts from
participant repayments, including principal and interest.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for student
loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and
costs associated with program administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The board, in collaboration with
aerospace training or educational programs, shall submit an annual
report regarding the aerospace training student loan program to the
governor and to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(2) The annual report shall describe the design and implementation
of the aerospace training student loan program, and shall include the
following:
(a) The number of applicants for loans;
(b) The number of participants in the loan program;
(c) The number of participants in the loan program who complete an
aerospace training or educational program;
(d) The number of participants in the loan program who are placed
in employment;
(e) The nature of that employment, including: (i) The type of job;
(ii) whether the job is full-time, part-time, or temporary; (iii)
whether the job pays annual wages that are: (A) Less than thirty
thousand dollars; (B) thirty thousand dollars or greater, but less than
sixty thousand dollars; or (C) sixty thousand dollars or more; and
(f) Demographic profiles of applicants for loans and participants
in the loan programs.
(3) The annual report shall be submitted by December 1st of each
year after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---