BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the long-term
success and prosperity of individual Washington state citizens and the
state as a whole depends on a high-quality public education system that
begins with learning for young children and continues seamlessly
through the common schools and a range of postsecondary and advanced
education alternatives. All aspects of the state's public education
system must be focused on the objective of student readiness and
equitable student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state education council
is established. The mission of the council is to recommend policies,
strategies, and a governance structure to make the public education
system student-focused and able to provide seamless service delivery
across all education sectors and entities, including early learning,
kindergarten through twelfth grade education in the common schools, and
postsecondary education.
(2) The Washington state education council is composed of
twenty-three members who shall represent the full spectrum of interests
and expertise in public education, from early learning through K-12 and
postsecondary education. In developing lists of candidates for
membership of the council, the organizations under this subsection (2)
must include individuals who have knowledge and experience in working
with historically underrepresented populations, including but not
limited to students with disabilities, English language learners, and
culturally diverse students and communities. The council shall
comprise:
(a) Two representatives of early learning programs and providers,
selected from six candidates submitted by advocacy organizations and
advisory committees on early learning;
(b) One public school administrator, selected from three candidates
submitted by the Washington association of school administrators;
(c) One public school director, selected from three candidates
submitted by the Washington state school directors' association;
(d) One public school principal, selected from three candidates
submitted by the association of Washington school principals;
(e) One parent, selected from three candidates submitted by the
Washington state parent teacher association;
(f) One career and technical educator, selected from three
candidates submitted by the Washington association for career and
technical education;
(g) One K-12 teacher, selected from three candidates submitted by
employee associations representing teachers;
(h) One community or technical college faculty member, selected
from three candidates submitted by employee associations representing
college faculty;
(i) One faculty member from a four-year public institution of
higher education, selected from three candidates submitted by the
faculty senates of the four-year public colleges and universities;
(j) One representative of classified employees, selected from three
candidates submitted by employee associations representing such
employees;
(k) Two representatives of four-year public institutions of higher
education, selected from six candidates submitted by the council of
presidents;
(l) Two representatives of community and technical colleges,
selected from six candidates submitted by the Washington association of
community and technical colleges;
(m) One representative of private education, selected from three
candidates submitted by associations representing approved private
schools, private career schools, and independent colleges and
universities;
(n) One representative of the business community, selected from
three candidates submitted by the partnership for learning;
(o) One representative of the office of the governor;
(p) The superintendent of public instruction; and
(q) Four members of the legislature, with two appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one from each of the two major
caucuses of the house of representatives and two appointed by the
president of the senate, one from each of the two major caucuses of the
senate.
(3) Except for the superintendent of public instruction and the
legislative members, members of the council are appointed by the
governor. In making appointments, the governor shall consider the
diversity of the population of the state and strive for a balanced
representation of the state's geographic regions. The governor shall
also ensure that the membership of the council includes individuals who
have knowledge and experience in working with historically
underrepresented populations, including but not limited to students
with disabilities, English language learners, and culturally diverse
students and communities.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene the
council and act as temporary chair until the council has an opportunity
to select a chair and vice chair from among its members.
(5) Ten voting members of the council constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The legislative members of the council may
participate in meetings of the council but may not vote. Except for
the legislative members, all other members of the council are voting
members.
(6) Members of the council, including the legislative members,
shall not be compensated for their service on the council and shall not
be reimbursed for travel expenses. In order to conserve resources, the
council shall maximize the use of technology to conduct its work and
shall meet only in public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington state education council
shall develop recommendations for restructuring state entities with
responsibilities for early learning, K-12 education, and postsecondary
education in order to create a system of public education that is
student-focused and able to provide seamless service delivery across
all education sectors. Restructuring may include reassigning,
removing, or modifying duties and responsibilities and eliminating or
modifying entities as necessary to achieve more efficient and effective
service delivery and oversight.
(2) The council shall address the following state education
entities in its recommendations:
(a) The higher education coordinating board established under RCW
28B.76.040;
(b) The state board for community and technical colleges
established under RCW 28B.50.050;
(c) The state board of education established under RCW 28A.305.011;
(d) The professional educator standards board established under RCW
28A.410.200;
(e) The quality education council established under RCW
28A.290.010;
(f) The achievement gap oversight and accountability committee
established under RCW 28A.300.136;
(g) The Washington state school directors' association established
under RCW 28A.345.010;
(h) The office of the education ombudsman established under RCW
43.06B.010;
(i) The education research and data center established under RCW
43.41.400;
(j) The department of early learning established under RCW
43.215.020;
(k) The early learning advisory council established under RCW
43.215.090; and
(l) The office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) The council shall also examine current data and information
about student progress and success throughout the public education
system and identify state policies or data collection that would
improve the accountability of all education sectors.
(4) In developing its recommendations, the council shall also
identify state programs and initiatives that do not meaningfully
contribute to making the public education system more student-focused
and able to provide seamless service delivery.
(5) The council may establish advisory committees on specific
topics to receive adequate input, expertise, and participation from
education providers and community representatives in developing the
recommendations. Each advisory committee must include at least three
members of the council. Advisory committee members serve without
compensation or state reimbursement for travel expenses.
(6) The council must submit a preliminary progress report to the
governor and the legislature by January 5, 2012.
(7) The council must submit a final report with recommendations to
restructure strategic oversight and supervision of the public education
system to the governor and the legislature by December 5, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may assign no more than two full-time equivalent staff to
support the Washington state education council, with one assigned to
provide research support and one assigned to provide administrative
support. The council may request assistance from other state agencies
as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---