BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.94.150 and 1997 c 393 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All counties operating a system of sewerage and/or water shall
have a lien for delinquent connection charges and charges for the
availability of sewerage and/or water service, together with interest
fixed by resolution at eight percent per annum from the date due until
paid. Penalties of not more than ten percent of the amount due may be
imposed in case of failure to pay the charges at times fixed by
resolution. The lien shall be for all charges, interest, ((and))
penalties, and lien recording and release fees, and shall attach to the
premises to which the services were available. The lien shall be
superior to all other liens and encumbrances, except general taxes and
local and special assessments of the county.
(2) The county department established in RCW 36.94.120 shall
certify periodically the delinquencies to the auditor of the county at
which time the lien shall attach.
(3) In lieu of the procedure provided in subsection (2) of this
section, a county may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt the
alternative procedure applicable to cities and towns set forth in RCW
35.67.210, 35.67.215, and 35.67.290.
(4) Upon the expiration of sixty days after the attachment of the
lien, the county may bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the
superior court of the county where the property is located. Costs
associated with the foreclosure of the lien, including but not limited
to advertising, title report, and personnel costs, shall be added to
the lien upon filing of the foreclosure action. In addition to the
costs and disbursements provided by statute, the court may allow the
county a reasonable attorney's fee. The lien shall be foreclosed in
the same manner as the foreclosure of real property tax liens.

--- END ---