BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.100 and 2006 c 200 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, all powers, duties, and functions of a
participating fire protection jurisdiction pertaining to fire
protection and emergency services shall be transferred to the regional
fire protection service authority on its creation date or on the
effective date that a fire protection jurisdiction is subsequently
annexed into an authority.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, and on the creation date of the regional fire
protection service authority or, in the case of a fire protection
jurisdiction, on the effective date that the fire protection
jurisdiction is subsequently annexed into an authority, all reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material
in the possession of the participating fire protection jurisdiction
pertaining to fire protection and emergency services powers, functions,
and duties shall be delivered to the regional fire protection service
authority; all real property and personal property including cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the participating fire protection jurisdiction in
carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers,
functions, and duties shall be transferred to the regional fire
protection service authority; and all funds, credits, or other assets
held by the participating fire protection jurisdiction in connection
with the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and
duties shall be transferred and credited to the regional fire
protection service authority.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, any appropriations made to the participating
fire protection jurisdiction for carrying out the fire protection and
emergency services powers, functions, and duties shall be transferred
and credited to the regional fire protection service authority.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, whenever any question arises as to the transfer
of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files,
equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of
the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred,
the governing body of the participating fire protection jurisdiction
shall make a determination as to the proper allocation.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, all rules and all pending business before the
participating fire protection jurisdiction pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the regional fire protection service authority, and all existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the regional fire protection service authority.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the participating fire protection jurisdiction shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before creation of the regional fire
protection service authority.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers, the treasurer for the authority shall certify the
apportionments.
(6)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all employees of the
participating fire protection jurisdictions are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the regional fire protection service authority on its
creation date or, in the case of a fire protection jurisdiction, on the
effective date that the fire protection jurisdiction is subsequently
annexed into an authority. Upon transfer, unless an agreement for
different terms of transfer is reached between the collective
bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and the
participating fire protection jurisdictions, an employee is entitled to
the employee rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would
have been entitled as an employee of a participating fire protection
jurisdiction, including rights to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of
transfer;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) If any or all of the participating fire protection
jurisdictions provide for civil service in their fire departments, the
collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and
the participating fire protection jurisdictions must negotiate
regarding the establishment of a civil service system within the
authority. This subsection does not apply if none of the participating
fire protection districts provide for civil service.
(c) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 52.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fire protection jurisdiction that is adjacent to the boundary
of a regional fire protection service authority is eligible for
annexation by the authority.
(2) An annexation is initiated by the adoption of a resolution by
the governing body of a fire protection jurisdiction requesting the
annexation. The resolution requesting annexation must then be filed
with the governing board of the authority that is requested to annex
the fire protection jurisdiction.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, on receipt of the resolution requesting
annexation, the governing board of the authority may adopt a resolution
amending its plan to establish terms and conditions of the requested
annexation and submit the resolution and plan amendment to the fire
protection jurisdiction requesting annexation. An election to
authorize the annexation may be held only if the governing body of the
fire protection jurisdiction seeking annexation adopts a resolution
approving both the annexation and the related plan amendment.
(4)(a) An annexation is authorized if the voters in the fire
protection jurisdiction proposed to be annexed approve by a simple
majority vote a single ballot measure approving the annexation and
related plan amendment.
(b) An annexation is effective on the date specified in the ballot
measure. In the event the ballot measure does not specify an effective
date, the effective date is on the subsequent January 1st or July 1st,
whichever occurs first.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.044 and 2004 c 129 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a fire protection district is a participating fire
protection jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service
authority, the regular property tax levies of the fire protection
district are limited as follows:
(a) The regular levy of the district under RCW 52.16.130 shall not
exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the
authority under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a);
(b) The levy of the district under RCW 52.16.140 shall not exceed
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property
in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the authority
under RCW 52.26.140(1)(b); and
(c) The levy of the district under RCW 52.16.160 shall not exceed
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property
in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the authority
under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c).
(2) If a city or town is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service authority, the
regular levies of the city or town shall not exceed the applicable
rates provided in RCW 27.12.390, 52.04.081, and 84.52.043(1) less the
aggregate rates of any regular levies made by the authority under RCW
52.26.140(1).
(3) If a port district is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in a regional fire protection service authority, the
regular levy of the port district under RCW 53.36.020 shall not exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the aggregate rates of any regular levies
imposed by the authority under RCW 52.26.140(1).
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority or annexed into a regional fire protection service
authority.

--- END ---