BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to relieve cities
and counties of certain requirements imposed by the state by revising
these duties or making the duties optional rather than mandatory.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.22.620 and 2009 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
CITIES: PUBLIC WORKS REPORTING TO STATE AUDITOR. (1) As used in
this section, the term "public works" means as defined in RCW
39.04.010.
(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract
pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by
subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public
works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget
period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public
works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental
public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount
of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it
under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.
If a first-class city has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be
reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be
performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period.
Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city
shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of
public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so
withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in
its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has
performed by public employees has been so reduced.
Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget
period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be
done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids.
The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any
first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the
city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.
(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection
(2) of this section, a first-class city shall not have public employees
perform a public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if
more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works
project, or a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand
dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public
works project or the public works project is street signalization or
street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The
restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the
project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction
on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.
(4) In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements
contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually ((shall))
may prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public
works construction budget and supplemental public works construction
budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works
performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a
biennial basis, this annual report ((shall)) may indicate the amount of
public works that is performed by public employees within the current
biennial period that is above or below ten percent of the total
biennial construction budget.
Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less ((shall)) may use the form required by RCW 43.09.205
to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand
dollars that are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of
that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value
of all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be
waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if
an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or
contract.
(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this
section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works
roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from
a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.
(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
COUNTIES: REPORT FROM PROSECUTORS TO GOVERNOR AND LIQUOR CONTROL
BOARD. The prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Be legal adviser of the legislative authority, giving ((them
[it])) it his or her written opinion when required by the legislative
authority or the chairperson thereof touching any subject which the
legislative authority may be called or required to act upon relating to
the management of county affairs;
(2) Be legal adviser to all county and precinct officers and school
directors in all matters relating to their official business, and when
required draw up all instruments of an official nature for the use of
said officers;
(3) Appear for and represent the state, county, and all school
districts subject to the supervisory control and direction of the
attorney general in all criminal and civil proceedings in which the
state or the county or any school district in the county may be a
party;
(4) Prosecute all criminal and civil actions in which the state or
the county may be a party, defend all suits brought against the state
or the county, and prosecute actions upon forfeited recognizances and
bonds and actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;
(5) Attend and appear before and give advice to the grand jury when
cases are presented to it for consideration and draw all indictments
when required by the grand jury;
(6) Institute and prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the
arrest of persons charged with or reasonably suspected of felonies when
the prosecuting attorney has information that any such offense has been
committed and the prosecuting attorney shall for that purpose attend
when required by them if the prosecuting attorney is not then in
attendance upon the superior court;
(7) Carefully tax all cost bills in criminal cases and take care
that no useless witness fees are taxed as part of the costs and that
the officers authorized to execute process tax no other or greater fees
than the fees allowed by law;
(8) Receive all cost bills in criminal cases before district judges
at the trial of which the prosecuting attorney was not present, before
they are lodged with the legislative authority for payment, whereupon
the prosecuting attorney may retax the same and the prosecuting
attorney must do so if the legislative authority deems any bill
exorbitant or improperly taxed;
(9) Present all violations of the election laws which may come to
the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the special consideration of
the proper jury;
(10) Examine once in each year the official bonds of all county and
precinct officers and report to the legislative authority any defect in
the bonds of any such officer;
(11) ((Make an annual report to the governor as of the 31st of
December of each year setting forth the amount and nature of business
transacted by the prosecuting attorney in that year with such other
statements and suggestions as the prosecuting attorney may deem useful;
(12) Send to the state liquor control board at the end of each year
a written report of all prosecutions brought under the state liquor
laws in the county during the preceding year, showing in each case, the
date of trial, name of accused, nature of charges, disposition of case,
and the name of the judge presiding;
(13))) Seek to reform and improve the administration of criminal
justice and stimulate efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in
substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.34.010 and 1963 c 4 s 36.34.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTIES: SURPLUS PROPERTY VALUED AT LESS THAN FIVE HUNDRED
DOLLARS. Whenever it appears to the board of county commissioners that
it is for the best interests of the county and the taxing districts and
the people thereof that any part or parcel, or portion of such part or
parcel, of property, whether real, personal, or mixed, belonging to the
county, including tax title land, should be sold, the board shall sell
and convey such property, under the limitations and restrictions and in
the manner hereinafter provided.
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to county surplus
property valued at less than five hundred dollars. County surplus
property valued at less than five hundred dollars may be disposed of or
recycled.
In making such sales the board of county commissioners may sell any
timber, mineral, or other resources on any land owned by the county
separate and apart from the land in the same manner and upon the same
terms and conditions as provided in this chapter for the sale of real
property.
The board of county commissioners may reserve mineral rights in
such land and, if such reservation is made, any conveyance of the land
shall contain the following reservation:
"The party of the first part hereby expressly saves, excepts, and
reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its successors, and
assigns, forever, all oils, gases, coals, ores, minerals, gravel,
timber, and fossils of every name, kind, or description, and which may
be in or upon said lands above described; or any part thereof, and the
right to explore the same for such oils, gases, coals, ores, minerals,
gravel, timber and fossils; and it also hereby expressly saves and
reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its successors, and
assigns, forever, the right to enter by itself, its agents, attorneys,
and servants upon said lands, or any part or parts thereof, at any and
all times, for the purpose of opening, developing, and working mines
thereon, and taking out and removing therefrom all such oils, gases,
coal, ores, minerals, gravel, timber, and fossils, and to that end it
further expressly reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself,
its successors, and assigns, forever, the right by it or its agents,
servants, and attorneys at any and all times to erect, construct,
maintain, and use all such buildings, machinery, roads and railroads,
sink such shafts, remove such oil, and to remain on said lands or any
part thereof, for the business of mining and to occupy as much of said
lands as may be necessary or convenient for the successful prosecution
of such mining business, hereby expressly reserving to itself, its
successors, and assigns, as aforesaid, generally, all rights and powers
in, to, and over said land, whether herein expressed or not, reasonably
necessary or convenient to render beneficial and efficient the complete
enjoyment of the property and the rights hereby expressly reserved."
No rights shall be exercised under the foregoing reservation until
provision has been made to pay to the owner of the land upon which the
rights reserved are sought to be exercised, full payment for all
damages sustained by reason of entering upon the land: PROVIDED, That
if the owner for any cause refuses or neglects to settle the damages,
the county, its successors, or assigns, or any applicant for a lease or
contract from the county for the purpose of prospecting for or mining
valuable minerals, or operation contract, or lease, for mining coal, or
lease for extracting petroleum or natural gas, shall have the right to
institute such legal proceedings in the superior court of the county
wherein the land is situated, as may be necessary to determine the
damages which the owner of the land may suffer. Any of the reserved
minerals or other resources not exceeding two hundred dollars in value
may be sold, when the board deems it advisable, either with or without
publication of notice of sale, and in such manner as the board may
determine will be most beneficial to the county.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.44.210 and 1995 c 399 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS: REPORT TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE ON BONDS. For
each state or local government bond issued, the underwriter of the
issue shall supply the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce with information on the bond issue within twenty
days of its issuance. In cases where the issuer of the bond makes a
direct or private sale to a purchaser without benefit of an
underwriter, the issuer shall supply the required information. The
bond issue information shall be provided on a form prescribed by the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
and shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the bond
issue; (2) the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities;
(4) the purposes of the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information;
and (6) the type of bonds that are issued. A copy of the bond
covenants shall be supplied with this information.
For each state or local government bond issued, the issuer's bond
counsel promptly shall provide to the underwriter or to the department
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce information
on the amount of any fees charged for services rendered with regard to
the bond issue.
Each local government that issues any type of bond ((shall)) may
make a report annually to the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce that includes a summary of all the
outstanding bonds of the local government as of the first day of
January in that year. Such report ((shall)) may distinguish the
outstanding bond issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in
RCW 39.44.200, and ((shall)) may report the local government's
outstanding indebtedness compared to any applicable limitations on
indebtedness, including RCW 35.42.200, 39.30.010, and 39.36.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.14.100 and 2007 c 430 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
CITIES: MULTIFAMILY PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION REPORTING. (1) Thirty
days after the anniversary of the date of the certificate of tax
exemption and each year for the tax exemption period, the owner of the
rehabilitated or newly constructed property shall file with a
designated authorized representative of the city an annual report
indicating the following:
(a) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the
anniversary date;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use and, if applicable, that the property has been in compliance with
the affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020 since
the date of the certificate approved by the city;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the city in regards to
the units receiving a tax exemption.
(2) All cities, which issue certificates of tax exemption for
multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter,
((shall)) may report annually by December 31st of each year, beginning
in 2007, to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce. The report ((must)) may include the following
information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;
(c) The number and type of units produced or to be produced meeting
affordable housing requirements;
(d) The actual development cost of each unit produced;
(e) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit
produced;
(f) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption and a summary of these figures for the city; and
(g) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
COUNTIES: VALUATION OF TAX-EXEMPT PUBLIC PROPERTY. At the time of
making the assessment of real property, the assessor shall enter each
description of property exempt under the provisions of chapter 84.36
RCW, and ((value and)) list the same in the manner and subject to the
same rule as the assessor is required to assess all other property,
designating in each case to whom such property belongs. Except as
otherwise provided in law, the assessor is not required to value
property exempt under the provisions of RCW 84.36.010. However, with
respect to publicly owned property exempt from taxation under
provisions of RCW 84.36.010, the assessor shall value only such
property as is leased to or occupied by a private person under an
agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such property for a
private purpose when a request for such valuation is received from the
department of revenue or the lessee of such property for use in
determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter 82.29A RCW:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any assessor
from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a private
person for private purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REPEALERS. The following acts or parts of
acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 36.32.210 (Inventory of county capitalized assets -- County
commission inventory statement -- Filing and public inspection -- Penalty--Prosecutions -- Taxpayer's action) and 2003 c 53 s 204, 1997 c 245 s 3,
1995 c 194 s 5, 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 2, 1963 c 108 s 1, & 1963 c 4 s
36.32.210; and
(2) RCW 43.19.691 (Municipalities -- Energy audits and efficiency)
and 2005 c 299 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---