BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.238 and 2009 c 60 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An annexation by a city or town that is proposing to annex
territory served by one or more fire protection districts may be
accomplished by ordinance after entering into an interlocal agreement
as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW with the county and the fire
protection district or districts that have jurisdiction over the
territory proposed for annexation.
(b) A city or town proposing to annex territory shall initiate the
interlocal agreement process by sending notice to the fire protection
district representative and county representative stating the city's or
town's interest to enter into an interlocal agreement negotiation
process. The parties have forty-five days to respond in the
affirmative or negative. A negative response must state the reasons
the parties do not wish to participate in an interlocal agreement
negotiation. A failure to respond within the forty-five day period is
deemed an affirmative response and the interlocal agreement negotiation
process may proceed. The interlocal agreement process may not proceed
if any negative responses are received within the forty-five day
period.
(c) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in an ordinance describing the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and setting a date for a public
hearing on the ordinance. If the boundaries of the territory proposed
for annexation are agreed to by all parties, a notice of intention must
be filed with the boundary review board created under RCW 36.93.030.
However, the jurisdiction of the board may not be invoked as described
in RCW 36.93.100 for annexations that are the subject of such
agreement.
(2) An interlocal annexation agreement under this section must
include the following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals must include,
but are not limited to:
(i) The transfer of revenues and assets between the fire protection
districts and the city or town;
(ii) A consideration and discussion of the impact to the level of
service of annexation on the unincorporated area, and an agreement that
the impact on the ability of fire protection and emergency medical
services within the incorporated area must not be negatively impacted
at least through the budget cycle in which the annexation occurs;
(iii) A discussion with fire protection districts regarding the
division of assets and its impact to citizens inside and outside the
newly annexed area;
(iv) Community involvement, including an agreed upon schedule of
public meetings in the area or areas proposed for annexation;
(v) Revenue sharing, if any;
(vi) Debt distribution;
(vii) Capital facilities obligations of the city, county, and fire
protection districts;
(viii) An overall schedule or plan on the timing of any annexations
covered under this agreement; and
(ix) A description of which of the annexing cities' development
regulations will apply and be enforced in the area.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(v) Annexation procedures;
(vi) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, and inspection services;
(vii) Financial and administrative services; and
(viii) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years, which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the city or town, the county, and the fire protection
district.
(3) ((If the fire protection district, annexing city or town, and
county reach an agreement on the enumerated goals, the annexation
ordinance may proceed and is not subject to referendum. If only the
annexing city or town and county reach an agreement on the enumerated
goals, the city or town and county may proceed with annexation under
the interlocal agreement, but)) (a) If an agreement is reached on the
enumerated goals either (i) among the fire protection district,
annexing city or town, and the county; or (ii) between the annexing
city or town and the county, then the annexation may proceed under the
interlocal agreement, and, in either case, the annexation ordinance is
subject to referendum.
(b) The annexation ordinance provided for in this section is
subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body of the city or town, signed by qualified electors in
a number not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last
general state election in the area to be annexed, the question of
annexation must be submitted to the voters of the area in a general
election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a special
election called for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice
of the election must be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080, and the
election must be conducted as provided in the general election laws
under Title 29A RCW. The annexation must be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition to the annexation.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but excluding,
the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if a timely and
sufficient referendum petition has not been filed, the area annexed
becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(4) If any portion of a fire protection district is proposed for
annexation to or incorporation into a city or town, both the fire
protection district and the city or town shall jointly inform the
employees of the fire protection district about hires, separations,
terminations, and any other changes in employment that are a direct
consequence of annexation or incorporation at the earliest reasonable
opportunity.
(5) The needed employees shall be taken in order of seniority and
the remaining employees who transfer as provided in this section and
RCW 35.10.360 and 35.10.370 shall head the list for employment in the
civil service system in order of their seniority, to the end that they
shall be the first to be reemployed in the city or town fire department
when appropriate positions become available. Employees who are not
immediately hired by the city or town shall be placed on a reemployment
list for a period not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer
period is authorized by an agreement reached between the collective
bargaining representatives of the employees of the annexing and annexed
fire agencies and the annexing and annexed fire agencies.
(6)(a) Upon transfer, an employee is entitled to the employee
rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been
entitled as an employee of the fire protection district, including
rights to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level of compensation at the
time of transfer, unless the employee's rank and duties have been
reduced as a result of the transfer. If the transferring employee is
placed in a position with reduced rank and duties, the employee's
compensation may be adjusted, but the adjustment may not result in a
decrease of greater than fifty percent of the difference between the
employee's compensation before the transfer and the compensation level
for the position that the employee is transferred to;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) (a) of this subsection does not apply if upon transfer an
agreement for different terms of transfer is reached between the
collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and
the participating fire protection jurisdictions.
(7) If upon transfer, the transferring employee receives the
rights, benefits, and privileges established under subsection (6)(a)(i)
through (iv) of this section, those rights, benefits, and privileges
are subject to collective bargaining at the end of the current
bargaining period for the jurisdiction to which the employee has
transferred.
(8) Such bargaining must take into account the years of service the
transferring employee accumulated before the transfer and must be
treated as if those years of service occurred in the jurisdiction to
which the employee has transferred.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.14.480 and 2009 c 60 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An annexation by a code city proposing to annex territory
served by one or more fire protection districts may be accomplished by
ordinance after entering into an interlocal agreement as provided in
chapter 39.34 RCW with the county and the fire protection district or
districts that have jurisdiction over the territory proposed for
annexation.
(b) A code city proposing to annex territory shall initiate the
interlocal agreement process by sending notice to the fire protection
district representative and county representative stating the code
city's interest to enter into an interlocal agreement negotiation
process. The parties have forty-five days to respond in the
affirmative or negative. A negative response must state the reasons
the parties do not wish to participate in an interlocal agreement
negotiation. A failure to respond within the forty-five day period is
deemed an affirmative response and the interlocal agreement negotiation
process may proceed. The interlocal agreement process may not proceed
if any negative responses are received within the forty-five day
period.
(c) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in an ordinance describing the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and setting a date for a public
hearing on the ordinance. If the boundaries of the territory proposed
for annexation are agreed to by all parties, a notice of intention must
be filed with the boundary review board created under RCW 36.93.030.
However, the jurisdiction of the board may not be invoked as described
in RCW 36.93.100 for annexations that are the subject of such
agreement.
(2) An interlocal annexation agreement under this section must
include the following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals must include,
but are not limited to:
(i) The transfer of revenues and assets between the fire protection
district and the code city;
(ii) A consideration and discussion of the impact to the level of
service of annexation on the unincorporated area, and an agreement that
the impact on the ability of fire protection and emergency medical
services within the incorporated area must not be negatively impacted
at least through the budget cycle in which the annexation occurs;
(iii) A discussion with fire protection districts regarding the
division of assets and its impact to citizens inside and outside the
newly annexed area;
(iv) Community involvement, including an agreed upon schedule of
public meetings in the area or areas proposed for annexation;
(v) Revenue sharing, if any;
(vi) Debt distribution;
(vii) Capital facilities obligations of the code city, county, and
fire protection districts;
(viii) An overall schedule or plan on the timing of any annexations
covered under this agreement; and
(ix) A description of which of the annexing code cities'
development regulations will apply and be enforced in the area.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(v) Annexation procedures;
(vi) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, and inspection services;
(vii) Financial and administrative services; and
(viii) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years, which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the code city, the county, and the fire protection
district.
(3) ((If the fire protection district, annexing code city, and
county reach an agreement on the enumerated goals, the annexation
ordinance may proceed and is not subject to referendum. If only the
annexing code city and county reach an agreement on the enumerated
goals, the code city and county may proceed with annexation under the
interlocal agreement, but)) (a) If an agreement is reached on the
enumerated goals either (i) among the fire protection district,
annexing code city, and the county; or (ii) between the annexing code
city and the county, then the annexation may proceed under the
interlocal agreement, and, in either case, the annexation ordinance is
subject to referendum.
(b) The annexation ordinance provided for in this section is
subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body of the code city, signed by qualified electors in a
number not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general
state election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation
must be submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if
one is to be held within ninety days or at a special election called
for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election
must be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070, and the election must be
conducted as provided in the general election laws under Title 29A RCW.
The annexation must be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority
of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition to the
annexation.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but excluding,
the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if a timely and
sufficient referendum petition has not been filed, the area annexed
becomes a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation.

--- END ---