BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW
to read as follows:
If a motor vehicle is impounded as a result of a traffic
infraction, the registered owner of the vehicle must provide proof of
financial responsibility or motor vehicle insurance before the vehicle
can be redeemed. If the registered owner fails to provide proof of
financial responsibility or motor vehicle insurance within fourteen
calendar days of the impound, the registered owner must pay the costs
associated with the tow and impound, a fine of three hundred fifty
dollars to the department for deposit into the motor vehicle fund, and
an additional fine of twenty dollars to the registered tow truck
operator for each day the vehicle is kept in impoundment after the
fourteen-day period.

--- END ---