BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.010 and 2010 c 161 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:
(1) "Commercial motor vehicle," for the purposes of requiring a
department of transportation number, means the same as defined in RCW
46.25.010(6), or a motor vehicle used in commerce when the motor
vehicle: (a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or
more (26,001 pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit of a gross
vehicle weight rating of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or
more); (b) has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or
more (26,001 pounds or more); or (c) is used in the transportation of
hazardous materials, as defined in RCW 46.25.010(13);
(2) "Department of transportation number" means a department of
transportation number from the federal motor carrier safety
administration;
(3) "Interstate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial
vehicle that operates in more than one state;
(4) "Intrastate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial
vehicle that operates exclusively within the state of Washington;
(5) "Motor carrier" means a person or entity who has been issued a
department of transportation number and who owns a commercial motor
vehicle;
(6) "Registration period" means the effective period of a vehicle
registration issued by the department for a vehicle that has a declared
gross weight of eight thousand pounds or less. A registration period
begins at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar year designated by the
department and ends at 12:00 a.m. on the same day the second succeeding
year unless otherwise specified;
(7) "Registration year" means the effective period of a vehicle
registration issued by the department for a vehicle that has a declared
gross weight of more than eight thousand pounds. A registration year
begins at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar year designated by the
department and ends at 12:00 a.m. on the same day the following year
unless otherwise specified;
(((7))) (8) "Renewal notice" means the notice to renew a vehicle
registration sent to the registered owner by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.020 and 2010 c 161 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall assign a new registration year or
registration period to a vehicle if:
(a) The Washington state vehicle registration has expired and
registered ownership to the vehicle is being transferred. The renewed
license is valid for a full twelve-month period or twenty-four month
period unless a specific expiration date is required by law, rule, or
program; or
(b) The Washington vehicle registration has expired and the
registered owner:
(i) Is a member of the United States armed forces;
(ii) Was stationed outside of Washington under military orders
during the prior vehicle registration year or registration period; and
(iii) Provides the department a copy of the military orders.
(2) Each registration year may be divided into twelve registration
months. Each registration period may be divided into twenty-four
registration months. Each registration month begins at 12:01 a.m. on
a day of the month assigned by the department and ends at 12:00 a.m. on
the same day the following month.
(3) A registration year or registration period extends through the
end of the next business day when the final day of a registration year
or registration period or month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16A.025 and 2010 c 161 s 431 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may by rule extend or reduce vehicle registration
periods for the purpose of staggering renewal periods. The rules may
exclude any classes or classifications of vehicles from the staggered
renewal system and may provide for the gradual introduction of classes
or classifications of vehicles into the system. The rules shall
provide for the collection of proportionately increased or decreased
vehicle license fees and of excise or property taxes required to be
paid at the time of registration.
((It is the intent of the legislature that there shall be neither
a significant net gain nor loss of revenue to the state general fund or
the motor vehicle fund as the result of implementing and maintaining a
staggered vehicle registration system.))

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16A.110 and 2010 c 161 s 428 and 2010 c 8 s 9012
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized
representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director on a form approved by the director. The application for a
renewal vehicle registration must be accompanied by a draft, money
order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes required by
law for the application for a renewal vehicle registration.
(2) An application and the fees and taxes for a renewal vehicle
registration must be handled in the same manner as an original vehicle
registration application. The registration does not need to show the
name of the lien holder when the application for renewal vehicle
registration becomes the renewal registration upon validation.
(3) A person expecting to be out of state during the normal renewal
period of a vehicle registration may renew a vehicle registration and
have license plates or tabs preissued by applying for a renewal as
described in subsection (1) of this section. A vehicle registration
may be renewed for the subsequent registration year or registration
period up to eighteen months before the current expiration date and
must be displayed from the date of issue or from the day of the
expiration of the current registration year or registration period,
whichever date is later.
(4) An application for a renewal vehicle registration is not
required for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by:
(a) The state of Washington, or by any county, city, town, school
district, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington; or
(b) A governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state
and recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department
of the interior.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16A.180 and 2010 c 161 s 432 and 2010 c 8 s 9014
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A registration certificate must be:
(a) Signed by the registered owner, or if a firm or corporation,
the signature of one of its officers or other authorized agent, to be
valid;
(b) Carried in the vehicle for which it is issued; and
(c) Provided to law enforcement and the department by the operator
of the vehicle upon demand.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to operate or be in possession of
a vehicle without carrying a registration certificate for the vehicle.
Any person in charge of a vehicle shall, upon demand of any of the
local authorities or of any police officer or of any representative of
the department, permit an inspection of the vehicle registration
certificate. This section does not apply to a vehicle for which
registration is not required to be renewed annually or biennially and
is a publicly owned vehicle marked as required under RCW 46.08.065.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16A.440 and 2010 c 161 s 421 are each amended to
read as follows:
Private use single-axle trailers of two thousand pounds scale
weight or less may qualify for a reduced vehicle license fee described
in RCW 46.17.350(1)(k). To qualify for the reduced vehicle license
fee:
(1) The trailer must be operated upon public highways;
(2) The vehicle license fee must be collected ((annually)) for each
registration ((year)) period or fraction of a registration ((year))
period; and
(3) The trailer must be operated for personal use of the owner and
not held for rental to the public or used in any commercial or business
endeavor.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any
other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall
pay a three dollar filing fee for a vehicle subject to a registration
year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a six dollar filing fee for a
vehicle subject to a registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010,
in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.
(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a
four dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required
by law.
(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed
under RCW 46.68.400.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.17.015 and 2010 c 161 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any
other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall
pay a twenty-five cent license plate technology fee for a vehicle
subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a
fifty cent license plate technology fee for a vehicle subject to a
registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any
other fees and taxes required by law. The license plate technology fee
must be distributed under RCW 46.68.370.
(2) A vehicle registered under RCW 46.16A.455 or 46.17.330 is not
subject to the license plate technology fee.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.17.025 and 2010 c 161 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any
other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall
pay a fifty cent license service fee for a vehicle subject to a
registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a one dollar
license service fee for a vehicle subject to a registration period, as
defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes
required by law. The license service fee must be distributed under RCW
46.68.220.
(2) A vehicle registered under RCW 46.16A.455 or 46.17.330 is not
subject to the license service fee.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.17.305 and 2010 c 161 s 522 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for a
boat trailer, the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay
a ((three)) six dollar aquatic weed fee in addition to any other fees
and taxes required by law. The ((three)) six dollar fee must be
deposited in the freshwater aquatic weeds account created in RCW
43.21A.650.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.17.330 and 2010 c 161 s 527 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350
and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for farm
vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.425, the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the
applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following farm
vehicle reduced gross weight license fee by weight:

WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds $((24.50)) 49.00 $((24.50)) 49.00

6,000 pounds $((24.50)) 49.00 $((24.50)) 49.00

8,000 pounds $((24.50)) 49.00 $((24.50)) 49.00

10,000 pounds $40.50 $40.50

12,000 pounds $49.00 $49.00

14,000 pounds $54.50 $54.50

16,000 pounds $60.50 $60.50

18,000 pounds $86.50 $86.50

20,000 pounds $95.00 $95.00

22,000 pounds $102.00 $102.00

24,000 pounds $109.50 $109.50

26,000 pounds $115.00 $115.00

28,000 pounds $134.00 $134.00

30,000 pounds $153.00 $153.00

32,000 pounds $182.50 $182.50

34,000 pounds $193.50 $193.50

36,000 pounds $209.00 $209.00

38,000 pounds $228.50 $228.50

40,000 pounds $260.00 $260.00

42,000 pounds $270.00 $315.00

44,000 pounds $275.50 $320.50

46,000 pounds $295.50 $340.50

48,000 pounds $307.50 $352.50

50,000 pounds $333.00 $378.00

52,000 pounds $349.50 $394.50

54,000 pounds $376.50 $421.50

56,000 pounds $397.00 $442.00

58,000 pounds $412.50 $457.50

60,000 pounds $439.00 $484.00

62,000 pounds $470.00 $515.00

64,000 pounds $480.00 $525.00

66,000 pounds $533.50 $578.50

68,000 pounds $556.00 $601.00

70,000 pounds $598.00 $643.00

72,000 pounds $639.00 $684.00

74,000 pounds $693.50 $738.50

76,000 pounds $748.50 $793.50

78,000 pounds $816.50 $861.50

80,000 pounds $880.50 $925.50

82,000 pounds $941.00 $986.00

84,000 pounds $1,001.00 $1,046.00

86,000 pounds $1,061.50 $1,106.50

88,000 pounds $1,122.00 $1,167.00

90,000 pounds $1,182.50 $1,127.50

92,000 pounds $1,242.50 $1,287.50

94,000 pounds $1,303.00 $1,348.00

96,000 pounds $1,363.50 $1,408.50

98,000 pounds $1,424.00 $1,469.00

100,000 pounds $1,484.00 $1,529.00

102,000 pounds $1,544.50 $1,589.50

104,000 pounds $1,605.00 $1,650.00

105,500 pounds $1,665.50 $1,710.50

(2) Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for
hauling logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to
vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
(3) If the resultant gross weight is not listed in the table
provided in subsection (1) of this section, it must be increased to the
next higher weight.
(4) Farm vehicles that have a declared gross weight of eight
thousand pounds or less must pay the gross weight license fee listed in
Schedule A or Schedule B biennially.
(5) The farm vehicle reduced gross weight license fees provided in
subsection (1) of this section are in addition to the filing fee
required under RCW 46.17.005 and any other fee or tax required by law.
(((5))) (6) The farm vehicle reduced gross weight license fee as
provided in subsection (1) of this section must be distributed under
RCW 46.68.030.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.17.350 and 2010 c 161 s 531 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to
pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper $ ((4.90)) 9.80 $ ((3.50)) 7.00 RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer $ 34.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats
or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered) $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle $ 18.00 $ 18.00 RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle
trailer $ ((15.00)) 30.00 $ ((15.00)) 30.00 RCW 46.68.035(2)

(l) Snowmobile $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage $ 12.00 $ 12.00 RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer $ ((30.00)) 60.00 $ ((30.00)) 60.00 RCW 46.68.030

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1)(b), (f),
(g), (h), (j), (k), (n), (p), and (q) of this section must be paid
biennially.
(3) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this
section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005,
and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.17.375 and 2010 c 161 s 534 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for registration for a
recreational vehicle, the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to pay a
((three)) six dollar fee in addition to any other fees and taxes
required by law. The recreational vehicle sanitary disposal fee must
be deposited in the RV account created in RCW 46.68.170.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "recreational vehicle" means
a camper, motor home, or travel trailer.

Sec. 14 RCW 46.68.030 and 2010 c 161 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall forward all fees for vehicle registrations
under chapters ((46.16)) 46.16A and 46.17 RCW, unless otherwise
specified by law, to the state treasurer with a proper identifying
detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit these moneys to the
motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(2) Proceeds from vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license
fees must be deposited by the state treasurer as follows:
(a) $20.35 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee for a
vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010,
and $40.70 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle
subject to a registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, must be
deposited in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle
fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal vehicle license
fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account must be
for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities
of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and
reappropriations.
(b) $2.02 of each initial vehicle license fee and $0.93 of each
renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a registration
year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and $4.04 of each initial vehicle
license fee and $1.86 of each renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle
subject to a registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, must be
deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account.
(c) Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal
vehicle license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this
section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.50.460 and 1979 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to the end of any registration ((year)) period of a vehicle,
the director shall cause to be mailed to the owners of travel trailers
or campers, of record, notice of the amount of tax payable during the
succeeding registration ((year)) period. The notice shall contain a
legal description of the travel trailer or camper, prominent notice of
due dates, and such other information as may be required by the
director.

--- END ---