BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.76.280 and 1995 c 380 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may sell or lease property acquired under this
chapter to a county rail district established under chapter 36.60 RCW,
a county, a port district, or any other public or private entity
authorized to operate rail service. Any public or private entity that
originally donated funds to the department under this chapter shall
receive credit against the purchase price for the amount donated to the
department, less management costs, in the event such public or private
entity purchases the property from the department.
(2) If no county rail district, county, port district, or other
public or private entity authorized to operate rail service purchases
or leases the property within six years after its acquisition by the
department, the department may sell or lease such property in the
manner provided in RCW 47.76.290. Failing this, the department may
sell or convey all such property in the manner provided in RCW
47.76.300 or 47.76.320.
(3) Property acquired by the department under this chapter that is
not essential for the operation of the rail service contemplated in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be sold or leased at any
time following acquisition in the manner provided in RCW 47.76.290.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.76.290 and 1993 c 224 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If real property acquired by the department under this chapter
that is essential for the operation of the rail service contemplated in
RCW 47.76.280 is not sold or leased to a public or private entity
authorized to operate rail service within six years of its acquisition
by the department, the department may sell or lease the property at
fair market value to any of the following governmental entities or
persons:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) The former owner, heir, or successor of the property from whom
the property was acquired; or
(e) Any abutting private owner or owners.
(2)(a) Real property acquired by the department under this chapter
that is not essential for the operation of the rail service
contemplated in RCW 47.76.280 may be leased or sold at fair market
value, at any time following acquisition, to any entity or person in
the following priority order:
(i) The current tenant or lessee of the real property or real
property abutting the property being sold;
(ii) An abutting private owner, but only after each other abutting
private owner, if any, as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the real
property within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed
sale, the real property must be sold at public auction in the manner
provided in RCW 47.76.320;
(iii) Any other state agency;
(iv) The city or county in which the real property is situated;
(v) Any other municipal corporation; or
(vi) The former owner, heir, or successor of the real property from
whom the real property was acquired.
(b) If the department intends to sell or lease property under this
subsection to an entity or person that is not the entity or person with
the highest priority status under this subsection, the department must
give written notice to each entity or person with higher priority
status under this subsection. The entity with the highest priority
status, willing to enter into a sale or lease at fair market value,
must be given right of first refusal to buy or lease the property.
(3) Notice of intention to sell under this section shall be given
by publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the
area in which the property is situated not less than thirty days prior
to the intended date of sale.
(((3))) (4) Sales to purchasers under this section may, at the
department's option, be for cash or by real estate contract, except
that any such property of the Palouse River and Coulee City rail lines
that was purchased with bond proceeds in November 2004 may be sold only
for cash at fair market value.
(((4))) (5) Conveyances made under this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((5))) (6) All moneys received under this section shall be
deposited in the essential rail ((banking account of the general fund))
assistance account created in RCW 47.76.250. Any moneys deposited
under this subsection from sales or leases of property that are
related, in any way, to the Palouse River and Coulee City rail lines
must be used and, in the case of moneys received from sales, expended
within two years of receipt, only for the refurbishment or improvement
of the Palouse River and Coulee City rail lines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
All revenue received by the department of transportation from
operating leases or other business operations on the Palouse River and
Coulee City rail lines must be used only for the refurbishment or
improvement of the Palouse River and Coulee City rail lines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---