BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
interest of the public to reduce recidivism and to promote the
reintegration into society of individuals convicted of crimes.
Research indicates that legal financial obligations may constitute a
significant barrier to successful reintegration and may result in
increases in recidivism. The legislature further recognizes that the
accrual of interest on nonrestitution debt during the term of
incarceration results in many individuals leaving prison with
insurmountable debt. These circumstances make it less likely that
restitution will be paid in full and more likely that former offenders
and their families will remain in poverty. In order to foster
reintegration and reduce recidivism, this act creates a mechanism for
courts to eliminate interest accrued on nonrestitution debt during
incarceration and improves incentives for payment of legal financial
obligations.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.82.090 and 2009 c 479 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments.
All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state
general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020,
twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five
percent to the county current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court may, on motion by the offender, following the
offender's release from total confinement, reduce or waive the interest
on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a criminal
conviction((.)) as follows:
(a) The court shall waive all interest on the portions of the legal
financial obligations that are not restitution that is accrued during
the term of total confinement, provided the offender shows that the
interest creates a hardship for the offender or his or her immediate
family;
(b) The court may reduce interest on the restitution portion of the
legal financial obligations only if the principal has been paid in
full;
(c) The court may reduce or waive the interest ((only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her)) on all other legal
financial obligations not otherwise addressed in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. ((The court may not waive the interest on the restitution
portion of the legal financial obligation and may only reduce the
interest on the restitution portion of the legal financial obligation
if the principal of the restitution has been paid in full.)) The
offender must show that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay, that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship, and that he or she will be unable to pay the principal and
interest in full and that reduction or waiver of the interest will
likely enable the offender to pay the full principal and any remaining
interest thereon. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort"
means that the offender has either (((a))) (i) paid the principal
amount in full; or (((b))) (ii) made ((twenty-four consecutive)) at
least fifteen monthly payments within an eighteen-month period,
excluding any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of
corrections, on his or her legal financial obligations under his or her
payment agreement with the court;
(d) For purposes of (a) through (c) of this subsection, the court
may reduce or waive interest on legal financial obligations only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal financial
obligations. The court may grant the motion, establish a payment
schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for purposes of
reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
(3) This section applies to persons convicted as adults or
adjudicated delinquents in juvenile court.

--- END ---