BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Currently, more than two million veterans are eligible to
enroll full time in colleges across the country, however, many are not
fully accessing their veterans' educational benefits. Due to time
restrictions on these benefits, it is essential that colleges
coordinate services that allow veterans to enroll and complete their
degrees in a timely manner. A coalition has been formed in Washington
state to bring together community colleges and a public university in
regional capacity to meet the needs of student veterans and to benefit
veterans in ways including a more seamless transition from community
colleges to four-year institutions of higher education.
(2) Western Washington University shall coordinate a program that
leverages leadership of returning veterans. Olympic College, Everett
Community College, Skagit Valley College, Whatcom Community College,
Bellingham Technical College, Northwest Indian College, and Western
Washington University are the participating institutions.
(3) As a central resource, Western Washington University is
responsible for, but not limited to:
(a) Providing leadership opportunities for interested veterans that
draw upon veterans' military experiences;
(b) Identifying resources and pooling efforts among veterans to
address barriers to education such as child care and transportation,
and to create connections among student veterans;
(c) Reviewing and revising policies to improve the transfer
experience, with particular emphasis on reducing barriers unique to
student veterans, including difficulties encountered by student
veterans with mixed federal veterans' administration benefits and state
financial aid awards;
(d) Developing partnerships between the institutions and outside
agencies to bridge veteran support and services;
(e) Providing training for certifying officers on changes to
benefits processing and relevant laws;
(f) Providing training to faculty and staff on student veteran-related issues; and
(g) Providing training for faculty, staff, and student peer
volunteers.
(4) Each participating institution under subsection (2) of this
section should endeavor to:
(a) Create a full-time dedicated veterans' coordinator or
certifying official;
(b) Create a dedicated veterans' office presence, both in-person
and online, to provide a place for veterans to meet, study, and connect
with other students who share in their transitional challenges
returning to civilian life and to access referral information;
(c) Collaborate with student representatives from organizations and
clubs to promote programs that will engage and support veterans and
help in the transition from military to civilian life;
(d) Provide direct assistance in areas such as academic advising,
career planning, tutorial services, financial literacy, and services
tailored to meet veteran's individual needs such as counseling and
disability services.
(5) Western Washington University shall allocate funds to the
participating institutions based on the number of veterans receiving
services at the institution.
(6) Western Washington University, with input from the
participating institutions, shall report by November 1st of even-numbered years to appropriate committees of the legislature on outcomes
of the program in this section, including:
(a) The change in numbers of student veterans transferring from
two-year to four-year institutions;
(b) The change in numbers of student veterans graduating, and of
those graduating in a timely manner;
(c) Any increased opportunities for student veterans to be engaged
in leadership activities and their preparedness to use leadership
skills in a nonmilitary setting;
(d) Whether student veterans exhibit a stronger connectedness with
institutions and other veterans through mentoring, leadership
opportunities, and resource sharing;
(e) Any improved access to services and resources through
partnerships, collaborative efforts, and direct assistance;
(f) Enhanced knowledge for service providers, faculty, and staff on
each campus; and
(g) The improvements in basic infrastructure needs at individual
campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of eight hundred seventy-two
thousand seven hundred dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, from the
general fund to Western Washington University for the purposes of this
act.
(2) The sum of one million ninety-seven thousand five hundred
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013, from the general fund to Western
Washington University for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---