BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who collects claim information from, or furnishes
claim information to, insureds or claimants, and who enters data is not
an "adjuster" for the purpose of this chapter if both of the following
are satisfied:
(a) The individual's claim-related activity is limited exclusively
to claims originating from policies of insurance issued through a
communications equipment program as defined in RCW 48.120.005(2); and
(b) The individual is an employee of, and is supervised by, a
person that is licensed as an independent adjuster. For purposes of
this section, "employee" includes employees of entities under common
ownership with the licensed person.
(2) The person that is licensed as an independent adjuster must
maintain complete records of its employees engaged in the activity
described in subsection (1) of this section and must comply with either
(a) or (b) of this subsection:
(a) The person must submit a list of the names of all such
employees to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner
annually and must keep the list current by reporting all changes,
deletions, or additions within thirty days after the change, deletion,
or addition occurred. Each list must be retained by the licensed
independent adjuster for a period of three years from submission; or
(b) The person must maintain a system to track and document in the
claim records each employee engaged in the activity described in
subsection (1) of this section and, upon request of the commissioner,
must identify the employee who has engaged in the activity.
(3) The person licensed as an independent adjuster must provide a
training and education program for each employee engaged in the
activity described in subsection (1) of this section prior to allowing
the employee to engage in the activity. The training must include a
section on compliance with applicable insurance laws for which a
syllabus outlining the content of this section must be submitted to the
commissioner for approval prior to use, and resubmitted for approval of
any changes prior to use.
(4) The licensed independent adjuster that supervises the persons
engaged in the activity described in subsection (1) of this section is
responsible for their conduct. The commissioner may place on
probation, revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the adjuster's license
of the independent adjuster, levy a civil penalty in accordance with
RCW 48.17.560, or any combination of actions for any of the causes for
which an adjuster's license may be revoked under chapter 48.17 RCW for
the violation of any insurance laws, or any rule, subpoena, or order of
the commissioner by a person engaged in the activity described in
subsection (1) of this section who is employed by the licensed
adjuster.

--- END ---