BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends to establish the
agriculture and critical areas voluntary stewardship program as
recommended in the report submitted by the William D. Ruckelshaus
Center to the legislature as required by chapter 353, Laws of 2007, and
chapter 203, Laws of 2010.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Provide county legislative authorities with a new option for
protecting critical areas that is an alternative to requirements of the
growth management act. The legislature finds that this alternative, in
addition to further harmonizing requirements of the growth management
act to protect critical areas and preserve agricultural lands, will
further the goal of fostering improved cooperation between diverse
interests, will enhance critical areas located within regions of the
state that engage in agricultural activities, and will maintain and
improve the long-term viability of agriculture in local communities;
(b) Include in the stewardship program, locally tailored programs
with recommended practices and incentives that are available on a
watershed level. The legislature intends for these locally tailored
programs, to the maximum extent practicable, to address nonpoint water
quality issues related to agricultural activities; and
(c) Make the stewardship program available to enhance critical
areas in participating counties, including areas within these counties
that are subject to the jurisdiction of the shoreline management act.
Should the stewardship program be applied in areas that are subject to
the jurisdiction of the shoreline management act, the legislature
intends for its application to be consistent with the shoreline
management act.
(3) The legislature does not intend for the stewardship program to
affect actions taken to comply with the requirements of chapter 36.70A
RCW by counties that are not participating in the program.
(4) The legislature intends for the stewardship program to be
guided by the following principles:
(a) Building upon existing work in local watersheds;
(b) Emphasizing voluntary stewardship before regulatory actions;
(c) Protecting critical areas from further degradation;
(d) Setting priorities for voluntary actions to enhance critical
areas;
(e) Improving compliance with applicable laws pertaining to the
protection of water quality and fish habitat; and
(f) Fostering a spirit of cooperation among diverse interest groups
to better assure program success.
(5) The legislature further intends that, in designing and
administering the stewardship program, the state conservation
commission shall use existing state and federal programs, to the
maximum extent practicable, in its efforts to achieve the goals of the
program.

--- END ---