BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.90.140 and 1986 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall enforce the rules adopted under this
chapter. The secretary may develop joint plans of responsibility with
any local health jurisdiction to administer this chapter.
(2) Upon dissolution of a joint plan under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall assume responsibility from the local
health jurisdiction for enforcing the rules adopted under this chapter.
In such cases, the department may not require changes in the
installation of equipment at a facility if:
(a) The equipment was installed at the time a joint plan was in
effect;
(b) The equipment was installed in compliance with manufacturer
specifications;
(c) The local health jurisdiction did not find the installation of
the equipment out of compliance with rules adopted under this chapter;
and
(d) The manufacturer has not issued a recall or changed its
specifications for placement of the equipment.

--- END ---