BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) As prescription drug prices continue to escalate, other states
have experienced the creation by insurers of a new cost-sharing
mechanism known as prescription drug specialty tiers;
(b) Many insurers use a three-tiered drug formulary structure that
provides fixed cost prescription drug benefits to insureds, based on
generic, brand name preferred, and brand name nonpreferred
designations;
(c) Specialty tiers include the costly prescription drugs to which
some insurers are instituting percentage cost prescription drug
benefits that are causing some insureds to pay more than three thousand
dollars for one month's supply of medication;
(d) Such drugs are typically new, infusible biologics or plasma-derived therapies produced in lesser quantities than other drugs and
not available as less costly brand name or generic prescription drugs;
and
(e) The cost-sharing, deductible, and coinsurance obligations for
certain drugs have become cost prohibitive for insureds trying to
overcome serious disease such as cancer, hemophilia, multiple
sclerosis, myositis, neuropathy, primary immunodeficiency disease, and
rheumatoid arthritis.
(2) The legislature finds that insurers are also increasing
prescription drug copays to amounts beyond the reach of most insureds
and that if an insurer utilizes the three-tiered drug formulary, the
amounts charged for brand name nonpreferred and specialty drug copays
should not have the effect of unfairly denying access to prescription
drugs covered by the health benefit plan and should not cost more than
is necessary to provide a reasonable incentive for insureds to use
brand name preferred prescription drugs.
(3) The legislature further finds that paying hundreds or even
thousands of dollars each month for prescription drugs would be a
strain for any person, but for people with chronic illnesses and life-threatening conditions, this unfortunate social policy has the
potential to destroy a family's financial solvency or end the ability
to take a necessary medication. Specialty tiers are contrary to the
original purpose of insurance, which was the spreading of costs.
Specialty tiers create a structure where those who are sickest pay
more, and those who are healthy pay less. Therefore, the creation of
specialty tiers is an unlawful discriminatory practice.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that every insured have
access to reasonable prescription drug benefits and that the creation
of specialty tiers will prevent the achievement of that intent.
(5) The legislature further intends that the office of the
insurance commissioner consider the discriminatory practice of
specialty tiers and advise the political subdivisions of the state of
Washington to not obtain insurance coverage that offers such policies
that may restrict the use of life-saving therapies due to the
extraordinary disparity in cost-sharing, deductibles, and coinsurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer may not create specialty tiers that require
payment of a percentage cost of prescription drugs.
(b) An insurer may not establish tiers of prescription drug copays
in which the maximum prescription drug copay exceeds by more than five
hundred percent the lowest prescription drug copay charged under the
health benefit plan.
(c) If an insurer's health benefit plan provides a limit for out-of-pocket expenses for benefits other than prescription drugs, the
insurer shall include one of the following provisions in the plan that
would result in the lowest out-of-pocket prescription drug cost to the
insured:
(i) Out-of-pocket expenses for prescription drugs must be included
under the plan's total limit for out-of-pocket expenses for all
benefits provided under the plan; or
(ii) Out-of-pocket expenses for prescription drugs per contract
year may not exceed one thousand dollars per insured or two thousand
dollars per insured family, adjusted for inflation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Health benefit plan" means any plan provided by a health
carrier, to the extent not preempted by federal law or exempted by
state law. "Health benefit plan" does not mean one or more, or any
combination, of the following:
(i) Coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, or
any combination thereof;
(ii) Credit-only insurance;
(iii) Coverage for specified disease or illness;
(iv) Limited scope dental or vision benefits;
(v) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(vi) Automobile medical payment insurance or homeowners medical
payment insurance;
(vii) Insurance under which benefits are payable with or without
regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in
any liability policy or equivalent self-insurance coverage; or
(viii) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance; and
(b) "Insurer" has the same meaning as "health carrier" in RCW
48.43.087.
(3) This section applies to all health benefit plans delivered or
issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2012.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
office of the insurance commissioner shall enforce this section. The
commissioner may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
(5) The office of the insurance commissioner shall cease
enforcement of this section if it determines that the requirements of
this section will result in the assumption by the state of additional
costs pursuant to section 1311(d)(3)(B), as such section was amended by
section 10104(e) of Title X, of the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended.

--- END ---