BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Third-party administrator" means any entity that contracts to
administer workers' compensation claims for self-insured employers
qualified under RCW 51.14.020 and certified pursuant to RCW 51.14.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Claims management entity" means any individual designated by a
self-insured employer qualified under RCW 51.14.020 and certified
pursuant to RCW 51.14.030 to administer workers' compensation claims
including self-administered organizations and third-party
administrators.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.200 and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 48 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If a self-insurer as defined in RCW 51.08.173 or a third-party
administrator or claims management entity as defined by chapter 51.08
RCW fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with a compensation order
which has become final and is not subject to review or appeal or
refuses to timely provide or pay for treatment or vocational services,
the director or any person entitled to compensation under the order may
institute proceedings for injunctive or other appropriate relief for
enforcement of the order and the worker or a representative of the
worker may file suit against the self-insured employer, third-party
administrator, or claims management entity. These proceedings may be
instituted in the superior court for the county in which the claimant
resides, or, if the claimant is not then a resident of this state, in
the Thurston county superior court ((for the county in which the self-insurer may be served with process)).
(2) The superior court shall enforce obedience to the order by
proper means, enjoining compliance upon the person obligated to comply
with the compensation order. The court may issue such writs and
processes as are necessary to carry out its orders. Additionally, the
court may, after finding that a self-insurer, third-party
administrator, or claims management entity has failed, refused, or
neglected to pay compensation and benefits or timely provide or pay for
treatment or vocational services due the entitled party, increase the
unpaid compensation and benefits to an amount not to exceed three times
the amount of unpaid compensation and benefits due the worker and award
reasonable attorneys' fees as well as actual and statutory litigation
costs.
(3) A proceeding under this section does not preclude other methods
of enforcement provided for in this title or available under chapter
51.48 RCW.

--- END ---