BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.215 and 2010 c 180 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child may petition the juvenile court to reinstate the
previously terminated parental rights of his or her parent under the
following circumstances:
(a) The child was previously found to be a dependent child under
this chapter;
(b) The child's parent's rights were terminated in a proceeding
under this chapter;
(c) The child has not achieved his or her permanency plan within
three years of a final order of termination or the permanency plan was
achieved within three years of the final order of termination but was
not sustained after the child turned twelve years of age and the child
was returned to foster care; and
(d) The child must be at least twelve years old at the time the
petition is filed. Upon the child's motion for good cause shown, or on
its own motion, the court may hear a petition filed by a child younger
than twelve years old.
(2) If the child is eligible to petition the juvenile court under
subsection (1) of this section and a parent whose rights have been
previously terminated contacts the department or supervising agency or
the child's guardian ad litem regarding reinstatement, the department
or supervising agency or the guardian ad litem must notify the eligible
child about his or her right to petition for reinstatement of parental
rights.
(3) A child seeking to petition under this section shall be
provided counsel at no cost to the child.
(4) The petition must be signed by the child in the absence of a
showing of good cause as to why the child could not do so.
(5) If, after a threshold hearing to consider the parent's apparent
fitness and interest in reinstatement of parental rights, the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the best interests of the
child may be served by reinstatement of parental rights, the juvenile
court shall order that a hearing on the merits of the petition be held.
(6) The court shall give prior notice for any proceeding under this
section, or cause prior notice to be given, to the department or the
supervising agency, the child's attorney, and the child. The court
shall also order the department or supervising agency to give prior
notice of any hearing to the child's former parent whose parental
rights are the subject of the petition, any parent whose rights have
not been terminated, the child's current foster parent, relative
caregiver, guardian or custodian, and the child's tribe, if applicable.
(7) The juvenile court shall conditionally grant the petition if it
finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child has not achieved
his or her permanency plan and is not likely to imminently achieve his
or her permanency plan and that reinstatement of parental rights is in
the child's best interest. In determining whether reinstatement is in
the child's best interest the court shall consider, but is not limited
to, the following:
(a) Whether the parent whose rights are to be reinstated is a fit
parent and has remedied his or her deficits as provided in the record
of the prior termination proceedings and prior termination order;
(b) The age and maturity of the child, and the ability of the child
to express his or her preference;
(c) Whether the reinstatement of parental rights will present a
risk to the child's health, welfare, or safety; and
(d) Other material changes in circumstances, if any, that may have
occurred which warrant the granting of the petition.
(8) In determining whether the child has or has not achieved his or
her permanency plan or whether the child is likely to achieve his or
her permanency plan, the department or supervising agency shall provide
the court, and the court shall review, information related to any
efforts to achieve the permanency plan including efforts to achieve
adoption or a permanent guardianship.
(9)(a) If the court conditionally grants the petition under
subsection (7) of this section, the case will be continued for six
months and a temporary order of reinstatement entered. During this
period, the child shall be placed in the custody of the parent. The
department or supervising agency shall develop a permanency plan for
the child reflecting the plan to be reunification and shall provide
transition services to the family as appropriate.
(b) If the child must be removed from the parent due to abuse or
neglect allegations prior to the expiration of the conditional six-month period, the court shall dismiss the petition for reinstatement of
parental rights if the court finds the allegations have been proven by
a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) If the child has been successfully placed with the parent for
six months, the court order reinstating parental rights remains in
effect and the court shall dismiss the dependency.
(10) After the child has been placed with the parent for six
months, the court shall hold a hearing. If the placement with the
parent has been successful, the court shall enter a final order of
reinstatement of parental rights, which shall restore all rights,
powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent
as to the child, including those relating to custody, control, and
support of the child. The court shall dismiss the dependency and
direct the clerk's office to provide a certified copy of the final
order of reinstatement of parental rights to the parent at no cost.
(11) The granting of the petition under this section does not
vacate or otherwise affect the validity of the original termination
order.
(12) Any parent whose rights are reinstated under this section
shall not be liable for any child support owed to the department
pursuant to RCW 13.34.160 or Title 26 RCW or costs of other services
provided to a child for the time period from the date of termination of
parental rights to the date parental rights are reinstated.
(13) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights is a separate action
from the termination of parental rights proceeding and does not vacate
the original termination of parental rights. An order granted under
this section reinstates the parental rights to the child. This
reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the parent and
child have changed since the time of the termination of parental rights
and reunification is now appropriate.
(14) This section is retroactive and applies to any child who is
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court at the time of the hearing
regardless of the date parental rights were terminated.
(15) The state, the department, the supervising agency, and its
employees are not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in the provision of services under this section, unless the
act or omission constitutes gross negligence. This section does not
create any duty and shall not be construed to create a duty where none
exists. This section does not create a cause of action against the
state, the department, the supervising agency, or its employees
concerning the original termination.

--- END ---