BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96A.090 and 2005 c 70 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing standards for
approved treatment programs, the process for the review and inspection
program applying to the department for certification as an approved
treatment program, and fixing the fees to be charged by the department
for the required inspections. The standards may concern the health
standards to be met and standards of services and treatment to be
afforded patients.
(2) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify
an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the
provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this
chapter. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(3) No treatment program may advertise or represent itself as an
approved treatment program if approval has not been granted, has been
denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.
(4) A treatment program certified for assessment services must use
one of the validated assessment tools recommended by the alcohol and
drug abuse institute established by the University of Washington. The
tool must be validated for the type of assessment to be provided and
must be validated for adults or youth, as appropriate.
(5) Certification as an approved treatment program is effective for
one calendar year from the date of issuance of the certificate. The
certification shall specify the types of services provided by the
approved treatment program that meet the standards adopted under this
chapter. Renewal of certification shall be made in accordance with
this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards
set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.
(((5))) (6) Approved treatment programs shall not provide
alcoholism or other drug addiction treatment services for which the
approved treatment program has not been certified. Approved treatment
programs may provide services for which approval has been sought and is
pending, if approval for the services has not been previously revoked
or denied.
(((6))) (7) The department periodically shall inspect approved
public and private treatment programs at reasonable times and in a
reasonable manner.
(((7))) (8) The department shall maintain and periodically publish
a current list of approved treatment programs.
(((8))) (9) Each approved treatment program shall file with the
department on request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the
department reasonably requires. An approved treatment program that
without good cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or
information as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may be
removed from the list of approved treatment programs, and its
certification revoked or suspended.
(((9))) (10) The department shall use the data provided in
subsection (((8))) (9) of this section to evaluate each program that
admits children to inpatient treatment upon application of their
parents. The evaluation shall be done at least once every twelve
months. In addition, the department shall randomly select and review
the information on individual children who are admitted on application
of the child's parent for the purpose of determining whether the child
was appropriately placed into treatment based on an objective
evaluation of the child's condition and the outcome of the child's
treatment.
(((10))) (11) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing
held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may
issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing
him or her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the
books and accounts of, any approved public or private treatment program
refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the department or
which the department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in
violation of this chapter.
(((11))) (12)(a) All approved opiate substitution treatment
programs that provide services to women who are pregnant are required
to disseminate up-to-date and accurate health education information to
all their pregnant clients concerning the possible addiction and health
risks that their opiate substitution treatment may have on their baby.
All pregnant clients must also be advised of the risks to both them and
their baby associated with not remaining on the opiate substitute
program. The information must be provided to these clients both
verbally and in writing. The health education information provided to
the pregnant clients must include referral options for the addicted
baby.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that require all opiate
treatment programs to educate all pregnant women in their program on
the benefits and risks of methadone treatment to their fetus before
they are provided these medications, as part of their addiction
treatment. The department shall meet the requirements under this
subsection within the appropriations provided for opiate treatment
programs. The department, working with treatment providers and medical
experts, shall develop and disseminate the educational materials to all
certified opiate treatment programs.

--- END ---