BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.66.030 and 2005 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must establish a regional mobility
grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to aid local
governments and public institutions of higher education in funding
projects such as intercounty connectivity service, park and ride lots,
rush hour transit service, and capital projects that improve the
connectivity and efficiency of our transportation system. The
department ((shall)) must identify cost-effective projects that reduce
delay for people and goods and improve connectivity between counties
and regional population centers. The department ((shall)) must submit
a prioritized list of all projects requesting funding to the
legislature by December 1st of each year.
(2) The department may establish an advisory committee to carry out
the mandates of this chapter.
(3) The department must report annually to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the status of any grants projects
funded by the program created under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.030 and 2005 c 336 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative
authority of a county, city, or district may fix and impose a parking
tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking business within its
respective jurisdiction. A city or county may impose the tax only to
the extent that it has not been imposed by the district, and a district
may impose the tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by
a city or county. The jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of this
section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county. The
jurisdiction of a city or district includes only the area within its
boundaries.
(2)(a) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a
city, a county in its unincorporated area, or a district may fix and
impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a
facility operated by a commercial parking business.
(b) The city, county, or district may provide that:
(((a))) (i) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor
vehicle;
(((b))) (ii) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is
paid, whether paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease
of nonresidential space;
(((c))) (iii) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility
and remitted to the city, county, or district;
(((d))) (iv) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the
parking charge;
(((e))) (v) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the
facility, the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the
type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and
(((f))) (vi) Tax exempt carpools((,)); vehicles ((with handicapped
decals,)) displaying a valid person with disability parking permit; or
government vehicles are exempt from the tax.
(3) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means
the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor
vehicles.
(4) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls
available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.
(5) The county, city, or district levying the tax provided for in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for its payment on a
monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local government may develop
by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the tax, including
provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses, collection,
and enforcement.
(6) The proceeds of the commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by
a city or county under subsection (1) or (2) of this section ((shall))
must be used for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW
82.80.070 or for transportation improvements in accordance with chapter
36.73 RCW. The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a district must
be used as provided in chapter 36.120 RCW.
(7) If a public institution of higher education has an active
commute trip reduction program as identified in RCW 70.94.531, a
county, city, or district imposing a tax under this section to which
parking at the institution is subject, must provide exemptions from the
tax imposed in this section in an amount equal to or more than the
amount invested by such institution in the commute trip reduction
program.

--- END ---