BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.162.005 and 2007 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that ((Washington's innovation and trade-driven economy has provided tremendous opportunities for citizens of
the state, but that there is no guarantee that globally competitive
firms will continue to grow and locate in the state. The current
economic development system is fragmented among numerous programs,
councils, centers, and organizations with inadequate overall
coordination and insufficient guidance built into the system to ensure
that the system is responsive to its customers. The current economic
development system's data-gathering and evaluation methods are
inconsistent and unable to provide adequate information for determining
how well the system is performing on a regular basis so the system may
be held accountable for its outcomes.
The legislature also finds that developing a comprehensive economic
development strategic plan to guide the operation of effective economic
development programs, including workforce training, infrastructure
development, small business assistance, technology transfer, and export
assistance, is vital to the state's efforts to increase the
competitiveness of state businesses, encourage employment growth,
increase state revenues, and generate economic well-being. There is a
need for responsive and consistent involvement of the private sector in
the state's economic development efforts. The legislature finds that
there is a need for the development of coordination criteria for
business recruitment, expansion, and retention activities carried out
by the state and local entities. It is the intent of the legislature))
in order to achieve long-term global competitiveness, prosperity, and
economic opportunity for all the state's citizens, Washington state
must become the most attractive, creative, and fertile investment
environment for innovation in the world.
(2) The legislature finds that the state must take a strategic
approach to fostering an innovation economy, and that success will be
driven by public and private sector leaders who are committed to
developing and advocating a shared vision and collaborating across
organizational and geographic boundaries. The legislature therefore
intends to create an economic development commission that will provide
planning, coordination, evaluation, monitoring, and policy analysis and
development for the state economic development system as a whole, and
advice to the governor and legislature concerning the state economic
development system.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.162.010 and 2007 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to ((oversee the economic development strategies and
policies of the department of community, trade, and economic
development)) assist the governor and legislature by providing
leadership, direction, and guidance on a long-term and systematic
approach to economic development that will result in enduring global
competitiveness, prosperity, and economic opportunity for all the
state's citizens.
(2)(a) The ((Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of eleven voting members)) commission consists of twenty-three
members. Fifteen of the members must be voting members appointed by
the governor as follows: ((Six)) Eight representatives of the private
sector, one representative of labor from east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains and one representative of labor from west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains, one representative of port districts,
one representative of four-year state public higher education, one
representative ((for)) of state community or technical colleges, one
representative of nonprofit trade associations engaged in economic
development, and one representative of associate development
organizations. The director of the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce, the director of the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the commissioner of the
employment security department, the secretary of the department of
transportation, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate
overseeing economic development policies ((shall)) must serve as
nonvoting ex officio members.
(b) Members may not designate alternates, substitutes, or
surrogates. However, members may participate in a meeting by
conference telephone or similar communications equipment so that all
persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same
time. Participation by that method constitutes presence in person at
a meeting.
(c) The chair of the commission ((shall)) must be a private sector
voting member selected by the governor with the consent of the senate,
and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. ((In selecting the
chair, the governor shall seek a person who understands the future
economic needs of the state and nation and the role the state's
economic development system has in meeting those needs.
(b))) A vice chair must be elected by members of the commission but
may not be the director of an executive branch agency or a member of
the legislature. The vice chair must exercise the duties of the
commission chair in his or her absence.
(d) In making the appointments, the governor ((shall)) must consult
with the commission and with organizations that have an interest in
economic development, including, but not limited to, industry
associations, labor organizations, minority business associations,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, port associations,
tribes, and the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction
over economic development.
(((c))) (e) The members ((shall)) must be representative of the
geographic regions of the state, including eastern and central
Washington, as well as represent the ethnic diversity of the state.
Private sector members ((shall)) must represent existing and emerging
industries, small businesses, women-owned businesses, and minority-owned businesses. Members of the commission ((shall)) must serve
statewide interests while preserving their diverse perspectives, and
((shall)) must be recognized leaders in their fields with demonstrated
experience in economic development, innovation, or disciplines related
to economic development.
(3) Members appointed by the governor ((shall)) serve at the
pleasure of the governor for not more than two consecutive three-year
terms, except that, as determined by the governor, the terms of four of
the appointees on the commission on the effective date of this section
expire in 2012, the terms of four of the appointees on the commission
on the effective date of this section expire in 2013, and the terms of
three of the appointees on the commission on the effective date of this
section expire in 2014. Thereafter all terms are for three years.
Vacancies must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments.
(4) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(5) The executive director of the commission ((shall)) must be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the ((voting members of
the)) commission. The salary of the executive director must be set by
the governor with the consent of the commission. The governor may
dismiss the executive director only with the approval of a majority
vote of the commission. The commission, by a majority vote, may
dismiss the executive director with the approval of the governor. The
commission must evaluate the performance of the executive director in
a manner consistent with the process used by the governor to evaluate
the performance of agency directors.
(6) The commission may adopt ((rules)) policies and procedures for
its own governance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, "commission" means the Washington state economic
development commission created under RCW 43.162.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.162.015 and 2007 c 232 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The commission shall employ an executive director.)) The
executive director ((shall serve as chief executive officer of the
commission and shall)) of the commission must serve as its chief
executive officer. Subject to available resources and in accordance
with commission direction, the executive director must:
(a) Administer the provisions of this chapter, employ such
personnel as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter, utilize staff of existing operating agencies to the fullest
extent possible, and employ outside consulting and service agencies
when appropriate((.
(2) The executive director may not be the chair of the commission.
(3) The executive director shall));
(b) Appoint necessary staff who ((shall be)) are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The executive director's appointees
((shall)) serve at the executive director's pleasure on such terms and
conditions as the executive director determines but subject to chapter
42.52 RCW.
(((4) The executive director shall appoint and employ such other
employees as may be required for the proper discharge of the functions
of the commission.
(5))) The executive director must implement a hiring process for a
research manager responsible for managing the evaluation functions
under RCW 43.162.020. By October 1, 2011, the executive director must
make a recommendation to the commission on a qualified candidate to
fill the research manager position. The commission is responsible for
making the final decision on hiring the research manager;
(c) Appoint employees who are subject to the provisions of chapter
41.06 RCW; and
(d) Contract with additional persons who have specific technical
expertise if needed to carry out a specific, time-limited project.
(2) The executive director ((shall exercise such additional
powers)) must exercise additional authority, other than rule making, as
may be delegated by the commission.
(3) The executive director must develop for commission review and
approval an annual commission budget and work plan in accordance with
the omnibus appropriations bill approved by the legislature, and must
present a fiscal report to the commission quarterly for its review and
comment.
(4) The executive director of the commission must report solely to
the governor and the commissioners on matters pertaining to commission
operations.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.162.020 and 2009 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The Washington state economic development commission shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination,
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's economic development system using, but not limited to, the
"Next Washington" plan and the global competitiveness council
recommendations;
(2) Develop and maintain on a biennial basis a state comprehensive
plan for economic development, including but not limited to goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state economic development system;
identify the elements local associate development organizations must
include in their countywide economic development plans; and review the
state system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. The
plan shall)) (1) The commission must concentrate its major efforts on
strategic planning, policy research and analysis, advocacy, evaluation,
and promoting coordination and collaboration.
(2) During each regular legislative session, the commission must
consult with appropriate legislative committees about the state's
economic development needs and opportunities.
(3)(a) By January 31st of each odd-numbered year, the commission
must submit to the governor and legislature a biennial comprehensive
statewide economic development strategy with a report on progress from
the previous comprehensive strategy.
(b) The comprehensive statewide economic development strategy must
include the industry clusters in the state and the strategic clusters
targeted by the commission for economic development efforts. The
commission ((shall)) must consult with the workforce training and
education coordinating board and include labor market and economic
information by the employment security department in developing the
list of clusters and strategic clusters that meet the criteria
identified by the working group convened by the economic development
commission and the workforce training and education coordinating board
under chapter 43.330 RCW.
(4)(a) In developing the ((state comprehensive plan for economic
development)) comprehensive statewide economic development strategy,
the commission ((shall)) must use, but may not be limited to:
Economic, labor market, and populations trend reports in office of
financial management forecasts; the annual state economic climate
report prepared by the economic climate council; joint office of
financial management and employment security department labor force,
industry employment, and occupational forecasts; the results of
scientifically based outcome evaluations; the needs of industry
associations, industry clusters, businesses, and employees as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input((;
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state economic development system and related state programs; perform
a biennial assessment of the ongoing and strategic economic development
needs of the state; and assess the extent to which the economic
development system and related programs represent a consistent,
coordinated, efficient, and integrated approach to meet such needs; and
(4) Produce a biennial report to the governor and the legislature
on progress by the commission in coordinating the state's economic
development system and meeting the other obligations of this chapter,
as well as include recommendations for any statutory changes necessary
to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination.
The commission may delegate to the executive director any of the
functions of this section)).
(b) The comprehensive statewide economic development strategy may
include:
(i) An assessment of the state's economic vitality;
(ii) Recommended goals, objectives, and priorities for the next
biennium, and the future;
(iii) A common set of outcomes and benchmarks for the economic
development system as a whole;
(iv) Recommendations for removing barriers and promoting
collaboration among participants in the innovation ecosystem;
(v) An inventory of existing relevant programs compiled by the
commission from materials submitted by agencies;
(vi) Recommendations for expanding, discontinuing, or redirecting
existing programs, or adding new programs; and
(vii) Recommendations of best practices and public and private
sector roles in implementing the comprehensive statewide economic
development strategy.
(5) In developing the biennial statewide economic development
strategy and the annual update required under this section, the
commission must consult, collaborate, and coordinate with relevant
state agencies, private sector businesses, nonprofit organizations
involved in economic development, trade associations, and relevant
local organizations in order to avoid duplication of effort.
(6) State agencies must cooperate with the commission and provide
information as the commission may reasonably request.
(7) The commission must develop a biennial budget request for
approval by the office of financial management. The commission must
adopt an annual budget and work plan in accordance with the omnibus
appropriations bill approved by the legislature.
(8) Of state appropriated funds for the operation of the
commission, the state agency serving as the commission's fiscal agent
may use no more than ten percent of funds appropriated for commission
personnel costs and no more than three percent of funds in the
Washington state economic development commission account to cover
administrative expenses.
(9)(a) The commission and its fiscal agent must jointly develop and
adopt a memorandum of understanding to outline and establish clear
lines of authority and responsibility between them related to budget
and administrative services.
(b) The memorandum of understanding may not provide any additional
grant of authorities to the commission or the fiscal agent that is not
already provided for by statute, nor diminish any authorities or powers
granted to either party by statute.
(c) Periodically, but not less often than biannually, the
commission and fiscal agent must review the memorandum of understanding
and, if necessary, recommend changes to the other party.
(d) As provided generally under RCW 43.162.015, the executive
director of the commission must report solely to the governor and the
commissioners on matters pertaining to commission operations.
(10) To maintain its objectivity and concentration on strategic
planning, policy research and analysis, and evaluation, the commission
may not take an administrative role in the delivery of services.
However, subject to available resources and consistent with its work
plan, the commission or the executive director may conduct outreach
activities such as regional forums and best practices seminars.
(11) The commission must evaluate its own performance on a regular
basis.
(12) The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program, or any private source, and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.162.025 and 2007 c 232 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to available funds, the Washington state economic
development commission may:
(((1))) (a) Periodically review for consistency with the state
comprehensive plan for economic development the policies and plans
established for:
(((a))) (i) Business and technical assistance by the small business
development center, the Washington manufacturing service, the
Washington technology center, associate development organizations, the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce,
and the office of minority and women-owned business enterprises;
(((b))) (ii) Export assistance by the small business export finance
assistance center, the international marketing program for agricultural
commodities and trade, the department of agriculture, the center for
international trade in forest products, associate development
organizations, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce; and
(((c))) (iii) Infrastructure development by the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce and the
department of transportation;
(((2))) (b) Review and make recommendations to the office of
financial management and the legislature on budget requests and
legislative proposals relating to the state economic development system
for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan for
economic development;
(((3) Provide for coordination among the different agencies,
organizations, and components of the state economic development system
at the state level and at the regional level;
(4) Advocate for the state economic development system and for
meeting the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees;
(5) Identify partners and)) (c) In collaboration with the
department of commerce and other partners, develop a plan ((to
develop)) for a consistent and reliable database on participation
rates, costs, program activities, and outcomes from publicly funded
economic development programs in this state by ((January 1, 2011.))
October 1, 2012;
(((a) In coordination with the development of the database,)) (i)
By October 1, 2012, the commission ((shall)) must establish standards
for data collection and maintenance for providers in the economic
development system in a format that is accessible to use by the
commission. The commission ((shall)) must require a minimum of common
core data to be collected by each entity providing economic development
services with public funds and shall develop requirements for minimum
common core data in consultation with the economic climate council, the
office of financial management, and the providers of economic
development services;
(((b))) (ii) The commission ((shall)) must establish minimum common
standards and metrics for program evaluation of economic development
programs, and monitor such program evaluations; and
(((c))) (iii) The commission ((shall)) must, beginning no later
than January 1, ((2012)) 2014, periodically administer, based on a
schedule established by the commission, scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state economic development system including, but not
limited to, surveys of industry associations, industry cluster
associations, and businesses served by publicly funded economic
development programs; matches with employment security department
payroll and wage files; and matches with department of revenue tax
files; and
(((6))) (d) Evaluate proposals for expenditure from the economic
development strategic reserve account and recommend expenditures from
the account.
((The commission may delegate to the director any of the functions
of this section.)) (2) The governor or legislature may direct the
commission, from time to time, to undertake additional research and
policy analysis, assessments, or other special projects related to its
mission.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.162.030 and 2007 c 232 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Creation of the ((Washington state economic development))
commission ((shall)) may not be construed to modify any authority or
budgetary responsibility of the governor or the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, grants,
donations, sponsorships, or contributions under RCW 43.162.020 must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
Washington state economic development commission only for purposes
related to carrying out the mission, roles, and responsibilities of the
commission.
(2) Whenever any money, from the federal government or from other
sources, that was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature, has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the executive director must use the
unanticipated receipts process as provided in RCW 43.79.270 to request
authority to spend the money.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp
s c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c
145 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state economic development commission account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---