BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the hard work
and dedication of the mathematics advisory panel, the mathematics
consultants hired by the state board of education, and the members and
staff of the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction in revising the state mathematics
learning standards, which were finalized in 2008. External third-party
evaluations and national comparisons have identified Washington's new
mathematics learning standards as among the highest quality in the
nation. Over the last two biennia, the state and school districts have
invested millions of dollars in providing professional development for
teachers, developing and aligning curriculum, and purchasing more
aligned textbooks and materials. Teachers and students have been
preparing for new mathematics assessments that are also aligned with
the standards and will be required for high school graduation starting
with the class of 2013.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that any change to the state's
learning standards in mathematics in the short term would be highly
inefficient and disruptive for the school system, staff, and students
alike. The legislature further finds that the current budget situation
for both the state and local school districts precludes spending
precious resources on making additional, unnecessary changes in
learning standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.071 and 2010 c 235 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By August 2, 2010)) No earlier than July 1, 2013, the
superintendent of public instruction may revise the state essential
academic learning requirements authorized under RCW 28A.655.070 for
mathematics, reading, writing, and communication by ((provisionally))
adopting a common set of standards for students in grades kindergarten
through twelve. The revised state essential academic learning
requirements may be substantially identical with the standards
developed by a multistate consortium in which Washington participated,
must be consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.655.070, and may
include additional standards if the additional standards do not exceed
fifteen percent of the standards for each content area. However, the
superintendent of public instruction shall not take steps to implement
the ((provisionally)) adopted standards ((until the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate have an
opportunity to review the standards)) before July 1, 2013.
(2) By January 1, ((2011)) 2013, the superintendent of public
instruction shall submit to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate((:
(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards
and the state essential academic learning requirements as of June 10,
2010, including the comparative level of rigor and specificity of the
standards and the implications of any identified differences; and
(b))) an estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school
districts to implement the ((provisionally)) adopted standards,
including providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum,
adjustment of state assessments, and other actions.
(3) If the 2013 legislature determines that the superintendent of
public instruction has shown that implementation of the common set of
standards under this section is prudent and beneficial for students and
the citizens of the state, the superintendent may implement the
revisions to the essential academic learning requirements under this
section after ((the 2011 legislative session unless otherwise
directed)) July 1, 2013, if so authorized by the legislature.

--- END ---