BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to promote a safe
learning environment and to protect the safety and welfare of all
students and school personnel as well as maintain order and discipline
in the schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.230 and 1999 c 167 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A school resource officer, school principal, vice principal, or
principal's designee may search a student, the student's possessions
and personal effects, ((and)) the student's locker and desk, and the
student's motor vehicle, in school facilities or on school grounds, or
at any school-sponsored or school-associated activity, if the school
resource officer, principal, vice principal, or principal's designee
has reasonable grounds to suspect that the search will yield evidence
of the student's violation of the law or school rules. A search is
mandatory if there are reasonable grounds to suspect a student has
illegally possessed a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.280.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the scope
of the search is proper if the search is conducted as follows:
(a) The methods used are reasonably related to the objectives of
the search; and
(b) Is not excessively intrusive in light of the age and sex of the
student and the nature of the suspected infraction.
(3) A school resource officer, principal, or vice principal, or
anyone acting under ((their)) the principal's or vice principal's
direction, may not subject a student to a strip search or body cavity
search as those terms are defined in RCW 10.79.070.
(4) Authorized school resource officers may confiscate any
contraband discovered in a search under this section.

--- END ---