BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
agriculture industry is vital to the health and well-being of the state
and its residents. This industry employs one hundred sixty thousand
persons, has an economic value of thirty-eight billion dollars, and
represents twelve percent of the state's economy. Additionally, the
legislature recognizes that the agricultural community has a deeply
vested interest in protecting the natural functions of the land, as
clean water and a healthy environment are essential to the community's
livelihood.
The legislature finds also that agricultural production has been
decreasing in recent years and that many production and production-related businesses have either closed or relocated to other locations
with more favorable regulatory environments. These trends are
especially troubling, as the agriculture industry provides fresh and
nutritious foods for our residents and prevents Washingtonians from
relying upon products produced in other states and nations.
The growth management act recognizes the importance of having
agricultural activities on lands throughout the state. The act
currently regulates agricultural land differently than critical areas
because of the importance of the agriculture industry to all Washington
residents. The legislature affirms that the Washington state
department of agriculture is properly recognized as the state agency
that should address concerns related to agricultural activity.
The legislature further finds that twelve state agencies and twelve
federal agencies have jurisdiction over agricultural activities.
Additionally, water quality is regulated by five state agencies and two
federal agencies. Because of the current regulatory regime and the
importance to our economy of continued prosperous agricultural
activities, the legislature finds there is a need to prevent another
layer of regulation being placed upon agricultural activities when they
occur on lands designated as critical areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in
effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each county
and city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical
areas that are required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be adopted on or before
September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such
development regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992.
(b) Development regulations that protect critical areas may not
apply to areas upon which agricultural activities occur. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(b), "agricultural activities" has the same
meaning as defined in section 3 of this act.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter authorizes a county or city to cause an
agricultural activity to cease.
(2) For purposes of this section, "agricultural activity" or
"agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant for any reason; conducting
agricultural operations; maintaining, repairing, and replacing
agricultural facilities, when the replacement facility is no closer to
a critical area than the original facility or in substantially the same
location as the original; and maintaining agricultural lands under
production or cultivation.

--- END ---