BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
grants provided under section 2 of this act.
(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September,
December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural
mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand
dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a rural mobility grant program.
The purpose of the grant program is to aid small cities and rural
areas, as identified in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2008"
published by the department or subsequent versions published by the
department.
(a) Fifty percent of the money appropriated for the rural mobility
grant program must go to noncompetitive grants that must be distributed
to the transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) Fifty percent of the money appropriated for the rural mobility
grant program must go to competitive grants to providers of rural
mobility service in areas not served or underserved by transit
agencies.
(2) The department may establish an advisory committee to carry out
the mandates of this section.
(3) The department must report annually to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the status of any grants projects
funded by the program created under this section.
(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the department shall,
with money appropriated for the competitive grants program under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, implement a pilot project to provide
agricultural workers with enhanced transit opportunities through the
establishment of one or more vanpool programs. The pilot project must,
at a minimum, provide appropriate vehicles, insurance, and maintenance,
and may charge an appropriate fee, as determined by the department, to
the riders in a vanpool.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route
number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---