BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. (1) The intent of this chapter is
to protect the fairness of elections for the highest court in
Washington state - the supreme court. Doing so will foster the
public's trust in the integrity and independence of the court in the
face of increasingly large sums of money raised and spent by special
interest groups. That flood of money threatens the impartiality,
independence, and credibility of the judiciary. To maintain public
confidence in the judiciary, we must prevent not only corruption, but
the appearance of corruption, for the judiciary is the one branch of
government that must be uniquely impartial, independent, and unbiased
in order to best serve the residents of Washington. It is destructive
for our democracy to allow the court to become influenced by large
amounts of money, and for citizens to think that judicial decisions are
influenced by those large amounts of money. This chapter is necessary
to ensure that the state's highest courts continue to be unbiased and
insulated from special interests.
(2) Therefore, this chapter, the judicial election reform act,
introduces a program to provide an alternative source of financing
candidates for the Washington supreme court who demonstrate public
support and voluntarily accept strict fund-raising and spending limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. In addition to the definitions
in RCW 42.17A.005, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contested election" means an election in which there are two
or more candidates running for the same office whose names will appear
on the ballot.
(2) "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate for supreme
court justice who is on the ballot but has chosen not to apply for
public funds from the judicial election reform act fund or a candidate
who is on the ballot and has applied but has not been certified to
receive public funds from the judicial election reform act fund.
(3) "Publicly financed candidate" means a candidate who becomes
certified to receive public campaign funds under section 6 of this act.
(4) "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution in an amount of
at least ten dollars, but no more than twenty-five percent of the
maximum contribution limit allowed under RCW 42.17A.410, made by a
registered voter of the state, and that is received during the
qualifying period.
(5) "Qualifying period" means the period beginning February 1st of
the election year and ending thirty days after the close of the regular
filing period for the office.
(6) "Uncontested election" means an election in which a candidate
running for a specified office has no opponent on the ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 JUDICIAL ELECTION REFORM ACT FUND. (1) The
judicial election reform act fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts under this chapter required to be
deposited into the fund must be deposited into the fund. Expenditures
from the fund may be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Only
the commission may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) When the funds in the account have been fully distributed, the
commission and the treasurer must cease making any public funds
disbursements under section 11 of this act. No candidate may receive
any disbursement of funds beyond those authorized under section 11 of
this act, nor may any candidate receive any further disbursements of
funds under section 11 of this act when the fund has been exhausted.
The commission may adopt rules to address distribution of remaining
funds in the account for pending requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 VOLUNTARY LIMITATIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS FOR
JUDICIAL CAMPAIGNS. A publicly financed candidate and a publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee shall:
(1) Only accept contributions from individuals, and only as
qualifying contributions under section 5 of this act;
(2) During the qualifying period and solely for the purpose of
raising qualifying contributions, accept no more than two times the
contribution limit under RCW 42.17A.410 of the candidate's personal
funds;
(3) Collect at least three hundred fifty qualifying contributions
that, in the aggregate, total at least twenty-five times the filing fee
for the office of supreme court justice in accordance with section 5 of
this act;
(4) File the required reports regarding qualifying and expenditures
to the commission;
(5) Sign a joint statement with the treasurer of the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee, under oath, promising to
comply with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 42.17A RCW; and
(6) Comply with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 42.17A
RCW to the extent required for publicly funded candidates as prescribed
by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION. A candidate
who wishes to receive public campaign funds must:
(1) File an application with the commission declaring his or her
intent to participate in the program as a candidate for the supreme
court. The application must be filed before or during the qualifying
period. In the application, the candidate must affirm that only one
political committee, identified with its treasurer, must handle all
contributions, expenditures, and obligations for the publicly financed
candidate and that the candidate will comply with the provisions in
this chapter and rules adopted by the commission; and
(2) Obtain at least three hundred fifty qualifying contributions
that, in the aggregate, total at least twenty-five times the filing fee
for the office by the end of the qualifying period. No payment, gift,
or anything of value may be given in exchange for a qualifying
contribution. A qualifying contribution must be:
(a) Made by a registered voter of the state;
(b) Made by a person who is not given anything of value in exchange
for the qualifying contribution;
(c) In an amount of at least ten dollars but not more than twenty-five percent of the contribution limit allowed under RCW 42.17A.410;
(d) Received during the qualifying period by the candidate or on
behalf of the candidate; and
(e) Made by check, money order, or credit card.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CERTIFICATION AS A PUBLICLY FINANCED
CANDIDATE. (1) Upon receipt of an application, the commission must
determine whether or not the candidate has complied with the following
requirements:
(a) Signed and filed an application to participate;
(b) Submitted a report itemizing the qualifying contributions
received. The report must include the name, home address, telephone
number, and county of residence for each person who made a contribution
and the date the contribution was received, and any other information
required by the commission;
(c) Submitted a check or money order equal to the total qualifying
contributions, less money expended for the purpose of raising
qualifying contributions received by the candidate in accordance with
section 7 of this act, made out to the judicial election reform act
fund; and
(d) Submitted affidavits signed by persons collecting qualifying
contributions stating that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the
contribution was made by a registered voter of the state.
(2) Once the requirements in subsection (1) of this section are
met, the commission must verify that a sufficient number of qualifying
contributions were made by registered voters of the state at the time
the contribution was made.
(3) The commission must determine if a candidate meets the
requirements for public financing within seven calendar days of the
filing of an application. If the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section are met, the commission must certify the candidate for
public financing. If the commission denies certification, it must
provide written reasons why certification is denied. Any candidate who
is denied certification may reapply one time by submitting the required
information or the number of qualifying contributions needed to
complete the certification within fourteen calendar days of the date of
the commission's decision.
(4) A candidate who is certified as a publicly financed candidate
may use that designation in campaign materials and will be so
designated in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 QUALIFYING CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) A publicly
financed candidate may expend money received as qualifying
contributions, as well as the candidate's personal funds, to pay for
expenses related to raising qualifying contributions. The amount of
qualifying contributions used for this purpose may not exceed fifty
percent of the minimum dollar amount of qualifying contributions
required under section 5 of this act. Expenditures made for the
purpose of this section must be reported as required under RCW
42.17A.235 and 42.17A.240 or as determined by the commission by rule.
(2) If a candidate attempts to qualify for public funding but does
not meet the threshold for qualification, withdraws from the program
before certification, is denied certification under section 6 of this
act, or revokes participation under section 10 of this act, the
candidate may keep the total dollar amount of qualifying contributions
received during the qualifying period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CONTROLS ON A PUBLICLY FINANCED CANDIDATE'S
AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE. A publicly financed candidate and the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee must file the reports
required pursuant to this chapter as determined by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 USES OF PUBLIC FUNDS. (1) Money in the
account of a publicly financed candidate's authorized committee may
only be used for purposes directly related to the candidate's campaign.
(2) Money in the account of a publicly financed candidate's
authorized committee may not be used to pay fines or civil penalties,
for costs or legal fees related to representation before the
commission, or for defense of an enforcement action under this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter prevents a publicly financed candidate from
having a legal defense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REVOCATION. (1) A publicly financed
candidate may revoke in writing to the commission a decision to
participate in the public financing program no later than thirty days
after the end of the qualifying period in the year of the election.
After a timely revocation, that candidate may accept and expend money
outside the provisions of this act. Within thirty days after
revocation, a candidate must return to the commission all money
received under section 11 of this act.
(2) A publicly financed candidate who revokes a decision to
participate in the public financing program after the time period
established in subsection (1) of this section must return all money
received under section 11 of this act and pay a fine of one thousand
dollars per day for each day beyond the allowed revocation period and
the day the candidate revokes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAMPAIGN FUNDING. (1)(a) Within five
business days after a publicly financed candidate's name is approved to
appear on the primary ballot by the appropriate elections officer, the
commission must authorize the state treasurer to distribute to the
account of the authorized committee of each certified publicly financed
candidate an amount equal to one hundred times the filing fee as
established in RCW 29A.24.091 for the primary.
(b) Within five business days after a publicly financed candidate's
name is approved to appear on the general election ballot, the
commission must authorize the state treasurer to distribute funds to
the account of the authorized committee of each certified publicly
financed candidate in an amount equal to one hundred twenty-five times
the filing fee for the office as established in RCW 29A.24.091.
(c) Participating candidates in uncontested elections must receive
four times the filing fee as established in RCW 29A.24.091, plus the
net amount of qualifying contributions previously remitted to the
commission pursuant to section 6 of this act.
(2) A publicly financed candidate must return within ten calendar
days to the judicial election reform act fund any amount distributed
for an election that is unspent and uncommitted as of the date the
candidate ceases to be a candidate or as of the date of the election,
whichever occurs first.
(3) The commission must authorize and the state treasurer must
distribute funds to publicly financed candidates in a manner that
ensures accountability and safeguards the integrity of the fund.
(4) The commission has the authority to increase or decrease the
amount of funds authorized under this section depending on the amount
of money in the fund, the number of candidates applying to the program,
the number of contested races, and other reasons deemed to be pertinent
for funding participating candidates. The commission shall adopt rules
to implement procedures under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 REPORTS. (1)(a) Any nonparticipating
candidate who has a publicly financed opponent must report total
contributions received to the commission electronically within twenty-four hours after the total amount of contributions received exceeds
eighty percent of the amount authorized for publicly financed
candidates under section 11 of this act, and must make subsequent
reports as required by the commission to monitor contributions.
(b) Any person making independent expenditures or electioneering
communications in excess of three thousand dollars in support of or
opposition to a publicly financed candidate, or in support of a
candidate opposing a publicly financed candidate, must file a report
with the commission within twenty-four hours of the date the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is contracted
for, agreed to, or otherwise obligated. The report must include the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the sponsor;
(ii) The source of funds for the independent expenditure or
electioneering communication;
(iii) Any other source information required by the commission by
rule;
(iv) The name and address of the person to whom the independent
expenditure or electioneering communication expenditure was made;
(v) A detailed description of the expenditure;
(vi) The date the expenditure was contracted for, agreed to, or
otherwise obligated;
(vii) The amount of the expenditure; and
(viii) Any other information the commission may require.
(c) The commission may adopt rules implementing the provisions of
this section, including rules that determine whether filing under this
section satisfies the filing requirements under other provisions of
this chapter and chapter 42.17A RCW.
(2) Publicly financed candidates must report in accordance with
rules adopted by the commission. A publicly financed candidate who
revokes his or her participation in the program, who ceases to be a
candidate, or who loses an election must file a final report with the
commission and return any unspent disbursements received from the
judicial election reform act fund. In developing reporting
requirements for publicly financed candidates, the commission must use
existing campaign reporting procedures when determined practicable by
the commission.
(3) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this section is subject to a civil penalty equal to the
contribution or expenditure not reported.
(4) The commission must ensure prompt public access to the reports
received under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 DISQUALIFICATION FROM PROGRAM. If the
commission finds that a publicly financed candidate or the publicly
financed candidate's committee is accepting or expending money outside
the provisions of section 4 of this act, the candidate is disqualified
from the program, is subject to a civil penalty under RCW 42.17A.750,
and must return all money received from the judicial election reform
act fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 IMPLEMENTATION AND ENFORCEMENT DUTIES. In
implementing the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall:
(1) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents as required by this chapter;
(2) Prepare and publish instructions to facilitate compliance with
this chapter and explaining the duties of persons and committees under
this chapter;
(3) Adopt rules to carry out the policies of this chapter. These
rules are not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17A.110; and
(4) Enforce the provisions of this chapter, ensure that money
transferred from the judicial election reform act fund into the account
of an authorized committee of a publicly financed candidate is spent as
specified, and monitor reports filed and financial records of
candidates as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 EXPEDITED ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW. (1) The
commission shall develop an expedited administrative review process
that is not subject to the adjudicative proceedings of chapter 34.05
RCW. However, commission findings are subject to judicial review under
RCW 34.05.570(4).
(2) Candidates and potential candidates whom the commission finds
ineligible to participate in the program may seek expedited
administrative review of commission decisions.
(3) In an expedited administrative review process, the commission
shall issue a final decision no more than five calendar days after
review is requested.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any petition for judicial review of a final decision in an
expedited administrative review must be filed within five calendar days
of the final decision. In any judicial review, the court may not grant
a stay or temporary relief unless it finds the conditions specified in
RCW 34.05.550(3) (a), (b), and (c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The commission may not offer the program in
this chapter until one million dollars is in the judicial election
reform act fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The commission may solicit and accept
gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal
property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange,
invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and
income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
Moneys received under this section must be deposited into the judicial
election reform act fund established in section 3 of this act and may
only be used for the purposes of sections 1 through 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The commission must report to the governor
and to the appropriate committees of the legislature in January of
even-numbered years on the effectiveness of the judicial election
reform act once the program is offered.

Sec. 19 RCW 42.17A.750 and 2010 c 204 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
One or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be
imposed by court order in addition to any other remedies provided by
law:
(1) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of that election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of the finding. Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy be
imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.
(2) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his or her registration
may be revoked or suspended and he or she may be enjoined from
receiving compensation or making expenditures for lobbying. However,
the imposition of a sanction shall not excuse the lobbyist from filing
statements and reports required by this chapter.
(3) A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter may
be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for
each violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17A.405 or 42.17A.410 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten
thousand dollars or three times the amount of the contribution
illegally made or accepted, whichever is greater.
(4) A person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each delinquency
continues.
(5) A person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent
to the amount not reported as required.
(6) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.
(7)(a) The civil penalty for a violation of a contribution or
expenditure limit established under section 4 of this act by or on
behalf of a publicly financed candidate is ten times the amount by
which the expenditures or contributions exceed the applicable limit.
If the violation occurs within five days of an election, the civil
penalty is twenty times the amount by which the expenditures or
contributions exceed the applicable limit. A publicly financed
candidate found to have knowingly committed a violation of the
expenditure or contribution limits under section 4 of this act must pay
the applicable fines, surrender all money in the candidate's authorized
committee account to the judicial election reform act fund, and will
cease to be a publicly financed candidate.
(b) In addition to any other penalties imposed by law, the civil
penalty for a violation by or on behalf of a publicly financed
candidate of a reporting requirement imposed by this chapter is one
hundred dollars per day. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection
(7)(b) may not exceed twice the amount of expenditures or contributions
not reported in a timely manner. The candidate and the candidate's
authorized committee are jointly and severally responsible for a civil
penalty imposed under this subsection.
(c) The civil penalty for a violation of the revocation requirement
imposed by section 10 of this act is one thousand dollars per day for
each day past the period allowed for a timely revocation.
(d) The civil penalty for a violation of the reporting provisions
in section 12 of this act is equal to the amount not reported, less
self-contributed funds.
(e) All civil penalties collected under this subsection must be
deposited into the judicial election reform act fund.

Sec. 20 RCW 3.62.060 and 2009 c 572 s 1 and 2009 c 372 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Clerks of the district courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(1) In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a
district court, the plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement
or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of forty-three dollars plus
any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. Any party filing a
counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in such action shall
pay to the court a filing fee of forty-three dollars plus any surcharge
authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party shall be compelled to pay to the
court any other fees or charges up to and including the rendition of
judgment in the action other than those listed.
(2) For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ, or for filing
an attorney issued writ of garnishment, a fee of twelve dollars.
(3) For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twenty dollars.
(4) For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of one hundred
twenty-five dollars to be paid by the person demanding a jury.
(5) For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of twenty
dollars.
(6) For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's
office a fee of five dollars.
(7) At the option of the district court:
(a) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of
record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the
first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or
portion of a page, a fee of one dollar;
(b) For authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two
dollars for each additional seal affixed;
(c) For preparing a copy of an instrument on file or of record in
the clerk's office without a seal, a fee of fifty cents per page;
(d) When copying a document without a seal or file that is in an
electronic format, a fee of twenty-five cents per page;
(e) For copies made on a compact disc, an additional fee of twenty
dollars for each compact disc.
(8) For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court
a fee of forty dollars including any costs of tape duplication as
governed by the rules of appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction
(RALJ).
(9) At the option of the district court, for clerk's services such
as processing ex parte orders, performing historical searches,
compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record
searches, a fee not to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an
hour.
(10) For duplication of part or all of the electronic recording of
a proceeding ten dollars per tape or other electronic storage medium.
(11) For filing any abstract of judgment or transcript of judgment
from a municipal court or municipal department of a district court
organized under the laws of this state a fee of forty-three dollars.
(12) At the option of the district court, a service fee of up to
three dollars for the first page and one dollar for each additional
page for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to Washington state rules
of court, general rule 17.
(13) Until July 1, 2011, in addition to the fees required by
subsection (1) of this section, clerks of the district courts shall
collect a surcharge of twenty dollars on all fees required by
subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization trust account.
This surcharge is not subject to the division and remittance
requirements of RCW 3.62.020.
(14) Effective July 1, 2012, in addition to the fees required by
subsection (1) of this section, clerks of the district courts shall
collect a judicial integrity surcharge of three dollars on all fees
required by subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to
the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial election reform act
fund created in section 3 of this act. This surcharge is not subject
to the division and remittance requirements of RCW 3.62.020.
The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as
court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 36.18 RCW
to read as follows:
Effective July 1, 2012, a three-dollar judicial integrity surcharge
shall be added to each of the fees in RCW 36.18.012 except for the fees
in RCW 36.18.012(10), 36.18.016, and 36.18.020, that must be remitted
to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial election reform act
fund created in section 3 of this act. Surcharges collected under this
section are not subject to the division and remittance requirements of
RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070 and no surcharge under this section may be
applied to any fee which, before applying other surcharges, is less
than twenty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This chapter may be known and cited as the
judicial election reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act shall be liberally construed to
effectuate its purposes and policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 18, 22, and 23 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If the people ratify this act as provided
in section 27 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) The secretary of state shall submit
this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in
accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the
laws adopted to facilitate its operation.
(2) If the people ratify this act as specified in subsection (1) of
this section, revenues generated shall be spent as detailed in this
act.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050(6), the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title shall read: "The legislature
has passed House Bill No. ...(this act), concerning public funding for
supreme court campaigns. This bill would establish a voluntary public
funding program for candidates for supreme court justice."

--- END ---