BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.080 and 2005 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of registration, and certificates of authorization
and renewals thereof, shall expire on the last day of the month of
December following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid
on that date unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the administrator
of the division of professional licensing to notify every person, firm,
or corporation registered under this chapter of the date of the
expiration of his or her certificate and the amount of the renewal fee
that shall be required for its renewal for one year. Such notice shall
be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of each year.
Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment of
a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. In case
any professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this
chapter shall fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for,
within ninety days from the date when the same shall become due, the
renewal fee shall be the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's
fee.
(2) ((Beginning July 1, 2007,)) The department of licensing may not
renew a certificate of registration for a land surveyor or engineer
unless the registrant verifies to the board that he or she has
completed at least fifteen hours of continuing professional development
per year of the registration period. ((By July 1, 2006,)) The board
shall adopt rules governing continuing professional development for
land surveyors and engineers that are generally patterned after the
model rules of the national council of examiners for engineering and
surveying. The director may, as provided in RCW 43.24.086, set fees to
cover the costs of administering the continuing professional
development requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---