BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health or social welfare organization may deduct from the
measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing child
welfare services under a government-funded program.
(2) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Child welfare services" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 74.13.020; and
(b) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning
provided in RCW 82.04.431.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to amounts received by a
taxpayer on or after August 1, 2011.

--- END ---