BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.620 and 2010 c 161 s 1027 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A vessel owner who is a nonresident ((natural)) person
((shall)) must apply for a nonresident vessel permit on or before the
sixty-first day of use in Washington state if the vessel:
(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state
of principal operation or has been issued a valid number under federal
law; and
(b) Has been brought into Washington state for personal use for not
more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period.
(2) A nonresident vessel permit:
(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director;
(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(c) Is valid for two months.
(3) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director ((shall)) must collect the fee required in
RCW 88.02.640(1)(g) when issuing nonresident vessel permits.
(4) A nonresident vessel permit is not required under this section
if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity within
Washington state.
(5) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules to implement this
section, including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident
vessel permit.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.700 and 2010 c 106 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresident ((individuals)) persons of vessels thirty feet or longer if
((an individual)) a person purchasing a vessel purchases and displays
a valid use permit.
(2)(a) ((An individual)) A person claiming exemption from retail
sales tax under this section must display proof of ((his or her)) the
person's current nonresident status at the time of purchase.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident ((individual's)) person's
status for an individual includes one piece of identification such as
a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification card that has a
photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state
jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection (2)(b) must show
the holder's residential address and have as one of its legal purposes
the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.
(c) The department must adopt rules to implement this section as
necessary, including rules determining acceptable proof of a
nonresident person who is not an individual.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the vessel dealer to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A dealer may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the dealer
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor must examine the proof of nonresidence, determine
whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (2)(b) of this section
or any applicable rules adopted by the department, and maintain records
for each nontaxable sale that shows the type of proof accepted,
including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the
expiration date, if any.
(4) A vessel dealer ((shall)) must issue a use permit to a buyer if
the dealer is satisfied that the buyer is a nonresident. The use
permit must be in a form and manner required by the department and must
include an affidavit, signed by the purchaser, declaring that the
vessel will be used in a manner consistent with this section. The fee
for the issuance of a use permit is five hundred dollars for vessels
fifty feet in length or less and eight hundred dollars for vessels
greater than fifty feet in length. Funds collected under this section
and RCW 82.12.700 must be reported on the dealer's excise tax return
and remitted to the department in accordance with RCW 82.32.045. The
department must transmit the fees to the state treasurer to be
deposited in the state general fund. The use permit must be displayed
on the vessel and is valid for twelve consecutive months from the date
of issuance. A use permit is not renewable. A purchaser at the time
of purchase must make an irrevocable election to take the exemption
authorized in this section or the exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or
82.08.02665. A vessel dealer must maintain a copy of the use permit
for the dealer's records. Vessel dealers must provide copies of use
permits issued by the dealer under this section and RCW 82.12.700 to
the department on a quarterly basis.
(5) A nonresident person who claims an exemption under this section
and who uses a vessel in this state after his or her use permit for
that vessel has expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW
82.08.020 on the original selling price of the vessel and must pay the
tax directly to the department. Interest at the rate provided in RCW
82.32.050 applies to amounts due under this subsection, retroactively
to the date the vessel was purchased, and accrues until the full amount
of tax due is paid to the department.
(6) Any vessel dealer who makes sales without collecting the tax to
a person who does not hold valid identification establishing
out-of-state residency or other proof as required by rule, and any
dealer who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresident((s))
persons as provided in this section, is personally liable for the
amount of tax due.
(7) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of the fee
imposed in this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(8) A vessel dealer that issues use permits under this section and
RCW 82.12.700 must file with the department all returns in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The electronic filing requirement in this subsection ends when
a vessel dealer no longer issues use permits, and the dealer has
electronically filed all of its returns reporting the fees collected
under this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(c) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.700 and 2007 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of a vessel thirty feet or longer if a nonresident ((individual))
person:
(a) Purchased the vessel from a vessel dealer in accordance with
RCW 82.08.700;
(b) Purchased the vessel in the state from a person other than a
vessel dealer, but the nonresident ((individual)) person purchases and
displays a valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section
within fourteen days of the date that the vessel is purchased in this
state; or
(c) Acquired the vessel outside the state, but purchases and
displays a valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section
within fourteen days of the date that the vessel is first brought into
this state.
(2) Any vessel dealer that makes tax exempt sales under RCW
82.08.700 ((shall)) must issue use permits under this section. A
vessel dealer ((shall)) must issue a use permit under this section if
the dealer is satisfied that the ((individual)) person purchasing the
permit is a nonresident. The use permit is valid for twelve
consecutive months from the date of issuance. A use permit is not
renewable, and ((an individual)) a person may only purchase one use
permit for a particular vessel. A person who has been issued a use
permit under RCW 82.08.700 for a particular vessel may not purchase a
use permit under this section for the same vessel after the use permit
issued under RCW 82.08.700 expires. All other requirements and
conditions, not inconsistent with the provisions of this section,
relating to use permits in RCW 82.08.700, apply to use permits under
this section. A person may not claim an exemption under RCW
82.12.0251(1) within twenty-four months after a use permit, issued
under this section or RCW 82.08.700, for the same vessel, has expired.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a nonresident
who claims an exemption under this section and who uses a vessel in
this state after his or her use permit for that vessel has expired is
liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 based on the value of
the vessel at the time that the vessel was either purchased in this
state under circumstances in which the exemption under RCW 82.08.700
did not apply or was first brought into this state, as the case may be.
Interest at the rate provided in RCW 82.32.050 applies to amounts due
under this subsection, retroactively to the date that the vessel was
purchased in this state or first brought into the state, and accrues
until the full amount of tax due is paid to the department.
(b) A nonresident ((individual)) person who is exempt under both
this section and RCW 82.08.700 and who uses a vessel in this state
after ((his or her)) the use permit for that vessel expires is liable
for tax and interest as provided in RCW 82.08.700(5).
(4) Any vessel dealer that issues a use permit to ((an individual))
a person who does not hold valid identification or other proof as
required by rule establishing out-of-state residency, and any dealer
that fails to maintain records for each use permit issued that shows
the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where
appropriate, and the expiration date, if any, is personally liable for
the amount of tax due.
(5) The department must adopt rules to implement this section as
necessary, including rules determining acceptable proof of a
nonresident person who is not an individual.

--- END ---