BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
withdraw from the interstate compact which purportedly would establish
a system to elect the president by a national popular vote. The
compact was approved in Senate Bill No. 5599, chapter 264, Laws of
2009.
Ending state participation in a compact that is not yet operative,
only two years after initial approval, warrants an explanation as to
the causes for rejecting the compact.
Reasonable people may disagree about whether the nation is best
served by the current system where the electors of each individual
state select the president, or whether the system should be changed so
that a national election could be held and the candidate with the most
popular votes nationwide would be president. It is not reasonable to
claim that the current system of voting, where each state has its own
group of candidates on the ballot, and each state has its own voting
standards and requirements, constitutes a single national election from
which a single national vote winner can be identified.
Candidates for president file for office in each state, or only in
some states, as they choose and are able to qualify. In every election
there exists a broad array of choices that voters have for president,
depending on which state the voter lives in. Candidates may appear in
one state as the candidate for X party and in another state as the
candidate for Y party. Candidates may file Mr. X as their vice
presidential running mate in one state and file Ms. Y as their
candidate for vice president in another state. Candidates who are on
the ballot and actively campaigning in some states will not appear at
all on the ballot in other states. These are not mere hypothetical
possibilities, they are the actual occurrences in recent elections. As
long as all the voters in one particular state face common ballot
choices, there is currently no requirement nor need for voters of other
states to face the exact same choices. Voters in Washington state, for
example, cast votes that impact only the vote of Washington state
presidential electors, and their vote has no impact on other states
whose candidate choices may not have been the same. Under the compact,
the vote totals of each state will be counted and the president named
based on the largest total number of votes obtained nationwide, with no
recognition of the fact that voters faced very different choices from
one state to the next.
In addition to each state having its own unique list of candidates
and political parties on its ballot, each state has its own unique
voter qualification rules and voting methods. In forty-eight states a
felon who is in prison is not allowed to vote in that state's election,
two states do allow such votes. Under the compact every state would be
required to accept the vote total of every other state, meaning that
when compact states decide which candidate should receive the electoral
votes of their state they would be required to count votes of persons
who would not have been allowed to vote in their state. The number of
differences between the states in election processes is greater than
the number of similarities between the states. Some states are almost
exclusively election day only voting at polling locations, while other
states have early voting beginning over twenty days before election
day. Some states have very conservative rules regarding absentee
ballots while the state of Oregon sends everyone a ballot and has no
polling locations. It would be unconstitutional for any single state
to have within that state the broad range of different voting rules and
process that now exist among the states, such a diverse system would
deny equal protection of the laws. It is constitutional for the
individual states to choose voting rules and methods that are very
different from other states, because under current law, what the voters
of one state decide has no influence on the electoral votes to be cast
by any other state. The interstate compact would change all that.
Elections in every state, those within the compact and those that are
not, would determine how a compact state would be required to cast its
electoral votes.
The interstate compact is not unconstitutional because it fails to
provide equal protection of the law, there is not now any requirement
in our federal system that each state have the same ballot or voting
process. However, by requiring each state to determine how its
electoral votes will be cast based upon election results from other
states with different ballots and voting requirements, the compact is
unconstitutional for a more basic reason. All laws must be rational.
The mere rationality test is the easiest standard of review by which a
law can pass constitutional scrutiny. If a court finds that there is
even a remote possibility that a reasonable person could have imagined
that the law made sense, then it will be presumed to pass the mere
rationality test. The interstate compact purporting to establish a
national election without first creating a common ballot and common
voting process for every state fails to meet even that minimal test.
It is possible that a revised compact could require a common ballot
and common voting process for all states before going into effect. It
would then be up to the individual states to adopt conforming laws, or
it might be possible for the federal government in the area of
presidential elections to mandate a common ballot and voting process
nationwide. At this time there is no requirement for a common ballot
and no requirement for common voting process among the states. Given
that the compact in its current form is not rational, Washington state
is compelled to withdraw from the compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In accordance with RCW 29A.56.300, Article
IV, the governor of Washington state shall notify the governor of all
other states currently in the compact to notify them of Washington
state's withdrawal from the compact. The governor shall forward to
each such governor a copy of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.56.320 and 2009 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the year in which a presidential election is held, each major
political party and each minor political party or independent candidate
convention held under chapter 29A.20 RCW that nominates candidates for
president and vice president of the United States shall nominate
presidential electors for this state. The party or convention shall
file with the secretary of state a certificate signed by the presiding
officer of the convention at which the presidential electors were
chosen, listing the names and addresses of the presidential electors.
Each presidential elector shall execute and file with the secretary of
state a pledge that, as an elector, he or she will vote for the
candidates nominated by that party. The names of presidential electors
shall not appear on the ballots. The votes cast for candidates for
president and vice president of each political party shall be counted
for the candidates for presidential electors of that political party((;
however, if the interstate compact entitled the "agreement among the
states to elect the president by national popular vote," as set forth
in RCW 29A.56.300, governs the appointment of the presidential electors
for a presidential election as provided in clause 9 of Article III of
that compact, then the final appointment of presidential electors for
that presidential election shall be in accordance with that compact)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.56.300 (States' agreement -- Presidential election--National popular vote) and 2009 c 264 s 2; and
(2) 2009 c 264 s 1 (uncodified).

--- END ---