BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.020 and 2009 c 565 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Contingent loan agreement" means an agreement between the
state and a local government in which the state provides an absolute
and unconditional commitment to make a loan to a local government from
the public works assistance account in order to enhance the credit of
local government borrowing.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(((4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the
public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public
works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.))
(5) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of ((streets and roads,
bridges,)) water systems, ((or)) storm and sanitary sewage systems
((and)), solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities, and
flood control levees. A planning project may include the compilation
of biological, hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin,
or region necessary to develop a base of information for a capital
facility plan.
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans and ((financing guarantees))
contingent loan agreements from the board, and (b) help local
governments improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire,
construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public
facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.030 and 1999 c 153 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works board is hereby created.
(2)(a) The board shall be composed of thirteen members.
(b)(i) One member shall be from the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(ii) One member shall be from the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate.
(c) Nine members shall be appointed by the governor for terms of
four years, except that five members initially shall be appointed for
terms of two years. The board shall include: (((a) Three)) (i) Two
members, ((two)) one of whom shall be an elected official((s)) and one
shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six
persons nominated by the association of Washington cities or its
successor; (((b) three)) (ii) two members, ((two)) one of whom shall be
an elected official((s)) and one shall be a public works manager,
appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated by the
Washington state association of counties or its successor; (((c)
three)) (iii) two members appointed from a list of at least six persons
nominated jointly by the Washington public utility districts
association and a state association of water-sewer districts, or their
successors; and (((d) four)) (iv) three members appointed from the
general public. In appointing the ((four)) general public members, the
governor shall endeavor to balance the geographical composition of the
board and to include members with special expertise in relevant fields
such as public finance, architecture and civil engineering, and public
works construction. The governor shall appoint one of the general
public members of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall
coincide with the term of the governor.
(d) Two members shall be from the community economic revitalization
board, one of whom shall be the chair, selected in accordance with RCW
43.160.030, and one of whom shall be chosen by the community
revitalization board members.
(3) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.
(4)(a) Nonlegislative members of the board shall receive no
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(b) Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 44.04.120.
(5)(a) If a public member vacancy on the board occurs by death,
resignation, or otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position
for the unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from
lists provided by the associations under subsection (2) of this section
shall be filled from a list of at least three persons nominated by the
relevant association or associations. Any public members of the board,
appointive or otherwise, may be removed by the governor for cause in
accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.
(b) If a legislative member vacancy on the board occurs by death,
resignation, or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 932 are each
amended to read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be expended
only after appropriation. Money in the public works assistance account
shall be used to make loans ((and to give financial guarantees)) to
local governments for public works projects and to make payments
required under contingent loan agreements for public works projects.
Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state
match requirements under federal law for projects and activities
conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance
account. Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, sums in the public works
assistance account may be used for the water pollution control
revolving fund program match in section 3013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010
1st sp. sess. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the job development fund to the general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the
board may:
(((1))) (a) Make low-interest or interest-free loans to local
governments from the public works assistance account or other funds and
accounts for the purpose of assisting local governments in financing
public works projects. The board may require such terms and conditions
and may charge such rates of interest on its loans as it deems
necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Money received from local governments in repayment of loans made under
this section shall be paid into the public works assistance account for
uses consistent with this chapter((.));
(((2) Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money
to be received by the public works assistance account, to the repayment
of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The
board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the
public works assistance account plus money to be received from the
payment of the debt service on loans made from that account, nor shall
the board pledge the faith and credit or the taxing power of the state
or any agency or subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations
issued by any local government.
(3))) (b) Make loans to local governments to assist those local
governments to pay all or a portion of the principal of or interest on
obligations issued to finance infrastructure projects pursuant to
contingent loan agreements;
(c) Coordinate with the Washington state treasurer, who, on behalf
of the state of Washington, may prescribe the terms of and enter into
a contingent loan agreement between the state and a local government if
the state treasurer determines that such a contingent loan agreement is
financially prudent and is consistent with the provisions of this
chapter. The office of the state treasurer may charge a fee to local
governments to recover the costs of creating the contingent loan
agreements;
(i) The state's obligation to make any loan to a local government
pursuant to the terms of a contingent loan agreement shall be subject
to appropriation from the public works assistance account;
(ii) In order to provide for the state of Washington's obligations
under the terms of contingent loan agreements, the legislature shall
make provision, from time to time in appropriations acts, for such
amounts as may be required to make timely payments from the public
works assistance account;
(d) Create such subaccounts in the public works assistance account
as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter((.)); and
(((4))) (e) Provide a method for the allocation of loans ((and
financing guarantees)) and contingent loan agreements, and for the
provision of technical assistance under this chapter.
(2) Neither the board nor the state treasurer may pledge the faith
and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or
subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local
government.
(3) The board shall consult with the community economic
revitalization board established under chapter 43.160 RCW to explore
opportunities for coordination and consistency.
(4) All local public works projects aided in whole or in part under
the provisions of this chapter shall be put out for competitive bids,
except for emergency public works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the
recipient jurisdiction shall comply with this requirement to the extent
feasible and practicable. The competitive bids called for shall be
administered in the same manner as all other public works projects put
out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity aided
under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.155.070 and 2009 c 518 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for a loan((s)) or ((pledges)) contingent loan
agreement under this chapter the board must determine that a local
government meets all of the following conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; ((and))
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors;
(d) The local government must have an equitable sewer user charge
system for residential, commercial, and industrial users that the
governing body of the local government determines will provide for the
maintenance and operation of that system and for the timely payment of
all financial obligations of the planned sewer utility;
(e) The connection fees for new connections to a sewer system must
reflect a fair share cost of infrastructure from which new connections
will benefit;
(f) The local government must have a capital wastewater facilities
reserve fund dedicated to paying for wastewater infrastructure and
equipment replacement; and
(g) A sewer use ordinance must restrict certain connections and
wastes to protect a local government's investment and enhance the
wastewater treatment's process stability and effluent quality. The
ordinance must, at a minimum:
(i) Require new sewers and connections to be properly designed and
constructed;
(ii) Require a provision with a timeline and proximity in which
existing and future residences must connect to the sewer system;
(iii) Prohibit inflow sources into the sewer system; and
(iv) Prohibit introduction of toxic or hazardous wastes into the
sewer system in an amount or concentration that endangers the public's
safety or the physical integrity of the system which may cause
violations of the national pollutant discharge elimination system
permit or state waste discharge permit; and
(h) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade audit is available, the local government must have
received such an audit in order to be eligible for a loan or contingent
loan agreement.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or ((loan guarantee)) entering into a contingent loan
agreement under this chapter if such request is made before the
expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a loan or
((loan guarantee)) from entering into a contingent loan agreement under
this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development regulations are
adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for
a loan or ((loan guarantee)) contingent loan agreement.
(3) In considering awarding loans ((for public facilities to)) or
entering into contingent loan agreements with a special district((s))
requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city,
or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall consider whether
the county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose
planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) ((Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether
the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in
RCW 90.71.010;
(c))) If the project is located in the Puget Sound region, whether
the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership ((under RCW 90.71.310)). Any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may
receive assistance under this section only if the project is not in
conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(((d))) (c) Whether the project is critical in nature and would
affect the health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(((e))) (d) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007;
(((f))) (e) The cost of the project compared to the size of the
local government and amount of loan money available;
(((g))) (f) The number of communities served by or funding the
project;
(((h))) (g) Whether the project is located in an area of high
unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;
(((i))) (h) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion,
improvement, or renovation by a local government of a public water
system that is in violation of health and safety standards, including
the cost of extending existing service to such a system;
(((j))) (i) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(((k))) (j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(((l))) (k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section and the
contingent loan agreements made under RCW 43.160.030, during the
preceding fiscal year, and a prioritized list of projects which are
recommended for funding by the legislature((, including one copy to the
staff of each of the committees)). The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing,
the terms and conditions of the loan ((or financial guarantee)), the
local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of
the jurisdiction's critical need for the project, and documentation of
local funds being used to finance the public works project. The list
shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction
recommended for financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and
state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate
excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage,
water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section or
the contingent loan agreements made under RCW 43.160.030.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for a loan((s)) or ((pledges)) contingent loan
agreement for solid waste or recycling facilities under this chapter,
a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling
facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the
comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county
under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.))

Sec. 6 RCW 43.160.030 and 2008 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from ((each of the two
major caucuses of)) the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from ((each of the two major
caucuses of)) the senate to be appointed by the president of the
senate. The board shall also consist of the following members
appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public sector
economist; one port district official; one county official; one city
official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe;
one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area
east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of
the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east
of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from
the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board
shall elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, the
director of revenue, the commissioner of employment security, and the
secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members
of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.160.035 and 2003 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Each)) (1) The member of the house of representatives who is
appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW
43.160.030 may designate another member from the house of
representatives to take his or her place on the board for meetings at
which the member will be absent((, as long as the designated member
belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote
and participate in board deliberations as have the other board
members)). ((Each)) The member of the senate who is appointed to the
community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may
designate another member from the senate to take his or her place on
the board for meetings at which the member will be absent((, as long as
the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall
have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have
the other board members)). Each agency head of an executive agency who
is appointed to serve as a nonvoting advisory member of the community
economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate an
agency employee to take his or her place on the board for meetings at
which the agency head will be absent.
((The)) (2) Designees ((will)) under this section have all powers
to participate in board deliberations as have the other board members
but shall not have voting powers.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.160.060 and 2008 c 327 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, no more than twenty-five percent of all financial
assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants
to political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
(2) Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as
the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall
conform to the following requirements:
(((1))) (a) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(((b))) (ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in
a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any
other community in the state.
(((c))) (iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote gambling.
(((d))) (iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the
applicant political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((2))) (b) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project demonstrating convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
and
(((ii))) (B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial
plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities;
(((b))) (ii) For a project that cannot meet the requirement of
(((a))) (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
(((ii))) (B) Is part of a local economic development plan
consistent with applicable state planning requirements;
(((iii))) (C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard
economic principles; and
(((iv))) (D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the
board, or a rural county;
(((c))) (iii) For site-specific plans, studies, and analyses that
address environmental impacts, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, marketing, project engineering, design, site
planning, and project debt and revenue impacts, as grants not to exceed
fifty thousand dollars.
(((3))) (c) The board shall consult with the public works board
established under chapter 43.155 RCW to explore opportunities for
coordination and consistency.
(d) The board shall develop guidelines for local participation and
allowable match and activities.
(((4))) (e) An application must demonstrate local match and local
participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.
(((5))) (f) An application must be approved by the political
subdivision and supported by the local associate development
organization or local workforce development council or approved by the
governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((6))) (g) The board may allow de minimis general system
improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the
viability of the project.
(((7))) (h) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence
that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after
the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.
(((8))) (i) The board shall prioritize each proposed project
according to:
(((a))) (i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the
jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it
would create after the project is completed, but also giving
consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs
would be located;
(((b))) (ii) The rate of return of the state's investment,
including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector
investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected
increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;
(((c))) (iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health
insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of
employees;
(((d))) (iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase
existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and
employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of
existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public
facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing
infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary
transportation improvements; and
(((e))) (v) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007.
(((9))) (j) A responsible official of the political subdivision or
the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

--- END ---