BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
In carrying out its responsibilities under RCW 43.330.060 and
43.330.080, the department must establish protocols to be followed by
associate development organizations and department staff for the
recruitment and retention of businesses. The protocols must specify
the circumstances under which an associate development organization is
required to notify the department of its business recruitment and
retention efforts and when the department must notify the associate
development organization of its business recruitment and retention
efforts. The protocols established may not require the release of
proprietary information or the disclosure of information that a client
company has requested remain confidential. The department must require
compliance with the protocols in its contracts with associate
development organizations.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 2009 c 151 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((shall)) must contract with county-designated
associate development organizations to increase the support for and
coordination of community and economic development services in
communities or regional areas. The organizations contracted within
each community or regional area ((shall)) must work closely with the
department to carry out state-identified economic development
priorities and must be broadly representative of community and economic
interests. The organization ((shall)) must be capable of identifying
key economic and community development problems, developing appropriate
solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended initiatives.
The contracting organization ((shall)) must work with and include local
governments, local chambers of commerce, workforce development
councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private,
public, or nonprofit community and economic development groups. The
scope of services delivered under these contracts ((shall)) must
include two broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
throughout the county who need support to stay in business, expand, or
relocate to Washington from out of state or other countries.
Assistance must comply with business recruitment and retention
protocols established in section 1 of this act, and includes:
(a) Working with the appropriate partners throughout the county,
including but not limited to, local governments, workforce development
councils, port districts, community and technical colleges and higher
education institutions, export assistance providers, the Washington
manufacturing services, the Washington state quality award council,
small business assistance programs, and other federal, state, and local
programs to facilitate the alignment of planning efforts and the
seamless delivery of business support services ((in the)) within the
entire county;
(b) Providing information on state and local permitting processes,
tax issues, and other essential information for operating, expanding,
or locating a business in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington and local areas as excellent locations to
expand or relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business, which may include developing and
executing regional plans to attract companies from out of state;
(d) Working with businesses on site location and selection
assistance;
(e) Providing business retention and expansion services throughout
the county, including business outreach and monitoring efforts to
identify and address challenges and opportunities faced by businesses;
and
(f) Participating in economic development system-wide discussions
regarding gaps in business start-up assistance in Washington; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry sector strategies and other
economic development strategies, including cluster-based strategies,
that support increased living standards and increase foreign direct
investment throughout Washington. Activities include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts with workforce
development councils involving coordinated strategies around workforce
development and economic development policies and programs.
Coordinated planning efforts ((shall)) must include, but not be limited
to, assistance to industry clusters in the region;
(b) Participation between the contracting organization and the
state board for community and technical colleges as created in RCW
28B.50.050, and any community and technical colleges in providing for
the coordination of the job skills training program and the customized
training program within its region;
(c) Collecting and reporting data as specified by the contract with
the department for statewide systemic analysis. The department
((shall)) must consult with the Washington state economic development
commission in the establishment of such uniform data as is needed to
conduct a statewide systemic analysis of the state's economic
development programs and expenditures. In cooperation with other
local, regional, and state planning efforts, contracting organizations
may provide insight into the needs of target industry clusters,
business expansion plans, early detection of potential relocations or
layoffs, training needs, and other appropriate economic information;
(d) In conjunction with other governmental jurisdictions and
institutions, participate in the development of a countywide economic
development plan, consistent with the state comprehensive plan for
economic development developed by the Washington state economic
development commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.082 and 2009 c 518 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Contracting associate development organizations ((shall))
must provide the department with measures of their performance. Annual
reports ((shall)) must include information on the impact of the
contracting organization on employment, wages, tax revenue, and capital
investment. Specific measures ((shall)) must be developed in the
contracting process between the department and the contracting
organization every two years. Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, performance measures should be consistent across regions to
allow for statewide evaluation.
(b) In addition to the measures required in (a) of this subsection,
contracting associate development organizations in counties with a
population greater than one million five hundred thousand persons must
include the following measures in reports to the department:
(i) The number of small businesses that received retention and
expansion services, and the outcome of those services.
(ii) The number of businesses located outside of the boundaries of
the largest city within the contracting associate development
organization's region that received recruitment, retention, and
expansion services, and the outcome of those services.
(2)(a) The department and contracting organizations ((shall)) must
agree upon specific target levels for the performance measures in
subsection (1) of this section. Comparison of agreed thresholds and
actual performance ((shall)) must occur annually.
(b) Contracting organizations that fail to achieve the agreed
performance targets in more than one-half of the agreed measures
((shall)) must develop remediation plans to address performance gaps.
The remediation plans ((shall)) must include revised performance
thresholds specifically chosen to provide evidence of progress in
making the identified service changes.
(c) Contracts and state funding ((shall)) must be terminated for
one year for organizations that fail to achieve the agreed upon
progress toward improved performance defined under (b) of this
subsection. During the year in which termination for nonperformance is
in effect, organizations ((shall)) must review alternative delivery
strategies to include reorganization of the contracting organization,
merging of previous efforts with existing regional partners, and other
specific steps toward improved performance. At the end of the period
of termination, the department may contract with the associate
development organization or its successor as it deems appropriate.
(3) The department ((shall)) must report to the legislature and the
Washington economic development commission by December 31st of each
even-numbered year on the performance results of the contracts with
associate development organizations.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.330.010 and 2009 c 565 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of
community interests.
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(4) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business in this state under state or federal law.
(5) "Microenterprise development organization" means a community
development corporation, a nonprofit development organization, a
nonprofit social services organization or other locally operated
nonprofit entity that provides services to low-income entrepreneurs.
(6) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.29.006.
(7) "Statewide microenterprise association" means a nonprofit
entity with microenterprise development organizations as members that
serves as an intermediary between the department of commerce and local
microenterprise development organizations.

--- END ---