BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state route
number 523 is a heavily used corridor that connects state route number
99 on the west to state route number 522 on the east. The corridor
carries more than thirty thousand vehicles per day and has a high
accident rate. Sound transit is preparing to extend mass transit from
Northgate to Lynnwood and is planning a mass transit stop on Northeast
145th Street. The current roadway is four substandard-width lanes,
with narrow asphalt walkways and power poles that block pedestrian
travel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 To address the needs on the state route
number 523 corridor, the legislature directs the department of
transportation to undertake a corridor study. The study should seek to
identify improvements that will: Improve safety for all users,
including pedestrians, bicyclists, persons with disabilities, and
transit riders; improve transit speed, reliability, and access; and
consider the needs of abutting property owners. The study must be
guided by a steering committee with representation from the cities of
Shoreline and Seattle, the department of transportation, King county
metro, and sound transit. The study must identify several design
options and associated cost estimates. The results of the corridor
study must be submitted to the legislature in January 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Given that tolling on state route number 520
is scheduled to begin in spring 2011, the 2011 legislature finds that
funding to mitigate this impact on state route number 523 is urgently
needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of seven hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2013, from the motor vehicle account to the
department of transportation for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---