BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes counties have
limited revenue options and their capacity has been further limited
over the past decade. The legislature also recognizes the counties'
reliance on the limited revenue authorities makes it difficult for
counties to provide the necessary and required services to their
residents. The legislature also recognizes that cities have diverse
revenue options and the differences between cities and counties can be
confusing for both residents and businesses within a county. The
legislature also finds that a majority of citizens and businesses are
already paying a utility tax. The legislature intends to provide
counties with a utility tax option in order to help diversify revenue
options in order to provide necessary and required services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the conditions and
requirements of this section, a county may impose an excise tax on the
privilege of engaging in business as a utility. The tax is equal to
the gross income derived from providing service to consumers within the
county multiplied by the rate provided in subsection (3) of this
section. A county may submit a ballot proposition to the voters to
seek voter approval to impose the utility tax under this section, but
is not required to do so.
(2) A county with a population of one million five hundred thousand
persons or less may not impose an excise tax on the privilege of
engaging in business as a gas utility.
(3) A county may not impose a rate of tax that exceeds six percent,
except a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand
persons or less may not impose a rate that exceeds one percent on an
electrical power utility.
(4) A county must use taxes collected under the authority of this
section only for public safety, infrastructure, capital projects, and
other services.
(5) A utility subject to tax under this section must add the tax to
the rates or charges it makes for utility services and separately state
the amount of tax on billings.
(6) A county may initially impose the tax authorized under this
section only on the first day of a calendar quarter and no sooner than
seventy-five days from the date the county adopts the ordinance or
resolution imposing the tax.
(7) A county may provide exemptions for sales by utilities to
business customers, such as manufacturing facilities, aircraft repair
facilities, industrial parks, industrial facilities, farm businesses,
and computer data centers. A county may not provide a general
exemption for sales by utilities to residential customers unless
business customers are also exempt.
(8) A county must allow a credit against the cable service utility
tax for any franchise fee paid by the cable service utility to the
county.
(9) A county must allow a credit against the tax imposed under the
authority of this section for the amount of any similar utility tax
imposed by a city or town on the same taxable event. The credit
required by this subsection may not exceed the amount of tax otherwise
due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following definitions apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cable service utility" means a person providing cable service
as defined in the federal telecommunications act of 1996.
(2) "Electrical power utility" means a "light and power business"
as defined in RCW 82.16.010.
(3) "Gas utility" means a "gas distribution business" as defined in
RCW 82.16.010.
(4) "Gross income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.16.010.
(5) "Sewer utility" means a sewerage collection business as that
term is used in chapter 82.16 RCW.
(6) "Solid waste utility" means a "solid waste collection business"
as defined in RCW 82.18.010.
(7) "Telephone utility" means a person providing
"telecommunications service" as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(8) "Water utility" means a "water distribution business" as
defined in RCW 82.16.010.
(9) "Utility" means an electrical power utility, gas utility,
telephone utility, water utility, sewer utility, solid waste utility,
or cable service utility. "Utility" also means a water-sewer district
formed under Title 57 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---