BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon entering the state, any vehicle or combination of vehicles
with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than forty thousand pounds
and transporting cattle must immediately stop at a port of entry, which
is operated by the Washington state patrol.
(2) The requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to the operator of a vehicle in possession of a pasture permit or
cattle consigned to a public auction or sales yard. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to authorize a vehicle to bypass an open
weigh station or port of entry.
(3) Operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles in
violation of this section is prima facie evidence that the owner of the
vehicle or combination of vehicles caused or permitted the vehicle or
combination of vehicles to be so operated, and the owner is liable for
any penalties imposed under this section.
(4) The penalty for failure to comply with this section is one
thousand dollars. All fines collected under this section must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070 to
be used for road maintenance purposes in the counties described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The requirements and penalties in this section apply only in a
county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a
population of at least four hundred fifty thousand and an adjacent
county with a population of at least thirteen thousand but less than
fifteen thousand.
(6) The Washington state patrol must provide a one-time written
notification of the requirements of this section to affected carriers
known to have previously entered the state of Washington in the
counties described in subsection (5) of this section. The notification
requirement is not a defense for a driver from enforcement action if
found in violation of this section. Notification must be provided by
August 1, 2011.

--- END ---