BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.060 and 2010 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must:
(a) Assist in expanding the state's role as an international center
of trade, culture, and finance;
(b) Promote and market the state's products and services both
nationally and internationally;
(c) Work in close cooperation with other private and public
international trade efforts;
(d) Act as a centralized location for the assimilation and
distribution of trade information; and
(e) Establish and operate foreign offices promoting overseas trade
and commerce.
(2) The department ((shall)) must identify and work with Washington
businesses that can use local, state, and federal assistance to
increase domestic and foreign exports of goods and services.
(3) The department ((shall)) must work generally with small
businesses and other employers to facilitate resolution of siting,
regulatory, expansion, and retention problems. This assistance
((shall)) must include but not be limited to assisting in workforce
training and infrastructure needs, identifying and locating suitable
business sites, and resolving problems with government licensing and
regulatory requirements. The department ((shall)) must identify gaps
in needed services and develop steps to address them including private
sector support and purchase of these services.
(4) The department ((shall)) must work to increase the availability
of capital to small businesses by developing new and flexible
investment tools; by assisting in targeting and improving the
efficiency of existing investment mechanisms; and by assisting in the
procurement of managerial and technical assistance necessary to attract
potential investors.
(5) The department ((shall)) must assist women and minority-owned
businesses in overcoming barriers to entrepreneurial success. The
department ((shall)) must contract with public and private agencies,
institutions, and organizations to conduct entrepreneurial training
courses for minority and women-owned businesses. The instruction
((shall)) must be intensive, practical training courses in financing,
marketing, managing, accounting, and recordkeeping for a small
business, with an emphasis on federal, state, local, or private
programs available to assist small businesses. Instruction ((shall))
must be offered in major population centers throughout the state at
times and locations that are convenient for minority and women small
business owners.
(6)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, by December 1, 2010, the department, in conjunction
with the small business development center, must prepare and present to
the governor and appropriate legislative committees a specific,
actionable plan to increase access to capital and technical assistance
to small businesses and entrepreneurs beginning with the 2011-2013
biennium. In developing the plan, the department and the center may
consult with the Washington state microenterprise association, and with
other government, nonprofit, and private organizations as necessary.
The plan must identify:
(i) Existing sources of capital and technical assistance for small
businesses and entrepreneurs;
(ii) Critical gaps and barriers to availability of capital and
delivery of technical assistance to small businesses and entrepreneurs;
(iii) Workable solutions to filling the gaps and removing barriers
identified in (a)(ii) of this subsection; and
(iv) The financial resources and statutory changes necessary to put
the plan into effect beginning with the 2011-2013 biennium.
(b) With respect to increasing access to capital, the plan must
identify specific, feasible sources of capital and practical mechanisms
for expanding access to it.
(c) The department and the center must include, within the analysis
and recommendations in (a) of this subsection, any specific gaps,
barriers, and solutions related to rural and low-income communities and
small manufacturers interested in exporting.
(7) By January 1, 2013, the department must use a web-based
information system to coordinate work with other economic development
partners on business recruitment, retention, expansion, and trade. The
department must make the system available, provide training, and
require the system's use by associate development organizations. The
department may also make the system available to other economic
development partners. The web-based information system is to be used
to input data, track outcomes, and provide accurate and verifiable
information from which the department will create comprehensive
reports.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 2009 c 151 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall contract with county-designated associate
development organizations to increase the support for and coordination
of community and economic development services in communities or
regional areas. The organizations contracted within each community or
regional area shall be broadly representative of community and economic
interests. The organization shall be capable of identifying key
economic and community development problems, developing appropriate
solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended initiatives.
The contracting organization shall work with and include local
governments, local chambers of commerce, workforce development
councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private,
public, or nonprofit community and economic development groups. The
scope of services delivered under these contracts ((shall)) must
include two broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
who need support to stay in business, expand, or relocate to Washington
from out of state or other countries. Assistance includes:
(a) Working with the appropriate partners, including but not
limited to, local governments, workforce development councils, port
districts, community and technical colleges and higher education
institutions, export assistance providers, the Washington manufacturing
services, the Washington state quality award council, small business
assistance programs, and other federal, state, and local programs to
facilitate the alignment of planning efforts and the seamless delivery
of business support services in the county;
(b) Providing information on state and local permitting processes,
tax issues, and other essential information for operating, expanding,
or locating a business in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington and local areas as excellent locations to
expand or relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business, which may include developing and
executing regional plans to attract companies from out of state;
(d) Working with businesses on site location and selection
assistance;
(e) Providing business retention and expansion services, including
business outreach and monitoring efforts to identify and address
challenges and opportunities faced by businesses; ((and))
(f) Participating in economic development system-wide discussions
regarding gaps in business start-up assistance in Washington; and
(g) Using, by January 1, 2013, a web-based business information
system to track data and coordinate work with other economic
development partners on business recruitment, retention, expansion, and
trade; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry sector strategies and other
economic development strategies, including cluster-based strategies,
that support increased living standards and increase foreign direct
investment throughout Washington. Activities include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts with workforce
development councils involving coordinated strategies around workforce
development and economic development policies and programs.
Coordinated planning efforts shall include, but not be limited to,
assistance to industry clusters in the region;
(b) Participation between the contracting organization and the
state board for community and technical colleges as created in RCW
28B.50.050, and any community and technical colleges in providing for
the coordination of the job skills training program and the customized
training program within its region;
(c) Collecting and reporting data as specified by the contract with
the department for statewide systemic analysis. The department
((shall)) must consult with the Washington state economic development
commission in the establishment of such uniform data as is needed to
conduct a statewide systemic analysis of the state's economic
development programs and expenditures. In cooperation with other
local, regional, and state planning efforts, contracting organizations
may provide insight into the needs of target industry clusters,
business expansion plans, early detection of potential relocations or
layoffs, training needs, and other appropriate economic information;
(d) In conjunction with other governmental jurisdictions and
institutions, participate in the development of a countywide economic
development plan, consistent with the state comprehensive plan for
economic development developed by the Washington state economic
development commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.082 and 2009 c 518 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contracting associate development organizations ((shall)) must
provide the department with measures of their performance. Annual
reports shall include information on the impact of the contracting
organization on employment, wages, tax revenue, and capital investment.
Specific measures ((shall)) must be developed in the contracting
process between the department and the contracting organization every
two years and data must be input into a common web-based business
information system managed by the department. Performance measures
should be consistent across regions to allow for statewide evaluation.
(2)(a) The department and contracting organizations ((shall)) must
use a common web-based business information system and agree upon
specific target levels for the performance measures in subsection (1)
of this section. Comparison of agreed thresholds and actual
performance ((shall)) must occur annually.
(b) Contracting organizations that fail to provide the specified
data in the web-based business information system or achieve the agreed
performance targets in more than one-half of the agreed measures
((shall)) must develop remediation plans to address performance gaps.
For failure to meet agreed performance targets, the remediation plans
((shall)) must include revised performance thresholds specifically
chosen to provide evidence of progress in making the identified service
changes.
(c) Contracts and state funding ((shall be)) is terminated for one
year for organizations that fail to achieve the agreed upon progress
toward improved performance defined under (b) of this subsection.
During the year in which termination for nonperformance is in effect,
organizations ((shall)) must review alternative delivery strategies to
include reorganization of the contracting organization, merging of
previous efforts with existing regional partners, and other specific
steps toward improved performance. At the end of the period of
termination, the department may contract with the associate development
organization or its successor as it deems appropriate.
(3) The department ((shall)) must report to the legislature and the
Washington economic development commission by December 31st of each
even-numbered year on the performance results of the contracts with
associate development organizations.

--- END ---