BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2002 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An electronic benefit card issued to or on behalf of a person
receiving public assistance must contain a photo identification of the
person authorized to use the card.
(2) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW; or
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW.
(((2))) (3)(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all
recipients of electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection
(((1))) (2) of this section could result in legal proceedings and
forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, the department shall
notify the person in writing that the violation could result in legal
proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section.

--- END ---