BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2009 c 480 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's
office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to
be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem,
including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11,
13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their representation of children
in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been
abused or neglected.
(f) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department((,)): (i) The department must
notify the person accused of abuse or neglect within seventy-two hours
of receiving the report; and (ii) the investigation shall be conducted
within time frames established by the department in rule((.)) but in no
case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman of the contents of the report. The department
shall also notify the ombudsman of the disposition of the report.
(14) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(15) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(16) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. One or more prior unfounded allegation or allegations of
abuse or neglect may not be used by the department to determine whether
abuse or neglect has occurred. The department shall, within funds
appropriated for this purpose, offer enhanced community-based services
to persons who are determined not to require further state
intervention.
(17) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(18) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.031 and 2007 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To protect the privacy in reporting and the maintenance of
reports of nonaccidental injury, neglect, death, sexual abuse, and
cruelty to children by their parents, and to safeguard against
arbitrary, malicious, or erroneous information or actions, the
department shall not disclose or maintain information related to
reports of child abuse or neglect except as provided in this section or
as otherwise required by state and federal law.
(2) The department shall destroy all of its records concerning:
(a) A screened-out report, within three years from the receipt of
the report; and
(b) An unfounded or inconclusive report, ((within)) as soon as
practicable, but not to exceed six ((years of)) months from completion
of the investigation, unless a prior or subsequent founded report has
been received regarding the child who is the subject of the report, a
sibling or half-sibling of the child, or a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian of the child, before the records are destroyed.
(3) The department may keep records concerning founded reports of
child abuse or neglect as the department determines by rule.
(4) An unfounded, screened-out, or inconclusive report may not be
disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(5)(a) If the department fails to comply with this section, an
individual who is the subject of a report may institute proceedings for
injunctive or other appropriate relief for enforcement of the
requirement to purge information. These proceedings may be instituted
in the superior court for the county in which the person resides or, if
the person is not then a resident of this state, in the superior court
for Thurston county.
(b) If the department fails to comply with subsection (4) of this
section and an individual who is the subject of the report is harmed by
the disclosure of information, in addition to the relief provided in
(a) of this subsection, the court may award a penalty of up to one
thousand dollars and reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs to the
petitioner.
(c) A proceeding under this subsection does not preclude other
methods of enforcement provided for by law.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from
retaining general, nonidentifying information which is required for
state and federal reporting and management purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.100 and 2005 c 512 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds parents and children often are not aware
of their due process rights when agencies are investigating allegations
of child abuse and neglect. The legislature reaffirms that all
citizens, including parents, foster parents, guardians, and legal
custodians, shall be afforded due process, that protection of children
remains the priority of the legislature, and that this protection
includes protecting the family unit from unnecessary disruption. To
facilitate this goal, the legislature wishes to ensure that parents,
foster parents, guardians, and legal custodians and children be advised
in writing and orally, if feasible, of their basic rights and other
specific information as set forth in this chapter, provided that
nothing contained in this chapter shall cause any delay in protective
custody action.
(2)(a) The department shall notify the parent, foster parent,
guardian, or legal custodian of a child of any allegations of child
abuse or neglect made against such person at the initial point of
contact with such person, in a manner consistent with the laws
maintaining the confidentiality of the persons making the complaints or
allegations. The notification must occur within seventy-two hours of
receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect. Investigations of
child abuse and neglect should be conducted in a manner that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the integrity of
the investigation process.
(b) Whenever the department completes an investigation of a child
abuse or neglect report under chapter 26.44 RCW, the department shall
notify the subject of the report of the department's investigative
findings. The notice shall also advise the subject of the report that:
(((a))) (i) A written response to the report may be provided to the
department and that such response will be filed in the record following
receipt by the department;
(((b))) (ii) Information in the department's record may be
considered in subsequent investigations or proceedings related to child
protection or child custody;
(((c))) (iii) Founded reports of child abuse and neglect may be
considered in determining whether the person is disqualified from being
licensed to provide child care, employed by a licensed child care
agency, or authorized by the department to care for children; and
(((d))) (iv) A subject named in a founded report of child abuse or
neglect has the right to seek review of the finding as provided in this
chapter.
(3) The notification required by this section shall be made by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person's last known
address.
(4) The duty of notification created by this section is subject to
the ability of the department to ascertain the location of the person
to be notified. The department shall exercise reasonable, good-faith
efforts to ascertain the location of persons entitled to notification
under this section.
(5) The department shall provide training to all department
personnel who conduct investigations under this section that shall
include, but is not limited to, training regarding the legal duties of
the department from the initial time of contact during investigation
through treatment in order to protect children and families.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.300 and 2009 c 520 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child has been placed in a foster family home by the
department or supervising agency and the child has thereafter resided
in the home for at least ninety consecutive days, the department or
supervising agency shall notify the foster family at least five days
prior to moving the child to another placement, unless:
(a) A court order has been entered requiring an immediate change in
placement;
(b) The child is being returned home;
(c) The child's safety is in jeopardy; or
(d) The child is residing in a receiving home or a group home.
(2) If the child has resided in a foster family home for less than
ninety days or if, due to one or more of the circumstances in
subsection (1) of this section, it is not possible to give five days'
notification, the department or supervising agency shall notify the
foster family of proposed placement changes as soon as reasonably
possible.
(3) A child may not be removed from a foster family home unless
there is a preponderance of evidence indicating that the safety,
health, or welfare of the child is in jeopardy.
(4) This section is intended solely to assist in minimizing
disruption to the child in changing foster care placements. ((Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require that a court hearing be
held prior to changing a child's foster care placement nor to create
any substantive custody rights in the foster parents.))
(5) If a child is removed from a foster family home because of an
allegation of abuse or neglect against the foster parent or parents,
the foster parent or parents must be given visitation with the child
during the investigation, unless the department can provide clear and
convincing evidence of the abuse or neglect to a court.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.310 and 2009 c 520 s 78 are each amended to read
as follows:
Adequate foster parent training has been identified as directly
associated with increasing the length of time foster parents are
willing to provide foster care and reducing the number of placement
disruptions for children. Placement disruptions can be harmful to
children by denying them consistent and nurturing support. Foster
parents have expressed the desire to receive training in addition to
the foster parent training currently offered. Foster parents who care
for more demanding children, such as children with severe emotional,
mental, or physical handicaps, would especially benefit from additional
training. The department and supervising agency shall develop
additional training for foster parents that focuses on skills to assist
foster parents in caring for emotionally, mentally, or physically
handicapped children. The department shall also develop training to be
provided to foster parents concerning allegations of child abuse and
neglect, including information on allegations against foster parents.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.13.332 and 2001 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Foster parents have the right to be free of coercion,
discrimination, and reprisal in serving foster children, including the
right to voice grievances about treatment furnished or not furnished to
the foster child. Foster parents must be afforded due process to
protect the family unit from unnecessary disruption.
(2) In order to ensure foster parents are aware of their due
process rights when agencies are investigating allegations of child
abuse or neglect, the investigating agency must advise foster parents,
in writing, of their basic rights and other specific information set
forth in this chapter.

--- END ---