BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that parents and
guardians of unemancipated minor children have the primary
responsibility of ensuring that these children comply with the laws of
the state and local government and that failing to adequately supervise
such minors often results in unnecessary and preventable costs to
individuals and society. The legislature intends by this act to hold
parents and guardians accountable for the costs their unemancipated
minor children impose on others as a result of wrongful behavior.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A parent or guardian of an unemancipated child under eighteen
years of age is responsible for preventing the unemancipated minor
child from being in violation of any state or local law or committing
any tort.
(2) A parent or legal guardian commits the infraction of failing to
supervise an unemancipated minor child if the unemancipated child has
been found liable for damages in a civil proceeding or in a criminal
proceeding for any violation of any state or local law.
(3) Failure to supervise an unemancipated minor child is an
infraction punishable by a maximum fine of five hundred dollars. In
addition, the court may order the parent or legal guardian to pay any
fine or penalty imposed pursuant to a criminal proceeding and
restitution for actual damages to the person or property of a victim of
the subject unemancipated minor child's conduct at an amount determined
at the judge's discretion.
(4) Upon an unemancipated minor being convicted of a criminal
violation of state or local law, the parent or guardian shall be served
with a subpoena to appear before the court with the unemancipated minor
and show cause (a) why the criminal violation occurred, (b) why the
parent or guardian did not prevent the criminal violation from
occurring, and (c) why the parent or guardian should not be found
guilty of failure to supervise an unemancipated minor child.
(5) For purposes of this section, each violation of state or local
law by an unemancipated minor constitutes a separate infraction of
failure to supervise an unemancipated minor child.

--- END ---