BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.220 and 2005 c 106 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied
scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in
RCW 28B.140.005, each university may develop, adopt, and implement one
or more written administrative processes that shall, upon approval by
the governor, apply in place of the obligations imposed on universities
and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040,
42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and
42.52.160. The universities shall coordinate on the development of
administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. A
university research employee in compliance with the processes
authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW
42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130,
42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.
(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce activity subject to
the written approval processes under this section, as provided in RCW
42.52.360.
(3) University employees who make financial gains from the sale of
course materials they have authored and assigned to their classes, such
as a published textbook or software, are exempt from the provisions of
RCW 42.52.030 only to the extent of the sales to their students and
only if the university employee donates any financial gains from those
sales to the school's foundation or a student financial aid program.

--- END ---