BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.220 and 2010 c 161 s 617 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor
or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector
vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle that is at least thirty years
old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector
vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector
vehicle license plate shall:
(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under
chapters ((46.16)) 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and
(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW
46.17.220(1)(d), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by
law.
(2) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate may:
(a) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the
department; or
(b) Provide ((a)) an actual Washington state issued license plate
designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.
(3) Collector vehicle license plates:
(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;
(b) Are not required to be renewed; and
(c) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.
(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be
used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades,
and occasional pleasure driving.
(5) Collector vehicle license plates may be transferred from one
motor vehicle to another motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of
this section upon application to the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.
(6) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license
plate under subsection (2)(b) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must provide a method by which law enforcement
officers may readily access vehicle information for collector vehicles
by using the collector vehicle license plate number. In the event
duplicate license plate numbers have been issued to more than one
collector vehicle, the department must provide a method for law
enforcement officers to identify the correct vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---