BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school
for the blind, and their contractors may require background
investigations and screenings in addition to the record checks through
the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and federal
bureau of investigation that are required under RCW 28A.400.303.
(2) Within existing funds, the superintendent of public instruction
shall issue a request for proposal for persons or entities willing to
conduct background investigations and screenings for interested school
districts and others.
(3) The persons or entities selected by the superintendent of
public instruction shall contract directly with interested school
districts and others.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
inform school districts, educational service districts, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, and the state
school for the blind, as well as approved private schools and federal
bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, of the services and rates
negotiated with the persons or entities for various kinds of background
investigations and screenings and shall make this information available
on its web site.

--- END ---