BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.24.650 and 1969 ex.s. c 272 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state capitol committee shall provide for the construction,
remodeling, and furnishing of capitol office buildings, parking
facilities, governor's mansion, the management, protection,
preservation, and coordination of Capitol lake as a lake environment,
and such other buildings and facilities as are determined by the state
capitol committee to be necessary to provide space for the legislature
by way of offices, committee rooms, hearing rooms, and work rooms, and
to provide executive office space and housing for the governor, and to
provide executive office space for other elective officials and such
other state agencies as may be necessary, and to pay for all costs and
expenses in issuing the bonds and to pay interest thereon during
construction of the facilities for which the bonds were issued and six
months thereafter.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.24.700 and 2005 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that the historic facilities of the
Washington state capitol, including Capitol lake, are the most
important public facilities in the state. They are a source of beauty
and pride, a resource for celebrating our heritage and democratic
ideals, and an exceptional educational resource. The public and
historic facilities of the state capitol campus, including the
associated grounds and Capitol Lake, should be managed and maintained
to the highest standards of excellence, model the best of historic
preservation practice, and maximize opportunities for public access and
enjoyment. Consistent with this objective, Capitol lake should be
managed and maintained as a lake environment, in coordination with
interests within the Deschutes watershed and Budd Inlet, to ensure that
overall aesthetic, recreational, sediment management, and environmental
benefits are achieved.
(b) Capitol lake shall be comanaged by those Indian tribes with
histories or traditions or customary uses relating to either the
Deschutes river watershed, the historic Deschutes river estuary, Budd
Inlet, or the area now occupied by the lake and its surrounding
environment. This management role shall include full participation
with state agencies and other public entities in all decisions
regarding the administration, maintenance, preservation, and uses of
Capitol lake.
(2) The purpose of chapter 330, Laws of 2005 is to provide
authority and direction for the care and stewardship of the public and
historic facilities of the state capitol, to facilitate public access,
use, and enjoyment of these assets, and to carefully preserve them for
the benefit of future generations.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.24.710 and 2005 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 79.24.720, 79.24.730, 43.01.090, 43.19.500,
and 79.24.087, "state capitol public and historic facilities and
grounds" includes:
(1) The east, west and north capitol campus grounds, Sylvester
park, Heritage park, Marathon park, Centennial park, the Deschutes
river basin commonly known as Capitol lake, the interpretive center,
Deschutes parkway, and the landscape, memorials, artwork, fountains,
streets, sidewalks, lighting, and infrastructure in each of these areas
not including state-owned aquatic lands in these areas managed by the
department of natural resources under RCW ((79.90.450)) 79.105.010;
(2) The public spaces and the historic interior and exterior
elements of the following buildings: The visitor center, the
Governor's mansion, the legislative building, the John L. O'Brien
building, the Cherberg building, the Newhouse building, the Pritchard
building, the temple of justice, the insurance building, the Dolliver
building, capitol court, and the old capitol buildings, including the
historic state-owned furnishings and works of art commissioned for or
original to these buildings; and
(3) Other facilities or elements of facilities as determined by the
state capitol committee, in consultation with the department of general
administration.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.24.720 and 2005 c 330 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of general administration is responsible for the
stewardship, preservation, operation, and maintenance of the public and
historic facilities and grounds of the state capitol, subject to the
policy direction of the state capitol committee and ((the legislative
buildings committee as created in chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1301),
Laws of 2005, and)) the guidance of the capitol campus design advisory
committee. In administering this responsibility, the department shall:
(1) Apply the United States secretary of the interior's standards
for the treatment of historic properties;
(2) Seek to balance the functional requirements of state government
operations with public access and the long-term preservation needs of
the properties themselves; ((and))
(3) Consult with the capitol furnishings preservation committee,
the state historic preservation officer, the state arts commission, and
the state facilities accessibility advisory committee in fulfilling the
responsibilities provided for in this section; and
(4)(a) Coordinate with the jurisdictions with interest within the
Deschutes watershed and Budd Inlet to ensure that overall aesthetic,
recreational, sediment management, and environmental benefits are
achieved for Capitol lake as part of the Deschutes watershed.
(b) Capitol lake shall be comanaged by those Indian tribes with
histories or traditions or customary uses relating to either the
Deschutes river watershed, the historic Deschutes river estuary, Budd
Inlet, or the area now occupied by the lake and its surrounding
environment. This management role shall include full participation
with state agencies and other public entities in all decisions
regarding the administration, maintenance, preservation, and uses of
Capitol lake.

--- END ---