BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.44.011 and 2010 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Controlling person" is any person who owns or controls ten
percent or more of the beneficial ownership of any escrow agent,
regardless of the form of business organization employed and regardless
of whether such interest stands in such person's true name or in the
name of a nominee.
(2) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(3) "Designated escrow officer" means any licensed escrow officer
designated by a licensed escrow agent and approved by the director as
the licensed escrow officer responsible for supervising that agent's
handling of escrow transactions, management of the agent's trust
account, and supervision of all other licensed escrow officers employed
by the agent.
(4) "Director" means the director of financial institutions, or his
or her duly authorized representative.
(5) "Director of licensing" means the director of the department of
licensing, or his or her duly authorized representative.
(6) "Escrow" means any transaction, except the acts of a qualified
intermediary in facilitating an exchange under section 1031 of the
internal revenue code, wherein any person or persons, for the purpose
of effecting and closing the sale, purchase, exchange, transfer,
encumbrance, or lease of real or personal property to another person or
persons, delivers any written instrument, money, evidence of title to
real or personal property, or other thing of value to a third person to
be held by such third person until the happening of a specified event
or the performance of a prescribed condition or conditions, when it is
then to be delivered by such third person, in compliance with
instructions under which he or she is to act, to a grantee, grantor,
promisee, promisor, obligee, obligor, lessee, lessor, bailee, bailor,
or any agent or employee thereof. For purposes of this definition,
"escrow" includes the collection of payments and the performance of
related services by a third party in connection with a loan secured by
a lien on real or personal property but excludes vessel transfers.
(7) "Escrow agent" means any person engaged in the business of
performing for compensation the duties of the third person referred to
in subsection (6) of this section.
(8) "Escrow commission" means the escrow commission of the state of
Washington created by RCW 18.44.500.
(9) "Licensed escrow agent" means any sole proprietorship, firm,
association, partnership, or corporation holding a license as an escrow
agent under the provisions of this chapter.
(10) "Licensed escrow officer" means any natural person handling
escrow transactions and licensed as such by the director.
(11) "Person" means a natural person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or the plural
thereof, whether resident, nonresident, citizen, or not.
(12) "Split escrow" means a transaction in which two or more escrow
agents act to effect and close an escrow transaction.

--- END ---