BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may only operate upon the public roadways of this
state a vehicle combination that meets the following requirements:
(a) The tow vehicle within the vehicle combination must:
(i) Be properly registered in compliance with RCW 46.17.355;
(ii) Have a progressive brake controller; and
(iii) Not exceed sixty miles per hour;
(b) The vehicle combination must not:
(i) Weigh more than twenty-six thousand pounds cumulatively; and
(ii) Have a combined length greater than seventy-five feet;
(c) The first vehicle being towed in the vehicle combination must
be a fifth wheel-type vehicle;
(d) Any vehicle over three thousand pounds that is being towed in
the vehicle combination must have breakaway safety switches;
(e) All towed vehicles in the vehicle combination must be within
the manufacturer's hitch weight limit for the applicable vehicle's
hitch;
(f) The second vehicle being towed in the vehicle combination must
be equipped with safety chains; and
(g) All tow vehicles within the vehicle combination must be in
compliance with the manufacturer's tow capacity specifications.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "vehicle combination" means
any combination of vehicles consisting of at least two, but not more
than three, vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.036 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 64 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.44.037, it is unlawful for any person
to operate upon the public highways of this state any combination of
vehicles consisting of more than ((two)) three vehicles. For the
purposes of this section, a truck tractor-semitrailer or pole trailer
combination will be considered as two vehicles but the addition of
another axle to the tractor of a truck tractor-semitrailer or pole
trailer combination in such a way that it supports a proportional share
of the load of the semitrailer or pole trailer ((shall)) is not ((be))
deemed a separate vehicle but ((shall be)) is considered a part of the
truck tractor. For the purposes of this section, a converter gear used
in converting a semitrailer to a full trailer ((shall)) is not ((be))
deemed a separate vehicle but ((shall be)) is considered a part of the
trailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---