BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the right of free
speech, especially political speech, as guaranteed under the First
Amendment to the United States Constitution and Article I, section 5 of
the Washington state Constitution and that this right extends as fully
and equally to judges and judicial candidates of our state as it does
to all other candidates for public office in this state.
The legislature further recognizes that judges and judicial
candidates may and should choose to exercise these rights in order to
better inform the public as to their judicial philosophy, their
knowledge and understanding of the history, intent, purpose, and text
of the federal and state Constitutions and other law in order to
educate the people on a wide range of legal issues important to those
who have a civic obligation to become better informed when choosing
those judges and judicial candidates they wish to elect or retain.
The legislature hereby declares its belief that judges and judicial
candidates have a fundamental right to freely express and incorporate
their beliefs and opinions in any statements made regarding any
campaign or potential campaign for judicial office or any issue
pertaining thereto without legal or professional retribution or other
negative consequence, penalty, or sanction to the standing, evaluation,
or privilege of the judge or the judicial candidate.

--- END ---