BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state energy freedom act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the intent of the legislature that any
state, regional, or national program to implement a cap and trade
system or any other program to address greenhouse gas emissions or
motor vehicle fuel economy that has been or may be proposed by a state
agency requires express legislative authorization following a
comprehensive assessment of the fiscal and regulatory impacts of such
a system or program on Washington state's budget, economy, consumers,
families, and small and large businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Neither the department nor any other state agency may adopt or
enforce a state, regional, or national program to regulate the emission
of greenhouse gas or motor vehicle fuel economy, including rules
adopted under chapter 70.120A RCW, without express legislative
authorization that is enacted after the effective date of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this act, "greenhouse gas" means carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, sulfur hexafluoride,
hydrofluorocarbon, or perfluorocarbon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall provide a written report to the governor,
the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and
minority leader of the house of representatives on each proposed
program to address greenhouse gas emissions or motor vehicle fuel
economy, including rules adopted under chapter 70.120A RCW, and also
including any program that is the subject of a pending or previous
rule-making proceeding within three months of either the effective date
of this section or the release of recommendations by the participants
in the western climate initiative for a regional cap and trade or other
program to regulate greenhouse gas emissions or motor vehicle fuel
economy.
(2) The report must include a detailed description of the proposed
program, a comprehensive analysis of the fiscal and regulatory impacts
of the proposed program on Washington state's budget, economy,
consumers, families, and small and large businesses, and the
legislation required to authorize the proposed program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this act is
hereby declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and
is specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and
void and of no effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---