BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the right
to constitutional government act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that this nation and
this state were founded as constitutional republican forms of
government with democratically elected representatives enacting and
implementing laws consistent with those constitutions to promote the
general welfare of all the people. All elected officials take an oath
to uphold the constitutions. The role of government was intended to
remain as limited as possible in order to expand the liberties of the
people as far as possible. Over the past few decades, legislative and
executive branches have gone far beyond their original purposes and
powers, and have grown to the extent that the economic and regulatory
burdens placed upon the people is becoming unbearable and is infringing
on the rights of law-abiding citizens to enjoy their property, their
freedoms, and the fruits of their labors. The legislature further
finds that the United States congress has frequently ignored its own
House rule XIII 3(d) which requires "Each report of a committee on a
public bill or public joint resolution shall contain the following:
(1) A statement citing the specific powers granted to congress in the
Constitution to enact the law proposed by the bill or resolution." The
legislature intends by this chapter to ensure that all laws and rules
adopted by the federal and state governments are firmly grounded in
their respective constitutions so that those governments might return
to their proper realms and focus on the essential services that best
strike the balance between the need for government and the need for
people to be free.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Every bill, act, ordinance, resolution,
or rule adopted or enacted by a legislative or executive body, or the
people, shall include the citation of the express language from the
federal or state Constitution that provides the specific authority for
the provisions included in the bill, act, ordinance, resolution, or
rule.
(2) Every bill, act, ordinance, resolution, or rule adopted or
enacted by a legislative or executive body, or the people, shall limit
the provisions of the bill, act, ordinance, resolution, or rule to the
express language included in the citation from the federal or state
Constitution that provides the specific authority such provisions.
(3) Every bill, act, ordinance, resolution, or rule adopted or
enacted by a legislative or executive body, or the people, shall
include a brief rationale as how the provisions of the bill, act,
ordinance, resolution, or rule are provided specific authority in the
express language of the federal or state Constitution cited, including
the language of the text itself, a reasonable construction and
extension of the text, the intent as best can be ascertained of those
who adopted the text, and the historical understanding and context in
which the text was adopted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Every law, rule, order, or other act
adopted or enacted by the federal government should include the
citation of the express language from the federal Constitution that
provides the specific authority for the provisions included in the law,
rule, order, or other act.
(2) Every law, rule, order, or other act adopted or enacted by the
federal government should limit the provisions of the law, rule, order,
or other act to the express language included in the citation from the
federal Constitution that provides the specific authority such
provisions.
(3) Every law, rule, order, or other act adopted or enacted by the
federal government should include a brief rationale as how the
provisions of law, rule, order, or other act are provided specific
authority in the express language of the federal or state Constitution
cited, including the language of the text itself, a reasonable
construction and extension of the text, the intent as best can be
ascertained of those who adopted the text, and the historical
understanding and context in which the text was adopted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this act is
hereby declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and
is specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and
void and of no effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 1 RCW.

--- END ---