BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that
strategic investment in higher education is a matter of public
interest, and that certain baccalaureate programs are in the public
interest.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The subsidized, public higher education system should increase
production of degrees that are in the public interest;
(b) State policy goals and strategies should focus on degree
production that best meet the public interest; and
(c) Students need specific incentives to select and complete
degrees which are in the public interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.76.020 and 2010 c 245 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.
(3) "Major expansion" means expansion of the higher education
system that requires significant new capital investment, including
building new institutions, campuses, branches, or centers or conversion
of existing campuses, branches, or centers that would result in a
mission change.
(4) "Mission change" means a change in the level of degree awarded
or institutional type not currently authorized in statute.
(5) "Public interest degrees" means associate, baccalaureate, or
graduate degrees in the following fields: Biological science, computer
engineering, computer science, electrical engineering, information
technology, mathematics, mechanical engineering, and physical science.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2010 c 245 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
Board recommendations regarding proposed major expansion shall be
limited to determinations of whether the major expansion is within the
scope indicated in the most recent strategic master plan for higher
education or most recent system design plan. Recommendations regarding
existing capital prioritization processes are not within the scope of
the evaluation of major expansion. Major expansion and proposed
mission changes may be proposed by the board, any public institution of
higher education, or by a state or local government.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery;
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Recommendations from the technology transformation task force
created in chapter 407, Laws of 2009, and institutions of higher
education relative to the strategic and operational use of technology
in higher education. These and other reports, reviews, and audits
shall allow for: The development of enterprise-wide digital
information technology across educational sectors, systems, and
delivery methods; the integration and streamlining of administrative
tools including but not limited to student information management,
financial management, payroll, human resources, data collection,
reporting, and analysis; and a determination of the costs of multiple
technology platforms, systems, and models.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number and type
of higher education and training credentials required to match employer
demand for a skilled and educated workforce. The assessment shall
include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level of
higher education and training and the number of credentials needed to
match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) Prior to enrolling students each academic year, the board shall
identify which programs qualify as public interest degrees in RCW
28B.76.020 for which students may enroll at reduced tuition rates in
RCW 28B.15.068.
(5) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(((5))) (6) The following activities are subject to approval by the
board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(((6))) (7) Institutions seeking board approval under this section
must demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(((7))) (8) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(((8))) (9) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.
(((9))) (10) In the case of a proposed major expansion or mission
change, the needs assessment process under subsection (2) of this
section constitutes a threshold inquiry. If the board determines that
the need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has not
been justified, the inquiry is concluded. If the board determines that
the need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has been
sufficiently established, the board, in consultation with any directly
involved institutions and other interested agencies and individuals,
shall proceed to examine the viability of the proposal using criteria
including, but not limited to:
(a) The specific scope of the project including the capital
investment requirements, the number of full-time equivalent students
anticipated, and the number of academic programs planned;
(b) The existence of an efficient and sustainable financial plan;
(c) The extent to which existing resources can be leveraged;
(d) The current and five-year projected student population,
faculty, and staff to support the proposed programs, institution, or
innovation;
(e) The plans to accommodate expected growth over a twenty-year
time frame;
(f) The extent to which new or existing partnerships and
collaborations are a part of the proposal; and
(g) The feasibility of any proposed innovations to accelerate
degree production.
(((10))) (11) After the board completes its evaluation of the
proposed major expansion or mission change using the needs assessment
under subsection (2) of this section and viability determination under
subsection (((9))) (10) of this section, the board shall make a
recommendation to either proceed, modify, or not proceed with the
proposed major expansion or mission change. The board's recommendation
shall be presented to the governor and the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,
may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic
year in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students
shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the
seven percent increase limit established in this section except as
provided in RCW 28B.76.020. For academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11 the
omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition increases greater than
seven percent. To the extent that state appropriations combined with
tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in subsection (((2))) (3) of this
section, the legislature may revisit state appropriations, authorized
enrollment levels, and changes in tuition fees for any given fiscal
year.
(2) Tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students who enroll or are accepted to be enrolled in public interest
degrees in RCW 28B.76.020, may increase no greater than five percent
over the previous academic year in any institution of higher education,
except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11.
(3) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(((3))) (4) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the total per-student funding
level that represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(((4))) (5) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are
the top performing states on the new economy index published by the
progressive policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy
index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete in the
new economy. At least once every five years, the office of financial
management shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge
states are appropriate. The office of financial management shall
report its findings to the governor and the legislature.
(((5))) (6) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of tax credits available through
the American opportunity tax credit provided in the American recovery
and reinvestment act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) The joint select legislative task
force on public interest degrees is established, with members as
provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The governor shall appoint four members representing the
higher education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, and the
workforce training and education coordinating board.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership.
(2) The task force shall review and make recommendations on the
following:
(a) Modifications to public interest degrees in RCW 28B.76.020; and
(b) Policies that increase the ability of public and private
institutions of higher education to prepare Washington citizens with
the higher education qualifications that are in the public interest.
(3) The senate's committee services and the house of
representatives' office of program research shall provide staff support
for the task force.
(4) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members,
except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 30, 2011.

--- END ---