BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall create and issue a license plate, for display
at the front and rear of a motor vehicle, available for persons
convicted of an alcohol-related violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
or an equivalent local ordinance and for persons who have had their
driver's license suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101.
Both front and rear license plates must designate an uppercase letter
Z as the last symbol at the end of any sequence of letters or numbers,
or both, but otherwise conform to the standards described under RCW
46.16A.200. If the vehicle is a motorcycle or moped, only one license
plate must be issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
For motor vehicles issued Z-designated license plates under section
1 of this act, the department shall charge an additional fee of one
hundred dollars. For motorcycles or mopeds issued a Z-designated
license plate under section 1 of this act, the department shall charge
a fee of twenty-five dollars. The fees must be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require that, after any applicable period
of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges has ended,
a person may only operate a motor vehicle equipped with Z-designated
license plates as described in section 1 of this act if the person was
convicted of an alcohol-related violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
or an equivalent local ordinance.
(2) The display of Z-designated license plates is not necessary on
vehicles owned by a person's employer and driven as a requirement of
employment during working hours.
(3) The period of time of the restriction under this section is
three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under section 3 of this act
stating that the person must only operate a motor vehicle equipped with
Z-designated license plates. The department shall determine the
person's eligibility for a driver's license based upon verification
that the person has obtained the required Z-designated license plates.
If, based upon notification from a law enforcement agency or otherwise,
the department determines that the Z-designated license plates required
under this section are not being displayed as required, the department
shall suspend the person's driver's license or privilege to drive.
Whenever the driver's license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with the requirement
that the person only operate a motor vehicle equipped with Z-designated
license plates, the suspension must remain in effect until the person
obtains the required Z-designated license plates.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for a person with a notation on his or her
driving record, as described in subsection (1) of this section, to
operate a motor vehicle that is not equipped with Z-designated license
plates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is restricted to the use of a motor vehicle equipped
with Z-designated license plates and who knowingly disguises or
obscures the uppercase letter Z on the license plates is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.385 and 2010 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2009, any person licensed under this
chapter who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or a
violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b), or who has had or
will have his or her license suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW
46.20.3101, may submit to the department an application for an ignition
interlock driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the
prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to
receive the license, may issue an ignition interlock driver's license.
(b) A person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license
anytime, including immediately after receiving the notices under RCW
46.20.308 or after his or her license is suspended, revoked, or denied.
A person receiving an ignition interlock driver's license waives his or
her right to a hearing or appeal under RCW 46.20.308.
(c) An applicant under this subsection shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the person, and
that he or she has obtained Z-designated license plates.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain the device
and Z-designated license plates on all vehicles operated by the person
and shall restrict the person to operating only vehicles equipped with
the device and license plates, for the remainder of the period of
suspension, revocation, or denial. The installation of an ignition
interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented
by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or
maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven
at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment
during working hours. The person must provide the department with a
declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating
that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle
owned by the employer or other persons during working hours.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department under this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, an ignition
interlock driver's license granted upon a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 and 46.61.5055 and the period of time the
Z-designated license plate restriction is required under section 3 of
this act.
(2) An applicant for an ignition interlock driver's license who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive
a license only if the applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an ignition interlock
driver's license granted under this subsection no longer has a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles
operated by the driver, the director shall give written notice by
first-class mail to the driver that the ignition interlock driver's
license shall be canceled. If at any time before the cancellation goes
into effect the driver submits evidence that a functioning ignition
interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the
driver, the cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes
effective, the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new
ignition interlock driver's license upon submittal of evidence that a
functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all
vehicles operated by the driver.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an ignition interlock driver's license may request a
hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an ignition interlock driver's
license after receiving notice that the holder thereof has been
convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has been
convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any other
act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension or
revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give
notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person
whose ignition interlock driver's license has been canceled under this
section may reapply for a new ignition interlock driver's license if he
or she is otherwise qualified under this section and pays the fee
required under RCW 46.20.380.
(6)(a) Unless costs are waived by the ignition interlock company or
the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, the applicant shall pay
the cost of installing, removing, and leasing the ignition interlock
device and shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month.
Payments shall be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The
company shall remit the additional twenty-dollar fee to the department.
(b) The department shall deposit the proceeds of the twenty-dollar
fee into the ignition interlock device revolving account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to administer and operate the
ignition interlock device revolving account program. The department
shall adopt rules to provide monetary assistance according to greatest
need and when funds are available.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement ignition
interlock licensing. The department shall consult with the
administrative office of the courts, the state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, ignition interlock
companies, and any other organization or entity the department deems
appropriate.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.63.020 and 2010 c 252 s 3, 2010 c 161 s 1125, and
2010 c 8 s 9077 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title,
registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been destroyed or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the nonpayment of
taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and falsifying
residency when registering a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.19.050 relating to knowingly providing false information
in conjunction with an application for ((a)) special ((placard or
license plate for disabled persons')) parking privileges for persons
with disabilities;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) Section 4 of this act relating to operating a motor vehicle
without Z-designated license plates in violation of a driving record
notation that the license plates are required;
(14) Section 5 of this act relating to disguising or obscuring the
uppercase letter Z on Z-designated license plates;
(15) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(((14))) (16) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor
vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(((15))) (17) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, temporary restricted
driver's license, or ignition interlock driver's license;
(((16))) (18) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor
vehicle without an ignition interlock device in violation of a license
notation that the device is required;
(((17))) (19) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition
interlock device;
(((18))) (20) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's
licenses;
(((19))) (21) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial
responsibility;
(((20))) (22) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(((21))) (23) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device
information;
(((22))) (24) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(((23))) (25) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale,
distribution, or installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(((24))) (26) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal
preemption devices;
(((25))) (27) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home
pilot vehicles;
(((26))) (28) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of
dangerous articles;
(((27))) (29) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an
unattended car or other property;
(((28))) (30) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to
or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(((29))) (31) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers,
storage persons, and appraisers;
(((30))) (32) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the
driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer,
and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(((31))) (33) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities
of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(((32))) (34) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow
truck operators;
(((33))) (35) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(((34))) (36) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police
officers, flaggers, or firefighters;
(((35))) (37) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((36))) (38) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((37))) (39) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((38))) (40) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(((39))) (41) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((40))) (42) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((41))) (43) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((42))) (44) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((43))) (45) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((44))) (46) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((45))) (47) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((46))) (48) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((47))) (49) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((48))) (50) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((49))) (51) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((50))) (52) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((51))) (53) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((52))) (54) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((53))) (55) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((54))) (56) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((55))) (57) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((56))) (58) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((57))) (59) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((58))) (60) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((59))) (61) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((60))) (62) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((61))) (63) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((62))) (64) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---