BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that providing
supportive housing for chronically homeless individuals who are the
highest users of public crisis services results in improved outcomes
for the served individuals and the public. The legislature recognizes
that these individuals incur large costs through frequent use of
hospital emergency departments, detoxification and sobering facilities,
and jails. The legislature also finds that providing supportive
housing facilities for these individuals presents a valuable benefit
that improves public health and safety and reduces public spending,
particularly in the medicaid program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sums of one million dollars for
fiscal year 2012 and one million dollars for fiscal year 2013, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the state
general fund to the department of commerce solely for purposes of
supportive housing as described in this section.
(2) The department of commerce shall use amounts appropriated in
this section to contract for two geographically dispersed supportive
housing facilities comprising a combined total of at least one hundred
units. Such units must be targeted for use by chronically homeless
individuals who are the highest users of public crisis services.
(3) For purposes of this section, "supportive housing" means
housing that is available for lease to, and intended for, chronically
homeless individuals with mental illness, chemical dependency, or other
disabling or chronic health conditions, at which supportive services
are provided on site that are designed to assist tenants in achieving
and sustaining housing stability, but where participation in such
services is not a condition of ongoing tenancy.
(4) The department of commerce shall ensure that the individuals
selected for residency in the supportive housing will have the
characteristics and service utilization patterns known to be associated
with significant cost offsets once the individuals are housed.
(5) The legislature finds that investments in supportive housing
will result in prompt and near-term savings in medical assistance
expenditures on behalf of those individuals served by supportive
housing. For this reason, it is the intent of the legislature to
offset appropriations for supportive housing in this section with a
corresponding reduction in medical assistance appropriations in the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium operating appropriations act.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that amounts appropriated
in this section be considered ongoing rather than one-time and shall
carry forward into the operating budget for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium.

--- END ---