BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.29.011 and 2009 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
All personal service contracts shall be entered into pursuant to
competitive solicitation, except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) Sole source contracts;
(3) Contract amendments;
(4) Contracts between a consultant and an agency of less than
twenty thousand dollars. However, contracts of five thousand dollars
or greater but less than twenty thousand dollars shall have documented
evidence of competition, which must include agency posting of the
contract opportunity on the state's common vendor registration and bid
notification system. Agencies shall not structure contracts to evade
these requirements; ((and))
(5) Contracts between a consultant and an institution of higher
education of less than one hundred thousand dollars. However,
contracts of ten thousand dollars or greater but less than one hundred
thousand dollars shall have documented evidence of competition, which
must include an institution of higher education's posting of the
contract opportunity on the state's common vendor registration and bid
notification system. Institutions of higher education shall not
structure contracts to evade these requirements; and
(6) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of contracts
exempted from the competitive solicitation process by the director of
the office of financial management when it has been determined that a
competitive solicitation process is not appropriate or cost-effective.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.29.018 and 2009 c 486 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Sole source contracts shall be filed with the office of
financial management and made available for public inspection at least
ten working days prior to the proposed starting date of the contract.
Documented justification for sole source contracts shall be provided to
the office of financial management when the contract is filed, and must
include evidence that the agency posted the contract opportunity on the
state's common vendor registration and bid notification system. For
sole source contracts of twenty thousand dollars or more, documented
justification shall also include evidence that the agency attempted to
identify potential consultants by advertising through statewide or
regional newspapers.
(2) The office of financial management shall approve sole source
contracts of twenty thousand dollars or more before any such contract
becomes binding and before any services may be performed under the
contract. These requirements shall also apply to sole source contracts
of less than twenty thousand dollars if the total amount of such
contracts between an agency and the same consultant is twenty thousand
dollars or more within a fiscal year. Agencies shall ensure that the
costs, fees, or rates negotiated in filed sole source contracts of
twenty thousand dollars or more are reasonable.
(3) The requirements of this section shall not apply to sole source
contracts entered into by institutions of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.29.068 and 1998 c 245 s 33 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The office of financial management shall maintain a publicly
available list of all personal service contracts entered into by state
agencies during each fiscal year. For purposes of this section, state
agency does not include an institution of higher education. The list
shall identify the contracting agency, the contractor, the purpose of
the contract, effective dates and periods of performance, the cost of
the contract and funding source, any modifications to the contract, and
whether the contract was competitively procured or awarded on a sole
source basis. The office of financial management shall also ensure
that state accounting definitions and procedures are consistent with
RCW 39.29.006 and permit the reporting of personal services
expenditures by agency and by type of service. Designations of type of
services shall include, but not be limited to, management and
organizational services, legal and expert witness services, financial
services, computer and information services, social or technical
research, marketing, communications, and employee training or
recruiting services.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.14.025 and 2003 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. For purposes of this section, state
agency does not include institutions of higher education. The total
amount allotted for services to state agencies shall not exceed the
appropriation to the archives and records management account during any
allotment period.
(2) There is created the archives and records management account in
the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges
collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated
exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the division of archives and records management as
specified by law.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.06.285 and 1998 c 245 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury,
designated as the "higher education personnel service fund," to be used
by the board as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages,
and operations required for the administration of institutions of
higher education and related boards, the budget for which shall be
subject to review and approval and appropriation by the legislature.
((Subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an
amount not to exceed one-half of one percent of the salaries and wages
for all positions in the classified service)) An amount based on
services used shall be contributed from the operations appropriations
of each institution and the state board for community and technical
colleges and credited to the higher education personnel service fund as
such allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to
the above limitations, such amount shall be charged against the
allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director of financial
management from time to time, which will provide the board with funds
to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period.
(2) ((If employees of institutions of higher education cease to be
classified under this chapter pursuant to an agreement authorized by
RCW 41.56.201, each institution of higher education and the state board
for community and technical colleges shall continue, for six months
after the effective date of the agreement, to make contributions to the
higher education personnel service fund based on employee salaries and
wages that includes the employees under the agreement. At the
expiration of the six-month period, the director of financial
management shall make across-the-board reductions in allotments of the
higher education personnel service fund for the remainder of the
biennium so that the charge to the institutions of higher education and
state board for community and technical colleges based on the salaries
and wages of the remaining employees of institutions of higher
education and related boards classified under this chapter does not
increase during the biennium, unless an increase is authorized by the
legislature.
(3))) Moneys from the higher education personnel service fund shall
be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly
authorized by the board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.1906 and 2008 c 215 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on
competitive bids, and a formal sealed, electronic, or web-based bid
procedure, subject to RCW 43.19.1911, shall be used as standard
procedure for all purchases and contracts for purchases and sales
executed by the state purchasing and material control director and
under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939. This
requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases and
sales executed by agencies, including educational institutions, under
delegated authority granted in accordance with provisions of RCW
43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029. However, formal sealed, electronic,
or web-based competitive bidding is not necessary for:
(1) Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the
sealed bidding procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from
being met appropriately;
(2) Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That the state director of general administration shall
establish procedures to assure that purchases made by or on behalf of
the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial
management, to a lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state
agencies if considered necessary to maintain full disclosure of
competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall state
efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management,
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. The agency shall invite at least one quotation
each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who
shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. Immediately after the
award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A
record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management, shall be documented
for audit purposes. Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made
without competitive bids based on buyer experience and knowledge of the
market in achieving maximum quality at minimum cost;
(3) Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a
single source of supply and purchases involving special facilities,
services, or market conditions, in which instances the purchase price
may be best established by direct negotiation;
(4) Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management
division under RCW 43.41.310;
(5) Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients
of the department of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this
exemption is effective only when the state purchasing and material
control director, after consultation with the director of the division
of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate department of social and
health services procurement personnel, declares that such purchases may
be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;
(6) Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical
teaching or research purposes and by the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010, and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;
(7) Purchases for resale by institutions of higher education to
other than public agencies when such purchases are for the express
purpose of supporting instructional programs and may best be executed
through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers in order to meet
the special needs of the institution;
(8) Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding
((thirty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for
purchases between ((three)) ten thousand dollars and ((thirty-five))
one hundred thousand dollars quotations shall be secured from at least
three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive price and may be
obtained by telephone or written quotations, or both. For purchases
between ((three)) ten thousand dollars and ((thirty-five)) one hundred
thousand dollars, each institution of higher education shall invite at
least one quotation each from a certified minority and a certified
women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform such work.
A record of competition for all such purchases made from ((three)) ten
thousand to ((thirty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars shall be
documented for audit purposes;
(9) Off-contract purchases of Washington grown food when such food
is not available from Washington sources through an existing contract.
However, Washington grown food purchased under this subsection must be
of an equivalent or better quality than similar food available through
the contract and be able to be paid from the agency's existing budget.
This requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases
executed by state agencies, including institutions of higher education,
under delegated authority granted in accordance with RCW 43.19.190 or
under RCW 28B.10.029; and
(10) Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation,
valid until June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to
provide roving service patrols in one or more Washington state patrol
tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators wishing to
participate would cooperatively, with the department of transportation,
develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions negotiated by
the parties.
Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1st of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by
the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of
inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar
figure in subsections (2) ((and (8))) of this section may not be
adjusted to exceed five thousand dollars.
As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition in
RCW 15.64.060.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.41.130 and 2010 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management, after consultation with
other interested or affected state agencies, shall establish overall
policies governing the acquisition, operation, management, maintenance,
repair, and disposal of all motor vehicles owned or operated by any
state agency. These policies shall include but not be limited to a
definition of what constitutes authorized use of a state owned or
controlled passenger motor vehicle and other motor vehicles on official
state business. The definition shall include, but not be limited to,
the use of state-owned motor vehicles for commuter ride sharing so long
as the entire capital depreciation and operational expense of the
commuter ride-sharing arrangement is paid by the commuters. Any use
other than such defined use shall be considered as personal use.
(2)(a) By June 15, 2010, the director of the department of general
administration, in consultation with the office and other interested or
affected state agencies, shall develop strategies to assist state
agencies in reducing fuel consumption and emissions from all classes of
vehicles.
(b) In an effort to achieve lower overall emissions for all classes
of vehicles, state agencies should, when financially comparable over
the vehicle's useful life, consider purchasing or converting to ultra-low carbon fuel vehicles.
(3) State agencies shall phase in fuel economy standards for motor
pools and leased petroleum-based fuel vehicles to achieve an average
fuel economy standard of thirty-six miles per gallon for passenger
vehicle fleets by 2015.
(4) After June 15, 2010, state agencies shall:
(a) When purchasing new petroleum-based fuel vehicles for vehicle
fleets: (i) Achieve an average fuel economy of forty miles per gallon
for light duty passenger vehicles; and (ii) achieve an average fuel
economy of twenty-seven miles per gallon for light duty vans and sports
utility vehicles; or
(b) Purchase ultra-low carbon fuel vehicles.
(5) State agencies must report annually on the progress made to
achieve the goals under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
beginning October 31, 2011.
(6) The department of general administration, in consultation with
the office and other affected or interested agencies, shall develop a
separate fleet fuel economy standard for all other classes of
petroleum-based fuel vehicles and report the progress made toward
meeting the fuel consumption and emissions goals established by this
section to the governor and the relevant legislative committees by
December 1, 2012.
(7) The following vehicles are excluded from the average fuel
economy goals established in subsections (3) and (4) of this section:
Emergency response vehicles, passenger vans with a gross vehicle weight
of eight thousand five hundred pounds or greater, vehicles that are
purchased for off-pavement use, ultra-low carbon fuel vehicles, ((and))
vehicles that are driven less than two thousand miles per year, and
vehicles that are owned by institutions of higher education.
(8) Average fuel economy calculations used under this section for
petroleum-based fuel vehicles must be based upon the current United
States environmental protection agency composite city and highway mile
per gallon rating.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Petroleum-based fuel vehicle" means a vehicle that uses, as a
fuel source, more than ten percent gasoline or diesel fuel.
(b) "Ultra-low carbon fuel vehicle" means a vehicle that uses, as
a fuel source, at least ninety percent natural gas, hydrogen,
biomethane, or electricity.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.88.160 and 2006 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and
responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The
regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall
provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and
control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition,
such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.
(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor,
through the director of financial management, shall devise and
supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to
the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements,
resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central
accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail
deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial
management. The director of financial management shall adopt and
periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director
adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from
complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted
to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of
financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other
reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any
period.
(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of
financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary
operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload
estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means
to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance
between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget
period.
(3) The director of financial management shall report at least
annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status
of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation
projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are
shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management
shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project
is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated
start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled
claims at the time of completion.
(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of
the governor, shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal
audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency
that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of
its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage
adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and
financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include
criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of
resources at risk.
Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the
responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal
audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of
internal auditors;
(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of
determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of
manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures
for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from
training facilities made available to state employees;
(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care
services;
(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or
lack of coordination among agencies;
(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes
thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED,
That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit
systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established
by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for
recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate
standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the
fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except
that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans
may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies
headed by elective officials;
(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee
years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend
the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the
director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for
the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(5) The treasurer shall:
(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not
expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some
other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those
public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not
subject to appropriation;
(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the
treasurer's supervision or custody;
(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and
disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;
(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and
other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization
under RCW 43.41.180;
(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by
regulations issued pursuant to this law.
It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in
the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed
by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative
means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency
head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered
or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or
grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case
of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance
services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable
under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so
made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than
equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035,
such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such
services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to
the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the
department of general administration but in no case shall such required
cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully
indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of
promise to fully perform such services. Except for institutions of
higher education, no payments shall be made in advance for any
equipment maintenance services to be performed more than twelve months
after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned
that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will
apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for
recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section
shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's designee in
accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance
funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before
services have been rendered or material furnished.
(6) The state auditor shall:
(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits
that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to
this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the
books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with
the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible
in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings
from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a
section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of
this subsection.
(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon
any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.
(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The
report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include
determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied
with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to
perform or participate in performance verifications and performance
audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan
approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The
state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial
compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may
report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by
the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to
the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts
are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a
legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the
agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the
management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor
makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the
committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be
construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis
resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the
appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results
of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only
be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.
(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that
have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other
practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and
to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record,
including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of
financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six
months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of
funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial
management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit
resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state
auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial
management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of
personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped
goods or services.
(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.
(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW.
(((g))) In addition to the authority given to the state auditor in
this subsection (6), the state auditor is authorized to conduct
performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470. Nothing in this
subsection (6) shall limit, impede, or restrict the state auditor from
conducting performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470.
(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:
(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency
and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter
44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To
this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books,
accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.
(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative
committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the
performance and management of state agencies.
(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least
the following:
(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making
expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this
connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial
practices of any agencies; and
(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the
state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and
economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 1998 c 101 s 10 is repealed.

--- END ---