BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Civil marriage is a legal institution
recognized by the state in order to promote stable relationships and to
protect individuals who are in those relationships. Civil marriage is
based on a civil contract between two persons and does not require the
sanction or involvement of religious institutions. Civil marriage
provides important protections for the families of those who are
married, including not only children and other dependents they may
have, but also members of their extended families. The legislature and
the people of the state of Washington find that strong, healthy
families promote social stability and economic growth, and that these
families are supported and protected by the mutual obligations and
benefits conferred by civil marriage licenses. On these bases, the
state therefore has a strong interest in ending discrimination against
otherwise qualified applicants for a civil marriage license, including
discrimination on the basis of sex or sexual orientation of the
applicants.
(2) The legislature finds and declares as follows:
(a) Despite longstanding social and economic discrimination, many
gay and lesbian Washingtonians have formed lasting, committed, caring,
and mutually supportive relationships with persons of their same sex.
These couples live together, participate in their communities together,
and many raise children and care for family members together, just as
do heterosexual couples who have the option to marry under Washington
law.
(b) The state of Washington has a proud tradition of respect for
the principle that no human being should be denied his or her full
rights and responsibilities under the law.
(c) According to the 2000 census, Washington state is home to at
least sixteen thousand same sex couples, ranking ninth among the fifty
states in the number of same sex couples. Same sex couples live in all
thirty-nine counties in Washington, and nearly one in four of these
couples is raising children. While some of these couples may have
domestic partner registrations, such arrangements do not offer the same
scope and depth of rights, responsibilities, privileges, and
protections offered by civil marriages, nor do they provide any legal
standing outside the jurisdiction in which they occur.
(d) Marriage laws support the core values of commitment and
responsibility. Washington's discriminatory exclusion of same sex
couples from marriage harms those couples and their families by denying
those couples and their families specific and equal rights and
responsibilities under state and federal law. At least four hundred
twenty-three Washington state statutes confer rights, benefits, or
obligations depending upon marital status, many of which are currently
unavailable to Washington's same sex couples even with Washington's
domestic partnership law.
(e) Washington's domestic partnership laws have provided limited
relief for same sex couples, but the state's discriminatory exclusion
of same sex couples from marriage harms same sex couples and their
families by denying them the unique public recognition and affirmation
that civil marriage confers on other couples, and the opportunity to
express their mutual dedication through the uniquely recognized rituals
of marriage.
(f) Most states do not recognize civil marriage between same sex
couples, but some of those states may have domestic partnership laws
and may recognize domestic partnerships created in Washington. In
addition, Washington's reciprocity statute recognizes domestic
partnerships created in other states. Therefore, to protect Washington
citizens traveling to other states and to allow Washington to continue
recognizing domestic partnerships created in other states, the
legislature intends to retain Washington's domestic partnership
statutes until there is consistency throughout the states that provide
adequate protection for Washington's citizens.
(g) The legislature has an interest in encouraging and supporting
loving, stable, committed, caregiving relationships through civil
marriage regardless of the sex or sexual orientation of the partners.
(h) No official of any religious denomination or nonprofit
institution authorized to solemnize marriages shall be required to
solemnize any marriage in violation of his or her right to free
exercise of religion guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution or by the Washington state Constitution.
(3) It is the intent of this act to end discrimination in marriage
based on sex and sexual orientation in Washington, to ensure that all
persons in this state may enjoy the freedom to marry on equal terms,
while also respecting the religious freedom rights of clergy and
religious institutions to determine for whom to perform marriage
ceremonies and which marriages to recognize for religious purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.010 and 1998 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriage is a civil contract between ((a male and a female))
two persons who have each attained the age of eighteen years, and who
are otherwise capable.
(2) Every marriage entered into in which either ((the husband or
the wife)) person has not attained the age of seventeen years is void
except where this section has been waived by a superior court judge of
the county in which one of the parties resides on a showing of
necessity.
(3) Where necessary to implement the rights and responsibilities of
spouses under the law, gender specific terms such as husband and wife
shall be construed to be gender neutral.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriages in the following cases are prohibited:
(a) When either party thereto has a ((wife or husband)) spouse
living at the time of such marriage; or
(b) When the ((husband and wife)) spouses are nearer of kin to each
other than second cousins, whether of the whole or half blood computing
by the rules of the civil law((; or
(c) When the parties are persons other than a male and a female)).
(2) It is unlawful for any man to marry his father's sister,
mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's daughter,
brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is unlawful for any woman
to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son, brother, son's
son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son.
(3) A marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in
another jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not
prohibited or made unlawful under subsection (1)(a)((, (1)(c),)) or (2)
of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.60.010 and 2007 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Many Washingtonians are in intimate, committed, and exclusive
relationships with another person to whom they are not legally married.
These relationships are important to the individuals involved and their
families; they also benefit the public by providing a private source of
mutual support for the financial, physical, and emotional health of
those individuals and their families. The public has an interest in
providing a legal framework for such mutually supportive relationships,
whether the partners are of the same or different sexes, and
irrespective of their sexual orientation.
((The legislature finds that same sex couples, because they cannot
marry in this state, do not automatically have the same access that
married couples have to certain rights and benefits, such as those
associated with hospital visitation, health care decision-making, organ
donation decisions, and other issues related to illness, incapacity,
and death. Although many of these rights and benefits may be secured
by private agreement, doing so often is costly and complex.))
The legislature ((also)) finds that the public interest would be
served by extending rights and benefits to different sex couples in
which either or both of the partners is at least sixty-two years of
age. While these couples are entitled to marry under the state's
marriage statutes, some social security and pension laws nevertheless
make it impractical for these couples to marry. For this reason,
chapter 156, Laws of 2007 specifically allows couples to enter into a
state registered domestic partnership if one of the persons is at least
sixty-two years of age, the age at which many people choose to retire
and are eligible to begin collecting social security and pension
benefits.
The rights granted to state registered domestic partners in chapter
156, Laws of 2007 will further Washington's interest in promoting
family relationships and protecting family members during life crises.
Chapter 156, Laws of 2007 does not affect marriage or any other ways in
which legal rights and responsibilities between two adults may be
created, recognized, or given effect in Washington.

--- END ---