BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.050 and 2006 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Drivers of commercial motor vehicles shall obtain a commercial
driver's license as required under this chapter. Except when driving
under a commercial driver's instruction permit and a valid automobile
or classified license and accompanied by the holder of a commercial
driver's license valid for the vehicle being driven, no person may
drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the person holds and is in
immediate possession of a commercial driver's license and applicable
endorsements valid for the vehicle they are driving. However, this
requirement does not apply to any person:
(a) Who is the operator of a farm vehicle, and the vehicle is:
(i) Controlled and operated by a farmer;
(ii) Used to transport either agricultural products, which in this
section include Christmas trees and wood products harvested from
private tree farms and transported by vehicles weighing no more than
forty thousand pounds licensed gross vehicle weight, farm machinery,
farm supplies, animal manure, animal manure compost, or any combination
of those materials to or from a farm;
(iii) Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor
carrier; and
(iv) Used within one hundred fifty miles of the person's farm; or
(b) Who is a firefighter or law enforcement officer operating
emergency equipment, and:
(i) The firefighter or law enforcement officer has successfully
completed a driver training course approved by the director; and
(ii) The firefighter or law enforcement officer carries a
certificate attesting to the successful completion of the approved
training course; or
(c) Who is operating a recreational vehicle for noncommercial
purposes. As used in this section, "recreational vehicle" includes a
vehicle towing a horse trailer for a noncommercial purpose; or
(d) Who is operating a commercial motor vehicle for military
purposes. This ((exemption)) exception is applicable to active duty
military personnel; members of the military reserves; members of the
national guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time
national guard duty, personnel on part-time national guard training,
and national guard military technicians (civilians who are required to
wear military uniforms); and active duty United States coast guard
personnel. This exception is not applicable to United States reserve
technicians.
(2) No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle while his or her
driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while subject to
disqualification, or in violation of an out-of-service order.
Violations of this subsection shall be punished in the same way as
violations of RCW 46.20.342(1).
(3) The department shall to the extent possible enter into
reciprocity agreements with adjoining states to allow the waivers
described in subsection (1) of this section to apply to drivers holding
commercial driver's licenses from those adjoining states.

--- END ---