BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.2795 and 1994 c 158 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
By ((April)) September 1st of each year, the legislative authority
of each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional
transit authority shall prepare a six-year transit development plan for
that calendar year and the ensuing five years. The program shall be
consistent with the comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns, pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW, the
inherent authority of a first-class city or charter county derived from
its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW. The program shall contain
information as to how the municipality intends to meet state and local
long-range priorities for public transportation, capital improvements,
significant operating changes planned for the system, and how the
municipality intends to fund program needs. The six-year plan for each
municipality and regional transit authority shall specifically set
forth those projects of regional significance for inclusion in the
transportation improvement program within that region. Each
municipality and regional transit authority shall file the six-year
program with the state department of transportation, the transportation
improvement board, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils
within which the municipality is located.
In developing its program, the municipality and the regional
transit authority shall consider those policy recommendations affecting
public transportation contained in the state transportation policy plan
approved by the state transportation commission and, where appropriate,
adopted by the legislature. The municipality shall conduct one or more
public hearings while developing its program and for each annual
update.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.58.2796 and 2005 c 319 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall develop an annual report
summarizing the status of public transportation systems in the state
for the previous calendar year. By ((September)) December 1st of each
year, ((copies of)) the report ((shall be submitted)) must be made
available to the transportation committees of the legislature and to
each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and to individual
members of the municipality's legislative authority.
(2) To assist the department with preparation of the report, each
municipality shall file a system report by ((April)) September 1st of
each year with the state department of transportation identifying its
public transportation services for the previous calendar year and its
objectives for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of those
services. The system report shall address those items required for
each public transportation system in the department's report.
(3) The department report shall describe individual public
transportation systems, including contracted transportation services
and dial-a-ride services, and include a statewide summary of public
transportation issues and data. The descriptions shall include the
following elements and such other elements as the department deems
appropriate after consultation with the municipalities and the
transportation committees of the legislature:
(((1))) (a) Equipment and facilities, including vehicle replacement
standards;
(((2))) (b) Services and service standards;
(((3))) (c) Revenues, expenses, and ending balances, by fund
source;
(((4))) (d) Policy issues and system improvement objectives,
including community participation in development of those objectives
and how those objectives address statewide transportation priorities;
(((5))) (e) Operating indicators applied to public transportation
services, revenues, and expenses. Operating indicators shall include
operating cost per passenger trip, operating cost per revenue vehicle
service hour, passenger trips per revenue service hour, passenger trips
per vehicle service mile, vehicle service hours per employee, and
farebox revenue as a percent of operating costs.
(4) To the extent that information is available, the department
report must include descriptive information on any other modes of
public transportation, the impact of public transportation on
transportation system performance, and how public transportation helps
the state meet the transportation system policy goals described in RCW
47.04.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
New state facilities must be sited in areas adequately accessible
by transit service.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.101 and 2006 c 334 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall have the authority and it shall be his or her
duty:
(1) To serve as chief executive officer of the department with full
administrative authority to direct all its activities;
(2) To organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to
carry out the work and responsibilities of the department effectively;
(3) To designate and establish such transportation district,
region, or branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and to
appoint assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to
them or any officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary
to administer the department efficiently, which includes designating an
employee in each region to be responsible for integrating public
transportation into all state transportation planning and programming
activities and fostering greater partnerships between the state and
public transportation providers;
(4) To direct and coordinate the programs of the various divisions
of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible
mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate
unnecessary duplication of activity;
(5) To adopt all department rules that are subject to the adoption
procedures contained in the state administrative procedure act, except
rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute;
(6) To maintain and safeguard the official records of the
department, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders;
(7) To provide, under contract or interagency agreement, staff
support to the commission, including long-term technical and
administrative support as needed, to assist it in carrying out its
functions, powers, and duties;
(8) To execute and implement the biennial operating budget for the
operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and
with legislative appropriation;
(9) To advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(10) To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as
are now or hereafter provided by law.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.01.141 and 1987 c 505 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall submit a biennial report to the governor and
chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives with a copy to the staff of each of the committees,
including but not limited to operational and construction activities of
the preceding fiscal period as the department deems important, a report
regarding the integration of public transportation into state
transportation planning and programming activities and the fostering of
greater partnerships between the state and public transportation
providers, and recommendations for future operations of the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.04.280 and 2010 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this
section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement
of these policy goals:
(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation
systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and
goods to ensure a prosperous economy;
(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for
establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance
measures.
(4)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management establish objectives and performance measures for
the department of transportation and other state agencies with
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system
performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses
toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1)
of this section. The office of financial management shall submit
initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
the 2008 legislative session. The office of financial management shall
submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management collaborate with the department of transportation,
the Washington state transit association, and state and local agencies
with public transportation-related responsibilities to establish
objectives and performance measures for the department of
transportation and other state and local agencies with public
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure that public
transportation system performance at local, regional, and state
government levels progresses toward the attainment of the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section, which must, at a minimum,
include objectives and performance measures regarding safety,
efficiency, revenue, and cost. The office of financial management
shall submit initial objectives and performance measures to the
legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the
commission during the 2012 legislative session. The office of
financial management shall include these objectives and performance
measures in its preexisting reporting that the office of financial
management submits to the legislature for its review and shall provide
copies of the same to the commission during each regular session of the
legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.
(5) This section does not create a private right of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes the benefit that transit facilities
provide to motor vehicle traffic by facilitating the efficient
utilization in the operation of highways and reducing congestion and
hazardous driving conditions. The legislature further recognizes that
the Washington supreme court has identified these outcomes as
implicitly related to the specific highway purposes delineated in the
18th amendment to the state Constitution. As such, it is the intent of
the legislature that the department not charge state agencies airspace
leases for the use of highway right-of-way for transit facilities. For
purposes of this section, "transit facility" means all benches, kiosks,
lighting, waste receptacles, and shelters owned by a public
transportation system identified under RCW 82.14.045 and regional
transit authorities identified under chapter 81.112 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.06.140 and 2009 c 514 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares the following transportation
facilities and services to be of statewide significance: Highways of
statewide significance as designated by the legislature under chapter
47.05 RCW, the interstate highway system, interregional state principal
arterials including ferry connections that serve statewide travel,
intercity passenger rail services, intercity high-speed ground
transportation, major passenger intermodal terminals including
facilities such as park and ride lots and transit centers but excluding
all airport facilities and services, the freight railroad system, the
Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and
services that are related solely to marine activities affecting
international and interstate trade, key freight transportation
corridors serving these marine port facilities, and high capacity
transportation systems serving regions as defined in RCW 81.104.015.
The department, in cooperation with regional transportation planning
organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies, public ports,
private railroad operators, and private transportation providers, as
appropriate, shall plan for improvements to transportation facilities
and services of statewide significance in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan. Improvements to facilities and services of
statewide significance identified in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan, or to highways of statewide significance
designated by the legislature under chapter 47.05 RCW, are essential
state public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.
(2) The department of transportation, in consultation with local
governments, shall set level of service standards for state highways
and state ferry routes of statewide significance. Although the
department shall consult with local governments when setting level of
service standards, the department retains authority to make final
decisions regarding level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes of statewide significance. In establishing level of
service standards for state highways and state ferry routes of
statewide significance, the department shall consider the necessary
balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of
people and goods and the needs of local communities using these
facilities. When setting the level of service standards under this
section for state ferry routes, the department may allow for a standard
that is adjustable for seasonality.

--- END ---