BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.13.030 and 1985 c 412 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Starting on the date a producer delivers grain, hay, or straw to a
preparer, the producer has a first priority statutory lien, referred to
as a "preparer lien." This preparer lien shall continue ((twenty))
forty-five days after payment for the product is due and remains
unpaid, without filing any notice of lien, for the contract price, if
any, or the fair market value of the products delivered. The preparer
lien attaches to the agricultural products delivered by the producer to
the preparer, and to the preparer's accounts receivable.

--- END ---