BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state agency or municipality may waive the payment and
performance bond requirements under chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage
requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW for public works projects with a
total contract amount of five thousand dollars or less, exclusive of
sales tax.
(2) A state agency or municipality electing to waive payment and
performance bonds under subsection (1) of this section assumes the
liability for the contractor's and their subcontractors' nonpayment of
laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, and suppliers.
The state agency or municipality shall have the right of recovery
against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's or
subcontractors' behalf.
(3) A state agency or municipality electing to waive the retainage
requirements under subsection (1) of this section assumes the liability
for the contractor's or subcontractors' nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW. The state agency or
municipality shall have the right of recovery against the contractor
for any payments made on the contractor's or subcontractors' behalf.
(4) A state agency or municipality electing to waive payment and
performance bonds and retainage under this section must establish and
adopt procedures implementing the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.040 and 2009 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it shall be the duty
of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:
(a) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(b) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to said officer. Unless otherwise
authorized by the department of labor and industries, each voucher
claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project estimate shall
state that the prevailing wages have been paid in accordance with the
prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay prevailing wages on
file with the public agency. Following the final acceptance of a
public works project, it shall be the duty of the officer charged with
the disbursement of public funds, to require the contractor and each
and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to
submit to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid" before the funds
retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011 are released to
the contractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
before it is submitted to said officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of ((two thousand five
hundred)) five thousand dollars or less ((and)), exclusive of sales
tax, or for projects where the limited public works process under RCW
39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in this subsection (2) ((of
this section)), the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to
the claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than
((two thousand five hundred)) five thousand dollars for the purpose of
circumventing the procedures required by ((RCW 39.12.040(1)))
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---