BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In recognition of the extraordinary
sacrifices made by the men and women serving in the United States armed
forces, including Washington state's national guard and reserves, the
legislature intends to authorize an ongoing source of funding to
preserve the veterans innovations program. This important program
provides assistance to military members and their families who face
extreme financial hardships due to extended deployments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning in calendar year 2011, and on an annual basis thereafter,
the lottery will offer a statewide raffle to benefit veterans and their
families. The veterans raffle ticket will go on sale on Labor Day with
a drawing to occur on Veteran's Day, November 11th of each year.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.240 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund created in RCW 43.135.045 and the Washington opportunity pathways
account created in RCW 28B.76.526. On and after July 1, 2010, all
deposits not otherwise obligated under this section shall be placed in
the Washington opportunity pathways account. Moneys in the state
lottery account deposited in the Washington opportunity pathways
account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For transfer to the veterans innovations program account. The
net revenues received from the sale of the annual Veteran's Day lottery
raffle conducted under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the
veterans innovations program account created in RCW 43.60A.185 for
purposes of serving veterans and their families. For purposes under
this subsection, "net revenues" means all revenues received from the
sale of veteran lottery raffle tickets less the sum of the amount paid
out in prizes and the actual administration expenses of the lottery
solely related to the veteran lottery raffle.
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (8) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

--- END ---