BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.900 and 2009 c 515 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The agency council on coordinated transportation is terminated on
June 30, ((2011, as provided in RCW 47.06B.901)) 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.901 and 2009 c 515 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2012)) 2014:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 2009 c 515 s 3, 2007 c 421 s 1, 1999 c 385
s 1, & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.020 and 2009 c 515 s 4, 2007 c 421 s 2, & 1998 c 173
s 2;
(4) RCW 47.06B.030 and ((2009 c 515 s 5,)) 2007 c 421 s 3, 1999 c
385 s 5, & 1998 c 173 s 3;
(5) RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c 421 s 4 & 1999 c 385 s 6;
(6) RCW 47.06B.050 and 2009 c 515 s 8 & 2007 c 421 s 6;
(7) RCW 47.06B.060 and 2009 c 515 s 1;
(8) ((Section 2 of this act;
(9) Section 6 of this act;
(10) Section 7 of this act;
(11))) RCW 47.06B.070 and 2009 c 515 s 9;
(((12))) (9) RCW 47.06B.075 and 2009 c 515 s 10; and
(((13))) (10) RCW 47.06B.080 and 2009 c 515 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2011.

--- END ---