BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the structure
of the rapidly changing economy of our state and nation places a high
premium on education, both in the workplace and in civic life. In
addition, one of the most significant levers to make long-term
improvements in the state's economy is education.
(2) The legislature further finds that Washington state is
underperforming other states on a number of education indicators and
outcomes:
(a) Washington is below the national average in the percent of
children aged three to five who are not enrolled in early learning,
preschool, or kindergarten;
(b) Washington is listed among the bottom five states seeing an
increase, rather than a decline, in the achievement gap between white
and Asian students and other students of color as measured by national
reading and mathematics assessments;
(c) Washington ranks below the national average for on-time
graduation from high school;
(d) Washington ranks forty-seventh in the nation for the percentage
of young adults aged eighteen to twenty-four enrolled in college; and
(e) Washington ranks below the national average for per capita
state and local financial support for higher education.
(3) Therefore, strategic investments must be made to enhance and
improve public education in Washington, from early learning through
higher education. Furthermore, these investments must be identified
and funded in a thoughtful and responsible manner. The legislature
intends to establish a deliberative process for identifying
incremental, strategic investments to enhance and improve public
education, as well as providing the funding necessary to support the
investments through the modification and elimination of current tax
preferences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Public education" means:
(a) Early learning programs and services supported by public funds
and administered by the department of early learning;
(b) Instruction and programs delivered by the common schools
defined under RCW 28A.150.020, including but not limited to the program
of basic education defined under RCW 28A.150.200;
(c) Programs and services delivered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to benefit the students and staff
of the common schools;
(d) Instruction, programs, and research at institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; and
(e) State programs for higher education student financial aid.
(2) "Tax preference" has the definition in RCW 43.136.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Each odd-numbered year, the legislature
shall identify and establish a set of strategic investments to enhance
and improve public education.
(2) The strategic investments shall be established through the
omnibus appropriations act or other legislation, which must enumerate
each proposed investment and its estimated projected annual cost if the
investment were implemented beginning July 1st of the next ensuing odd-numbered year. The purpose of this budget proviso or other legislation
is to identify proposed strategic investments and their estimated
costs, but the investments proposed are not binding and do not take
effect without further implementing legislation as provided in section
5 of this act.
(3) In identifying the strategic investments, the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature shall:
(a) Hold public hearings to receive input on investment priorities
for education;
(b) Receive recommendations from the quality education council
regarding priorities for early learning and the common schools; and
(c) Receive recommendations from the state board for community and
technical colleges and the higher education coordinating board
regarding priorities for higher education.
(4) After the budget proviso or other legislation under this
section is signed into law, the office of the governor shall notify the
citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences
created in RCW 43.136.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Upon receipt of the notification from
the office of the governor under section 3 of this act, the citizen
commission for performance measurement of tax preferences shall
identify and recommend the repeal or modification of a set of tax
preferences that are expected to create sufficient revenue for the
state general fund to make the strategic investments included in the
legislation under section 3 of this act beginning July 1st of the next
ensuing odd-numbered year.
(2)(a) The commission shall submit its recommendations under this
section to the legislature in the form of proposed implementing
legislation by December 1st of each odd-numbered year.
(b) The proposed implementing legislation must include each tax
preference to be modified or repealed, necessary amendments to current
law to implement the modifications or repeals, and the estimated
revenue to the state general fund associated with the modifications or
repeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) During the legislative session convened
each even-numbered year, the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature shall hold a public hearing on the proposed legislation
submitted by the citizen commission for performance measurement of tax
preferences under section 4 of this act.
(2) Legislation to implement the recommendations of the commission
must be divided into two parts as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) Part I must be the proposed legislation submitted by the
citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences under
section 4 of this act, which shall be adopted or rejected as submitted
except that provisions of the legislation may be amended if approved by
a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature.
(b) Part II must contain:
(i) The specific strategic investments to enhance and improve
public education that will be made with the estimated revenue and their
projected costs beginning July 1st of the next ensuing odd-numbered
year;
(ii) Any amendments to current law or other authorizing provisions
necessary to implement the strategic investments;
(iii) A determination of how the estimated revenue associated with
the modifications or repeal of tax preferences must be distributed,
including the estimated amounts to be deposited in the strategic
investments in education account created in section 6 of this act; and
(iv) A direction to the state treasurer to deposit the estimated
revenue as determined under (b)(iii) of this subsection into the
strategic investments in education account for the purposes of making
the strategic investments identified in the legislation.
(3) Legislation enacted to implement the recommendations of the
commission under this section shall be submitted as a referendum bill
to the people at the next general election as provided under Article
II, section 1 of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The strategic investments in education
account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Interest earned on moneys in the
account remain in the account.
(2) Moneys in the strategic investments in education account must
be used to make the strategic investments to enhance and improve public
education identified in the legislation enacted and approved under
section 5 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the strategic investments
in education account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the urban arterial trust account, the volunteer firefighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account.
Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent
fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent
fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---