BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the retirement
and annuity programs of the state's institutions of higher education be
revised for future participants to reflect changes that have already
occurred in state pension plans. The legislature intends also that
newly hired employees who are eligible for participation in an annuity
or retirement income plan offered by a higher education institution
have an opportunity to participate in either (1) that plan without a
supplemental benefit under RCW 28B.10.400(3), or (2) the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 or the teachers' retirement system
plan 3. Plan 3 provides a combination of defined contribution and
defined benefit pension, which will be available for newly hired
employees. Further, the legislature intends that effective July 1,
2011, state funding for annuity or retirement income plans under RCW
28B.10.400 will not exceed six percent of salary. The legislature also
intends to reduce the expanded postretirement employment provisions for
members of the public employees' retirement system and the teachers'
retirement system plans 1 that were temporarily expanded due to the
shortage of qualified workers in particular teaching and public
employment categories, and eliminate postretirement employment
exceptions that existed for annuity or retirement income plan-covered
positions that have been the subject of abuse.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.400 and 2010 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, ((and)) the state board for community and technical colleges,
and the higher education coordinating board are authorized and
empowered:
(((1))) (a) To assist the faculties and ((such other)) senior
academic administrator employees as any such board may designate in the
purchase of old age annuities or retirement income plans under such
rules as any such board may prescribe, subject to the restrictions in
subsection (2) of this section. County agricultural agents, home
demonstration agents, 4-H club agents, and assistant county
agricultural agents paid jointly by the Washington State University and
the several counties shall be deemed to be full time employees of the
Washington State University for the purposes ((hereof)) of this
section;
(((2))) (b) To provide, under such rules ((and regulations)) as any
such board may prescribe for the faculty members or ((other)) senior
academic administrator employees under its supervision, for the
retirement of any such faculty member or ((other)) senior academic
administrator employee on account of age or condition of health,
retirement on account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth
birthday: PROVIDED, That such faculty member or ((such other)) senior
academic administrator employee may elect to retire at the earliest age
specified for retirement by federal social security law: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any supplemental payment authorized by (c) of this
subsection (((3) of this section)) and paid as a result of retirement
earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an actuarially reduced rate;
and shall be provided only to those persons who participate in an
annuity or retirement income plan under (a) of this subsection prior to
July 1, 2011;
(((3))) (c) To pay ((to any such retired person)) only to those
persons who participate in an annuity or retirement income plan under
(a) of this subsection prior to July 1, 2011, or to his or her
designated beneficiary(s), each year after his or her retirement, a
supplemental amount which, when added to the amount of such annuity or
retirement income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW
28B.10.415, received by the retired person or the retired person's
designated beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent
of the average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her
highest two consecutive years of full time service under an annuity or
retirement income plan established pursuant to (a) of this subsection
(((1) of this section)) at an institution of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if such retired person prior to retirement
elected a supplemental payment survivors option, any such supplemental
payments to such retired person or the retired person's designated
beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan
authorized by this section dies, or has died before retirement but
after becoming eligible for retirement on account of age, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be entitled to receive the supplemental
payment authorized by this subsection to which such designated
beneficiary(s) would have been entitled had said deceased faculty
member or other employee retired on the date of death after electing a
supplemental payment survivors option: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the
purpose of this subsection, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be
(((a))) (i) the surviving spouse of the retiree; or, (((b))) (ii) with
the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person or
persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life and
shall have been nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the retiree's institution of higher education((;)).
(((4))) (2) Boards are prohibited from offering a purchased annuity
or retirement income plan authorized under this section to employees
hired on or after July 1, 2011, who have retired or are eligible to
retire from a public employees' retirement system described in RCW
41.50.030. The higher education coordinating board ((is also
authorized and empowered as described in this section, subject to the
following: The board)) shall only offer participation in a purchased
annuity or retirement income plan authorized under this section to
employees who have previously contributed premiums to a similar
qualified plan((, and the board is prohibited from offering or funding
such a plan authorized under this section for the benefit of any
retiree who is receiving or accruing a retirement allowance from a
public employees' retirement system under Title 41 RCW or chapter 43.43
RCW)).
(3) For purposes of this chapter, "senior academic administrator"
means presidents; vice presidents; deans, directors, and chairs; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions who
either hold concurrent faculty appointment with rank, or are employed
by the state board for community and technical colleges or the higher
education coordinating board.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.405 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Members of the faculties and ((such other)) senior academic
administrator employees as are designated by the boards of regents of
the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional
universities and of The Evergreen State College, the higher education
coordinating board, or the state board for community and technical
colleges ((education)) who do not opt to become members of the
teachers' retirement system or the public employees' retirement system
under section 9 or 18 of this act, or who are not prevented from
participation in an annuity or retirement plan under RCW 28B.10.400(2)
shall be required to contribute not less than five percent of their
salaries during each year of full time service after the first two
years of such service toward the purchase of such annuity or retirement
income plan; such contributions may be in addition to federal social
security tax contributions, if any.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.410 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, the higher education coordinating board, or the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) shall pay not more
than one-half of the annual premium of any annuity or retirement income
plan established under the provisions of RCW 28B.10.400 ((as now or
hereafter amended)). Such contribution shall not exceed ten percent of
the salary of the faculty member or other employee on whose behalf the
contribution is made. This contribution may be in addition to federal
social security tax contributions made by the boards, if any.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.10.415 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, the higher education coordinating board, or the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) shall not pay any
amount to be added to the annuity or retirement income plan of any
retired person who was first hired on or after July 1, 2011, or who has
served for less than ten years in one or more of the state institutions
of higher education. In the case of persons who have served more than
ten years but less than twenty-five years no amount shall be paid in
excess of four percent of the amount authorized in ((subdivision (3)
of)) RCW 28B.10.400 ((as now or hereafter amended)) (1)(c), multiplied
by the number of years of full time service rendered by such person:
PROVIDED, That credit for years of service at an institution of higher
education shall be limited to those years in which contributions were
made by a faculty member or other employee designated pursuant to RCW
28B.10.400(1)(a) and the institution or the state as a result of which
a benefit is being received by a retired person from any Washington
state public retirement plan: PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such benefits
that a retired person is eligible to receive shall reduce any
supplementation payments provided for in RCW 28B.10.400 ((as now or
hereafter amended)).

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.10.417 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first
employed by a higher education institution in a position eligible for
participation in an annuity or retirement program under RCW 28B.10.400
prior to July 1, 2011.
(2) A faculty member or ((other)) senior academic administrator
employee designated by the board of trustees of the applicable regional
university or of The Evergreen State College as being subject to an
annuity or retirement income plan and who, at the time of such
designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system, shall retain credit for such service in the Washington state
teachers' retirement system and except as provided in subsection
(((2))) (3) of this section, shall leave his or her accumulated
contributions in the teachers' retirement fund. Upon his or her
attaining eligibility for retirement under the Washington state
teachers' retirement system, such faculty member or other employee
shall receive from the Washington state teachers' retirement system a
retirement allowance consisting of an annuity which shall be the
actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at his or
her age when becoming eligible for such retirement and a pension for
each year of creditable service established and retained at the time of
said designation as provided in RCW 41.32.497 ((as now or hereafter
amended)). Anyone who on July 1, 1967, was receiving pension payments
from the teachers' retirement system based on thirty-five years of
creditable service shall thereafter receive a pension based on the
total years of creditable service established with the retirement
system: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any such faculty member or ((other))
senior academic administrator employee who, upon attainment of
eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers'
retirement system, is still engaged in public educational employment,
shall not be eligible to receive benefits under the Washington state
teachers' retirement system until he or she ceases such public
educational employment. Any retired faculty member or ((other)) senior
academic administrator employee who enters service in any public
educational institution shall cease to receive pension payments while
engaged in such service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such service may be
rendered up to seventy-five days in a school year without reduction of
pension.
(((2))) (3) A faculty member or ((other)) senior academic
administrator employee designated by the board of trustees of the
applicable regional university or of The Evergreen State College as
being subject to the annuity and retirement income plan and who, at the
time of such designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers'
retirement system may, at his or her election and at any time, on and
after midnight June 10, 1959, terminate his or her membership in the
Washington state teachers' retirement system and withdraw his or her
accumulated contributions and interest in the teachers' retirement fund
upon written application to the board of trustees of the Washington
state teachers' retirement system. Faculty members or ((other)) senior
academic administrator employees who withdraw their accumulated
contributions, on and after the date of withdrawal of contributions,
shall no longer be members of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system and shall forfeit all rights of membership, including pension
benefits, theretofore acquired under the Washington state teachers'
retirement system.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.10.423 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 149 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For employees who are first employed by an institution of
higher education in a position eligible for participation in an old age
annuities or retirement income plan under this chapter prior to July 1,
2011, it is the intent of RCW 28B.10.400, 28B.10.405, 28B.10.410,
28B.10.415, 28B.10.420, 28B.10.423 and 83.20.030 that the retirement
income resulting from the contributions described herein from the state
of Washington and the employee shall be projected actuarially so that
it shall not exceed sixty percent of the average of the highest two
consecutive years salary. Periodic review of the retirement systems
established pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, 28B.10.405, 28B.10.410,
28B.10.415, 28B.10.420, and 28B.10.423 ((and 83.20.030)) will be
undertaken at such time and in such manner as determined by the
committees on ways and means of the senate and of the house of
representatives ((and the public pension commission)), the select
committee on pension policy, and the pension funding council, and joint
contribution rates will be adjusted if necessary to accomplish this
intent.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, state funding for annuity or retirement
income plans under RCW 28B.10.400 shall not exceed six percent of
salary. The state board for community and technical colleges and the
higher education coordinating board are exempt from the provisions of
this subsection (2).
(3) By June 30, 2013, and every two years thereafter, each
institution of higher education that is responsible for payment of
supplemental amounts under RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c) shall contract with the
state actuary under chapter 41.44 RCW for an actuarial valuation of
their supplemental benefit plan. By June 30, 2013, and at least once
every six years thereafter, each institution shall also contract with
the state actuary under chapter 41.44 RCW for an actuarial experience
study of the mortality, service, compensation, and other experience of
the annuity or retirement income plans created in this chapter, and
into the financial condition of each system. At the discretion of the
state actuary, the valuation or experience study may be performed by
the state actuary or by an outside actuarial firm under contract to the
office of the state actuary. Each institution of higher education is
required to provide the data and information required for the
performance of the valuation or experience study to the office of the
state actuary or to the actuary performing the study on behalf of the
state actuary. The state actuary may charge each institution for the
actual cost of the valuation or experience study through an interagency
agreement. Upon completion of the valuation or experience study, the
state actuary shall provide copies of the study to the institution of
higher education and to the select committee on pension policy and the
pension funding council.
(4)(a) A higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund
is created in the custody of the state treasurer for the purpose of
funding future benefit obligations of higher education retirement plan
supplemental benefits. The state investment board has the full power
to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment
money in the fund.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2012, an employer contribution rate of
one-half of one percent of salary is established to begin prefunding
the unfunded future obligations of the supplemental benefit established
in RCW 28B.10.400.
(c) Consistent with chapter 41.50 RCW, the department of retirement
systems shall collect the employer contribution rates established in
this section from each state institution of higher education, and
deposit those contributions into the higher education retirement plan
supplemental benefit fund. The contributions made by each employer
into the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund and
the earnings on those contributions shall be accounted for separately
within the fund.
(d) Following the completion and review of the initial actuarial
valuations and experience study conducted pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section, the pension funding council may:
(i) Adopt and make changes to the employer contribution rate
established in (a) of this subsection consistent with the procedures
established in chapter 41.45 RCW. If the actuarial valuations of the
higher education retirement plans of each institution contributing to
the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund suggest
that different contribution rates are appropriate for each institution,
different rates may be adopted. Rates adopted by the pension funding
council are subject to revision by the legislature.
(ii) Recommend legislation that will, upon accumulation of
sufficient funding in the higher education retirement plan supplemental
benefit fund transfer the responsibility for making supplemental
benefit payments to the department of retirement systems, and adjust
employer contribution rates to reflect the transfer of responsibility.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.10.430 and 1979 ex.s. c 96 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first
employed by an institution of higher education in a position eligible
for participation in an old age annuities or retirement income plan
under this chapter prior to July 1, 2011.
(2) For any person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to a
program established under RCW 28B.10.400, the pension portion of such
benefit shall be the sum of the following amounts:
(a) One-half of the monthly benefit payable under such program by
a life insurance company; and
(b) The monthly equivalent of the supplemental benefit described in
RCW 28B.10.400(((3))) (1)(c).
(((2))) (3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
effective July 1, 1979, no person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant
to RCW 28B.10.400 shall receive, as the pension portion of that
benefit, less than ten dollars per month for each year of service
creditable to the person whose service is the basis of the benefit.
Portions of a year shall be treated as fractions of a year and the
decimal equivalent shall be multiplied by ten dollars. Where the
benefit was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the beneficiary
commenced, the minimum pension provided in this section shall be
adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
effective July 1, 1979, the monthly benefit of each person who
commenced receiving a monthly benefit under this chapter as of a date
no later than July 1, 1974, shall be permanently increased by a post-retirement adjustment. Such adjustment shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Monthly benefits to which this subsection and subsection
(((2))) (3) of this section are both applicable shall be determined by
first applying subsection (((2))) (3) of this section and then applying
this subsection. The ((department)) institution shall determine the
total years of creditable service and the total dollar benefit base
accrued as of December 31, 1978, except that this determination shall
take into account only those persons to whom this subsection applies;
(b) The ((department)) institution shall multiply the total
benefits determined in (a) of this subsection by six percent and divide
the dollar value thus determined by the total service determined in (a)
of this subsection. The resultant figure shall then be a post-retirement increase factor which shall be applied as specified in (c)
of this subsection;
(c) Each person to whom this subsection applies shall receive an
increase which is the product of the factor determined in (b) of this
subsection multiplied by the years of creditable service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
to be codified under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as
follows:
(1) All faculty members who are first employed by an institution of
higher education in a position eligible for participation in old age
annuities or retirement income plans under chapter 28B.10 RCW on or
after July 1, 2011, have a period of thirty days to make an irrevocable
choice to:
(a) Become a member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 under
this chapter; or
(b) Participate in the annuities or retirement income plan provided
by the institution.
(2) At the end of thirty days, if the member has not made a choice
to become a member of the teachers' retirement system, he or she
becomes a participant in the institution's plan under RCW 28B.10.400,
but does not become eligible for any supplemental benefit under RCW
28B.10.400(1)(c).

Sec. 10 RCW 41.32.570 and 2007 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) ((Except under subsection (3) of this section,)) Any retired
teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any public
educational institution in Washington state at least one calendar month
after his or her accrual date shall cease to receive pension payments
while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service
for more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school year.
(3) ((Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters
service in any public educational institution in Washington state one
and one-half calendar months or more after his or her accrual date and:
(a) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the school board has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree
into the position;
(b) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of the school board or other highest decision-making
authority of the prospective employer;
(c) Whose employer retains records of the procedures followed and
the decisions made in hiring the retired teacher or retired
administrator and provides those records in the event of an audit; and
(d) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a school year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total limitation under this section applies prospectively
after July 22, 2007.
(4) When a retired teacher or administrator renders service beyond
eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the
employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the
entire duration of the member's employment during that fiscal year.
(5))) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary
with information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(((6))) (4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five
hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.32.800 and 2004 c 242 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.32.802, no retiree under the
provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's
monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or
41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement
income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.400.
If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his
or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon
reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed
pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.32.802 and 2004 c 242 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in
RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter
or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a
position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have
the right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.32.860 and 2005 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under RCW 41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to
receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is
employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010,
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.37.010, or as a law enforcement officer or
firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by
annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher
education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section,
his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused the suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement,
the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the
rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 14 RCW 41.32.862 and 2004 c 242 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in
RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter
or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a
position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have
the right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 15 RCW 41.35.060 and 2004 c 242 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in
RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter
or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a
position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.35.030, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680.
However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before
the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the
retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of
the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.

Sec. 16 RCW 41.35.230 and 2004 c 242 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.35.060, no retiree under the
provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's
monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.35.010, 41.40.010, 41.37.010, or
41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement
income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.400, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in
the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to
this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official.
(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section,
his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon
reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed
pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.37.050 and 2005 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with
an employer as defined in this chapter sooner than one calendar month
after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement
allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight
hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each
month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer
for one full calendar month.
(b) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an
employer as defined in chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(c) The benefit reduction provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per
month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied
to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a law enforcement officer or
firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by
annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher
education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her
benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under this
chapter, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes
a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of
membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive
membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire
if eligible in accordance with this chapter. However, if the right to
retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered
two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor
options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to be codified under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as
follows:
(1) All employees who are not qualified under section 9 of this act
and who are first employed by an institution of higher education in a
position eligible for participation in old age annuities or retirement
income plans under RCW 28B.10.400 on or after July 1, 2011, have a
period of thirty days to make an irrevocable choice to:
(a) Become a member of the public employees' retirement system plan
3 under this chapter; or
(b) Participate in the annuities or retirement income plan provided
by the institution.
(2) At the end of thirty days, if the member has not made a choice
to become a member of the public employees' retirement system, he or
she becomes a participant in the institution's plan under RCW
28B.10.400, but does not become eligible for any supplemental benefit
under RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c).

Sec. 19 RCW 41.40.037 and 2007 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) A retiree
from plan 1, plan 2, or plan 3 who enters employment with an employer
at least one calendar month after his or her accrual date may continue
to receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without
a reduction of pension. For purposes of this section, employment
includes positions covered by annuity and retirement income plans
offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(((b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer
at least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the employer has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree into
the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the select committee on pension
policy, the legislative evaluation and accountability program, the
legislative systems committee, and the statute law committee; or
according to rules adopted for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members
for a local government employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.))
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 20 RCW 41.50.030 and 2004 c 242 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As soon as possible but not more than one hundred and eighty
days after March 19, 1976, there is transferred to the department of
retirement systems, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
powers, duties, and functions of:
(a) The Washington public employees' retirement system;
(b) The Washington state teachers' retirement system;
(c) The Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system;
(d) The Washington state patrol retirement system;
(e) The Washington judicial retirement system; and
(f) The state treasurer with respect to the administration of the
judges' retirement fund imposed pursuant to chapter 2.12 RCW.
(2) On July 1, 1996, there is transferred to the department all
powers, duties, and functions of the deferred compensation committee.
(3) The department shall administer chapter 41.34 RCW.
(4) The department shall administer the Washington school
employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.35 RCW.
(5) The department shall administer the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.37 RCW.
(6) The department shall administer the collection of employer
contributions and initial prefunding of the higher education retirement
plan supplemental benefits, also referred to as the annuity or
retirement income plans created under chapter 28B.10 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.50.080 and 2004 c 242 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board shall provide for the investment of all
funds of the Washington public employees' retirement system, the
teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington
judicial retirement system, the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system, the higher education retirement plan supplemental
benefit fund, and the judges' retirement fund, pursuant to RCW
43.84.150, and may sell or exchange investments acquired in the
exercise of that authority.

Sec. 22 RCW 41.50.110 and 2009 c 564 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 28B.10, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37,
43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement
systems expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030,
41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to
defray its proportional share of the entire expense of the
administration of the retirement system that the employer participates
in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be
required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly
proportional to the estimated entire expense of the administration as
the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears to the
total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be
the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise
provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that month
to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall
be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each
employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by
the department. However, the department may at its discretion
establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in
which event the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal biennia, the
legislature may transfer from the department of retirement systems'
expense fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---