BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
citizens with non-English derived names whose ballots or petition
signatures have not been counted because the signature on the ballot
envelope is not the exact spelling of the name in the voter database.
The legislature finds that with many names, especially of foreign
origin, there are multiple possible spellings, and transposing letters
and other errors occur when the information is entered into computer
systems. There are innocent reasons for misspellings to occur that
should not cause a ballot or petition signature to be disqualified if
the signature on the ballot envelope and voter can be correctly
validated.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide
sufficient flexibility to the county auditors to accept ballots where
misspellings are present, yet the registered voter is clearly the same
person.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.165 and 2006 c 209 s 4 and 2006 c 208 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the voter neglects to sign the outside envelope of an
absentee or provisional ballot, the auditor shall notify the voter by
first-class mail and advise the voter of the correct procedures for
completing the unsigned affidavit. If the absentee ballot is received
within three business days of the final meeting of the canvassing
board, or the voter has been notified by first-class mail and has not
responded at least three business days before the final meeting of the
canvassing board, then the auditor shall attempt to notify the voter by
telephone, using the voter registration record information. In order
for the ballot to be counted, the voter must either:
(a) Appear in person and sign the envelope no later than the day
before the certification of the primary or election; or
(b) Sign a copy of the envelope provided by the auditor, and return
it to the auditor no later than the day before the certification of the
primary or election.
(2)(a) If the handwriting of the signature on an absentee or
provisional ballot envelope is not the same as the handwriting of the
signature on the registration file, the auditor shall notify the voter
by first-class mail, enclosing a copy of the envelope affidavit, and
advise the voter of the correct procedures for updating his or her
signature on the voter registration file. If the absentee or
provisional ballot is received within three business days of the final
meeting of the canvassing board, or the voter has been notified by
first-class mail and has not responded at least three business days
before the final meeting of the canvassing board, then the auditor
shall attempt to notify the voter by telephone, using the voter
registration record information. In order for the ballot to be
counted, the voter must either:
(i) Appear in person and sign a new registration form no later than
the day before the certification of the primary or election; or
(ii) Sign a copy of the affidavit provided by the auditor and
return it to the auditor no later than the day before the certification
of the primary or election. The voter may enclose with the affidavit
a photocopy of a valid government or tribal issued identification
document that includes the voter's current signature. If the signature
on the copy of the affidavit does not match the signature on file or
the signature on the copy of the identification document, the voter
must appear in person and sign a new registration form no later than
the day before the certification of the primary or election in order
for the ballot to be counted.
(b) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope
is not the same as the signature on the registration file because the
name is different, the ballot may be counted as long as the handwriting
is clearly the same. The auditor shall send the voter a change-of-name
form under RCW 29A.08.440 and direct the voter to complete the form.
(c) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope
is not the same as the signature on the registration file because the
voter used initials or a common nickname, the ballot may be counted as
long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
(d) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope
is not the same as the signature on the registration file because the
spelling of the name as signed by the voter is not identical to the
spelling of the name on the registration file, the ballot may be
counted as long as the handwriting is clearly the same. The auditor
shall contact the voter to verify the correct spelling of the voter's
name.
(3) A voter may not cure a missing or mismatched signature for
purposes of counting the ballot in a recount.
(4) A record must be kept of all ballots with missing and
mismatched signatures. The record must contain the date on which the
voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on
which the voter signed the envelope, a copy of the envelope, a new
registration form, or a change-of-name form. That record is a public
record under chapter 42.56 RCW and may be disclosed to interested
parties on written request.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1823 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the
legal voters on the petition.
(b) If the signature on the petition is not the same as the
signature on the registration file because the spelling of the name as
signed by the voter is not identical to the spelling of the name on the
registration file, the signature may be counted as long as the
handwriting is clearly the same. The auditor shall contact the voter
to verify the correct spelling of the voter's name.
(2) The verification and canvass of signatures on the petition may
be observed by persons representing the advocates and opponents of the
proposed measure so long as they make no record of the names,
addresses, or other information on the petitions or related records
during the verification process except upon the order of the superior
court of Thurston county. The secretary of state may limit the number
of observers to not less than two on each side, if in his or her
opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of the
verification process. Any such limitation shall apply equally to both
sides.
(3) The secretary of state may use any statistical sampling
techniques for this verification and canvass which have been adopted by
rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No petition will be rejected on
the basis of any statistical method employed, and no petition will be
accepted on the basis of any statistical method employed if such method
indicates that the petition contains fewer than the requisite number of
signatures of legal voters.
(4) If the secretary of state finds the same name signed to more
than one petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid
signature.
(5) For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of state
shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the
legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the
signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.

--- END ---