BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that identity theft is
a real and immediate concern to the public. When an individual's
identity is stolen, he or she is subjected to undeserved harassment
from collection agencies and must defend lawsuits resulting from
criminal activity. Identity theft has a traumatic impact on a person's
life and financial situation that can have a long-lasting effect.
The public records act was enacted so that the people could remain
informed about government agencies' activities. The act was not
envisioned to be a tool so that individuals could obtain private
information about other individuals.
The legislature finds that the public disclosure act is often used
by convicted criminals. It is unlawful to aid and abet criminals in
committing future crimes. The government, with its divulgence of
signatures to any person making a public records request, makes it
possible for criminals to access signatures of millions of people in
the state of Washington so that they can perpetuate fraud and other
crimes without the individual being able to protect that information.
If members of the public want signatures of a person, they can
contact the person directly without using the government as a conduit.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to prohibit disclosure
of signatures of nonemployees by government entities.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.010 and 2007 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(3) "Signature" means the name or mark written by the person or at
that person's direction and any associated personal information.
(4) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.010 and 2010 c 204 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, "person in interest" means and
includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(3) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(4) "Signature" means the name or mark written by the person or at
that person's direction and any associated personal information.
(5) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.230 and 2010 c 106 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(5) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; ((and))
(6) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard; and
(7) Signatures of individuals, excluding signatures of agency
employees acting in their official capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---