BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state firearms freedom act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature declares that the authority
for this act is the following:
(1) The tenth amendment to the United States Constitution
guarantees to the states and their people all powers not granted to the
federal government elsewhere in the Constitution and reserves to the
state and people of Washington certain powers as they were understood
at the time that Washington was admitted to statehood in 1889. The
guaranty of those powers is a matter of contract between the state and
people of Washington and the United States as of the time that the
compact with the United States was agreed upon and adopted by
Washington and the United States in 1889.
(2) The ninth amendment to the United States Constitution
guarantees to the people rights not granted in the Constitution and
reserves to the people of Washington certain rights as they were
understood at the time that Washington was admitted to statehood in
1889. The guaranty of those rights is a matter of contract between the
state and people of Washington and the United States as of the time
that the compact with the United States was agreed upon and adopted by
Washington and the United States in 1889.
(3) The regulation of intrastate commerce is vested in the states
under the ninth and tenth amendments to the United States Constitution.
(4) The second amendment to the United States Constitution reserves
to the people the right to keep and bear arms as that right was
understood at the time that Washington was admitted to statehood in
1889, and the guaranty of the right is a matter of contract between the
state and people of Washington and the United States as of the time
that the compact with the United States was agreed upon and adopted by
Washington and the United States in 1889.
(5) Article I, section 24 of the Washington state Constitution
clearly secures to Washington citizens, and prohibits government
interference with, the right of individual Washington citizens to keep
and bear arms. This constitutional protection is unchanged from the
1889 Washington state Constitution, which was approved by congress and
the people of Washington, and the right exists as it was understood at
the time that the compact with the United States was agreed upon and
adopted by Washington and the United States in 1889.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Borders of Washington" means the boundaries of Washington.
(2) "Firearms accessories" means items that are used in conjunction
with or mounted upon a firearm but are not essential to the basic
function of a firearm including, but not limited to, telescopic or
laser sights, magazines, flash or sound suppressors, folding or
aftermarket stocks and grips, speedloaders, ammunition carriers, and
lights for target illumination.
(3) "Generic and insignificant parts" includes, but is not limited
to, springs, screws, nuts, and pins.
(4) "Manufactured" means that a firearm, a firearm accessory, or
ammunition has been created from basic materials for functional
usefulness including, but not limited to, forging, casting, machining,
or other processes for working materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A personal firearm, a firearm accessory,
or ammunition that is manufactured commercially or privately in
Washington and that remains within the borders of Washington is not
subject to federal law or federal regulation, including registration,
under the authority of congress to regulate interstate commerce. It is
declared by the legislature that those items have not traveled in
interstate commerce. This section applies to a firearm, a firearm
accessory, or ammunition that is manufactured in Washington from basic
materials and that can be manufactured without the inclusion of any
significant parts imported from another state. Generic and
insignificant parts that have other manufacturing or consumer product
applications are not firearms, firearms accessories, or ammunition, and
their importation into Washington and incorporation into a firearm, a
firearm accessory, or ammunition manufactured in Washington does not
subject the firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition to federal
regulation. It is declared by the legislature that basic materials,
such as unmachined steel and unshaped wood, are not firearms, firearms
accessories, or ammunition and are not subject to congressional
authority to regulate firearms, firearms accessories, and ammunition
under interstate commerce as if they were actually firearms, firearms
accessories, or ammunition. The authority of congress to regulate
interstate commerce in basic materials does not include authority to
regulate firearms, firearms accessories, and ammunition made in
Washington from those materials. Firearms accessories that are
imported into Washington from another state and that are subject to
federal regulation as being in interstate commerce do not subject a
firearm to federal regulation under interstate commerce because they
are attached to or used in conjunction with a firearm in Washington.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A firearm that cannot be carried and used by one person;
(b) A firearm that has a bore diameter greater than one and one-half inches and that uses smokeless powder, not black powder, as a
propellant;
(c) Ammunition with a projectile that explodes using an explosion
of chemical energy after the projectile leaves the firearm; or
(d) A firearm, other than a shotgun, that discharges two or more
projectiles with one activation of the trigger or other firing device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A firearm manufactured or sold in Washington
under this chapter must have the words made in Washington clearly
stamped on a central metallic part, such as the receiver or frame.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this act is
hereby declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and
is specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and
void and of no effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to firearms, firearms
accessories, and ammunition that are manufactured and retained in
Washington after October 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---