BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.105 and 1994 c 164 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All department expenses relating to industrial safety and
health services of the department pertaining to workers' compensation
shall be paid by the department and financed by premiums and by
assessments collected from a self-insurer as provided in this title.
(2) The department shall include in all rate notices sent to state
fund and self-insured employers an accounting that clearly identifies
all programs and services that are financed in whole or in part by
state fund premiums or self-insurers' administrative assessments.

--- END ---