BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
materials used for storm water mitigation projects. The tax also does
not apply to labor and services rendered for the installation or
construction of storm water mitigation projects. The exemption is
available for a person that contracts with a local government or
department of transportation for storm water mitigation projects, and
for storm water mitigation projects on private property designed or
provided for a person.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Local government" means a political subdivision covered by
national pollutant discharge elimination system municipal phase I or
phase II permits.
(b) "Low-impact development" means a storm water management and
land use strategy applied at the parcel, subdivision, or drainage area
level, that emphasizes conservation and use of on-site natural features
integrated with engineered, small scale hydrologic controls to more
closely mimic predevelopment hydrologic functions.
(c) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(d) "Retrofit" means renovation or improvements associated with and
constructed adjacent to or near an existing site, subdivision, or
development in order to reduce or eliminate municipal storm water
runoff to receiving water bodies.
(e) "Storm water facility" includes, but is not limited to, ponds,
biofiltration swales, storm water treatment tanks, detention vaults,
oil water separators, dry wells, catch basins, filters, pervious
asphalt, and rain gardens.
(f) "Storm water mitigation projects" means construction or
retrofit of a storm water facility, including projects that utilize
low-impact development retrofit strategies, or projects that mitigate
or prevent storm water pollutants in receiving waters previously
remediated under federal or state-approved activities.
(3) A person claiming the exemption under this section must claim
the exemption in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of materials for storm water mitigation projects on storm water
facilities. The provisions of this chapter also do not apply to the
use of labor and services rendered for the installation or construction
of storm water mitigation projects on storm water facilities. The
definitions and requirements in section 1 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---