BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
At least once in each six-year period, the state actuary shall
conduct an actuarial study of financial risks to the state retirement
systems. As part of the study, the state actuary shall model the long-term effects on financial risks that occur when short-term experience
deviates from the long-term assumptions used in the systematic
actuarial funding for pensions. The results shall be filed with the
department, the office of financial management, the ways and means and
transportation committees of the legislature, the select committee on
pension policy, and the pension funding council.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.44.040 and 2003 c 295 s 4 and 2003 c 92 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding ((pension))
financial risks to the state retirement systems, benefit provisions,
((and)) funding policies, and investment policies of the state
investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions ((used by the department of
retirement systems)).
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill((. The actuarial fiscal note)) and
shall include: (a) The ((statutorily required contribution)) increases
in employer and member contribution rates that result from the
increased benefits or changes in expected pension costs; (b) the
associated cost of the increased benefits or changes in expected
pension costs for the biennium, the subsequent biennium, and the
following twenty-five years; (((b) the biennial cost of the increased
benefits if these exceed the required contribution;)) and (c) any
change in the present value of fully projected benefits and the
unfunded actuarial accrued ((benefits. An actuarial fiscal note shall
also be prepared for all amendments which are offered in committee or
on the floor of the house of representatives or the senate to any
pension bill. However, a majority of the members present may suspend
the requirement for an actuarial fiscal note for amendments offered on
the floor of the house of representatives or the senate)) liability.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW 41.04.276.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---