BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.82.010 and 2007 c 506 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director ((of general administration)), on behalf of the
agency involved and after consultation with the office of financial
management, ((shall)) must purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or
otherwise acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be
required by elected state officials, institutions, departments,
commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies
where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and may grant
easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part
of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not
otherwise have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This
section does not transfer financial liability for the acquired property
to the department of general administration.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director ((shall)) must determine the location, size, and design of any
real estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant
to this chapter, and any improvements thereon, ((shall)) must conform
to standards adopted by the director and approved by the office of
financial management governing facility efficiency unless a specific
exemption from such standards is provided by the director ((of general
administration)). The director ((of general administration shall))
must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature annually on any exemptions granted
pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director ((of general administration)) may fix the terms
and conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except
that no lease ((shall)) may extend greater than twenty years in
duration. The director ((of general administration)) may enter into a
long-term lease greater than ten years in duration upon a determination
by the director of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides a more favorable rate than would otherwise be
available, it appears to a substantial certainty that the facility is
necessary for use by the state for the full length of the lease term,
and the facility meets the standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section. The director ((of general administration)) may enter
into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration if an
analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less
than the life-cycle cost of purchasing or constructing a facility in
lieu of leasing the facility.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation ((shall)) does not prevent
a lessor from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as
security for the repayment of a promissory note provided that the
transaction would otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW
21.20.320. The state treasurer ((shall)) must adopt rules that
establish the criteria under which any such approval may be granted.
In establishing such criteria the state treasurer ((shall)) must give
primary consideration to the protection of the state's credit rating
and the integrity of the state's debt management program. If it
appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been used or referred
to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this
subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor cause such
lease to be terminated. The department of general administration
((shall)) must promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it may
appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred to in
violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director ((of general administration shall)) must provide
coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate
opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon
the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase
of a facility, the director ((of general administration shall)) must
determine whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or
agencies in a single facility with other agencies located in the same
geographic area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director ((of
general administration shall)) must consult with the affected state
agencies and the office of financial management to evaluate the impact
colocation would have on the cost and delivery of agency programs,
including whether program delivery would be enhanced due to the
centralization of services. The director ((of general
administration)), in consultation with the office of financial
management, ((shall)) must develop procedures for implementing
colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director ((of general administration)) is authorized to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real
estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such
real estate to state or federal agencies. The director ((of general
administration shall)) must charge each using agency its proportionate
rental which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs,
including, but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and
accounting services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which
((shall)) may not exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to
meet unforeseen expenses incident to management of the real estate.
(8) If the director ((of general administration)) determines that
it is necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant
to subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the director ((shall)) must
cause plans and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of
such work to be made and filed in his or her office and the state
agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out
of any available funds((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the cost of
executing such work ((shall)) may not exceed the sum of twenty-five
thousand dollars. Work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other than that
done by the owner of the property if other than the state, ((shall))
must be performed in accordance with the public works law of this
state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
((of general administration shall)) must make space utilization
studies, and ((shall)) must establish standards for use of space by
state agencies. Such studies ((shall)) must include the identification
of opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state agency
office and support facilities.
(10)(a) The director ((of general administration)) may construct
new buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and
equip, all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the
construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing
facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase
contract, the director ((of general administration shall)) must conduct
an evaluation of the facility design and budget using life-cycle cost
analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement.
(b) The director must also include representatives from private
sector organizations in conducting an analysis of alternative methods
of facilities acquisition. The alternative methods of facilities
acquisition must include: Short-term leasing, long-term leasing
(twenty to thirty years), alternative lease-to-purchase procedures,
leases with option(s) to purchase, and other methods suggested by the
private sector. The application of life-cycle cost analysis to various
alternative methods of facilities acquisition must include
considerations for maintenance costs, renovation costs, systems
replacement costs, and remodel costs occurring both before and after
state acquisition of ownership. The life-cycle term being analyzed
must be thirty years.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director ((of general administration)) or the director's
designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which
the property is located.
(12) The director ((of general administration)) may delegate any or
all of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as the director deems advisable. By January 1st
of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the department ((shall)) must
submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature on all delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases
for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing
contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the
state finance committee.
(15) The department of general administration ((shall)) must report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature on facility leases executed for
all state agencies for the preceding year, lease terms, and annual
lease costs. The report must include leases executed under RCW
43.82.045 and subsection (12) of this section.
(16) For the purposes of this section, "director" means the
director of general administration.

--- END ---