BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.120 and 1999 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a food assistance program for
legal immigrants who are ineligible for the federal food stamp program.
(2) The department shall adopt rules for the state food assistance
program ((shall follow exactly the rules of the federal food stamp
program except for the provisions pertaining to immigrant status)) to
operate the program within appropriations provided for the program in
the omnibus operating appropriations act and subject to any terms and
conditions in that act.
(3) The benefit under the state food assistance program shall be
established by the legislature in the biennial operating budget.
(4) The department may enter into a contract with the United States
department of agriculture to use the existing federal food stamp
program coupon system for the purposes of administering the state food
assistance program.
(5) In the event the department is unable to enter into a contract
with the United States department of agriculture, the department may
issue vouchers to eligible households for the purchase of eligible
foods at participating retailers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---