BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.72.210 and 1984 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
To protect the public health, safety, and welfare, cities, towns,
counties, and port districts of the state may license, control, and
regulate privately operated taxicab transportation services operating
within their respective jurisdictions. The power to regulate includes:
(1) Regulating entry into the business of providing taxicab
transportation services;
(2) Requiring a license to be purchased as a condition of operating
a taxicab and the right to revoke, cancel, or refuse to reissue a
license for failure to comply with regulatory requirements;
(3) Controlling the ((rates)) fares charged for providing taxicab
transportation service and the manner in which ((rates)) fares are
calculated and collected, including the establishment of zones as the
basis for ((rates)) fares;
(4) Regulating the routes of taxicabs, including restricting access
to airports;
(5) Establishing safety, equipment, and insurance requirements; and
(6) Any other requirements adopted to ensure safe and reliable
taxicab service.

--- END ---