BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member of an Indian tribe who owns a vehicle that does not
meet the requirements of RCW 46.16.022, and who operates the vehicle
outside of Indian country, must display license plates or decals
assigned by the department and pay all required vehicle license fees.
A violation of this subsection is a traffic infraction and is subject
to the penalty in RCW 46.16.010 and the immediate impoundment of the
vehicle. The vehicle may be redeemed upon payment of the penalty. All
fines collected under this section must be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund created under RCW 46.68.070 and used for road maintenance.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
A member of an Indian tribe who owns a vehicle that does not meet
the requirements of RCW 46.16A.175, and who operates the vehicle
outside of Indian country, must display license plates or decals
assigned by the department and pay all required vehicle license fees.
A violation of this subsection is a traffic infraction and is subject
to the penalty in RCW 46.16A.030 and the immediate impoundment of the
vehicle. The vehicle may be redeemed upon payment of the penalty. All
fines collected under this section must be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund created under RCW 46.68.070 and used for road maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---