BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of pharmacy.
(2)(a) "Covered drug" includes all legend and nonlegend drugs from
residential sources sold in any form. This includes brand name and
generic drugs.
(b) "Covered drug" does not include:
(i) Vitamins or supplement;
(ii) Herbal-based remedies and homeopathic drugs, products, or
remedies;
(iii) Cosmetics, shampoos, sunscreens, toothpaste, lip balm,
antiperspirants, or other personal care products that are regulated as
both cosmetics and nonlegend drugs under the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act;
(iv) Drugs for which producers provide a take-back program as part
of a federal food and drug administration managed risk evaluation and
mitigation strategy (21 U.S.C. Sec. 355-1);
(v) Drugs that are biological products as defined by 21 C.F.R.
600.3(h) as it exists on the effective date of this section if the
producer already provides a take-back program; and
(vi) Pet pesticide products contained in pet collars, powders,
shampoos, topical applications, or other forms.
(3) "Drug wholesaler" means a corporation, individual, or other
entity which buys drugs or devices for resale and distribution to
corporations, individuals, or entities other than consumers.
(4) "Drugs" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, the official national formulary, the official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement of
the formulary or those pharmacopoeias;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;
(c) Substances, other than food, intended to affect the structure
or any function of the body of humans or other animals; or
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any substances
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, but not including
medical devices or their component parts or accessories.
(5) "Generic drug" means drugs that are chemically identical or
bioequivalent to a brand name drug in dosage form, safety, strength,
route of administration, quality, performance characteristics, and
intended use. However, inactive ingredients may vary.
(6) "Legend drug" means any drugs, including controlled substances
under chapter 69.50 RCW, that are required by any applicable federal or
state law or regulation to be dispensed by prescription only or are
restricted to use by practitioners only.
(7) "Nonlegend drug" means any drugs that may be lawfully sold
without a prescription.
(8) "Person" means a firm, sole proprietorship, corporation,
limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, association, cooperative, or other
entity of any kind or nature.
(9) "Producer" means the person who:
(a) Has legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand of the
covered drug or manufactures a generic covered drug sold in Washington
state. "Producer" does not include a retailer who puts its store label
on a covered drug or a pharmacist who compounds a prescribed individual
drug product for a patient;
(b) Imports a covered drug branded or manufactured by a producer
that meets the definition under (a) of this subsection and has no
physical presence in the United States; or
(c) Sells at wholesale a covered drug, does not have legal
ownership of the brand, and elects to fulfill the responsibilities of
the producer for that covered drug.
(10) "Product stewardship program" means a statewide program for
the collection, transportation, and disposal of unwanted covered drugs
that is managed by the board.
(11) "Residential sources" includes single and multiple-family
residences, and locations where household drugs are unused, unwanted,
disposed, or abandoned, such as hospice services, boarding homes,
schools, foster care, day care, and other locations where either people
or their pet animals, or both, reside on a temporary or permanent
basis. This does not include waste from hospitals, clinics,
pharmacies, airport security, drug seizures by law enforcement,
businesses, or other nonresidential or business sources identified by
the board of pharmacy.
(12) "Unwanted covered drug" means any covered drug no longer
wanted by its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is
intended to be discarded by its owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By January 1, 2013, the board shall
create a proposed product stewardship program for review under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) In developing a proposed product stewardship program, the
board shall provide opportunities for public comment, including at
least one public hearing. Notice of the public hearing must be
provided by the board to the department of ecology, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, covered drug retailers,
substance abuse professionals, local governments, solid waste
professionals, water quality professionals, and the general public.
(b) The board shall consult with the department of ecology on the
proposed product stewardship program including transportation and
disposal systems, secure tracking and handling, package recycling, and
public education.
(c) The board shall consult with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs on the adequacy of the proposed product
stewardship program's security measures for collection, transportation,
and disposal of unwanted covered drugs.
(3) After public comment has been received under subsection (2) of
this section and by no later than January 1, 2014, the board shall
operate a product stewardship program in accordance with this chapter,
RCW 82.04.272, 69.41.030, and 18.64.005.
(4)(a) The board shall annually invite comments from health care
facilities, health care practitioners, pharmacists, local governments,
law enforcement personnel, and citizens on their satisfaction with the
services provided by the product stewardship program. This information
must be used by the board in developing product stewardship program
updates and revisions under (b) of this subsection.
(b) At least every four years, the board shall update its product
stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The product stewardship program created
by the board, must, at a minimum, provide for the following:
(a) A collection system for all unwanted covered drugs that is
safe, secure, and protects patient information. The collection system
must:
(i) Be convenient and adequately serve the needs of residents in
both urban and rural areas;
(ii) Provide, at a minimum, one drop-off collection site in all
counties in the state and one drop-off collection site in all cities
with a population greater than ten thousand, on an ongoing, year-round
basis. However, if a drop-off location cannot be arranged in a
specific county or city, prepaid mailing envelopes must be provided;
and
(iii) Incorporate drop-off collection sites for unwanted covered
drugs in existence on the effective date of this section if they meet
the requirements of the product stewardship program, and additional
collectors to improve convenience and availability of services;
(b) A handling and disposal system, including identification of and
contact information for collectors, transporters, and waste disposal
facilities to be used by the product stewardship program;
(c) How the board will use existing providers of waste
pharmaceutical services to the extent possible;
(d) How covered drugs will be separated from packaging to the
extent possible to reduce transportation and disposal costs and how
drug packaging will be recycled to the extent feasible;
(e) The policies and procedures to be followed by persons in charge
of unwanted covered drugs collected pursuant to the product stewardship
program;
(f) How the collected, unwanted covered drugs are tracked through
to final disposal and how safety and security is maintained; and
(g) How patient information on drug packaging will be kept secure
during collection, transportation, and disposal.
(2) The board may suspend the product stewardship program in whole
or in part if the board determines that suspension is necessary to
protect the public from imminent danger.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not require any person to
serve as a collector in the product stewardship program. A person may
offer to serve as a collector, or may agree to serve as a collector.
Collectors may include law enforcement, pharmacies, other relevant
public or private locations, such as hospitals, senior centers,
community health clinics, fire stations, veterinary clinics, or private
sector collectors, and mail-back services, operating in accordance with
state and federal laws and regulations for the handling of covered
drugs and in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board shall promote the use of the
product stewardship program and the safe storage and proper disposal of
covered drugs so that collection options are widely understood by
customers, pharmacists, retailers of covered drugs, and health care
practitioners including doctors and other prescribers.
(2) The board shall establish a toll-free telephone number and web
site where collection options will be publicized and prepare
educational and outreach materials describing where and how to return
unwanted covered drugs to the product stewardship program. These
materials must be provided to pharmacies, health care facilities, and
other interested parties for dissemination to residential sources.
(3) The department of ecology and local governments shall promote
the use of the product stewardship program and the program's toll-free
telephone number and web site through existing educational methods.
(4) The board shall annually evaluate the effectiveness of its
outreach and program activities. At least every four years, this
evaluation must include the percentage of residents that are aware of
the program and to what extent residents find the program convenient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Covered drugs collected under the
product stewardship program must be disposed of at a properly permitted
hazardous waste disposal facility, or at an in-state solid waste
incinerator facility permitted under chapter 173-434 WAC, or at a
properly permitted solid waste incinerator facility in a neighboring
state or province.
(2) Unwanted covered drugs from residential sources retain all
other generator exemptions for household hazardous waste.
(3) The board may petition the department of ecology for approval
to use final disposal technologies that provide superior environmental
and human health protection than provided by current the disposal
technologies in subsection (1) of this section for drugs if and when
those technologies are proven and available. The proposed technology
must provide equivalent protection in each, and superior protection in
one or more, of the following areas:
(a) Monitoring of any emissions or waste;
(b) Worker health and safety;
(c) Air, water, or land emissions contributing to persistent,
bioaccumulative, and toxic pollution; and
(d) Overall impact to the environment and human health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board may adopt rules necessary to
implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.
(2) The board, in consultation with the department of ecology, may
establish performance standards for the product stewardship program.
(3) By December 31, 2016, the board shall report to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, concerning the status of
the product stewardship program and any recommendations for changes to
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The pharmaceutical product stewardship
program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts to be deposited under RCW 82.04.272(2)(b) must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
administering this chapter. Only the secretary of the department of
health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.04.272 and 2003 c 168 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription; as to such persons, the amount of the tax shall be:
(a) Equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent; and
(b) Equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.346 of which one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars
shall be deposited on December 15th of each year into the
pharmaceutical product stewardship program account established in
section 8 of this act. The remainder shall be deposited into the
general fund for transfer to the health care authority for the purposes
of maintaining the Washington basic health plan established in chapter
70.47 RCW.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.0281; and
(b) "Warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription" means the buying of drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription from a manufacturer or another wholesaler, and reselling
of the drugs to persons selling at retail or to hospitals, clinics,
health care providers, or other providers of health care services, by
a wholesaler or retailer who is registered with the federal drug
enforcement administration and licensed by the state board of pharmacy.

Sec. 10 RCW 69.41.030 and 2010 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or
possess any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a
physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53
RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed
forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official
duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans
administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under
chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW
when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the
medical quality assurance commission, or any of the following
professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border
with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A
physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician
licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist
licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon
licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner, or a veterinarian licensed to
practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above
provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug
wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to
any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to
a common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or any employee thereof,
whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business
or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or
chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under
contract with the department of social and health services from
selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially
prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed
health care practitioners.
(2) The product stewardship program created in chapter 70.--- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 14 of this act) may possess and
transport drugs provided that the product stewardship program complies
with this chapter.
(3)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or
possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) A violation of this section involving possession is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.64.005 and 1990 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Regulate the practice of pharmacy and enforce all laws placed
under its jurisdiction;
(2) Prepare or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading
of, examinations for applicants for pharmacists' licenses;
(3) Establish the qualifications for licensure of pharmacists or
pharmacy interns;
(4) Conduct hearings for the revocation or suspension of licenses,
permits, registrations, certificates, or any other authority to
practice granted by the board, which hearings may also be conducted by
an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW;
(5) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
hearing, or disciplinary proceeding held under this chapter or any
other chapter assigned to the board;
(6) Assist the regularly constituted enforcement agencies of this
state in enforcing all laws pertaining to drugs, controlled substances,
and the practice of pharmacy, or any other laws or rules under its
jurisdiction;
(7) Promulgate rules for the dispensing, distribution, wholesaling,
and manufacturing of drugs and devices and the practice of pharmacy for
the protection and promotion of the public health, safety, and welfare.
Violation of any such rules shall constitute grounds for refusal,
suspension, or revocation of licenses or any other authority to
practice issued by the board;
(8) Adopt rules establishing and governing continuing education
requirements for pharmacists and other licensees applying for renewal
of licenses under this chapter;
(9) Be immune, collectively and individually, from suit in any
action, civil or criminal, based upon any disciplinary proceedings or
other official acts performed as members of such board. Such immunity
shall apply to employees of the department when acting in the course of
disciplinary proceedings;
(10) Suggest strategies for preventing, reducing, and eliminating
drug misuse, diversion, and abuse, including professional and public
education, and treatment of persons misusing and abusing drugs;
(11) Conduct or encourage educational programs to be conducted to
prevent the misuse, diversion, and abuse of drugs for health care
practitioners and licensed or certified health care facilities;
(12) Monitor trends of drug misuse, diversion, and abuse and make
periodic reports to disciplinary boards of licensed health care
practitioners and education, treatment, and appropriate law enforcement
agencies regarding these trends;
(13) Enter into written agreements with all other state and federal
agencies with any responsibility for controlling drug misuse,
diversion, or abuse and with health maintenance organizations, health
care service contractors, and health care providers to assist and
promote coordination of agencies responsible for ensuring compliance
with controlled substances laws and to monitor observance of these laws
and cooperation between these agencies. The department of social and
health services, the department of labor and industries, and any other
state agency including licensure disciplinary boards, shall refer all
apparent instances of over-prescribing by practitioners and all
apparent instances of legend drug overuse to the department. The
department shall also encourage such referral by health maintenance
organizations, health service contractors, and health care providers;
(14) Adopt rules to implement, administer, and enforce the laws on
the collection, transportation, disposal, and possession of unwanted
covered drugs from residential sources through the product stewardship
programs under chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
14 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide the service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Nothing in this chapter applies to
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, whose pharmaceutical wastes
are disposed of under rules and policies adopted by the department of
ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 8, 12, and 13 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act must be liberally construed to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

--- END ---