BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that medical
assistants are health professionals specifically trained to work in
ambulatory settings, such as physicians' offices, clinics, and group
practices. These multiskilled personnel are trained to perform
administrative and clinical procedures. Physicians value this unique
versatility more and more because patients ask them to contain costs
and manage human resources efficiently. The demand for medical
assistants is expanding rapidly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the
functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of
practice.
(2) "Health care practitioner" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW; or
(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an
osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW.
(3) "Medical assistant" means an unlicensed person who assists a
licensed health care practitioner in all aspects of outpatient
ambulatory health care pursuant to this chapter. A medical assistant
assists with patient care, executes administrative and clinical
procedures, and performs managerial functions.
(4) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is
physically present and is immediately available in the facility, but
need not be present during procedures to withdraw blood.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary shall adopt rules that
establish the minimum requirements necessary for a health care
practitioner, clinic, or group practice to certify a medical assistant
qualified to perform the duties authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any health care practitioner, clinic, or
group practice may certify a medical assistant to perform the functions
authorized in this chapter under the supervision of a health care
practitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A medical assistant under the supervision of
a health care practitioner may perform the following duties:
(1) Performing clinical procedures to include:
(a) Performing aseptic procedures;
(b) Preparing of and assisting in sterile procedures;
(c) Taking vital signs;
(d) Preparing patients for examination;
(e) Venous and capillary blood withdrawal and nonintravenous
injection;
(f) Observing and reporting patients signs or symptoms;
(2) Administering basic first aid;
(3) Assisting with patient examinations or treatment;
(4) Operating office medical equipment;
(5) Collecting routine laboratory specimens;
(6) Administering medications by unit, single, or calculated dosage
including vaccines; and
(7) Performing basic laboratory procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No person may practice as a medical
assistant unless that person is registered with the department of
health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In addition to any other authority
provided by law, the secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(c) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(d) Issue a registration to any applicant who has met the
requirements for registration and deny a registration to applicants who
do not meet the minimum qualifications for registration. However,
denial of a registration based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(e) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(f) Maintain the official department of health record of all
applicants and registrants; and
(g) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive
registration.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unregistered practice, the issuance and denial of a registration, and
the discipline of persons registered under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The secretary shall adopt rules to implement
this act by July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---