BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner must designate one statistical reporting agent
to assist him or her in gathering information on title insurance policy
issuance, business income, and expenses and making compilations
thereof. The costs and expenses of the statistical reporting agent
must be borne by all the authorized title insurance companies and title
insurance agents licensed to conduct the business of title insurance in
this state. The commissioner may adopt rules setting forth how the
costs and expenses of the statistical reporting agent are to be paid
and apportioned among the authorized title insurers and licensed title
insurance agents.
(2) Upon designation of a statistical reporting agent by the
commissioner under subsection (1) of this section all authorized title
insurance companies and licensed title insurance agents must annually,
by May 31st, file a report with the statistical reporting agent of
their policy issuance, business income, expenses, and loss experience
in this state. The report must be filed with the statistical reporting
agent in a manner and form prescribed by the commissioner by rule,
which must be consistent with the manner and form adopted by the
national association of insurance commissioners.
(3) The statistical reporting agent must review the information
filed with it for completeness, accuracy, and quality within one
hundred twenty days of its receipt. All title insurance companies and
title insurance agents must cooperate with the statistical reporting
agent to verify the completeness, accuracy, and quality of the data
that they submitted.
(4) Within thirty days after completing its review of the
information for quality and accuracy, the statistical reporting agent
must file the information for each title insurance company and title
insurance agent, individually and in the aggregate, with the
commissioner with a copy of the aggregate data from such statistical
reporting agent provided to each title insurer and title insurance
agent.
(5) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Information filed with the commissioner under section 1 of this
act must be kept confidential and is not subject to public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW, unless the commissioner finds, after notice
and hearing with the affected parties, it is in the public interest to
disclose the information.
(2) The commissioner may share the information in subsection (1) of
this section with the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, regulatory and law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and
international authorities, provided that the recipient agrees to
maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the commissioner from sharing or
publishing the information in an aggregate form.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.03.010 and 1993 c 462 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall examine the affairs, transactions,
accounts, records, documents, and assets of each authorized insurer as
often as he or she deems advisable. The commissioner shall so examine
each insurer holding a certificate of authority or certificate of
registration not less frequently than every five years. Examination of
an alien insurer may be limited to its insurance transactions in the
United States. In scheduling and determining the nature, scope, and
frequency of an examination, the commissioner shall consider such
matters as the results of financial statement analyses and ratios,
changes in management or ownership, actuarial opinions, reports of
independent certified public accountants, and other criteria as set
forth in the examiner's handbook adopted by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners and in effect when the commissioner exercises
discretion under this section.
(2) As often as the commissioner deems advisable and at least once
in five years, the commissioner shall fully examine each rating
organization and examining bureau licensed in this state. As often as
he or she deems it advisable the commissioner may examine each advisory
organization, any statistical reporting agent designated by the
commissioner under section 1 of this act, and each joint underwriting
or joint reinsurance group, association, or organization.
(3) The commissioner shall in like manner examine each insurer or
rating organization applying for authority to do business in this
state.
(4) In lieu of making an examination under this chapter, the
commissioner may accept a full report of the last recent examination of
a nondomestic rating or advisory organization, or joint underwriting or
joint reinsurance group, association or organization, as prepared by
the insurance supervisory official of the state of domicile or of
entry. In lieu of an examination under this chapter of a foreign or
alien insurer licensed in this state, the commissioner may accept an
examination report on the company as prepared by the insurance
department for the company's state of domicile or port-of-entry state
until January 1, 1994. Thereafter, an examination report may be
accepted only if: (a) That insurance department was at the time of the
examination accredited under the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners' financial regulation standards and accreditation
program; or (b) the examination was performed either under the
supervision of an accredited insurance department or with the
participation of one or more examiners employed by an accredited state
insurance department who, after a review of the examination work papers
and report, state under oath that the examination was performed in a
manner consistent with the standards and procedures required by their
insurance department.
(5) The commissioner may elect to accept and rely on an audit
report made by an independent certified public accountant for the
insurer in the course of that part of the commissioner's examination
covering the same general subject matter as the audit. The
commissioner may incorporate the audit report in his or her report of
the examination.
(6) For the purposes of completing an examination of any company
under this chapter, the commissioner may examine or investigate any
managing general agent or any other person, or the business of any
managing general agent or other person, insofar as that examination or
investigation is, in the sole discretion of the commissioner, necessary
or material to the examination of the company.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.03.060 and 2011 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Examinations within this state of any insurer or self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010
domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than a title
insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's examiners and
employees must, except as to fees, mileage, and expense incurred as to
witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(2) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the
examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices in this
state requiring travel and services outside this state, must be made by
the commissioner or by examiners designated by the commissioner and
must be at the expense of the person examined; but a domestic insurer
must not be liable for the compensation of examiners employed by the
commissioner for such services outside this state.
(3) When making an examination under this chapter, the commissioner
may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent
certified public accountants, or other professionals and specialists as
examiners, the cost of which must be borne by the person who is the
subject of the examination, except as provided in subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) The person examined and liable must reimburse the state upon
presentation of an itemized statement for the actual travel expenses of
the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable living expense
allowance, and their per diem compensation, including salary and the
employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable rate approved by
the commissioner, incurred on account of the examination. Per diem
salary and expenses for employees examining insurers domiciled outside
the state of Washington must be established by the commissioner on the
basis of the national association of insurance commissioner's
recommended salary and expense schedule for zone examiners, or the
salary schedule established by the state director of personnel, and the
expense schedule established by the office of financial management,
whichever is higher. A domestic title insurer must pay the examination
expense and costs to the commissioner as itemized and billed by the
commissioner.
The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners must not receive
or accept any additional emolument on account of any examination.
(5) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.
(6) The expense of the examination of any statistical reporting
agent designated by the commissioner under section 1 of this act must
be borne by and apportioned among all authorized title insurance
companies and licensed title insurance agents in this state.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.400 and 2010 c 172 s 2 and 2010 c 97 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court; ((and))
(18) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010; and
(19) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.400 and 2011 c 188 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151; ((and))
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010; and
(20) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---