BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.180 and 2009 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every
three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200, and
66.08.210((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board shall reserve from
distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as
may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.
(1) ((All)) Before any other distributions under this section are
made, license fees shall be distributed first as provided in this
subsection for the following licenses: Beer and/or wine restaurants;
taverns; snack bars; combined beer and wine retailers; grocery stores;
beer and/or wine specialty shops; passenger trains, vessels, and
airplanes; spirits, beer, and wine restaurants; spirits, beer, and wine
private clubs; beer and wine private clubs; and public houses.
(a) Ten and one-half percent of total license fee revenues shall be
deposited in the liquor revolving fund and may be expended only for
purposes of administration and enforcement of the licenses in this
subsection.
(b) Five percent of total license fee revenues shall be transferred
to the general fund to be used by the department of commerce solely for
community mobilization grants awarded under RCW 43.270.020.
(c) Five percent of total license fee revenues shall be transferred
to the general fund to be used by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction solely for safe and drug-free schools and
communities grants awarded under RCW 28A.170.090.
(2) After any distributions under subsection (1) of this section
are made, any remaining license fees, penalties, and forfeitures
derived under chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; hotel; spirits, beer,
and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses shall
every three months be disbursed by the board as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(((2))) (3) After any distributions under subsection (1) of this
section are made, the first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided
in RCW 66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the
board to the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug
prevention programs for kindergarten through third grade to be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction;
(((3))) (4) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived
from license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(((4))) (5) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW
66.24.210 shall every three months be disbursed by the board to
Washington State University solely for wine and wine grape research,
extension programs related to wine and wine grape research, and
resident instruction in both wine grape production and the processing
aspects of the wine industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The
director of financial management shall prescribe suitable accounting
procedures to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund to
be used by the department of social and health services and
appropriated are separately accounted for.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.320 and 2007 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on
the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises,
recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine
that was purchased for consumption with a meal.
(1) The annual fee shall be two hundred forty-one dollars for the
beer license, two hundred forty-one dollars for the wine license, or
four hundred eighty-two dollars for a combination beer and wine
license.
(2)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is ((three hundred fifty)) four hundred twenty-two dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with (([a])) a catering endorsement
shall, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of
the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon
request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or
requested information concerning the society or organization that will
be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the board, store liquor on the premises
of another not licensed by the board so long as there is a written
agreement between the licensee and the other party to provide for
ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no exclusivity
clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and the
agreement is filed with the board.
(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other
premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are
owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A
duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A
license fee of ((twenty)) twenty-four dollars shall be required for
such duplicate licenses.
(3) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such
premises under conditions established by the board under the following
conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or the passenger vessel,
as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing,
contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be
served, and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.
(4) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or
wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for
use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction
may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or
wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving,
storing, and handling beer or wine. The beer and/or wine licensee must
use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as
part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises
of the beer and/or wine licensee.
(5) If the license is issued to a person who contracts with the
Washington state ferry system to provide food and alcohol service on a
designated ferry route, the license shall cover any vessel assigned to
the designated route. A separate license is required for each
designated ferry route.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.330 and 2003 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated
as a tavern license to sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, or
both, at retail, for consumption on the premises. Such licenses may be
issued only to a person operating a tavern that may be frequented only
by persons twenty-one years of age and older.
The annual fee for such license shall be two hundred forty-one
dollars for the beer license, two hundred forty-one dollars for the
wine license, or four hundred eighty-two dollars for a combination beer
and wine license. ((Licensees who have a fee increase of more than one
hundred dollars as a result of this change shall have their fees
increased fifty percent of the amount the first renewal year and the
remaining amount beginning with the second renewal period. New
licensees obtaining a license after July 1, 1998, shall pay the full
amount of four hundred dollars.))

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.350 and 1997 c 321 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer retailer's license to be designated as a
snack bar license to sell beer by the opened bottle or can at retail,
for consumption upon the premises only, such license to be issued to
places where the sale of beer is not the principal business conducted;
fee one hundred ((twenty-five)) fifty-one dollars per year.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.354 and 1997 c 321 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license that may be
combined only with the on-premises licenses described in either RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.330. The combined license permits the sale of beer
and wine for consumption off the premises.
(1) Beer and wine sold for consumption off the premises must be in
original sealed packages of the manufacturer or bottler.
(2) Beer may be sold to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought
to the premises by the purchaser and filled at the tap by the retailer
at the time of sale.
(3) Licensees holding this type of license also may sell malt
liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four
gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW
66.28.200.
(4) The board may impose conditions upon the issuance of this
license to best protect and preserve the health, safety, and welfare of
the public.
(5) The annual fee for this license shall be one hundred ((twenty))
forty-five dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.24.360 and 2007 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or
wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the
state liquor stores.
(1) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(2) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
((fifty)) eighty-one dollars for each store.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain a
minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(5) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also
receive an endorsement to permit the international export of beer,
strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store
license shall be considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.
(d) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this license must be
sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder
of the license.
(e) The annual cost of this endorsement is ((five hundred)) six
hundred three dollars and is in addition to the license fees paid by
the licensee for a grocery store license.
(6) A grocery store licensee holding a snack bar license under RCW
66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of confections
containing more than one percent but not more than ten percent alcohol
by weight to persons twenty-one years of age or older.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.24.363 and 2010 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360 may apply for an
endorsement to offer beer and wine tasting under this section.
(2) To be issued an endorsement, a licensee must meet the following
criteria:
(a) The licensee has retail sales of grocery products for off-premises consumption that are more than fifty percent of the licensee's
gross sales or the licensee is a membership organization that requires
members to be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) The licensee operates a fully enclosed retail area encompassing
at least nine thousand square feet, except that the board may issue an
endorsement to a licensee with a retail area encompassing less than
nine thousand square feet if the board determines that no licensee in
the community the licensee serves meets the square footage requirement
and the licensee meets operational requirements established by the
board by rule; and
(c) The licensee has not had more than one public safety violation
within the past two years.
(3) A tasting must be conducted under the following conditions:
(a) Each sample must be two ounces or less, up to a total of four
ounces, per customer during any one visit to the premises;
(b) No more than one sample of the same product offering of beer or
wine may be provided to a customer during any one visit to the
premises;
(c) The licensee must have food available for the tasting
participants;
(d) Customers must remain in the service area while consuming
samples; and
(e) The service area and facilities must be located within the
licensee's fully enclosed retail area and must be of a size and design
such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to
ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently
intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(4) Employees of licensees whose duties include serving during
tasting activities under this section must hold a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(5) Tasting activities under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling may not be borne,
directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer, importer, or
distributor.
(6) A licensee may advertise a tasting event only within the store,
on a store web site, in store newsletters and flyers, and via e-mail
and mail to customers who have requested notice of events. Advertising
under this subsection may not be targeted to or appeal principally to
youth.
(7)(a) If a licensee is found to have committed a public safety
violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may suspend
the licensee's tasting endorsement and not reissue the endorsement for
up to two years from the date of the violation. If mitigating
circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty in lieu of
suspension during a settlement conference.
(b) The board may revoke an endorsement granted to a licensee that
is located within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized
by resolution of the board if the board finds that the tasting
activities by the licensee are having an adverse effect on the
reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.
(c) RCW 66.08.150 applies to the suspension or revocation of an
endorsement.
(8) The board may establish additional requirements under this
section to assure that persons under twenty-one years of age and
apparently intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(9) The annual fee for the endorsement is two hundred forty-one
dollars. The board shall review the fee annually and may increase the
fee by rule to a level sufficient to defray the cost of administration
and enforcement of the endorsement, except that the board may not
increase the fee by more than ten percent annually.
(10) The board must adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.24.371 and 2009 c 373 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.
The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is one
hundred twenty-one dollars for each store. The sale of any container
holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and
66.28.220.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.24.395 and 1997 c 321 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be a license that may be issued to corporations,
associations, or persons operating as federally licensed commercial
common passenger carriers engaged in interstate commerce, in or over
territorial limits of the state of Washington on passenger trains,
vessels, or airplanes. Such license shall permit the sale of
spirituous liquor, wine, and beer at retail for passenger consumption
within the state upon one such train passenger car, vessel, or
airplane, while in or over the territorial limits of the state. Such
license shall include the privilege of transporting into and storing
within the state such liquor for subsequent retail sale to passengers
in passenger train cars, vessels or airplanes. The fees for such
master license shall be ((seven hundred fifty)) nine hundred four
dollars per annum (class CCI-1)((: PROVIDED, That)). However, upon
payment of an additional sum of ((five)) six dollars per annum per car,
or vessel, or airplane, the privileges authorized by such license
classes shall extend to additional cars, or vessels, or airplanes
operated by the same licensee within the state, and a duplicate license
for each additional car, or vessel, or airplane shall be issued((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). Moreover, such licensee may make such sales
and/or service upon cars, or vessels, or airplanes in emergency for not
more than five consecutive days without such license((: AND PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That)). Furthermore, such license shall be valid only while
such cars, or vessels, or airplanes are actively operated as common
carriers for hire in interstate commerce and not while they are out of
such common carrier service.
(b) Alcoholic beverages sold and/or served for consumption by such
interstate common carriers while within or over the territorial limits
of this state shall be subject to such board markup and state liquor
taxes in an amount to approximate the revenue that would have been
realized from such markup and taxes had the alcoholic beverages been
purchased in Washington((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board's
markup shall be applied on spirituous liquor only. Such common
carriers shall report such sales and/or service and pay such markup and
taxes in accordance with procedures prescribed by the board.
(2) Alcoholic beverages sold and delivered in this state to
interstate common carriers for use under the provisions of this section
shall be considered exported from the state, subject to the conditions
provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The storage facilities
for liquor within the state by common carriers licensed under this
section shall be subject to written approval by the board.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.24.400 and 2008 c 41 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated
as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous
liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for
consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails
compounded or mixed on the premises only. A club licensed under
chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping accommodations, that is
licensed under this section may sell liquor by the bottle to registered
guests of the club for consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms,
or at banquets in the club. A patron of a bona fide restaurant or club
licensed under this section may remove from the premises recorked or
recapped in its original container any portion of wine which was
purchased for consumption with a meal, and registered guests who have
purchased liquor from the club by the bottle may remove from the
premises any unused portion of such liquor in its original container.
Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants and clubs, and
to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger trains, and to dining
places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to dining places at civic
centers with facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and
to such other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the
benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall
determine are qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board
should have, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under the
provisions and limitations of this title.
(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell bottled wine for off-premises
consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises
consumption under this section except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection
is one hundred ((twenty)) forty-five dollars.
(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager
may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's
employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine,
or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of
presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous
liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the
sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on
the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption malt
liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four
gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW
66.28.200. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is
one hundred ((twenty)) forty-five dollars.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.24.420 and 2009 c 271 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued
in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:
(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
shall be graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of
service provided as follows:

(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated
cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters,
or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business,
except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.
(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport
terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more
than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license
shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a
master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such
place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be
issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license
for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must maintain in a
substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing,
cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be
available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An
additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the annual master
license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or
privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports,
entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than
one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall
be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master
license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place.
Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at
the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for
each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a
dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention
center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the
premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and
food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on
the premises. An additional license fee of ((ten)) twelve dollars
shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(2) The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible,
shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the
business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and not
grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the immediate
vicinity of schools, without being limited in the administration of
this subsection to any specific distance requirements.
(3) The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of
Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the board, in
its discretion, to license in areas outside of cities and towns and
other communities, establishments which are operated and maintained
primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers, and
also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating dining, club
and buffet cars, or boats.
(4) The combined total number of spirits, beer, and wine nightclub
licenses, and spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses issued in the
state of Washington by the board, not including spirits, beer, and wine
private club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any time exceed
one license for each one thousand two hundred of population in the
state, determined according to the yearly population determination
developed by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW
43.62.030.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section, the board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license to any applicant if in the opinion of the board the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted for the particular
locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.
(6)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is ((three hundred fifty)) four hundred twenty-two dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with a catering endorsement shall,
if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the
date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request,
the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the board, store liquor on the premises
of another not licensed by the board so long as there is a written
agreement between the licensee and the other party to provide for
ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no exclusivity
clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and the
agreement is filed with the board.
(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other
premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are
owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A
duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A
license fee of ((twenty)) twenty-four dollars shall be required for
such duplicate licenses.
(7) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such
premises under conditions established by the board under the following
conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as
the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain
no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served,
and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.

Sec. 12 RCW 66.24.425 and 2001 c 199 s 3 and 2001 c 198 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may, in its discretion, issue a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to a business which qualifies as a "restaurant"
as that term is defined in RCW 66.24.410 in all respects except that
the business does not serve the general public but, through membership
qualification, selectively restricts admission to the business. For
purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all licenses issued under this
section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses
and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and qualifications in
this title, or in rules adopted by the board, as are applicable to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses generally except that no
service to the general public may be required.
(2) No license shall be issued under this section to a business:
(a) Which shall not have been in continuous operation for at least
one year immediately prior to the date of its application; or
(b) Which denies membership or admission to any person because of
race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical handicap.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license issued under this section that allows up to
forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and
guests may attend these events only by invitation of the sponsoring
member or members. These events may not be open to the general public.
The fee for the endorsement is an annual fee of ((nine hundred)) one
thousand eighty-five dollars. Upon the board's request, the holder of
the endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the
following information at least seventy-two hours before the event: The
date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of the
event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine
vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label
exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may
not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The
annual fee for the endorsement under this ((chapter [section])) section
is one hundred ((twenty)) forty-five dollars.

Sec. 13 RCW 66.24.450 and 2009 c 373 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No club shall be entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private
club license:
(a) Unless such private club has been in continuous operation for
at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application for
such license;
(b) Unless the private club premises be constructed and equipped,
conducted, managed, and operated to the satisfaction of the board and
in accordance with this title and the regulations made thereunder;
(c) Unless the board shall have determined pursuant to any
regulations made by it with respect to private clubs, that such private
club is a bona fide private club; it being the intent of this section
that license shall not be granted to a club which is, or has been,
primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor, but
solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of liquor is
incidental to the main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine private
club, as defined in RCW 66.04.010(8).
(2) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine private club
license, whether inside or outside of an incorporated city or town, is
((seven hundred twenty)) eight hundred sixty-eight dollars per year.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine private club license that allows up to forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend
these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members.
These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the
endorsement shall be an annual fee of ((nine hundred)) one thousand
eighty-five dollars. Upon the board's request, the holder of the
endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the
following information at least seventy-two hours prior to the event:
The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of
the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine private club license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer,
and wine private club license to sell bottled wine for off-premises
consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises
consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement
under this section is one hundred ((twenty)) forty-five dollars.

Sec. 14 RCW 66.24.452 and 2009 c 373 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and wine license to be issued to a
private club for sale of beer, strong beer, and wine for on-premises
consumption.
(2) Beer, strong beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap
or by open bottles or cans.
(3) The fee for the private club beer and wine license is ((one
hundred eighty)) two hundred seventeen dollars per year.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and
wine license that allows the holder of a private club beer and wine
license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption. Spirits,
strong beer, and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption
under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this
section is one hundred ((twenty)) forty-five dollars.

Sec. 15 RCW 66.24.580 and 1999 c 281 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public house license allows the licensee:
(a) To annually manufacture no less than two hundred fifty gallons
and no more than two thousand four hundred barrels of beer on the
licensed premises;
(b) To sell product, that is produced on the licensed premises, at
retail on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed
premises;
(c) To sell beer or wine not of its own manufacture for consumption
on the licensed premises if the beer or wine has been purchased from a
licensed beer or wine wholesaler;
(d) To hold other classes of retail licenses at other locations
without being considered in violation of RCW 66.28.010;
(e) To apply for and, if qualified and upon the payment of the
appropriate fee, be licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant to
do business at the same location. This fee is in addition to the fee
charged for the basic public house license.
(2) While the holder of a public house license is not to be
considered in violation of the prohibitions of ownership or interest in
a retail license in RCW 66.28.010, the remainder of RCW 66.28.010
applies to such licensees.
(3) A public house licensee must pay all applicable taxes on
production as are required by law, and all appropriate taxes must be
paid for any product sold at retail on the licensed premises.
(4) The employees of the licensee must comply with the provisions
of mandatory server training in RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.
(5) The holder of a public house license may not hold a
wholesaler's or importer's license, act as the agent of another
manufacturer, wholesaler, or importer, or hold a brewery or winery
license.
(6) The annual license fee for a public house is one thousand two
hundred five dollars.
(7) The holder of a public house license may hold other licenses at
other locations if the locations are approved by the board.
(8) Existing holders of annual retail liquor licenses may apply for
and, if qualified, be granted a public house license at one or more of
their existing liquor licensed locations without discontinuing business
during the application or construction stages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---