BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.026 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((1))) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set
forth in RCW 82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to
three cents per cigarette.
(((2))) Beginning July 1, 2010, the revenue collected under this
section must be deposited ((as follows:
(a) 14 percent must be deposited)) into the general fund.
(((b) The remainder must be deposited into the education legacy
trust account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---