BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The capital budget includes appropriations for the construction
and repair of public schools, colleges and universities, prisons and
juvenile rehabilitation facilities, state office buildings, housing for
low-income and disabled persons, farm workers and others, parks, public
infrastructure, and for other capital facilities and programs;
(b) The size of the capital budget is determined by the available
bond capacity under the constitutional debt limit and by moneys
available from dedicated accounts, trust revenue, and other funding
sources;
(c) Approximately half of the capital budget is financed with
state-issued general obligation bonds, which pledge the full faith,
credit and taxing power of the state toward payment of debt service;
and
(d) The capital budget has limited purpose if there is no bond
authorization bill to finance appropriations.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to increase the transparency
and clarity of the uses and sources of the capital budget for the 2011
supplemental and 2011-2013 fiscal biennium by combining in one bill the
authorization of state general obligation bonds with the appropriations
that they support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2013, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The appropriations in this act are appropriations for capital
purposes from proceeds of general obligation and other bonds.
Appropriations in this act may not necessarily represent all
expenditures authorized for a particular project for the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium. For some projects receiving appropriations in this
act, additional appropriations from other sources for those projects
may also be contained in chapter . . . ., Laws of 2011 (House Bill No.
1497).
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2012" or "FY 2012" means the period beginning July
1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2012.
(b) "Fiscal year 2013" or "FY 2013" means the period beginning July
1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2013.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(4) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any
portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(5) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only
and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior
biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for
reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of
specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what
may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2011-2013
biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not
necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for
the project or program in the future.
(6) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless
the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant
conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.
Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining
on June 30, 2011, from the 2009-2011 biennial appropriations for each
project.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1001, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,523,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,949,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,301,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,742,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,258,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (20074006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1040, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,688,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,010,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 and section 1005,
chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (20081001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1016, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Quincy Water Treatment System (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,328,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,563,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008 and section 1003, chapter 36, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,757,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,409,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools Program (20084856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,469,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,326,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1011, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,028,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,047,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,776,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,203,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,917,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 1012, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,851,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,551,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to section
1014, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1015, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1050, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,106,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,298,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,936,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools & Higher Education Institutions
(91000085)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund
(30000098)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to construct
or rehabilitate facilities to house homeless veterans. The department
must consult with the department of veterans affairs and must use these
funds as matching resources for funds available from the federal
veterans administration and the department of housing and urban
development.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(4) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities to house low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The department shall work with the farmworker housing
advisory committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of
highest need.
(5) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to build
low-income housing units in underserved communities and to concurrently
develop capacity in these same communities. Underserved communities of
concern are those that have high levels of poverty, specifically,
thirty percent of the local median income; experience chronic
homelessness; and lack affordable housing. Underserved communities
include veterans, immigrants, refugees, and those communities of color
disproportionately impacted by chronic homelessness and lack of
affordable housing. The department must collaborate with
representatives of underserved communities and organizations committed
to assistance in these efforts to prioritize and plan distribution of
funding.
(6) For counties with populations exceeding one million five
hundred thousand during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, allocation of
funds provided in this section shall account for local policies related
to affordable housing as required by chapter 36.70A RCW.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the projects or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for this purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Serenity House of Clallam County $52,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of King County $316,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap
Counties $1,250,000

Jewish Family Service $2,313,000

Low Income Housing Institute $313,000

The Salvation Army $56,000

Share $581,000

Navos $2,500,000

Kitsap Community Resources $600,000

Transitions $109,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Columbia
Basin $648,000

Village Green Foundation $1,029,000

Community Action Council of LMT $95,000

United Way of Kitsap County $605,000

ARC of Spokane $862,000

Dynamic Family Services $575,000

University District Food Bank $573,000

Total $12,327,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation in this section for the Roslyn Renaissance
project is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is
the intent of this appropriation to undertake a feasibility study of
structural and program integrity of historic buildings including (a)
the northwest improvement company store, (b) the Sylvia's house, and
(c) vacant commercial lots within the city of Roslyn. The study will
analyze the adaptability of relocating the city offices to the
renovated city hall building. The Roslyn downtown association shall
submit the completed study to the department by July 1, 2012, including
a detailed cost estimate for the property acquisition and
redevelopment, and a capital fundraising plan to support the
acquisitions through multiple funding sources.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Adna Athletic and Fitness Facility $80,000

American Lake Veterans' Golf
Course $250,000

Anacortes Depot $380,000

Bothell North Creek Forest Land
Acquisition $200,000

Boys and Girls Federal Way $50,000

Bucoda Odd Fellows Community
Center $150,000

Central WA State Fair
Association $35,000

City of Kirkland Athletic Fields $150,000

Colville Tribal Museum $250,000

Daybreak Youth Services Pre-Construction Activities $100,000

Dekalb Pier Project $700,000

Gig Harbor Maritime Pier $390,000

Grays Harbor Historical Seaport
Lady Washington Rehabilitation $169,000

Legion Park Visitors Center and
Trailhead Project $110,000

Match FEMA funds for Sprague
Response Center $300,000

North Mason Senior Center $1,360,000

Port of Bremerton $1,100,000

Puyallup Transit Oriented
Development $1,500,000

Redmond Central Connector $850,000

Roslyn Renaissance $300,000

Seattle Children's Hospital
Emergency Department $1,000,000

Skagit Valley Hospital $750,000

South Tacoma Community Center
Playground $380,000

Spokane Food Bank Distribution
Center Capacity and Renovation $1,250,000

Spokane Valley Partners Boiler
Replacement $100,000

Sultan Boys and Girls Club $500,000

Tacoma Hilltop Health Center $1,500,000

The Arc of Tri-Cities Facility $350,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Center $900,000

Vancouver Waterfront Park Pre-Construction Activities $500,000

Veteran's Memorial $210,000

West Hill Skyway
Redevelopment $750,000

YWCA Yakima $203,000

Total $16,817,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000100)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Little Bit Therapeutic Riding Center $560,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of King County -
Mercer Island PEAK
$800,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of Thurston County $163,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap Counties $800,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle $800,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of King County -
Ballard Boys & Girls Club Addition
$475,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Columbia Basin $629,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of Whatcom County $26,000

Total $4,253,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000101)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the projects or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for this purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Bainbridge Art Museum $518,000

Community Theatre, Inc. $91,000

Coyote Central $243,000

Harrington Opera House $66,000

Olympia Little Theatre $44,000

Seattle Musical Theatre $163,000

SIFF $491,000

Studio East Training for the Performing
Arts/Studio
$100,000

Taproot Theatre Company $570,000

Town Hall Association dba Town Hall
Seattle
$70,000

Velocity Dance Center $106,000

Total $2,462,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,506,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (91000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $644,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,320,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the
Chehalis basin flood control authority or other local flood districts
(i) to study, develop, construct, maintain, operate, and fund flood
control measures throughout the basin, (ii) to complete by December
2011 the ongoing study of the effect of possible retention structures
on fish in the basin, and (iii) to complete the hydraulic model for the
Chehalis river to calculate flood levels, flood damages, and benefits
of proposed flood mitigation projects for the lower portions of the
river; and
(b) $1,200,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for
nonfederal matching funds and state agency costs associated with the
United States army corps of engineers flood hazard mitigation projects
for the Chehalis river basin.
(2) By July 2012, the office of financial management, in
collaboration with the department of transportation and the department
of ecology, and affected and interested federal agencies, tribal
governments and local governments, must provide a report to the
governor and legislature that identifies recommended priority flood
hazard mitigation projects in the Chehalis river basin for continued
feasibility and design work. The report must:
(a) Address the potential for flood mitigation through upstream
water retention facilities, including benefits and impacts to fish and
potential mitigation of impacts;
(b) Describe the current alignment and design of the federal flood
levees proposed at Centralia and Chehalis, including extent of
protection provided to these communities, and any upstream or
downstream effects of the levees;
(c) Evaluate alternative projects that could protect the interstate
highway and the municipal airport at Centralia and Chehalis, and ensure
access to medical and other critical community facilities during flood
events;
(d) Discuss other alternatives that could provide flood relief and
protection in the basin, such as replacement of highway bridges that
constrain flood waters, flood easements on agricultural lands,
livestock evacuation facilities and routes, small-scale water diversion
and retention, use of riparian habitat and environmental restoration
projects to mitigate damages from flood waters, and other projects or
programs;
(e) Summarize the benefits and costs of recommended projects, using
available information and accepted benefit/cost methods; and
(f) Identify the responsible parties and procedures for making
final decisions on funding, construction and governance of recommended
flood projects, any related and necessary government agreements, and a
schedule for these decisions.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to fulfill the commitment
of section 101, chapter 179, Laws of 2008 and chapter 180, Laws of
2008, by appropriating funds when the federal match requirement is
needed.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,980,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,610,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,515,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Graving Dock Settlement (20084001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Emergency Repairs (30000027)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Emergency funds shall not be allotted
until an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director,
a scope of work, and cost estimate are approved by the office of
financial management. Emergency funds may only be used for unexpected
building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety,
or the day-to-day operations of the facility. The office of financial
management shall report to the house capital budget committee and
senate ways and means committee annually on the approved emergency
projects.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,183,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Bid Savings Contingency Pool (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (20081007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Upon completion of the project, temporary
modular buildings shall be removed, and the parking lot shall be
restored and landscaped within budget.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,944,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus High Voltage System Improvements (20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (20081011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,659,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,751,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (30000033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Powerhouse: Improvements and Preservation (30000056)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Facility Oversight Program: Staffing (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (20021008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,692,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000550)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,420,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (30000577)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,226,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,363,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000560)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,198,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,384,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historic Barn Preservation (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,963,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Fire Alarm Replacement (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center: Utility Replacements (20081504)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,193,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,813,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30000366)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30000367)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30000368)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,639,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center: Portable Classroom Replacement
(30000844)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Westlake Building Renovation (30000852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capacity to Replace Maple Lane School (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,635,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,097,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30001264)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30001290)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30001291)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (30002221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,561,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,616,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: HVAC Systems Upgrades (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works Preservation: Facility Preservation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Grants: Tulalip Water Supply and Hanson Harbor
(92000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $699,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for the Hanson Harbor water supply project. $2,500,000 of the
appropriation is provided solely for the Tulalip water supply pipeline.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,199,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,199,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,141,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(20062070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,029,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $798,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,024,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,446,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30000047)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $888,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000086)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,857,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace 5 Towers and Housing Roofs
(30000108)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The funding is provided solely for the
replacement of roofs on offender housing units.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Fire Detection/Suppression
(30000123)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Water Line Replacements (30000137)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,538,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Programmatic Projects (30000173)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,810,000
Public Safety Reimbursable Bond Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,356,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Westside Corrections Complex: Siting and Predesign (92000032)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (20042008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,974,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,629,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Special Offender Unit Core Building
and Wings Roofing (30000528)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation
(30000539)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,827,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Facility Preservation
(30000540)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,978,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,478,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code
Requirements (30000541)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,490,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
New Prison Reception Center (30000570)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,181,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,381,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,406,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $407,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,102,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 322, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,212,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (20052851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,968,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,229,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,097,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,604,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the
Columbia basin ground water management area for the following projects:
(a) $600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to construct
localized hydrologic models for municipal supply sources and aquifer
storage and recovery potential; and
(b) $400,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to develop and
implement methods to identify sustainable wells near the East Low
Canal.
(2) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation program.
(3) The department must reexamine its method of accounting for in-stream and out-of-stream benefits and develop a means of accounting for
the indirect but substantial and tangible out-of-stream benefits that
accrue from conservation, pump exchanges, and other projects. The
department must report the results of this reexamination to the
legislature by September 15, 2011.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,987,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,513,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,287,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,029,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Storm water Projects (20082002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,949,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,971,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm water Projects (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,533,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water (20084002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,495,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,624,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and
environmental impact statement. The reappropriated funds are to be
used by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to
evaluate potential in basin storage facilities such as the proposed
Bumping Lake and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives
that will enhance water supplies and streamflows in the Yakima basin.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,211,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,455,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup and Restoration (30000020)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,973,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds may be provided to develop and implement water banking
and transfer methods and agreements that are fully protective of senior
water rights and that protect domestic groundwater users and improve
the profitability of farming operations. The legislature finds such
activities to be in the public interest because they can help sustain
the viability of the agricultural economy and enhance the certainty of
water supplies for domestic groundwater users.
(2) Funds may be provided to lease or purchase water rights to
create a reserve water supply for domestic groundwater users that have
a groundwater right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as
well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users. In securing water
for such domestic groundwater users, strong preference shall be given
to the use of water banking and transfer methods that provide
alternatives to permanent purchase and dry-up of agricultural water
rights in the basin, including dry-year options, water banking, long-term water supply lease agreements, long-term agricultural land
fallowing agreements, and reduced consumptive use through efficiency or
alternative cropping arrangements while maintaining historic return
flows.
(3) A portion of the reappropriation may be used for administrative
costs, not to exceed four percent, and other costs associated with
leasing or acquiring and transferring the water rights. All costs
shall be fully recovered from participating domestic water users for
their prorated portion of the cost, including but not limited to the
costs of securing a water right or rights for this purpose, costs
associated with the development and implementation of alternative
agricultural water transfer methods, associated annual operational
costs, and federal water service contract costs owed to the United
States bureau of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner shall be
deposited in the state and local improvement revolving fund and may be
used for any purpose provided in this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,877,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
terms and conditions: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions
of section 3005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,879,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $17,500,000 of the cleanup
settlement account--state appropriation may be used for cleanup
activities associated with the Asarco contamination in Everett.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3016,
chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for
projects that improve water supplies and help achieve instream flows by
implementing watershed plans, as follows:
(1) Surface or groundwater storage feasibility projects, where such
projects are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage
task force report to the legislature, February 2001 (Ecology
Publication # 01 11 2002). The department shall consult the department
of fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use or stream flow
measurement.
(4) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks, water exchanges or similar tools. The department of
ecology shall give priority to water acquisitions in salmon critical
basins and in basins with adopted watershed plans (chapter 90.82 RCW).
The department shall place acquired water into the state's trust water
rights program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW). $2,000,000 of the
appropriation is provided solely for acquisition of water rights that
will be placed into the state's trust water rights program specifically
and only for instream flow purposes and not for water banks, water
exchanges and similar tools that are for mitigation of existing or
future water supply needs and other beneficial uses other than instream
flows.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Hood Canal Regional Septic Repair Loan Program (30000215)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Cleanup (30000015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation
(30000278)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (30000285)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Green River Flood Levee Improvements (30000295)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mount Vernon Flood Protection (30000297)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Hood Canal Wastewater (20061850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,790,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Preservation (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trail Development (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Initiative (30000050)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Twanoh State Park: Storm Water Improvements (30000054)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Dash Point State Park: Sanitary Sewer Collection System (30000269)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,247,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park: Housing Areas Exterior Improvements
(30000433)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $407,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Illahee State Park: Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (30000447)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $868,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park: Wastewater System (30000483)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fish Barrier Removal (30000540)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,940,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse Tunnel Hazard Repair (30000552)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Health and Safety (30000667)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,866,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,866,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park Wide Wastewater Treatment System (20082041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Facilities and Infrastructure Preservation (30000766)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,421,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000770)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park: Building 202 Rehabilitation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (19982003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 158, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $396,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,718,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,080,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriation that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $889,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,579,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Athletic Fields (20062952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 172, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $621,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,879,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 403, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,415,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 404, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,884,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,225,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,891,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (20082001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This reappropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,159,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,307,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20084005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,609,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the board may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000 each
to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands preservation
strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the farmlands
preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is for the Chehalis river surge plain natural area
preserve. This amount may not be expended for the project until the
department of natural resources has completed a management plan for the
preserve that maintains recreational access and that management plan is
presented to the house of representatives capital budget and senate
ways and means committees.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,665,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,367,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,262,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,821,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,377,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,187,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,785,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,357,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,060,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,542,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,701,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,887,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,579,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000081)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,855,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000203)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed
May 24, 2011.

Appropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,200,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,200,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Flood Assistance for Farm Communities (20084850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (91000002)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wiley Slough Restoration (20081028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,645,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (20062001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $495,000 of the state building
construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely to
complete project design, permitting, bid plans and specifications, and
preconstruction monitoring for removal or modification of the Seahurst
Park North Seawall.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,731,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,863,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for property acquisition, design, and permitting. If
the department does not acquire property, the amounts provided in this
section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Issaquah Hatchery Gravity Intake (20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Stemilt Basin Acquisition (20082029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000149)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000300)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,057,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $716,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Access Areas Preservation (30000086)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skamania Hatchery Intake Replacement (30000088)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Carpenter Creek Estuary Restoration (92000023)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000135)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Dam and Dike (30000145)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $718,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000173)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $577,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beebe Springs Phase 3 (92000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $651,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beebe Springs Development (92000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000295)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,727,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Access Areas Preservation (30000296)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Dam and Dike (30000297)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Cherry Valley Fish Passage and Stream Restoration (30000105)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,451,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000284)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,741,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000298)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000372)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Programmatic (30000301)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation (20082015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,456,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (20081015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000198)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Fire Hazard Reductions (30000201)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for forest improvement treatments on state trust lands
in eastern Washington.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000208)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (30000200)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided solely to the department to
transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes. The
approved list of properties for lease or transfer is identified in the
LEAP capital document No. 2011-4B, developed April 11, 2011.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. No later than September 30, 2011,
the department must deposit in the common school construction account
the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the
estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This
transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other
common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the
appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land
transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property
replacement account.
(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be
appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with
options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be
lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of
the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. No later than September 30, 2011, the
department must transfer to the common school construction account the
portion of the appropriation in this section that is attributable to
receipts from lease payments.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs and shall not
exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the original intended public purpose and the department
and legislature approves such uses.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) $53,231,000 of the appropriation must be deposited in the
common school construction account by September 30, 2011. The
department shall execute trust land transfers so that after the
deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section on an aggregate basis eighty percent of the total value of
transferred property is timber value or lease payments and is deposited
in the common school construction account. To achieve the eighty
percent requirement, the department may choose to lease properties
originally intended as transfers or transfer properties originally
intended as leases.
(9) By June 30, 2013, the state treasurer shall transfer to the
common school construction account any unexpended balance of the
appropriation in this section.
(10) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
department to process the fee transfer of properties leased to the
department of fish and wildlife through the trust land transfer program
during the current or previous biennium.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replacing State Forest Lands with Productive Forests (91000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided solely to the department to
transfer from state forest land status to natural resources
conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties with a
population of 25,000 or less which are subject to timber harvest
deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife
species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act. The approved list of properties for transfer is
identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2011-5A, developed March
24, 2011.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110, in the same manner as valuable material revenues from
other state forest lands in the applicable counties. The value of the
land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving
account and be solely used to buy replacement state forest land within
the same county as the property transferred, consistent with RCW
79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
applicable counties may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the state
forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Health and Safety Projects at County Fairs (92000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works: Preservation (30000050)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,415,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,259,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,187,000
School Construction and Skills Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,707,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,087,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,949,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,772,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $14,000,000 of the state building
construction account--state reappropriation in this section is for the
Grand Coulee Dam school district school project, contingent on the
availability of sufficient contributions from federal, local, or
private sources to make up the remainder of the total cost of the
project. The Grand Coulee Dam school district is faced with a unique
set of local funding barriers and federal funds may substitute as the
usual requirement for school district participation. In the event
sufficient matching contributions are not secured by the Grand Coulee
Dam school district, these funds shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,681,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--Bond--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,885,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,566,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,862,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency and Small Repair Grants (91000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 5007, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,844,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,045,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review the impact of students enrolled in alternative learning
experiences on the calculation of student enrollment projections for
determining school district eligibility for school construction
assistance, and shall work with interested stakeholders to analyze
whether the calculation should be changed. The results of the
analysis, including possible recommendations for an adjustment factor,
shall be submitted to the senate ways and means committee and the house
capital budget committee no later than December 31, 2011.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,765,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,927,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Urgent Repair Grant Program (91000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for nonrecurring costs
associated with school facility repairs and renovations necessary for
unforeseen health and safety needs.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after
consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school
districts, shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific
projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this
section. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the
following: (a) Limiting district applications to one hundred thousand
dollars; (b) limiting districts eligible to receive the grant to only
once every other biennium; and (c) requiring any district receiving
funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment
to addressing school facilities needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Skills Centers Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Aviation High School (20081002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Operational Savings Project Grants (30000097)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for energy operational
cost savings improvements to school facilities.
(2) Grants shall be awarded for projects using the energy savings
performance contracting method under chapter 39.35C RCW or an
equivalent method of evaluating and delivering energy operational costs
savings improvements. Projects that do not use energy savings
performance contracting must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost
savings for ten years or until the energy and operational costs savings
pay for the project, whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of
general administration's energy savings performance contracting method
guidelines; and (c) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit,
design, and construction. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may require third-party verification of savings if a
project is not implemented by an energy savings performance contracting
method as outlined in chapter 39.35C RCW. If required, third-party
verification must be conducted either by an energy savings performance
contractor qualified by the department of general administration, or a
licensed engineer that is a certified energy manager.
(3) Projects must be weighted and prioritized based on the
following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Prior grant award: Priority consideration shall be given to
applicants that did not receive grant awards from appropriations
provided in sections 1016 and 5007, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp.
sess.;
(b) Leverage ratio: The higher the leverage ratio of guaranteed
energy savings and utility or other incentives to state grant, the
higher the project ranking;
(c) Energy savings: The higher the simple payback for energy
savings, not to exceed the useful life of the energy conservation
measure, the higher the project ranking; and
(d) Persistence: The more extensively a project ensures the
persistence of energy operational cost savings through ongoing
measurement, verification, and reporting over the life of a project,
the higher the project ranking.
(4) In order to be eligible for energy cost savings grants under
this section, school districts must complete an investment grade audit
prior to application, or have completed an audit in the 2009-2011
biennium.
(5)(a) The superintendent of public instruction must use bond
proceeds to pay one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per
square foot, if the project does not meet the school district's
predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school districts
must pay the other one-half of the cost of the preliminary audit if the
project does not meet their predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(b) The energy savings performance contractor shall not charge for
an investment grade audit if the project does not meet the school
district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school
districts must pay the full price of an investment grade audit if they
do not proceed with a project that meets the school district's
predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(6) Applicants must submit documentation that demonstrates energy
and operational cost savings resulting from the installation of the
energy equipment and improvements. The energy savings analysis shall
be performed by a licensed engineer, and the documentation must
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements; and
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings.
(7) Each school district is limited to one grant award and no more
than $1,000,000.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
charge projects administrative fees.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal
year, until the funds are fully expended.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,739,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Preservation (30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $432,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Well Replacement (91000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Odegaard Undergraduate Learning Center (30000370)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,216,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,435,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
House of Knowledge Longhouse (30000021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,769,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,135,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
High Voltage Infrastructure Improvement Project (30000371)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington - Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Anderson Hall Renovation (20091002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,997,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Vancouver - Applied Technology and
Classroom Building (20062950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,828,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000065)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,803,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,335,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,978,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,365,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,843,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,283,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,144,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,242,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $376,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,290,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,868,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (30000451)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Nutrition Science: Predesign (30000456)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Laboratory Building Preservation and Renovation
(30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,291,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $530,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Preservation (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Infrastructure (30000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab I, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000116)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,364,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,862,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facilities Preservation (30000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,881,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure (30000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,023,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,225,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Fraser Hall Renovation (30000427)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,175,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (2002S001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,119,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (20024001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,681,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
212, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5043, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $964,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,635,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5044, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,759,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5120, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5045, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,788,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve West Barracks (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the provisions of section 5040, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Building Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Schooner Martha Foundation $118,000

Cascade Land Conservancy $155,000

Port of Chinook $45,000

City of Bellingham $100,000

La Conner Quilt and Textile
Museum $25,000

City of Vancouver $610,000

Blue Mountain Heritage
Society $30,000

Metro Parks Tacoma $60,000

Si View Metro Park District $25,000

Total $1,168,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum System Repair and Upgrades/Preservation (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,857,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Science Building (20012687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,835,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,978,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Music Building 15 Renovation
(20081320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,967,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls - Business and Social Science Building (20051853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,913,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College, Fort Steilacoom - Science and Technology (20042694)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,393,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom - Cascade Core (20061326)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,706,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Building 7 Renovation (20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $732,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,620,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College - Humanities and Student Services (20061204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,888,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup - Communication Arts and Health Building
(20042691)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,691,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (20061501)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $951,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,478,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,950,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Allied Health Building
(20062697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,343,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(20062698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,130,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,976,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,387,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (20081218)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,987,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,831,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,335,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,468,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,988,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,489,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $718,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,810,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Academic and Student Services Building
(20081224)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $890,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,545,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Health and Science Building (20081225)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,927,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,931,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,863,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,270,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,751,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,341,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $906,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,819,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,885,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,554,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,712,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $805,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,657,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $633,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,186,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,049,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000048)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,670,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (30000078)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,599,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,259,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: College/City Library (30000113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Fisheries Program (30000117)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Myklebust Gymnasium (30000118)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Music and Arts Center (30000119)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,954,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,291,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,584,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Stadium & Athletic Fields
(30000116)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $758,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Math Technology Building
(30000130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,562,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works Program (30000674)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,317,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Construction Contingency Pool (92000007)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
allocation by the state board for community and technical colleges for
major construction and renovation projects that confront emergent and
unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and
management reserves included in the project appropriation. The board
shall report at least quarterly to the office of financial management
and the legislative capital budget committees on requests for and
allocations from the pool.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,439,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,339,000

(End of part)

PART 6
2011 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 6001 2009 c 497 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for the specified public works projects and competitive public
works grant programs specified below. The public works board (board)
shall administer the following competitive public works grant programs
within the amounts specified, provided that up to ten percent of the
amounts provided for competitive grant programs may be transferred to
other competitive grant categories if acceptable applications for any
category do not total the amount available.
(1) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving communities in rural
counties as defined in RCW 43.160.020. The board shall prioritize
applications for funding for this small community jobs program based on
the following criteria:
(a) The unemployment rate of the community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The value the project presents to the community in lasting
improvements to public safety, environmental quality, recreation and
community life, or economic development.
(2) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving high density urban
communities. The board shall prioritize applications for funding from
this urban vitality program based on the following criteria:
(a) The proposed project's ability to decrease the per capita
vehicle miles driven in the community by increasing access to mass
transit, supporting residential density in proximity to employment
opportunities, and improving the safety and appeal of walking and
biking in a community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The local support for the project as indicated by the level of
local matching funds devoted to the project. Local matching funds do
not include funds from other state sources.
(3) The state taxable building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for emergency loans under RCW
43.155.065.
(4) (($23,535,000)) $21,528,000 is provided solely for the
following list of projects. The appropriation for Airway Heights
wastewater treatment plant is contingent upon a capacity agreement with
the Kalispel Tribe that precludes the need to build multiple wastewater
treatment facilities on the West Plains. If any project on the
following list is unable to show reasonable progress towards
accomplishing the intended project by December 31, 2010, the board may
transfer the amount allocated for the project to the competitive grant
categories in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Airway Heights Water Treatment Plant $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Assistance for Grand Coulee School $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Camano Island County Park Development $300,000

Small Community Jobs - Connell Infrastructure $1,100,000

Small Community Jobs - Dayton School Biomass Heating System $100,000

Small Community Jobs - Grandview Downtown Revitalization $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Green Acres Neighborhood Park $200,000

Small Community Jobs - Hoh Tribe Fire Station $623,000

Small Community Jobs - Longview Elementary Safety Underpass $250,000

Small Community Jobs - Mesa Playground $35,000

Small Community Jobs - Pasco Commercial Avenue Construction $800,000

Small Community Jobs - Union Gap School Crossing Improvement $227,000

Small Community Jobs - Yakima Downtown Futures $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Yelm Longmire Park $400,000

Urban Vitality - Federal Way Urban Infrastructure $5,000,000

((Urban Vitality - Infrastructure for Puyallup (Parametrix) $2,000,000))

Urban Vitality - Percival Landing $3,000,000

Urban Vitality - Redmond Square Development $2,000,000

Urban Vitality - Renton Hawks Landing $1,700,000

Water - Gig Harbor Waste Water Treatment $2,500,000

Water - Pine Terrace Water Association Project (($300,000))
$293,000

Total $21,528,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,597,000))
$40,340,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,597,000))
$42,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,597,000))
$42,340,000

Sec. 6002 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1001 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (1) $64,319 of the remaining
reappropriation for El Centro de la raza may be used for building
infrastructure. (2) $10,000 of the remaining reappropriation for
miracle league handicapped baseball may be used for pre-grading and
resurfacing construction. (3) $1,394,107 of the remaining
reappropriation for MOBIUS/inland northwest science and technology
center may be used for building design, construction, and renovation.
(4) $500,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Soundway property
preservation project may be used by the city of Seattle, in cooperation
with the nature consortium for habitat, recreation improvements, or
stewardship of the property, if the city of Seattle enacts pending city
legislation to preserve the property and place it under the
jurisdiction of city of Seattle parks and recreation. (5) The
reappropriation is adjusted for the transfer of the Vancouver national
historical reserve west barracks project to the Washington state
historical society and the termination of the following projects that
are no longer viable: (a) Snohomish senior center ((and)), (b) central
area motivation program (CAMP), (c) undeveloped woodlands linked to
interurban trail, (d) Hamilton improvement project, (e) Chambers Creek
footbridge, and (f) Tukwila kayak and canoe launching facility.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,258,000))
$8,761,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,399,000))
$45,902,000

Sec. 6003 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 107,
chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) The appropriation is subject to the project list in section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(3) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation for the Pacific Northwest
national labs campus infrastructure project is provided solely for
giga-pop infrastructure.
(4) Up to $2,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements and the purchase of real property in fee simple to restrict
the use of accident potential zones and clear zones. The office of
financial management shall establish a competitive process for
selecting projects to receive the grants. Final allocation of these
grants shall be at the discretion and with the approval of the director
of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the ((re))appropriation is provided solely
for improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force
base.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,733,000))
$1,253,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,439,000))
$9,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,828,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$46,941,000

Sec. 6004 2009 c 497 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Services Facilities Grants (20074002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1029, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(3) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the YMCA
of Snohomish county project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,495,000))
$1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,652,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,147,000))
$9,872,000

Sec. 6005 2009 c 497 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (20074003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1007, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the
Bellevue clubhouse project and the Mukilteo boys and girls club
project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$2,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,050,000))
$8,000,000

Sec. 6006 2009 c 497 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Water System Acquisition Rehabilitation Program (20074006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for the city of Republic to acquire the Pine Grove
water system.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,191,000))
$2,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,750,000))
$3,656,000

Sec. 6007 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1032,
chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
to the port of Grays Harbor for the bulk liquid facility project.
(3) The reappropriation is adjusted for (a) the termination of the
city of Soap Lake project.

Reappropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,298,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,930,000))
$19,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,930,000))
$48,930,000

Sec. 6008 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition. If the facility is not constructed by June 30, 2015, the
school district shall reimburse the state an amount equal to $1,000,000
increased by the average percentage appreciation in property values for
undeveloped land in the surrounding area between the date the school
district acquired the property and June 30, 2015 or the date the school
district disposes of the property.
(4) $600,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the institute for
community leadership may be used for land acquisition.
(5) $250,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest ilocandia association may be used for acquisition and
renovation.
(6) $200,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the library
connection at Greenbridge may be used for construction and equipment.
(7) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition.
(8) The remaining reappropriation for the Mobius/inland northwest
science and technology center may be used for building design,
construction, and renovation.
(9) The reappropriation is adjusted for the transfer of the
Vancouver national historical reserve project to the Washington state
historical society; the reduction of $1,400,000 from the Tacoma narrows
bridge lights project and $110,000 from the Seatac world war I memorial
plaza; and the termination of the following projects that are no longer
viable: (a) Camp kilworth land acquisition - Federal Way, (b) Kitsap
SEED, ((and (c) Seatac world war I memorial plaza)) (c) dining car
historic preservation, (d) Lake Stevens civic center, (e) Mill Creek
senior center, (f) mountains to sound - state route no. 18/Interstate
90 interchange project, (g) Simon youth foundation resource center, (h)
Shoreline YMCA, and (i) town square grid - Drexler drive project.
(10) The remaining reappropriation for the Ashford cultural and
mountaineering museum may be used for amenities in support of the
amphitheater and the park.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,650,000))
$53,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,694,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,344,000))
$125,144,000

Sec. 6009 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Quillayute Valley Wood-Fire Boiler (20084858)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($980,000))
$960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$980,000

Sec. 6010 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1009 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Snohomish County Biodiesel (20084859)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $419,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$419,000

Sec. 6011 2009 c 497 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1019, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the (a)
armed forces and aerospace museum project, (b) Cispus environmental
learning center project, and (c) the hope center project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,751,000))
$12,366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,378,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,129,000))
$17,744,000

Sec. 6012 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.
(2) The grant for the Federal Way performing arts center must be to
the city of Federal Way.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Admiral Theatre-No Theatre Left
Behind $140,000

Building a Foundation for Discovery $250,000

((Campus Consolidation (Cornish) $375,000))

Convert Key Bank to Everett's Plaza
Theatre $500,000

Cottage Renovation (Hedgebrook) $20,000

Downstairs at the 5th $800,000

Federal Way Performing Arts Center $325,000

Gateway Center (Lummi) $150,000

((James Center for the Performing Arts
(Sequim) $150,000))

Langston Hughes Performing Arts
Center $475,000

Legacy Project (Imagine) $200,000

Modular Classrooms for Dance
(Gladish) $30,000

Mt. Baker Theatre $1,000,000

Museum Expansion (Maryhill) $1,500,000

New Hands On Children's Museum $1,000,000

Reconstruction of First Stage
(Issaquah) $400,000

Seattle Opera Center $650,000

Stage Two (Whidbey) $450,000

Vashon Arts Center $1,115,000

Visual Arts Education Center
(Snohomish County) $1,000,000

Viva Vera Capital Campaign $70,000

Total (($10,600,000))
$10,075,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,600,000))
$10,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,000,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,600,000))
$10,075,000

Sec. 6013 2009 c 497 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Allen Place $800,000

Auburn Boys & Girls Club $800,000

Central Kitsap Community Campus
YMCA $800,000

Coal Creek Family YMCA $800,000

((East Pierce County HOPE Center $800,000))

Highline YMCA $800,000

((Hough Pool Renovation $150,000))

Jim Parsley Community Center $800,000

Kitsap Girl Scout Center $205,000

Naval Avenue Boys & Girls Club $80,000

Toutle River Ranch $360,000

West Sound Teen Center $305,000

YMCA Spokane Central $800,000

Total (($7,500,000))
$6,550,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,500,000))
$6,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,500,000))
$36,550,000

Sec. 6014 2009 c 497 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as otherwise directed before the effective date of this
section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

A Home for Opportunity - CASA Latina $325,000

Building the new Eastside Clinic - Community Health Care $1,900,000

Community Center for Sand Point Housing $350,000

Donald G. Topping HOPE Center - Boys & Girls Clubs of Puget Sound $1,934,250

Dove House (Domestic Violence/Sexual Assault Program of Jefferson County) $240,000

Duvall Multi-Service Center - Hopelink $617,985

((Education and Training Center Mt. Baker Planned Parenthood $881,847))

Emmanuel Family Life Center - Richard Allen Enterprises $400,594

Eritrean Community Center Expansion $300,000

Ferndale Boys & Girls Club $752,847

Giant Step - RRA $520,761

Greenbridge Early Learning Center $1,419,281

High Point Neighborhood Center $2,000,000

Highline YMCA $1,163,000

Milgard Work Opportunity Center - Tacoma Goodwill $1,850,000

Northeast Community Center Expansion $1,300,000

Pierce County Therapy Center $128,000

Rainier Vista & Rainier Valley Teen Center $2,400,000

Repurposing Daybreak Star $87,500

Riverwalk Point Community Building - Spokane Neighborhood Action Program $79,253

Rotary Support Center for Families $3,500,000

Safety & Systems Improvements at El Centro de la raza $250,031

TAF Community Learning Space (CLS) $1,500,000

The Keller House Services Center $600,000

YMCA/YWCA Central Spokane Facility $3,500,000

Total (($28,000,349))
$27,120,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,001,000))
$27,120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,001,000))
$27,120,000

Sec. 6015 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Local Community Projects

7th St. Theater $330,000

Arc of Tri-Cities $900,000

Bellevue Clinic--Seattle Children's Hospital $2,000,000

Blessed Sacrament Food and Emergency Facilities Renovation $200,000

Children's Village Expansion Project $500,000

Clark County Food Distribution Facility $1,500,000

Coal Creek YMCA (Newcastle) $800,000

Dawson Place Child Advocacy Center $1,000,000

Federal Way National Little League Field Lighting Project and Monument Entry Sign $177,000

Harlequin Theater $235,000

Home Dialysis Center and Professional Workforce Training $250,000

Kirkland Park Place Redevelopment $2,000,000

Livingston Baker Fire and Life Safety $750,000

Marshland Diking District $500,000

Marysville Boys & Girls Club $500,000

McClure Middle School Energy Saving Performance Contract Demonstration Project $1,000,000

((Mountains to Sound Greenway $100,000))

Mukilteo Boys & Girls Club $150,000

Neighborcare Health Clinic and Rainier Beach Medical Clinic $1,000,000

Parkland at Japanese Gulch $1,000,000

Petrovitsky Park Upgrade $750,000

Phoenix House $200,000

Poulsbo Marine Center $500,000

Public Broadcasting Frequency Expansion $223,000

((Ready by Five Early Learning Center $1,000,000))

Renovations to Mill Creek City Annex Building $30,000

Snohomish County Emergency Center $1,000,000

South Tacoma Community Center $1,000,000

Whatcom Hospice House $700,000

Zina Linnik $950,000

Total $20,145,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,245,000))
$20,145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,245,000))
$20,145,000

Sec. 6016 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(2) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(3) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(4) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(5) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(6) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Local Community Projects

Aviation High School $2,000,000

Bainbridge Island Metropolitan Park & Recreation District $130,000

Children's Village Expansion $250,000

East King County Performing Arts Center (PACE) $2,000,000

Hanford Reach Interpretive Center $500,000

Junior Achievement (Statewide JA World Initiative) $1,500,000

Lake Boren Park - Replace Unsafe Playground $325,000

Museum of Flight Space Gallery $3,000,000

Pike Market Workforce Childcare Facility $1,000,000

Rainier Beach Medical & Dental Clinic (Neighborcare Health) $500,000

Relocation of NAVES Mental Health Center in Brien $1,000,000

Restoration of Historic Piciform Theater $250,000

San Juan Island Farmers Market - Purchase Historic Building $375,000

South King County Multi service Center $300,000

Spokane Aerospace Technology Center Design $400,000

Sultan Lake 16 Dam Repair $250,000

Urban League Village at Colman School/NW African American Museum $100,000

West Hill/Skyway Area Infrastructure $250,000

Total $14,130,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,750,000))
$14,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,750,000))
$14,130,000

Sec. 6017 2010 1st. sp.s. c 36 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools and Higher Education Institutions
(91000085)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to public
school districts and public higher education institutions for
operational cost savings improvements to public school district and
higher education facilities and related projects that result in energy
and operational cost savings. Related projects are those projects that
must be completed in order for the energy efficiency improvements to be
effective. Grants may also be used for loan interest payments over the
term of a loan.
(2) The department of commerce, in consultation with the department
of general administration, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the Washington State University energy program shall
establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate applications
from public school districts and public higher education institutions.
Final grant awards shall be determined by the department of commerce.
(3) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section.
(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to public
school districts and public higher education institutions of the energy
reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a facility, activity,
measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, including any
compensation received from a utility or the Bonneville power
administration, is greater than the net present value of the costs of
implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility, activity,
measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, when discounted at
the cost of public borrowing.
(b) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation,
to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or
facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or
supplies, including but not limited to design, engineering, financing,
installation, project management, guarantees, operations, and
maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also include
reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid waste.
(c) "Energy cost savings" means savings realized in expenses for
energy use and expenses associated with water, wastewater, or solid
waste systems.
(d) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
public agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings
from energy efficiency.
(e) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts,
service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual
expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean
labor savings related to existing facility staff.
(f) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and
major equipment or systems owned by public school districts and public
higher education institutions.
(g) "Innovative measures" means advanced or emerging technologies,
systems or approaches that may not yet be in common practice but
improve energy efficiency, accelerate deployment, or reduce energy
usage, and become widely commercially available in the future if proven
successful in demonstration programs without compromising the
guaranteed performance or measurable energy and operational cost
savings anticipated. Examples of innovative measures include, but are
not limited to, advanced energy and systems operations monitoring,
diagnostics and controls systems for buildings; novel heating, cooling,
ventilation and water heating systems; advanced windows and insulation
technologies, highly efficient lighting technologies, designs, and
controls; and integration of renewable energy sources into buildings,
and energy savings verification technologies and solutions.
(4) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, based on demand
and capacity, with at least five percent of each grant round awarded to
small public school districts with fewer than 1,000 full-time
equivalent students, based on demand and capacity.
(5) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state jobs act grant, the higher the
project ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy
savings analysis shall be performed by a licensed engineer, and the
documentation must include but is not limited to the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements;
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings; and
(iii) A description of the extent to which the project employs
collaborative and innovative measures and encourages demonstration of
new and emerging technologies with high energy-savings or energy cost-reductions.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(6) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or
until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project,
whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of general
administration's energy savings performance contracting project
guidelines; and (c) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and
construction. The department of commerce may require third-party
verification of savings if a project is not implemented by an energy
savings performance contractor selected by the department of general
administration through the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must be conducted either by an energy savings
performance contractor selected by the department of general
administration through a request for qualifications, a licensed
engineer that is a certified energy manager, a project resource
conservation manager, or educational service district resource
conservation manager.
(7) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only
award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a
round until the department of commerce determines a final round is
appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round
may reapply in subsequent rounds.
(8) To match federal grants and programs that require state
matching funds and produce significantly higher efficiencies in
operations and utilities, the level of innovation criteria may be
increased for the purposes of weighted scoring to capture those federal
dollars for selected projects that require a higher level of innovation
and regional collaboration.
(9) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(10)(a) The department of commerce must use bond proceeds to pay
one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per square foot, if
the project does not meet the school district's and higher education
institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school
districts and public higher education institutions must pay the other
one-half of the cost of the preliminary audit if the project does not
meet their predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(b) The energy savings performance contractor shall not charge for
an investment grade audit if the project does not meet the school
district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school districts and public higher
education institutions must pay the full price of an investment grade
audit if they do not proceed with a project that meets the school
district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(11) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative
fees and may pay the department of general administration, the
Washington State University energy program, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction administration fees in an amount
determined through a memorandum of understanding.
(12) The department of commerce and the department of general
administration must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing
and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, compliance
with apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320,
compliance with prevailing wage requirements, and administration fees
by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and
all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$44,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$44,809,000

Sec. 6018 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Risk Pool (91000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
a risk pool to complete projects within the scope described in budget
documents submitted as part of the governor's capital budget request
and consistent with legislative history. This section only applies to
projects included in this 2010 supplemental capital budget with reduced
appropriations. The office of financial management may allot portions
of this appropriation ten days after notifying the senate ways and
means committee and the house of representatives capital budget
committee. The notification must include an explanation of the need
and the amount for the allotment to complete the scope of an approved
project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$0

Sec. 6019 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1034 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Pro Arts Building (91000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$201,000

Sec. 6020 2009 c 497 s 1069 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Relocation (20082028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$781,000

Sec. 6021 2009 c 497 s 1076 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Facility Oversight Program: Staffing (30000063)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department of general administration to assist
the office of financial management with the development and
implementation of RCW 43.82.035 and 43.82.055.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($740,000))
$705,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,597,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,337,000))
$6,302,000

Sec. 6022 2009 c 497 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000086)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,300,000))
$9,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,033,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,333,000))
$52,202,000

Sec. 6023 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Capacity to Replace Maple Lane School (92000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($760,000))
$2,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,025,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,785,000))
$2,097,000

Sec. 6024 2009 c 497 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(20082505)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The reappropriation is to add residential space to existing
facilities by remodeling existing residential space and converting
existing program space to residential space for additional beds.))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$554,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,664,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,939,000))
$54,793,000

Sec. 6025 2009 c 497 s 2025 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Traffic Study Implementation (30000843)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($355,000))
$39,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,351,000))
$1,035,000

Sec. 6026 2009 c 497 s 2012 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($650,000))
$540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,300,000))
$1,190,000

Sec. 6027 2009 c 497 s 2017 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest Campus Master Plan (20082850)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall resume and complete a master plan of the
portion of the Fircrest campus that is not utilized by the Fircrest
school or the department of health.
(2) In drafting the master plan, the department shall consult with
the following:
(a) The city of Shoreline;
(b) The department of natural resources;
(c) The department of health regarding their master planning
effort;
(d) Representatives of institutions of higher education with whom
the department has a partnership; and
(e) Representatives of the Shoreline community and neighboring
communities.))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000))
$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,000))
$442,000

Sec. 6028 2009 c 497 s 2041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security Beds (19982011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,772,000))
$4,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,170,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,942,000))
$232,800,000

Sec. 6029 2009 c 497 s 2045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (20062043)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,000))
$1,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,446,000))
$17,604,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,146,000))
$18,022,000

Sec. 6030 2009 c 497 s 2048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Larch Corrections Center: 80-Bed Expansion (20062852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($560,000))
$425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,512,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,072,000))
$2,937,000

Sec. 6031 2009 c 497 s 2043 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections: Replace and Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (20061005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($400,000))
$211,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,394,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,087,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,881,000))
$7,692,000

Sec. 6032 2009 c 497 s 2044 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(20062021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,950,000))
$34,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,344,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,276,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,570,000))
$63,631,000

Sec. 6033 2009 c 497 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Healthcare Center
(20062066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,700,000))
$6,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,358,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,058,000))
$18,293,000

Sec. 6034 2009 c 497 s 2049 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Heating and Cooling Loop Replacement (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,000))
$104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,745,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,925,000))
$2,849,000

Sec. 6035 2009 c 497 s 2050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace Barge Slip Pilings
(20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,612,000))
$3,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,900,000))
$3,434,000

Sec. 6036 2009 c 497 s 2051 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Kitchen Roofs at Monroe Correctional Complex (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,062,000))
$1,969,000

Sec. 6037 2009 c 497 s 2052 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace G Building Roof (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,000))
$205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,431,000))
$4,224,000

Sec. 6038 2009 c 497 s 2053 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Roofs (20081005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($900,000))
$890,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,766,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,666,000))
$6,656,000

Sec. 6039 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Roofs (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,000))
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($769,000))
$749,000

Sec. 6040 2009 c 497 s 2055 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Fire Alarm System
(20081008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$487,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,524,000))
$1,411,000

Sec. 6041 2009 c 497 s 2056 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Replace Electrical Distribution Building at Special Offenders Unit
(20081009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($539,000))
$536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,222,000))
$1,219,000

Sec. 6042 2009 c 497 s 2057 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Reformatory: Replace Cell Door and Electronics
(20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,000))
$133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,315,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,545,000))
$1,448,000

Sec. 6043 2009 c 497 s 2058 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Telecommunications
Infrastructure (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,329,000))
$1,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $521,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,045,000))
$19,105,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,895,000))
$20,736,000

Sec. 6044 2009 c 497 s 2062 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Laundry Improvements (20081033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,701,000))
$3,686,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,051,000))
$4,036,000

Sec. 6045 2009 c 497 s 2063 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Expand Reception Center (20082016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,000))
$2,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $397,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,100,000))
$55,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,570,000))
$56,299,000

Sec. 6046 2009 c 497 s 2066 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Corrections Center: Sex Offender Treatment Program
Building (20082028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($550,000))
$545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,397,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,947,000))
$4,942,000

Sec. 6047 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 2010 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Roof Replacement
(30000178)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,557,000))
$860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,557,000))
$860,000

Sec. 6048 2009 c 497 s 2074 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Fire Detection/Suppression
(30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,098,000))
$898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,098,000))
$898,000

Sec. 6049 2009 c 497 s 2073 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm
(30000121)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,625,000))
$661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,625,000))
$661,000

Sec. 6050 2009 c 497 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,870,000))
$34,470,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,698,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,315,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,883,000))
$66,483,000

Sec. 6051 2009 c 497 s 3011 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Program (20062010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,423,000))
$1,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,577,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,000,000))
$15,760,000

Sec. 6052 2009 c 497 s 3006 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,708,000))
$1,689,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $438,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,227,000))
$2,208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,573,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,800,000))
$5,781,000

Sec. 6053 2009 c 497 s 3004 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,600,000))
$1,468,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,992,000))
$1,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,658,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,650,000))
$13,518,000

Sec. 6054 2009 c 497 s 3008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,925,000))
$1,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,200,000))
$1,600,000

Sec. 6055 2009 c 497 s 3005 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (20044007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,481,000))
$1,366,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,512,000))
$1,397,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,538,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,050,000))
$44,935,000

Sec. 6056 2009 c 497 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Protection Study (20082855)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to conduct a study to determine the
number of decertified levees in the state and to identify strategies
for recertifying the levees so that they provide optimum protection for
the communities protected by the levees. The department must
prioritize areas to include in the study based on population and the
economic impact of potential flood damage.
The study must include the following components:
(1) A working group of levee managers to advise and inform the
study;
(2) A technical review of the structural integrity of levee
systems;
(3) An inventory, map, and rate the effectiveness of existing levee
systems; and
(4) The development of strategies and actions needed to improve the
existing levee system and to ensure certification by the United States
army corps of engineers for one-hundred year flood protection.
The study must be completed and a report provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by July 1, 2010.))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($280,000))
$205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($280,000))
$205,000

Sec. 6057 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 3015 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,380,000))
$669,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$2,289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$2,289,000

Sec. 6058 2009 c 497 s 3055 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Columbia basin ground water management area ground water hydrologic
modeling project. The project shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature that does the following:
(a) Describes the physical properties of the aquifer system and the
variation of those properties throughout the area of concern,
(b) Quantifies the rate and location of aquifer recharge and
discharge within the subarea,
(c) Quantifies the water balance for the by land use type,
(d) Demonstrates with empirical data a viable solution to the
observed problems in the area of concern,
(e) Estimates the quantity of water needed for the solution, and
(f) Evaluates the physical and legal availability of such water
from the Columbia River. The final report must be submitted by June
30, 2011.
(2) $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
to repair the Horseshoe Bend levy that protects communities in the Kent
valley.
(3) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for the King County fire protection district no. 16 to prevent flood
damage to the fire station.
(4) $2,350,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a
competitive grant program for projects that protect communities from
flood damage and prepare communities for drought and water shortages.
The department shall prioritize applications from communities most at
risk to flood damage and drought and who are least able to fund
mitigation projects from local resources. The department shall also
seek to balance the needs of different regions of the state, and choose
projects most ready to proceed.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$14,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$14,975,000

Sec. 6059 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Cama Beach State Park (30000101)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,775,000))
$1,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,775,000))
$1,625,000

Sec. 6060 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 3017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park Park-wide Infrastructure Redevelopment
(30000173)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,003,000))
$603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,003,000))
$603,000

Sec. 6061 2009 c 497 s 3077 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Bay View Park Wide Wastewater Treatment System (20082041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,760,000))
$510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,187,000))
$937,000

Sec. 6062 2009 c 497 s 3082 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Minor Works Preservation (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,930,000))
$6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,641,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,571,000))
$47,441,000

Sec. 6063 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 3024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000
each to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands
preservation strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the
farmlands preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge
plain natural area preserve. This amount may not be expended for the
project until the department of natural resources has completed a
management plan for the preserve that maintains recreational access and
that management plan is presented to the house of representatives
capital budget and senate ways and means committees.

Reappropriation:
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,319,000))
$3,792,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,956,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,994,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,769,000))
$63,242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,019,000))
$98,492,000

Sec. 6064 2009 c 497 s 3135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriations are provided solely for the list of projects in
LEAP capital document No. 2009-1a, developed April 23, 2009.))

Appropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$5,445,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000,000))
$69,445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,000,000))
$269,445,000

Sec. 6065 2009 c 497 s 3157 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for the
repair necessary to restore the facility for limited operations;
(2) $550,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for
property acquisition. If the department does not acquire property, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse; and
(3) $50,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for the
department to participate in a work group with the Puyallup Tribe of
Indians that will make recommendations no later than December 1, 2009,
regarding the options for improving production from hatcheries along
the Puyallup river system while reducing cost. Options to be
considered include shifting production among the hatcheries,
consolidation of hatcheries, and shifting responsibilities for
construction, maintenance and operations of hatcheries.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($800,000))
$792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,105,000))
$3,097,000

Sec. 6066 2009 c 497 s 3186 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
((Bebee)) Beebe Springs Phase 3 (92000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,643,000))
$1,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,643,000))
$1,043,000

Sec. 6067 2009 c 497 s 3174 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Washougal Hatchery Pond Renovation (30000094)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,236,000))
$1,086,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,236,000))
$1,086,000

Sec. 6068 2009 c 497 s 3184 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Chambers Creek Adult Trap (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($702,000))
$12,000

Sec. 6069 2009 c 497 s 3166 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation (20082015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,728,000))
$3,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $328,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,256,000))
$3,656,000

Sec. 6070 2009 c 497 s 3175 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Grays River Hatchery Intake Replacement (30000089)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($549,000))
$81,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,499,000))
$4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,048,000))
$4,081,000

Sec. 6071 2009 c 497 s 3193 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Projects (30000071)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,300,000))
$2,250,000

Sec. 6072 2009 c 497 s 3194 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000079)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,923,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,623,000))
$14,588,000

Sec. 6073 2009 c 497 s 3195 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Capital Renovations (30000109)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($816,000))
$591,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,682,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,498,000))
$33,273,000

Sec. 6074 2009 c 497 s 3189 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Colville Armory (20082851)

Reappropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($292,000))
$162,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($921,000))
$791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,942,000))
$3,812,000

Sec. 6075 2009 c 497 s 3192 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Blanchard Mountain (20081951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely as a
continuing compensation for preservation of the core of Blanchard
mountain in Skagit County and the subsequent acquisition of replacement
working forest lands as Skagit county state forest lands. The
department shall consult with the University of Washington college of
forest resources' northwest environmental forum and with other interest
groups prior to the purchase.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,975,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$527,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$4,527,000

Sec. 6076 2009 c 497 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Apple Awards (91000001)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Grants of $25,000 may be awarded to public
elementary schools whose students propose capital projects on school
property or on other public property in the community, city, or county
in which the school is located. The program must be administered by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction which shall
determine competitive criteria for awarding the grants. $125,000 of
the appropriation is available for five awards of $25,000 each in the
2009-2010 school year and $125,000 of the appropriation for five awards
of $25,000 each in the 2010-2011 school year. The funds must be used
exclusively for capital projects as proposed by the students in the
schools and approved by the district's school board.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$247,000

Sec. 6077 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency and Small Repair Grants (91000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
nonrecurring costs associated with school facility repairs and
renovations necessary for health and safety. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance
and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop
criteria for providing funding for specific projects to stay within the
appropriation level provided in this section. The criteria must
include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting recipient
district applications to one hundred thousand dollars per three-year
period; (b) limiting districts eligible to receive the grant only once
in any three-year period; and (c) requiring any district receiving
funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment
to addressing school facilities needs.
(2) $50,000,000 of the new appropriation is provided solely for
energy operational cost savings improvements to school facilities. The
appropriation must be distributed using the performance-based
contracting method of delivering energy operational cost savings
improvements to public facilities.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal
year, until the funds are fully expended.
(4) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the Monroe
public schools for retrofitting the Frank Wagner Elementary chimney.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000,000))
$69,889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000,000))
$69,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6078 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
Well Replacement (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Sec. 6079 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (20061005)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,822,000))
$10,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,510,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,332,000))
$61,267,000

Sec. 6080 2009 c 497 s 5077 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$1,473,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,837,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,102,000))
$30,238,000

Sec. 6081 2009 c 497 s 5082 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Building (30000045)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,870,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,470,000))
$56,448,000

Sec. 6082 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5041 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve Visitors Center (91000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$0

Sec. 6083 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Construction Contingency Pool (92000007)

((The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
allocation by the state board for community and technical colleges for
major construction and renovation projects that confront emergent and
unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and
management reserves included in the project appropriation. The board
shall report at least quarterly to the office of financial management
and the legislative capital budget committees on requests for and
allocations from the pool.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,076,000))
$2,835,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,339,000))
$3,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,339,000))
$3,098,000

Sec. 6084 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5080 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Centralia Community College - Science Building (20042850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,737,000))
$2,445,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,931,000))
$2,639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,919,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,850,000))
$31,558,000

Sec. 6085 2009 c 497 s 5144 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls - Business and Social Science Building (20051853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,313,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,313,000))
$19,729,000

Sec. 6086 2009 c 497 s 5161 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (20061751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($519,000))
$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,197,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,716,000))
$2,599,000

Sec. 6087 2009 c 497 s 5228 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College - Fisheries Program (30000117)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$0

Sec. 6088 2009 c 497 s 5216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College - Music and Arts Center (30000119)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$311,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$311,000

(End of part)

PART 7
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriations acts for the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal bienniums, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of one billion one hundred twenty-two million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance
these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in
this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee
shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered
for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of
the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002 (1) The proceeds from the sale of the
bonds authorized in section 7001 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The
proceeds shall be transferred as follows:
(a) One billion seven million dollars to remain in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;
(b) Twenty million two hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor
recreation account created by RCW 79A.25.060;
(c) Twenty million two hundred thousand dollars to the habitat
conservation account created by RCW 79A.15.020;
(d) Eight hundred thousand dollars to the riparian protection
account created by RCW 79A.15.120;
(e) Eight hundred thousand dollars to the farmlands preservation
account created by RCW 79A.15.130;
(f) Fifty-one million dollars to the state taxable building
construction account. All receipts from taxable bond issues are to be
deposited into the account. If the state finance committee deems it
necessary or advantageous to issue more than the amount specified in
this subsection (1)(f) as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal
internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of
nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce the total financing
costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such additional taxable bonds
shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account
in lieu of any transfer otherwise provided by this section. If the
state finance committee determines that a portion of the amount
specified in this subsection (1)(f) as taxable bonds may be issued as
nontaxable bonds in compliance with federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds, then such bond proceeds shall be transferred to the state
building construction account in lieu of the transfer to the state
taxable building construction account otherwise provided by this
subsection (1)(f). The state treasurer shall submit written notice to
the director of financial management if it is determined that any such
additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account
is necessary or that a transfer from the state taxable building
construction account to the state building construction account may be
made. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in
the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 7002(1) (a) through (f)
of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 7002(1) (a) through (f)
of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 7002(1) (a)
through (f) of this act, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any
general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in
the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004 (1) Bonds issued under sections 7001
through 7003 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation
of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of
the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the
principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 7001 of this act, and
sections 7002 and 7003 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an
exclusive method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006 A new section is added to chapter 43.99I
RCW to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this chapter have not been issued by
June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue
such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007 A new section is added to chapter 43.99N
RCW to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this chapter have not been issued by
June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue
such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008 A new section is added to chapter 43.99P
RCW to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized in this chapter have not been issued by
June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue
such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

Sec. 7009 RCW 43.99Q.130 and 2009 c 500 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design,
construction, and other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the
state legislative building, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum
of eighty-two million five hundred ten thousand dollars or as much
thereof as may be required to finance the rehabilitation and
improvements to the legislative building and all costs incidental
thereto. The approved rehabilitation plan includes costs associated
with earthquake repairs and future earthquake mitigation and allows for
associated relocation costs and the acquisition of appropriate
relocation space. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at a
price the state finance committee determines. No bonds authorized in
this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. The
proceeds of the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
section shall be deposited in the capitol historic district
construction account hereby created in the state treasury. These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this
section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and
sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management subject to
legislative appropriation.
(2) If any bonds authorized in this chapter have not been issued by
June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee to issue
such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010 A new section is added to chapter 43.99Q
RCW to read as follows:
If any bonds authorized pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.020(5) have not been
issued by June 30, 2013, the authority of the state finance committee
to issue such remaining unissued bonds shall expire June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011 Sections 7001 through 7005 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) The office of financial management shall report any transfer
effected under this section to the house of representatives capital
budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, at least
thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of
financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers
within thirty days from the date of transfer. The governor's capital
budget request following any transfer shall reflect that transfer in
the affected agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8005 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8006 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8007 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8008 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under
this act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery,
agencies shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that
projects and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020
action agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of
information on specific actions, projects, associated funding,
performance measures, and other information necessary to track project
implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In
situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is
not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda Puget Sound
partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor
and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8009 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING
(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of school plant facilities may be expended for
the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington state arts commission
may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund
larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities may be
expended for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 may be expended for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2011-2013 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8010 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8011 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8012 SALARY ADJUSTMENT
The appropriations in this act shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this act and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Appropriations in this act are provided solely for a 3.0
percent salary reduction effective July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013,
for all employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches,
including those employees in the Washington management service, and
including employees exempt from merit system rules, except for:
(a) Elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials;
(b) Student employees at state institutions of higher education;
(c) Faculty employees at state institutions of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That appropriations to higher education institutions
are reduced in an amount reflecting a 3.0 percent reduction in faculty
salary expenditures;
(d) Certificated employees of the state school for the blind and
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss;
(e) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol
represented by the state patrol troopers' association and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants' association;
(f) Represented ferry workers of the Washington state department of
transportation, provided, however, that other reductions are included
in section 504 of the 2011-2013 transportation appropriations act;
(g) Employees whose salary is less than $2,500 per month; and
(h) Employees as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For employees subject to the 3.0 percent reduction in salary
under subsection (1) of this section employees will receive temporary
salary reduction leave of up to 5.2 hours per month. The director of
personnel shall adopt rules governing the accrual and use of temporary
salary reduction leave.
(3) The department of retirement systems shall include any forgone
salary or lost work hours under subsections (1) and (3) of this section
in the final average compensation of employees affected for purposes of
calculating retirement benefits, as specified in executive request
legislation Z-0211.1/11.
(4) The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in office of financial management document 2011-01, which is
hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in office of financial
management document 2011-01 and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8013 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8014 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 83, 154
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 93, 155
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 105
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 131
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36, 139
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 60, 147
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22, 127
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 66, 149
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 27, 129
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 19, 127
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 51, 145
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 47, 144
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 151
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 80, 153
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 79, 153
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 88, 154
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
--- END ---