BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to maintain funding assistance for Washington seniors who lack the
means to pay for the prescription drugs necessary for their health and
well-being. The legislature further finds that a tax preference
currently supporting a completely discretionary activity, such as
elective cosmetic surgery, should instead be used to support
Washington's seniors who cannot afford their prescription drug costs.
Therefore, it is the legislature's intent that the funds saved by the
termination of the tax preferences in this act be used to support
seniors dually eligible for both medicare and medicaid who are unable
to pay for the costs of their medicare part D copayments.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.050 and 2010 c 112 s 14, 2010 c 111 s 201, and
2010 c 106 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(1), (2), and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; ((and))
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and
(h) Cosmetic medical services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) "Cosmetic medical service" means any medical procedure
performed on an individual by a person licensed or regulated in a
health profession as described in RCW 18.120.020, and any services
directly related to the performance of the medical procedure, that is
directed at improving the individual's appearance and that is not
medically necessary to promote the proper function of the body or
prevent or treat physical illness or disease. "Cosmetic medical
service" includes, but is not limited to, cosmetic surgery, hair
transplants, cosmetic injections, cosmetic soft tissue fillers,
dermabrasion and chemical peel, laser hair removal, laser skin
resurfacing, laser treatment of leg veins, sclerotherapy, and cosmetic
dentistry. Any medical procedure performed on abnormal structures
caused by or related to congenital defects, developmental
abnormalities, trauma, infection, tumors, or disease, including
procedures to improve function or give a more normal appearance, is
medically necessary. Services covered by the individual's medical or
dental insurance or that are deductible by the individual as medical
expenses for purposes of federal income tax are presumed to be
medically necessary services.
(2) "Cosmetic surgery" means the surgical reshaping of normal
structures on the body to improve the body image, self-esteem, or
appearance of an individual.
(3) "Services directly related to the performance of the medical
procedure" include occupancy at medical facilities and services
provided by an anesthesiologist, surgeon, or other licensed or
regulated health professional described in RCW 18.120.020. Services
required for or directly related to cosmetic medical services do not
include evaluation and referral by a primary care physician or
consultation or treatment by a counselor, psychologist, or
psychiatrist.
(4) An individual claiming that a medical procedure, otherwise
meeting the definition of cosmetic medical service in this section, is
not a cosmetic medical service must complete and provide to the seller
an affidavit in a form and manner prescribed by the department
documenting that the procedure is medically necessary to promote the
proper function of the body or prevent or treat physical illness or
disease. The seller must retain a copy of the affidavit for the
seller's files.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 206 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state
a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a
consumer any:
(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in
any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual
or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer
thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state;
(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of
delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both;
(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or
(g), (3)(a) or (h), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge;
(d) Extended warranty; or
(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service,
including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in
connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.
(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated
services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:
(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale; and
(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services,
and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the
consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service
taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (g), (3)(a) or (h), or (6)(b), if
the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax
imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user
of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the
effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property,
extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:
(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by his or her bailor or donor;
(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on
reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value
of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed
by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;
(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or
(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services,
which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of
the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present
user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected
to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been
paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is
levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of
the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the
taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the
purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase
price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person"
includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and
"consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.010 and 2010 c 127 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, has full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, also means any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (1), the use of the property is
deemed to be by such consumer.
(2) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).
(3) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4),
"retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at
retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax
imposed under this chapter.
(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer
organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under
the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities
that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended
warranty, digital good, digital code, or a sale of any digital
automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050
(2)(a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) that is subject to the tax imposed by
this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional
employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible
for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540.
(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW.
(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary
meaning, and mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural
gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation,
storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act
preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(d) With respect to a digital good or digital code, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views,
accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or
otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good or digital code;
(e) With respect to a digital automated service, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys,
or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;
(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer,
as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software;
(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has
been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses,
downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or
enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; ((and))
(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of
which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also
taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this
state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or
storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption
by the taxpayer; and
(i) With respect to a service described in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h), the
first presence within this state by the taxpayer after the service has
been performed upon that taxpayer.
(7)(a) "Value of the article used" is the purchase price for the
article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used is determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used must be in an amount representing a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined as
nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of
use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules
as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such articles
of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to
become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used is determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used must be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used is determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used is determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used is determined by the
purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay
permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.
(8) "Value of the digital good or digital code used" means the
purchase price for the digital good or digital code, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good or digital code is
acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good or
digital code must be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods or
digital codes of like quality and character under rules the department
may prescribe.
(9) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used is
determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price
at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality and
character under rules the department may prescribe.
(10) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the service used is determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar services of like quality and character under rules the
department may prescribe.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.035 and 2009 c 535 s 1107 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon
the use in this state of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or services
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), (3) (a) or
(h), or (6)(b), in the amount that the present user thereof or his or
her bailor or donor has paid a legally imposed retail sales or use tax
with respect to such property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or service defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) to any other state,
possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, any
political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
By May 1, 2012, and by May 1st of every year thereafter, the
department must annually estimate the increase in state revenue for the
prior calendar year resulting from the changes made to the excise
taxation of cosmetic medical services under this act and certify the
estimated amount to the state treasurer. By July 1, 2012, and by July
1st of every year thereafter, the state treasurer must transfer the
amount into the senior pharmacy assistance account hereby created in
the state treasury. Money in the account may only be appropriated to
fund medicare part D prescription drug copayment coverage for full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries provided under RCW 74.09.515.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.034(4) and 43.135.035(4) do not apply to the transfers
established in section 6 of this act.

--- END ---