BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.080 and 2007 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 1993, for the permanent partial disabilities
here specifically described, the injured worker shall receive
compensation as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short
thigh stump (3" or less below the
tuberosity of ischium) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with
functional stump . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of leg below knee joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme) . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,800.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,900.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,340.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,804.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,600.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of
metatarsal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,140.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,016.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,494.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 378.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or
by disarticulation at the shoulder . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,000.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid
insertion to below the elbow joint at
the insertion of the biceps tendon . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,300.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow
joint distal to the insertion of the
biceps tendon to and including
mid-metacarpal amputation of the
hand . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at
metacarpophalangeal joints . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,160.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or
with resection of carpometacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,440.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,150.00

Of index finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,346.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of middle finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,776.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,374.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,860.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,888.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,944.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 972.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of one eye by enucleation . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,600.00

Loss of central visual acuity in one eye . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,000.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Complete loss of hearing in one ear . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,200.00

(b) Beginning on July 1, 1993, compensation under this subsection
shall be computed as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection shall be
increased by thirty-two percent; and
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the
compensation amounts for the specified disabilities listed in (a) of
this subsection, as adjusted under (b)(i) of this subsection, shall be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated as follows: The index for the calendar year
preceding the year in which the July calculation is made, to be known
as "calendar year A," is divided by the index for the calendar year
preceding calendar year A, and the resulting ratio is multiplied by the
compensation amount in effect on June 30 immediately preceding the July
1st on which the respective calculation is made. For the purposes of
this subsection, "index" means the same as the definition in RCW
2.12.037(1).
(2) Compensation for amputation of a member or part thereof at a
site other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section, and
for loss of central visual acuity and loss of hearing other than
complete, shall be in proportion to that which such other amputation or
partial loss of visual acuity or hearing most closely resembles and
approximates. Compensation shall be calculated based on the adjusted
schedule of compensation in effect for the respective time period as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Compensation for any other permanent partial disability not
involving amputation shall be in the proportion which the extent of
such other disability, called unspecified disability, shall bear to the
disabilities specified in subsection (1) of this section, which most
closely resembles and approximates in degree of disability such other
disability, and compensation for any other unspecified permanent
partial disability shall be in an amount as measured and compared to
total bodily impairment. To reduce litigation and establish more
certainty and uniformity in the rating of unspecified permanent partial
disabilities, the department shall enact rules having the force of law
classifying such disabilities in the proportion which the department
shall determine such disabilities reasonably bear to total bodily
impairment. In enacting such rules, the department shall give
consideration to, but need not necessarily adopt, any nationally
recognized medical standards or guides for determining various bodily
impairments.
(b) Until July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be deemed to be ninety thousand dollars.
Beginning on July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be adjusted as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the amount payable for total bodily
impairment under this section shall be increased to one hundred
eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the
amount payable for total bodily impairment prescribed in (b)(i) of this
subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of
this section.
(c) Until July 1, 1993, the total compensation for all unspecified
permanent partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall not
exceed the sum of ninety thousand dollars. Beginning on July 1, 1993,
total compensation for all unspecified permanent partial disabilities
resulting from the same injury shall not exceed a sum calculated as
follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the sum shall be increased to one
hundred eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the sum
prescribed in (b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as provided
in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section.
(4) If permanent partial disability compensation is followed by
permanent total disability compensation, ((any portion of the permanent
partial disability compensation which exceeds the amount that would
have been paid the injured worker if permanent total disability
compensation had been paid in the first instance)) all permanent
partial disability compensation paid to the worker under the claim or
claims for which total permanent disability compensation is awarded
shall be, at the choosing of the injured worker, either: (a) Deducted
from the worker's monthly pension benefits in an amount not to exceed
twenty-five percent of the monthly amount due from the department or
self-insurer or one-sixth of the total overpayment, whichever is less;
or (b) deducted from the pension reserve of such injured worker and his
or her monthly compensation payments shall be reduced accordingly. Any
interest paid on any permanent partial disability compensation may not
be deducted from the pension benefits or pension reserve. The
provisions of this subsection apply to all permanent total disability
determinations issued on or after July 1, 2011.
(5) Should a worker receive an injury to a member or part of his or
her body already, from whatever cause, permanently partially disabled,
resulting in the amputation thereof or in an aggravation or increase in
such permanent partial disability but not resulting in the permanent
total disability of such worker, his or her compensation for such
partial disability shall be adjudged with regard to the previous
disability of the injured member or part and the degree or extent of
the aggravation or increase of disability thereof.
(6) When the compensation provided for in subsections (1) through
(3) of this section exceeds three times the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, payment shall
be made in monthly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments set forth in RCW 51.32.090 until
such compensation is paid to the injured worker in full, except that
the first monthly payment shall be in an amount equal to three times
the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions
of RCW 51.08.018, and interest shall be paid at the rate of eight
percent on the unpaid balance of such compensation commencing with the
second monthly payment. However, upon application of the injured
worker or survivor the monthly payment may be converted, in whole or in
part, into a lump sum payment, in which event the monthly payment shall
cease in whole or in part. Such conversion may be made only upon
written application of the injured worker or survivor to the department
((and)) or self-insurer. A decision to deny the application to the
worker of a self-insurer, or to either grant or deny the application to
the worker of an employer insured by the department, shall rest in the
discretion of the department depending upon the merits of each
individual application. Upon the death of a worker all unpaid
installments accrued shall be paid according to the payment schedule
established prior to the death of the worker to the widow or widower,
or if there is no widow or widower surviving, to the dependent children
of such claimant, and if there are no such dependent children, then to
such other dependents as defined by this title.
(7) Awards payable under this section are governed by the schedule
in effect on the date of injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---