BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.
(2)(a) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
feasibility of alternatives to the operation of residential
habilitation centers described in this section. The department shall
examine the current nationwide nonprofit organizations and any public-private partnerships that operate residential habilitation centers. As
an element of the study, the department shall review applicable state
and federal laws, as well as current and potential public-private
funding sources for residential habilitation centers. The department
shall provide recommendations regarding the implementation in
Washington state of residential habilitation centers operated by either
nonprofit organizations or a public-private partnership, and whether
such organizations or partnerships can deliver the same or better
services than are currently delivered by state-operated residential
habilitation centers.
(b) The department shall submit the study and its recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature before June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---