BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.075 and 1988 c 161 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The compensation or death benefits payable pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter for temporary total disability, permanent
total disability, or death arising out of injuries or occupational
diseases shall be adjusted as follows:
(1) On July 1, 1982, there shall be an adjustment for those whose
right to compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971, and
before July 1, 1982. The adjustment shall be determined by multiplying
the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction,
the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right to
compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1982.
(2) In addition to the adjustment established by subsection (1) of
this section, there shall be another adjustment on July 1, 1983, for
those whose right to compensation was established on or after July 1,
1971, and before July 1983, which shall be determined by multiplying
the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction,
the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right to
compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1983.
(3) In addition to the adjustments under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, further adjustments shall be made beginning on July 1,
1984, and on each July 1st thereafter for those whose right to
compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971. The adjustment
shall be determined by multiplying the amount of compensation to which
they are entitled by a fraction, the denominator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal
year in which such person's right to compensation was established, and
the numerator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state
under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1st of the year in which the adjustment is
being made. The department or self-insurer shall adjust the resulting
compensation rate to the nearest whole cent, not to exceed the average
monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018.
(4) No adjustment shall be made on July 1, 2011, under subsection
(3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---