BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
licensing's publications and web site provide timely and useful
information to the public about licensing programs and services. The
publications and web site are informative in nature and do not serve as
a public forum or a limited public forum for the discussion or exchange
of ideas. The legislature further finds that allowing the department
of licensing to sell advertisements in its publications and internet
advertisements for display on its web site could provide new sources of
revenue for the agency to better deliver licensing services.
Therefore, the legislature intends to allow the department of licensing
to sell advertisements in its publications and internet advertisements
for display on its web site, provided that the advertisements are
consistent with the business mission of the agency as well as any
internet advertisement guidelines adopted by the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, the department may sell
advertisements in its publications and internet advertisements for
display on the department's web site in connection with services and
programs. In publications where advertisements are included and
locations where internet advertisements are offered, the publication or
web site must also include a disclaimer, indicating that the inclusion
of advertisements does not imply endorsement by the state.
(2) Prior to selling advertisements, the department must develop
policy, style, and content guidelines for advertisements that ensure
that the subject matter of any advertisement published or displayed by
the department directly relates to the business mission and purpose of
the department. The department's policy, and implementation of the
policy, must be consistent with legal requirements to assure that the
venue is not a public forum consistent with the United States
Constitution and Washington state Constitution and legal
interpretations of both Constitutions. The attorney general must
approve, in writing, policies established under this section prior to
the sale and posting of any advertisement. The approval by the
attorney general is not exempt from public disclosure.
(3) Revenue generated from the sale of advertisements under this
section must be deposited in the highway safety fund created in RCW
46.68.060.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "internet advertisement"
refers to specific advertising methods on the internet, including
display or banner advertisements, sponsorships, and business listings
where goods or services might be purchased online.

--- END ---