BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
executive ethics board are transferred to the public disclosure and
ethics commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the executive ethics
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be delivered to the custody of the public disclosure and ethics
commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the executive ethics board in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the public disclosure and ethics commission. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the public
disclosure and ethics commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the executive ethics board for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
public disclosure and ethics commission.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds,
books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the executive ethics
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the public disclosure and ethics
commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the public disclosure and ethics
commission.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
executive ethics board shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.010 and 2005 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(4) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(5) "Commission" means the public disclosure and ethics commission
created in RCW 42.17A.100.
(6) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(((6))) (7) "Confidential information" means (a) specific
information, rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available
to the general public on request or (b) information made confidential
by law.
(((7))) (8) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or
more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(((8))) (9) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial
conduct, the legislative ethics board, and the ((executive ethics
board)) commission.
(((9))) (10) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in
RCW 42.17.020.
(((10))) (11) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17 RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(((11))) (12) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to
a state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or
similar item or activity in connection with the state officer's or
state employee's official role.
(((12))) (13) "Official duty" means those duties within the
specific scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as
defined by the officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the
state Constitution.
(((13))) (14) "Participate" means to participate in state action or
a proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(((14))) (15) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether
or not operated for profit.
(((15))) (16) "Regulatory agency" means any state board,
commission, department, or officer, except those in the legislative or
judicial branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative
proceedings, issue permits or licenses, or to control or affect
interests of identified persons.
(((16))) (17) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction
involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating
authority, whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone
or through subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or
otherwise direct state action in respect of such transaction.
(((17))) (18) "State action" means any action on the part of an
agency, including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(((18))) (19) "State officer" means every person holding a position
of public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial
office of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior
court, judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court,
members of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate
and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of
elective offices in the executive branch of state government, chief
executive officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions,
or committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(((19))) (20) "State employee" means an individual who is employed
by an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(((20))) (21) "University" includes "state universities" and
"regional universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes
any research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute and the Washington Technology Center.
(((21))) (22) "University research employee" means a state officer
or state employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the
state officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology
transfer, approved consulting activities related to research and
technology transfer, or other incidental activities.
(((22))) (23) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its
ordinary meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(((23))) (24)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a
proceeding, application, submission, request for a ruling or other
determination, contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the
state officer, state employee, or former state officer or state
employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.52.220 and 2005 c 106 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied
scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in
RCW 28B.140.005, each university may develop, adopt, and implement one
or more written administrative processes that shall, upon approval by
the governor, apply in place of the obligations imposed on universities
and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040,
42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and
42.52.160. The universities shall coordinate on the development of
administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. A
university research employee in compliance with the processes
authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW
42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130,
42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.
(2) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce
activity subject to the written approval processes under this section,
as provided in RCW 42.52.360.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.52.360 and 2005 c 106 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce this
chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to statewide elected
officers and all other officers and employees in the executive branch,
boards and commissions, and institutions of higher education.
(2) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall enforce this
chapter with regard to the activities of university research employees
as provided in this subsection.
(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110,
42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall
be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in
regulations of the United States public health service and the office
of the secretary of the department of health and human services in
Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity
in research.
(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and
42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive
system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work
activities by university research employees while assuring that such
employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the
university.
(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the
administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the
university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the
university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable
reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess
of de minimis.
(3) The ((executive ethics board)) commission shall:
(a) Develop educational materials and training;
(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(c) Issue advisory opinions;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal
from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; and
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.
(4) The ((board)) commission may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the ((board)) commission or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 42.52.220, the ((executive ethics
board)) commission may review and approve agency policies as provided
for in this chapter.
(6) This section does not apply to state officers and state
employees of the judicial branch.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.52.550 and 1994 c 154 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
The citizen members of the legislative ethics board ((and the
members of the executive ethics board)) shall be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislator members of the
legislative ethics board shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
44.04.120.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.52.570 and 2008 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of fish and wildlife and the parks and
recreation commission may approve private business activity in state-owned housing provided under Title 77 RCW or chapter 79A.05 RCW.
(2) Prior to granting approval of private business activity in
state-owned housing, the department of fish and wildlife and the parks
and recreation commission must adopt a private business activity policy
that is approved by the ((executive ethics board)) commission.
(a) The private business activity policy may only authorize private
business activity by the resident state employee while the employee is
off duty or the employee's spouse who is approved for residency in the
agency housing or the employee's children.
(b) The private business activity policy may not allow private
business activity that negatively impacts the agency's operations. For
the purposes of this section, "negatively impacts" includes but is not
limited to: (i) Negative impacts to visitors' services or access; (ii)
in-person visits to state-owned housing for the purpose of transacting
business that negatively impacts agency operations; (iii) the
incurrence of additional expenses by the state; (iv) the use of signage
in the state-owned residence; (v) advertising on state-owned property;
or (vi) an appearance of state endorsement of the private business
activity.
(3) The private business activity must comply with all other local,
state, and federal laws.
(4) All approvals of a private business activity in state-owned
housing must be by the agency director or designee in writing.
(5) A state employee is presumed not to be in violation of RCW
42.52.070 or 42.52.160 if the employee or the employee's spouse or
child complies with this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall consist of a chairman and four other members, each
of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall
expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the
membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor
with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability of any
member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person to act
in his stead during the continuance of such inability. The members
shall not be removable during their respective terms except for cause
determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The governor in
appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve as chairman
at the governor's pleasure. The appointed chairman shall serve as a
fully participating board member and as the director of the agency.
The members of the board and its officers and employees shall not
engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public
office without the prior approval of the ((executive ethics board))
public disclosure and ethics commission indicating compliance with RCW
42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the
time of appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as
the representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association. The members of the board shall
each severally receive salaries fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The board may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor,
the compensation of and prescribe the duties of a senior administrative
officer and such officers, employees, and assistants as may be
necessary, and provide necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.40.020 and 2008 c 266 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in
any department or agency of state government.
(3) "Good faith" means the individual providing the information or
report of improper governmental activity has a reasonable basis in fact
for reporting or providing the information. An individual who
knowingly provides or reports, or who reasonably ought to know he or
she is providing or reporting, malicious, false, or frivolous
information, or information that is provided with reckless disregard
for the truth, or who knowingly omits relevant information is not
acting in good faith.
(4) "Gross mismanagement" means the exercise of management
responsibilities in a manner grossly deviating from the standard of
care or competence that a reasonable person would observe in the same
situation.
(5) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(6)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by an
employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is a gross waste of public funds or resources as defined
in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature;
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety;
(iv) Which is gross mismanagement; or
(v) Which prevents the dissemination of scientific opinion or
alters technical findings without scientifically valid justification,
unless state law or a common law privilege prohibits disclosure. This
provision is not meant to preclude the discretion of agency management
to adopt a particular scientific opinion or technical finding from
among differing opinions or technical findings to the exclusion of
other scientific opinions or technical findings. Nothing in this
subsection prevents or impairs a state agency's or public official's
ability to manage its public resources or its employees in the
performance of their official job duties. This subsection does not
apply to de minimis, technical disagreements that are not relevant for
otherwise improper governmental activity. Nothing in this provision
requires the auditor to contract or consult with external experts
regarding the scientific validity, invalidity, or justification of a
finding or opinion.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(7) "Public official" means the attorney general's designee or
designees; the director, or equivalent thereof in the agency where the
employee works; an appropriate number of individuals designated to
receive whistleblower reports by the head of each agency; or the
((executive ethics board)) public disclosure and ethics commission.
(8) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(9) "Use of official authority or influence" includes threatening,
taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or
approving any personnel action such as an appointment, promotion,
transfer, assignment including but not limited to duties and office
location, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment,
performance evaluation, determining any material changes in pay,
provision of training or benefits, tolerance of a hostile work
environment, or any adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other
disciplinary action.
(10)(a) "Whistleblower" means:
(i) An employee who in good faith reports alleged improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, initiating an investigation by the
auditor under RCW 42.40.040; or
(ii) An employee who is perceived by the employer as reporting,
whether they did or not, alleged improper governmental action to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, initiating an investigation by the auditor under RCW
42.40.040.
(b) For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter
49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means:
(i) An employee who in good faith provides information to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an
employee who is believed to have reported asserted improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, or to have provided information to
the auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040
but who, in fact, has not reported such action or provided such
information; or
(ii) An employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting
review or provides information to the rules review committee, and an
employee who is believed to have identified rules warranting review or
provided information to the rules review committee but who, in fact,
has not done so.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.40.910 and 2008 c 266 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Chapter 266, Laws of 2008 and chapter 361, Laws of 1999 do not
affect the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board, the
((executive ethics board)) public disclosure and ethics commission, or
the commission on judicial conduct, as set forth in chapter 42.52 RCW.
The senate, the house of representatives, and the supreme court shall
adopt policies regarding the applicability of chapter 42.40 RCW to the
senate, house of representatives, and judicial branch.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.17.190 and 1995 c 397 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate shall report
annually: The total budget; the portion of the total attributed to
staff; and the number of full-time and part-time staff positions by
assignment, with dollar figures as well as number of positions.
(2) Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or
otherwise expressly authorized by law, no public funds may be used
directly or indirectly for lobbying: PROVIDED, This does not prevent
officers or employees of an agency from communicating with a member of
the legislature on the request of that member; or communicating to the
legislature, through the proper official channels, requests for
legislative action or appropriations which are deemed necessary for the
efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in the proper
performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this
subsection does not apply to the legislative branch.
(3) Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may
expend public funds for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be
limited to (a) providing information or communicating on matters
pertaining to official agency business to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating the official
position or interests of the agency to any elected official or officer
or employee of any agency: PROVIDED, That public funds may not be
expended as a direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any
elected official or officer or employee of any agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, the term "gift" means a voluntary transfer
of any thing of value without consideration of equal or greater value,
but does not include informational material transferred for the sole
purpose of informing the recipient about matters pertaining to official
agency business. This section does not permit the printing of a state
publication which has been otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) No elective official or any employee of his or her office or
any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may
use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following
activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose an initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the initiative
to the legislature, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members
of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the
expression of an opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry;
(c) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency;
(d) Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature
that would be permitted under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180 if conducted
regarding other ballot measures.
(5) Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district which expends
public funds for lobbying shall file with the commission, except as
exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly statements providing the
following information for the quarter just completed:
(a) The name of the agency filing the statement;
(b) The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected
official, officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of
the nature of the lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent
on the lobbying;
(c) A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying
including but not limited to travel, consultant or other special
contractual services, and brochures and other publications, the
principal purpose of which is to influence legislation;
(d) For purposes of this subsection the term "lobbying" does not
include:
(i) Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of
financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the
office of financial management to the legislature for appropriations
other than its own agency budget requests;
(ii) Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to
a legislative request expressly requesting or directing a specific
study, recommendation, or report by an agency on a particular subject;
(iii) Official reports including recommendations submitted to the
legislature on an annual or biennial basis by a state agency as
required by law;
(iv) Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or
within state agencies or between or within local agencies;
(v) Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:
(A) Telephone conversations or preparation of written
correspondence;
(B) In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four
days or parts thereof during any three-month period by officers or
employees of that agency and in-person lobbying by any elected official
of such agency on behalf of such agency or in connection with the
powers, duties, or compensation of such official: PROVIDED, That the
total expenditures of nonpublic funds made in connection with such
lobbying for or on behalf of any one or more members of the legislature
or state elected officials or public officers or employees of the state
of Washington do not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month period:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the exemption under this subsection is in
addition to the exemption provided in (A) of this subsection;
(C) Preparation or adoption of policy positions.
The statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by
the commission and shall be filed within one month after the end of the
quarter covered by the report.
(6) In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or special purpose district may determine and so notify the ((public
disclosure)) commission, that elected officials, officers, or employees
who on behalf of any such local agency engage in lobbying reportable
under subsection (5) of this section shall register and report such
reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist who is required to
register and report under RCW 42.17.150 and 42.17.170. Each such local
agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW 42.17.180.
(7) The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected
official or officer or employee of an agency from complying with other
provisions of this chapter, if such elected official, officer, or
employee is not otherwise exempted.
(8) The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and
certain local agencies to report the identities of those persons who
lobby on behalf of the agency for compensation, together with certain
separately identifiable and measurable expenditures of an agency's
funds for that purpose. This section shall be reasonably construed to
accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency to report any of
its general overhead cost or any other costs which relate only
indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or which are equally
attributable to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the
agency.
The ((public disclosure)) commission may adopt rules clarifying and
implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department
of information services, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure and ethics commission, the executive director of the
Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and
conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director
of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of
tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, ((executive ethics board,)) forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure and
ethics commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings
board, public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board,
board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of
Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission,
Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources
board, Washington public power supply system executive board,
Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 12 RCW 42.17.350 and 1998 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a "public disclosure and ethics
commission" which shall be composed of five members who shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. All
appointees shall be persons of the highest integrity and
qualifications. No more than three members shall have an
identification with the same political party.
(2) The term of each member shall be five years. No member is
eligible for appointment to more than one full term. Any member may be
removed by the governor, but only upon grounds of neglect of duty or
misconduct in office.
(3) During his or her tenure, a member of the commission is
prohibited from engaging in any of the following activities, either
within or outside the state of Washington:
(a) Holding or campaigning for elective office;
(b) Serving as an officer of any political party or political
committee;
(c) Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in
opposition to a candidate or proposition;
(d) Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support
of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;
(e) Participating in any way in any election campaign; or
(f) Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a
member or the staff of the commission may lobby to the limited extent
permitted by RCW 42.17.190 on matters directly affecting this chapter.
(4) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled within thirty days
of the vacancy by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and the
appointee shall serve for the remaining term of his or her predecessor.
A vacancy shall not impair the powers of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the commission.
(5) Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The
commission shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of
procedure in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and in addition shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while
engaged in the business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The compensation provided pursuant to this section
shall not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any
retirement system created pursuant to the general laws of this state.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.17.510 and 2010 c 204 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. For partisan office, if a candidate has
expressed a party or independent preference on the declaration of
candidacy, that party or independent designation shall be clearly
identified in electioneering communications, independent expenditures,
or political advertising.
(2) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of
this section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section, all political advertising undertaken as an
independent expenditure or an electioneering communication by a person
or entity other than a bona fide political party must include as part
of the communication:
(a) The statement: "No candidate authorized this ad. It is paid
for by (name, address, city, state)";
(b) If the sponsor is a political committee, the statement: "Top
Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the names of the five
persons or entities making the largest contributions in excess of seven
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement or communication; and
(c) If the sponsor is a political committee established,
maintained, or controlled directly, or indirectly through the formation
of one or more political committees, by an individual, corporation,
union, association, or other entity, the full name of that individual
or entity.
(3) The information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter.
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing entities if the full
name of the entity has been clearly spoken previously during the
broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by
a listing of the names of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions in excess of seven hundred dollars reportable
under this chapter during the twelve-month period before the date of
the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing
entities if the full name of the entity has been clearly spoken
previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the ((public disclosure)) commission shall, by rule, exempt
from the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 14 RCW 42.17A.100 and 2010 c 204 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public disclosure and ethics commission is established.
The commission shall be composed of five members appointed by the
governor, with the consent of the senate. All appointees shall be
persons of the highest integrity and qualifications. No more than
three members shall have an identification with the same political
party.
(2) The term of each member shall be five years. No member is
eligible for appointment to more than one full term. Any member may be
removed by the governor, but only upon grounds of neglect of duty or
misconduct in office.
(3) During his or her tenure, a member of the commission is
prohibited from engaging in any of the following activities, either
within or outside the state of Washington:
(a) Holding or campaigning for elective office;
(b) Serving as an officer of any political party or political
committee;
(c) Permitting his or her name to be used in support of or in
opposition to a candidate or proposition;
(d) Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support
of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;
(e) Participating in any way in any election campaign; or
(f) Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a
member or the staff of the commission may lobby to the limited extent
permitted by RCW 42.17A.635 on matters directly affecting this chapter.
(4) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled within thirty days
of the vacancy by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and the
appointee shall serve for the remaining term of his or her predecessor.
A vacancy shall not impair the powers of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the commission.
(5) Three members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The
commission shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of
procedure in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while engaged in
the business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The compensation provided pursuant to this section shall
not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any
retirement system created under the laws of this state.

Sec. 15 RCW 42.17A.320 and 2010 c 204 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. For partisan office, if a candidate has
expressed a party or independent preference on the declaration of
candidacy, that party or independent designation shall be clearly
identified in electioneering communications, independent expenditures,
or political advertising.
(2) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of
this section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and
(5) of this section, all political advertising undertaken as an
independent expenditure or an electioneering communication by a person
or entity other than a bona fide political party must include as part
of the communication:
(a) The statement: "No candidate authorized this ad. It is paid
for by (name, address, city, state)";
(b) If the sponsor is a political committee, the statement: "Top
Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the names of the five
persons or entities making the largest contributions in excess of seven
hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement or communication; and
(c) If the sponsor is a political committee established,
maintained, or controlled directly, or indirectly through the formation
of one or more political committees, by an individual, corporation,
union, association, or other entity, the full name of that individual
or entity.
(3) The information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter.
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing entities if the full
name of the entity has been clearly spoken previously during the
broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by
a listing of the names of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions in excess of seven hundred dollars reportable
under this chapter during the twelve-month period before the date of
the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing
entities if the full name of the entity has been clearly spoken
previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the ((public disclosure)) commission shall, by rule, exempt
from the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 16 RCW 42.17A.635 and 2010 c 204 s 808 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate shall report
annually: The total budget; the portion of the total attributed to
staff; and the number of full-time and part-time staff positions by
assignment, with dollar figures as well as number of positions.
(2) Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or
otherwise expressly authorized by law, no public funds may be used
directly or indirectly for lobbying. However, this does not prevent
officers or employees of an agency from communicating with a member of
the legislature on the request of that member; or communicating to the
legislature, through the proper official channels, requests for
legislative action or appropriations that are deemed necessary for the
efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in the proper
performance of their official duties. This subsection does not apply
to the legislative branch.
(3) Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may
expend public funds for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be
limited to (a) providing information or communicating on matters
pertaining to official agency business to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating the official
position or interests of the agency to any elected official or officer
or employee of any agency. Public funds may not be expended as a
direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any elected
official or officer or employee of any agency. For the purposes of
this subsection, "gift" means a voluntary transfer of any thing of
value without consideration of equal or greater value, but does not
include informational material transferred for the sole purpose of
informing the recipient about matters pertaining to official agency
business. This section does not permit the printing of a state
publication that has been otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) No elective official or any employee of his or her office or
any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may
use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17A.555 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following
activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose an initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the initiative
to the legislature, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members
of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the
expression of an opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency;
(d) Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature
that would be permitted under RCW 42.17A.555 and 42.52.180 if conducted
regarding other ballot measures.
(5) Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district that expends
public funds for lobbying shall file with the commission, except as
exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly statements providing the
following information for the quarter just completed:
(a) The name of the agency filing the statement;
(b) The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected
official, officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of
the nature of the lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent
on the lobbying;
(c) A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying
including but not limited to travel, consultant or other special
contractual services, and brochures and other publications, the
principal purpose of which is to influence legislation;
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "lobbying" does not include:
(i) Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of
financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the
office of financial management to the legislature for appropriations
other than its own agency budget requests;
(ii) Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to
a legislative request expressly requesting or directing a specific
study, recommendation, or report by an agency on a particular subject;
(iii) Official reports including recommendations submitted to the
legislature on an annual or biennial basis by a state agency as
required by law;
(iv) Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or
within state agencies or between or within local agencies;
(v) Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:
(A) Telephone conversations or preparation of written
correspondence;
(B) In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four
days or parts thereof during any three-month period by officers or
employees of that agency and in-person lobbying by any elected official
of such agency on behalf of such agency or in connection with the
powers, duties, or compensation of such official. The total
expenditures of nonpublic funds made in connection with such lobbying
for or on behalf of any one or more members of the legislature or state
elected officials or public officers or employees of the state of
Washington may not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month period.
The exemption under this subsection (5)(d)(v)(B) is in addition to the
exemption provided in (d)(v)(A) of this subsection;
(C) Preparation or adoption of policy positions.
The statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by
the commission and shall be filed within one month after the end of the
quarter covered by the report.
(6) In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section, any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or special purpose district may determine and so notify the ((public
disclosure)) commission that elected officials, officers, or employees
who, on behalf of any such local agency, engage in lobbying reportable
under subsection (5) of this section shall register and report such
reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist who is required to
register and report under RCW 42.17A.600 and 42.17A.615. Each such
local agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW
42.17A.630.
(7) The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected
official or officer or employee of an agency from complying with other
provisions of this chapter, if such elected official, officer, or
employee is not otherwise exempted.
(8) The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and
certain local agencies to report the identities of those persons who
lobby on behalf of the agency for compensation, together with certain
separately identifiable and measurable expenditures of an agency's
funds for that purpose. This section shall be reasonably construed to
accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency to report any of
its general overhead cost or any other costs that relate only
indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or that are equally attributable
to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the agency.
(9) The ((public disclosure)) commission may adopt rules clarifying
and implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

Sec. 17 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the director of the state system of community and technical colleges,
the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure and ethics commission, the
executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the
recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems,
the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of
the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the
secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director
of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state
universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each
district and each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, ((public
disclosure commission,)) public employees' benefits board, recreation
and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board,
shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation
commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and
transportation commission, Washington State University board of
regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.03.028 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department of personnel shall study the duties and salaries
of the directors of the several departments and the members of the
several boards and commissions of state government, who are subject to
appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the
governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies
of state government:
The arts commission; the human rights commission; the board of
accountancy; the board of pharmacy; the eastern Washington historical
society; the Washington state historical society; the recreation and
conservation office; the criminal justice training commission; the
department of personnel; the state library; the traffic safety
commission; the horse racing commission; the advisory council on
vocational education; the public disclosure and ethics commission; the
state conservation commission; the commission on Hispanic affairs; the
commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state board for
volunteer firefighters and reserve officers; the transportation
improvement board; the public employment relations commission; the
forest practices appeals board; and the energy facilities site
evaluation council.
(2) The department of personnel shall report to the governor or the
chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing authority at least once in
each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor may designate, but
not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its
recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

Sec. 19 RCW 44.05.020 and 1983 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.
(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal
law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each
year ending in zero.
(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the
Washington public disclosure and ethics commission pursuant to RCW
42.17.150.
(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional
redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 42.52.340 (Transfer of jurisdiction) and 1994 c 154 s 204;
(2) RCW 42.52.350 (Executive ethics board) and 1994 c 154 s 205;
and
(3) RCW 42.52.380 (Political activities of board members) and 1997
c 11 s 1 & 1994 c 154 s 208.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 10 through 13 of this act expire
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 14 through 17 of this act take
effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---