BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 13.40.005 (Juvenile disposition standards commission--Abolished -- References to commission -- Transfer of powers, duties, and
functions) and 1995 c 269 s 301;
(2) RCW 9.94A.850 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Established--Powers and duties) and 2009 c 375 s 8, 2009 c 28 s 17, & 2005 c 282 s
19;
(3) RCW 9.94A.863 (Monetary threshold amounts of property crimes--Review -- Report) and 2009 c 431 s 2;
(4) RCW 9.94A.8672 (Sex offender policy board -- Establishment) and
2008 c 249 s 2;
(5) RCW 9.94A.8673 (Sex offender policy board -- Membership) and 2008
c 249 s 3;
(6) RCW 9.94A.8675 (Sex offender policy board -- Authority) and 2008
c 249 s 5; and
(7) RCW 72.09.350 (Corrections mental health center -- Collaborative
arrangement with University of Washington -- Services for mentally ill
offenders -- Annual report to the legislature) and 1993 c 459 s 1.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.860 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 311 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The sentencing guidelines commission is hereby created as
provided in this section. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.875, the
commission is advisory only and may only advise the department, the
governor, or the legislature as deemed necessary by the secretary of
the department, the governor, or the legislature.
(2) The commission consists of twenty voting members, one of whom
the governor shall designate as chairperson. With the exception of ex
officio voting members, the voting members of the commission shall be
appointed by the ((governor, subject to confirmation by the senate))
secretary of the department.
(((2))) (3) The voting membership consists of the following:
(a) The head of the state agency having general responsibility for
adult correction programs, as an ex officio member;
(b) The director of financial management or designee, as an ex
officio member;
(c) The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board, as an ex
officio member;
(d) The head of the state agency, or the agency head's designee,
having responsibility for juvenile corrections programs, as an ex
officio member;
(e) Two prosecuting attorneys;
(f) Two attorneys with particular expertise in defense work;
(g) Four persons who are superior court judges;
(h) One person who is the chief law enforcement officer of a county
or city;
(i) Four members of the public who are not prosecutors, defense
attorneys, judges, or law enforcement officers, one of whom is a victim
of crime or a crime victims' advocate;
(j) One person who is an elected official of a county government,
other than a prosecuting attorney or sheriff;
(k) One person who is an elected official of a city government;
(l) One person who is an administrator of juvenile court services.
In making the appointments, the governor shall endeavor to assure
that the commission membership includes adequate representation and
expertise relating to both the adult criminal justice system and the
juvenile justice system. In making the appointments, the governor
shall seek the recommendations of Washington prosecutors in respect to
the prosecuting attorney members, of the Washington state bar
association in respect to the defense attorney members, of the
association of superior court judges in respect to the members who are
judges, of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in
respect to the member who is a law enforcement officer, of the
Washington state association of counties in respect to the member who
is a county official, of the association of Washington cities in
respect to the member who is a city official, of the office of crime
victims advocacy and other organizations of crime victims in respect to
the member who is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate, and
of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators in
respect to the member who is an administrator of juvenile court
services.
(((3))) (4)(a) All voting members of the commission, except ex
officio voting members, shall serve terms of three years and until
their successors are appointed and confirmed.
(b) The governor shall stagger the terms of the members appointed
under subsection (((2))) (3)(j), (k), and (l) of this section by
appointing one of them for a term of one year, one for a term of two
years, and one for a term of three years.
(((4))) (5) The speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate may each appoint two nonvoting members to the
commission, one from each of the two largest caucuses in each house.
The members so appointed shall serve two-year terms, or until they
cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed,
whichever occurs first.
(((5))) (6) The members of the commission ((shall)) may not be
reimbursed for travel expenses ((as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060)). Legislative members ((shall)) may not be reimbursed by
their respective houses ((as provided under RCW 44.04.120)). Members
((shall be)) are not compensated ((in accordance with RCW 43.03.250)).
(7) The commission may meet if a meeting is called by the secretary
of the department, the governor, or the legislature and only for such
purposes as determined by the secretary of the department, the
governor, or the legislature.
(8) The commission must serve as a clearinghouse and information
center for the collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of
information on:
(a) State and local adult sentencing practices; and
(b) Juveniles sentenced as adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services must serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation,
analysis, and dissemination of information on:
(1) State and local juvenile sentencing practices; and
(2) Juveniles sentenced as adults.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(((2) The sentencing guidelines commission shall be sent a
completed copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction
for each felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section and
shall compile a yearly and cumulative judicial record of each
sentencing judge in regards to his or her sentencing practices for any
and all felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The sentencing guidelines commission shall compare each
individual judge's sentencing practices to the standard or presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes listed in subsection (2)
of this section for the appropriate offense level as defined in RCW
9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518, offender score as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and
any applicable deadly weapon enhancements as defined in RCW 9.94A.533
(3) or (4), or both. These comparative records shall be retained and
made available to the public for review in a current, newly created or
reworked official published document by the sentencing guidelines
commission.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the sentencing guidelines
commission as required in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentencing guidelines commission shall have the authority and shall
undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past,
current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1)
of this section are received by the sentencing guidelines commission.))

Sec. 5 RCW 13.50.010 and 2010 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombudsman,
the department of social and health services and its contracting
agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having
children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight
committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(b) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the
juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(c) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the
case;
(d) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the
records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
department of social and health services records needed for its
research and data-gathering functions ((under RCW 9.94A.850 and other
statutes)). Access to records or information for research purposes
shall be permitted only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in
the records or information will be preserved. Each person granted
permission to inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for
research purposes shall present a notarized statement to the court
stating that the names of juveniles and parents will remain
confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
((sentencing guidelines commission under RCW 9.94A.850)) department of
social and health services upon request. The commission shall not
disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records
without the named individual's written permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.74501 and 2001 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) department shall serve
as the state council for interstate adult offender supervision as
required under article IV of RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision. ((To assist the commission in performing
its functions as the state council,)) The department of corrections
shall provide staffing and support services. The ((commission))
department may form a subcommittee, including members representing the
legislative, judicial, and executive branches of state government, and
victims' groups((, and the secretary of corrections,)) to perform the
functions of the state council. Any such subcommittee shall include
representation of both houses and at least two of the four largest
political caucuses in the legislature.
(2) The ((commission,)) department or a subcommittee if formed for
that purpose, shall:
(a) Review department operations and procedures under RCW
9.94A.745, and recommend policies to the compact administrator,
including policies to be pursued in the administrator's capacity as the
state's representative on the interstate commission created under
article III of RCW 9.94A.745;
(b) Report annually to the legislature on interstate supervision
operations and procedures under RCW 9.94A.745, including
recommendations for policy changes; and
(c) Not later than December 1, 2004, report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of its functioning as the state council under article
IV of RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend any legislation it deems
appropriate.
(3) The ((commission, or a subcommittee if formed for that
purpose,)) secretary of the department shall appoint ((one of its
members, or)) an employee of the department ((designated by the
secretary)), or a subcommittee if formed for that purpose shall appoint
one of its members, to represent the state at meetings of the
interstate commission created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745 when
the compact administrator cannot attend.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.855 and 2005 c 282 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) secretary of the department shall appoint a
research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient resources to
accomplish its duties. The ((commission)) department may request from
((the office of financial management, the indeterminate sentence review
board,)) the administrative office of the courts, the department of
corrections, and the department of social and health services such
data, information, and data processing assistance as it may need to
accomplish its duties, and such services shall be provided without cost
to the ((commission)) department. ((The commission shall adopt its own
bylaws.
The salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be
fixed by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.))

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.870 and 1999 c 143 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the governor finds that an emergency exists in that the
population of a state residential correctional facility exceeds its
reasonable, maximum capacity, then the governor may do any one or more
of the following:
(1) Call the ((sentencing guidelines commission)) department into
an emergency meeting for the purpose of evaluating the standard ranges
and other standards. The ((commission)) department may adopt any
revision or amendment to the standard ranges or other standards that it
believes appropriate to deal with the emergency situation. The
revision or amendment shall be adopted in conformity with chapter 34.05
RCW and shall take effect on the date prescribed by the ((commission))
department. The legislature shall approve or modify the
((commission's)) department's revision or amendment at the next
legislative session after the revision or amendment takes effect.
Failure of the legislature to act shall be deemed as approval of the
revision or amendment;
(2) Call the clemency and pardons board into an emergency meeting
for the purpose of recommending whether the governor's commutation or
pardon power should be exercised to meet the present emergency.

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.52.025 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to
commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters
or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.
(2) Residential burglary is a class B felony. ((In establishing
sentencing guidelines and disposition standards, the sentencing
guidelines commission and the juvenile disposition standards commission
shall consider residential burglary as a more serious offense than
second degree burglary.))

Sec. 10 RCW 10.98.140 and 1987 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial
management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal
justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies
shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state
criminal justice forecasting.
(2) The office of financial management shall be the official state
agency for the sentenced felon jail forecast. This forecast shall
provide at least a six-year projection and shall be published by
December 1 of every even-numbered year beginning with 1986. The office
of financial management shall seek advice regarding the assumptions in
the forecast from criminal justice agencies and associations.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) department shall keep
records on all sentencings above or below the standard range defined by
chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum, the records shall include the name of
the offender, the crimes for which the offender was sentenced, the name
and county of the sentencing judge, and the deviation from the standard
range. Such records shall be made available to public officials upon
request.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.98.160 and 2005 c 282 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions,
and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office
of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall
consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the
administrative office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies,
local jails, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the
indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting
attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial
management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice
issues. The Washington integrated justice information board shall
review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the
courts for development and modification of the statewide justice
information network.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2009 c 479 s 50 and 2009 c 445 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the 2007-2009 biennium, operation of the
integrated crisis response and intensive case management pilots
contracted with the department of social and health services division
of alcohol and substance abuse. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the Washington
state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug
court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the
criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment
providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary,
shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
2013.

Sec. 13 RCW 72.66.016 and 1983 c 255 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A furlough shall not be granted to a resident if the furlough
would commence prior to the time the resident has served the minimum
amounts of time provided under this section:
(a) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is longer than
twelve months, he or she shall have served at least six months of the
term;
(b) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is less than twelve
months, he or she shall have served at least ninety days and shall have
no longer than six months left to serve on his or her minimum term;
(c) If he or she is serving a mandatory minimum term of
confinement, he or she shall have served all but the last six months of
such term.
(2) A person convicted and sentenced for a violent offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 is not eligible for furlough until the person
has served at least one-half of the minimum term ((as established by
the board of prison terms and paroles or the sentencing guidelines
commission)).

--- END ---