BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
FINDINGS OF POLICY AND PURPOSE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that a well-developed and maintained, effectively managed, and market-competitive freight transportation port infrastructure is essential to
the long-term economic prosperity of the state and its citizens in a
global economy. The legislature further finds that integrated capital
facilities investment, global marketing, and operational management
generate operating efficiencies and economies of scale that provide the
best value to taxpayers. It is the intent of the legislature that a
Puget Sound port authority meet and exceed the operational productivity
and financial performance metrics of global and domestic peer ports.

PART II
PUGET SOUND PORT AUTHORITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FORMATION. A port district located in a
county with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons
or more and any port district located in an adjoining county with a
population of over five hundred thousand persons must establish the
Puget Sound port authority within one year of the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 GOVERNANCE. (1) A board of commissioners
consisting of eleven nonpartisan commissioners must govern the Puget
Sound port authority.
(2) Commissioners are elected and apportioned as follows:
(a) Six commissioners apportioned to six geographical districts and
elected on a nonpartisan basis. Each commissioner representing a
district must be a registered voter residing within that district.
Initial apportionment and establishment of district lines must be
determined by the county auditors located within the authority within
thirty days of the formation of the Puget Sound port authority
according to the requirements in (c) of this subsection. Subsequent
reapportionment and drawing of district lines must be conducted by the
county auditors located within the authority;
(b) Five commissioners appointed by the governor with the consent
of the senate. The governor's appointments shall include individuals
who have relevant expertise in international trade, marketing, freight
transportation design, construction, operation, and maintenance; and
(c) At least two districts must be located primarily in each
county. Each district must contain a population, excluding nonresident
military personnel, as equal as practicable to the population of any
other district. To a reasonable extent, each district must contain
contiguous territory, be compact, and be convenient.
(3) Commissioners, including those appointed by the governor, shall
serve six-year terms of office, except that two of the initially
elected commissioners representing a district shall serve a two-year
term of office and two of the initially elected commissioners
representing a district shall serve four-year terms. The governor
shall designate which districts have commissioners that serve two-year,
four-year, and six-year terms. The first election for commissioners
must be held at the general election following the formation of the
Puget Sound port authority, consistent with Title 29A RCW.
(4) The commissioners shall: Organize, by the election of its own
members, a president and secretary; by resolution, adopt rules
governing the transaction of its business; and adopt an official seal.
Only an elected commissioner may serve as president or secretary. All
proceedings of the Puget Sound port authority commission shall be by
motion or resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such purpose,
which shall be public records.
(5) Vacancies in positions appointed by the governor must be filled
by appointment of the governor. Vacancies in elected positions must be
filled by a person approved by a majority of the remaining
commissioners who shall serve until the vacancy is filled at the next
general election held more than one hundred eighty days after the date
the vacancy is filled on an interim basis. The person appointed to
fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of
the office to which he or she was appointed.
(6) If a commissioner is appointed by the governor, the governor
may only reappoint a commissioner to one additional six-year term of
office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 POWERS AND PURPOSES. A Puget Sound port
authority is hereby granted all powers and purposes consistent with
those in this title as now or hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 DISSOLUTION OF PORT DISTRICTS WITHIN THE
PUGET SOUND PORT AUTHORITY. After establishment of the Puget Sound
port authority under section 201 of this act, any port district located
within the boundaries of the Puget Sound port authority shall be
dissolved pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 53.47 RCW.

Sec. 205 RCW 53.47.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 162 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
A port district shall be deemed inactive if, at the time of the
filing of the petition for dissolution with the clerk of the superior
court of the county in which such port district is situated, such port
has failed to comply with ((subdivision)) subsection (1), (2), ((or))
(3), or (4) of this section.
(1) The port district has failed to file its budget with the board
of county commissioners or, in the case of home rule charters, the
appropriate governing body for the two fiscal years immediately
preceding the date of filing such petition, and the port district,
having been in existence for two years or more, has failed to adopt its
comprehensive plan of harbor improvement and/or industrial development
as provided by statute, and does not presently own or has not leased
within two years prior to the filing of such petition, real property
for use for port purposes.
(2) The port district does not presently own or has not leased or
owned real property for use for port purposes within the four calendar
years prior to the filing of such petition.
(3) The port district has not filed its budget with the board of
county commissioners or, in the case of home rule charters, the
appropriate governing body for the two fiscal years immediately
preceding the filing of said petition has not adopted its comprehensive
plan of harbor improvement and/or industrial development as provided by
statute, and has not met with a legal quorum at least twice in the last
two calendar years prior to the filing of such petition.
(4) The port district is located within the boundaries of the Puget
Sound port authority established under section 201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 COMMISSIONER COMPENSATION. Each
commissioner shall receive an annual salary equal to the annual salary
of a county councilmember located in a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand persons or more. A commissioner may
waive all or a portion of his or her compensation under this section
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 CONSOLIDATION OF OVERSEAS OFFICES. A
Puget Sound port authority shall coordinate with the overseas trade
offices within the department of community, trade, and economic
development and establish a plan to consolidate trade offices with the
Puget Sound port authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND LEGISLATURE.
Within one year of the effective date of this section, the Puget Sound
port authority shall submit to the governor and legislature a plan
detailing how the authority will significantly enhance Washington
state's global marine, air, and rail freight transportation
competitiveness with other global and domestic ports and increase
international trade commerce providing broad economic benefits to the
citizens of the state. The plan shall include, but is not limited to,
the following elements:
(1) An integrated and consolidated management and operations
reorganization plan to be implemented in a phased manner over five
years. The management and operations reorganization plan must include
specific actions and clearly measurable fiscal metrics;
(2) How the authority will maximize and expand freight
transportation capital facilities to significantly increase global
marine, air, and rail freight transportation infrastructure capacity,
including a fifty-year investment funding plan to support such
investments. The authority must include the evaluation and application
of environmental technologies and practices to mitigate potential
adverse impacts. The joint legislative audit and review committee and
the Puget Sound port authority shall jointly collaborate to develop
performance metrics to assess capital facilities utilization and
productivity;
(3) A strategic global marketing plan to increase global and
domestic market share for North American markets for both inbound and
outbound global freight transportation traffic volume and commodity
dollar value, including clearly identifiable targeted markets and
market penetration performance goals and metrics;
(4) The capital facilities investment plan and the strategic global
marketing plan shall identify and take into consideration existing
global freight transportation and marketing assets located in
Washington and located across the greater binational Pacific Northwest
economic region including, but not limited to, collaboration with the
port authorities of the Canadian province of British Columbia.

PART III
FINANCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 TREASURER. (1) A Puget Sound port
authority, by resolution, shall designate a person with experience in
financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the authority. The
commission may designate the treasurer of any county within which the
authority is located to act as its treasurer. The designated treasurer
has all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties the county
treasurer has related to investing surplus funds. The authority shall
require a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in this
state in an amount and under the terms and conditions the authority, by
resolution, from time to time finds will protect the authority against
loss. The authority shall pay the premium on the bond.
(2) If the treasurer of the authority is also the treasurer of a
county, all authority funds must be deposited with a county depository
under the same restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for
county depositories. If the treasurer of the authority is not the
treasurer of a county, all funds must be deposited in a bank or banks
that are authorized to do business in this state and are qualified for
insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act as the
authority, by resolution, designates, or funds shall be invested in
legal investments for counties.
(3) The authority may provide and require a reasonable bond of any
other person handling money or securities of the authority, but the
authority shall pay the premium on the bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 TAX LEVY--LIMITATION. The Puget Sound
port authority may raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
assessed valuation of the taxable property in the authority boundaries.
Any levy collected under this section shall be used solely for capital
improvements and no levy revenue may be used for operations of the
authority. The levy shall be made and taxes collected in the manner
provided for the levy and collection of taxes in school districts of
the first class.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 PAYMENT OF CLAIMS--USE OF WARRANTS AND
CHECKS. The Puget Sound port authority that acts as its own treasurer
as provided in section 301 of this act may by resolution adopt a policy
for the payment of claims or other obligations of the authority, which
are payable out of solvent funds, electing either to pay obligations by
warrant or by check. However, no check shall be issued when the
applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is ordered, but a
warrant shall be issued instead. When checks are to be used, the
commission shall designate the qualified public depository where checks
are to be drawn, and the officers authorized or required to sign
checks. Wherever in this title reference is made to warrants, the term
includes checks authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 INDEBTEDNESS--LIMITATION. (1) The Puget
Sound port authority may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow
money for authority purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any existing
indebtedness of the authority not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the
district.
(2) With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at
a general or special port authority election called for that purpose,
the Puget Sound port authority may contract indebtedness or borrow
money for authority purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
therefor provided the total indebtedness of the authority at any such
time shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the value of the
taxable property in the authority.
(3) Any port district may issue general district bonds evidencing
any indebtedness, payable at any time not exceeding fifty years from
the date of the bonds. Any contract for indebtedness or borrowed money
authorized by RCW 53.36.030(1)(b) shall not exceed twenty-five years.
The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.
(4) Elections required under this section shall be held as provided
in RCW 39.36.050.
(5) This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan
agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness
under this chapter must exclude the amount of a loan under such a loan
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 (1) The Puget Sound port authority is
hereby authorized, prior to the receipt of taxes raised by levy, to
borrow money or issue the warrants of the authority in anticipation of
the revenues to be derived by such authority and such warrants shall be
redeemed from the first money available from such taxes when collected.
Such warrants may be in any form, including bearer warrants or
registered warrants as provided in RCW 39.46.030.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such warrants
may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 The designated treasurer acting as Puget
Sound port authority treasurer shall create a fund to be known as the
"Puget Sound port authority fund," into which shall be paid all money
received by him or her from the collection of taxes in behalf of such
port authority, and shall also maintain such other special funds as may
be created by the commission into which shall be placed such moneys as
the commission may by its resolution direct. All such port authority
funds shall be deposited with the county depositories under the same
restrictions, contracts, and security as is provided by statute for
county depositories and all interest collected on such port authority
funds shall belong to the Puget Sound port authority and shall be
deposited to its credit in the proper authority funds: PROVIDED, That
any portion of such authority moneys determined by the commission to be
in excess of the current needs of the authority may be invested by the
county treasurer in accordance with RCW 36.29.020 and 36.29.022 and
chapter 39.59 RCW, and all interest collected thereon shall likewise
belong to the authority and shall be deposited to its credit in the
proper authority funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 The commission of the Puget Sound port
authority may, by resolution, create an incidental expense fund in such
amount as the commission may direct. Such incidental expense fund may
be kept and maintained in a bank or banks designated in the resolution
creating the fund, and such depository shall be required to give bonds
or securities to the authority for the protection of such incidental
expense fund, in the full amount of the fund authorized by the
resolution. Vouchers shall be drawn to reimburse said incidental
expense fund and such vouchers shall be approved by the commission.
Transient labor, freight, express, cartage, postage, petty supplies,
and minor expenses of the authority may be paid from said incidental
expense fund and all such disbursements therefrom shall be by check of
the authority auditor or such other officer as the commission shall by
resolution direct. All expenditures from said incidental expense fund
shall be covered by vouchers drawn by the authority auditor and
approved by the manager or such other officer of the authority as the
commission may by resolution direct. The officer disbursing said fund
shall be required to give bond to the authority in the full authorized
amount of the incidental expense fund for the faithful performance of
his or her duties in connection with the disbursement of moneys from
such fund.

PART IV
CERTIFICATION & PERMITTING & TAXATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 53.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each port district or a port authority created under chapter
53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this act) with
annual property tax collections of one million dollars or greater must
annually transfer seven percent of its gross operating revenues,
excluding revenues derived from any property tax levy, to school
districts as provided by this section.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "gross operating revenues"
has the same meaning as defined by RCW 53.12.005.
(2)(a) A school district is eligible to receive the transferred
funds as provided by this section if the school district includes
within its jurisdiction, territory that is also within the jurisdiction
of the port district or a port authority created under chapter 53.---
RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this act).
(b) The amount of funds an eligible school district may receive
from a port district must be proportionate and must be determined by:
(i) The total number of school district pupils that reside within
the jurisdiction of the port district or a port authority created under
chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this
act); and
(ii) The total number of school district pupils that reside within
the jurisdiction of the port district or a port authority created under
chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this act)
from each school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 For the purposes of this chapter, "port
authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created under chapter
53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) The department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife must, for port district or port
authority property and railway corridors as provided by section 406 of
this act, delegate, to the maximum extent consistent with federal law,
all environmental permitting authority currently exercised by these
agencies, including, but not limited to, chapters 90.48, 90.58, and
77.55 RCW, to each port district or port authority. The department of
ecology and the department of fish and wildlife must delegate authority
by certifying port commissions to self-permit with regard to all state
environmental permits currently issued, approved, or consulted upon by
the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) As part of a port district's or port authority's self-permitting process, a port commission must, before issuing the final
permit for a project on port district property or a railway corridor as
provided by section 406 of this act, send a draft copy of the permit to
both the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife
for review and comment. The departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife must limit their comments to whether the port commission has
complied with the environmental standards the departments are otherwise
required to enforce when exercising permitting authority for projects
not on port district property, port authority property, or a railway
corridor as provided by section 406 of this act. The departments of
ecology and fish and wildlife have thirty days to review and comment on
the draft permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 (1) Upon the certification provided for by
section 403 of this act, port districts and port authorities are exempt
from obtaining any permit issued by a county, city, or town, regarding
projects conducted on port district property, port authority property,
or a railway corridor as provided by section 406 of this act, but not
limited to, any permit issued under chapter 90.58 RCW, any permit
related to regulation of critical areas under chapter 36.70A RCW, and
any permit required for filling, grading, building, or construction, or
any other permit required for a project that would otherwise be issued
under a local ordinance meeting the definition of a development
regulation under chapter 35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, 36.70A, or 36.70B RCW.
Nothing in this section may be construed as discouraging full and
appropriate cooperation and consultation between port districts or a
port authority and local governments for projects conducted on port
district property or a railway corridor as provided by section 406 of
this act.
(2) For projects subject to the provisions of chapter 43.21C RCW,
the port district must serve as the lead entity for all review required
under chapter 43.21C RCW. Nothing in this section may be construed as
limiting the ability of local governments to participate in the process
as provided for in chapter 43.21C RCW.
(3) In addition to local government participation in the process
provided for in chapter 43.21C RCW, and as part of the self-permitting
process set forth in this chapter, the port district or port authority
must, before issuing the final permit for a project on port district
property, port authority property, or a railway corridor as provided by
section 406 of this act, send a draft copy of the permit to each local
government in whose jurisdiction the project is being constructed for
review and comment. Each local government has thirty days to review
and comment on the draft permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 The department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife may conduct inspections of projects
conducted on port district property, port authority property, or a
railway corridor as provided by section 406 of this act where a port
district has issued permits under authority delegated by the department
of ecology or the department of fish and wildlife. If an inspector
from the department of ecology or the department of fish and wildlife
discovers an example of substantial noncompliance with the
environmental standards the departments are otherwise required to
enforce when exercising permitting authority for projects not on port
district property, port authority property, or a railway corridor as
provided by section 406 of this act, the inspector must document that
example and issue a detailed report of that example, which must be
transmitted to the port district or port authority that issued the
permits. The port district or port authority may issue a formal
response to the report addressing whether it believes that the port
district, its tenants, or a railway company as provided by section 406
of this act failed to substantially comply with the environmental
standards the departments are otherwise required to enforce when
exercising permitting authority for projects not on port district or
port authority property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 (1) Any port district or port authority
may, at the request of a railroad company operating a class I railroad
in the state of Washington, serve as the permitting authority for any
mainline railway infrastructure project conducted in a railway
corridor.
(2) Any port district or port authority acting as a permitting
authority for any qualifying project in a railway corridor must comply
with the requirements of sections 403 through 405 of this act that are
otherwise required for projects conducted on port district or port
authority property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 A new section is added to chapter 77.55
RCW to read as follows:
Where the department of fish and wildlife has delegated hydraulic
project permit approval authority contained in this chapter to port
districts under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
503 of this act) or the Puget Sound port authority created under
chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this
act), port districts or the port authority will be substituted for the
department of fish and wildlife in an appeal of the approval of a
permit concerning a hydraulic project that is on port district property
or a railway corridor as provided by section 406 of this act. The
appeal process for the permits issued by a port district or port
authority under authority delegated by the department of fish and
wildlife will operate in the same manner as for permits granted by the
department of fish and wildlife under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a port located business.
(2) Any person maintaining places of business both on and off port
district property that contribute to the business activity must, for
the purpose of computing this tax exemption, apportion to this
exemption that portion of gross income which is derived from activities
rendered from the business location located on port district or port
authority property.
(3) Where the apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate
accounting methods, the taxpayer must apportion to this exemption that
proportion of total income which the cost of doing business on the port
property bears to the total cost of doing business within the state.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" means a business whose place of
business is located on property owned by a port district or port
authority and rented or leased to the business. A port located
business includes a port district or port authority.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property or services to a port located business when
the tangible personal property or services are used exclusively at the
business's location on port owned property.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" has the same meaning as provided in
section 408 of this act.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
tangible personal property or services by a port located business when
the tangible personal property or services are used exclusively at the
business's location on port owned property.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" has the same meaning as provided in
section 408 of this act.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 A new section is added to chapter 82.16
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to amounts received
from sales to port located businesses.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" has the same meaning as provided in
section 408 of this act.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 A new section is added to chapter 35.21
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not impose a tax on amounts received by a
port located business.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" has the same meaning as provided in
section 408 of this act.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in property of port districts and port
authorities are exempt from tax under this chapter.
(2) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 A new section is added to chapter 84.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The personal property of a port located business which is used
by the business exclusively at the business's location on port owned
property is exempt from taxation.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Port located business" has the same meaning as provided in
section 408 of this act.
(b) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 415 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of tangible
personal property or services used for the expansion of capacity on a
mainline rail line. A mainline rail line is a rail line that carried
more than five million gross ton-miles per mile in the prior year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of tangible
personal property or services used for the expansion of capacity on a
mainline railway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 417 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans from the
commingled trust fund to port districts with one million dollars or
greater in annual tax receipts. In the aggregate, loans to all
eligible port districts or port authorities made pursuant to this
section may not exceed five percent of the portion of the commingled
trust fund allocated by the board to fixed income investments. No loan
to a port district or port authority under this section may be made by
the board from the commingled trust fund at less than the market rate
for a comparable investment.
(2) The pledge of a port district or port authority of any
revenues, income, profits, charges, fees, or other moneys for the
repayment of a loan from the board is valid and binding from the time
of the adoption of any resolution or the execution of any agreement
making such pledge notwithstanding the fact that there may not then be
any simultaneous delivery thereof, that the revenues, income, receipts,
profits, charges, fees, and other moneys so pledged as soon as received
by the district are immediately subject to the lien of such pledge
without the physical delivery thereof and without further act, and that
the lien of any such pledge is valid and binding as against all parties
having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the
district irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
Neither the resolutions or loan agreement or any other instrument by
which the loan is created need be recorded to be effective.
(3) Any port district or port authority accepting a loan from the
board must agree that, in the event of any shortfall in revenues
affecting the ability of the port district to repay the loan, the port
district or port authority must increase the levy made under RCW
53.36.020 by an amount sufficient to repay the loan made by the board
over a period no greater than the original duration of the loan.
(4) Loans made under this section must be made in a manner
consistent with investment or management criteria established by the
board. In making loans to port districts or a port authority under
this section, the board's primary objectives are to maximize return at
a prudent level of risk, as required by RCW 43.33A.110, and to maintain
the diversity of investment as required by RCW 43.33A.140.
(5) Application for loans must be made by an eligible port district
or port authority to the board in the form and manner as the board may
prescribe.
(6) "Port authority" means the Puget Sound port authority created
under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of
this act).

Sec. 418 RCW 53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A district or port authority may raise revenue by levy of an
annual tax not to exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the assessed valuation of the taxable property
in such port district or port authority for general port purposes,
including the establishment of a capital improvement fund for future
capital improvements, except that any levy for the payment of the
principal and interest of the general bonded indebtedness, or any
indebtedness for a loan made to the district or port authority by the
state investment board, of the port district ((shall be)) or port
authority is in excess of any levy made by the port district or port
authority under the forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value limitation. The levy ((shall)) must be made and taxes collected
in the manner provided for the levy and collection of taxes in school
districts of the first class.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port authority" means the
Puget Sound port authority created under chapter 53.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 502 of this act).

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 APPLICABILITY OF PUBLIC LAWS. The Puget
Sound port authority, its officers, and the board of commissioners,
created under this act, are subject to the general laws regulating
local governments and local governmental officials including, but not
limited to, applicable requirements under chapters 42.17, 42.23, 42.30,
42.41, and 43.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 101, 201 through 204, 206 through
208, and 301 through 307 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Sections 402 through 406 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 This act shall be liberally construed to
effect the policies and purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---