BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - Authorizing a Corporate Net Income Tax
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this title. Except as provided in this section, any term used in this
title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the
internal revenue code.
(1) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(2) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
on January 1, 2011.
(3) "Taxable income" means federal taxable income after making the
additions, subtractions, apportionments, and allocations provided under
this title.
(4) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(5) "Taxpayer" means a corporation receiving income subject to tax
under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 CORPORATE PRIVILEGE TAX IMPOSED.
Beginning January 1, 2013, a tax is imposed at the rate of 7.0 percent
for each taxable year on the taxable income of corporations for the
privilege of engaging in business within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 TAXABLE INCOME MODIFICATIONS. In
computing taxable income, modifications must be made to the taxpayer's
federal taxable income as required under this section, unless the
modification has the effect of duplicating an item of income or
deduction.
(1) Add amounts that have been deducted in computing federal
taxable income to the extent the amounts have been carried over from
taxable years ending before the effective date of this section.
(2) Add amounts that have been deducted in computing federal
taxable income to the extent the amounts have been carried back from
future taxable years.
(3) Add taxes on or measured by net income that have been deducted
under the internal revenue code in computing federal taxable income.
(4) Add gross income that has been excluded under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
103 of the internal revenue code in computing federal taxable income,
except gross income derived from obligations of the state of Washington
or political subdivisions of the state of Washington. However, the
amount added under this subsection must be reduced by any expenses
incurred in the production of amounts added under this subsection, to
the extent the expenses have not been deducted in computing federal
taxable income.
(5) Deduct gross income that the state is prohibited from taxing
under the Constitution or laws of the United States, to the extent the
gross income was included in computing federal taxable income.
However, the amount deducted under this subsection must be reduced by
any expenses incurred in the production of amounts subtracted under
this subsection, to the extent the expenses have been deducted in
computing federal taxable income.
(6) Deduct income attributable to activities subject to tax under
chapter 82.04 RCW for periods prior to the effective date of this
section, to the extent the gross income was included in computing
federal taxable income. However, the amount deducted under this
subsection must be reduced by any expenses incurred in the production
of such income, to the extent the expenses have been deducted in
computing federal taxable income.
(7) Deduct income attributable to activities subject to tax under
chapter 82.16 RCW, to the extent the gross income was included in
computing federal taxable income. However, the amount deducted under
this subsection must be reduced by any expenses incurred in the
production of such income to the extent the expenses have been deducted
in calculating federal taxable income.
(8) Deduct income attributable to insurance business upon which a
tax based on gross premiums is paid to the state. However, the amount
deducted under this subsection must be reduced by any expense incurred
in the production of such income to the extent the expense has been
deducted in calculating federal taxable income.
(9) Add any amounts subject to tax under subchapter F, chapter 1,
subtitle A of the internal revenue code. For the purposes of
computations under this section, if a nonprofit organization has no
federal taxable income, or a negative federal taxable income, federal
taxable income must be treated as if it were zero.
(10) Add amounts upon which an S corporation is subject to tax
under subchapter S, chapter 1, subtitle A of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 TAX RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. If the
first taxable year of any taxpayer with respect to which a tax is
imposed by this title ends before December 31st of the calendar year in
which this title becomes effective, referred to in this section as a
fractional taxable year, the taxable income for the fractional taxable
year shall be the taxpayer's taxable income for the entire taxable
year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the taxpayer's
election:
(1) The taxable income must be multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the fractional
taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in
the entire taxable year.
(2) The taxable income must be adjusted, in accordance with rules
of the department, so as to include only such income and be reduced
only by such deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent
records of the taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 ESTIMATION AGREEMENTS. The department may
reasonably estimate the items of business or nonbusiness income of a
taxpayer having an office within the state and one or more other states
or foreign countries that may be apportioned or allocated to the state
and may enter into estimation agreements with such taxpayers for the
determination of their liability for the tax imposed by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME.
(1) For corporations other than financial organizations or public
utilities, all income must be apportioned and allocated to this state
except income that is apportioned or allocated to another state under
RCW 82.56.010.
(2) For financial organizations and public utilities, as defined in
Article IV, section 1(d) and (f) of RCW 82.56.010, that are taxable
both within this state and in another state within the meaning of
Article IV, section 3 of RCW 82.56.010, the amount of net income to be
apportioned or allocated, or both, to this state must be determined in
accordance with rules adopted by the department. The rules must, as
far as the department deems practical, be consistent with the
provisions of Article IV of RCW 82.56.010. In developing the rules,
the department shall also give appropriate consideration to any uniform
regulations adopted by the multistate tax commission pursuant to
Article VII of RCW 82.56.010, and to the rules of other states in which
the financial organizations and public utilities are also taxable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 COMBINED REPORTING. (1) The department
may permit or require a corporation that is subject to taxation under
this title and is a part of a water's edge combined group to file a
combined report covering the combined operations of the group. The
report must contain such information as is designated in rules adopted
by the department.
(2) A corporation is a part of a water's edge combined group if it
is engaged in business activities that are integrated with, dependent
upon, or that contribute to the business activities of the group as a
whole. Only corporations meeting one or more of the following
descriptions may be included in a water's edge combined group:
(a) Corporations included or includable in a consolidated return
for federal income tax purposes;
(b) United States possessions corporations;
(c) Corporations incorporated in any United States possession or
territory;
(d) Domestic international sales corporations or foreign sales
corporations;
(e) Corporations incorporated in a country that either does not
impose an income tax or imposes an income tax at a rate lower than
ninety percent of the federal tax rate on the federally defined income
tax base, if:
(i) Fifty percent or more of either the sales or purchases or of
payments of income or expenses, exclusive of payments for intangible
property, or payments of eighty percent or more of all expenses are
made directly or indirectly to one or more members of a water's edge
combined group; or
(ii) The corporation conducts no significant economic activity;
(f) Foreign corporations having at least a threshold level of
business activity in the United States, as determined under rules of
the department;
(g) United States corporations that are members of a group of two
or more corporations with a common owner or owners, either corporate or
noncorporate, where more than fifty percent of the voting stock of each
member corporation is directly or indirectly owned by the common owner
or owners or by one or more of the member corporations.
(3) The income attributable to the Washington activities of a
corporation that is a part of a water's edge combined group must be
determined by the apportionment of the entire business net income of
the group and the allocation of nonbusiness income of the corporation,
using the factors and methods in section 106 of this act and the rules
of the department adopted under section 106 of this act. Business net
income may include income of corporations that do not have federal
taxable income because they are not subject to federal taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED--DUE DATE OF
ESTIMATED TAXES--AMOUNT OF ESTIMATED TAX--UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1)
Each taxpayer who is required by the internal revenue code to make
payment of estimated taxes must pay to the department on forms
prescribed by the department the estimated taxes due under this title.
(2) The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the
determination of reporting periods and due dates of payments of
estimated tax apply to the estimated tax payments due under this
section.
(3) The amount of the estimated tax is the annualized tax divided
by the number of months in the reporting period. No estimated tax is
due if the annualized tax is less than five hundred dollars. The
provisions of RCW 82.32.050 and 82.32.090 apply to underpayments of
estimated tax but do not apply to underpayments if the tax remitted to
the department under this title is either ninety percent of the tax
shown on the return or one hundred percent of the tax shown on the
previous year's tax return.
(4) For purposes of this section, the annualized tax is the
taxpayer's projected tax liability for the taxable year as computed
under section 6654 of the internal revenue code and the regulations
thereunder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's
method of accounting for purposes of the tax imposed under this title
must be the same as the taxpayer's method of accounting for federal
income tax purposes. If no method of accounting has been regularly
used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the method
used does not clearly reflect income, tax due under this title is
computed by a method of accounting that in the opinion of the
department fairly reflects income.
(2) If a corporation's method of accounting is changed for federal
income tax purposes, it must be similarly changed for purposes of this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 CORPORATIONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS.
(1) All taxpayers must file with the department, on forms prescribed
by the department, an income tax return for each taxable year. A
corporation owing no tax for a taxable year is not required to file a
return for that year. Each corporation required to file a return under
this title must, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due
thereon to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of
the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period.
(3) If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the
taxpayer or the internal revenue service, the taxpayer must, within
ninety days of the final determination of the adjustment by the
internal revenue service or within thirty days of the filing of a
federal return adjusted by the taxpayer, file with the department on
forms prescribed by the department, a corrected return reflecting the
adjustments as finally determined. The taxpayer must pay any
additional tax due resulting from the finally determined internal
revenue service adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and
assessment. The period of limitation for the collection of the
additional tax, interest, and penalty due as a result of an adjustment
by the taxpayer or a finally determined internal revenue service
adjustment begins at the later of thirty days following the final
determination of the adjustment or the date of the filing of the
corrected return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 DUE DATE FOR FILING A RETURN--EXTENSIONS--INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The due date of a return required to be filed
with the department is the due date of the federal income tax return or
informational return for federal income tax purposes. The department
has the authority to grant extensions of times by which returns
required to be filed by this title may be submitted. The department
also has the authority to grant extensions of time to pay tax with
regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the rate as
specified in RCW 82.32.050 accrues during any extension period and the
interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to late
payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the limitation of RCW
82.32.090, in the case of the late filing of an informational return,
there is imposed a penalty the amount of which must be established by
the department by rule. The penalty may not exceed fifty dollars per
month for a maximum of ten months. RCW 82.32.105 applies to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 RECORDS--RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer
required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title must
keep records, render statements, make returns, file reports, and
perform other acts as the department requires by rule. Each return
must be made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the
department. The department may require other statements and reports be
made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the
department. The department may require any taxpayer required to deduct
and withhold the tax imposed under this title to furnish to the
department a correct copy of any return or document that the taxpayer
has filed with the internal revenue service or received from the
internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department
at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible without being inconsistent with
this title, all of the provisions of the internal revenue code relating
to the following subjects apply to the taxes imposed under this title:
(a) Liability of transferees;
(b) Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for
filing returns, verification of returns, and the time when a return is
deemed filed.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to the provisions in subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably
necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection
of tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. Chapter 82.32
RCW applies to the taxes imposed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 RULES. The department may adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
title. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this title, must follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States department of the treasury
with respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a
part of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and
treasury department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 CRIMES. (1) Any person who knowingly
attempts to evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person required to collect tax imposed under this title who
knowingly fails to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax,
make returns, keep records, or supply information, as required under
this title, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 117 RCW 82.03.130 and 2005 c 253 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board ((shall have)) has jurisdiction to decide the
following types of appeals:
(a) Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.
(b) Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW
84.08.130.
(c) Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the
director of revenue made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if
filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the
mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being hereby
established.
(d) Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public
utility or private car company from determinations by the director of
revenue of equalized assessed valuation of property and the
apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter 84.12 and
84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.
(e) Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty
public utility or private car company from a determination of any
county indicated ratio for such county compiled by the department of
revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED, That
(i) ((Said)) The appeal be filed after review of the ratio under
RCW 84.48.075(3) and not later than fifteen days after the mailing of
the certification; and
(ii) The hearing before the board ((shall)) must be expeditiously
held in accordance with rules prescribed by the board and ((shall))
takes precedence over all matters of the same character.
(f) Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second-class
shorelands on navigable lakes by the department of natural resources
pursuant to RCW ((79.94.210)) 79.125.450.
(g) Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment
district proposals established by governmental ordinances pursuant to
RCW 39.88.060.
(h) Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of
revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use assessment
pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.
(i) Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to
determine value by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.
(j) Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.
(k) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).
(l) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.39.020.
(m) Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds
including penalties and interest under Title 82A RCW.
(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the
provisions of RCW 1.12.070 ((shall)) apply to all notices of appeal
filed with the board of tax appeals.

Sec. 118 RCW 82.03.140 and 2000 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW
82.03.130, a party taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an
informal hearing, such election to be made according to rules of
practice and procedure to be promulgated by the board((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, nothing ((shall)) prevents the assessor or taxpayer,
as a party to an appeal pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days
from the date of the receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with
the clerk of the board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal
one((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
(2) Nothing ((herein shall)) in this section may be construed to
modify the provisions of RCW 82.03.190((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)).
(3) Upon an appeal under RCW 82.03.130(1) (e) or (m), the director
of revenue may, within ten days from the date of its receipt of the
notice of appeal, file with the clerk of the board notice of its
((intention that the hearing be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW))
election of a formal hearing.
(4) In the event that appeals are taken from the same decision,
order, or determination, as the case may be, by different parties and
only one of such parties elects a formal hearing, a formal hearing
((shall)) must be granted.

PART II - Repealing the State Business and Occupation Tax
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The following acts or parts of acts, as
now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective January
1, 2013:
(1) RCW 82.04.220 (Business and occupation tax imposed) and 2010
1st sp.s. c 23 s 102 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.220;
(2) RCW 82.04.230 (Tax upon extractors) and 2006 c 300 s 5, 1993
sp.s. c 25 s 101, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 262 s 33, 1967
ex.s. c 149 s 7, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.230;
(3) RCW 82.04.240 (Tax on manufacturers) and 2010 c 114 s 104, 2004
c 24 s 4, 2003 c 149 s 3, 1998 c 312 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 102, 1981
c 172 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 262
s 34, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 8, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 5, & 1961 c 15 s
82.04.240;
(4) RCW 82.04.2403 (Manufacturer tax not applicable to cleaning
fish) and 1994 c 167 s 1;
(5) RCW 82.04.2404 (Manufacturers -- Processors for hire--Semiconductor materials) and 2010 c 114 s 105 & 2006 c 84 s 2;
(6) RCW 82.04.250 (Tax on retailers) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 509,
2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 508, 2010 1st sp.s. c 11 s 1, 2008 c 81 s 5, 2006
c 177 s 5, & 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2;
(7) RCW 82.04.255 (Tax on real estate brokers) and 1997 c 7 s 1,
1996 c 1 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 202, 1985 c 32 s 2, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3
s 1, 1983 c 9 s 1, & 1970 ex.s. c 65 s 3;
(8) RCW 82.04.257 (Tax on digital products and services) and 2010
c 111 s 301 & 2009 c 535 s 401;
(9) RCW 82.04.260 (Tax on manufacturers and processors of various
foods and by-products -- Research and development organizations -- Travel
agents -- Certain international activities -- Stevedoring and associated
activities -- Low-level waste disposers -- Insurance producers, surplus
line brokers, and title insurance agents--Hospitals -- Commercial
airplane activities -- Timber product activities -- Canned salmon
processors) and 2011 c 2 s 203, 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 506,& 2010 c 114
s 107;
(10) RCW 82.04.261 (Surcharge on timber and wood product
manufacturers, extractors, and wholesalers) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s
510;
(11) RCW 82.04.263 (Tax on cleaning up radioactive waste and other
by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development)
and 2009 c 469 s 202 & 1996 c 112 s 3;
(12) RCW 82.04.270 (Tax on wholesalers) and 2004 c 24 s 5, 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 5, 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3, & 1999 c 358 s 2;
(13) RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and reselling prescription
drugs) and 2003 c 168 s 401 & 1998 c 343 s 1;
(14) RCW 82.04.280 (Tax on printers, publishers, highway
contractors, extracting or processing for hire, cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse operation, insurance general agents, radio and
television broadcasting, government contractors -- Cold storage warehouse
defined -- Storage warehouse defined -- Periodical or magazine defined) and
2010 c 106 s 206, 2010 c 106 s 205, 2009 c 461 s 3, 2009 c 461 s 2,
2006 c 300 s 7, 2006 c 300 s 6, 2004 c 24 s 6, 2003 c 149 s 4, 1998 c
343 s 3, 1994 c 112 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 303, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 106,
1986 c 226 s 2, 1983 c 132 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 90 s 3, 1971 ex.s. c
299 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 7, & 1970 ex.s. c 8 s 2;
(15) RCW 82.04.285 (Tax on contests of chance) and 2005 c 369 s 5;
(16) RCW 82.04.286 (Tax on horse races) and 2005 c 369 s 6;
(17) RCW 82.04.290 (Tax on international investment management
services or other business or service activities) and 2008 c 81 s 6,
2005 c 369 s 8, 2004 c 174 s 2, 2003 c 343 s 2, & 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s
6;
(18) RCW 82.04.29001 (Creation and distribution of custom
software -- Customization of prewritten computer software -- Taxable
services) and 2003 c 168 s 602 & 1998 c 332 s 4;
(19) RCW 82.04.29002 (Additional tax on certain business and
service activities) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1101;
(20) RCW 82.04.2905 (Tax on providing day care) and 1998 c 312 s 7;
(21) RCW 82.04.2906 (Tax on certain chemical dependency services)
and 2003 c 343 s 1;
(22) RCW 82.04.2907 (Tax on royalties) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s
107, 2010 c 111 s 302, 2009 c 535 s 407, 2001 c 320 s 3, & 1998 c 331
s 1;
(23) RCW 82.04.2908 (Tax on provision of room and domiciliary care
to boarding home residents) and 2005 c 514 s 302 & 2004 c 174 s 1;
(24) RCW 82.04.2909 (Tax on aluminum smelters) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 2 s 1, 2006 c 182 s 1, & 2004 c 24 s 3;
(25) RCW 82.04.293 (International investment management services--Definitions) and 1997 c 7 s 3 & 1995 c 229 s 1;
(26) RCW 82.04.298 (Tax on qualified grocery distribution
cooperatives) and 2011 c 2 s 204, 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 511, 2008 c 49
s 1, & 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1;
(27) RCW 82.04.315 (Exemptions -- International banking facilities)
and 1982 c 95 s 7;
(28) RCW 82.04.317 (Exemptions -- Motor vehicle sales by
manufacturers at wholesale auctions to dealers) and 1997 c 4 s 1;
(29) RCW 82.04.330 (Exemptions -- Sales of agricultural products) and
2001 c 118 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 305, 1988 c 253 s 2, & 1987 c 23 s 4;
(30) RCW 82.04.331 (Exemptions -- Wholesale sales to farmers of seed
for planting, conditioning seed for planting owned by others) and 1998
c 170 s 2;
(31) RCW 82.04.332 (Exemptions -- Buying and selling at wholesale
unprocessed milk, wheat, oats, dry peas, dry beans, lentils, triticale,
canola, corn, rye, and barley) and 2007 c 131 s 1 & 1998 c 312 s 2;
(32) RCW 82.04.333 (Exemptions -- Small harvesters) and 2007 c 48 s
5 & 1990 c 141 s 1;
(33) RCW 82.04.334 (Exemptions -- Standing timber) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 23 s 512 & 2007 c 48 s 3;
(34) RCW 82.04.337 (Exemptions -- Amounts received by hop growers or
dealers for processed hops shipped outside the state) and 1987 c 495 s
1;
(35) RCW 82.04.392 (Exemptions -- Mortgage brokers' third-party
provider services trust accounts) and 1998 c 311 s 3 & 1997 c 106 s 21;
(36) RCW 82.04.405 (Exemptions -- Credit unions) and 1998 c 311 s 4
& 1970 ex.s. c 101 s 3;
(37) RCW 82.04.416 (Exemptions -- Operation of state route No. 16)
and 1998 c 179 s 3;
(38) RCW 82.04.421 (Exemptions -- Out-of-state membership sales in
discount programs) and 1997 c 408 s 1;
(39) RCW 82.04.422 (Exemptions -- Wholesale sales of motor vehicles)
and 2004 c 81 s 1 & 2001 c 258 s 1;
(40) RCW 82.04.425 (Exemptions -- Accommodation sales) and 1980 c 37
s 78, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 9, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.425;
(41) RCW 82.04.426 (Exemptions -- Semiconductor microchips) and 2010
c 114 s 110 & 2003 c 149 s 2;
(42) RCW 82.04.4261 (Exemptions -- Federal small business innovation
research program) and 2004 c 2 s 9;
(43) RCW 82.04.4262 (Exemptions -- Federal small business technology
transfer program) and 2004 c 2 s 10;
(44) RCW 82.04.4267 (Exemptions -- Operation of parking/business
improvement areas) and 2005 c 476 s 1;
(45) RCW 82.04.4281 (Deductions -- Investments, dividends, interest
on loans) and 2007 c 54 s 9, 2002 c 150 s 2, & 1980 c 37 s 2;
(46) RCW 82.04.4287 (Deductions -- Compensation for receiving,
washing, etc., horticultural products for person exempt under RCW
82.04.330 -- Materials and supplies used) and 1980 c 37 s 8;
(47) RCW 82.04.4292 (Deductions -- Interest on investments or loans
secured by mortgages or deeds of trust) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 301
& 1980 c 37 s 12;
(48) RCW 82.04.4294 (Deductions -- Interest on loans to farmers and
ranchers, producers or harvesters of aquatic products, or their
cooperatives) and 1980 c 37 s 14;
(49) RCW 82.04.4295 (Deductions -- Manufacturing activities completed
outside the United States) and 1980 c 37 s 15;
(50) RCW 82.04.4296 (Deductions -- Reimbursement for accommodation
expenditures by funeral homes) and 1980 c 37 s 16;
(51) RCW 82.04.433 (Deductions -- Sales of fuel for consumption
outside United States' waters by vessels in foreign commerce) and 2009
c 494 s 2 & 1985 c 471 s 16;
(52) RCW 82.04.4333 (Credit -- Job training services -- Approval) and
1996 c 1 s 4;
(53) RCW 82.04.4339 (Deductions -- Grants to support salmon
restoration) and 2004 c 241 s 1;
(54) RCW 82.04.4451 (Credit against tax due -- Maximum credit -- Table)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1102, 1997 c 238 s 2, & 1994 sp.s. c 2 s 1;
(55) RCW 82.04.44525 (Credit -- New employment for international
service activities in eligible areas -- Designation of census tracts for
eligibility -- Records -- Tax due upon ineligibility -- Interest assessment--Information from employment security department) and 2009 c 535 s 1104,
2008 c 81 s 9, & 1998 c 313 s 2;
(56) RCW 82.04.447 (Credit -- Natural or manufactured gas purchased
by direct service industrial customers -- Reports) and 2001 c 214 s 9;
(57) RCW 82.04.4482 (Credit -- Sales of electricity or gas to an
aluminum smelter) and 2004 c 24 s 9;
(58) RCW 82.04.4486 (Credit -- Syrup taxes paid by buyer) and 2006 c
245 s 1;
(59) RCW 82.04.601 (Exemptions -- Affixing stamp services for
cigarette sales) and 2007 c 221 s 5;
(60) RCW 82.62.030 (Allowance of tax credits -- Limitations) and 2007
c 485 s 3, 2001 c 320 s 13, 1999 c 164 s 306, 1997 c 366 s 5, 1996 c 1
s 3, & 1986 c 116 s 17;
(61) RCW 82.04.340 (Exemptions -- Boxing, sparring, or wrestling
matches) and 2000 c 103 s 6, 1988 c 19 s 4, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.340;
(62) RCW 82.04.424 (Exemptions -- Certain in-state activities) and
2003 c 76 s 2;
(63) RCW 82.04.4272 (Deductions -- Direct mail delivery charges) and
2005 c 514 s 114;
(64) RCW 82.04.4285 (Deductions -- Motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel taxes) and 1998 c 176 s 3 & 1980 c 37 s 6;
(65) RCW 82.04.43391 (Deductions -- Commercial aircraft loan interest
and fees) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 112;
(66) RCW 82.04.540 (Professional employer organizations -- Taxable
under RCW 82.04.290(2) -- Deduction) and 2006 c 301 s 1;
(67) RCW 82.04.645 (Exemptions -- Financial institutions -- Amounts
received from certain affiliated persons) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s
110;
(68) RCW 82.04.650 (Exemptions -- Investment conduits and
securitization entities) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 111;
(69) RCW 82.04.410 (Exemptions -- Hatching eggs and poultry) and 1967
ex.s. c 149 s 15 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.410;
(70) RCW 82.04.339 (Exemptions -- Day care provided by churches) and
1992 c 81 s 1;
(71) RCW 82.04.3395 (Exemptions -- Child care resource and referral
services by nonprofit organizations) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 3;
(72) RCW 82.04.363 (Exemptions -- Camp or conference center -- Items
sold or furnished by nonprofit organization) and 2009 c 535 s 409 &
1997 c 388 s 1;
(73) RCW 82.04.3651 (Exemptions -- Amounts received by nonprofit
organizations for fund-raising activities) and 2010 c 106 s 208, 1999
c 358 s 3, & 1998 c 336 s 2;
(74) RCW 82.04.367 (Exemptions -- Nonprofit organizations that are
guarantee agencies, issue debt, or provide guarantees for student
loans) and 1998 c 324 s 1 & 1987 c 433 s 1;
(75) RCW 82.04.368 (Exemptions -- Nonprofit organizations -- Credit and
debt services) and 1993 c 390 s 1;
(76) RCW 82.04.370 (Exemptions -- Certain fraternal and beneficiary
organizations) and 1961 c 293 s 4 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.370;
(77) RCW 82.04.380 (Exemptions -- Certain corporations furnishing aid
and relief) and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.380;
(78) RCW 82.04.385 (Exemptions -- Operation of sheltered workshops)
and 1988 c 176 s 915, 1988 c 13 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 134 s 1, & 1970 ex.s.
c 81 s 3;
(79) RCW 82.04.395 (Exemptions -- Certain materials printed in school
district and educational service district printing facilities) and 1979
ex.s. c 196 s 12;
(80) RCW 82.04.397 (Exemptions -- Certain materials printed in
county, city, or town printing facilities) and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 14;
(81) RCW 82.04.399 (Exemptions -- Sales of academic transcripts) and
1996 c 272 s 1;
(82) RCW 82.04.408 (Exemptions -- Housing finance commission) and
1983 c 161 s 25;
(83) RCW 82.04.415 (Exemptions -- Sand, gravel and rock taken from
county or city pits or quarries, processing and handling costs) and
1965 ex.s. c 173 s 10;
(84) RCW 82.04.418 (Exemptions -- Grants by United States government
to municipal corporations or political subdivisions) and 1983 1st ex.s.
c 66 s 2;
(85) RCW 82.04.419 (Exemptions -- County, city, town, school
district, or fire district activity) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 3;
(86) RCW 82.04.4201 (Exemptions -- Sales/leasebacks by regional
transit authorities) and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 24;
(87) RCW 82.04.4251 (Exemptions -- Convention and tourism promotion)
and 2006 c 310 s 1;
(88) RCW 82.04.4282 (Deductions -- Fees, dues, charges) and 2009 c
535 s 410, 1994 c 124 s 3, 1989 c 392 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 3;
(89) RCW 82.04.4291 (Deductions -- Compensation received by a
political subdivision from another political subdivision for services
taxable under RCW 82.04.290) and 1980 c 37 s 11;
(90) RCW 82.04.4293 (Deductions -- Interest on obligations of the
state, its political subdivisions, and municipal corporations) and 1980
c 37 s 13;
(91) RCW 82.04.432 (Deductions -- Municipal sewer service fees or
charges) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 17;
(92) RCW 82.04.4322 (Deductions -- Artistic or cultural
organization -- Compensation from United States, state, etc., for
artistic or cultural exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981
c 140 s 1;
(93) RCW 82.04.4324 (Deductions -- Artistic or cultural
organization -- Deduction for tax under RCW 82.04.240 -- Value of articles
for use in displaying art objects or presenting artistic or cultural
exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981 c 140 s 2;
(94) RCW 82.04.4326 (Deductions -- Artistic or cultural
organizations -- Tuition charges for attending artistic or cultural
education programs) and 1981 c 140 s 3;
(95) RCW 82.04.4327 (Deductions -- Artistic and cultural
organizations -- Income from business activities) and 1985 c 471 s 6;
(96) RCW 82.04.4332 (Deductions -- Tuition fees of foreign degree-granting institutions) and 1993 c 181 s 10;
(97) RCW 82.04.434 (Credit -- Public safety standards and testing)
and 1991 c 13 s 1;
(98) RCW 82.04.600 (Exemptions -- Materials printed in county, city,
town, school district, educational service district, library or library
district) and 1979 ex.s. c 266 s 8;
(99) RCW 82.04.610 (Exemptions -- Import or export commerce) and 2007
c 477 s 2;
(100) RCW 82.04.615 (Exemptions -- Certain limited purpose public
corporations, commissions, and authorities) and 2007 c 381 s 1;
(101) RCW 82.04.335 (Exemptions -- Agricultural fairs) and 1965 ex.s.
c 145 s 1;
(102) RCW 82.04.338 (Exemptions -- Hop commodity commission or hop
commodity board business) and 1998 c 200 s 1;
(103) RCW 82.04.394 (Exemptions -- Amounts received by property
management company for on-site personnel) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s
1202, 2010 c 106 s 209, & 1998 c 338 s 2;
(104) RCW 82.04.4271 (Deductions -- Membership fees and certain
service fees by nonprofit youth organization) and 1981 c 74 s 1;
(105) RCW 82.04.640 (Exemptions -- Washington vaccine association--Certain assessments received) and 2010 c 174 s 16;
(106) RCW 82.04.4298 (Deductions -- Repair, maintenance, replacement,
etc., of residential structures and commonly held property -- Eligible
organizations) and 1980 c 37 s 18;
(107) RCW 82.04.324 (Exemptions -- Qualifying blood, tissue, or blood
and tissue banks) and 2004 c 82 s 1 & 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3;
(108) RCW 82.04.326 (Exemptions -- Qualified organ procurement
organizations) and 2002 c 113 s 1;
(109) RCW 82.04.327 (Exemptions -- Adult family homes) and 1987 1st
ex.s. c 4 s 1;
(110) RCW 82.04.355 (Exemptions -- Ride sharing) and 1999 c 358 s 8
& 1979 c 111 s 17;
(111) RCW 82.04.4263 (Exemptions -- Income received by the life
sciences discovery fund authority) and 2005 c 424 s 11;
(112) RCW 82.04.4264 (Exemptions -- Nonprofit boarding homes -- Room
and domiciliary care) and 2005 c 514 s 301;
(113) RCW 82.04.4265 (Exemptions -- Comprehensive cancer centers) and
2005 c 514 s 401;
(114) RCW 82.04.4289 (Exemption -- Compensation for patient services
or attendant sales of drugs dispensed pursuant to prescription by
certain nonprofit organizations) and 2003 c 168 s 402, 1998 c 325 s 1,
1993 c 492 s 305, 1981 c 178 s 2, & 1980 c 37 s 10;
(115) RCW 82.04.4297 (Deductions -- Compensation from public entities
for health or social welfare services -- Exception) and 2002 c 314 s 3,
2001 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 2, 1988 c 67 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 17;
(116) RCW 82.04.4311 (Deductions -- Compensation received under the
federal medicare program by certain hospitals or health centers) and
2005 c 86 s 1 & 2002 c 314 s 2;
(117) RCW 82.04.4337 (Deductions -- Certain amounts received by
boarding homes) and 2004 c 174 s 7;
(118) RCW 82.04.620 (Exemptions -- Certain prescription drugs) and
2007 c 447 s 1; and
(119) RCW 82.04.635 (Exemptions -- Nonprofits providing legal
services to low-income persons) and 2009 c 508 s 1.

PART III - Eliminating Municipal Business and Occupation Taxes
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2013, a city may not impose a business and
occupation tax or other gross receipts tax. This section does not
apply to the utility taxes listed in RCW 35.102.020.

PART IV - Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 116 of
this act constitute a new title in the Revised Code of Washington, to
be codified as Title 82A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 EFFECTIVE DATE. Except for sections 102,
108, and 201 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 102, 108, and
201 of this act take effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---