BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 13.40.005 (Juvenile disposition standards commission--Abolished -- References to commission -- Transfer of powers, duties, and
functions) and 1995 c 269 s 301;
(2) RCW 9.94A.850 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Established--Powers and duties) and 2009 c 375 s 8, 2009 c 28 s 17, & 2005 c 282 s
19;
(3) RCW 9.94A.863 (Monetary threshold amounts of property crimes--Review -- Report) and 2009 c 431 s 2;
(4) RCW 9.94A.8672 (Sex offender policy board -- Establishment) and
2008 c 249 s 2;
(5) RCW 9.94A.8673 (Sex offender policy board -- Membership) and 2008
c 249 s 3;
(6) RCW 9.94A.8675 (Sex offender policy board -- Authority) and 2008
c 249 s 5; and
(7) RCW 72.09.350 (Corrections mental health center -- Collaborative
arrangement with University of Washington -- Services for mentally ill
offenders -- Annual report to the legislature) and 1993 c 459 s 1.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.860 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 311 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The sentencing guidelines commission is hereby created as
provided in this section. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.875, the
commission is advisory only and may only advise the governor and the
legislature as deemed necessary by the governor and the legislature.
(2) The commission consists of twenty voting members, one of whom
the governor shall designate as chairperson. With the exception of ex
officio voting members, the voting members of the commission shall be
appointed by the governor, or his or her designee, subject to
confirmation by the senate.
(((2))) (3) The voting membership consists of the following:
(a) The head of the state agency having general responsibility for
adult correction programs, as an ex officio member;
(b) The director of financial management or designee, as an ex
officio member;
(c) The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board, as an ex
officio member;
(d) The head of the state agency, or the agency head's designee,
having responsibility for juvenile corrections programs, as an ex
officio member;
(e) Two prosecuting attorneys;
(f) Two attorneys with particular expertise in defense work;
(g) Four persons who are superior court judges;
(h) One person who is the chief law enforcement officer of a county
or city;
(i) Four members of the public who are not prosecutors, defense
attorneys, judges, or law enforcement officers, one of whom is a victim
of crime or a crime victims' advocate;
(j) One person who is an elected official of a county government,
other than a prosecuting attorney or sheriff;
(k) One person who is an elected official of a city government;
(l) One person who is an administrator of juvenile court services.
In making the appointments, the governor shall endeavor to assure
that the commission membership includes adequate representation and
expertise relating to both the adult criminal justice system and the
juvenile justice system. In making the appointments, the governor
shall seek the recommendations of Washington prosecutors in respect to
the prosecuting attorney members, of the Washington state bar
association in respect to the defense attorney members, of the
association of superior court judges in respect to the members who are
judges, of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in
respect to the member who is a law enforcement officer, of the
Washington state association of counties in respect to the member who
is a county official, of the association of Washington cities in
respect to the member who is a city official, of the office of crime
victims advocacy and other organizations of crime victims in respect to
the member who is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate, and
of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators in
respect to the member who is an administrator of juvenile court
services.
(((3))) (4)(a) All voting members of the commission, except ex
officio voting members, shall serve terms of three years and until
their successors are appointed and confirmed.
(b) The governor shall stagger the terms of the members appointed
under subsection (((2))) (3)(j), (k), and (l) of this section by
appointing one of them for a term of one year, one for a term of two
years, and one for a term of three years.
(((4))) (5) The speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate may each appoint two nonvoting members to the
commission, one from each of the two largest caucuses in each house.
The members so appointed shall serve two-year terms, or until they
cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed,
whichever occurs first.
(((5))) (6) The members of the commission ((shall)) may not be
reimbursed for travel expenses ((as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060)). Legislative members ((shall)) may not be reimbursed by
their respective houses ((as provided under RCW 44.04.120)). Members
((shall be)) are not compensated ((in accordance with RCW 43.03.250)).
(7) The commission may meet if a meeting is called by the governor
and the legislature and only for such purposes as determined by the
governor and the legislature.
(8) The administrative office of the courts must serve as a
clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation,
analysis, and dissemination of information on:
(a) State and local adult sentencing practices; and
(b) Juveniles sentenced as adults.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(2) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must be sent a completed copy of the judgment and
sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under
subsection (1) of this section and shall compile a yearly and
cumulative judicial record of each sentencing judge in regards to his
or her sentencing practices for any and all felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must compare each individual judge's sentencing
practices to the standard or presumptive sentence range for any and all
felony crimes listed in subsection (2) of this section for the
appropriate offense level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518,
offender score as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly
weapon enhancements as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both.
These comparative records shall be retained and made available to the
public for review in a current, newly created or reworked official
published document by the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
administrative office of the courts.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the ((sentencing
guidelines commission)) administrative office of the courts as required
in subsection (2) of this section, the ((sentencing guidelines
commission shall have)) administrative office of the courts has the
authority and ((shall)) must undertake reasonable and necessary steps
to assure that all past, current, and future sentencing documents as
defined in subsection (1) of this section are received by the
((sentencing guidelines commission)) administrative office of the
courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.50.010 and 2010 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombudsman,
the department of social and health services and its contracting
agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having
children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight
committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(b) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the
juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(c) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the
case;
(d) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the
records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
administrative office of the courts records needed for its research and
data-gathering functions ((under RCW 9.94A.850 and other statutes)).
Access to records or information for research purposes shall be
permitted only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records
or information will be preserved. Each person granted permission to
inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes
shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names
of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
((sentencing guidelines commission under RCW 9.94A.850)) administrative
office of the courts upon request. The commission shall not disclose
the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without
the named individual's written permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.74501 and 2001 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) department of
corrections must serve as the state council for interstate adult
offender supervision as required under article IV of RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. ((To assist the
commission in performing its functions as the state council, the
department of corrections shall provide staffing and support
services.)) The ((commission)) department of corrections may form a
subcommittee, including members representing the legislative, judicial,
and executive branches of state government, and victims' groups((, and
the secretary of corrections,)) to perform the functions of the state
council. Any such subcommittee shall include representation of both
houses and at least two of the four largest political caucuses in the
legislature.
(2) The ((commission,)) department of corrections or a subcommittee
if formed for that purpose, shall:
(a) Review department of corrections operations and procedures
under RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend policies to the compact
administrator, including policies to be pursued in the administrator's
capacity as the state's representative on the interstate commission
created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745; and
(b) Report annually to the legislature on interstate supervision
operations and procedures under RCW 9.94A.745, including
recommendations for policy changes((; and
(c) Not later than December 1, 2004, report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of its functioning as the state council under article
IV of RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend any legislation it deems
appropriate)).
(3) The ((commission, or a subcommittee if formed for that purpose,
shall)) department of corrections must appoint ((one of its members,
or)) an employee of the ((department designated by the secretary))
department of corrections, or a subcommittee if formed for that purpose
shall appoint one of its members, to represent the state at meetings of
the interstate commission created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745
when the compact administrator cannot attend.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.855 and 2005 c 282 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission shall)) administrative office of the courts must
appoint a research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient
resources to accomplish its duties. The ((commission)) administrative
office of the courts may request from ((the office of financial
management, the indeterminate sentence review board, the administrative
office of the courts,)) the department of corrections((,)) and the
department of social and health services such data, information, and
data processing assistance as it may need to accomplish its duties, and
such services shall be provided without cost to the ((commission))
administrative office of the courts. ((The commission shall adopt its
own bylaws.
The salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be
fixed by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.))

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.52.025 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to
commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters
or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.
(2) Residential burglary is a class B felony. In establishing
sentencing guidelines and disposition standards, ((the sentencing
guidelines commission and the juvenile disposition standards commission
shall consider)) residential burglary ((as)) is to be considered a more
serious offense than second degree burglary.

Sec. 8 RCW 10.98.140 and 1987 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial
management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal
justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies
shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state
criminal justice forecasting.
(2) The office of financial management shall be the official state
agency for the sentenced felon jail forecast. This forecast shall
provide at least a six-year projection and shall be published by
December 1 of every even-numbered year beginning with 1986. The office
of financial management shall seek advice regarding the assumptions in
the forecast from criminal justice agencies and associations.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission shall)) administrative
office of the courts must keep records on all sentencings above or
below the standard range defined by chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum,
the records shall include the name of the offender, the crimes for
which the offender was sentenced, the name and county of the sentencing
judge, and the deviation from the standard range. Such records shall
be made available to public officials upon request.

Sec. 9 RCW 10.98.160 and 2005 c 282 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions,
and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office
of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall
consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the
administrative office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies,
local jails, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the
indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting
attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial
management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice
issues. The Washington integrated justice information board shall
review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the
courts for development and modification of the statewide justice
information network.

Sec. 10 RCW 72.66.016 and 1983 c 255 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A furlough shall not be granted to a resident if the furlough
would commence prior to the time the resident has served the minimum
amounts of time provided under this section:
(a) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is longer than
twelve months, he or she shall have served at least six months of the
term;
(b) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is less than twelve
months, he or she shall have served at least ninety days and shall have
no longer than six months left to serve on his or her minimum term;
(c) If he or she is serving a mandatory minimum term of
confinement, he or she shall have served all but the last six months of
such term.
(2) A person convicted and sentenced for a violent offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 is not eligible for furlough until the person
has served at least one-half of the minimum term as established by the
((board of prison terms and paroles or the sentencing guidelines
commission)) indeterminate sentence review board.

--- END ---