BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to establish a
more competitive environment and to provide assurances to state
agencies that they are receiving a competitive price by allowing the
solicitation of bids from the public printer and from private vendors
for all jobs that require the services of a print shop.
The legislature intends to enable the public printer to compete
effectively by eliminating price caps that make it difficult to recover
its production costs, thereby permitting it to set its own prices for
individual jobs with the overall goal of achieving long-term financial
stability, better utilization of taxpayer resources, and value for the
state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.78.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 927 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The public printer shall print and bind the session laws, the
journals of the two houses of the legislature, all bills, resolutions,
documents, and other printing and binding of either the senate or
house, as ((the same)) may be ordered by the legislature; and such
forms, blanks, record books, and printing and binding ((of every
description)) as may be ordered by ((all state officers, boards,
commissions, and institutions, and)) the supreme court((,)) and the
court of appeals ((and officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on
requisition, from time to time, by the proper authorities)). This
section shall not apply to the printing of the supreme court and the
court of appeals reports((,)) or to the printing of bond certificates
or bond offering disclosure documents((, to the printing of educational
publications of the state historical societies, or to any printing done
or contracted for by institutions of higher education: PROVIDED, That
institutions of higher education, in consultation with the public
printer, develop vendor selection procedures comparable to those used
by the public printer for contracted printing jobs. Where any
institution or institution of higher learning of the state is or may
become equipped with facilities for doing such work, it may do any
printing: (1) For itself, or (2) for any other state institution when
such printing is done as part of a course of study relative to the
profession of printer. Any printing and binding of whatever
description as may be needed by any institution or agency of the state
department of social and health services not at Olympia, or the supreme
court or the court of appeals or any officer thereof, the estimated
cost of which shall not exceed one thousand dollars, may be done by any
private printing company in the general vicinity within the state of
Washington so ordering, if in the judgment of the officer of the agency
so ordering, the saving in time and processing justifies the award to
such local private printing concern.
Beginning on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limit specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limit by adjusting the previous biennium's limit by an
appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of inflation
for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to the
nearest fifty dollars.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply
to pilot printing projects authorized by the office of financial
management to allow state agencies and institutions to directly acquire
printing services)).
(2) State agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of higher
education requiring the services of a print shop may use the public
printer. If a print job is put out for bid, the public printer must be
included in the bid solicitation. All solicitations must be posted on
the state's common vendor registration and bid notification system and
results provided to the public printer. All solicitations must include
the requirement to use recycled copy and printing paper for all jobs
printed on white copy and printing paper as is required of the public
printer in RCW 43.78.170. All bid specifications must require the use
of biodegradable ink.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.78.070 and 2009 c 549 s 5148 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The public printer shall use the state printing plant upon the
following conditions, to wit:
(1) He or she shall do the public printing, and charge therefor the
fees as provided by law. He or she may print the Washington Reports
for the publishers thereof under a contract approved in writing by the
governor.
(2) The gross income of the public printer shall be deposited in an
account designated "state printing plant revolving fund" in
depositaries approved by the state treasurer, and shall be disbursed by
the public printer by check and only as follows:
First, in payment of the actual cost of labor, material, supplies,
replacements, repairs, water, light, heat, telephone, rent, and all
other expenses necessary in the operation of the plant: PROVIDED, That
no machinery shall be purchased except on written approval of the
governor;
Second, in payment of the cost of reasonable insurance upon the
printing plant, payable to the state and of all fidelity bonds required
by law of the public printer;
Third, in payment to the public printer of a salary which shall be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040;
Fourth, in remitting the balance to the state treasurer for the
general fund: PROVIDED, That a reasonable sum to be determined by the
governor, the public printer, and the director of financial management
shall be retained in the fund for working capital for the public
printer.)) (1) The public printer must use the state printing plant and
charge fees as provided by law. Any machinery purchased must have
written approval of the governor.
(2) The public printer may print the Washington Reports for the
publishers under a contract approved in writing by the governor.
(3) The public printer shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor
in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public printing revolving account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from public printing must be
deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the administrative and operating purposes related to public
printing. Only the public printer or the public printer's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(2) Receipts remaining in the account after expenses, plus a
reasonable sum for working capital, as determined by the governor, the
public printer, and the director of financial management, shall be
deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.78.080 and 1972 ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
All printing, ruling, binding, and other work done or supplies
furnished by the state printing plant ((for the various state
departments, commissions, institutions, boards, and officers)) shall be
paid for on an actual cost basis as determined from a standard cost
finding system to be maintained by the state printing plant. ((In no
event shall the price charged the various state departments,
commissions, institutions, boards, and officers exceed those
established by the Porte Publishing Company's Franklin Printing
Catalogue for similar and comparable work. All bills for printing,
ruling, binding, and other work done or for supplies furnished by the
state printing plant shall be certified and sworn to by the public
printer.
The public printing shall be divided into the following classes:
FIRST CLASS. The bills, resolutions, and other matters that may be
ordered by the legislature, or either branch thereof, in bill form,
shall constitute the first class, and shall be printed in such form as
the legislature shall provide.
SECOND CLASS. The second class shall consist of printing and
binding of journals of the senate and house of representatives, and the
annual and biennial reports of the several state officers, state
commissions, boards, and institutions, with the exception of the
reports of the attorney general and the governor's message to the
legislature, which shall be printed and bound in the same style as
heretofore. Said journals and reports shall be printed in such form as
the senate and house of representatives and the various state officers,
commissions, boards, and institutions shall respectively provide.
THIRD CLASS. The third class shall consist of all reports,
communications, and all other documents that may be ordered printed in
book form by the legislature or either branch thereof, and all reports,
books, pamphlets, and other like matter printed in book form required
by all state officers, boards, commissions, and institutions shall be
printed in such form and style, and set in such size type, and printed
on such grade of paper as may be desired by the state officer, board,
commission, or institution ordering them, and which they think will
best serve the purpose for which intended.
FOURTH CLASS. The fourth class shall consist of the session laws,
and shall be printed and bound in such form as the statute law
committee shall provide.
FIFTH CLASS. The fifth class shall consist of the printing of all
stationery blanks, record books, and circulars, and all printing and
binding required by the respective state officers, boards, commissions,
and institutions not covered by classes one, two, three, and four.))
The public printer must update its budgeted hourly rate model, as
needed, to accurately reflect its operational costs.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.78.100 and 1993 c 379 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public printer shall furnish all paper, stock, and binding
materials required in all public work, and shall charge the same to the
state, as it is actually used, at the actual price at which it was
purchased plus up to five percent for waste, insurance, storage, and
handling. This section does not apply to institutions of higher
education.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.78.110 and 2009 c 486 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever in the judgment of the public printer certain
printing, ruling, binding, or supplies can be secured from private
sources more economically than by doing the work or preparing the
supplies in the state printing plant, the public printer may obtain
such work or supplies from such private sources. The bid solicitation
((for the contract opportunity)) must be posted ((on the state's common
vendor registration and bid)) to the public printer vendor notification
system. The public printer shall develop procurement policies and
procedures, such as unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that
encourage and facilitate the purchase of such services or supplies from
Washington small businesses to the maximum extent practicable and
consistent with international trade agreement commitments.
(2) In the event any work or supplies are secured on behalf of the
state under this section, the ((state printing plant shall be entitled
to)) public printer may add up to five percent to the cost ((thereof))
to cover the handling of the orders ((which shall be added to the bills
and charged to the respective authorities ordering the work or
supplies. The five percent handling charge shall not apply to
contracts with institutions of higher education)).
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(b) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To reduce duplication of services, streamline the coordination
and management of printing services for the state, and minimize long-term costs, state agencies and institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 with in-house print shops must consolidate
printing equipment and staff with the public printer. Some excess
capacity is permitted at the public printer to accommodate normal
fluctuations in demand.
(2) This section does not apply to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
To improve the efficiency and minimize the costs of agency-based
printing, the office shall establish rules and guidelines for all
agencies to use in managing their printing operations, including both
agency-based printing and those jobs that require the services of a
print shop, as based on the successes of implementation of existing
print management programs in state agencies. At a minimum, the rules
and guidelines must implement managed print strategies to track,
manage, and reduce agency-based printing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The office of financial management must
determine which agencies have print shops and shall prepare proposed
legislation by November 15, 2011, to transfer the print shop personnel,
equipment, and activities of state agencies and institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 to the public printer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
By November 1, 2016, building on the findings of the 2011 audit,
the state auditor shall conduct a comprehensive performance audit of
state printing services in accordance with RCW 43.09.470. Following
the audit in 2016, the state auditor shall conduct follow-up audits as
deemed necessary to ensure effective implementation of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.300.040 and 2009 c 556 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of
consulting educational service district superintendents or other school
officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be made
available online and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to public and nonpublic
agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW,
rules related to the common schools, and such other matter as the state
superintendent or the state board of education shall determine((.
Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to the public
printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account within the
state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount));
(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies
that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to
encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for
physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;
(16) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2010 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An institution of higher education may exercise
independently those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education.
(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the
department of general administration.
(c) Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of
higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and
43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917,
43.19.1937, 43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and
43.19.560 through 43.19.637.
(d) Purchases under chapter 39.29, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by
institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for
materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into
by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.
(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450.
(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350.
(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily
demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that
the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any
of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW
43.19.685, 43.19.534, and 43.19.637.
(h) Any institution of higher education that chooses to exercise
independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of
commodities shall notify the director of general administration.
Thereafter the director of general administration shall not be required
to provide those services for that institution for the duration of the
general administration contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(5) ((An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.))
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 1.08.039 (Publication, sale, and distribution of code and
supplements -- Contracts or other arrangements) and 1955 c 235 s 8 & 1953
c 257 s 12;
(2) RCW 15.24.085 (Promotional printing not restricted by public
printer laws) and 2002 c 313 s 121 & 1961 c 11 s 15.24.085;
(3) RCW 15.62.190 (Promotional printing and literature -- Exempt from
public printing requirements) and 1989 c 5 s 19;
(4) RCW 16.67.170 (Promotional printing not restricted by public
printer laws) and 1969 c 133 s 16;
(5) RCW 43.78.020 (Bond) and 2009 c 549 s 5147 & 1965 c 8 s
43.78.020; and
(6) RCW 43.78.090 (Reprinting) and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.090.

--- END ---