BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote safe state correctional facilities. Following the tragic
murder of officer Jayme Biendl, the governor and department of
corrections requested the national institute of corrections to review
safety procedures at the Monroe reformatory. While the report found
the Monroe reformatory is a safe institution, it recommends changes
that would enhance safety. The legislature recognizes that operating
safe institutions requires ongoing efforts including collective
bargaining to address areas where improvements can be made to enhance
the safety of state correctional facilities. This act addresses ways
to increase safety at state correctional facilities and implements
changes recommended in the report of the national institute of
corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department shall establish a
statewide security advisory committee to conduct comprehensive reviews
of the department's total confinement security-related policies and
procedures.
(2) The statewide security advisory committee shall make
recommendations to the secretary regarding methods to provide
consistent application of the policies and procedures regarding
security issues in total confinement correctional facilities.
(3) The statewide security advisory committee shall include a
balance of institutional staff including, but not limited to, custody
staff. At a minimum, the statewide security advisory committee shall
include:
(a) The director of prisons or his or her designee;
(b) A nonsupervisory classified employee and/or sergeant from each
local advisory committee of a major facility and one nonsupervisory
classified employee and/or sergeant representative from a minimum
facility;
(c) A senior-ranking security custody staff member from each major
correctional facility and a senior-ranking custody staff member from a
minimum correctional facility;
(d) A senior ranking community corrections officer; and
(e) A delegate from the union that represents department employees
located at correctional facilities.
(4) The statewide security advisory committee shall develop
guidelines to establish local security advisory committees for each
total confinement correctional facility within the department. The
chair of each local security advisory committee shall be the captain at
a major facility and the lieutenant at a minimum security facility.
The local security advisory committee should consist of a wide range of
nonsupervisory classified employees and/or sergeants from the facility,
such as medical staff, class counselors, program staff, and mental
health staff.
(5) The department shall report back to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2011, and
annually thereafter. The report shall include:
(a) Recommendations raised by either the statewide or local
security advisory committees;
(b) Actions taken by the department as a result of recommendations
by the statewide security advisory committee; and
(c) Recommendations for additional resources or legislation to
address security concerns in total confinement correctional facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall establish
multidisciplinary teams at each total confinement correctional facility
that will evaluate offenders' placements in inmate job assignments and
custody promotions. The teams at each facility shall determine
suitable placements based on the offender's risk, behavior, or other
factors considered by the team.
(2) At a minimum, each team shall have representation from a wide
range of nonsupervisory classified employees and sergeants from the
facility, such as medical staff, class counselors, program staff, and
mental health staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall develop training
curriculum regarding staff safety issues at total confinement
correctional facilities. At a minimum, the training shall address the
following issues:
(a) Security routines;
(b) Physical plant layout;
(c) Offender movement and program area coverage; and
(d) Situational awareness and de-escalation techniques.
(2) The department shall seek the input of both the statewide
security and local advisory committees in developing the curriculum.
(3) The department shall deliver such training to applicable
correctional staff at in-service training by July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department may pilot the use of body
alarms and proximity cards within available resources.
(2) The department shall hire a consultant to study the feasibility
of implementing a statewide system for staff safety, utilizing body
alarms and proximity cards for staff within the department's total
confinement correctional facilities and report findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2011. At a minimum, the report shall
include:
(a) Recommendations for the use of body alarms by security level;
(b) Recommendations for specific positions that should require the
use of body alarms;
(c) The information technological and infrastructure requirements
needed for body alarms and proximity cards;
(d) The training requirements for body alarms;
(e) Lessons learned from any pilot project the department may
implement in the interim;
(f) The estimated cost of the alarms and proximity cards and needed
supporting infrastructure, staffing, and training requirements.
(3) The consultant shall seek the input of both the statewide and
local security advisory committees in preparing his or her report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall hire a consultant
to study the deployment of video monitoring cameras within the
department to make recommendations regarding statewide standards for
the positioning and use of video monitoring cameras in total
confinement correctional facilities and report findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2011. At a minimum, the report shall
include:
(a) Recommendations for the use of video monitoring cameras by
security level;
(b) Recommendations for specific locations within a total
confinement correctional facility which would benefit from the use of
video monitoring cameras;
(c) The information technological and infrastructure requirements
needed for effective use of video monitoring cameras;
(d) Recommendations for how video monitoring cameras would best be
deployed in current total confinement correctional facilities;
(e) Recommendations about how video monitoring cameras should be
incorporated into future prison construction to insure consistency in
camera use system-wide;
(f) The estimated cost of the video monitoring cameras, supporting
infrastructure needed, and staffing required by the total confinement
correctional facility.
(2) The consultant shall seek the input of both the statewide and
local security advisory committees in preparing his or her report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall develop a
comprehensive plan for the use of oleoresin capsicum aerosol products,
commonly referred to as pepper spray, as a security measure available
for staff at total confinement correctional facilities.
(2) The department may initiate a pilot project, within available
funds, to expand the deployment of oleoresin capsicum aerosol products
within total confinement correctional facilities.
(3) The department's plan for the deployment of oleoresin capsicum
aerosol products to staff shall include findings, if any, from the
pilot project, recommendations regarding which facility's use should be
limited to, what the training requirements should be, the estimated
costs, and an implementation schedule.
(4) The department shall seek the input of both the statewide and
local security advisory committees in developing its plan.
(5) The department shall report its plan, including costs, to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 72.09 RCW.

--- END ---