BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
ESTABLISHING THE WASHINGTON ECONOMIC PROSPERITY BANK
MISSION, OBJECTIVES, POWERS, DEFINITIONS, GOVERNANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The Washington economic prosperity
bank is established as an agency of state government. Within
constitutional and statutory parameters, the bank's mission is to:
(a) Finance Washington businesses and public infrastructure in
order to promote economic growth, revitalize communities, encourage a
healthy jobs climate, and enhance the quality of life for the state's
residents; and
(b) Increase the effective, efficient, and accountable use of state
resources by decreasing the number of state agencies and programs
authorized to finance businesses and public infrastructure.
(2) The bank's objectives are to:
(a) Act as a clearinghouse that provides a single point of decision
making and accountability for allocating major economic development
grant and loan funds;
(b) Reduce state staff, operational costs, and inefficient
processes by consolidating under one umbrella authority the autonomous
public infrastructure and business programs that are currently
dispersed under management of several agencies;
(c) Achieve economies of scale, including potential decreases in
interest rates attached to public and private projects;
(d) Streamline access to financing information by standardizing
application processes and evaluation criteria, and consolidating
sources of information, including web sites; and
(e) Increase access to capital for Washington businesses and public
infrastructure.
(3) The bank is authorized to:
(a) Operate as the state's single financing authority for
businesses and public infrastructure;
(b) Issue taxable and tax-exempt revenue bonds, make loans or
grants, and leverage state and federal funds; and
(c) Provide a means for the state, for public benefit, to buy
public debt and sell it to public entities, as well as to refinance the
debt of the state and its political subdivisions.
(4) In addition to other powers specified in this chapter, the bank
may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments,
with any public or private person or entity, in accordance with this
chapter and the state Constitution;
(c) Solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations, or contributions
from any federal, state, local governmental agency or program, or any
private source, and expend the same for any purpose consistent with
this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW; and
(e) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bank" means the Washington economic prosperity bank created in
this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the bank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The bank shall be governed by a five
member board of directors: The governor; the lieutenant governor; the
state auditor; the attorney general; and the state treasurer, who shall
serve as board chair.
(2) The board shall:
(a) Establish an advisory council of financial experts and appoint
its members;
(b) Appoint the bank's officers and evaluate their performance;
(c) Set objectives and common criteria for allocating the bank's
resources based upon legislative direction, best practices,
maximization of benefits to the state at a prudent level of risk, and
creation of long-term value for the state;
(d) Make final decisions on allocation of its resources among
funding programs under its management; and
(e) Communicate its decisions and rationale to the legislature and
the public.
(3)(a) The board shall appoint a five member advisory council.
Each council candidate must have experience in finance, banking, or
budget and demonstrate a statewide perspective regarding economic
prosperity. At least four board members must vote affirmatively to
confirm each candidate as an advisory councilmember. Advisory
councilmembers serve at the pleasure of the board.
(b) As authority to make funding decisions under an existing
program is transferred to the bank pursuant to section 201 of this act,
the board shall appoint the transferred program's current executive
director or board chair to one of the five positions on the advisory
council. The appointment must remain in effect until either one
funding cycle has been completed under the bank's management, or the
board determines that the transfer of the program to the bank has
otherwise been completed, whichever occurs first.
(c) The advisory council shall:
(i) Develop and recommend to the board common criteria for
evaluating applications for the funding programs under the bank's
management;
(ii) Make recommendations to the board on which applications to
approve for funding; and
(iii) Develop and recommend to the board contractual policies and
procedures.
(d) Members of the advisory council are entitled to reimbursement
for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this
chapter, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The board may delegate some of its functions to the chair and
to the bank president. However, board members may not delegate their
final decision-making authority or their attendance at meetings.
Members may participate in a meeting by conference telephone or similar
electronic communications equipment so that all persons participating
in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. Participation by
that method constitutes presence in person at a meeting.
(5) The board may adopt policies and procedures for its own
governance.
(6) The board may establish expert ad hoc technical advisory
committees to assist in evaluating applications for bank funding. The
board may, and is encouraged to, draw these experts from boards and
agencies that previously managed the relevant funding programs. The
board may also establish technical advisory committees or consult with
public and private sector experts in substantive areas related to the
bank's mission, objectives, and duties.
(7)(a)(i) The board shall appoint a bank president and other
officers, all of whom must have demonstrated experience in finance,
banking, or budget. The officers are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW. The officers shall serve at the board's pleasure,
on such terms and conditions as the board determines, but subject to
chapter 42.52 RCW.
(ii) The officers shall provide support to the board and the
advisory council, carry out bank policies and programs, and exercise
additional authority as may be delegated by the board.
(b) Subject to available funding and consistent with board
direction, the bank president:
(i) May employ such additional personnel as are necessary to the
bank's operations. This employment shall be in accordance with the
state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(ii) May contract with persons who have the technical expertise
needed to carry out a specific, time-limited project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter
does not apply in the Washington economic prosperity bank to its
officers, as provided in section 103(7)(a)(i) of this act.

PART II
PROGRAM TRANSFERS, SIX-YEAR PLAN, ACCOUNTABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) When the bank is provided with the
relevant specific expenditure authority in the enacted operating or the
capital appropriations act, the following business finance programs
will be transitioned from their current agencies to the bank: The life
sciences discovery fund established in chapter 43.350 RCW, and the
energy freedom program established in chapter 43.325 RCW. The
legislature expects that these programs will be fully transferred to
the bank within one year of the bank receiving such expenditure
authority. Until the board determines that the program is fully
transferred to the bank, funding applications must continue to be
evaluated and selected using agency personnel, criteria, policies, and
procedures provided for under the applicable statute authorizing the
program.
(2)(a) Before the commencement of the legislative session
immediately following the legislative session in which the bank is
provided with specific expenditure authority, the board must submit to
the legislature a six-year plan for transferring management authority
for additional business finance programs and public infrastructure
programs to the bank.
(b) To determine which categories, funding sources, and programs to
recommend for transfer, the board must use a quantitative and
qualitative process, including considering whether each transfer will
provide measurable public benefit through expanded investment
opportunities, administrative efficiencies, or other criteria
determined by the board.
(c) The six-year plan must include recommendations for:
(i) Program transfers that would take place within two, four, and
six years of bank operations commencing;
(ii) Management of matching funds, federal funds, legacy accounts,
and any other sources of revenue that would be under the bank's
management;
(iii) Protection of existing bondholder's rights, covenants, and
contracts;
(iv) A timeline within which the bank will achieve fiscal self-sufficiency; and
(v) Statutory or budgetary changes that will increase the bank's
capacity to achieve its mission, objectives, and duties.
(3) To prepare its six-year plan, the board must evaluate, at a
minimum, the following business and public infrastructure fund sources
for transfer to the bank:
(a) The rural Washington loan fund under chapter 43.168 RCW;
(b) The forest products revolving loan fund, managed by the
department of commerce;
(c) The coastal revolving loan fund, managed by the department of
commerce;
(d) HUD section 108 guaranteed loans, managed by the department of
commerce;
(e) Community development block grant float loans, managed by the
department of commerce;
(f) The child care facility revolving fund under RCW 43.31.502;
(g) Industrial revenue bonds, managed by the Washington economic
development finance authority;
(h) The public works trust fund under chapter 43.155 RCW;
(i) Community economic revitalization board loans and grants under
chapter 43.160 RCW;
(j) The centennial clean water program, managed by the department
of ecology;
(k) The freight mobility strategic investment program under chapter
47.06A RCW;
(l) The housing trust fund under RCW 43.185.030;
(m) Housing finance commission programs under chapter 43.180 RCW;
and
(n) Washington wildlife and recreation program grants under chapter
79A.15 RCW.
(4) The legislature may modify the six-year plan submitted by the
bank and direct any program and fund source transfers through
legislation and the operating and capital appropriations budgets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) Beginning December 1, of the year in
which this section takes effect, the bank must report annually to the
legislature on its most recently completed fiscal year's activities and
outcomes and its proposed plans for the upcoming fiscal year. The
report must include: The bank's objectives; the common criteria and
prudent risk definition that it uses to evaluate and select projects;
projects submitted, evaluated, and selected for funding; the size,
scope, and fund sources included in the bank's outstanding portfolio;
outcomes that the bank has achieved including return on investment,
creation of long-term value, and self-funding of bank operations; any
significant staff changes; and any policy or fiscal recommendations for
legislative consideration.
(2) By July 1 ten years after the year in which this section takes
effect, and every ten years thereafter, the joint legislative audit and
review committee must conduct a performance audit to assess the extent
to which implementation and operation of the bank has met the
objectives provided in section 101(2) of this act and to recommend
additional actions to improve the bank's performance and
accountability.
(3) If circumstances require that the bank terminate its
activities, its functions must be transferred to the office of the
state treasurer or to another agency as directed by the legislature.

PART III
FISCAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The Washington economic prosperity
bank account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from legislative appropriations, program transfers, gifts,
grants, donations, sponsorships, contributions, fees, loan repayments,
and interest earnings must be deposited in the account or in such
subaccounts as may be needed to properly manage the bank's various
funds, obligations, and investments; except that, the board shall
determine, in consultation with the office of the state treasurer,
whether maintaining segregated accounts for any of the existing fund
sources transferred to the bank would be beneficial to the state.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used by the bank only for purposes consistent with the
bank's mission, objectives, and duties.
(2) The bank's operational budget is subject to legislative
appropriation until such time as the director of financial management
determines that the bank demonstrates fiscal self-sufficiency.
(3) Whenever any money, from the federal government or other
sources, that was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the bank shall use the unanticipated receipts
process as provided in RCW 43.79.270 to request authority to spend the
money.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS TECHNICAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 42.30.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 33 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or
special meeting:
(a) To consider matters affecting national security;
(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real
estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;
(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be
offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However,
final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid
contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would
cause a likelihood of increased costs;
(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company,
financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the
export trading company;
(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against
a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such
officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public
shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;
(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public
employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However,
subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of
salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally
applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public,
and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting
the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in
a meeting open to the public;
(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment
to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final
action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting
open to the public;
(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters
relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal
counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge
regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.
This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an
executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is
present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential
litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a)
concerning:
(i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to which the
agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity
is, or is likely to become, a party;
(ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be
commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity; or
(iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or current
practice that the agency has identified when public discussion of the
litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency;
(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its
advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment,
and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect
the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic
climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board,
financial and commercial information when the information relates to
the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds
or in private loss to the providers of this information;
(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation
of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;
(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(n) To consider in the case of a health sciences and services
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information; or
(o) To consider in the case of the Washington economic prosperity
bank, the substance of loan or grant applications and awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information.
(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of
a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the
public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session
will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated
later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

Sec. 402 RCW 42.56.270 and 2009 c 394 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce or the office of the governor in connection with
the siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce based on information as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, any work product is not exempt from
disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business, information
described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be available to the public
under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business; ((and))
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; and
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the Washington
economic prosperity bank in applications for loans or grants under
chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 502 of this
act), to the extent that such information, if revealed, would
reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of
this information.

Sec. 403 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2010 sp.s. c 19 s 22, 2010 sp.s. c 13
s 4, 2010 sp.s. c 9 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 4, and 2010 c 215 s 7 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
accessible communities account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving account,
the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative
works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll
collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust
fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance
account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington
global health technologies and product development account, the grain
inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense
fund, the local tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the
produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington economic prosperity bank
account, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners'
bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences discovery
fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced
cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading achievement
account.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 404 RCW 43.325.020 and 2009 c 451 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies except as provided in section 201(1) of
this act.
(2) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(((2))) (3) When reviewing applications submitted under this
program, the director shall consult with those agencies and other
public entities having expertise and knowledge to assess the technical
and business feasibility of the project and probability of success.
These agencies may include, but are not limited to, Washington State
University, the University of Washington, the department of ecology,
the department of natural resources, the department of agriculture, the
department of general administration, local clean air authorities, the
Washington state conservation commission, and the clean energy
leadership council created in section 2, chapter 318, Laws of 2009.
(((3))) (4) Except as provided in subsections (((4))) (5) and
(((5))) (6) of this section, the director, in cooperation with the
department of agriculture, may approve an application only if the
director finds:
(a) The project will convert farm products, wastes, cellulose, or
biogas directly into electricity or biofuel or other coproducts
associated with such conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use feedstocks produced in the state, if
feasible, except this criterion does not apply to the construction of
facilities used to distribute and store fuels that are produced from
farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
43.325.010 and the findings delivered to the director.
(((4))) (5) When reviewing an application for a refueling project,
the coordinator may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if the
director finds:
(a) The project will offer alternative fuels to the motoring
public;
(b) The project does not require continued state support;
(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined
in RCW 43.325.010;
(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately
spaced alternative fuel refueling network along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140; and
(e) The project will result in increased access to alternative
fueling infrastructure for the motoring public along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140.
(((5))) (6) When reviewing an application for energy efficiency
improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative energy
technology, the director may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if
the director finds:
(a) The project or program will result in increased access for the
public, state and local governments, and businesses to energy
efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative
energy technologies;
(b) The project or program demonstrates technical feasibility and
directly assists in moving a commercially viable project into the
marketplace for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The project or program does not require continued state
support; or
(d) The federal government has provided funds with a limited time
frame for use for energy independence and security, energy efficiency,
renewable energy, innovative energy technologies, or conservation.
(((6))) (7)(a) The director may approve a project application for
assistance under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section up to five
million dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance constitute
more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(b) The director may approve a refueling project application for a
grant or a loan under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section up to
fifty thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall a grant or a loan
award constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(((7))) (8) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy or biofuel industry, or a viable energy efficiency, renewable
energy, or innovative energy technology industry. The agreement shall
include provisions to protect the state's investment, including a
requirement that a successful applicant enter into contracts with any
partners that may be involved in the use of any assistance provided
under this program, including services, facilities, infrastructure, or
equipment. Contracts with any partners shall become part of the
application record.
(((8))) (9) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from
operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 405 RCW 43.325.040 and 2009 c 564 s 942 and 2009 c 451 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section applies except as provided in section 201(1) of
this act.
(2) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account and any loan
payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under the
energy freedom account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for financial assistance for further
funding for projects consistent with this chapter or otherwise
authorized by the legislature.
(((2))) (3) The green energy incentive account is created in the
state treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All
receipts from appropriations made to the green energy incentive account
shall be deposited into the account, and may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for:
(a) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(b) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, including grants provided
for the electrification program set forth in RCW 43.325.110; and
(c) Demonstration projects developed with state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and local governments that result in the
design and building of a hydrogen vehicle fueling station.
(((3))) (4)(a) The energy recovery act account is created in the
state treasury. State and federal funds may be deposited into the
account and any loan payments of principal and interest derived from
loans made from the energy recovery act account must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
(b) Expenditures from the account may be used only for loans, loan
guarantees, and grants that encourage the establishment of innovative
and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency
technology, including but not limited to:
(i) Renewable energy projects or programs that require interim
financing to complete project development and implementation;
(ii) Companies with innovative, near-commercial or commercial,
clean energy technology; and
(iii) Energy efficiency technologies that have a viable repayment
stream from reduced utility costs.
(c) The director shall establish policies and procedures for
processing, reviewing, and approving applications for funding under
this section. When developing these policies and procedures, the
department must consider the clean energy leadership strategy developed
under section 2, chapter 318, Laws of 2009.
(d) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the term and rates of funding provided from this
account.
(e) The policies and procedures of this subsection (((3))) (4) do
not apply to assistance awarded for projects under RCW
43.325.020(((3))) (4).
(((4))) (5) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy
freedom account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent
of any funding provided from the energy freedom account for
administrative overhead or other deductions not directly associated
with conducting the research, projects, or other end products that the
funding is designed to produce unless this provision is waived in
writing by the director.
(((5))) (6) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not
a state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is
prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding
provided from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or
other deductions not directly associated with conducting the research,
projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to
produce.
(((6))) (7) Subsections (((2), (4) and (5))) (3), (5), and (6) of
this section do not apply to assistance awarded for projects under RCW
43.325.020(((3))) (4).
(((7))) (8) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the energy freedom account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 406 RCW 43.325.050 and 2009 c 518 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 201(1) of this act, the director
shall report to the legislature and governor on the status of the
energy freedom program created under this chapter, on or before
December 1, 2006, and biennially thereafter. This report must include
information on the projects that have been funded, the status of these
projects, and their environmental, energy savings, and job creation
benefits.

Sec. 407 RCW 43.325.902 and 2007 c 348 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies except as provided in section 201(1) of
this act.
(2) Energy freedom program projects funded pursuant to RCW
43.325.040 or by the legislature pursuant to sections 191 and 192,
chapter 371, Laws of 2006 for which the department of agriculture has
signed loan agreements and disbursed funds prior to June 30, 2007,
shall continue to be serviced by the department of agriculture.
(((2))) (3) Energy freedom program projects funded pursuant to RCW
43.325.040 or by the legislature pursuant to sections 191 and 192,
chapter 371, Laws of 2006 for which moneys have been appropriated but
loan agreements or disbursements have not been completed must be
transferred to the department for project management on July 1, 2007,
subject to the ongoing requirements of the energy freedom program.

Sec. 408 RCW 43.350.005 and 2005 c 424 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that promoting the health of state
residents is a fundamental purpose of state government. The
legislature declares it to be a clear public purpose and governmental
function to promote life sciences research to foster a preventive and
predictive vision of the next generation of health-related innovations,
to enhance the competitive position of Washington state in this vital
sector of the economy, and to improve the quality and delivery of
health care for the people of Washington. The legislature finds that
public support for and promotion of life sciences research will benefit
the state and its residents through improved health status and health
outcomes, economic development, and contributions to scientific
knowledge, and such research will lead to breakthroughs and
improvements that might not otherwise be discovered due to lack of
existing market incentives, especially in the area of regenerative
medicine. The legislature finds that public support for and promotion
of life sciences research has the potential to provide cures or new
treatments for many debilitating diseases that cost the state millions
of dollars each year. It is appropriate and consistent with the intent
of the master settlement agreement between the state and tobacco
product manufacturers to invest a portion of the revenues derived
therefrom by the state in life sciences research, to leverage the
revenues with other funds, and to encourage cooperation and innovation
among public and private institutions involved in life sciences
research.
(2) Except as provided in section 201(1) of this act, the purpose
of this chapter is to establish a life sciences discovery fund
authority, to grant that authority the power to contract with the state
to receive revenues under the master settlement agreement, and to
contract with other entities to receive other funds, and to disburse
those funds consistent with the purpose of this chapter. The life
sciences discovery fund is intended to promote the best available
research in life sciences disciplines through diverse Washington
institutions and to build upon existing strengths in the area of
biosciences and biomanufacturing in order to spread the economic
benefits across the state. The life sciences discovery fund is also
intended to foster improved health care outcomes and improved
agricultural production research across this state and the world. The
research investments of the life sciences discovery fund are intended
to further the goals of the "Bio 21" report and to support future
statewide, comprehensive strategies to lead the nation in life
sciences-related research and employment.

Sec. 409 RCW 43.350.020 and 2005 c 424 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies except as provided in section 201(1) of
this act.
(2) The life sciences discovery fund authority is created and
constitutes a public instrumentality and agency of the state, separate
and distinct from the state, exercising public and essential
governmental functions.
(((2))) (3) The powers of the authority are vested in and shall be
exercised by a board of trustees consisting of: Two members of either
the house appropriations committee or the house committee dealing with
technology issues, one from each caucus, to be appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; two members of either the senate
committee on ways and means or the senate committee dealing with
technology issues, one from each caucus, to be appointed by the
president of the senate; and seven members appointed by the governor
with the consent of the senate, one of whom shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the authority and who shall serve on the board and
as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The
respective officials shall make the initial appointments no later than
thirty days after May 12, 2005. The term of the trustees, other than
the chair, is four years from the date of their appointment, except
that the terms of three of the initial gubernatorial appointees, as
determined by the governor, are for two years from the date of their
appointment. A trustee appointed by the governor may be removed by the
governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The appropriate
official shall fill any vacancy on the board by appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term. The trustees appointed by the
governor shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may
be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses
incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject
to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The trustees who are legislators shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(((3))) (4) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.
(((4))) (5) The trustees shall elect a treasurer and secretary
annually, and other officers as the trustees determine necessary, and
may adopt bylaws or rules for their own government.
(((5))) (6) Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with
the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the
chair or when a majority of the trustees so requests. Meetings of the
board may be held at any location within or out of the state, and
trustees may participate in a meeting of the board by means of a
conference telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW
23B.08.200.
(((6))) (7) The authority is subject to audit by the state auditor.
(((7))) (8) The attorney general must advise the authority and
represent it in all legal proceedings.

Sec. 410 RCW 43.350.030 and 2005 c 424 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 201(1) of this act, in addition to
other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the authority is
empowered to:
(1) Use public moneys in the life sciences discovery fund,
leveraging those moneys with amounts received from other public and
private sources in accordance with contribution agreements, to promote
life sciences research;
(2) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities other
than the state to receive moneys in consideration of the authority's
promise to leverage those moneys with amounts received through
appropriations from the legislature and contributions from other public
entities and private entities, in order to use those moneys to promote
life sciences research. Nonstate moneys received by the authority for
this purpose shall be deposited in the life sciences discovery fund
created in RCW 43.350.070;
(3) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote life sciences research;
(4) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
as consistent with its purpose including the segregation of revenues
into separate funds and accounts;
(5) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract for the promotion
of life sciences research to be conducted in the state. Grant
agreements shall specify deliverables to be provided by the recipient
pursuant to the grant. The authority shall solicit requests for
funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (a)
The quality of the proposed research; (b) its potential to improve
health outcomes, with particular attention to the likelihood that it
will also lower health care costs, substitute for a more costly
diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough treatment for
a particular disease or condition; (c) its potential for leveraging
additional funding; (d) its potential to provide health care benefits
or benefit human learning and development; (e) its potential to
stimulate the health care delivery, biomedical manufacturing, and life
sciences related employment in the state; (f) the geographic diversity
of the grantees within Washington; (g) evidence of potential royalty
income and contractual means to recapture such income for purposes of
this chapter; and (h) evidence of public and private collaboration;
(6) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with life sciences research; and
(7) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward.

Sec. 411 RCW 43.350.040 and 2005 c 424 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 201(1) of this act, the authority has
all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and duties
and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other powers
specified in this chapter, the authority may: (1) Sue and be sued in
its own name; (2) make and execute agreements, contracts, and other
instruments, with any public or private person or entity, in accordance
with this chapter; (3) employ, contract with, or engage independent
counsel, financial advisors, auditors, other technical or professional
assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to
implement this chapter; (4) establish such special funds, and controls
on deposits to and disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for
the implementation of this chapter; (5) enter into contracts with
public and private entities for life sciences research to be conducted
in the state; (6) adopt rules, consistent with this chapter; (7)
delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes
of this chapter; (8) exercise any other power reasonably required to
implement the purposes of this chapter; and (9) hire staff and pay
administrative costs.

Sec. 412 RCW 43.350.070 and 2005 c 424 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Except as provided in section 201(1) of this act,
only the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made only for purposes of
this chapter. Administrative expenses of the authority, including
staff support, may be paid only from the fund. Revenues to the fund
consist of transfers made by the legislature from strategic
contribution payments deposited in the tobacco settlement account under
RCW 43.79.480, moneys received pursuant to contribution agreements
entered into pursuant to RCW 43.350.030, moneys received from gifts,
grants, and bequests, and interest earned on the fund.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The sum of . . . . . ., or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2012, from the general fund to the Washington economic
prosperity bank for its operations.
(2) The sum of . . . . . ., or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013, from the
general fund to the Washington economic prosperity bank for its
operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 101 through 103, 201, 202, and
301 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Sections 404 through 406 of this act
expire June 30, 2016.

--- END ---