BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration must conduct a survey
to determine which states provide a preference for its resident
contractors bidding on public works projects, and provide details on
the type of preference, the amount of the preference, and how the
preference is applied. The survey must be completed by November 1,
2011, and by December 1, 2011, the department must submit a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the
survey. The report must also include recommendations necessary to
implement the intent of this section and section 2 of this act.
(2) The department of general administration must distribute the
results of the survey, along with the requirements of this section and
section 2 of this act, to all state and local agencies with the
authority to procure public works. The department may adopt rules and
procedures to implement the reciprocity requirements in subsection (3)
of this section or may determine that such rules and procedures are not
necessary to implement the intent of this section and section 2 of this
act.
(3) In any bidding process for public works in which a bid is
received from a nonresident contractor from a state that provides a
percentage bidding preference, a comparable percentage disadvantage
must be applied to the bid of that nonresident contractor. This
subsection does not take effect until the department of general
administration has adopted the rules and procedures for reciprocity
under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A nonresident contractor from a state that provides a
percentage bid preference means a contractor that:
(a) Is not registered or licensed, or otherwise legally authorized
to perform public works construction in Washington; and
(b) At the time of bidding on a public works project, does not have
a physical office located in Washington.
(5) The state of residence for a nonresident contractor shall be
the state in which the contractor was incorporated or, if not a
corporation, the state where the contractor's business entity was
formed.
(6) This section does not apply to public works procured pursuant
to RCW 39.04.155 or 39.04.280, or any other procurement where
competitive bidding is exempt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---