BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2009 c 373 s 1 and 2009 c 271 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of
Washington; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling
its products within the United States in accordance with a written
agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or
winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced
licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor
are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured
or produced within the state of Washington.
(17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the
sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains
a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist
during all hours the drug store is open.
(18) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and
is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in
carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to
chapter 18.64 RCW.
(19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having
facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept,
used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous
liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous,
vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a
part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or
otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other
substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer,
and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures
capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or
other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by
weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or
less of alcohol by weight.
(26) "Liquor-related products" means ice and mixers; preserved
foods, such as olives, onions, and cherries that are used in drinks;
bartender's guides, shakers, strainers, mixing spoons, swizzle sticks,
and similar tools used in preparing drinks; coasters, straws, napkins,
and other such items associated with drinking alcoholic beverages;
glassware specifically associated with drinking alcoholic beverages;
and liquor branded logo giftware.
(27) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract
of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure
water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and
not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the
purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight
percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."
(((27))) (28) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((28))) (29) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides
entertainment and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of
alcohol for consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c)
both, and has an occupancy load of one hundred or more.
(((29))) (30) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((30))) (31) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((31))) (32) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((32))) (33) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((33))) (34) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((34))) (35) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((35))) (36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((36))) (37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((37))) (38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((38))) (39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the nonprofit organization
conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the
board.
(((39))) (40) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((40))) (41) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((41))) (42) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((42))) (43) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((43))) (44)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((44))) (45) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((45))) (46) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.
(((46))) (47) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.026 and 2008 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Administrative expenses of the board shall be appropriated and paid
from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative expenses shall
include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the board
and its employees, the cost of opening additional state liquor stores
and warehouses, legal services, pilot projects, annual or other audits,
and other general costs of conducting the business of the board. The
administrative expenses shall not include costs of liquor, liquor-
related products, and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of
transportation and delivery to the point of distribution, the cost of
operating, maintaining, relocating, and leasing state liquor stores and
warehouses, other costs pertaining to the acquisition and receipt of
liquor and lottery tickets, agency commissions for contract liquor
stores, transaction fees associated with credit or debit card purchases
for liquor in state liquor stores and in contract liquor stores
pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041, sales tax, and those amounts
distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210
and 66.08.220. Agency commissions for contract liquor stores shall be
established by the liquor control board after consultation with and
approval by the director of the office of financial management. All
expenditures and payment of obligations authorized by this section are
subject to the allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.165 and 2005 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall, consistent with, and in addition to, the existing
retail business plan, implement strategies to improve the efficiency of
retail sales operations and maximize revenue-generating opportunities.
Strategies to be implemented shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Expanding store operations to include Sunday sales in selected
liquor stores. Sunday sales are optional for liquor vendors operating
agency stores;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store liquor merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors; and
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store liquor merchandising of
brands. ((The plan may not include provisions for selling liquor-related items other than those items previously authorized.))

Sec. 4 RCW 66.16.010 and 2005 c 518 s 935 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, shall deem
advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the sale of
liquor and liquor-related products in accordance with the provisions of
this title and the regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all
liquor shall be fixed by the board from time to time so that the net
annual revenue received by the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent. Effective no later than July 1, 2005, the liquor control
board shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all
retail sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military, and tribal
sales. The intent of this surcharge is to raise revenue for the
general fund-state for the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums. The
board shall remove the surcharge June 30, 2007.
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located except as provided in subsection (8) of
this section, contract liquor stores. In addition, the board may
appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures
liquor products other than wine under a license under this title, as a
contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor products of its
own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such contract liquor
stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the guidelines provided
by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor stores shall be
subject to such additional rules and regulations consistent with this
title as the board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and
((shall have)) has full power to do each and every act necessary to the
conduct of its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and
approval of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever,
subject only to audit by the state auditor((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the board ((shall have)) has no authority to regulate the
content of spoken language on licensed premises where wine and other
liquors are served and where there is not a clear and present danger of
disorderly conduct being provoked by such language;
(12) Conduct a pilot project, beginning in fiscal year 2012, to
appoint up to five contract stores colocated within grocery stores
licensed under RCW 66.24.360 in high population areas. The board must
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the results of
the pilot project no later than January 1, 2013.

--- END ---