BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
tribal tax oversight act of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that Indian tribes do
not pay property tax on land held in trust by the federal government
nor on nonreservation land used for essential government services.
Tribally owned businesses are not subject to sales and excise taxes on
transactions conducted by tribal members on tribal land. The state of
Washington, through the centennial accord, has agreed to treat Indian
tribes on a sovereign-to-sovereign basis. In recent years, special tax
treatment has been conferred on federally recognized Indian tribes,
including property tax exemptions for nonreservation land, additional
cigarette tax contracts, and tribal fuel tax agreements. The
legislature reaffirms the need to be vigilant in its oversight of state
and local tax dollars. However, these tax agreements and preferences
reduce or eliminate the amount of tax dollars the state is entitled to
collect and create an inequitable situation. This is money that can be
used for education, public safety, health and human services, and
transportation. The legislature intends to eliminate special tax
preferences given to federally recognized Indian tribes in recent years
and provide for additional requirements for the renewal of existing tax
agreements.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.010 and 2010 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the
state, or any county or municipal corporation; ((all property belonging
exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located in the
state, if that property is used exclusively for essential government
services;)) all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems
and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW; all property under
a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded
agreement granting immediate possession and use to the public bodies
listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession and
use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; and, for a period of forty years from
acquisition, all property of a community center; is exempt from
taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national
government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively
as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative
of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official
representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.
(2) For the purposes of this section ((the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a))), "community center" means property, including a building or
buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a district by a
local school board, and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit
organization for the purposes of converting them into community
facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for
community members. The community center may make space available to
businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of
space in or on the property.
(((b) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health,
education, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation,
and utility services.))

Sec. 4 RCW 82.36.450 and 2007 c 515 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The governor may enter into an agreement with any federally
recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within this state
regarding motor vehicle fuel taxes included in the price of fuel
delivered to a retail station wholly owned and operated by a tribe,
tribal enterprise, or tribal member licensed by the tribe to operate a
retail station located on reservation or trust property. The agreement
may provide mutually agreeable means to address any tribal immunities
or any preemption of the state motor vehicle fuel tax.
(2) The provisions of this section do not repeal existing
state/tribal fuel tax agreements or consent decrees in existence on May
15, 2007. The state and the tribe may agree to substitute an agreement
negotiated under this section for an existing agreement or consent
decree, or to enter into an agreement using a methodology similar to
the state/tribal fuel tax agreements in effect on May 15, 2007.
(3) If a new agreement is negotiated, the agreement must:
(a) Require that the tribe or the tribal retailer acquire all motor
vehicle fuel only from persons or companies operating lawfully in
accordance with this chapter as a motor vehicle fuel distributor,
supplier, importer, or blender, or from a tribal distributor, supplier,
importer, or blender lawfully doing business according to all
applicable laws;
(b) Provide that the tribe will expend fuel tax proceeds or
equivalent amounts on: Planning, construction, and maintenance of
roads, bridges, and boat ramps; transit services and facilities;
transportation planning; police services; and other highway-related
purposes;
(c) Include provisions for audits or other means of ensuring
compliance to certify the number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel
purchased by the tribe for resale at tribal retail stations, and the
use of fuel tax proceeds or their equivalent for the purposes
identified in (b) of this subsection. Compliance reports must be
delivered to the director of the department of licensing.
(4) Information from the tribe or tribal retailers received by the
state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement shall be
deemed to be personal information under RCW 42.56.230(3)(b) and exempt
from public inspection and copying.
(5) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate fuel tax
agreements to the department of licensing.
(6))) The department of licensing may enter into an agreement with
any federally recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within
this state regarding the imposition, collection, and use of this
state's motor vehicle fuel tax, or the budgeting or use of moneys in
lieu thereof, upon terms substantially the same as those in the consent
decree entered by the federal district court (Eastern District of
Washington) in Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation v. DOL,
et al. District Court No. CY-92-248-JLO.
(2) The department of licensing ((shall)) must prepare and submit
an annual report to the legislature on the status of existing
agreements and any ongoing negotiations with tribes.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.38.310 and 2007 c 515 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The governor may enter into an agreement with any federally
recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within this state
regarding special fuel taxes included in the price of fuel delivered to
a retail station wholly owned and operated by a tribe, tribal
enterprise, or tribal member licensed by the tribe to operate a retail
station located on reservation or trust property. The agreement may
provide mutually agreeable means to address any tribal immunities or
any preemption of the state special fuel tax.
(2) The provisions of this section do not repeal existing
state/tribal fuel tax agreements or consent decrees in existence on May
15, 2007. The state and the tribe may agree to substitute an agreement
negotiated under this section for an existing agreement or consent
decree, or to enter into an agreement using a methodology similar to
the state/tribal fuel tax agreements in effect on May 15, 2007.
(3) If a new agreement is negotiated, the agreement must:
(a) Require that the tribe or the tribal retailer acquire all
special fuel only from persons or companies operating lawfully in
accordance with this chapter as a special fuel distributor, supplier,
importer, or blender, or from a tribal distributor, supplier, importer,
or blender lawfully doing business according to all applicable laws;
(b) Provide that the tribe will expend fuel tax proceeds or
equivalent amounts on: Planning, construction, and maintenance of
roads, bridges, and boat ramps; transit services and facilities;
transportation planning; police services; and other highway-related
purposes;
(c) Include provisions for audits or other means of ensuring
compliance to certify the number of gallons of special fuel purchased
by the tribe for resale at tribal retail stations, and the use of fuel
tax proceeds or their equivalent for the purposes identified in (b) of
this subsection. Compliance reports must be delivered to the director
of the department of licensing.
(4) Information from the tribe or tribal retailers received by the
state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement shall be
deemed personal information under RCW 42.56.230(3)(b) and exempt from
public inspection and copying.
(5) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate fuel tax
agreements to the department of licensing.
(6))) The department of licensing may enter into an agreement with
any federally recognized Indian tribe located on a reservation within
this state regarding the imposition, collection, and use of this
state's special fuel tax, or the budgeting or use of moneys in lieu
thereof, upon terms substantially the same as those in the consent
decree entered by the federal district court (Eastern District of
Washington) in Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation v. DOL,
et al. District Court No. CY-92-248-JLO.
(2) The department of licensing ((shall)) must prepare and submit
an annual report to the legislature on the status of existing
agreements and any ongoing negotiations with tribes.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.06.455 and 2001 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor may enter into cigarette tax contracts concerning
the sale of cigarettes. All cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must
meet the requirements for cigarette tax contracts under this section.
Except for cigarette tax contracts under RCW 43.06.460, the rates,
revenue sharing, and exemption terms of a cigarette tax contract are
not effective unless authorized in a bill enacted by the legislature.
(2) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall be)) are in regard to retail
sales in which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of
possession of the cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian
country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers.
In addition, contracts ((shall)) must provide that retailers ((shall))
do not sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any
person under the age of eighteen years.
(3) A cigarette tax contract with a tribe ((shall)) must provide
for a tribal cigarette tax in lieu of all state cigarette taxes and
state and local sales and use taxes on sales of cigarettes in Indian
country by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for
sales to tribal members.
(4) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must provide that all
cigarettes possessed or sold by a retailer ((shall)) bear a cigarette
stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp
vendor and applied to the cigarettes. The procedures to be used by the
tribe in obtaining tax stamps must include a means to assure that the
tribal tax will be paid by the wholesaler obtaining such cigarettes.
Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some other discrete
identification so that each stamp can be traced to its source.
(5) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must provide that retailers
((shall)) purchase cigarettes only from:
(a) Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the
state of Washington;
(b) Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not
licensed to do business in the state of Washington, agree to comply
with the terms of the cigarette tax contract, are certified to the
state as having so agreed, and who do in fact so comply. However, the
state may in its sole discretion exercise its administrative and
enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to the extent
permitted by law;
(c) A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or
manufacturer described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and
(d) A tribal manufacturer.
(6) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must be for renewable periods
of no more than eight years. A renewal may not include a renewal of
the phase-in period. For renewals occurring after the effective date
of this section, any agreement must include a provision requiring the
tribe to transmit thirty percent of the tribal tax revenue on all
cigarette sales to the state. The funds must be transmitted to the
state treasurer on a quarterly basis for deposit by the state treasurer
into the general fund. The remaining tribal tax revenue must be used
for essential government services, as that term is defined in this
section.
(7) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must include provisions for
compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(8) Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential
government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of cigarette
and food retailers is prohibited.
(9) The cigarette tax contract may include provisions to resolve
disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.
(10) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cigarette tax
contracts to the department of revenue. The department of revenue
((shall)) must consult with the liquor control board during the
negotiations.
(11) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of a contract is subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(12) It is the intent of the legislature that the liquor control
board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and
shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW and therefore the liquor
control board is responsible for enforcement activities that come under
the terms of chapter 82.24 RCW.
(13) Each cigarette tax contract ((shall)) must include a procedure
for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a
procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an
opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for
termination of the contract should the violation fail to be resolved
through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the
terms of the contract so allow. A contract ((shall)) must provide for
termination of the contract if resolution of a dispute does not occur
within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has
occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period. In
addition, the contract ((shall)) must include provisions delineating
the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe, the department
of revenue, and the liquor control board.
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.06.460, 82.08.0316,
82.12.0316, and 82.24.295:
(a) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health,
education, job services, sewer, water, environmental and land use,
transportation, utility services, and economic development;
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and
operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a
business owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose
name the land is held in trust; and
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian
tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington.

--- END ---