BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
contractual oversight and transparency act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature reaffirms the need for
it to be vigilant in its oversight of all matters concerning the budget
and provide state agencies with sufficient resources to do the people's
work. However, the governor is in the unique position to approve
agreements, contracts, and compacts with the federal government, other
states, and nations, without consultation with the legislature. In
those agreements, the governor can obligate the state to spend money or
provide services without adequate compensation, and without the
legislature being aware until after an agreement is made.
(2) The legislature intends to provide increased transparency so
that the people's representatives have oversight over contracts that
bind the state and its resources. This act creates a process by which
the governor must work with the legislature to ensure that there is
broad-based support before an agreement is signed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor may not adopt, execute, or otherwise enter into
any compact with another state, the federal government, Indian tribe or
band, or other sovereign entity without prior legislative approval as
required in this section.
(2) Prior to the adoption or execution of any compact by the
governor, the compact must be submitted to the legislature for its
approval in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.
Any compact the governor submits for legislative approval must be in
the form of a joint resolution submitted to both houses of the
legislature.
(3) Upon introduction to the legislature of the joint resolution
required under this section, the legislature must approve or reject the
resolution by adjournment sine die of the regular or special session in
which the resolution was introduced. Approval of the resolution
requires the affirmative vote of sixty percent of the members of each
house of the legislature. The failure of the legislature to act on the
resolution by adjournment sine die of the relevant session is deemed to
be rejection of the proposed compact.
(4) If the legislature approves the joint resolution, then the
governor may execute the compact.
(5) If a joint resolution is not introduced to the legislature as
required under this section, then the proposed compact is deemed
rejected.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "compact" means any
agreement, contract, or covenant between Washington state and the
federal government or Indian tribe or another state or other sovereign
entity.
(7) Class III tribal-state gaming compacts must be approved by
joint resolutions pursuant to RCW 9.46.360.
(8) This section does not apply to grant applications for the
benefit of Washington state.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.06.110 and 2009 c 549 s 5020 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the governor,
or his or her designee, is hereby authorized and empowered to undertake
such programs as will, in the judgment of the governor, or his or her
designee, enable families and individuals of all ages, in rural and
urban areas, in need of the skills, knowledge, motivations, and
opportunities to become economically self-sufficient to obtain and
secure such skills, knowledge, motivations, and opportunities. Such
programs may be engaged in as solely state operations, or in
conjunction or cooperation with any appropriate agency of the federal
government, any branch or agency of the government of this state, any
city or town, county, municipal corporation, metropolitan municipal
corporation or other political subdivision of the state, or any private
corporation. Where compliance with the provisions of federal law or
rules or regulations promulgated thereunder is a necessary condition to
the receipt of federal funds by the state, the governor or his or her
designee, is hereby authorized to comply with such laws, rules or
regulations to the extent necessary for the state to cooperate most
fully with the federal government in furtherance of the programs herein
authorized.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.06.450 and 2001 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the legislature
intends to further the government-to-government relationship between
the state of Washington and Indians in the state of Washington by
authorizing the governor to enter into contracts concerning the sale of
cigarettes. The legislature finds that these cigarette tax contracts
will provide a means to promote economic development, provide needed
revenues for tribal governments and Indian persons, and enhance
enforcement of the state's cigarette tax law, ultimately saving the
state money and reducing conflict. In addition, it is the intent of
the legislature that the negotiations and the ensuing contracts
((shall)) have no impact on the state's share of the proceeds under the
master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the
state. Chapter 235, Laws of 2001 does not constitute a grant of taxing
authority to any Indian tribe nor does it provide precedent for the
taxation of non-Indians on fee land.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.06.455 and 2001 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor may enter into cigarette tax contracts concerning the sale of
cigarettes. All cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must meet the
requirements for cigarette tax contracts under this section. Except
for cigarette tax contracts under RCW 43.06.460, the rates, revenue
sharing, and exemption terms of a cigarette tax contract are not
effective unless authorized in a bill enacted by the legislature.
(2) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must be in regard to retail
sales in which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of
possession of the cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian
country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers.
In addition, contracts ((shall)) must provide that retailers ((shall))
may not sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any
person under the age of eighteen years.
(3) A cigarette tax contract with a tribe ((shall)) must provide
for a tribal cigarette tax in lieu of all state cigarette taxes and
state and local sales and use taxes on sales of cigarettes in Indian
country by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for
sales to tribal members.
(4) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must provide that all
cigarettes possessed or sold by a retailer ((shall)) must bear a
cigarette stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable
stamp vendor and applied to the cigarettes. The procedures to be used
by the tribe in obtaining tax stamps must include a means to assure
that the tribal tax will be paid by the wholesaler obtaining such
cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some other
discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to its source.
(5) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must provide that retailers
((shall)) must purchase cigarettes only from:
(a) Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the
state of Washington;
(b) Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not
licensed to do business in the state of Washington, agree to comply
with the terms of the cigarette tax contract, are certified to the
state as having so agreed, and who do in fact so comply. However, the
state may in its sole discretion exercise its administrative and
enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to the extent
permitted by law;
(c) A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or
manufacturer described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and
(d) A tribal manufacturer.
(6) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must be for renewable periods
of no more than eight years. A renewal may not include a renewal of
the phase-in period.
(7) Cigarette tax contracts ((shall)) must include provisions for
compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(8) Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential
government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of cigarette
and food retailers is prohibited.
(9) The cigarette tax contract may include provisions to resolve
disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.
(10) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cigarette tax
contracts to the department of revenue. The department of revenue
((shall)) must consult with the liquor control board during the
negotiations.
(11) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of a contract is subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(12) It is the intent of the legislature that the liquor control
board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and
shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW and therefore the liquor
control board is responsible for enforcement activities that come under
the terms of chapter 82.24 RCW.
(13) Each cigarette tax contract ((shall)) must include a procedure
for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a
procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an
opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for
termination of the contract should the violation fail to be resolved
through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the
terms of the contract so allow. A contract ((shall)) must provide for
termination of the contract if resolution of a dispute does not occur
within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has
occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period. In
addition, the contract ((shall)) must include provisions delineating
the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe, the department
of revenue, and the liquor control board.
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.06.460, 82.08.0316,
82.12.0316, and 82.24.295:
(a) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health,
education, job services, sewer, water, environmental and land use,
transportation, utility services, and economic development;
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and
operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a
business owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose
name the land is held in trust; and
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian
tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.06.460 and 2008 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor is authorized to enter into cigarette tax contracts with the
Squaxin Island Tribe, the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, the
Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, the Quinault Nation, the Jamestown S'Klallam
Indian Tribe, the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, the Stillaguamish Tribe,
the Sauk-Suiattle Tribe, the Skokomish Indian Tribe, the Yakama Nation,
the Suquamish Tribe, the Nooksack Indian Tribe, the Lummi Nation, the
Chehalis Confederated Tribes, the Upper Skagit Tribe, the Snoqualmie
Tribe, the Swinomish Tribe, the Samish Indian Nation, the Quileute
Tribe, the Kalispel Tribe, the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation, the Cowlitz Indian Tribe, the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe,
the Makah Tribe, the Hoh Tribe, the Spokane Tribe, and the Shoalwater
Bay Tribe. Each contract adopted under this section ((shall)) must
provide that the tribal cigarette tax rate be one hundred percent of
the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes within
three years of enacting the tribal tax and ((shall)) must be set no
lower than eighty percent of the state cigarette and state and local
sales and use taxes during the three-year phase-in period. The three-year phase-in period ((shall)) must be shortened by three months each
quarter the number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes is
at least ten percent or more than the quarterly average number of
cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes from the six-month period
preceding the imposition of the tribal tax under the contract. Sales
at a retailer operation not in existence as of the date a tribal tax
under this section is imposed are subject to the full rate of the
tribal tax under the contract. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of
the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes, as
provided in RCW 43.06.455(3).
(2) A cigarette tax contract under this section is subject to RCW
43.06.455.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.06.465 and 2005 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup
Tribe of Indians concerning the sale of cigarettes, subject to the
limitations in this section. The legislature intends to address the
uniqueness of the Puyallup Indian reservation and its selling
environment through pricing and compliance strategies, rather than
through the imposition of equivalent taxes. It is the legislature's
intent (a) that an increase in prices through a flat tax will reduce
much of the competitive advantage that has historically existed due to
the discrepancy in the difference between state and tribal taxes, and
(b) that the tribal retailers can remain in business under the changed
circumstances. The governor may delegate the authority to negotiate a
cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup Tribe to the department of
revenue. The department of revenue ((shall)) must consult with the
liquor control board during the negotiations.
(2) Any agreement must require the tribe to impose a tax of eleven
dollars and seventy-five cents on each carton of cigarettes, with ten
packs a carton and twenty cigarettes per pack being the industry
standard. This tax ((shall)) must be prorated for cartons and packs
that are nonstandard. This tribal tax is in lieu of the combined state
and local sales and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and as such
these state taxes are not imposed during the term of the agreement on
any transaction governed by the agreement. The tribal tax ((shall))
must increase or decrease by the same dollar amount as any increase or
decrease in the state cigarette tax.
(3) The agreement must include a provision requiring the tribe to
transmit thirty percent of the tribal tax revenue on all cigarette
sales to the state. The funds ((shall)) must be transmitted to the
state treasurer on a quarterly basis for deposit by the state treasurer
into the general fund. The remaining tribal tax revenue must be used
for essential government services, as that term is defined in RCW
43.06.455.
(4) The agreement is limited to retail sales in which Indian
retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the
cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are
not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition,
agreements ((shall)) must provide that retailers ((shall)) must not
sell or give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person
under the age of eighteen years.
(5)(a) The agreement must include a provision to price and sell the
cigarettes so that the retail selling price is not less than the price
paid by the retailer for the cigarettes.
(b) The tribal tax is in addition to the retail selling price.
(c) The agreement must include a provision to assure the price paid
to the retailer includes the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(d) If the tribe is acting as a wholesaler to tribal retailers, the
retail selling price must not be less than the price the tribe paid for
such cigarettes plus the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(6)(a) The agreement must include provisions regarding enforcement
and compliance by the tribe in regard to enrolled tribal members who
sell cigarettes and ((shall)) must describe the individual and joint
responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the
liquor control board.
(b) The agreement must include provisions for tax administration
and compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(c) The agreement must include provisions for sharing of
information among the tribe, the department of revenue, and the liquor
control board.
(7) The agreement must provide that all cigarettes possessed or
sold by a tribal retailer ((shall)) must bear a tribal cigarette stamp
obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and
applied to the cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or
some other discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to
its source.
(8) The agreement must provide that retailers ((shall)) must
purchase cigarettes only from wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to
do business in the state of Washington.
(9) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(10) The agreement must include provisions to resolve disputes
using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and ((shall)) must
include a dispute resolution protocol. The protocol ((shall)) must
include a procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has
occurred, a procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact
occurred, an opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision
providing for termination of the agreement should the violation fail to
be resolved through this process, such termination subject to mediation
should the terms of the agreement so allow. An agreement must provide
for termination of the agreement if resolution of a dispute does not
occur within twenty-four months from the time notification of a
violation has occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time
period.
(11) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement, and as such this
agreement does not authorize negotiation regarding a redistribution of
the state's proceeds under the master settlement agreement.
(12) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of an agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(13) It is the intent of the legislature that the liquor control
board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and
shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW.
(14) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW.
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe or (ii) a business wholly owned
and operated by an enrolled tribal member and licensed by the tribe.
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means the Puyallup Tribe of Indians,
which is a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.06.466 and 2008 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that entering into a cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation is a positive step and that such an
agreement will support a stable and orderly environment on the Yakima
Reservation for regulation of cigarette sales. The legislature further
finds that the very special circumstances of the Yakama Nation pursuant
to the Treaty with the Yakamas of 1855 (12 Stat. 951) support a
cigarette tax agreement that reflects those circumstances. The
legislature also finds that the provisions of the agreement with the
Yakama Nation authorized by chapter 228, Laws of 2008 are reasonably
necessary to prevent fraudulent transactions and place a minimal burden
on the Yakama Nation, pursuant to the United States supreme court's
decision in Washington v. Confederated Tribes of the Colville Indian
Reservation, 447 U.S. 134 (1980).
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation reflects the uniqueness of the Yakama
Nation's Treaty through specific terms that govern pricing of
cigarettes, tribal cigarette tax revenue, information sharing, and
administration of the agreement.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW; and
(b) "Tribal retailer" means a cigarette retailer as that term is
defined in RCW 82.24.010 that is licensed by and located within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation and is wholly owned by the Yakama
Nation or any of its enrolled members.
(3) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the Yakama
Nation, a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, concerning the sale
of cigarettes, subject to the provisions of this section. The governor
may delegate the authority to negotiate the agreement to the department
of revenue.
(4) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(5) All cigarettes possessed or sold by tribal retailers must be
subject to the agreement, except cigarettes manufactured within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation by the Yakama Nation or its enrolled
members.
(6) The agreement must allow the Yakama Nation to exempt its
enrolled members from the tribal cigarette tax imposed under subsection
(7) of this section.
(a) Sales of cigarettes exempt under this subsection must be
subject to the requirements of subsection (9) of this section.
(b) The exemption must be provided only at the point of sale and
reimbursement provided to the tribal retailer by the Yakama Nation.
(7) The agreement must require the Yakama Nation to impose and
maintain in effect on the sale of cigarettes by tribal retailers a tax
as provided in this subsection.
(a) The rate of tax will be expressed in dollars and cents and must
be the percentage of tax imposed by the state under chapter 82.24 RCW
for the period of the agreement as ((stated here)) follows:
(i) Eighty percent during the first six years;
(ii) Eighty-four percent during the seventh year; and
(iii) Eighty-seven and six-tenths percent during the eighth year.
(b) The tax must be imposed on each carton, or portion of a carton,
of cigarettes, with ten packs per carton and twenty cigarettes per pack
being the industry standard, and prorated for cartons and packs that
are not standard.
(c) The tax must be in lieu of the combined state and local sales
and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and, as provided in RCW
82.24.302, 82.08.0316, and 82.12.0316, the taxes imposed by chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.24 RCW do not apply during the term of the
agreement on any transaction governed by the agreement.
(d) Throughout the term of the agreement and any renewal of the
agreement, the tax must increase or decrease in correspondence with the
state cigarette tax by applying the percentages in (a) of this
subsection.
(8) The revenue generated by the tax imposed under subsection (7)
of this section must be used by the Yakama Nation for essential
government services, as that term is defined in RCW 43.06.455.
(9) All cigarettes possessed or sold by a tribal retailer must bear
a tribal cigarette tax stamp as provided in this subsection.
(a) The Yakama Nation may act as its own stamp vendor, subject to
meeting reasonable requirements for internal controls.
(b) The stamps must have serial numbers or other discrete
identification that allow stamps to be traced to their source.
(10) The price paid by the tribal retailer to the wholesaler must
not be less than the total of the price paid by the Yakama Nation or
other wholesaler and the tax imposed under subsection (7) of this
section.
(11) The retail selling price of cigarettes sold by tribal
retailers must not be less than the price paid by them under subsection
(10) of this section.
(12) Tribal retailers must not sell or give, or permit to be sold
or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.
(13) The authority and the individual and joint responsibility of
the Yakama Nation, the department of revenue, and the liquor control
board for administration and enforcement must be specified in the
agreement including, but not limited to, requirements regarding
transport of cigarettes, keeping of records, reporting, notice,
inspection, audit, and mutual exchange of information.
(a) Requirements must provide for sharing of information regarding
transport of cigarettes in the state of Washington by the Yakama Nation
or its enrolled members, reporting of information on sales to customers
located outside the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation, and authority
for unannounced inspection by the state of tribal retailers to verify
compliance with stamping and pricing provisions.
(b) Information received by the state or open to state review under
the terms of the agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(14) The agreement must provide for resolution of disputes using a
nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and establish a dispute
resolution protocol that includes the following elements:
(a) A procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has
occurred;
(b) A procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact
occurred;
(c) An opportunity to correct the violation;
(d) A procedure for terminating the agreement in the event of a
failure to correct the violation, such termination subject to mediation
should the terms of the agreement so allow; and
(e) Termination of the agreement for cause.
(15) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement or concern
redistribution of the state's proceeds under the master settlement
agreement.
(16) The department of revenue may share with the Yakama Nation tax
information under RCW 82.32.330 that is necessary for the Yakama
Nation's compliance with the agreement.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.06.475 and 2007 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor may enter into timber harvest excise tax agreements concerning
the harvest of timber. All timber harvest excise tax agreements must
meet the requirements for timber harvest excise tax agreements under
this section. The terms of a timber harvest excise tax agreement are
not effective unless the agreement is authorized in RCW 43.06.480.
(2) Timber harvest excise tax agreements ((shall)) must be in
regard to timber harvests on fee land within the exterior boundaries of
the reservation of the Indian tribe and are not in regard to timber
harvests on trust land or land owned by the tribe within the exterior
boundaries of the reservation.
(3) The agreement must provide that the tribal tax ((shall be)) is
credited against the state and county taxes imposed under RCW 84.33.041
and 84.33.051.
(4) Tribal ordinances for timber harvest excise taxation, or other
authorizing tribal laws, which implement the timber harvest excise tax
agreement with the state, must incorporate or contain provisions
identical to chapter 84.33 RCW that relate to the tax rates and
measures, such as stumpage values.
(5) Timber harvest excise tax agreements must be for renewable
periods of no more than eight years.
(6) Timber harvest excise tax agreements must include provisions
for compliance, such as inspection procedures, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(7) Tax revenue retained by the tribe must be used for essential
government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of timber
harvesters is prohibited.
(8) The timber harvest excise tax agreement may include provisions
to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.
(9) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate the timber
harvest excise tax agreements to the department of revenue.
(10) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of a timber harvest excise tax agreement is subject to
the provisions of RCW 82.32.330. The department of revenue may enter
into an information sharing agreement with the tribe to facilitate
sharing information to improve tax collection.
(11) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include dispute
resolution procedures, contract termination procedures, and provisions
delineating the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe and
the department of revenue.
(12) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include
provisions to require taxpayers to submit information that may be
required by the department of revenue or tribe.
(13) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Essential government services" means services such as forest
land management; protection, enhancement, regulation, and stewardship
of forested land; land consolidation; tribal administration; public
facilities; fire; police; public health; education; job services;
sewer; water; environmental and land use; transportation; utility
services; and public facilities serving economic development purposes
as those terms are defined in RCW 82.14.370(3)(c);
(b) "Forest land" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035;
(c) "Harvester" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035;
(d) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian
tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington; and
(e) "Timber" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.06.480 and 2007 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
governor is authorized to enter into a timber harvest excise tax
agreement with the Quinault Nation. Agreements adopted under this
section must provide that the tribal timber harvest excise tax rate be
one hundred percent of the state timber harvest excise tax.
(2) A timber harvest excise tax agreement under this section is
subject to RCW 43.06.475.

Sec. 12 RCW 9.46.360 and 1992 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The negotiation process for compacts, or compact amendments,
with federally recognized Indian tribes for conducting class III
gaming, as defined in the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec.
2701 et seq., on federal Indian lands is governed by this section.
(2)(a) The ((gambling)) commission through the director or the
director's designee ((shall)) must negotiate compacts, including
compact amendments, for class III gaming on behalf of the state with
federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington. Nothing
in this section authorizes the governor to execute a compact without
the approval of the legislature.
(b) Negotiations should include an expectation that the tribe will
make payments to the state based on the gross gaming revenue generated
from all class III gaming activities consistent with the following
graduated scale:

Tiers Gross Gaming Revenue Percentage

1 $0 - $30,000,000 3%

2 More than $30,000,000 - $60,000,000 5%

3 More than $60,000,000 - $90,000,000 10%

4 More than $90,000,000 - $120,000,000 15%

5 More than $120,000,000 - $150,000,000 20%

6 More than $150,000,000 - $180,000,000 25%

7 More than $180,000,000 - $210,000,000 30%

8 Above $210,000,000 35%

(3)(a) When a tentative agreement with an Indian tribe on a
proposed compact is reached, the director ((shall)) must immediately
transmit a copy of the proposed compact to all voting and ex officio
members of the ((gambling)) commission and to the standing committees
of the legislature designated pursuant to subsection (((5))) (4) of
this section. The director must forward with his or her submittal
documents a recommendation for approval of the proposed compact and
comments about or analysis of the proposed compact's provisions.
(((4))) (b) The commission may hold public hearings on the proposed
compact any time after receiving a copy of the compact from the
director. Within forty-five days after receiving the proposed compact
from the director, the commission must vote on whether to forward the
proposed compact, with any comments, to the legislature for approval or
to return the proposed compact to the director with instructions for
further negotiations. Notwithstanding RCW 9.46.040, the four ex
officio members of the ((gambling)) commission ((shall be)) are deemed
voting members of the ((gambling)) commission for the sole purpose of
voting on proposed compacts submitted under this section.
(((5))) (4) Within thirty days after receiving notice from the
director that a proposed compact ((from the director)) has been
forwarded by the commission under subsection (3) of this section, one
standing committee from each house of the legislature ((shall)) must
hold a public hearing on the proposed compact and forward its
respective ((comments to the gambling commission)) recommendations, if
any, to the legislature. The president of the senate ((shall)) must
designate the senate standing committee that is to carry out the duties
of this section, and the speaker of the house of representatives
((shall)) must designate the house standing committee that is to carry
out the duties of this section. The designated committees ((shall))
must continue to perform under this section until the president of the
senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as the case may
be, designates a different standing committee. The committees must
receive at the hearing any comments on the proposed compact provided by
the commission.
(((6) The gambling commission may hold public hearings on the
proposed compact any time after receiving a copy of the compact from
the director. Within forty-five days after receiving the proposed
compact from the director, the gambling commission, including the four
ex officio members, shall vote on whether to return the proposed
compact to the director with instructions for further negotiation or to
forward the proposed compact to the governor for review and final
execution.
(7) Notwithstanding provisions in this section to the contrary, if
the director forwards a proposed compact to the gambling commission and
the designated standing committees within ten days before the beginning
of a regular session of the legislature, or during a regular or special
session of the legislature, the thirty-day time limit set forth in
subsection (5) of this section and the forty-five day limit set forth
in subsection (6) of this section are each forty-five days and sixty
days, respectively.
(8))) (5)(a) The legislature may act on the proposed compact by a
joint resolution introduced in the legislative session during which the
designated standing committees received notice under subsection (4) of
this section or, if not in session or if in a special session or within
the last thirty days of a regular session when the notice was received,
in the next convened regular or special legislative session.
(b) If a joint resolution is introduced under this subsection, the
legislature must approve or reject the resolution by adjournment sine
die of the regular or special session in which the resolution was
introduced. Approval of the resolution requires the affirmative vote
of sixty percent of the members of each house of the legislature. The
failure of the legislature to act on the resolution by adjournment sine
die of the relevant session is deemed to be rejection of the proposed
compact.
(c) If the legislature approves a joint resolution under this
subsection, the proposed compact must be forwarded to the governor for
review and final execution. If the legislature does not approve or
rejects the resolution, the proposed compact must be returned to the
commission for further negotiation.
(d) If a joint resolution is not introduced under this subsection,
the proposed compact is deemed rejected and must be returned to the
commission for further negotiation.
(6) Funding for the negotiation process under this section must
come from the gambling revolving fund.
(((9))) (7) In addition to the powers granted under this chapter,
the commission, consistent with the terms of any compact, is authorized
and empowered to enforce the provisions of any compact between a
federally recognized Indian tribe and the state of Washington.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor
may exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and
the following sections:
(1) The governor ((shall)) must supervise the conduct of all
executive and ministerial offices;
(2) The governor ((shall)) must see that all offices are filled,
including as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and the duties thereof
performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows;
and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith at
its next session;
(3) The governor ((shall)) must make the appointments and supply
the vacancies mentioned in this title;
(4) The governor is the sole official organ of communication
between the government of this state and the government of any other
state or territory, or of the United States;
(5) Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this
state, or which may affect the title of this state to any property, or
which may result in any claim against the state, the governor may
direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of the state, and
report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the
governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(6) The governor may require the attorney general or any
prosecuting attorney to inquire into the affairs or management of any
corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in
this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury
designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(7) The governor may require the attorney general to aid any
prosecuting attorney in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;
(8) The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand
dollars in each case, payable out of the state treasury, for
information leading to the apprehension of any person convicted of a
felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or for
information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;
(9) The governor ((shall)) must perform such duties respecting
fugitives from justice as are prescribed by law;
(10) The governor ((shall)) must issue and transmit election
proclamations as prescribed by law;
(11) The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon
demand, special reports to the governor, in writing;
(12) The governor may, after finding that a public disorder,
disaster, energy emergency, or riot exists within this state or any
part thereof which affects life, health, property, or the public peace,
proclaim a state of emergency in the area affected, and the powers
granted the governor during a state of emergency ((shall be)) are
effective only within the area described in the proclamation;
(13) The governor may, after finding that there exists within this
state an imminent danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in
RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which seriously endangers the
agricultural or horticultural industries of the state of Washington, or
which seriously threatens life, health, or economic well-being, order
emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or disease
situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;
(14) ((On all)) With respect to compacts approved and forwarded to
the governor by the legislature pursuant to RCW 9.46.360(((6))), the
governor is authorized and empowered to execute, on behalf of the state
compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of
Washington pursuant to the federal Indian gaming regulatory act, 25
U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for conducting class III gaming, as defined
in the federal act, on Indian lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 12 and 13 of this act apply to all
tribal-state class III compacts and compact amendments that have not
been finally executed by the governor as of the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---