BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall deposit to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account)--state appropriation on an annual basis the
greater of the following:
(a) An amount equal to all sales and use taxes paid under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the fuel purchased or used by the state ferry
system for marine purposes; or
(b) Five million two hundred thousand dollars.
(2) The revenue provided in this section is hereby pledged to the
payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the
authority of RCW 47.10.861 for the purposes provided in section 2 of
this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to provide these
revenues, in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and
interest on all bonds issued under the authority of RCW 47.10.861 for
the purposes provided in section 2 of this act.
(3) This section expires on the date that the bonds that are issued
for the purposes of section 2 of this act are retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of seventy-five million dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2013, from transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation to the department of transportation for
the purposes of constructing a ferry boat vessel with a carrying
capacity of at least one hundred thirty cars. These funds shall be
used to supplement the funds appropriated in the 2011-2013
transportation budget for the purpose of constructing the vessel in the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation in this section includes up to seventy-five million
dollars in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---