BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.200 and 2007 c 458 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a statewide strategic master plan for
higher education that proposes a vision and identifies measurable goals
and priorities for the system of higher education in Washington state
for a ten-year time period. The board shall update the statewide
strategic master plan every four years. The plan shall address the
goals of: (a) Expanding access; (b) using methods of educational
delivery that are efficient, cost-effective, and productive to deliver
modern educational programs; and (c) using performance measures to
gauge the effectiveness of the state's progress towards meeting its
higher education goals. The plan shall encompass all sectors of higher
education, including the two-year system, workforce training, the four-year institutions, and financial aid. The board shall also specify
strategies for expanding access, affordability, quality, efficiency,
and accountability among the various institutions of higher education.
(2) In developing the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
of higher education including the council of presidents, the community
and technical college system, and, when appropriate, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, the independent higher education institutions, the
business sector, and labor. The board shall identify and utilize
models of regional planning and decision making before initiating a
statewide planning process. The board shall also seek input from
students, faculty organizations, community and business leaders in the
state, members of the legislature, and the governor.
(3) As a foundation for the statewide strategic master plan for
higher education, the board shall review role and mission statements
for each of the four-year institutions of higher education and the
community and technical college system. The purpose of the review is
to ensure institutional roles and missions are aligned with the overall
state vision and priorities for higher education.
(4) In assessing needs of the state's higher education system, the
board should encourage partnerships, embrace innovation, and consider,
analyze, and make recommendations concerning the following information:
(a) Demographic, social, economic, and technological trends and
their impact on service delivery for a twenty-year horizon;
(b) The changing ethnic composition of the population and the
special needs arising from those trends;
(c) Business and industrial needs for a skilled workforce;
(d) College attendance, retention, transfer, graduation, and
dropout rates;
(e) Needs and demands for basic and continuing education and
opportunities for lifelong learning by individuals of all age groups;
(f) Needs and demands for nontraditional populations including, but
not limited to, adult learners; and
(g) Needs and demands for access to higher education by placebound
students and individuals in heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions.
(5) The statewide strategic master plan for higher education shall
include, but not be limited to, the following access and educational
delivery items:
(a) Recommendations based on enrollment forecasts and analysis of
data about demand for higher education, and policies and actions to
meet the goal of expanding access;
(b) State and regional priorities for new or expanded degree
programs or off-campus programs, including what models of service
delivery may be most cost-effective;
(c) Recommended policies or actions to improve the efficiency of
student transfer and graduation or completion;
(d) State and regional priorities for addressing needs in high-demand fields where enrollment access is limited and employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job
openings;
(e) Recommended tuition and fees policies and levels; and
(f) Priorities and recommendations including increased transparency
on financial aid.
(6) The board shall present the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education
in a way that provides guidance for institutions, the governor, and the
legislature to make further decisions regarding institution-level
plans, policies, legislation, and operating and capital funding for
higher education. In the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall recommend specific actions to be taken and
identify measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities.
(7) Every four years by December 15th, beginning December 15, 2007,
the board shall submit an update of the ten-year statewide strategic
master plan for higher education to the governor and the legislature.
The updated plan shall reflect the expectations and policy directions
of the legislative higher education and fiscal committees, and shall
provide a timely and relevant framework for the development of future
budgets and policy proposals. The legislature shall, by concurrent
resolution, approve or recommend changes to the updated plan, following
public hearings. The board shall submit the final plan, incorporating
legislative changes, to the governor and the legislature by June of the
year in which the legislature approves the concurrent resolution. The
plan shall then become state higher education policy unless legislation
is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan. The board
shall report annually to the governor and the legislature on the
progress being made by the institutions of higher education and the
state to implement the strategic master plan.
(8) Each four-year institution shall develop an institution-level
ten-year strategic plan that implements the vision, goals, priorities,
and strategies within the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education based on the institution's role and mission. Institutional
strategic plans shall encourage partnerships, embrace innovation, and
contain measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities with attention given
to the goals and strategies of increased access and program delivery
methods. The board shall review the institution-level plans to ensure
the plans are aligned with and implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education and shall periodically monitor institutions'
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities within their plans.
(9) The board shall also review the comprehensive master plan
prepared by the state board for community and technical colleges for
the community and technical college system under RCW 28B.50.090 to
ensure the plan is aligned with and implements the statewide strategic
master plan for higher education.
(10) The board shall consider the recommendations of the higher
education performance advisory council established in section 2 of this
act for incorporation in the strategic master plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A higher education performance advisory council is established.
The council shall be staffed by the board. The purpose of the council
is to:
(a) Advise the higher education coordinating board on the
development and recommendations to be incorporated into the strategic
master plan in RCW 28B.76.200;
(b) Examine structural changes in higher education that will
improve the governance structures and increase efficiencies in both
administration and educational delivery, while maintaining high quality
educational programs that can be incorporated into the strategic master
plan in RCW 28B.76.200; and
(c) Identify objectives for the public higher education system that
provide the greatest benefits and that require public funding; and
prioritize the identified objectives.
(2) The higher education performance advisory council comprises the
following members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives who shall select a cochair for the
council;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate who
shall select a cochair for the council;
(c) A representative of the higher education coordinating board;
and
(d) A representative of the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(3) The higher education performance advisory council shall meet at
least four times per year in addition to at least two special meetings
for advisory councilmembers to advise board members. The council shall
consider input from the broad range of higher education stakeholders
across the state.
(4) Legislative members of the higher education performance
advisory council shall serve without additional compensation but may be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while
attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by
the board. Nonlegislative members of the council may be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---