BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning in fiscal year 2011 and every state fiscal year
thereafter, except as provided in this section, intensive water users
who hold a water right document for industrial, agricultural, or
commercial purposes must annually remit a water right protection fee as
provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Exceptions to the requirement to pay water resources management
services fees under this subsection are as follows:
(i) A water right for generating hydroelectric power that requires
payment of an annual license fee under RCW 90.16.050;
(ii) A nonconsumptive water right that does not diminish the source
of water;
(iii) A water right held by the state of Washington;
(iv) A water right held in trust by the state of Washington under
chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW, identified solely for instream purposes and
including water rights held temporarily in trust;
(v) A water right held by the United States, including rights of
Indian tribes held in trust by the United States;
(vi) A water right for storage in a reservoir under RCW 90.03.370.
However, water quantities documented under a secondary permit or
otherwise documented for a beneficial use of water from a reservoir as
the source of water supply, must be assessed the applicable fee under
subsection (2) of this section;
(vii) Persons or entities, both permitted and permit-exempt, that
use water for domestic purposes; and
(viii) Persons or entities, both permitted and permit-exempt, that
use small or moderate amounts of water for industrial, agricultural, or
commercial purposes.
(2)(a) The following schedule of annual water right protection fees
apply only to intensive water users that hold a water right document
for industrial, agricultural, or commercial uses. The fees are based
upon the maximum annual diversion or withdrawal volume allowed under
the water right document as follows:
(i) For equal to or more than one cubic foot per second and less
than eleven cubic feet per second, four hundred fifty dollars;
(ii) For equal to or more than eleven cubic feet per second and
less than two hundred twenty-eight cubic feet per second, seven hundred
fifty dollars; and
(iii) For equal to or more than two hundred twenty-eight cubic feet
per second, nine hundred dollars.
(b) An intensive water user who holds a water right document for
industrial, agricultural, or commercial purposes must be assessed a
single fee for the cumulative quantity of multiple water rights on
record when these rights are appurtenant to the same or adjacently
owned properties. The single fee only accounts for the quantity of
water that can legally be exercised at one time under a user's
portfolio of water rights. In any case, no intensive water user
subject to this fee schedule is required to pay more than nine hundred
dollars per year.
(3) The fees established in this section must also be remitted by
intensive water users that have a water right document for industrial,
agricultural, or commercial purposes and that have a contract with the
United States to use water provided under a water right document held
by the United States. The amount of the fees to be paid by such a
contractor are as provided in subsection (2) of this section based on
the maximum delivery rate under the contract.
(4)(a) The department shall provide notice by mail of the
requirement to pay fees. The notice must provide at least sixty days
from the date of mailing before the fee is due.
(b) For ease and efficiency of administration, the department may
stagger the issuance of the notices and the due dates for payment of
the fee throughout a year by geographic regions of the department and
shall determine the sequence of notification by county within each
region through a random drawing of county names.
(c) The department shall provide a second notice after ninety days
of the date of the original mailing of notice to an intensive water
user who has not responded. The second notice must be by certified
mail with return receipt requested and require payment within thirty
days of the mailing of the second notice. The cost of certified
mailing must be added to the amount due.
(d) The department shall widely publicize the requirement for water
right holders and claimants to pay the fees in this section through
public notices, public service announcements, dissemination through
newsletters of stakeholder groups, by posting on the department's
internet web site, and by other means, including the use of online or
electronic filing of forms and payments the department determines would
be helpful in achieving compliance with these requirements.
(5) For the purpose of updating water right records, the
department's initial notice must include a form that must be completed
and returned with the initial fee payment by an intensive water user
that holds a water right for industrial, agricultural, or commercial
purposes. The form must include, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(a) The identifying water right number that appears on the
supporting document or documents of the subject water right.
Alternately, enclosing a copy of the water right permit, certificate,
or statement of claim filed under RCW 90.14.061 satisfies this
requirement;
(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the entity holding
the water right, if different from the name and contact information in
the bill;
(c) The location or locations at which water is diverted,
withdrawn, or stored;
(d) The legal description and, if available, physical address of
the property or properties on which the water is used;
(e) The purpose or purposes for which water is diverted, withdrawn,
or stored;
(f) The acreage of land irrigated, whether for commercial or
noncommercial purposes, if applicable; and
(g) The product or products manufactured or the nature of the
commercial enterprise in which water is used, if applicable.
(6) The holder of a water right document whose diversion or
withdrawal is metered or measured by a measuring device that is
compliant with the department's metering standards, such as those found
in applicable agency rules, qualifies for a ten percent discount from
the fees required by subsection (2) of this section provided the holder
of the water right document files with the department a one-time
notarized statement confirming that the holder's measuring device
complies with department standards. The notarized statement must be in
a form provided by the department.
(7) An intensive water user may reduce or avoid paying the fee
established in subsection (2) of this section by informing the
department, prior to the date the fee is due, that the water right
document holder intends to withdraw or amend the person's water right
document to reduce the amount on record. The department shall send the
intensive water user the appropriate paperwork to be submitted for this
purpose and reduce the amount of fees due according to the amended
quantity of water. Actions under this subsection do not relieve an
intensive water user from the payment of past due fees from a prior
year.
(8)(a) If an intensive water user required to pay a fee under
subsection (2) of this section fails to do so within one year of the
date that the intensive water user receives the second notice by
certified mail, the department may initiate lien proceedings against
the right or claim or cancellation of the permit, and the intensive
water user's right may be subject to interruption. The water user must
be informed that interest will accrue on any unpaid fee amount in
accordance with (c) of this subsection.
(b) The department may issue orders under RCW 43.27A.190 and civil
penalties under RCW 90.03.600 as a result of unpaid fees.
(c) Interest on unpaid fees accrues and compounds after payment is
ninety days overdue. The interest rate is based on the federal prime
rate on January 1st of the year in which the interest accrues.
(d) The department may contract with the state department of
revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and collection
of fees authorized in this section.
(e) The department may not consider an amendment or change to a
water right document until unpaid fees are remitted.
(9) All receipts from the fees collected under this section must be
deposited into the water rights protection account established in RCW
90.14.240.
(10) Payments remitted under this section are not refundable except
in the case of administrative error that results in overpayment.
(11) Payment of fees required by this section does not constitute
a determination or affirmation of or prima facie evidence of the
validity or extent of any water right or claim.
(12) For the purposes of this section, a "water right document"
includes: A permit issued under RCW 90.03.290, 90.03.370, or
90.44.050; a water right certificate issued under RCW 90.03.240,
90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090; information furnished by a ground
water user as required by the department under RCW 90.44.050; or a
statement of claim filed under RCW 90.14.061.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.240 and 2005 c 412 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The water rights ((tracking system)) protection account is created
in the custody of the state ((treasury)) treasurer. ((Twenty percent
of the fees collected by the department of ecology according to RCW
90.03.470)) All receipts from the fees received under section 1 of this
act must be deposited in the account. ((Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.)) Expenditures from the account may be
used by the department of ecology ((for the development,
implementation, and management of a water rights tracking system,
including a water rights mapping system and a water rights database))
to assist and support water right document holders and to prevent and
address impairment of water rights through department activities,
including but not limited to monitoring, consolidating data and
information, making information accessible to the public, and
enforcement of state water laws. Only the director of the department
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish and maintain up-to-date records of
the entities that hold water rights and claimed rights. It is the
responsibility of all water right holders and claimants to inform the
department when there is a change in ownership or contact information.
The department shall make forms available, including electronically,
for use by persons reporting a change in this information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules to modify and update the fees
established in RCW 90.03.470. The fees must be based on the
department's actual cost to carry out the actions for which fees are
charged in RCW 90.03.470.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must submit a report to the governor and the
legislature on the status of protecting water rights and instream flow
rights by November 30, 2012, and by November 30th of every even-numbered year thereafter through 2020.

--- END ---