BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that overpayments are
a serious problem for state agencies given the magnitude and complexity
of state operations and ongoing audit findings for agency internal
control weaknesses. Overpayments waste tax dollars and detract from
the efficiency and effectiveness of state operations by diverting
resources from their intended uses. An overpayment occurs when an
individual, vendor, or other entity receives a government payment in
error or in excess of the legal amount entitled. The legislature
further finds that some state agencies already diligently work to
recover overpayments through internal audit processes and staff. To
improve the economy and efficiency of governmental operations, the
state should contract for recovery audits to recoup any overpayments
made of state tax dollars to help augment existing state agency efforts
to recover overpayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consultant" means a private contractor with recovery audit
expertise.
(2) "Director" means the director of financial management.
(3) "Overpayment" includes:
(a) Failure to meet eligibility requirements;
(b) Duplicate payments;
(c) Invoice and pricing errors;
(d) Failure to apply discounts, rebates, or other allowances;
(e) Failure to comply with purchasing agreements; and
(f) Any other inadvertent errors resulting in overpayments.
(4) "Recovery audit" means a financial management technique used to
identify overpayments made by a state agency with respect to
individuals, vendors, and other entities in connection with a payment
activity.
(5) "State agency" means a department, office, board, commission,
bureau, division, institution, or institution of higher education.
"State agency" includes individual state agencies and programs, as well
as those programs and activities that cross agency lines, all statewide
elected offices, and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director must contract with
consultants to conduct recovery audits of payments made by state
agencies to individuals, vendors, and other entities.
(2) A contract under this section:
(a) May provide for reasonable compensation for services provided
under the contract, including compensation determined by the
application of a specified percentage of the total amount recovered
because of the consultant's audit activities;
(b) May permit or require the consultant to pursue a judicial
action in a court inside or outside this state to recover an overpaid
amount; and
(c) Must allow time for the performance of existing state payment
auditing procedures and may not allow a recovery audit of a payment
during the ninety-day period after the date the payment was made.
(3) The director or a state agency whose payments are being audited
must provide a person acting under a contract authorized by this
section with any confidential information in the custody of the
director or state agency that is necessary for the performance of the
audit or the recovery audit of an overpayment, to the extent the
director and state agency are not prohibited from sharing the
information under an agreement with another state or the federal
government. A person acting under a contract authorized by this
section, and each employee or agent of the person, is subject to all
prohibitions against the disclosure of confidential information
obtained from the state in connection with the contract that apply to
the director or applicable state agency or an employee of the director
or applicable state agency. A person acting under a contract
authorized by this section or an employee or agent of the person who
discloses confidential information in violation of a prohibition made
applicable to the person under this subsection is subject to
prosecution for a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director must require that recovery
audits be performed on the payments to individuals, vendors, and other
entities made by each state agency that has total expenditures from all
funds during a state fiscal biennium in an amount that exceeds fifty
million dollars.
(2) In addition, the director must require recovery audits for any
state agency that receives an audit finding by the state auditor for
internal control weaknesses concerning agency payments and contracts
after the state agency has been given one hundred eighty days to
address the state auditor findings and implement any recommendations.
(3) Each state agency to which this section applies must provide
the recovery audit consultant with all information necessary for the
audit.
(4) The director may exempt from the mandatory recovery audit
process a state agency or activity, according to criteria the director
adopts by rule, after consideration of the likely costs and benefits of
performing recovery audits for agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) When contracting with consultants for
recovery audits, the director must select the consultant based on the
lowest reasonable compensation for services provided under recovery
audit contracts based on a specified percentage of the total amount
recovered because of a consultant's audit activities.
(2) A state agency must expend or return to the federal government
any federal money that is recovered through a recovery audit conducted
under this chapter. The state agency must expend or return the federal
money in accordance with the rules of the federal program through which
the agency received the federal money.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director must make available
electronic form copies of any reports received from a consultant
contracting under this chapter to:
(a) The governor;
(b) The state auditor's office; and
(c) The legislative fiscal committees of the legislature.
(2) The director must provide the copies required by subsection (1)
of this section not later than the seventh business day after the date
the director receives the consultant's report.
(3) Not later than December 31st of each year, the director must
issue a report to the legislature summarizing the contents of all
reports received under this chapter during the previous fiscal year.
This report must also be posted on the office of financial management's
web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director must adopt rules necessary to
implement this chapter in a timely manner so that the director may
begin contracting with consultants under this chapter not later than
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---