BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.32.730 (Sourcing -- Streamlined sales and use tax
agreement) and 2010 c 106 s 229;
(2) RCW 82.14.490 (Sourcing -- Sales and use taxes) and 2007 c 6 s
503;
(3) RCW 82.14.495 (Streamlined sales and use tax mitigation
account -- Creation) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 952, 2009 c 4 s 907, &
2007 c 6 s 902; and
(4) RCW 82.14.500 (Streamlined sales and use tax mitigation
account -- Funding -- Determination of losses) and 2007 c 6 s 903.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.020 and 2010 c 106 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property is deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet at or
from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services is deemed to have occurred
at the place at which such services were primarily performed, except
that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in RCW
46.55.010, the retail sale is deemed to have occurred at the place of
business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property is deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
is deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and services
involved were primarily performed;
(5) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty is deemed to
have occurred at the business location of the seller if the extended
warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an extended
warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business location of
the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty is deemed to have
occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer occurs;
(8) A retail sale consisting of a digital good, digital code, or
digital automated service is deemed to have occurred at the location
where the purchaser takes receipt of the good, code, or service. The
department may adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection,
including rules that address circumstances where it may be unclear
where receipt by the purchaser occurred;
(9) "City" means a city or town;
(((2))) (10) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, has full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed
under authority of this chapter. However, the terms "retail sale" and
"sale at retail" have only the meaning provided in RCW 82.08.010 for
the purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly requires that
a different definition apply;
(((3))) (11) "Taxable event" means any retail sale, or any use,
upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended. However, the term
does not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW 82.08.150, as
now or hereafter amended; and
(((4))) (12) "Treasurer or other legal depository" means the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.390 and 2008 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((7))) (6) of this section,
the governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before
July 31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences
construction of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation
of an existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created
before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than ninety thousand that commences construction of a new
regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) created under the
authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d) created before September 1,
2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than seventy thousand, that commences construction of a new
regional center before January 1, 2009, or before January 1, 2011, in
the case of a new regional center in a county designated by the
president as a disaster area in December 2007, may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax ((shall)) may
not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales
tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2)(((a) The governing body of a public facilities district
imposing a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may
increase the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal
years of July 1, 2008, the department determines that, as a result of
RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW
82.14.020, a public facilities district's sales and use tax collections
for fiscal years after July 1, 2008, have been reduced by a net loss of
at least 0.50 percent from the fiscal year before July 1, 2008. The
fiscal year in which this section becomes effective is the first fiscal
year after July 1, 2008.
(b) The department shall determine sales and use tax collection net
losses under this section as provided in RCW 82.14.500 (2) and (3).
The department shall provide written notice of its determinations to
public facilities districts. Determinations by the department of a
public facilities district's sales and use tax collection net losses as
a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to
RCW 82.14.020 are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of
RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW
82.14.020. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to RCW
82.14.055.
(3))) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to
be collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue ((shall)) must perform
the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
public facilities district.
(((4))) (3) No tax may be collected under this section before
August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this section ((shall)) expires when
the bonds issued for the construction of the regional center and
related parking facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five
years after the tax is first collected.
(((5))) (4) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) may only
be used for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched
with an amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this section, provided that
amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter
35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100
RCW ((shall)) does not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not
limited to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the
development or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated
and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind
contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed
to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.
(((6))) (5) The combined total tax levied under this section
((shall)) may not be greater than ((0.037)) 0.033 percent. If both a
public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under
this section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created
under chapter 35.57 RCW ((shall)) must be credited against the tax
imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100
RCW.
(((7))) (6) A public facilities district created under chapter
36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the
legislative authority of the county where the public facilities
district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

--- END ---