BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that for ensuing
biennia, the Washington state patrol, ferry operations, as well as
state and local roadway preservation and maintenance activities will
soon experience significant funding shortfalls. The legislature
further recognizes that existing law, enacted in 2002, requires the
department of licensing to submit a fee study every two years to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and the
senate, the purpose of which is to ensure cost recovery for
transportation services. Based on the review of the department of
licensing's fee study, the legislature will review and adjust fees
accordingly each biennium to ensure that fees are adjusted and brought
up-to-date. The legislature further recognizes that previous studies
conducted by the joint transportation committee have recommended
various fees adjustments. The legislature finds that many of the fee
adjustments identified in these studies have not been made for several
years. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to adjust
certain fees for the sole purposes of addressing funding shortfalls in
certain transportation programs, providing gap funding for local
transportation entities along with roadway preservation for cities and
counties, and bringing fees in-line with costs. Accordingly, the
legislature intends to provide additional funding solely for: The
Washington state patrol; the Washington state ferry operating and
capital programs; the department of transportation highway maintenance
and preservation programs; the department of transportation public
transportation program; the transportation improvement board; the
county road administration board; the freight mobility strategic
investment board; the safe routes to schools program; and the state
treasurer, for the purposes of debt service and ancillary costs related
to bonds issued to fund the construction of a ferry boat vessel.

I. APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Additive transportation funding is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes for the period ending June 30, 2013.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout the act:
(a) "Lapse" means the amount shall return to unappropriated status.
(b) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(c) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,600,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the auto theft investigation units
in King county, Spokane, and Tacoma.
(2) $9,500,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
and $500,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation
are provided solely for equipment acquisition, installation,
integration, and financing needs associated with the conversion of the
existing communication system to narrowbanding as required by the
federal communications commission.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the total
appropriation in this section must be used by the Washington state
patrol for the ongoing operations of the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,500,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation and $2,500,000 of the highway safety
account--state appropriation are provided solely to further reduce the
highway maintenance backlog in order to maintain or increase levels of
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,005,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section must be
distributed statewide to transit entities as shown in LEAP
Transportation Document 2011-TR1, as developed on May 24, 2011. The
basis for the distribution to each entity is the entity's pro rata
share of the total passenger trips statewide by all transit entities in
calendar years 2008 and 2009, as compiled by the public transportation
program, except that no entity may receive less than one hundred
thousand dollars and no entity may receive more than twenty percent of
the appropriation in this section. Funding must be used for
operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE--PROGRAM X
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the purchase of fuel for marine operations.
(2) $4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain the same level of service provided in the
2009-2011 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to help
cities meet urgent preservation and storm water needs.
(2) $4,500,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the urban arterial program.
(3) $500,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the small city pavement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the county arterial preservation program to help
counties meet urgent preservation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for urgent preservation needs on the state highway
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of constructing a
ferry boat vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred
forty-four cars.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $144,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL
PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely to the freight mobility strategic investment board
for grants to meet urgent freight corridor improvement and preservation
needs.
(2) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
and $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for safe routes to schools program projects, in rank
order, and identified as contingency projects in the LEAP
Transportation Document 2011-A, pedestrian and bicycle safety program
projects and safe routes to school program projects, referenced in
chapter 367, Laws of 2011 (the omnibus transportation appropriations
act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000

II. DRIVER FEES
Sec. 14 RCW 46.20.055 and 2010 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee ((of twenty dollars)) as required under
subsection (5) of this section, and meets the following requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit;
(b) The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to ((renew an)) receive a second or third
instruction permit must submit the application to the department in
person and pay a twenty-five dollar fee.
(5) Examination fee. An applicant who takes the examination
required under this section must pay a fee of twenty-five dollars for
each examination taken, irrespective of passage or failure.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is ((twenty)) twenty-five
dollars unless an applicant is a recipient of continuing public
assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the
secretary of social and health services. For those persons the fee
must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.20.120 and 2005 c 314 s 306 and 2005 c 61 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) All or any part of the examination involving operating a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under RCW 46.20.125; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ((twenty)) thirty-five dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. ((However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.))
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

Sec. 17 RCW 46.20.200 and 2002 c 352 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If an instruction permit, identicard, or a driver's license is
lost or destroyed, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a
duplicate of it upon furnishing proof of such fact satisfactory to the
department and payment of a fee of ((fifteen)) twenty dollars to the
department.
(2) A replacement permit, identicard, or driver's license may be
obtained to change or correct material information upon payment of a
fee of ten dollars and surrender of the permit, identicard, or driver's
license being replaced.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.20.308 and 2008 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503. Neither
consent nor this section precludes a police officer from obtaining a
search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility or
where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is
under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the
following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver is age
twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of
the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if the driver is under
age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the
driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if the driver is under age
twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504; and
(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is
suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without
the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section and that the person waives the right to a hearing if he or she
receives an ignition interlock driver's license;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within twenty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of ((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollars as part
of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within
twenty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of
such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required
((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollar fee, the department shall
afford the person an opportunity for a hearing. The department may
waive the required ((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollar fee if the
person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the person was under the
age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a)
whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request
of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege
to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to
the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without express
consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the
time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

III. VEHICLE FEES
Sec. 19 RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any
other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall
pay a ((three)) seven dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees
and taxes required by law.
(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a
((four)) eight dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees and
taxes required by law.
(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed
under RCW 46.68.400.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.17.100 and 2010 c 161 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a certificate of title as
required in this title, the department, county auditor or other agent,
or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to
pay a ((five)) fifteen dollar application fee in addition to any other
fees and taxes required by law. The certificate of title application
fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.020.

Sec. 21 RCW 46.17.140 and 2010 c 161 s 512 are each amended to
read as follows:
The penalty for a late transfer under RCW 46.12.650(7) is ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars assessed on the sixteenth day after the date of
delivery and two dollars for each additional day thereafter, but the
total penalty must not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars. The
penalty must be distributed under RCW 46.68.020.

Sec. 22 RCW 46.17.200 and 2011 c 171 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Original issue $10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Reflectivity $2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue,
motorcycle $2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement,
motorcycle $2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, moped $1.50 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(a)(iii), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes to retain
the current license plate number upon license plate replacement, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The twenty dollar
fee must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

IV. MISCELLANEOUS FEES
Sec. 23 RCW 46.52.130 and 2010 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon a proper request, the department may furnish an abstract of a
person's driving record as permitted under this section.
(1) Contents of abstract of driving record. An abstract of a
person's driving record, whenever possible, must include:
(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person
was driving, including:
(i) The total number of vehicles involved;
(ii) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;
(iii) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; and
(iv) Whether the accident resulted in a fatality;
(b) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that
an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle
law;
(c) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and
(d) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic
citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon
the named individual by an arresting officer.
(2) Release of abstract of driving record. An abstract of a
person's driving record may be furnished to the following persons or
entities:
(a) Named individuals. (i) An abstract of the full driving record
maintained by the department may be furnished to the individual named
in the abstract.
(ii) Nothing in this section prevents a court from providing a copy
of the driver's abstract to the individual named in the abstract,
provided that the named individual has a pending or open infraction or
criminal case in that court. A pending case includes criminal cases
that have not reached a disposition by plea, stipulation, trial, or
amended charge. An open infraction or criminal case includes cases on
probation, payment agreement or subject to, or in collections. Courts
may charge a reasonable fee for the production and copying of the
abstract for the individual.
(b) Employers or prospective employers. (i) An abstract of the
full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an
employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an
employer or prospective employer of the named individual for purposes
related to driving by the individual as a condition of employment or
otherwise at the direction of the employer.
(ii) Release of an abstract of the driving record of an employee or
prospective employee requires a statement signed by: (A) The employee
or prospective employee that authorizes the release of the record; and
(B) the employer attesting that the information is necessary for
employment purposes related to driving by the individual as a condition
of employment or otherwise at the direction of the employer. If the
employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain this
information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.
(iii) Upon request of the person named in the abstract provided
under this subsection, and upon that same person furnishing copies of
court records ruling that the person was not at fault in a motor
vehicle accident, the department must indicate on any abstract provided
under this subsection that the person was not at fault in the motor
vehicle accident.
(c) Volunteer organizations. (i) An abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department may be furnished to a volunteer
organization or an agent for a volunteer organization for which the
named individual has submitted an application for a position that would
require driving by the individual at the direction of the volunteer
organization.
(ii) Release of an abstract of the driving record of a prospective
volunteer requires a statement signed by: (A) The prospective
volunteer that authorizes the release of the record; and (B) the
volunteer organization attesting that the information is necessary for
purposes related to driving by the individual at the direction of the
volunteer organization. If the volunteer organization authorizes an
agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this must be noted in
the statement.
(d) Transit authorities. An abstract of the full driving record
maintained by the department may be furnished to an employee or agent
of a transit authority checking prospective volunteer vanpool drivers
for insurance and risk management needs.
(e) Insurance carriers. (i) An abstract of the driving record
maintained by the department covering the period of not more than the
last three years may be furnished to an insurance company or its agent:
(A) That has motor vehicle or life insurance in effect covering the
named individual;
(B) To which the named individual has applied; or
(C) That has insurance in effect covering the employer or a
prospective employer of the named individual.
(ii) The abstract provided to the insurance company must:
(A) Not contain any information related to actions committed by law
enforcement officers or firefighters, as both terms are defined in RCW
41.26.030, or by Washington state patrol officers, while driving
official vehicles in the performance of their occupational duty. This
does not apply to any situation where the vehicle was used in the
commission of a misdemeanor or felony;
(B) Include convictions under RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525, except
that the abstract must report the convictions only as negligent driving
without reference to whether they are for first or second degree
negligent driving; and
(C) Exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060, except
that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution under RCW
10.05.090, the abstract must show the deferred prosecution as well as
the removal.
(iii) Any policy of insurance may not be canceled, nonrenewed,
denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of information
regarding an accident included in the abstract of a driving record,
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault.
(iv) Any insurance company or its agent, for underwriting purposes
relating to the operation of commercial motor vehicles, may not use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's
operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such employment. Any
insurance company or its agent, for underwriting purposes relating to
the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles, may not use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's
operation of commercial motor vehicles.
(v) The director may enter into a contractual agreement with an
insurance company or its agent for the limited purpose of reviewing the
driving records of existing policyholders for changes to the record
during specified periods of time. The department shall establish a fee
for this service, which must be deposited in the highway safety fund.
The fee for this service must be set at a level that will not result in
a net revenue loss to the state. Any information provided under this
subsection must be treated in the same manner and is subject to the
same restrictions as driving record abstracts.
(f) Alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies. An abstract of
the driving record maintained by the department covering the period of
not more than the last five years may be furnished to an alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and
health services to which the named individual has applied or been
assigned for evaluation or treatment, for purposes of assisting
employees in making a determination as to what level of treatment, if
any, is appropriate, except that the abstract must:
(i) Also include records of alcohol-related offenses, as defined in
RCW 46.01.260(2), covering a period of not more than the last ten
years; and
(ii) Indicate whether an alcohol-related offense was originally
charged as a violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.
(g) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys. An abstract
of the full driving record maintained by the department, including
whether a recorded violation is an alcohol-related offense, as defined
in RCW 46.01.260(2), that was originally charged as a violation of
either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, may be furnished to city attorneys
or county prosecuting attorneys. City attorneys and county prosecuting
attorneys may provide the driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agencies approved by the department of social and health
services to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for
evaluation or treatment.
(h) State colleges, universities, or agencies, or units of local
government. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the
department may be furnished to (i) state colleges, universities, or
agencies for employment and risk management purposes or (ii) units of
local government authorized to self-insure under RCW 48.62.031 for
employment and risk management purposes.
(i) Superintendent of public instruction. An abstract of the full
driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to the
superintendent of public instruction for review of public school bus
driver records. The superintendent or superintendent's designee may
discuss information on the driving record with an authorized
representative of the employing school district for employment and risk
management purposes.
(3) Release to third parties prohibited. Any person or entity
receiving an abstract of a person's driving record under subsection
(2)(b) through (i) of this section shall use the abstract exclusively
for his, her, or its own purposes or as otherwise expressly permitted
under this section, and shall not divulge any information contained in
the abstract to a third party.
(4) Fee. The director shall collect a ((ten-dollar)) twelve dollar
fee for each abstract of a person's driving record furnished by the
department. Fifty percent of the fee must be deposited in the highway
safety fund, and fifty percent of the fee must be deposited according
to RCW 46.68.038.
(5) Violation. (a) Any negligent violation of this section is a
gross misdemeanor.
(b) Any intentional violation of this section is a class C felony.

Sec. 24 RCW 46.29.050 and 2010 c 8 s 9028 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall upon request furnish any person or his or
her attorney a certified abstract of his or her driving record, which
abstract shall include enumeration of any motor vehicle accidents in
which such person has been involved. Such abstract shall (a) indicate
the total number of vehicles involved, whether the vehicles were
legally parked or moving, and whether the vehicles were occupied at the
time of the accident; and (b) contain reference to any convictions of
the person for violation of the motor vehicle laws as reported to the
department, reference to any findings that the person has committed a
traffic infraction which have been reported to the department, and a
record of any vehicles registered in the name of the person. ((The
department shall collect for each abstract the sum of ten dollars,
fifty percent of which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund
and fifty percent of which must be deposited according to RCW
46.68.038.))
(2) The department shall upon request furnish any person who may
have been injured in person or property by any motor vehicle, with an
abstract of all information of record in the department pertaining to
the evidence of the ability of any driver or owner of any motor vehicle
to respond in damages. ((The department shall collect for each
abstract the sum of ten dollars, fifty percent of which shall be
deposited in the highway safety fund and fifty percent of which must be
deposited according to RCW 46.68.038.))
(3) For each abstract furnished under this section, the department
must collect and administer a fee as required in RCW 46.52.130.

Sec. 25 RCW 46.20.293 and 2007 c 424 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to provide juvenile courts with the
department's record of traffic charges compiled under RCW 46.52.101 and
13.50.200, against any minor upon the request of any state juvenile
court or duly authorized officer of any juvenile court of this state.
Further, the department is authorized to provide any juvenile court
with any requested service which the department can reasonably perform
which is not inconsistent with its legal authority which substantially
aids juvenile courts in handling traffic cases and which promotes
highway safety.
The department is authorized to furnish to the parent, parents, or
guardian of any person under eighteen years of age who is not
emancipated from such parent, parents, or guardian, the department
records of traffic charges compiled against the person and shall
collect for the copy a fee of ((ten)) twelve dollars, fifty percent of
which must be deposited in the highway safety fund and fifty percent of
which must be deposited according to RCW 46.68.038.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Sections 14 through 25 of this act apply to
vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---