BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.260 and 2011 c 2 s 203 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f)(i) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(ii) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (1)(f) must file a complete annual survey with the
department under RCW 82.32.585.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4494 and 2009 c 469 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, harvesters are
allowed a credit against the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter, as provided in this section. The credit per harvested green
ton of forest derived biomass sold, transferred, or used for production
of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel is as follows:
(a) For forest derived biomass harvested October 1, 2009, through
June 30, 2010, zero dollars;
(b) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2010, through June
30, 2013, three dollars;
(c) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2013, through June
30, 2015, five dollars.
(2) Credit may not be claimed for forest derived biomass sold,
transferred, or used before July 1, 2009. The amount of credit allowed
for a reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this
chapter for that reporting period. Any unused excess credit in a
reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting periods for
a maximum of two years.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "harvested" and "harvesters"
are defined in RCW 84.33.035, and "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(4) A person claiming the tax credit provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.956 and 2009 c 469 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog
fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including
forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood
pellets; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) A person claiming the tax credit provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.956 and 2009 c 469 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956;
and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) A person claiming the tax credit provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2013.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.585 and 2010 c 114 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax ((preference)) expenditure that
requires a survey under this section must file a complete annual survey
with the department.
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the survey is
due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a
person becomes eligible to claim the tax ((preference)) expenditure
that requires a survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax ((preference)) expenditure is a deferral of tax,
the first survey must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year
following the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as operationally complete, and a survey
must be filed by April 30th of each of the seven succeeding calendar
years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax ((preference))
expenditure claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax ((preference)) expenditure was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax ((preference)) expenditure
provided under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include
the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with activities at the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax ((preference)) expenditure has
been assigned, and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW
82.04.4452 apply to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax ((preference)) expenditure was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax ((preference)) expenditure.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax ((preference)) expenditure claimed, is deemed taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax
((preference)) expenditure claimed is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section. If the amount of the tax ((preference)) expenditure claimed
as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed
or otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise
tax returns or other information known to the department, the amount
actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax ((preference)) expenditure that requires an annual survey under
this section but fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due
date of the survey or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department
must declare the amount of the tax ((preference)) expenditure claimed
for the previous calendar year to be immediately due. If the tax
((preference)) expenditure is a deferral of tax, twelve and one-half
percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b)(i) If a person claims a tax expenditure that does not produce
a net benefit to the state each year, the department must declare the
amount of the tax expenditure claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due and payable.
(ii) The amount otherwise due and payable under (b)(i) of this
subsection may be waived if the failure to produce a net benefit to the
state was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer.
(iii) If the tax expenditure is a deferral of tax, twelve and
one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due.
(iv) If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee
has received the economic benefit.
(c) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax ((preference)) expenditure was
claimed, and accrues until the taxes for which the tax ((preference))
expenditure was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under this subsection
are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and
may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
determine the net benefit to the state of any individual's tax
expenditure for purposes of subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(8) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(((8))) (9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax ((preference)) expenditure" has the meaning ((provided))
as "tax preference" in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax
((preferences)) expenditures requiring a survey under this section.
(c) "Net benefit to the state" means the amount of economic benefit
to the state in jobs created or retained, if the stated legislative
intent of the tax expenditure was job creation or retention, plus the
amount of increased economic activity directly related to the tax
expenditure claimed, measured by the amount of taxes paid by the
increased economic activity claimed, minus the annual amount of
taxpayer savings.
(i) For purposes of this subsection (9)(c), the amount of economic
benefit to the state in jobs created or retained must be measured by
state and local taxes paid by an employee, which must be calculated as
a percentage of the annual wage for each employment position as
follows:
(A) For an annual wage of less than twenty thousand dollars, the
percentage is 17.3 percent;
(B) For an annual wage of more than twenty thousand dollars and
less than thirty-seven thousand dollars, the percentage is 12.7
percent;
(C) For an annual wage of more than thirty-seven thousand dollars
and less than sixty-two thousand dollars, the percentage is 11.2
percent;
(D) For an annual wage of more than sixty-two thousand dollars and
less than ninety-nine thousand dollars, the percentage is 9.5 percent;
and
(E) For an annual wage of more than ninety-nine thousand dollars,
the percentage is 7.6 percent.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (9)(c), the amount of
increased economic activity directly related to the tax expenditure
claimed must be measured by the increased taxes paid by the taxpayer
annually on the activity directly related to the tax expenditure minus
the annual amount of taxpayer savings.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.534 and 2010 c 114 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax ((preference)) expenditure that
requires a report under this section must file a complete annual report
with the department. The report is due by April 30th of the year
following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim
the tax ((preference)) expenditure that requires a report under this
section. The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax
((preference)) expenditure was claimed. However, persons engaged in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes may
report employment, wage, and benefit information per job at the
manufacturing site for the year that the tax ((preference)) expenditure
was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The
report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time,
part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax
((preference)) expenditure was claimed.
(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax ((preference))
expenditure provided by RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax
((preferences)) expenditures provided by RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481,
82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must indicate on the annual
report the quantity of product produced in this state during the time
period covered by the report.
(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which a tax ((preference)) expenditure was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax ((preference)) expenditure.
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax ((preference)) expenditure that requires an annual report under
this section but fails to submit a complete report by the due date or
any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax ((preference)) expenditure claimed for the previous
calendar year to be immediately due and payable.
(b)(i) If a person claims a tax expenditure that does not produce
a net benefit to the state each year, the department must declare the
amount of the tax expenditure claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due and payable.
(ii) The amount otherwise due and payable under (b)(i) of this
subsection may be waived if the failure to produce a net benefit to the
state was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer.
(c) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax ((preference)) expenditure was
claimed, and accrues until the taxes for which the tax ((preference))
expenditure was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under this subsection
are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and
may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
determine the net benefit to the state of any individual's tax
expenditure for purposes of subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(6) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Net benefit to the state" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.32.585.
(b) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(((b))) (c) "Tax ((preference)) expenditure" has the meaning
((provided)) as "tax preference" in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only
the tax ((preferences)) expenditures requiring a survey under this
section.

--- END ---