BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Under Article IX of the Washington state
Constitution, all children are entitled to an opportunity to receive a
basic education. Although the state must assure that students in
public schools have opportunities to participate in the instructional
program of basic education, there is no obligation for either the state
or school districts to provide that instruction using a particular
delivery method or through a particular program.
(2) The legislature finds ample evidence of the need to examine and
reconsider policies under which alternative learning that occurs
outside the classroom using an individual student learning plan may be
considered equivalent to full-time attendance in school, including for
funding purposes. Previous legislative studies have raised questions
about financial practices and accountability in alternative learning
experience programs. Since 2005, there has been significant enrollment
growth in alternative learning experience online programs, with
evidence of unexpected financial impact when large numbers of
nonresident students enroll in programs. Based on this evidence, there
is a rational basis on which to conclude that there are different costs
associated with providing a program not primarily based on full-time,
daily contact between teachers and students and not primarily occurring
on-site in a classroom.
(3) For these reasons, the legislature intends to allow for
continuing review and revision of the way in which state funding
allocations are used to support alternative learning experience
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "alternative learning experience
program" means a course or set of courses that is:
(a) Provided in whole or in part independently from a regular
classroom setting or schedule, but may include some components of
direct instruction;
(b) Supervised, monitored, assessed, evaluated, and documented by
a certificated teacher employed by the school district or under
contract as permitted by applicable rules; and
(c) Provided in accordance with a written student learning plan
that is implemented pursuant to the school district's policy and rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for alternative
learning experiences.
(2) Alternative learning experience programs include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Alternative learning experience online programs as defined in
RCW 28A.150.262;
(b) Programs that include significant participation and partnership
by parents and families in the design and implementation of a student's
learning experience; and
(c) Programs that use a written student learning plan to direct the
student in independent study.
(3) School districts that offer alternative learning experience
programs may not provide any compensation, reimbursement, gift, reward,
or gratuity to any parents, guardians, or students for participation.
This prohibition includes, but is not limited to, providing funds to
parents, guardians, or students for the purchase of educational
materials, supplies, experiences, services, or technological equipment.
A district may purchase educational materials, equipment, or other
nonconsumable supplies for students' use in alternative learning
experience programs if the purchase is consistent with the district's
approved curriculum, conforms to applicable laws and rules, and is made
in the same manner as such purchases are made for students in the
district's regular instructional program. Items so purchased remain
the property of the school district upon program completion. School
districts may not purchase or contract for instructional or co-curricular experiences and services that are included in an alternative
learning experience written student learning plan, including but not
limited to lessons, trips, and other activities, unless such
experiences and services are provided in the same manner and to the
same extent to students enrolled in the district's regular
instructional program. School districts that purchase or contract for
such experiences and services for students enrolled in an alternative
learning experience program must submit an annual report to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction detailing the costs and
purposes of the expenditures. These requirements extend to contracted
providers of alternative learning experience programs, and each
district shall be responsible for monitoring the compliance of its
providers with these requirements.
(4) To count as a full-time equivalent student or portion thereof
for purposes of state funding under RCW 28A.150.260, students
participating in alternative learning experience programs must receive
one hour per week of face-to-face, in-person instructional contact time
from a certificated teacher. The supervising teacher may rely on
synchronous digital communication, including telephone or interactive
audio or video communications, to meet the requirement for face-to-face, in-person contact with students due to reasons of medical
necessity or when the student's temporary travel makes the in-person
contact infeasible. For alternative learning experience online
programs under RCW 28A.150.262, this requirement may be satisfied by
one hour per week of direct personal contact in compliance with RCW
28A.150.262(11).
(5) Part-time enrollment in alternative learning experiences is
subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.150.350.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
defining minimum requirements and accountability for alternative
learning experience programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2009 c 542 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through alternative learning
experience online programs. As used in this section and section 2 of
this act, an "alternative learning experience online program" is a set
of online courses or an online school program as defined in RCW
28A.250.010 that is delivered to students in whole or in part
independently from a regular classroom schedule. ((The superintendent
of public instruction has the authority to adopt rules to implement the
revised definition beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium for school
districts claiming state funding for the programs.)) Beginning in the
2012-13 school year, alternative learning experience online programs
must be offered by an online provider approved by the superintendent of
public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020 to meet the definition in this
section. The rules shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress; the rules shall
require districts providing programs under this section to nonresident
students to establish procedures that address, at a minimum, the
coordination of student counting for state funding so that no student
is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, an alternative learning
experience online program to adopt and annually review written policies
for each program and program provider and to receive an annual report
on its digital alternative learning experience online programs from its
staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
an alternative learning experience online program to report annually to
the superintendent of public instruction on the types of programs and
course offerings, and number of students participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the alternative learning experience online program be
provided by a certificated ((instructional staff)) teacher;
(7) Requiring each school district offering courses or programs to
identify the ratio of certificated instructional staff to full-time
equivalent students enrolled in such courses or programs, and to
include a description of their ratio as part of the reports required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in an
alternative learning experience online program, a learning plan that
includes a description of course objectives and information on the
requirements a student must meet to successfully complete the program
or courses. The rules shall allow course syllabi and other additional
information to be used to meet the requirement for a learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with a certificated ((instructional staff))
teacher at least weekly until the student completes the course
objectives or the requirements in the learning plan. Direct personal
contact is for the purposes of instruction, review of assignments,
testing, evaluation of student progress, or other learning activities.
Direct personal contact may include the use of telephone, e-mail,
instant messaging, interactive video communication, or other means of
digital communication. At least one hour per week of the direct
personal contact must be synchronous between the teacher and the
student;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning programs to receive accreditation through
the Northwest ((association of accredited schools)) accreditation
commission or another national, regional, or state accreditation
program listed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction after consultation with the Washington coalition for online
learning;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning to provide information to students and
parents on whether or not the courses or programs: Cover one or more
of the school district's learning goals or of the state's essential
academic learning requirements or whether they permit the student to
meet one or more of the state's or district's graduation requirements;
and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
alternative learning experience online courses to a student provide the
parent or guardian of the student, prior to the student's enrollment,
with a description of any difference between home-based education as
described in chapter 28A.200 RCW and the enrollment option selected by
the student. The parent or guardian shall sign documentation attesting
to his or her understanding of the difference and the documentation
shall be retained by the district and made available for audit.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.250.005 and 2009 c 542 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that online learning provides tremendous
opportunities for students to access curriculum, courses, and a unique
learning environment that might not otherwise be available. The
legislature supports and encourages online learning opportunities.
(2) However, the legislature also finds that there is a need to
assure quality in online learning, both for the programs and the
administration of those programs. The legislature is the steward of
public funds that support students enrolled in online learning and must
ensure an appropriate accountability system at the state level.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to take a first step in
improving oversight and quality assurance of online learning programs,
and intends to examine possible additional steps that may need to be
taken to improve financial accountability.
(4) The first step in improving quality assurance is to:
(a) Provide objective information to students, parents, and
educators regarding available online learning opportunities, including
program and course content, how to register for programs and courses,
teacher qualifications, student-to-teacher ratios, prior course
completion rates, and other evaluative information;
(b) Create an approval process for ((multidistrict)) online
providers;
(c) Enhance statewide equity of student access to high quality
online learning opportunities; and
(d) Require school district boards of directors to develop policies
and procedures for student access to online learning opportunities.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.250.010 and 2009 c 542 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Multidistrict online provider" means:
(i) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into a contract
with a school district to provide online courses or programs to K-12
students from more than one school district;
(ii) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into contracts
with multiple school districts to provide online courses or programs to
K-12 students from those districts; or
(iii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a school
district that provides online courses or programs to students who
reside outside the geographic boundaries of the school district.
(b) "Multidistrict online provider" does not include a school
district online learning program in which fewer than ten percent of the
students enrolled in the program are from other districts under the
interdistrict student transfer provisions of RCW 28A.225.225.
"Multidistrict online provider" also does not include regional online
learning programs that are jointly developed and implemented by two or
more school districts or an educational service district through an
interdistrict cooperative program agreement that addresses, at minimum,
how the districts share student full-time equivalency for state basic
education funding purposes and how categorical education programs,
including special education, are provided to eligible students.
(2)(a) "Online course" means a course ((that)) where:
(i) More than half of the course content is delivered ((primarily))
electronically using the internet or other computer-based methods; and
(ii) ((Is taught by a teacher primarily from a remote location.
Students enrolled in an online course may have access to the teacher
synchronously, asynchronously, or both)) More than half of the teaching
is conducted from a remote location through an online course learning
management system or other online or electronic tools.
(b) "Online school program" means a school program that:
(i) Offers courses or grade-level coursework that is delivered
primarily electronically using the internet or other computer-based
methods;
(ii) Offers courses or grade-level coursework that is taught by a
teacher primarily from a remote location using online or other
electronic tools. Students enrolled in an online program may have
access to the teacher synchronously, asynchronously, or both;
(iii) ((Delivers a part-time or full-time sequential program))
Offers a sequential set of online courses or grade-level coursework
that may be taken in a single school term or throughout the school year
in a manner that could provide a full-time basic education program if
so desired by the student. Students may enroll in the program as part-time or full-time students; and
(iv) Has an online component of the program with online lessons and
tools for student and data management.
(c) An online course or online school program may be delivered to
students at school as part of the regularly scheduled school day. An
online course or online school program also may be delivered to
students, in whole or in part, independently from a regular classroom
schedule, but such courses or programs must comply with RCW 28A.150.262
to qualify for state basic education funding.
(3) "Online provider" means any provider of an online course or
program, including multidistrict online providers, all school district
online learning programs, and all regional online learning programs.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.250.020 and 2009 c 542 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with
the state board of education, shall develop and implement approval
criteria and a process for approving ((multidistrict)) online
providers; a process for monitoring and if necessary rescinding the
approval of courses or programs offered by an online ((course))
provider; and an appeals process. The criteria and processes for
multidistrict online providers shall be adopted by rule by December 1,
2009.
(2) When developing the approval criteria, the superintendent of
public instruction shall require that providers offering online courses
or programs have accreditation through the Northwest ((association of
accredited schools)) accreditation commission or another national,
regional, or state accreditation program listed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction after consultation with the
Washington coalition for online learning. In addition to other
criteria, the approval criteria shall include the degree of alignment
with state academic standards and require that all teachers be
certificated in accordance with Washington state law. When reviewing
((multidistrict)) online providers that offer high school courses, the
superintendent of public instruction shall assure that the courses
offered by the provider are eligible for high school credit. However,
final decisions regarding the awarding of high school credit shall
remain the responsibility of school districts.
(3) Initial approval of ((multidistrict)) online providers by the
superintendent of public instruction shall be for four years. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop a process for the
renewal of approvals and for rescinding approvals based on
noncompliance with approval requirements. Any multidistrict online
provider that was approved by the digital learning commons or
accredited by the Northwest association of accredited schools before
July 26, 2009, and that meets the teacher certification requirements of
subsection (2) of this section, is exempt from the initial approval
process under this section until August 31, 2012, but must comply with
the process for renewal of approvals and must comply with approval
requirements.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall make the first
round of decisions regarding approval of multidistrict online providers
by April 1, 2010. The first round of decisions regarding approval of
online providers that are not multidistrict online providers shall be
made by April 1, 2012. Thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall make annual approval decisions no later than November
1st of each year.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish an
online learning advisory committee within existing resources that shall
provide advice to the superintendent regarding the approval criteria,
major components of the web site, the model school district policy,
model agreements, and other related matters. The committee shall
include a representative of each of the following groups: Private and
public online providers, parents of online students, accreditation
organizations, educational service districts, school principals,
teachers, school administrators, school board members, institutions of
higher education, and other individuals as determined by the
superintendent. Members of the advisory committee shall be selected by
the superintendent based on nominations from statewide organizations,
shall serve three-year terms, and may be reappointed. The
superintendent shall select the chair of the committee.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.250.030 and 2009 c 542 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall create an office of
online learning. In the initial establishment of the office, the
superintendent shall hire staff who have been employed by the digital
learning commons to the extent such hiring is in accordance with state
law and to the extent funds are available. The office shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a web site that provides objective
information for students, parents, and educators regarding online
learning opportunities offered by ((multidistrict)) online providers
that have been approved in accordance with RCW 28A.250.020. The web
site shall include information regarding the online course provider's
overall instructional program, specific information regarding the
content of individual online courses and online school programs, a
direct link to each online course provider's web site, how to register
for online learning programs and courses, teacher qualifications,
student-to-teacher ratios, course completion rates, and other
evaluative and comparative information. The web site shall also
provide information regarding the process and criteria for approving
((multidistrict)) online providers. To the greatest extent possible,
the superintendent shall use the framework of the course offering
component of the web site developed by the digital learning commons;
(2) Develop model agreements with approved ((multidistrict)) online
providers that address standard contract terms and conditions that may
apply to contracts between a school district and the approved provider.
The purpose of the agreements is to provide a template to assist
individual school districts, at the discretion of the district, in
contracting with ((multidistrict)) online providers to offer the
((multidistrict)) online provider's courses and programs to students in
the district. The agreements may address billing, fees,
responsibilities of online course providers and school districts, and
other issues; and
(3) In collaboration with the educational service districts:
(a) Provide technical assistance and support to school district
personnel through the educational technology centers in the development
and implementation of online learning programs in their districts; and
(b) To the extent funds are available, provide online learning
tools for students, teachers, administrators, and other educators.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.250.060 and 2009 c 542 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, school districts may
claim state ((basic education)) funding under RCW 28A.150.260, to the
extent otherwise allowed by state law, for students enrolled in online
courses or programs only if the online courses or programs are:
(a) Offered by a multidistrict online provider approved under RCW
28A.250.020 by the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Offered by a school district online learning program if the
program serves students who reside within the geographic boundaries of
the school district, including school district programs in which fewer
than ten percent of the program's students reside outside the school
district's geographic boundaries; or
(c) Offered by a regional online learning program where courses are
jointly developed and offered by two or more school districts or an
educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative
program agreement.
(2) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, school districts may
claim state funding under RCW 28A.150.260, to the extent otherwise
allowed by state law, for students enrolled in online courses or
programs only if the online courses or programs are offered by an
online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020 by the superintendent of
public instruction.
(3) Criteria shall be established by the superintendent of public
instruction to allow online courses that have not been approved by the
superintendent of public instruction to be eligible for state funding
if the course is in a subject matter in which no courses have been
approved and, if it is a high school course, the course meets
Washington high school graduation requirements.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2010 c 236 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act. The allocations calculated under subsections (4)
through (12) of this section may be adjusted as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for students whose full-time equivalent enrollment
status is calculated based on enrollment in an alternative learning
experience program as defined in section 2 of this act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and
graduation advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.150.100 and 2010 c 236 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.150.410 and
28A.400.200, "basic education certificated instructional staff" means
all full-time equivalent classroom teachers, teacher librarians,
guidance counselors, certificated student health services staff, and
other certificated instructional staff in the following programs as
defined for statewide school district accounting purposes: Basic
education, secondary vocational education, general instructional
support, and general supportive services.
(2) Each school district shall maintain a ratio of at least forty-six basic education certificated instructional staff to one thousand
annual average full-time equivalent students. This requirement does
not apply to that portion of a district's annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment that is enrolled in alternative learning
experience programs as defined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 9 and 10 of this act take effect
September 1, 2011.

--- END ---