BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.0604 and 2007 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2
retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided in RCW
41.26.720(1)(a).
(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2
retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office
of financial management and department of retirement systems of the
state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director
shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2011, and until June 30, 2013, the following
contribution rates are established consistent with the contribution
rates determined in the 2009 actuarial valuation, a 7.40 percent
employee contribution rate, a 4.44 percent employer contribution rate,
and a 2.96 percent state contribution rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---