BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.802 and 2008 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By September 30, 2011, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer five million dollars to the local public
safety enhancement account.
(2))) By September 30, 2013, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars to the local public
safety enhancement account.
(((3))) (2) By September 30, 2015, if the prior fiscal biennium's
general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues
by more than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature,
the state treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars to the local
public safety enhancement account.
(((4))) (3) By September 30, 2017, and by September 30 of each
odd-numbered year thereafter, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer the lesser of one-third of the increase,
or fifty million dollars, to the local public safety enhancement
account.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.805 and 2008 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The local law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system benefits improvement account (benefits account) is
created within the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 fund. All receipts from RCW 41.26.800(1) must
be deposited into the account.
(2) The funds in the benefits account shall not be included by the
actuary retained by the board in the calculation of the market value of
assets of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system plan 2 fund until the board directs the actuary retained by the
board in writing to do so for purposes of financing benefits enacted by
the legislature. The board shall, in consultation with the state
investment board and within ninety days of the transfer of funds into
the benefits account, provide the actuary retained by the board, in
writing, the market value of the amount directed from the benefits
account for inclusion in the calculation of the market value of assets
of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
plan 2 fund. The market value of the amount directed from the benefits
account shall be an amount determined by the state actuary to
sufficiently offset the unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities of
benefit improvements financed from this account. The market value of
the amount directed from the benefits account shall be determined as of
the date of the direction from the board to include this amount for
purposes of financing benefits enacted by the legislature.
(3) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2
retirement board shall administer the fund in an actuarially sound
manner.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the
benefits account. The state investment board is authorized to adopt
investment policies for the money in the benefits account. All
investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
within the benefits account shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160
and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from
the investment of the money shall be retained by the benefits account.
(5) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(6) When appropriate for investment purposes, the state investment
board may commingle money in the fund with other funds.
(7) The authority to establish all policies relating to the
benefits account, other than the investment policies set forth in this
section, resides with the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
plan 2 retirement board. Other than investments by and expenses of the
state investment board, disbursements from this fund may be made only
on the authorization of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
plan 2 retirement board for purposes of funding the member, employer,
and state cost of financing benefits enacted by the legislature.
(8) The state investment board shall routinely consult with and
communicate with the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 retirement board on the investment policy, earnings of the trust, and
related needs of the benefits account.
(9) Funds in the benefits account cannot be used to finance future
benefit improvements if the state actuary determines that the actuarial
present value of fully projected benefits for current and future
members for all benefits being financed from this account exceeds the
actuarial present value of the revenue provided under RCW 41.26.802 and
the accrued earnings of the benefits account. When making the
determination under this subsection, the state actuary shall select
assumptions and methods to reduce the risk that the actual revenue
received is less than the assumed revenue.
(10) In the event that the funds appropriated and deposited into
the benefits account pursuant to RCW 41.26.800 are inadequate to
support benefit improvements previously adopted pursuant to this
section, any unfunded costs shall be funded through a contribution rate
adopted by the board, subject to revision by the legislature, and
distributed to employees, employers, and the state in the same manner
as specified in RCW 41.26.725.

--- END ---