BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the ((public
works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050)) state general
fund. An amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county
assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79.480 and 2009 c 564 s 937 and 2009 c 479 s 30 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the ((tobacco settlement account created in this section))
state general fund except as these moneys are sold or assigned under
chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) ((The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the state general fund, and to the tobacco prevention
and control account for purposes set forth in this section. The
legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic contribution
payments as defined in RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery
fund created in RCW 43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer less than the entire strategic
contribution payments.
(3))) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account ((from the tobacco settlement account)),
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the
state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of
the account.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.350.070 and 2011 c 5 s 916 are each amended to read
as follows:
The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Only the board or the board's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made
only for purposes of this chapter. Administrative expenses of the
authority, including staff support, may be paid only from the fund.
Revenues to the fund consist of transfers made by the legislature
((from strategic contribution payments deposited in the tobacco
settlement account under RCW 43.79.480)) into the account, moneys
received pursuant to contribution agreements entered into pursuant to
RCW 43.350.030, moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests, and
interest earned on the fund. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer to other state funds or accounts such amounts
as represent the excess balance of the life sciences discovery fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.76.115 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 912 are each
amended to read as follows:
The fair fund is created in the custody of the state treasury. All
moneys received by the department of agriculture for the purposes of
this fund and from RCW 67.16.105(((4))) (7) shall be deposited into the
fund. ((At the beginning of fiscal year 2002 and each fiscal year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from
the general fund the sum of two million dollars, except for fiscal year
2011 the state treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from the
general fund the sum of one million one hundred three thousand
dollars.)) Expenditures from the fund may be used only for assisting
fairs in the manner provided in this chapter. Only the director of
agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---