BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.310 and 2007 c 361 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall create a formula that converts the cost of
the increase in wages and benefits, other than health care benefits,
negotiated and funded in the contract for individual providers of home
care services pursuant to RCW 74.39A.270 and 74.39A.300, into a
per-hour amount((, excluding those benefits defined in subsection (2)
of this section)). That per-hour amount shall be added to the
statewide home care agency vendor rate and shall be used exclusively
for improving the wages and benefits of home care agency workers who
provide direct care to state-funded personal care or respite care
clients. The formula shall account for:
(a) All types of wages, benefits, and compensation negotiated and
funded each biennium, including but not limited to:
(i) Regular wages;
(ii) Benefit pay, such as vacation, sick, and holiday pay;
(iii) Taxes on wages/benefit pay;
(iv) Mileage; and
(v) Contributions to a training partnership; and
(b) The increase in the average cost of worker's compensation for
home care agencies and application of the increases identified in (a)
of this subsection to all hours required to be paid, including travel
time, of direct service workers under the wage and hour laws and
associated employer taxes.
(2) ((The contribution rate for health care benefits, including but
not limited to medical, dental, and vision benefits, for eligible
agency home care workers shall be paid by the department to home care
agencies at the same rate as negotiated and funded in the collective
bargaining agreement for individual providers of home care services))
The amount to be added to the statewide home care agency vendor rate
for the purchase of health coverage for home care agency workers who
provide direct care to state-funded personal care or respite care
clients shall be an amount set out in the applicable state omnibus
operating appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---