BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.020 and 2010 c 245 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.
(((3) "Major expansion" means expansion of the higher education
system that requires significant new capital investment, including
building new institutions, campuses, branches, or centers or conversion
of existing campuses, branches, or centers that would result in a
mission change.
(4) "Mission change" means a change in the level of degree awarded
or institutional type not currently authorized in statute.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.76.070 and 1985 c 370 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall adopt bylaws and shall meet ((at least)) four times
each year and at such other times as determined by the chair who shall
give reasonable prior notice to the members.
Board members are expected to consistently attend board meetings.
The chair of the board may ask the governor to remove any member who
misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without cause.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2010 c 245 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing
assessment process to analyze the need for additional degrees and
programs, additional off-campus centers and locations for degree
programs, and consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year
institutions. Board recommendations regarding proposed major expansion
shall be limited to determinations of whether the major expansion is
within the scope indicated in the most recent strategic master plan for
higher education or most recent system design plan. Recommendations
regarding existing capital prioritization processes are not within the
scope of the evaluation of major expansion. Major expansion and
proposed mission changes may be proposed by the board, any public
institution of higher education, or by a state or local government.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery;
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Recommendations from the technology transformation task force
created in chapter 407, Laws of 2009, and institutions of higher
education relative to the strategic and operational use of technology
in higher education. These and other reports, reviews, and audits
shall allow for: The development of enterprise-wide digital
information technology across educational sectors, systems, and
delivery methods; the integration and streamlining of administrative
tools including but not limited to student information management,
financial management, payroll, human resources, data collection,
reporting, and analysis; and a determination of the costs of multiple
technology platforms, systems, and models.
(3))) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the
state board for community and technical colleges and the workforce
training and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number
and type of higher education and training credentials required to match
employer demand for a skilled and educated workforce. The assessment
shall include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level
of higher education and training and the number of credentials needed
to match the forecast of net job openings.
(((4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of
study or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5))) (2) The following activities are subject to approval by the
board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(((6))) (3) Institutions seeking board approval under this section
must ((demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs
assessment developed under this section. Institutions must also))
demonstrate how the proposals align with or implement the statewide
strategic master plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(((7))) (4) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(((8))) (5) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on ((the
needs assessment analysis)) alignment with the strategic master plan in
RCW 28B.76.200.
(((9) In the case of a proposed major expansion or mission change,
the needs assessment process under subsection (2) of this section
constitutes a threshold inquiry. If the board determines that the need
for the proposed major expansion or mission change has not been
justified, the inquiry is concluded. If the board determines that the
need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has been
sufficiently established, the board, in consultation with any directly
involved institutions and other interested agencies and individuals,
shall proceed to examine the viability of the proposal using criteria
including, but not limited to:
(a) The specific scope of the project including the capital
investment requirements, the number of full-time equivalent students
anticipated, and the number of academic programs planned;
(b) The existence of an efficient and sustainable financial plan;
(c) The extent to which existing resources can be leveraged;
(d) The current and five-year projected student population,
faculty, and staff to support the proposed programs, institution, or
innovation;
(e) The plans to accommodate expected growth over a twenty-year
time frame;
(f) The extent to which new or existing partnerships and
collaborations are a part of the proposal; and
(g) The feasibility of any proposed innovations to accelerate
degree production.
(10) After the board completes its evaluation of the proposed major
expansion or mission change using the needs assessment under subsection
(2) of this section and viability determination under subsection (9) of
this section, the board shall make a recommendation to either proceed,
modify, or not proceed with the proposed major expansion or mission
change. The board's recommendation shall be presented to the governor
and the legislature.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) ((Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3))) Establish transfer policies;
(((4))) (3) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency
requirements;
(((5))) (4) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with
bordering states and the province of British Columbia;
(((6))) (5) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels
for administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and
faculty using comparative data from peer institutions;
(((7))) (6) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with
all relevant state policies for higher education;
(((8))) (7) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year
institutions or between and among four-year institutions and community
colleges at the request of one or more of the institutions involved, or
at the request of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the
legislature. The decision of the board shall be binding on the
participants in the dispute;
(((9))) (8) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(((10))) (9) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to
remove any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus activities; and
(((11))) (10) Make recommendations to increase minority
participation, and monitor and report on the progress of minority
participation in higher education.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.76.340 and 2010 c 235 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board must establish boundaries for service regions for
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016
implementing professional educator standards board-approved educator
preparation programs. Regions shall be established to encourage and
support, not exclude, the reach of public institutions of higher
education across the state.
(2) ((Based on the data in the assessment in RCW 28B.76.230 and
28B.76.335,)) The board shall determine whether reasonable teacher
preparation program access for prospective teachers is available in
each region. If access is determined to be inadequate in a region, the
institution of higher education responsible for the region shall submit
a plan for meeting the access need to the board.
(3) Partnerships with other teacher preparation program providers
and the use of appropriate technology shall be considered. The board
shall review the plan and, as appropriate, assist the institution in
developing support and resources for implementing the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.76.210 (Budget priorities and levels of funding--Guidelines for institutions -- Review and evaluation of budget requests--Recommendations) and 2010 c 245 s 10, 2008 c 205 s 4, 2007 c 458 s 202,
2004 c 275 s 7, 2003 c 130 s 3, 1997 c 369 s 10, 1996 c 174 s 1, 1993
c 363 s 6, & 1985 c 370 s 4;
(2) RCW 28B.76.240 (Statewide transfer and articulation policies)
and 2004 c 275 s 10, 1998 c 245 s 23, 1985 c 370 s 27, & 1983 c 304 s
1;
(3) RCW 28B.76.2401 (Statewide transfer of credit policy and
agreement -- Requirements) and 2004 c 55 s 5 & 1983 c 304 s 2;
(4) RCW 28B.76.250 (Transfer associate degrees -- Work groups--Implementation -- Progress reports) and 2004 c 55 s 2;
(5) RCW 28B.76.260 (Statewide system of course equivalency -- Work
group) and 2004 c 55 s 3;
(6) RCW 28B.76.300 (State support received by students--Information) and 2004 c 275 s 14, 1997 c 48 s 1, & 1993 c 250 s 1;
(7) RCW 28B.76.310 (Development of methods and protocols for
measuring educational costs -- Schedule of educational cost study
reports) and 2004 c 275 s 15, 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7, 1992 c 231 s 5,
& 1989 c 245 s 3;
(8) RCW 28B.76.320 (Board to transmit amounts constituting approved
educational costs) and 2004 c 275 s 16, 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 6, & 1989
c 245 s 4; and
(9) RCW 28B.76.335 (Teacher preparation degree and certificate
programs -- Needs assessment) and 2010 c 235 s 507 & 2007 c 396 s 17.

--- END ---