BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the ferry system
is an important driver of the Washington state economy, supporting jobs
and businesses in communities around Puget Sound. The ferry system is
also an integral part of the state highway system and, as such,
benefits all citizens by connecting communities and markets around the
state.
The legislature further finds that funding for the ferry system
remains insufficient to provide adequate service in support of this
economic engine. Further, new funding sources will only be acceptable
when the state can show that the ferry system manages its costs
prudently, while delivering reliable, safe, and quality cross-sound
transportation services.
The legislature finds that the ferry system is subject to the
statewide transportation system policy goals established in RCW
47.04.280 and yet performance criteria are not fully used by management
to improve operations or demonstrate to the public that ferry service
is being provided in the most cost-effective manner.
Therefore, the legislature intends to: Strengthen performance
incentives for Washington state ferries managers; increase the
accountability and transparency of ferry management and operations;
improve service to ferry riders; and realize cost savings in the ferry
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:
(a) "Management" means a Washington management services employee or
exempt employee at the Washington state ferries, except captains.
(b) "Captain" means a ferry employee classified as a master or
staff master of a vessel. The captain is the commanding officer who is
the sole individual responsible for all activities aboard a vessel,
including meeting or exceeding performance criteria and measurements
established in this section.
(c) "Performance criteria" means measurable standards to be used by
the department to evaluate the sufficiency of the services being
provided to ferry riders.
(d) "Performance report" means a report that summarizes ferry
system performance using the performance criteria under subsection (2)
of this section, identifies whether performance targets were achieved,
and includes a management discussion of the results.
(2) Performance criteria must include, but not be limited to:
(a) Safety performance as measured by passenger injuries per one
million passenger miles and by injuries per ten thousand revenue
service hours that are recordable by standards of the federal
occupational safety and health administration and related to standard
operating procedures;
(b) Service effectiveness measures including, but not limited to,
passenger satisfaction of interactions with ferry employees,
cleanliness and comfort of vessels and terminals, and satisfactory
response to requests for assistance. Passenger satisfaction must be
measured by an evaluation that is created by a contracted market
research company and conducted by the Washington state transportation
commission as part of the ferry riders' opinion group survey. The
Washington state transportation commission shall, to the extent
possible, integrate the passenger satisfaction evaluation into the
ferry user data survey described in RCW 47.60.286;
(c) On-time performance by route within ten minutes of published
sailing time. This measurement must exclude delays that are authorized
or are outside of the control of the department including, but not
limited to, medical issues, weather or tidal conditions, and security
or other safety issues;
(d) Cost containment measures including, but not limited to,
operating cost per passenger mile, operating cost per revenue service
mile, discretionary overtime as a percentage of straight time, and
gallons of fuel consumed per revenue service mile;
(e) Maintenance and capital program effectiveness measures
including, but not limited to: Project delivery rate as measured by
the number of projects completed on time and within the omnibus
transportation appropriations act; vessel and terminal design and
engineering costs as measured by a percentage of the total capital
program, including measurement of the ongoing operating and maintenance
costs; and total vessel out-of-service time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Performance targets must be established by an ad hoc committee
with members from and designated by the office of the governor. By
July 1, 2011, the ad hoc committee shall present the performance
targets to the representatives of the legislative transportation
committees and the joint transportation committee for review and
approval.
(2) By October 1, 2011, the department shall complete a performance
report that provides a baseline assessment of current performance using
final 2009-2011 data. This report must be reviewed by the office of
financial management and be provided to the legislative transportation
committees by November 1, 2011.
(3) By October 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, the department
shall complete a performance report for the prior fiscal year. This
report must be reviewed by the office of financial management, and the
findings of the report must be incorporated into the governor's
proposed biennial transportation budget. The office of financial
management shall transmit a copy of the reviewed performance report to
the legislature with the governor's proposed biennial transportation
budget.
(4)(a) By June 30, 2013, the Washington state ferries must meet or
exceed the target performance level for seventy-five percent of the
performance criteria under section 2(2) of this act. If the Washington
state ferries does not meet or exceed the target performance level for
seventy-five percent of the performance criteria, the department must:
(i) Develop and implement a request for information or a request
for qualifications process to identify qualifications necessary and
costs associated with privatizing the management functions of the
Washington state ferries; and
(ii) Present the results of the request for information or request
for qualifications to the transportation committees of the legislature
and the governor.
(b) In consultation with the governor's office, the transportation
committees of the legislature shall utilize the information provided in
(a) of this subsection to determine whether or not to competitively
contract out the management functions of the Washington state ferry
system the following biennium.
(c) If the governor and the transportation committees of the
legislature opt to competitively contract out the management functions
of the Washington state ferry system in the following biennium, the
contract must be a fixed cost contract that requires the private
management services firm to meet or exceed the target performance level
for seventy-five percent of the performance criteria under section 2(2)
of this act. Based on this performance criteria, the contract must
provide for incentive or retained payment arrangements as a means of
ensuring satisfactory performance of the contract and improved
performance of the ferry system over time.
(d) The contract must include a requirement that the firm retain
existing and future collective bargaining agreements as negotiated
between the state and the employees' labor representatives. The
private management services firm may rehire Washington management
services employees or exempt employees at the Washington state ferries.
(e) The contract must be for a two-year period. If the private
management services firm meets or exceeds the performance criteria
under section 2(2) of this act, the contract is renewable for an
additional two years for a maximum of ten years. After ten years, the
department shall implement an invitation for bid process.
(f) Consistent with RCW 41.06.142(3), the contract is not subject
to requirements for agencies purchasing services that have been
customarily and historically provided by state employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2013, the marine employees' commission shall
sever from the masters, mates, and pilots bargaining unit all captains
as defined in section 2 of this act. In anticipation of the captains'
severance from the masters, mates, and pilots bargaining unit, the
marine employees' commission shall conduct an election by August 31,
2011, to determine representation of the captains. The marine
employees' commission shall certify a captains-only bargaining unit, to
be effective July 1, 2013, if a majority of the captains in the
masters, mates, and pilots bargaining unit indicate by vote that they
desire to be included in a captains-only bargaining unit.
Notwithstanding the results of the election, captains shall remain a
part of the masters, mates, and pilots bargaining unit through June 30,
2013.
(2) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative for a
captains-only bargaining unit must negotiate a collective bargaining
agreement exclusive to the captains-only bargaining unit.
(3) For negotiations covering the 2013-2015 biennium, the employer
and the exclusive bargaining representative of the captains-only
bargaining unit must negotiate agreements that are consistent with
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The report required in RCW 47.01.071(5) and 47.04.280 must include
the performance criteria in section 2(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By January 1, 2012, the joint transportation
committee shall examine and report to the legislature on the following
issues:
(1) The practice of members of a collective bargaining unit who are
characterized as being inactive or on a leave of absence while serving
in a management position; and
(2) The roles and responsibilities of terminal supervisors and
chief engineers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 By December 31, 2011, the marine employees'
commission is merged with the public employment relations commission
and becomes an independent division within the public employment
relations commission.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.64.280 and 2010 c 283 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission within the
public employment relations commission. The governor shall appoint the
marine employees' commission with the consent of the senate. The
marine employees' commission shall consist of three members: One
member to be appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one
member from the public who has significant knowledge of maritime
affairs. The public member shall be chair of the marine employees'
commission. One of the original members shall be appointed for a term
of three years, one for a term of four years, and one for a term of
five years. Their successors shall be appointed for terms of five
years each, except that any person chosen to fill a vacancy shall be
appointed only for the unexpired term of the member whom he or she
succeeds. Marine employees' commission members are eligible for
reappointment. Any member of the marine employees' commission may be
removed by the governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty
or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause. Marine employees'
commission members are not eligible for state retirement under chapter
41.40 RCW by virtue of their service on the marine employees'
commission. Members of the marine employees' commission shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive
reimbursement for official travel and other expenses at the same rate
and on the same terms as provided for the transportation commission by
RCW 47.01.061. The payments shall be made from the Puget Sound ferry
operations account.
(2) The marine employees' commission shall: (a) Adjust all
complaints, grievances, and disputes between labor and management
arising out of the operation of the ferry system as provided in RCW
47.64.150; (b) provide for impasse mediation as required in RCW
47.64.210; and (c) perform those duties required in RCW 47.64.300.
(3)(a) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and disputes,
the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify the marine
employees' commission, which shall make careful inquiry into the cause
thereof and issue an order advising the ferry employee, or the ferry
employee organization representing him or her, and the department of
transportation, as to the decision of the marine employees' commission.
(b) The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes
at all hearings conducted by the marine employees' commission. The
orders and awards of the marine employees' commission are final and
binding upon any ferry employee or employees or their representative
affected thereby and upon the department.
(c) The marine employees' commission shall adopt rules of procedure
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(d) The marine employees' commission has the authority to subpoena
any ferry employee or employees, or their representatives, and any
member or representative of the department, and any witnesses. The
marine employees' commission may require attendance of witnesses and
the production of all pertinent records at any hearings held by the
marine employees' commission. The subpoenas of the marine employees'
commission are enforceable by order of any superior court in the state
of Washington for the county within which the proceeding may be
pending.
The marine employees' commission may hire staff as necessary,
appoint consultants, enter into contracts, and conduct studies as
reasonably necessary to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The public employment relations commission
shall evaluate the merger described in section 7 of this act and
provide recommendations on alternative organizational structures. A
report is due to the joint transportation committee by November 15,
2012.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.64.011 and 2006 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the governor and employee organizations to be the
exclusive representatives during collective bargaining negotiations.
(2) "Commission" means the marine employees' commission created
within the public employment relations commission in RCW 47.64.280 (as
recodified by this act).
(3) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(4) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) "Lockout" means the refusal of the employer to furnish work to
ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee organizations to
make concessions during collective bargaining, grievance, or other
labor relation negotiations. Curtailment of employment of ferry
employees due to lack of work resulting from a strike or work stoppage
shall not be considered a lockout.
(8) "Office of financial management" means the office as created in
RCW 43.41.050.
(9) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her willful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of
work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full,
faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the
purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any
other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work
under conditions which pose an endangerment to the health and safety of
ferry employees or the public, as determined by the master of the
vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.64.150 and 1983 c 15 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agreement with a ferry employee organization that is the
exclusive representative of ferry employees in an appropriate unit may
provide procedures for the consideration of ferry employee grievances
and of disputes over the interpretation and application of agreements.
Negotiated procedures may provide for binding arbitration of ferry
employee grievances and of disputes over the interpretation and
application of existing agreements. An arbitrator's decision on a
grievance shall not change or amend the terms, conditions, or
applications of the collective bargaining agreement. The procedures
shall provide for the invoking of arbitration only with the approval of
the employee organization. The costs of arbitrators shall be shared
equally by the parties.
Ferry system employees shall follow either the grievance procedures
provided in a collective bargaining agreement, or if no such procedures
are so provided, shall submit the grievances to the ((marine
employees')) commission as provided in RCW 47.64.280 (as recodified by
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 47.64.280 is recodified as a section in
chapter 41.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The capital vessel replacement account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. All revenues generated from the vessel replacement
surcharge under RCW 47.60.315(7) must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the construction or
purchase of ferry vessels.
(2) The state treasurer shall not transfer any moneys from the
capital vessel replacement account.

Sec. 14 RCW 47.60.315 and 2007 c 512 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt fares and pricing policies by rule,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, according to the following schedule:
(a) Each year the department shall provide the commission a report
of its review of fares and pricing policies, with recommendations for
the revision of fares and pricing policies for the ensuing year;
(b) By September 1st of each year, beginning in 2008, the
commission shall adopt by rule fares and pricing policies for the
ensuing year.
(2) The commission may adopt by rule fares that are effective for
more or less than one year for the purposes of transitioning to the
fare schedule in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The commission may increase ferry fares included in the
schedule of charges adopted under this section by a percentage that
exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
(4) The chief executive officer of the ferry system may authorize
the use of promotional, discounted, and special event fares to the
general public and commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing
capacity use and the revenues collected by the ferry system. The
department shall report to the commission a summary of the promotional,
discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and
the financial results from these activities.
(5) Fare revenues and other revenues deposited in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530 may not be used to
support the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW
47.60.505, unless the support for capital is separately identified in
the fare.
(6) The commission may not raise fares until the fare rules contain
pricing policies developed under RCW 47.60.290, or September 1, 2009,
whichever is later.
(7) The commission shall impose a vessel replacement surcharge of
twenty-five cents on every ferry fare sold, including multiride and
monthly pass fares. In the event that fares are collected in one
direction only, the surcharge is fifty cents on every ferry fare sold.
This surcharge must be clearly indicated to ferry passengers and
drivers and, if possible, on the fare media itself.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st
sp.s. c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010
c 145 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---