BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.050 and 2008 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department ((shall)) must assess
against the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and
((shall)) must add thereto interest on the tax only. The department
((shall)) must notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as
provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount and the additional
amount ((shall)) becomes due and ((shall)) must be paid within thirty
days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as the
department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
((shall be)) is computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the
last day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the
earlier of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December
31, 1998, the rate of interest ((shall be)) is variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed
((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for
use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest ((shall be)) is variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section from the last day of the year in which
the deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so
computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each
year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, ((shall be)) is
computed from the last day of the month following each calendar year
included in a notice, and the last day of the month following the final
month included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the
due date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date
of the notice, additional interest ((shall be)) is computed until the
date of payment. The rate of interest ((shall be)) is variable and
computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so
computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each
year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer ((shall be)):
(i) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 2012, is an
average of the federal short-term rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
1274(d) plus two percentage points; and
(ii) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 2011, is an
average of the bank prime loan rate, as published by the federal
reserve board in the H.15 report, plus three percentage points. This
subsection (2)(a)(ii) also applies to interest imposed beginning
January 1, 2012, for tax liabilities arising before that date and
included in any notice that is not paid in full by the due date of the
notice.
(b) The rate set for each new year ((shall be)) is computed by
taking an arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the
((federal short-term)) rate, compounded annually. ((That)) The average
((shall be)) is calculated using the rates from four months: January,
April, and July of the calendar year immediately preceding the new
year, and October of the previous preceding year.
(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the due date of any assessment or
correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or
interest as the department deems proper.
(4) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver ((shall)) also extends
the period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW
82.32.060(2).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.56.440 and 2008 c 181 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must collect all ad
valorem taxes upon ships and vessels listed with the department in
accordance with RCW 84.40.065 and all applicable interest and
penalties.
(b) The taxes ((shall be)) are due and payable to the department on
or before the thirtieth day of April and ((shall be)) are delinquent
after that date.
(2) If payment of the tax is not received by the department by the
due date, there ((shall be)) is imposed a penalty of five percent of
the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within thirty
days after the due date, there ((shall be)) is imposed a total penalty
of ten percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received
within sixty days after the due date, there ((shall be)) is imposed a
total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the tax. No penalty
so added ((shall)) may be less than five dollars.
(3) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate set forth in RCW 82.32.050 from the date of delinquency until
paid. Interest or penalties collected on delinquent taxes under this
section ((shall)) must be paid by the department into the general fund
of the state treasury.
(4) If upon information obtained by the department it appears that
any ship or vessel required to be listed according to the provisions of
RCW 84.40.065 is not so listed, the department ((shall)) must value the
ship or vessel and assess against the owner of the vessel the taxes
found to be due and ((shall)) must add thereto interest at the rate set
forth in RCW 82.32.050 from the original due date of the tax until the
date of payment. The department ((shall)) must notify the vessel owner
by mail of the amount and the same ((shall)) becomes due and ((shall))
must be paid by the vessel owner within thirty days of the date of the
notice. If payment is not received by the department by the due date
specified in the notice, the department ((shall)) must add a penalty of
ten percent of the tax found due. A person who willfully gives a false
listing or willfully fails to list a ship or vessel as required by RCW
84.40.065 ((shall be)) is subject to the penalty imposed by RCW
84.40.130(2), which ((shall)) must be assessed and collected by the
department.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section, along with all penalties
and interest thereon, ((shall)) must be collected by the department
according to the procedures set forth in chapter 82.32 RCW for the
filing and execution of tax warrants, including the imposition of
warrant interest. In the event a warrant is issued by the department
for the collection of taxes under this section, the department
((shall)) must add a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
delinquent tax, but not less than ten dollars.
(6) The department ((shall)) must also collect all delinquent taxes
pertaining to ships and vessels appearing on the records of the county
treasurers for each of the counties of this state as of December 31,
1993, including any applicable interest or penalties. The provisions
of subsection (5) of this section ((shall)) apply to the collection of
such delinquent taxes.
(7) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any
taxes payable under this section as the department deems proper.
(8)(a) If, upon receipt of an application by a vessel owner for a
refund, or upon examination of any information obtained by the
department, the department determines that the vessel owner has
overpaid the tax due under this section, the department must refund the
amount of the overpayment, together with interest as provided in (b) of
this subsection (8).
(b) Interest on refunds must be allowed at the rate provided in RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed must be adjusted on the first day
of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar
year. Interest must be refunded from the date of overpayment until the
date the refund is mailed. No refund may be made by the department
more than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in
which the refund application is made or the department's examination of
information is complete.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.102.080 and 2003 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax ((shall))
must compute interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid tax or penalty
in accordance with RCW 82.32.050, as that statute existed on January 1,
2011.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax ((shall))
must compute interest paid on refunds or credits of amounts paid or
other recovery allowed a taxpayer in accordance with RCW 82.32.060;
except, the interest rate must be computed in the manner provided under
RCW 82.32.050, as that statute existed on January 1, 2011.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.60.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department, in cooperation with the office of financial
management, ((shall)) must develop rules for determining the amount to
be assessed to individual hospitals, notifying individual hospitals of
the assessed amount, and collecting the amounts due. Such rule making
((shall)) must specifically include provision for:
(a) Transmittal of quarterly notices of assessment by the
department to each hospital informing the hospital of its nonmedicare
hospital inpatient days and the assessment amount due and payable.
Such quarterly notices ((shall)) must be sent to each hospital at least
thirty calendar days prior to the due date for the quarterly assessment
payment.
(b) Interest on delinquent assessments at the rate specified in RCW
82.32.050, as that statute existed on January 1, 2011.
(c) Adjustment of the assessment amounts as follows:
(i) For each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2010, the assessment
amounts under RCW 74.60.030 (1) and (3) may be adjusted as follows:
(A) If sufficient other funds for hospitals, excluding any
extension of section 5001 of P.L. No. 111-5, are available to support
the reimbursement rates and other payments under RCW 74.60.080,
74.60.090, 74.60.100, 74.60.110, or 74.60.120 without utilizing the
full assessment authorized under RCW 74.60.030 (1) or (3), the
department shall reduce the amount of the assessment for prospective
payment system, psychiatric, and rehabilitation hospitals
proportionately to the minimum level necessary to support those
reimbursement rates and other payments.
(B) Provided that none of the conditions set forth in RCW
74.60.150(2) have occurred, if the department's forecasts indicate that
the assessment amounts under RCW 74.60.030 (1) and (3), together with
all other available funds, are not sufficient to support the
reimbursement rates and other payments under RCW 74.60.080, 74.60.090,
74.60.100, 74.60.110, or 74.60.120, the department ((shall)) must
increase the assessment rates for prospective payment system,
psychiatric, and rehabilitation hospitals proportionately to the amount
necessary to support those reimbursement rates and other payments, plus
a contingency factor up to ten percent of the total assessment amount.
(C) Any positive balance remaining in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year ((shall)) must be applied to reduce the assessment amount
for the subsequent fiscal year.
(ii) Any adjustment to the assessment amounts pursuant to this
subsection, and the data supporting such adjustment, including but not
limited to relevant data listed in subsection (2) of this section, must
be submitted to the Washington state hospital association for review
and comment at least sixty calendar days prior to implementation of
such adjusted assessment amounts. Any review and comment provided by
the Washington state hospital association ((shall)) may not limit the
ability of the Washington state hospital association or its members to
challenge an adjustment or other action by the department that is not
made in accordance with this chapter.
(2) By November 30th of each year, the department ((shall)) must
provide the following data to the Washington state hospital
association:
(a) The fund balance;
(b) The amount of assessment paid by each hospital;
(c) The annual medicaid fee-for-service payments for inpatient
hospital services and outpatient hospital services; and
(d) The medicaid healthy options inpatient and outpatient payments
as reported by all hospitals to the department on disproportionate
share hospital applications. The department ((shall)) must amend the
disproportionate share hospital application and reporting instructions
as needed to ensure that the foregoing data is reported by all
hospitals as needed in order to comply with this subsection (2)(d).
(3) The department ((shall)) must determine the number of
nonmedicare hospital inpatient days for each hospital for each
assessment period.
(4) To the extent necessary, the department ((shall)) must amend
the contracts between the managed care organizations and the department
and between regional support networks and the department to incorporate
the provisions of RCW 74.60.120. The department ((shall)) must pursue
amendments to the contracts as soon as possible after April 27, 2010.
The amendments to the contracts ((shall)) must, among other provisions,
provide for increased payment rates to managed care organizations in
accordance with RCW 74.60.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies only to interest imposed or
allowed after December 31, 2011, regardless of whether the interest
relates to tax liabilities incurred or overpayments made on or before
that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---