BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) By May 1, 2012, and by May 1st of every year thereafter, the
department, in consultation with the department of transportation, must
annually estimate the amount of state sales and use taxes paid under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on fuel purchased or used by the state
ferry system for marine purposes, and certify the amount to the state
treasurer.
(b) By June 30, 2012, and by June 30th of every year thereafter,
the state treasurer must transfer into the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account) the greater of: (i) Five million two hundred thousand
dollars; or (ii) the amount calculated under (a) of this subsection
(1).
(2) The revenue provided in this section is hereby pledged to the
payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the
authority of RCW 47.10.861 for the purposes provided in section 2 of
this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to provide these
revenues, in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and
interest on all bonds issued under the authority of RCW 47.10.861 for
the purposes provided in section 2 of this act.
(3) This section expires on the date that the bonds that are issued
for the purposes of section 2 of this act are retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of seventy-five million dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2013, from transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation to the department of transportation for
the purposes of constructing a ferry boat vessel with a carrying
capacity of at least one hundred forty-four cars. These funds shall be
used to supplement the funds appropriated in the 2011-2013
transportation budget for the purpose of constructing the vessel in the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation in this section includes up to seventy-five million
dollars in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---