BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the continuing
economic crisis is not unique to Washington and has had devastating
impacts to the unemployed, homeowners, and critical state services and
a continued degeneration of our public schools, roads, and bridges.
The legislature fully acknowledges its constitutional requirement
to pass and maintain a balanced budget from year to year. Balancing
the budget exclusively through cuts to essential state programs,
however, can result in unexpected long-term costs in other areas of the
budget.
Therefore, in order to truly understand the ramifications of budget
decisions, the legislature intends to create a mechanism to more
accurately portray the true cost of cuts or enhancements to the state
budget, both in the short and long term.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88A.020 and 2008 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management shall, in cooperation with
appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a
procedure for the provision of fiscal notes on the expected impact of
bills and resolutions which increase or decrease or tend to increase or
decrease state government revenues or expenditures. Fiscal notes must
also include an estimate of the impact of expenditure reductions or
increases on other state or local program expenditures. Such fiscal
notes shall indicate by fiscal year the impact for the remainder of the
biennium in which the bill or resolution will first take effect as well
as a cumulative forecast of the fiscal impact for the succeeding four
fiscal years. Fiscal notes shall separately identify the fiscal
impacts on the operating and capital budgets. Estimates of fiscal
impacts shall be calculated using the procedures contained in the
fiscal note instructions issued by the office of financial management.
In establishing the fiscal impact called for pursuant to this
chapter, the office of financial management shall coordinate the
development of fiscal notes with all state agencies affected.
The preparation and dissemination of the ongoing cost projections
and other requirements of RCW 43.135.031 for bills increasing taxes or
fees shall take precedence over fiscal notes.

--- END ---