BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many
Washington residents need essential mental health services to preserve
and promote wellness, strong families, and public safety. Furthermore,
ensuring a strong mental health safety net saves Washington taxpayers
money by preventing the need for expensive emergency, hospitalization,
and criminal justice services. The legislature further finds that
there is a need to provide stable funding to maintain critical mental
health services for Washington residents.
(2) The legislature also finds that while Washington residents pay
sales taxes, nonresidents come to Washington to enjoy Washington's
amenities and receive an unfair tax break by avoiding sales taxes.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that nonresidents pay
sales taxes just as Washington residents do, in order to preserve and
promote strong mental health services and public safety in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to
nonresidents of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital
codes for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident status--Penalties) and 2011 c 7 s 1, 2010 c 106 s 215, 2009 c 535 s 512, 2007
c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
By June 1, 2012, and by June 1st of every year thereafter, the
department must annually estimate the increase in state revenue for the
current fiscal year resulting from the repeal of the nonresident sales
tax exemption (RCW 82.08.0273), and certify the estimated amount to the
state treasurer. By July 1, 2012, and by July 1st of every year
thereafter, the state treasurer must transfer the certified amount from
the state general fund into the mental health services account hereby
created in the state treasury. Money in the account may only be
appropriated for the provision of mental health services, as defined in
RCW 71.24.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---