BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.48.010 and 1995 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Aircraft" means any weight-carrying device or structure for
navigation of the air which is designed to be supported by the air;
(((2) "Secretary" means the secretary of transportation;))
(3) "Person" includes a firm, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation((;
(4) "Small multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of less than seventy-five hundred pounds; and
(5) "Large multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of seventy-five hundred pounds or more)).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.48.020 and 2000 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An annual excise tax is hereby imposed for the privilege of
using any aircraft in the state. A current certificate of air
worthiness with a current inspection date from the appropriate federal
agency and/or the purchase of aviation fuel ((shall)) constitutes the
necessary evidence of aircraft use or intended use. ((The tax shall))
The amount of the tax is one percent of the taxable value of the
aircraft, as determined under section 3 of this act less seventy-five
thousand dollars.
(2) The tax imposed under this section must be collected annually
or under a staggered collection schedule as required by the
((secretary)) department by rule. ((No additional tax shall be imposed
under this chapter upon any aircraft upon the transfer of ownership
thereof, if the tax imposed by this chapter with respect to such
aircraft has already been paid for the year in which transfer of
ownership occurs. A violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor
punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2))) (3) Persons who are required to register aircraft under
chapter 47.68 RCW and who register aircraft in another state or foreign
country and avoid the ((Washington)) aircraft excise tax imposed under
this section are liable for ((such)) the unpaid excise tax. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) The department of revenue may, under chapter 82.32 RCW, assess
and collect the unpaid excise tax imposed under ((chapter 82.32 RCW))
this section, including the penalties and interest provided in chapter
82.32 RCW.
(((3))) (5) Except as provided under subsection((s (1) and (2)))
(3) of this section, a violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor
punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, taxable value
is based on the most recent purchase price of the aircraft, depreciated
according to the year of the most recent purchase of the aircraft. For
purposes of this subsection, "purchase price" means the consideration,
whether money, credit, rights, or other property expressed in terms of
money paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser
to the seller for the aircraft.
(b) For aircraft for which the most recent purchase price was not
indicative of the fair market value of the aircraft at the time of
purchase, the department may appraise the aircraft. If the department
appraises the aircraft, the taxable value is based on the department's
appraisal of fair market value of the aircraft at the time of the most
recent purchase, depreciated according to the year of the most recent
purchase of the aircraft.
(c) For aircraft acquired other than by purchase, including
aircraft manufactured, constructed, or assembled by the owner, the
department must appraise the aircraft before registration. In such
cases, the taxable value is the fair market value at the time of the
department's appraisal. For subsequent years, taxable value is based
on the department's appraisal of fair market value of the aircraft,
depreciated according to the year that the owner acquired the aircraft
or, in the case of aircraft manufactured, constructed, or assembled by
the owner, the year that the aircraft became operational.
(2)(a) An appraisal conducted by the department:
(i) Need not include a physical inspection of the aircraft; and
(ii) May be based on any guidebook, report, or compendium of
recognized standing in the aviation industry and information provided
to the department by the owner of the aircraft.
(b) Any aircraft owner disputing the department's appraised value
under this section may petition for a conference with the department as
provided under RCW 82.32.160 or for reduction of the tax due as
provided under RCW 82.32.170.
(3)(a) The department must prepare a depreciation schedule for use
in the determination of the taxable value for the purposes of this
chapter. The schedule must be based upon information available to the
department pertaining to the current fair market value of aircraft.
(b) The department must recommend a depreciation schedule to the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2011, for enactment in law during the 2012 legislative
session for use in the determination of taxable value for taxes due
under this chapter during calendar year 2013 and subsequent calendar
years.
(4) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this
section, including any rules necessary to provide a reasonable method
or methods to determine the fair market value of an aircraft.
(5) For purposes of this section, "department" means the department
of revenue.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.48.030 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 22 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((The amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each
calendar year shall be as follows:

Type of aircraft Registration fee

Single engine fixed wing $ 50

Small multi-engine fixed wing 65

Large multi-engine fixed wing 80

Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing 100

Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing 125

Helicopter 75

Sailplane 20

Lighter than air 20

Home built 20

(2))) The amount of tax imposed under ((subsection (1) of this
section)) RCW 82.48.020 for each calendar year ((shall)) must be
divided into twelve parts corresponding to the months of the calendar
year, and the excise tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time
in this state after the last day of any month ((shall)) is only ((be))
levied for the remaining months of the calendar year including the
month in which the aircraft is being registered((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the minimum amount payable ((shall be)) is three dollars.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, an aircraft ((shall be)) is
deemed registered for the first time in this state when such aircraft
was not ((previously)) required to be registered by this state for the
year immediately preceding the year in which application for
registration is made and was not so registered.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.48.070 and 1987 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary shall)) department must give a receipt to each
person paying ((the)) excise tax under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.48.080 and 1995 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary shall)) department must regularly pay to the state
treasurer the excise taxes collected under this chapter((, which shall
be credited by the state treasurer as follows: Ninety percent to the
general fund and ten percent to the aeronautics account in the
transportation fund for administrative expenses)) for deposit into the
general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.48.110 and 1967 ex.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The first tax to be collected under this chapter shall be for the
calendar year 1968.)) (1) No aircraft with respect to which the excise
tax imposed by this chapter is payable ((shall)) may be listed and
assessed for ad valorem taxation so long as this chapter remains in
effect((, and any such assessment heretofore made except under
authority of section 13, chapter 49, Laws of 1949 and section
82.48.110, chapter 15, Laws of 1961 is hereby directed to be canceled:
PROVIDED, That)).
(2) Any aircraft, whether or not subject to the provisions of this
chapter, with respect to which the excise tax imposed by this chapter
will not be paid or has not been paid for any year ((shall)) must be
listed and assessed for ad valorem taxation in that year, and the ad
valorem tax liability resulting from such listing and assessment
((shall)) must be collected in the same manner as though this chapter
had not been passed((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this chapter shall not
be construed to affect any ad valorem tax based upon assessed
valuations made in 1948 and/or any preceding year for taxes payable in
1949 or any preceding year, which ad valorem tax liability tax for any
such years shall remain payable and collectible in the same manner as
though this chapter had not been passed)).

Sec. 8 RCW 47.68.230 and 2005 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to operate or cause
or authorize to be operated any civil aircraft within this state unless
such aircraft has an appropriate effective certificate, permit, or
license issued by the United States, if such certificate, permit, or
license is required by the United States, and a current registration
certificate issued by the ((secretary of transportation)) department of
licensing, if registration of the aircraft with the department of
((transportation)) licensing is required by this chapter. It ((shall
be)) is unlawful for any person to engage in aeronautics as an airman
or airwoman in the state unless the person has an appropriate effective
airman or airwoman certificate, permit, rating, or license issued by
the United States authorizing him or her to engage in the particular
class of aeronautics in which he or she is engaged, if such
certificate, permit, rating, or license is required by the United
States.
(2) Where a certificate, permit, rating, or license is required for
an airman or airwoman by the United States, it ((shall)) must be kept
in his or her personal possession when he or she is operating within
the state. Where a certificate, permit, or license is required by the
United States or by this chapter for an aircraft, it ((shall)) must be
carried in the aircraft at all times while the aircraft is operating in
the state and ((shall)) must be conspicuously posted in the aircraft
where it may be readily seen by passengers or inspectors. Such
certificates ((shall)) must be presented for inspection upon the demand
of any peace officer, or any other officer of the state or of a
municipality or member, official, or employee of the department of
transportation authorized pursuant to this chapter to enforce the
aeronautics laws, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any
airport, or upon the reasonable request of any person.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.48.090 and 1992 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In case a claim is made by any person that the person has paid an
erroneously excessive amount of excise tax under this chapter, the
person may apply to the department of ((transportation)) licensing for
a refund of the claimed excessive amount together with interest at the
rate specified in RCW 82.32.060. The department of ((transportation
shall)) licensing must review such application, and if it determines
that an excess amount of tax has actually been paid by the taxpayer,
such excess amount and interest at the rate specified in RCW 82.32.060
((shall)) must be refunded to the taxpayer by means of a voucher
approved by the department of ((transportation)) licensing and by the
issuance of a state warrant drawn upon and payable from such funds as
the legislature may provide for that purpose. No refund ((shall)) may
be allowed, however, unless application for the refund is filed with
the department of ((transportation)) licensing within ninety days after
the claimed excessive excise tax was paid and the amount of the
overpayment exceeds five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---