BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in the
process of mitigating a revenue shortfall of approximately ten billion
dollars for the 2009-2011 biennium, the state, only two years later,
faces another projected revenue shortfall of at least five billion
dollars. Many of the programs that were cut by the 2009 and 2010
legislative sessions and that are under the threat of further cuts
during the 2011 legislative session, are due to the current economic
recession and the fundamental inadequacies and unfairness of our
current revenue structure. These budget cuts threaten the health,
safety, and security of a civilized Washington state. Some examples of
these cuts are: Dropping forty thousand people off the Washington
basic health plan; cutting early childhood education for one thousand
five hundred three year olds; cutting all-day kindergarten for children
living in poverty; cutting assistance for thirty thousand disabled and
unemployable persons; cutting prescription drug assistance for
eighty-five thousand seniors; cutting maternity support for fifty
thousand high-risk pregnant women; cutting terminal care hospices for
two thousand six hundred people; cutting children's health care for
sixteen thousand low-income kids; making tuition costs out of reach for
average income students; cutting medicaid medical care; and cutting
services for mental health care, chemical dependency, home care, child
care, public health, foster care, tobacco use prevention, cancer
screening, nursing home care, supporting people with developmental
disabilities, home visiting, universal vaccinations, hospital care,
affordable housing, adult day health, and family planning, among many
others.
(2) The legislature further finds that the federal stimulus money
and accounting procedures used to balance the 2009-2011 budget will
probably not be available to mitigate any projected revenue shortfall
in the 2011-2013 budget. Therefore, it is in the best interests of the
people of Washington state to mitigate the devastating effects of the
aforementioned cuts by looking at new ways to raise revenue for the
short term, and to look at long-term solutions to the state's revenue
problems. This can be done while at the same time securing fairness,
adequacy, and stability within our state revenue structure.
(3) It is the legislature's intent with this act to move the state
forward with two goals: (a) Raising immediate revenue to mitigate the
cruel impacts of draconian budget cuts, with specific emphasis on the
basic health plan; and (b) initiating inquiry and proceedings toward
long-term solutions to the state's unfair, inadequate, and volatile
revenue problems. These goals allow all the people of the state to:
Collectively share the financial responsibilities of this recession so
that everyone is pitching in to get us all through the recession
together; ensure that we leave no one behind; and position our state
for recovery by reforming our revenue structure to encourage healthy
economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, an additional tax is
imposed on a banking business each year for business activities
conducted within this state. The tax equals the taxable amount
reported on the state combined excise tax return for the prior calendar
year multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(2) The tax under subsection (1) of this section only applies if
the two following requirements are met for any year: (a) The banking
business reported annual net income in the prior calendar year equal to
or greater than one billion dollars; and (b) annual net income for the
prior calendar year was at least five percent of its total revenue for
that year. The requirements under this subsection must be evaluated
based on information reported in the banking business's consolidated
financial statements, as prepared according to generally accepted
accounting principles, for the prior calendar year.
(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to this section except as otherwise
provided in this section. The tax imposed under this section must be
paid by the twenty-fifth of May, except taxes owed in 2011 are due by
the twenty-fifth of September. The department may adopt rules
necessary to implement and collect the tax imposed under this section.
(4) Taxes collected under this section must be deposited into the
general fund to be used exclusively for the basic health plan under
chapter 70.47 RCW.
(5) For the purpose of this section, "banking business" means a
person engaging in business as a national or state-chartered bank, a
mutual savings bank, a savings and loan association, a trust company,
an alien bank, a foreign bank, a credit union, a stock savings bank, or
a similar entity that is chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW,
or organized under Title 12 U.S.C.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---