BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Part I
Premium Taxes--Sales of Airplanes, Locomotives,
Railroad Cars, and Watercraft--Newspapers
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that there is no
ascertainable reason for the exemption in RCW 48.14.020(3), which
relates to ocean marine and foreign trade insurance contracts, and
therefore repeals the exemption.

Sec. 102 RCW 48.14.020 and 2009 c 161 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to other provisions of this chapter, each authorized
insurer except title insurers ((shall)) must on or before the first day
of March of each year pay to the state treasurer through the
commissioner's office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, such tax ((shall be)) is in the amount
of two percent of all premiums, excluding amounts returned to or the
amount of reductions in premiums allowed to holders of industrial life
policies for payment of premiums directly to an office of the insurer,
collected or received by the insurer under RCW 48.14.090 during the
preceding calendar year other than ocean marine and foreign trade
insurances, after deducting premiums paid to policyholders as returned
premiums, upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be performed
in this state. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums ((shall))
must be on a written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the
basis required by the annual statement. For the purposes of this
section the consideration received by an insurer for the granting of an
annuity ((shall)) is not ((be)) deemed to be a premium.
(2) In the case of insurers which require the payment by their
policyholders at the inception of their policies of the entire premium
thereon in the form of premiums or premium deposits which are the same
in amount, based on the character of the risks, regardless of the
length of term for which such policies are written, such tax ((shall
be)) is in the amount of two percent of the gross amount of such
premiums and premium deposits upon policies on risks resident, located,
or to be performed in this state, in force as of the thirty-first day
of December next preceding, less the unused or unabsorbed portion of
such premiums and premium deposits computed at the average rate thereof
actually paid or credited to policyholders or applied in part payment
of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on one-year policies
expiring during such year.
(3) ((Each authorized insurer shall with respect to all ocean
marine and foreign trade insurance contracts written within this state
during the preceding calendar year, on or before the first day of March
of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's
office a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on its gross
underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be
ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums
less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean
marine and foreign trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e.,
gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded)
during such calendar year under such contracts. In the case of
insurers issuing participating contracts, such gross underwriting
profit shall not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this
subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation dividends,
by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.
(4))) The state does hereby preempt the field of imposing excise or
privilege taxes upon insurers or their appointed insurance producers,
other than title insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal
subdivision ((shall have)) has the right to impose any such taxes upon
such insurers or these insurance producers.
(((5))) (4) If an authorized insurer collects or receives any such
premiums on account of policies in force in this state which were
originally issued by another insurer and which other insurer is not
authorized to transact insurance in this state on its own account, such
collecting insurer ((shall be)) is liable for and ((shall)) must pay
the tax on such premiums.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.08.0262 and 2009 c 503 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) Sales of airplanes (i) to the United States government; (ii)
((for use)) used primarily in conducting interstate or foreign
commerce; or (iii) ((for use)) used primarily in providing intrastate
air transportation by a commuter air carrier;
(b) Sales of locomotives, railroad cars, or watercraft ((for use))
used primarily in conducting interstate or foreign commerce by
transporting therein or therewith property and persons for hire or for
use in conducting commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the
territorial waters of the state;
(c) Sales of tangible personal property that becomes a component
part of such airplanes, locomotives, railroad cars, or watercraft, and
of motor vehicles or trailers whether owned by or leased with or
without drivers and used by the holder of a carrier permit issued by
the interstate commerce commission or its successor agency authorizing
transportation by motor vehicle across the boundaries of this state, in
the course of constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the same; and
(d) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to such constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving.
(2) The term "commuter air carrier" means an air carrier holding
authority under Title 14, Part 298 of the code of federal regulations
that carries passengers on at least five round trips per week on at
least one route between two or more points according to its published
flight schedules that specify the times, days of the week, and places
between which those flights are performed.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.08.0253 and 2009 c 535 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) The distribution and newsstand sale of printed newspapers; and
(b) The sale of newspapers transferred electronically, provided
that the electronic version of a printed newspaper:
(i) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(ii) Is prominently identified by the same name as the printed
newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a complement
to the printed newspaper.
(2) For purposes of this section, "printed newspaper" means a
publication issued regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month
and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely
together without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind,
including any supplement of a printed newspaper.
(3)(a) The legislature intends that democracy requires an informed
citizenry that has free access to unbiased information.
(b) A newspaper is immediately ineligible for the tax exemption
under this section, if the newspaper gains a dominant market share and
becomes a dominant provider of opinion in the market wherein it
promotes the bias of its editorial board without opposing opinion by
another newspaper in the same market, unless the newspaper implements
a plan to correct the dissemination of biased information to the
citizenry.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.12.0345 and 2009 c 535 s 618 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply in respect to the
use of:
(1) Printed newspapers as defined in RCW 82.08.0253; and
(2) Newspapers transferred electronically, provided that the
electronic version of a printed newspaper:
(a) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(b) Is prominently identified by the same name as the printed
newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a complement
to the printed newspaper.
(3)(a) The legislature intends that democracy requires an informed
citizenry that has free access to unbiased information.
(b) A newspaper is immediately ineligible for the tax exemption
under this section, if the newspaper gains a dominant market share and
becomes a dominant provider of opinion in the market wherein it
promotes the bias of its editorial board without opposing opinion by
another newspaper in the same market, unless the newspaper implements
a plan to correct the dissemination of biased information to the
citizenry.

Part II
Radio and TV Broadcasting
Sec. 201 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent ((licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW)); (f) radio and television
broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising
computed as a standard deduction ((based on the national average
thereof as annually reported by the federal communications
commission)), which the department must publish by rule every fifth
year by September 30th, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent ((licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW)); (f) radio and television
broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising
computed as a standard deduction ((based on the national average
thereof as annually reported by the federal communications
commission)), which the department must publish by rule every fifth
year by September 30th, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
For the standard deduction in RCW 82.04.280(6), the department must
study radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national
and regional advertising to establish the standard deduction computed
as a ratio of the network, national and regional advertising revenue to
the total advertising revenue of the radio or television station
expressed as a percentage. The department must complete the study
using the best available information. This study must be completed by
August 1, 2011, and the standard deduction must be published by rule by
December 1, 2011. The study must be repeated every fifth year
thereafter by March 30th and the rule must be published every fifth
year by September 30th.

Part III
Nonprofit Property Tax Exemptions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The legislature recognizes the rich
and diverse traditions represented by Washington's nonprofit homes for
the sick or infirm and nonprofit hospitals for the sick and the value
they provide to the residents and communities they serve as well as the
employees who provide loving compassionate care.
(2) The legislature finds requiring uniform and public reporting of
community benefit is one way these facilities can continue to
demonstrate the value provided in a manner consistent with the values
of transparency and public accountability. Further, the legislature
finds that Washington should adopt national standards for reporting of
community benefits for nonprofit hospitals and nonprofit homes for the
sick or infirm.

Sec. 302 RCW 84.36.840 and 2007 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW
84.36.020 and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes, and before the
exemption ((shall be)) is allowed for any year, the superintendent or
manager or other proper officer of the organization, association,
corporation, or institution claiming exemption from taxation ((shall))
must file with the department of revenue a statement certifying that
the income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have
been applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or
for its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. This report
((shall)) must also include a statement of the receipts and
disbursements of the exempt organization, association, corporation, or
institution.
(2) Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050
((shall)) must also file a list of all property claimed to be exempt,
the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it for the
preceding year, the use to which the revenue was applied, the number of
students who attended the school or college, the total revenues of the
institution with the source from which they were derived, and the
purposes to which the revenues were applied, listing the items of such
revenues and expenditures in detail.
(3) Nonprofit homes for the sick or infirm and nonprofit hospitals
for the sick claiming exemptions under RCW 84.36.040(1) (d) and (e)
must also file on an annual basis no later than June 30th of each year,
with the department of revenue a community benefit report for the
preceding year. Community benefits include, but are not limited to:
Community health improvement services; health professions education;
subsidized health services; research; financial and in-kind
contributions; community-building activities; community benefit
operations; and charity care, including unreimbursed costs of indigent
government sponsored programs and medicaid shortfall. Nonprofit
hospitals for the sick must file a copy of the federal income tax form
990 "Schedule H" with the department to report data on community
benefits, including charity care. Nonprofit homes for the sick or
infirm must file a report on community benefits, including charity
care, on a standardized form developed by the department. The
standardized form must provide the same or similar relevant data as
required for the federal income tax form 990 "Schedule H" to report
data on community benefits, including charity care. Reports filed
under this subsection must be submitted electronically to the
department by June 30, 2012, for community benefits provided during
calendar year 2011, and by June 30th in each subsequent year
thereafter. The department must provide electronic notice of the
filing due date by May 31st of each year. The department may waive the
requirement to file reports electronically for good cause shown. If
the report is not received by the filing deadline, the exemption must
be removed. However, the department must allow a reasonable extension
of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or before the
required filing date and for good cause shown therein.
(4) The reports required under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or
approved by the department, or mailed to the department. The reports
((shall)) must be submitted on or before March 31st of each year. The
department ((shall)) must remove the tax exemption from the property of
any organization, association, corporation, or institution that does
not file the required report with the department on or before the due
date. However, the department ((shall)) must allow a reasonable
extension of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or
before the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Part IV
Income Limit for Business and Occupation
Tax Exemptions for Agricultural Products
Sec. 401 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to amounts under two million
dollars derived by any farmer that sells any agricultural product at
wholesale or to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces agricultural
products owned by others, such as custom feed operations. This
exemption ((shall)) does not apply to any person selling such products
at retail or to any person selling manufactured substances or articles.
This chapter ((shall)) also does not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.04.410 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to amounts under two hundred
thousand dollars derived by persons engaged in the production and sale
of hatching eggs or poultry for use in the production for sale of
poultry or poultry products.

Part V
Public Utility Tax--Removing Urban Category
Sec. 501 RCW 82.16.010 and 2010 c 106 s 224 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(5) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, except when such transportation meets the
definition of urban transportation business or occurs exclusively upon
private roads.
(6) (("Motor)) (a) "Transportation business" means the business
(((except urban transportation business))) of operating any motor
propelled vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed
for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any
motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban
transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. ((However, "motor))
(b) "Transportation business" also means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the
business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the
business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including
in such services the collection and distribution of property arriving
from or destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not
such collection or distribution be made by the person performing a
local or interstate line-haul of such property.
(c) "Transportation business" does not mean or include: (((a)))
(i) A log transportation business; or (((b))) (ii) the transportation
of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads or
private highways.
(7)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (6), (8), (9), (10), (((12),))
and (((13))) (12) of this section or any business subject to control by
the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties
incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature
to be of a public service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope
hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll
bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (7)(b) apply throughout this
subsection (7).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(8) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It ((shall)) does not, however,
include any business herein defined as an urban transportation
business.
(9) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(10) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(12) (("Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(13))) "Water distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or
sale.
(((14))) (13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" applies equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(5) (("Motor)) (a) "Transportation business" means the business
(((except urban transportation business))) of operating any motor
propelled vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed
for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any
motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban
transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. ((However, "motor))
(b) "Transportation business" also means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the
business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the
business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including
in such services the collection and distribution of property arriving
from or destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not
such collection or distribution be made by the person performing a
local or interstate line-haul of such property.
(c) "Transportation business" does not mean or include the
transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon
private roads or private highways.
(6)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), (((11),)) and
(12) of this section or any business subject to control by the state,
or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto,
or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (6)(b) apply throughout this
subsection (6).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(7) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It ((shall)) does not, however,
include any business herein defined as an urban transportation
business.
(8) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(9) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(10) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(11) (("Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(12))) "Water distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or
sale.
(((13))) (12) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" ((shall)) apply equally in the provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.16.020 and 2009 c 469 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) ((Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f))) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and ((eight-tenths)) seventy-five hundredths of one
percent;
(((g))) (e) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths
percent;
(((h))) (f) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on the act or privilege of
engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses
mentioned in subsection (1)(a) through (c), and (e) of this section
equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 504 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) ((Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f))) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and ((eight-tenths)) seventy-five hundredths of one
percent;
(((g))) (e) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths
percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on the act or privilege of
engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses
mentioned in subsection (1)(a) through (c), and (e) of this section
equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Part VI
Membership Dues and Fees
Sec. 601 RCW 82.04.4282 and 2009 c 535 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) dues and initiation fees paid to
nonprofit organizations exempt from the federal income tax under Title
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(8), (c)(10), or
(c)(19) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended as of January
1, 2011, (2) ((dues, (3))) contributions, (((4))) (3) donations,
(((5))) (4) tuition fees, (((6))) (5) charges made by a nonprofit trade
or professional organization for attending or occupying space at a
trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the
nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(((7))) (6) charges made for operation of privately operated
kindergartens, and (((8))) (7) endowment funds. This section may not
be construed to exempt any person, association, or society from tax
liability upon selling tangible personal property, digital goods,
digital codes, or digital automated services, or upon providing
facilities or other services for which a special charge is made to
members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount
of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to members
without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are
graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of
such goods or services ((shall)) is not ((be)) considered as a
deduction under this section.

Part VII
Public Utility Tax Deduction for Irrigation
Sec. 701 RCW 82.16.050 and 2007 c 330 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the
following items:
(1) Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service
businesses, directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance
thereof. This subsection may not be construed to exempt service
charges which are spread on the property tax rolls and collected as
taxes;
(2) Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the
same public service business as the seller, for resale as such within
this state. This deduction is allowed only with respect to water
distribution, gas distribution or other public service businesses which
furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the performance of public
service businesses;
(3) Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable
under this chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for
services furnished jointly by both, if the total amount has been
credited to and appears in the gross income reported for tax by the
former;
(4) The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or
customer;
(5) The amount of bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, on which tax was
previously paid under this chapter;
(6) Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited
from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or
laws of the United States;
(7) Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an
irrigation system, for ((irrigation)) agricultural purposes;
(8) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in this state to final destination outside this state,
or from points of origin outside this state to final destination in
this state, with respect to which the carrier grants to the shipper the
privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some point in this
state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or other
processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination;
(9) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in the state to an export elevator, wharf, dock or
ship side on tidewater or its navigable tributaries to be forwarded,
without intervening transportation, by vessel, in their original form,
to interstate or foreign destinations. No deduction is allowed under
this subsection when the point of origin and the point of delivery to
the export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side are located within the
corporate limits of the same city or town;
(10) Amounts derived from the transportation of agricultural
commodities, not including manufactured substances or articles, from
points of origin in the state to interim storage facilities in this
state for transshipment, without intervening transportation, to an
export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side on tidewater or its
navigable tributaries to be forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations. If agricultural commodities are transshipped
from interim storage facilities in this state to storage facilities at
a port on tidewater or its navigable tributaries, the same agricultural
commodity dealer must operate both the interim storage facilities and
the storage facilities at the port.
(a) The deduction under this subsection is available only when the
person claiming the deduction obtains a certificate from the
agricultural commodity dealer operating the interim storage facilities,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, certifying that:
(i) More than ninety-six percent of all of the type of agricultural
commodity delivered by the person claiming the deduction under this
subsection and delivered by all other persons to the dealer's interim
storage facilities during the preceding calendar year was shipped by
vessel in original form to interstate or foreign destinations; and
(ii) Any of the agricultural commodity that is transshipped to
ports on tidewater or its navigable tributaries will be received at
storage facilities operated by the same agricultural commodity dealer
and will be shipped from such facilities, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations.
(b) As used in this subsection, "agricultural commodity" has the
same meaning as agricultural product in RCW 82.04.213;
(11) Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of
electrical energy for resale within or outside the state or for
consumption outside the state;
(12) Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a nonprofit
water association and used for capital improvements by that nonprofit
water association;
(13) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under
RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the
treatment or disposal of sewage;
(14) Amounts derived from fees or charges imposed on persons for
transit services provided by a public transportation agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, "public transportation agency" means a
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and urban public
transportation systems, as defined in RCW 47.04.082. Public
transportation agencies shall spend an amount equal to the reduction in
tax provided by this tax deduction solely to adjust routes to improve
access for citizens using food banks and senior citizen services or to
extend or add new routes to assist low-income citizens and seniors.

Part VIII
Fraternal Benefit Societies
Sec. 801 RCW 48.36A.240 and 1987 c 366 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every society organized or licensed under this chapter that is
organized as a nonprofit organization, corporation, or association and
serves low-income communities is hereby declared to be a charitable and
benevolent institution, and all of its funds ((shall be)) is exempt
from all and every state, county, district, municipal, and school tax,
other than taxes on real estate and office equipment.

Part IX
Tax Exemption Repeals
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.350 (Exemptions -- Racing) and 2005 c 369 s 7 & 1961 c
15 s 82.04.350;
(2) RCW 82.08.0257 (Exemptions -- Auction sales of personal property
used in farming) and 2009 c 535 s 511 & 1980 c 37 s 25;
(3) RCW 84.36.130 (Airport property in this state for smaller
airports belonging to municipalities of adjoining states) and 1998 c
201 s 1 1961 c 15 s 84.36.130; and
(4) RCW 82.04.4289 (Exemption -- Compensation for patient services or
attendant sales of drugs dispensed pursuant to prescription by certain
nonprofit organizations) and 2003 c 168 s 402, 1998 c 325 s 1, 1993 c
492 s 305, 1981 c 178 s 2, & 1980 c 37 s 10.

Part X
Miscellaneous Provisions
Sec. 1001 RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Section 202, chapter . . ., Laws of 2011 (section 202 of
this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104, 110,
117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, section 3,
chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and
commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip
fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first day of the
month in which a contract for the construction of a significant
semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the
director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the
effective date of sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150,
chapter 114, Laws of 2010(([,])), section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009,
section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws
of 2003 to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the department
discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place
within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department
must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer
effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed
deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person
reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit
under section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 Section 201 of this act expires on the
date that section 202 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 Section 202 of this act takes effect if
the contingency in section 1001 of this act occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 Section 203 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 Sections 501 and 503 of this act expire
June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 Sections 502 and 504 of this act take
effect June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 Except for sections 202, 203, 502, and
504 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---