BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 301 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food
and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances,
whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated
form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed
for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does
not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, or dietary supplements. For purposes of this subsection, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(b)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; ((or))
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code,
as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42
of the federal internal revenue code; or
(d)(i) That are sold by a school, college, or university to a
nonprofit entity, if:
(A) The meals are for students or faculty members of the nonprofit
entity; and
(B) The students of the nonprofit entity are eligible to earn
academic credit from any school, college, or university.
(ii) There is no requirement for a student to be enrolled in the
school, college, or university selling the meal for a meal to be
eligible for the exemption under this subsection (3)(d).
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling
price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients,
other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have
been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total
gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales
tax rate expressed as a decimal.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food
ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks," and
"dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; ((or))
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293; or
(d)(i) That are sold by a school, college, or university to a
nonprofit entity, if:
(A) The meals are for students or faculty members of the nonprofit
entity; and
(B) The students of the nonprofit entity are eligible to earn
academic credit from any school, college, or university.
(ii) There is no requirement for a student to be enrolled in the
school, college, or university selling the meal for a meal to be
eligible for the exemption under this subsection (3)(d).

--- END ---