BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.070 and 1997 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, intangible
personal property is exempt from ad valorem taxation.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, the first million
dollars of assessed value of certificates of deposit; state, county,
and municipal bonds and warrants and bonds and warrants of other taxing
districts; bonds of the United States and of foreign countries or
political subdivisions thereof; and the bonds, stocks, or shares of
private corporations is exempt from ad valorem taxation.
(2) "Intangible personal property" means:
(a) All moneys and credits including mortgages, notes, accounts,
certificates of deposit, tax certificates, judgments, state, county and
municipal bonds and warrants and bonds and warrants of other taxing
districts, bonds of the United States and of foreign countries or
political subdivisions thereof and the bonds, stocks, or shares of
private corporations;
(b) Private nongovernmental personal service contracts, private
nongovernmental athletic or sports franchises, or private
nongovernmental athletic or sports agreements provided that the
contracts, franchises, or agreements do not pertain to the use or
possession of tangible personal or real property or to any interest in
tangible personal or real property; and
(c) Other intangible personal property such as trademarks, trade
names, brand names, patents, copyrights, trade secrets, franchise
agreements, licenses, permits, core deposits of financial institutions,
noncompete agreements, customer lists, patient lists, favorable
contracts, favorable financing agreements, reputation, exceptional
management, prestige, good name, or integrity of a business.
(3) "Intangible personal property" does not include zoning,
location, view, geographic features, easements, covenants, proximity to
raw materials, condition of surrounding property, proximity to markets,
the availability of a skilled workforce, and other characteristics or
attributes of property.
(4) This section does not preclude the use of, or permit a
departure from, generally accepted appraisal practices and the
appropriate application thereof in the valuation of real and tangible
personal property, including the appropriate consideration of licenses,
permits, and franchises granted by a government agency that affect the
use of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.

--- END ---