BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the governor's proposed 2011-13 budget,
in-home medicaid hours are being reduced for forty-five thousand
individuals by an average hour reduction of ten percent. These
services, like many other essential governmental functions, are funded
in great part by the state sales tax. The sales tax is paid by all
Washington residents and is duly imposed on the residents of most other
state and foreign jurisdictions. However, a few jurisdictions are
provided a unique exemption from the retail sales tax. Recognizing the
great hardship on Washington residents from the reduction in these
services, it is the intent of the voters to restore partial funding for
these reduced hours by repealing the nonresident sales tax exemption
and directing the receipts from the general fund to the medicaid
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Decisions as to the hours of in-home care to be provided must be
based solely upon an objective assessment of medical need, as follows:
The department must provide eligible individuals with the hours of
in-home care designated as the "base hours" for their in-home group, as
set forth in WAC 388-106-0125, as it existed on December 1, 2010,
unless the individual is eligible for a modification in hours pursuant
to the objective standards set forth in WAC 388-106-0130 (2) through
(6), as those subsections existed on December 1, 2010. The department
may consider no other factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to
nonresidents of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital
codes for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident status--Penalties) and 2011 c 7 s 1, 2010 c 106 s 215, 2009 c 535 s 512, 2007
c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39 are each repealed.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.050 and 2010 c 112 s 14, 2010 c 111 s 201, and
2010 c 106 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(1), (2), and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; ((and))
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and
(h) Debt collection services, including account collections, bill
collections, repossession, and other services related to debt
collection.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050, the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title shall be as follows: "The
legislature has passed Senate Bill No. . . . (this act). This bill
would partially restore funding for in-home long-term care services for
eligible elderly and disabled persons by extending the sales tax to
nonresidents and debt collection services."

--- END ---