BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.140 and 1989 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Every employer who is not a self-insurer shall deduct from
the pay of each of his or her workers one-half of the amount he or she
is required to pay, for medical benefits within each risk
classification. Such amount shall be periodically determined by the
director and reported by him or her to all employers under this title:
PROVIDED, That the state governmental unit shall pay the entire amount
into the medical aid fund for volunteers, as defined in RCW 51.12.035,
and the state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire amount into
the medical aid fund for registered apprentices or trainees, for the
purposes of RCW 51.12.130. The deduction under this section is not
authorized for premiums assessed under RCW 51.16.210.
(2))) It shall be unlawful for the employer((, unless specifically
authorized by this title,)) to deduct or obtain any part of the premium
or other costs required to be by him or her paid from the wages or
earnings of any of his or her workers, and the making of or attempt to
make any such deduction shall be a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.073 and 1989 c 385 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) Each
employer shall ((retain from the earnings of each worker)) remit to the
department that amount as shall be fixed from time to time by the
director, the basis for measuring ((said)) that amount to be determined
by the director. ((The money so retained shall be matched in an equal
amount by each employer, and all)) Such moneys shall be remitted to the
department in such manner and at such intervals as the department
directs and shall be placed in the supplemental pension fund((:
PROVIDED, That the state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire
amount into the supplemental pension fund for registered apprentices or
trainees during their participation in supplemental and related
instruction classes)). The moneys so collected shall be used
exclusively for the additional payments from the supplemental pension
fund prescribed in this title and for the amount of any increase
payable under the provisions of RCW 51.32.075, as now or hereafter
amended, and shall be no more than necessary to make such payments on
a current basis. The department may require a self-insurer to make any
additional payments which are payable from the supplemental pension
fund and thereafter such self-insurer shall be reimbursed therefrom.
(((2) None of the amount assessed for the supplemental pension fund
under RCW 51.16.210 may be retained from the earnings of workers
covered under RCW 51.16.210.))

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.242 and 2008 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) Each
self-insured employer shall ((retain from the earnings of each of its
workers)) remit to the department that amount as shall be fixed from
time to time by the director, the basis for measuring ((said)) that
amount to be determined by the director. These moneys shall only be
((retained from employees and)) remitted to the department in such
manner and at such intervals as the department directs and shall be
placed in the self-insured employer overpayment reimbursement fund.
The moneys so collected shall be used exclusively for reimbursement to
the reserve fund and to self-insured employers for benefits overpaid
during the pendency of board or court appeals in which the self-insured
employer prevails and has not recovered, and shall be no more than
necessary to make such payments on a current basis.
(((2) None of the amount assessed for the employer overpayment
reimbursement fund under this section may be retained from the earnings
of workers covered under RCW 51.16.210.))

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.370 and 1994 c 265 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct research on chemically related
illnesses, which shall include contracting with recognized medical
research institutions. The department shall develop an implementation
plan for research based on sound scientific research criteria, such as
double blind studies, and shall include adequate provisions for peer
review, and submit the plan to the ((worker's [workers'])) workers'
compensation advisory committee for review and approval. Following
approval of the plan, all specific proposals for projects under the
plan shall be submitted for review to a scientific advisory committee,
established to provide scientific oversight of research projects, and
to the workers' compensation advisory committee. The department shall
include a research project that encourages regional cooperation in
addressing chemically related illness.
(2) Expenditures for research projects shall be within legislative
appropriations from the medical aid fund, with self-insured employers
and the state fund each paying a pro rata share, based on the number of
worker hours, of the authorized expenditures. ((For the purposes of
this subsection only, self-insured employers may deduct from the pay of
each of their employees one-half of the share charged to the employer
for the expenditures from the medical aid fund.))

--- END ---