BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "plug-in vehicle" means a
four-wheeled motor vehicle that:
(a) Is made by a manufacturer;
(b) Is manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and
highways;
(c) Has not been modified from original manufacturer
specifications;
(d) Does not have a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 8,500
pounds;
(e) Has a maximum speed capability of at least sixty-five miles per
hour;
(f) Is propelled to a significant extent by an electric motor that
draws electricity from a battery that:
(i) Has a capacity of not less than 3.4 kilowatt hours; and
(ii) Is capable of being recharged from an external source of
electricity; and
(g) Is acquired by the owner on or after October 1, 2010.
(2) Whenever the department of transportation places a traffic
control device on a highway designating a portion of the highway as a
high occupancy vehicle lane, the traffic control device must also
indicate that the high occupancy vehicle lane may be used at all times
by plug-in vehicles that have obtained a permit from the department of
transportation under this section, regardless of the number of
passengers in the vehicle.
(3)(a) The department of transportation shall consult with the
Washington state patrol and the local authorities to design a permit
using existing resources by July 1, 2012, to designate a vehicle as a
plug-in vehicle authorized to use a high occupancy vehicle lane.
(b) The secretary of transportation may limit the number of permits
issued to ensure that high occupancy vehicle lane operations are not
degraded to an unacceptable level.
(4) Beginning December 1, 2012, and by every December 1st
thereafter, the department of transportation shall report to the
legislature on the effect of the use of plug-in vehicle permits issued
under this section on the operation of high occupancy vehicle lanes in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires August 1, 2015.

--- END ---