BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries shall implement an
improvement plan as provided in this section to continuously improve
efficiency, effectiveness, integrity, and satisfaction in the state's
workers' compensation system, including the occupational safety and
health program, to best in the nation. Self-insured employers shall
cooperate with the department and provide information necessary for the
department to fully implement this section.
(2) The department shall apply to the Washington state quality
award or a similar Baldrige assessment organization such as the
Baldrige national quality program for a full Baldrige assessment within
ten months of the effective date of this section. To assure continued
improvement to the system, the department shall apply for a full
assessment every two years after the initial assessment, and every
three years after reaching a score of sixty percent. The department
shall commit and develop a plan to become a high performance, high
integrity organization and reach a score of sixty percent in six years.
(3) The department shall develop a statewide worker safety and
workers' compensation performance improvement plan and a performance
dashboard grading program within six months of the effective date of
this section, and update the plan and performance grading program
annually. The department shall develop online real time monitoring of
all measures and shall link a plan with improvement strategies for each
measurement with a target. The measures must at a minimum include in
order of priority:
(a) Claims reduction: Reduce the number of allowed claims by hours
worked by four percent within two years and twenty percent within ten
years, to include at a minimum, segmentation by occupation, industry,
county, and permanent total disability benefits awarded;
(b) Cost reduction: Reduce total workers' compensation system
costs, including occupational safety and health costs, by four percent
within two years and twenty percent within ten years to include at a
minimum, segmentation by occupation, industry, county, permanent total
disability benefits, and average medical cost per claim segmented by
average total cost per claim with seven days or more of temporary total
disability benefits;
(c) Best practice implementation: Share and increase adoption of
best practices by employers, workers, and providers;
(d) Productivity improvement and waste reduction: Reduce system
waste to zero and increase system productivity;
(e) Employer safety plan and implementation:
(i) All employer safety plans rated excellent; and
(ii) Reduce to zero the rate of serious hazards identified per
occupational safety and health consultation and citations for serious
violations issued per inspection;
(f) Performance management: Increase the Baldrige assessment to
sixty percent and increase lean or lean six sigma implementation to one
hundred percent as measured by the audit conducted under subsection (4)
of this section;
(g) Provider performance: Increase percentage of providers rated
excellent within five years;
(h) System integrity and ethics: Increase integrity and reduce
fraud by employers, workers, providers, and others;
(i) System satisfaction: Improve employer, worker, stakeholder,
and provider satisfaction to best in the nation; and
(j) Timeliness improvement: Decrease claims processing time,
worker return-to-work time, and average duration of temporary total
disability benefits.
(4) The state auditor shall conduct an audit of the department's
workers' compensation and occupational safety and health performance
measures, strategic plan, government management and accountability
performance, lean implementation plan, and other major processes every
two years until certified as fully implemented, and then every five
years.
(5) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature annually regarding the requirements of this section.
The report must include a summary of the most recent Baldrige
assessment, a description of the most recent performance improvement
plan and performance grading program, and the most recent annual
performance scorecards.
(6) The department shall recognize annually with the governor's
workplace safety award the employers, by industry, that are the safest
and the most improved with respect to safety and cost. The department
shall also recognize employers that have adopted best practices.

--- END ---