BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
STRENGTHENING INSTRUCTION AND SUPPORT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Before implementing revisions to the state essential academic
learning requirements as authorized under RCW 28A.655.070, the
superintendent of public instruction must ensure that a fairness and
bias review of the revisions has been conducted, including providing an
opportunity for input from the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee under RCW 28A.300.136 and from an additional
diverse group of community representatives, parents, and educators to
be convened by the superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2012, each school district board of directors that
grants high school diplomas shall adopt a policy that defines a high
school credit for purposes of meeting state and local graduation
requirements. The Washington state school directors' association, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall develop a model
policy that school districts may choose to adopt to satisfy the policy
requirements. The policy may define a high school credit based on a
seat-time definition, demonstrated competencies, or some combination,
as long as the policy specifies the means by which the school district
assures that students have gained the knowledge and skills necessary to
earn a credit.
(2) Each school district board of directors shall submit a copy of
its policy to the state board of education.
(3) The state board of education may adopt a rule repealing the
seat-time definition of a high school credit by May 31, 2012, and shall
require school districts to certify annually to the board that the
district has a policy to define a high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Within available state and federal funds for school and district
improvement, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide technical assistance to schools and districts
specifically targeted to reduce school dropouts and improve on-time and
extended high school graduation rates. The technical assistance shall
be more intensive for those high schools and school districts in
significant need of improvement.

Sec. 104 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2010 c 236 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and
graduation advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 105 RCW 28A.657.050 and 2010 c 235 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local district superintendent and local school board of a
school district designated as a required action district must submit a
required action plan to the state board of education for approval.
Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan
must be submitted under a schedule as required by the state board. A
required action plan must be developed in collaboration with
administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing
any employees within the district, students, and other representatives
of the local community. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested.
The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on
a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall
submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with
federal guidelines. After the office of the superintendent of public
instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal
guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action
plan to the state board of education for approval.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action. However, a district may not establish
a charter school under a federal intervention model without express
legislative authority. The intervention models are the turnaround,
restart, school closure, and transformation models. The intervention
model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic
performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to
allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts
designated as a required action district by the state board of
education within three years of implementation of the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant or a grant from other federal funds for school improvement to the
superintendent of public instruction;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address
the findings of the academic performance audit; ((and))
(e) Use of the state kindergarten readiness assessment process if
the school is an elementary school;
(f) Use of family engagement coordinators to build relationships
between families, the school, and the community to improve student
achievement; and
(g) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, must reopen the
agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to
terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a
required action plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each
issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the
filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court
setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of
its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant or a grant from
other federal funds for school improvement to the district from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement one of
the four federal intervention models. The court's decision must be
issued no later than June 15th of the year in which the petition is
filed and is final and binding on the parties; however the court's
decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it does not allow
the school district to implement a required action plan consistent with
the requirements for the award of a federal school improvement grant or
other federal funds for school improvement by the superintendent of
public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the four federal models in a required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
To the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction may require elementary
schools receiving federal school improvement grants to use the state
kindergarten readiness assessment, and may require a school to use
family engagement coordinators to build relationships between families,
the school, and the community to improve student achievement.

PART II
CLOSING THE OPPORTUNITY GAP
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.165.015 and 2004 c 20 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter.
(2) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, ((and))
mathematics, and science as well as readiness associated with these
skills.
(3) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade eleven who scores below standard for his or her grade level on
the statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services. Beginning with the 2007-2008 school year,
"participating student" means a student in kindergarten through grade
twelve who scores below standard for his or her grade level on the
statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services.
(4) "Statewide assessments" means one or more of the several basic
skills assessments administered as part of the state's student
assessment system, and assessments in the basic skills areas
administered by local school districts.
(5) "Underachieving students" means students with the greatest
academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the statewide
assessments.

Sec. 202 RCW 28A.165.015 and 2009 c 548 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter.
(2) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, ((and))
mathematics, and science as well as readiness associated with these
skills.
(3) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade twelve who scores below standard for his or her grade level on
the statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services.
(4) "Statewide assessments" means one or more of the several basic
skills assessments administered as part of the state's student
assessment system, and assessments in the basic skills areas
administered by local school districts.
(5) "Underachieving students" means students with the greatest
academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the statewide
assessments.

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2009 c 556 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A participating school district shall submit the district's
plan for using learning assistance funds to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for approval, to the extent
required under subsection (2) of this section. The program plan must
identify the program activities to be implemented from RCW 28A.165.035
and implement all of the elements in (a) through (h) of this
subsection. The school district plan shall include the following:
(a) District and school-level data on reading, writing, science,
and mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW
and relevant federal law;
(b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students to
be served by the program, including the identification of school or
program sites providing program activities;
(c) How accelerated learning plans are developed and implemented
for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may be
developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such as
student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(i) Achievement goals for the students;
(ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in
the plan;
(iii) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment;
and
(iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(d) How state level and classroom assessments are used to inform
instruction;
(e) How focused and intentional instructional strategies have been
identified and implemented;
(f) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed and
supported in the program and in participating schools;
(g) How other federal, state, district, and school resources are
coordinated with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan to support underachieving students; and
(h) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.
(2) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 204 RCW 28A.320.190 and 2009 c 578 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for
eligible ((eleventh and)) ninth through twelfth grade students who are
not on track to meet local or state graduation requirements as well as
eighth grade students who need additional assistance in order to have
the opportunity for a successful entry into high school. The program
shall provide early notification of graduation status and information
on education opportunities including preapprenticeship programs that
are available.
(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the
extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make
available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or
more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing
enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160.
Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to
provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(((3)))
(5).
(3) Under the extended learning opportunities program,
instructional services for eligible students can occur during the
regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location
deemed appropriate by the school district, including the educational
service district, in order to meet the needs of these students.
Instructional services provided under this section do not include
services offered at private schools. Instructional services can
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the ((Washington)) state
high school assessment ((of student learning));
(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school
classes or at a skill center;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs
for credit retrieval and ((Washington)) state assessment ((of student
learning)) preparatory classes; and
(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational
service districts to serve eighth((, eleventh, and)) through twelfth
grade educators through professional development in accordance with RCW
28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide
direct services to eligible students and those students electing to
continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling
with basic reading skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall work with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to design and implement a research study to measure
the impact on student achievement of remediation strategies funded by
the learning assistance program.
(2) The objectives of the research study are to determine which
remediation strategies are most effective and efficient in improving
student achievement in reading, mathematics, and science; and identify
outcome measures for use by policymakers in evaluating learning
assistance program success. The study design shall include
quantitative and qualitative methods; identify the data necessary for
a high-quality study; and identify the extent that necessary data is
being collected and, if not, how it could be collected, including
through sampling if necessary.
(3) The institute shall submit the research study design to the
quality education council and the education committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2011.
(4) The institute shall submit the results of the research study to
the quality education council and the education committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2012.

Sec. 206 RCW 28A.180.090 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 6 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
evaluation system designed to measure increases in the English and
academic proficiency of eligible pupils. When developing the system,
the superintendent shall:
(1) Require school districts to assess potentially eligible pupils
within ten days of registration using an English proficiency assessment
or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public
instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to
both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district;
(2) Require school districts to annually assess all eligible pupils
at the end of the school year using an English proficiency assessment
or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public
instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to
both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district.
Aggregated results must be posted on the web site of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for each school and school
district, using the Washington state report card. The report card must
include the average length of time students in each school and district
are enrolled in the transitional bilingual instructional program,
annual change in the number and percentage of students making progress
in learning English, annual change in the number and percentage of
students attaining English proficiency, and the number and percentage
of students meeting annual targets in reading and mathematics for state
and federal accountability; and
(3) Develop a system to evaluate increases in the English and
academic proficiency of students who are, or were, eligible pupils.
This evaluation shall include students when they are in the program and
after they exit the program until they finish their K-12 career or
transfer from the school district. Aggregated results from the
academic assessment of students who were formerly eligible pupils under
the program must be reported by school and school district using the
Washington state report card. The purpose of the evaluation system is
to inform schools, school districts, parents, and the state of the
effectiveness of the transitional bilingual programs in school and
school districts in teaching these students English and other content
areas, such as mathematics and writing((; and
(4) Report to the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2002, regarding the development of the
systems described in this section and a timeline for the full
implementation of those systems. The legislature shall approve and
provide funding for the evaluation system in subsection (3) of this
section before any implementation of the system developed under
subsection (3) of this section may occur)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of the program for highly capable students under
this chapter, a highly capable student means a student who performs, or
shows potential for performing, at significantly advanced levels when
compared to others of his or her age, experience, or environment.
Outstanding capabilities are seen with the student's general
intellectual aptitudes, specific academic abilities, creative
productivities within a specific domain, or leadership skills. Highly
capable students are present in all cultural and linguistic groups and
across all socioeconomic strata; coexist with all manner of disabling
conditions both visible and invisible; and manifest across all areas of
human endeavor.

Sec. 208 RCW 28A.185.020 and 2009 c 548 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that, for highly capable students, access
to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction is access to a basic
education. The education of highly capable students may include
supports and services that are in addition to those ordinarily provided
as part of general education.
(2) There are multiple definitions of highly capable, from
intellectual to academic to artistic. The research literature strongly
supports using multiple criteria to identify highly capable students,
and therefore, the legislature does not intend to prescribe a single
method. Instead, the legislature intends to allocate funding based on
two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school
district's population and authorize school districts to identify
through the use of multiple, objective criteria those students most
highly capable and eligible to receive accelerated learning and
enhanced instruction in the program offered by the district. Access to
accelerated learning and enhanced instruction through the program for
highly capable students does not constitute an individual entitlement
for any particular student.
(((2))) (3) Supplementary funds provided by the state for the
program for highly capable students under RCW 28A.150.260 shall be
categorical funding to provide services to highly capable students as
determined by a school district under RCW 28A.185.030.

Sec. 209 RCW 28A.185.030 and 2009 c 380 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Local school districts may establish and operate, either separately
or jointly, programs for highly capable students. Such authority shall
include the right to employ and pay special instructors and to operate
such programs jointly with a public institution of higher education.
Local school districts which establish and operate programs for highly
capable students shall adopt identification procedures and provide
educational opportunities as follows:
(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction, school districts shall implement procedures for
nomination, assessment and selection of their most highly capable
students for the purposes of the highly capable program. ((Nominations
shall be based upon data from teachers, other staff, parents, students,
and members of the community. Assessment shall be based upon a review
of each student's capability as shown by multiple criteria intended to
reveal, from a wide variety of sources and data, each student's unique
needs and capabilities. Selection shall be made by a broadly based
committee of professionals, after consideration of the results of the
multiple criteria assessment.)) Under the procedures, no single
criterion should prevent a student's identification. However, any
single criterion, if strong enough, may indicate a need for services.
The rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction must
include but are not limited to consistent procedures for:
(a) Universal screening;
(b) Regular public notification;
(c) Use of multiple criteria;
(d) Involvement of qualified professionals in the identification
process;
(e) Family involvement in decision making;
(f) Notification of parents or legal guardians;
(g) Safeguards to reduce cultural, linguistic, socioeconomic, and
gender bias, and to mitigate impacts resulting from disabilities; and
(h) Periodic reviews, including input from families.
(2) When a student, who is a child of a military family in
transition, has been assessed or enrolled as highly capable by a
sending school, the receiving school shall initially honor placement of
the student into a like program.
(a) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(b) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments to
determine appropriate placement and continued enrollment in the
program.
(3) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational
opportunity which takes into account each student's unique needs and
capabilities and the limits of the resources and program options
available to the district, including those options which can be
developed or provided by using funds allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for that purpose.
(4) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 210 RCW 28C.18.162 and 2009 c 238 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this section and RCW 28C.18.160 and
28C.18.164 through 28C.18.168.
(1) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities. For the
purposes of opportunity internships, the teaching of mathematics,
science, bilingual education, special education, or English as a second
language is considered a high-demand occupation.
(2) "Low-income high school student" means a student who is
enrolled in grade((s)) ten, eleven, or twelve in a public high school
and who qualifies for federal free or reduced-price meals. If a
student qualifies at the time the student begins participating in the
opportunity internship program, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price meals thereafter.
To participate in the program, the student must remain enrolled in high
school until the student receives a high school diploma.
(3) "Opportunity internship consortium" means a local consortium
formed for the purpose of participating in the opportunity internship
program and which may be composed of a local workforce development
council, economic development council, area high schools, community or
technical colleges, apprenticeship councils, preapprenticeship programs
such as running start for the trades, private vocational schools
licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, public and private four-year
institutions of higher education, employers in targeted industries, and
labor organizations. Partnerships of high schools, teacher preparation
programs, and community-based organizations offering the program under
RCW 28A.415.370 may be considered opportunity internship consortia.
(4) "Opportunity internship graduate" means a low-income high
school student who successfully completes an opportunity internship
program and graduates from high school.
(5) "Postsecondary program of study" means an undergraduate or
graduate certificate, apprenticeship, or degree program.
(6) "Preapprenticeship" means a program of at least ninety hours
and not more than one hundred eighty hours in length that provides
practical experience, education, preparation, and the development of
skills that would be beneficial for entry into state-approved
apprenticeship programs, including but not limited to construction
industry structure and the construction process; orientation to state-approved apprenticeship; tools of the various trades and safe handling
of power tools; and industry standards of safety, responsibility, and
craft excellence.
(7) "Targeted industry" means a business or industry identified by
a local workforce development council as having high-demand occupations
that require candidates to have completed a postsecondary program of
study.

Sec. 211 RCW 28A.660.042 and 2007 c 396 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is created.
(2)(a) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section,
participation is limited to paraeducators without a college degree who
have at least three years of classroom experience. It is anticipated
that candidates enrolled in this program will complete their associate
of arts degree at a community and technical college in two years or
less and become eligible for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement via route one in the
alternative routes to teacher certification program provided in this
chapter.
(((2))) (b) Entry requirements for candidates under this subsection
(2) include district or building validation of qualifications,
including three years of successful student interaction and leadership
as a classified instructional employee.
(3) Subject to the availability of funds for the pipeline for
paraeducators conditional scholarship program under RCW 28A.660.050,
after qualified candidates under subsection (2) of this section have
been accepted, individuals who participated in one of the recruiting
Washington teachers grant programs under RCW 28A.415.370 may
participate in the pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship
program if the individual meets the criteria for the scholarship under
RCW 28A.660.050.

Sec. 212 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2010 c 235 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of professional educator standards board-approved
alternative routes to teaching programs under RCW 28A.660.040. For
fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to fiscal year 2010
participants in the alternative route partnership program. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through a professional educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified ((paraeducators)) individuals as provided by
RCW 28A.660.042. Paraeducators who apply for the program under RCW
28A.660.042(2) shall receive first priority in scholarship awards. In
order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.

Sec. 213 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2010 c 235 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
Alternative route programs under this chapter shall operate one to
four specific route programs. Successful completion of the program
shall make a candidate eligible for residency teacher certification.
The mentor of the teacher candidate at the school and the supervisor of
the teacher candidate from the teacher preparation program must both
agree that the teacher candidate has successfully completed the
program.
(1) Alternative route programs operating route one programs shall
enroll currently employed classified instructional employees with
transferable associate degrees or former participants in the recruiting
Washington teachers program who enter through the pipeline for
paraeducators conditional scholarship program under RCW 28A.660.042 who
are seeking residency teacher certification with endorsements in
mathematics, special education, bilingual education, or English as a
second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
route will complete both their baccalaureate degree and requirements
for residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored
internship to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership
programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam; and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) Alternative route programs operating route two programs shall
enroll currently employed classified staff with baccalaureate degrees
seeking residency teacher certification in subject matter shortage
areas and areas with shortages due to geographic location. Candidates
enrolled in this route must complete a mentored internship complemented
by flexibly scheduled training and coursework offered at a local site,
such as a school or educational service district, or online or via
video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with the
partnership program's higher education partner. In addition,
partnership grant programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as classified
staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam.
(3) Alternative route programs seeking funds to operate route three
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
not employed in the district at the time of application. When
selecting candidates for certification through route three, districts
and approved preparation program providers shall give priority to
individuals who are seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas or shortages due to geographic locations.
Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer
teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a
mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a second summer
teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry
requirements for candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam.
(4) Alternative route programs operating route four programs shall
enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are employed in the
district at the time of application, or who hold conditional teaching
certificates or emergency substitute certificates. Cohorts of
candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching
academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a mentored
internship. If employed on a conditional certificate, the intern may
serve as the teacher of record, supported by a well-trained mentor. In
addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam.
(5) Applicants for alternative route programs who are eligible
veterans or national guard members and who meet the entry requirements
for the alternative route program for which application is made shall
be given preference in admission.

PART III
SUPPORTING EDUCATION PROFESSIONALS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The legislature intends to continue
development and implementation of revised teacher and principal
evaluation systems according to the schedule in RCW 28A.405.100,
including supporting the work of those school districts developing and
piloting the revised evaluation systems.

Sec. 302 RCW 28A.400.201 and 2010 c 236 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that providing students with the
opportunity to access a world-class educational system depends on our
continuing ability to provide students with access to world-class
educators. The legislature also understands that continuing to attract
and retain the highest quality educators will require increased
investments. The legislature intends to enhance the current salary
allocation model and recognizes that changes to the current model
cannot be imposed without great deliberation and input from teachers,
administrators, and classified employees. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to begin the process of developing an enhanced
salary allocation model that is collaboratively designed to ensure the
rationality of any conclusions regarding what constitutes adequate
compensation.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in collaboration with the office of financial
management, shall convene a technical working group to recommend the
details of an enhanced salary allocation model that aligns state
expectations for educator development and certification with the
compensation system and establishes recommendations for a concurrent
implementation schedule. In addition to any other details the
technical working group deems necessary, the technical working group
shall make recommendations on the following:
(a) How to reduce the number of tiers within the existing salary
allocation model;
(b) How to account for labor market adjustments;
(c) How to account for different geographic regions of the state
where districts may encounter difficulty recruiting and retaining
teachers;
(d) The role of and types of bonuses available;
(e) Ways to accomplish salary equalization over a set number of
years; and
(f) Initial fiscal estimates for implementing the recommendations
including a recognition that staff on the existing salary allocation
model would have the option to grandfather in permanently to the
existing schedule.
(3) As part of its work, the technical working group shall conduct
or contract for a preliminary comparative labor market analysis of
salaries and other compensation for school district employees to be
conducted and shall include the results in any reports to the
legislature. For the purposes of this subsection, "salaries and other
compensation" includes average base salaries, average total salaries,
average employee basic benefits, and retirement benefits.
(4) The analysis required under subsection (1) of this section
must:
(a) Examine salaries and other compensation for teachers, other
certificated instructional staff, principals, and other building-level
certificated administrators, and the types of classified employees for
whom salaries are allocated;
(b) Be calculated at a statewide level that identifies labor
markets in Washington through the use of data from the United States
bureau of the census and the bureau of labor statistics; and
(c) Include a comparison of salaries and other compensation to the
appropriate labor market for at least the following subgroups of
educators: Beginning teachers and types of educational staff
associates.
(5) The working group shall conduct a comprehensive analysis of
educator professional development and mentoring needs for principals,
teachers, educational staff associates, and classified staff. The
analysis must include professional development needs in the following
specific areas:
(a) Cultural competency;
(b) Competency in language acquisition; and
(c) Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics instruction.
(6) The working group shall also examine current barriers and
possible strategies, including incentives, to recruit and retain
diverse teachers and teachers with knowledge and skills in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics.
(7) The working group shall include representatives of the
department of personnel, the professional educator standards board, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington
education association, the Washington association of school
administrators, the association of Washington school principals, the
Washington state school directors' association, the public school
employees of Washington, and other interested stakeholders with
appropriate expertise in compensation related matters. The working
group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as necessary to
assure participation and input from a broad array of diverse
stakeholders.
(((6))) (8) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by
the legislature and the quality education council created in RCW
28A.290.010. The working group shall make an initial report to the
legislature by June 30, 2012, and shall include in its report
recommendations for whether additional further work of the group is
necessary.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Sections 104, 202, and 208 of this act
take effect September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Section 201 of this act expires September
1, 2011.

--- END ---