BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.08.065 and 1998 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) It is unlawful for any public officer having charge of any
vehicle owned or controlled by any county, city, town, or public body
in this state other than the state of Washington and used in public
business to operate the same upon the public highways of this state
unless and until there shall be displayed upon such automobile or other
motor vehicle in letters of contrasting color not less than one and
one-quarter inches in height in a conspicuous place on the right and
left sides thereof, the name of such county, city, town, or other
public body, together with the name of the department or office upon
the business of which the said vehicle is used.
(b) This section shall not apply to vehicles of a sheriff's office,
local police department, or any vehicles used by local peace officers
under public authority for special undercover or confidential
investigative purposes. A vehicle owned or controlled by a sheriff's
office or local police department that is not marked in compliance with
this section and that is being used by a local peace officer for other
than special undercover or confidential investigative purposes shall
not remain on private property while the officer is filling out reports
or executing other administrative activities.
(c) This subsection (1) shall not apply to: (((a))) (i) Any
municipal transit vehicle operated for purposes of providing public
mass transportation; (((b))) (ii) any vehicle governed by the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section; nor to (((c))) (iii)
any motor vehicle on loan to a school district for driver training
purposes.
(d) It shall be lawful and constitute compliance with the
provisions of this section, however, for the governing body of the
appropriate county, city, town, or public body other than the state of
Washington or its agencies to adopt and use a distinctive insignia
which shall be not less than six inches in diameter across its smallest
dimension and which shall be displayed conspicuously on the right and
left sides of the vehicle. Such insignia shall be in a color or colors
contrasting with the vehicle to which applied for maximum visibility.
The name of the public body owning or operating the vehicle shall also
be included as part of or displayed above such approved insignia in
colors contrasting with the vehicle in letters not less than one and
one-quarter inches in height. Immediately below the lettering
identifying the public entity and agency operating the vehicle or below
an approved insignia shall appear the words "for official use only" in
letters at least one inch high in a color contrasting with the color of
the vehicle.
(e) The appropriate governing body may provide by rule or ordinance
for marking of passenger motor vehicles as prescribed in subsection (2)
of this section or for exceptions to the marking requirements for local
governmental agencies for the same purposes and under the same
circumstances as permitted for state agencies under subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
passenger motor vehicles owned or controlled by the state of
Washington, and purchased after July 1, 1989, must be plainly and
conspicuously marked on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window
with the name of the operating agency or institution or the words
"state motor pool," as appropriate, the words "state of Washington -- for official use only," and the seal of the state of Washington or the
appropriate agency or institution insignia, approved by the department
of general administration. Markings must be on a transparent adhesive
material and conform to the standards established by the department of
general administration. For the purposes of this section, "passenger
motor vehicles" means sedans, station wagons, vans, light trucks, or
other motor vehicles under ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to vehicles used
by the Washington state patrol for general undercover or confidential
investigative purposes. Traffic control vehicles of the Washington
state patrol may be exempted from the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section at the discretion of the chief of the Washington state
patrol. The department of general administration shall adopt general
rules permitting other exceptions to the requirements of subsection (2)
of this section for other vehicles used for law enforcement,
confidential public health work, and public assistance fraud or support
investigative purposes, for vehicles leased or rented by the state on
a casual basis for a period of less than ninety days, and those
provided for in RCW 46.08.066(3). The exceptions in this subsection,
subsection (4) of this section, and those provided for in RCW
46.08.066(3) shall be the only exceptions permitted to the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Any motorcycle, vehicle over 10,000 pounds gross vehicle
weight, or other vehicle that for structural reasons cannot be marked
as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is owned or
controlled by the state of Washington or by any county, city, town, or
other public body in this state and used for public purposes on the
public highways of this state shall be conspicuously marked in letters
of a contrasting color with the words "State of Washington" or the name
of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the
name of the department or office that owns or controls the vehicle.
(5) All motor vehicle markings required under the terms of this
chapter shall be maintained in a legible condition at all times.

--- END ---