BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee, in
consultation with the department of labor and industries and the
workers' compensation advisory committee, shall conduct a performance
audit of the workers' compensation claims management system, including
self-insured claims. The joint legislative audit and review committee
may contract with an independent expert in workers' compensation claims
management to assist with the audit.
(2) The audit shall:
(a) Evaluate the extent to which the department: (i) Makes fair
and timely decisions, and resolves complaints and disputes in a timely,
fair, and effective manner; and (ii) communicates with employers and
workers in a timely, responsive, and accurate manner, including
communication about review and appeal rights, and including the use of
plain language and sufficient opportunities for face-to-face meetings;
(b) Determine if current claims management organization and service
delivery models are the most efficient available; analyze organization
and delivery for retrospective rating plan participants as compared to
nonparticipants to identify differences and how those differences
influence retrospective rating plan refunds; and determine whether
current initiatives improve service delivery, meet the needs of current
and future workers and employers, improve public education and
outreach, and are otherwise measurable; and
(c) Make recommendations regarding administrative changes that
should be made to improve efficiency while maintaining high levels of
quality service to help address system costs, and any needed
legislative changes to implement the recommendations.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
progress reports by December 1, 2012, and December 1, 2013, and the
results of the audit by June 30, 2015, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2015.

--- END ---