BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.--- and 2011 c 58 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, beginning
October 1, 2011, and every quarter thereafter, every beneficiary
issuing notices of default, or directing that a trustee or authorized
agent issue the notice of default, on owner-occupied residential real
property under this chapter must:
(a) Report to the department the number of owner-occupied
residential real properties for which the beneficiary has issued a
notice of default during the previous quarter; and
(b) Remit the amount required under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For each owner-occupied residential real property for which a
notice of default has been issued, the beneficiary issuing the notice
of default, or directing that a trustee or authorized agent issue the
notice of default, shall remit two hundred fifty dollars to the
department to be deposited, as provided under RCW 61.24.--- (section
11, chapter 58, Laws of 2011), into the foreclosure fairness account.
The two hundred fifty dollar payment is required per property and not
per notice of default. The beneficiary shall remit the total amount
required in a lump sum each quarter.
(3) No later than thirty days after April 14, 2011, the
beneficiaries required to report and remit to the department under this
section shall determine the number of owner-occupied residential real
properties for which notices of default were issued during the three
months prior to April 14, 2011. The beneficiary shall remit to the
department a one-time sum of two hundred fifty dollars multiplied by
the number of properties. In addition, by July 31, 2011, the
beneficiaries required to report and remit to the department under this
section shall remit to the department another one-time sum of two
hundred fifty dollars multiplied by the number of owner-occupied
residential real properties for which notices of default were issued
from April 14, 2011, through June 30, 2011. The department shall
deposit the funds into the foreclosure fairness account as provided
under RCW 61.24.---(section 11, chapter 58, Laws of 2011).
(4) This section does not apply to any beneficiary or loan servicer
that is a federally insured depository institution, as defined in 12
U.S.C. Sec. 461(b)(1)(A), and that certifies under penalty of perjury
that it has issued, or has directed a trustee or authorized agent to
issue, fewer than two hundred fifty notices of default in the preceding
year.
(5) This section does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---