BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The utilities and transportation
commission and the department of commerce must jointly select a
consultant located within the state of Washington with experience in
economic and policy analysis to conduct an analysis of the energy
independence act, chapter 19.285 RCW, and the treatment of
hydroelectric power as an eligible renewable resource. Specifically,
the analysis must review the following elements and recommend changes
to the energy independence act that will stabilize energy costs for
consumers and businesses including:
(a) The variability of water flow on an annual and seasonal basis
through hydroelectric dams and its impact on the market price of power;
(b) The amount of hydroelectric generation that has been curtailed
to accommodate generation from other sources and from available data,
a forecast of future curtailment of hydroelectric generation to meet
the requirements of the energy independence act;
(c) The amount of capacity in the hydroelectric generation system
that can serve as firming power for intermittent renewable resources
and the real opportunity cost of curtailing hydroelectric generation in
favor of other generation sources;
(d) The average price per megawatt hour of hydroelectric power
generated within the state of Washington compared to new wind and solar
power and, as data is available, other renewable resources as that term
is defined in RCW 19.285.030;
(e) The estimated cost of new infrastructure necessary to integrate
wind, solar, and other renewable resources onto the electric grid to
meet the requirements of the energy independence act and other state
renewable energy requirements;
(f) The role of federal regulations on the generational and
operational flexibility of hydroelectric dams within the state of
Washington; and
(g) The policy treatment in other states with renewable energy
requirements of hydroelectric generation as an eligible renewable
resource.
(2) The utilities and transportation commission and the department
of commerce must report the findings and recommendations of the
analysis to the legislature by January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---