BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to make
retroactive and technical amendments to clarify the intent of chapter
520, Laws of 2009, and chapter 291, Laws of 2010, and to resolve any
ambiguity existing in those laws prior to this act.
In enacting chapter 520, Laws of 2009, and chapter 291, Laws of
2010, the legislature intended to change how the department of social
and health services administers and manages child welfare services. To
further these changes, the legislature:
(1) Specifically mandated the end dates by which the department is
to make these changes, but otherwise did not intend to limit the
department's discretion; and
(2) Expressly mandated that: (a) The department contract, by July
1, 2011, for service coordination components of case management and
other services, and by December 30, 2012, for all services under RCW
74.13.360 and 74.13.372; and (b) such contracts for services under (a)
of this subsection, including services obtained through requests for
proposals for those services, that are historically and customarily
performed by classified employees, not be subject to the processes set
forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5).
The legislature intends that through contracts for service
coordination and other services under RCW 74.13.360 or 74.13.372, and
through the services to be contracted for through request for proposals
for those services, the department will be better able to achieve
required outcomes in child safety, child permanency, including
reunification, and child well-being.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.362 and 2009 c 520 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 41.06.142(3), ((performance-based)) contracting for
services under RCW 74.13.360 or 74.13.372 and for services to be
contracted for under these statutes through request for proposals is
expressly mandated by the legislature and is not subject to the
processes set forth in RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5).
((A continuation or expansion of delivery of child welfare services
under the provisions of RCW 74.13.372 shall be considered expressly
mandated by the legislature and not subject to the provisions of RCW
41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5).))

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.360 and 2010 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than ((July 1, 2011,)) December 1, 2011, the
department shall ((convert)) not renew its current contracts with
providers of child welfare services and shall enter into performance-based contracts with a substantially decreased number of entities for
the provision of child welfare services. ((In accomplishing this
conversion, the department shall decrease the total number of contracts
it uses to purchase child welfare services from providers.)) The
((conversion of)) change to performance-based contracts for the
provision of child welfare services ((to performance-based contracts))
must be done in a manner that does not adversely affect the state's
ability to continue to obtain federal funding for child welfare related
functions currently performed by the state and with consideration of
options to further maximize federal funding opportunities and increase
flexibility in the use of such funds, including use for preventive and
in-home child welfare services.
(2) No later than December 30, 2012:
(a) In the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a),
child welfare services shall be provided by supervising agencies with
whom the department has entered into performance-based contracts.
Supervising agencies may enter into subcontracts with other licensed
agencies; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may not
directly provide child welfare services to families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a).
(3) No later than December 30, 2012, for families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
is responsible for only the following:
(a) Monitoring the quality of services for which the department
contracts under this chapter;
(b) Ensuring that the services are provided in accordance with
federal law and the laws of this state, including the Indian child
welfare act;
(c) Providing child protection functions and services, including
intake and investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect,
emergency shelter care functions under RCW 13.34.050, and referrals to
appropriate providers; and
(d) Issuing licenses pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(4) No later than December 30, 2012, for families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
may provide child welfare services only:
(a) For the limited purpose of establishing a control or comparison
group as deemed necessary by the child welfare transformation design
committee, with input from the Washington state institute for public
policy, to implement the demonstration sites selected and defined
pursuant to RCW 74.13.368(4)(a) in which the performance in achieving
measurable outcomes will be compared and evaluated pursuant to RCW
74.13.370; or
(b) In an emergency or as a provider of last resort. The
department shall adopt rules describing the circumstances under which
the department may provide those services. For purposes of this
section, "provider of last resort" means the department is unable to
contract with a private agency to provide child welfare services in a
particular geographic area or, after entering into a contract with a
private agency, either the contractor or the department terminates the
contract.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, on and after September 1, 2010,
performance-based contracts shall be structured to hold the supervising
agencies accountable for achieving the following goals in order of
importance: Child safety; child permanency, including reunification;
and child well-being.
(6) A federally recognized tribe located in this state may enter
into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child
welfare services to Indian children whether or not they reside on a
reservation. Nothing in this section prohibits a federally recognized
Indian tribe located in this state from providing child welfare
services to its members or other Indian children pursuant to existing
tribal law, regulation, or custom, or from directly entering into
agreements for the provision of such services with the department, if
the department continues to otherwise provide such services, or with
federal agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies prospectively and
retroactively to cover all actions undertaken by the department of
social and health services to implement chapter 520, Laws of 2009, and
chapter 291, Laws of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---