BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 WHEREAS, The separation of powers, both
between the branches of the federal government and between federal and
state authority, is essential to the preservation of individual
liberty;
WHEREAS, The United States Constitution creates a federal
government of limited and enumerated powers, and reserves to the states
or to the people those powers not granted to the federal government;
WHEREAS, The federal government has enacted many laws that have
preempted state laws with respect to health care, and placed increasing
strain on state budgets, impairing other responsibilities such as
education, infrastructure, and public safety;
WHEREAS, The member states seek to protect individual liberty and
personal control over health care decisions, and believe the best
method to achieve these ends is by vesting regulatory authority over
health care in the states;
WHEREAS, By acting in concert, the member states may express and
inspire confidence in the ability of each member state to govern health
care effectively; and
WHEREAS, The member states recognize that consent of the United
States congress may be more easily secured if the member states
collectively seek consent through an interstate compact;
NOW, THEREFORE, The member states hereto resolve, and by the
adoption into law under their respective state Constitutions of this
health care compact, agree, as set out in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this compact, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Commission" means the interstate advisory health care
commission.
(2) "Effective date" means the date upon which this compact shall
become effective for purposes of the operation of state and federal law
in a member state, which shall be the later of:
(a) The date upon which this compact shall be adopted under the
laws of the member state; and
(b) The date upon which this compact receives the consent of
congress pursuant to Article I, section 10 of the United States
Constitution, after at least two member states adopt this compact.
(3) "Health care" means care, services, supplies, or plans related
to the health of an individual and includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative,
maintenance, or palliative care and counseling, service, assessment, or
procedure with respect to the physical or mental condition or
functional status of an individual or that affects the structure or
function of the body;
(b) Sale or dispensing of a drug, device, equipment, or other item
in accordance with a prescription; and
(c) An individual or group plan that provides, or pays the cost of,
care, services, or supplies related to the health of an individual,
except any care, services, supplies, or plans provided by the United
States department of defense and United States department of veterans
affairs, or provided to Native Americans.
(4) "Member state" means a state that is signatory to this compact
and has adopted it under the laws of that state.
(5) "Member state base funding level" means a number equal to the
total federal spending on health care in the member state during
federal fiscal year 2010. On or before the effective date, each member
state shall determine the member state base funding level for its
state, and that number shall be binding upon that member state. The
preliminary estimate of member state base funding level for the state
of Washington is fifteen billion four hundred ninety-seven million
dollars.
(6) "Member state current year funding level" means the member
state base funding level multiplied by the member state current year
population adjustment factor multiplied by the current year inflation
adjustment factor.
(7) "Member state current year population adjustment factor" means
the average population of the member state in the current year less the
average population of the member state in federal fiscal year 2010,
divided by the average population of the member state in federal fiscal
year 2010, plus one. Average population in a member state shall be
determined by the United States census bureau.
(8) "Current year inflation adjustment factor" means the total
gross domestic product deflator in the current year divided by the
total gross domestic product deflator in federal fiscal year 2010.
Total gross domestic product deflator shall be determined by the bureau
of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The member states shall take joint and
separate action to secure the consent of the United States congress to
this compact in order to return the authority to regulate health care
to the member states consistent with the goals and principles
articulated in this compact. The member states shall improve health
care policy within their respective jurisdictions and according to the
judgment and discretion of each member state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislatures of the member states have
the primary responsibility to regulate health care in their respective
states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Each member state, within its state, may
suspend by legislation the operation of all federal laws, rules,
regulations, and orders regarding health care that are inconsistent
with the laws and regulations adopted by the member state pursuant to
this compact. Federal and state laws, rules, regulations, and orders
regarding health care will remain in effect unless a member state
expressly suspends them pursuant to its authority under this compact.
For any federal law, rule, regulation, or order that remains in effect
in a member state after the effective date, that member state shall be
responsible for the associated funding obligations in its state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Each federal fiscal year, each member
state shall have the right to federal moneys up to an amount equal to
its member state current year funding level for that federal fiscal
year, funded by the United States congress as mandatory spending and
not subject to annual appropriation, to support the exercise of member
state authority under this compact. This funding shall not be
conditional on any action of or regulation, policy, law, or rule being
adopted by the member state.
(2) By the start of each federal fiscal year, the United States
congress shall establish an initial member state current year funding
level for each member state, based upon reasonable estimates. The
final member state current year funding level shall be calculated, and
funding shall be reconciled by the United States congress based upon
information provided by each member state and audited by the United
States government accountability office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The interstate advisory health care
commission is established. The commission consists of members
appointed by each member state through a process to be determined by
each member state. A member state may not appoint more than two
members to the commission and may withdraw membership from the
commission at any time. Each commission member is entitled to one
vote. The commission shall not act unless a majority of the members
are present, and no action shall be binding unless approved by a
majority of the commission's total membership.
(2) The commission may elect from among its membership a
chairperson. The commission may adopt and publish bylaws and policies
that are not inconsistent with this compact. The commission shall meet
at least once a year, and may meet more frequently.
(3) The commission may study issues of health care regulation that
are of particular concern to the member states. The commission may
make nonbinding recommendations to the member states. The legislatures
of the member states may consider these recommendations in determining
the appropriate health care policies in their respective states.
(4) The commission shall collect information and data to assist the
member states in their regulation of health care, including assessing
the performance of various state health care programs and compiling
information on the prices of health care. The commission shall make
this information and data available to the legislatures of the member
states. Notwithstanding any other provision in this compact, no member
state shall disclose to the commission the health information of any
individual, nor shall the commission disclose the health information of
any individual.
(5) The commission shall be funded by the member states as agreed
to by the member states. The commission shall have the
responsibilities and duties as may be conferred upon it by subsequent
action of the respective legislatures of the member states in
accordance with the terms of this compact.
(6) The commission shall not take any action within a member state
that contravenes any state law of that member state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This compact shall be effective on its
adoption by at least two member states and consent of the United States
congress. This compact shall be effective unless the United States
congress, in consenting to this compact, alters the fundamental
purposes of this compact, which are:
(1) To secure the right of the member states to regulate health
care in their respective states pursuant to this compact and to suspend
the operation of any conflicting federal laws, rules, regulations, and
orders within their states; and
(2) To secure federal funding for member states that choose to
invoke their authority under this compact, as prescribed by section 6
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The member states, by unanimous agreement,
may amend this compact from time to time without the prior consent or
approval of the United States congress and any amendment shall be
effective unless, within one year, the United States congress
disapproves that amendment. Any state may join this compact after the
date on which congress consents to the compact by adoption into law
under its state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Any member state may withdraw from this
compact by adopting a law to that effect, but no such withdrawal shall
take effect until six months after the governor of the withdrawing
member state has given notice of the withdrawal to the other member
states. A withdrawing state shall be liable for any obligations that
it may have incurred prior to the date on which its withdrawal becomes
effective. This compact shall be dissolved upon the withdrawal of all
but one of the member states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A Washington state member of the interstate
advisory health care commission shall give the code reviser notice of:
(1) The effective date of the health care compact under chapter
74.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act); and
(2) The withdrawal of Washington state from the health care compact
or any event that causes dissolution of the compact.

--- END ---