BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 1983 retail sales tax was extended to
telephone services. However, an exemption was provided for certain
residential telephone service. That exemption, codified in RCW
82.08.0289, applies to individuals "subscribing to a residential class
of telephone service."
(2) The legislature finds that the department of revenue has
consistently interpreted the phrase "a residential class of telephone
service" as it would have been understood when the residential
telephone service exemption was enacted in 1983. The legislature
further finds that in 1983, all telephone service was divided into
"residential" and "business" classifications, as defined by regulatory
tariffs filed with the utilities and transportation commission. As a
result, the department of revenue has consistently restricted the
residential telephone service exemption to local telephone service
provided under a regulatory tariff. This includes traditional landline
telephone service but excludes cellular telephone service and voice
over internet protocol telephone service, which are not subject to
regulatory tariffs.
(3) The legislature further finds that the department of revenue's
interpretation of the residential telephone service exemption has been
upheld by the board of tax appeals but was recently rejected by the
Thurston county superior court. In Sprint Spectrum LP v. State of
Washington Department of Revenue, Cause No. 10-2-02276-4, the Thurston
county superior court ruled that the taxpayer's sales of cellular
telephone services to nonbusiness customers qualify for the residential
telephone service exemption in RCW 82.08.0289. The legislature
recognizes that this decision, if upheld on appeal, would very likely
require the department of revenue to grant the residential telephone
service exemption to all other telecommunications services a carrier
treats as residential, such as voice over internet protocol telephone
service. The legislature also finds that if the superior court's
decision is sustained on appeal, the unexpected state and local revenue
impacts would be extremely large.
(4) The legislature intends by this act to prevent the adverse
fiscal impacts that would result if the Thurston county superior
court's Sprint Spectrum LP decision were to be upheld on appeal.
Therefore, this act clarifies that the residential telephone service
exemption in RCW 82.08.0289 has always applied only to residential
telephone service offered under a tariff filed with the utilities and
transportation commission, consistent with the department of revenue's
long-standing interpretation of the exemption. As a clarification of
the law, this act is intended to apply both prospectively and
retroactively.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0289 and 2007 c 6 s 1006 and 2007 c 6 s 1005 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of:
(a) Local service;
(b) Coin-operated telephone service; and
(c) Mobile telecommunications services, including any toll service,
provided to a customer whose place of primary use is outside this
state.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065, as well as the definitions in
this subsection, apply to this section.
(a) "Local service" means ancillary services and telecommunications
service, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than toll
service, provided to an individual subscribing to a residential class
of telephone service offered under a tariff required to be filed with
the Washington utilities and transportation commission under Title 80
RCW.
(b) "Toll service" does not include customer access line charges
for access to a toll calling network.
(c) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications
service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct
deposits of money to operate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies prospectively as well as
retroactively to tax periods open for assessment or refund of taxes
under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.060, including any refund claims or
disputed assessments pending before the department of revenue, board of
tax appeals, or any court of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---