BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.510.250 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before the last business day of September 1969 and each
month thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall
apportion from the state general fund to the several educational
service districts of the state the proportional share of the total
annual amount due and apportionable to such educational service
districts for the school districts thereof as follows:

September . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

October . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

November . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

December . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

January . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

February . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

March . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

April . . . . . . . . . . . . 9%

May . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.5%

June . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.0%

July . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

August . . . . . . . . . . . . 10.0%

The annual amount due and apportionable shall be the amount
apportionable for all apportionment credits estimated to accrue to the
schools during the apportionment year beginning September ((first
[1st])) 1st and continuing through August ((thirty-first [31st])) 31st.
Appropriations made for school districts for each year of a biennium
shall be apportioned according to the schedule set forth in this
section for the fiscal year starting September 1st of the then calendar
year and ending August 31st of the next calendar year, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The apportionment from the
state general fund for each month shall be an amount which will equal
the amount due and apportionable to the several educational service
districts during such month: PROVIDED, That any school district may
petition the superintendent of public instruction for an emergency
advance of funds which may become apportionable to it but not to exceed
ten percent of the total amount to become due and apportionable during
the school districts apportionment year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall determine if the emergency warrants such advance and
if the funds are available therefor. If the superintendent determines
in the affirmative, he or she may approve such advance and, at the same
time, add such an amount to the apportionment for the educational
service district in which the school district is located: PROVIDED,
That the emergency advance of funds and the interest earned by school
districts on the investment of temporary cash surpluses resulting from
obtaining such advance of state funds shall be deducted by the
superintendent of public instruction from the remaining amount
apportionable to said districts during that apportionment year in which
the funds are advanced.
(2) In the ((2010-11)) 2012-13 school year, the June apportionment
payment to school districts shall be reduced by ((one hundred twenty-
eight)) three hundred forty million dollars, and an additional
apportionment payment shall be made on July 1, ((2011)) 2013, in the
amount of ((one hundred twenty-eight)) three hundred forty million
dollars. This July 1st payment shall be in addition to the regularly
calculated July apportionment payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for a financial
contingency fund is not provided by June 30, 2012, in the section
providing for the superintendent of public instruction--for general
apportionment in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect September
1, 2012.

--- END ---