BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 31 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital)) With respect to services
provided to recipients eligible for medical assistance programs under
this chapter, the authority shall specify in rule the methodology by
which it will pay rural hospitals certified by the centers for medicare
and medicaid services as ((a)) critical access hospitals. ((Any
additional payments made by the authority for the healthy options
program shall be no more than the additional amounts per service paid
under this section for other medical assistance programs.))
(2) Beginning on July 24, 2005, a moratorium shall be placed on
additional hospital participation in critical access hospital payments
under this section. However, rural hospitals that applied for
certification to the centers for medicare and medicaid services prior
to January 1, 2005, but have not yet completed the process or have not
yet been approved for certification, remain eligible for medical
assistance payments under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.60.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certified public expenditure hospital" means a hospital
participating in the department's certified public expenditure payment
program as described in WAC 388-550-4650 or successor rule.
(2) "Critical access hospital" means a hospital as described in RCW
74.09.5225.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Fund" means the hospital safety net assessment fund
established under RCW 74.60.020.
(5) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(6) "Long-term acute care hospital" means a hospital which has an
average inpatient length of stay of greater than twenty-five days as
determined by the department of health.
(7) "Managed care organization" means an organization having a
certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office
of the insurance commissioner that contracts with the department under
a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services
to eligible clients under the department's medicaid managed care
programs, including the healthy options program.
(8) "Medicaid" means the medical assistance program as established
in Title XIX of the social security act and as administered in the
state of Washington by the department of social and health services.
(9) "Medicare cost report" means the medicare cost report, form
2552-96, or successor document.
(10) "Nonmedicare hospital inpatient day" means total hospital
inpatient days less medicare inpatient days, including medicare days
reported for medicare managed care plans, as reported on the medicare
cost report, form 2552-96, or successor forms, excluding all skilled
and nonskilled nursing facility days, skilled and nonskilled swing bed
days, nursery days, observation bed days, hospice days, home health
agency days, and other days not typically associated with an acute care
inpatient hospital stay.
(11) "Prospective payment system hospital" means a hospital
reimbursed for inpatient and outpatient services provided to medicaid
beneficiaries under the inpatient prospective payment system and the
outpatient prospective payment system as defined in WAC 388-550-1050.
For purposes of this chapter, prospective payment system hospital does
not include a hospital participating in the certified public
expenditure program, a critical access hospital, or a bordering city
hospital located outside of the state of Washington and in one of the
bordering cities listed in WAC 388-501-0175 or successor regulation.
(12) "Psychiatric hospital" means a hospital facility licensed as
a psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.
(13) "Regional support network" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 71.24.025.
(14) "Rehabilitation hospital" means a medicare-certified
freestanding inpatient rehabilitation facility.
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(16) "Small rural disproportionate share hospital payment" means a
payment made in accordance with WAC 388-550-5200 or subsequently filed
regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---