BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.112 and 2009 c 409 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person subject to court order under the provisions of this
chapter who is thereafter convicted of a criminal offense remains under
the jurisdiction of the department and shall be returned to the custody
of the department following: (((1))) (a) Completion of the criminal
sentence; or (((2))) (b) release from confinement in a state, federal,
or local correctional facility. Any conditional release order shall be
immediately revoked upon conviction for a criminal offense.
(2) During any period of confinement pursuant to a criminal
conviction, or for any period of detention awaiting trial on criminal
charges, the provision of RCW 71.09.070 requiring the department to
conduct an annual examination of the person's mental condition is
suspended.
(3) This section does not apply to persons subject to a court order
under the provisions of this chapter who are thereafter sentenced to
life without the possibility of release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
February 1, 2012.

--- END ---