BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall be
responsible for all costs relating to the evaluation and treatment of
persons committed to their custody whether in a secure facility or
under a less restrictive alternative under any provision of this
chapter. The secretary shall adopt rules to contain costs relating to
reimbursement for evaluation services.
(2) In all stages of the proceedings under this chapter, the
department of social and health services shall be responsible only for
the reimbursement of the cost of a single attorney for the respondent,
a single prosecuting attorney, a single paralegal for the respondent,
a single paralegal for the prosecution, a single investigator for the
respondent, a single investigator for the prosecution, reimbursement
for transportation of the respondent to and from court proceedings, and
for the cost of a single expert evaluation for the prosecution and a
single expert evaluation for the respondent.
(3) In proceedings under RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060, the
department of social and health services shall not be responsible for
costs of the prosecution and of the defense that result from the delay
of the case after the first continuance requested by either party
granted by the court.
(4) The county in which a petition as provided for under RCW
71.09.030 has been filed is responsible for all other costs of
prosecution and defense.
(5) Reimbursement may be obtained by the department for the cost of
care and treatment of persons committed to its custody whether in a
secure facility or under a less restrictive alternative pursuant to RCW
43.20B.330 through 43.20B.370.
(6) The secretary of social and health services shall adopt rules
to contain costs relating to reimbursement for the costs of prosecution
and defense under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.040 and 2009 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition under RCW 71.09.030, the judge
shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the
person named in the petition is a sexually violent predator. If such
determination is made the judge shall direct that the person be taken
into custody.
(2) Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken into custody
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall provide the
person with notice of, and an opportunity to appear in person at, a
hearing to contest probable cause as to whether the person is a
sexually violent predator. In order to assist the person at the
hearing, within twenty-four hours of service of the petition, the
prosecuting agency shall provide to the person or his or her counsel a
copy of all materials provided to the prosecuting agency by the
referring agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025, or obtained by the
prosecuting agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025(1) (c) and (d). At this
hearing, the court shall (a) verify the person's identity, and (b)
determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the person is
a sexually violent predator. At the probable cause hearing, the state
may rely upon the petition and certification for determination of
probable cause filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030. The state may
supplement this with additional documentary evidence or live testimony.
The person may be held in total confinement at the county jail until
the trial court renders a decision after the conclusion of the seventy-two hour probable cause hearing. The county shall be entitled to
reimbursement for the cost of ((housing and)) transporting the person
pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.
(3) At the probable cause hearing, the person shall have the
following rights in addition to the rights previously specified: (a)
To be represented by counsel; (b) to present evidence on his or her
behalf; (c) to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(d) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file. The
court must permit a witness called by either party to testify by
telephone. Because this is a special proceeding, discovery pursuant to
the civil rules shall not occur until after the hearing has been held
and the court has issued its decision.
(4) If the probable cause determination is made, the judge shall
direct that the person be transferred to an appropriate facility for an
evaluation as to whether the person is a sexually violent predator.
The evaluation shall be conducted by a person deemed to be
professionally qualified to conduct such an examination pursuant to
rules developed by the department of social and health services. In
adopting such rules, the department of social and health services shall
consult with the department of health and the department of
corrections. In no event shall the person be released from confinement
prior to trial. A witness called by either party shall be permitted to
testify by telephone.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.060 and 2009 c 409 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court or jury shall determine whether, beyond a reasonable
doubt, the person is a sexually violent predator. In determining
whether or not the person would be likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility, the fact
finder may consider only placement conditions and voluntary treatment
options that would exist for the person if unconditionally released
from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. The
community protection program under RCW 71A.12.230 may not be considered
as a placement condition or treatment option available to the person if
unconditionally released from detention on a sexually violent predator
petition. When the determination is made by a jury, the verdict must
be unanimous.
If, on the date that the petition is filed, the person was living
in the community after release from custody, the state must also prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the person had committed a recent overt
act. If the state alleges that the prior sexually violent offense that
forms the basis for the petition for commitment was an act that was
sexually motivated as provided in RCW 71.09.020(((15))) (17)(c), the
state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the alleged sexually
violent act was sexually motivated as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
If the court or jury determines that the person is a sexually
violent predator, the person shall be committed to the custody of the
department of social and health services for placement in a secure
facility operated by the department of social and health services for
control, care, and treatment until such time as: (a) The person's
condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition
of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative as set forth in RCW 71.09.092 is in the best
interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would
adequately protect the community.
If the court or unanimous jury decides that the state has not met
its burden of proving that the person is a sexually violent predator,
the court shall direct the person's release.
If the jury is unable to reach a unanimous verdict, the court shall
declare a mistrial and set a retrial within forty-five days of the date
of the mistrial unless the prosecuting agency earlier moves to dismiss
the petition. The retrial may be continued upon the request of either
party accompanied by a showing of good cause, or by the court on its
own motion in the due administration of justice provided that the
respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. In no event may the
person be released from confinement prior to retrial or dismissal of
the case.
(2) If the person charged with a sexually violent offense has been
found incompetent to stand trial, and is about to be or has been
released pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and his or her commitment is
sought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall
first hear evidence and determine whether the person did commit the act
or acts charged if the court did not enter a finding prior to dismissal
under RCW 10.77.086(4) that the person committed the act or acts
charged. The hearing on this issue must comply with all the procedures
specified in this section. In addition, the rules of evidence
applicable in criminal cases shall apply, and all constitutional rights
available to defendants at criminal trials, other than the right not to
be tried while incompetent, shall apply. After hearing evidence on
this issue, the court shall make specific findings on whether the
person did commit the act or acts charged, the extent to which the
person's incompetence or developmental disability affected the outcome
of the hearing, including its effect on the person's ability to consult
with and assist counsel and to testify on his or her own behalf, the
extent to which the evidence could be reconstructed without the
assistance of the person, and the strength of the prosecution's case.
If, after the conclusion of the hearing on this issue, the court finds,
beyond a reasonable doubt, that the person did commit the act or acts
charged, it shall enter a final order, appealable by the person, on
that issue, and may proceed to consider whether the person should be
committed pursuant to this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the state shall
comply with RCW 10.77.220 while confining the person. During all court
proceedings where the person is present, the person shall be detained
in a secure facility. If the proceedings last more than one day, the
person may be held in the county jail for the duration of the
proceedings, except the person may be returned to the department's
custody on weekends and court holidays if the court deems such a
transfer feasible. The county shall be entitled to reimbursement for
the cost of ((housing and)) transporting the person pursuant to rules
adopted by the secretary. The department shall not place the person,
even temporarily, in a facility on the grounds of any state mental
facility or regional habilitation center because these institutions are
insufficiently secure for this population.
(4) A court has jurisdiction to order a less restrictive
alternative placement only after a hearing ordered pursuant to RCW
71.09.090 following initial commitment under this section and in accord
with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.090 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed
that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually
violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. The department
of social and health services is responsible only for reimbursement for
the cost of a single defense attorney at the show cause hearing. At
the show cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general
shall present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed
person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator
and that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of
the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. The department of social and health services is responsible
only for reimbursement for the cost of a single prosecuting attorney at
the show cause hearing. In making this showing, the state may rely
exclusively upon the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070.
The committed person may present responsive affidavits or declarations
to which the state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find
probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives
unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to
have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state.
The department is responsible for the cost of one expert or
professional person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting
agency's behalf. The committed person shall also have the right to a
jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or
her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is
indigent and requests an appointment. The department is responsible
for the cost of one expert or professional person to conduct an
evaluation on the committed person's behalf.
(b) Whenever any person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of
this subsection, the department is responsible for the cost of one
expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's
behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert
or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or
professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the
person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant
medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person
who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the
person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an
evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf.
Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional
expert services at his or her own expense.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall
otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition
has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when
evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less
restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change
in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person
either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or
that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately
protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is
current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following
and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last
commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this
section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to,
a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
February 1, 2012.

--- END ---