BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.200 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 949 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve
officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January
1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies
with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080.
For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training
shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of
employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the
commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such
employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990,
shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment
unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended
by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is
requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially
employed on or after January 1, 1990.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission
shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary
facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting
attendees for seven days per week, except during the ((2011-2013))
state fiscal ((biennium)) year 2012 when the ((employing,)) county,
city(([,])), or state ((law enforcement)) agency that employs the law
enforcement personnel shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five
percent of the cost of training its personnel. Effective July 1, 2012,
the county or city agency that employs the law enforcement personnel
shall reimburse the commission for fifty percent of the total cost of
training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided
for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law
enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol
officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is
enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such
reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary
replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits
received by the replaced officer during his or her training period.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.220 and 2009 c 146 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and
municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982,
shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with
standards adopted by the commission. The training shall be
successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the
personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and
shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.
(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for noncommuting attendees. Effective July 1, 2012, the
county or municipal agency that employs the correctional personnel
shall reimburse the commission fifty percent of the total cost of
training.
(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the
Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The
Washington state department of corrections is responsible for
identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and
providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it.
In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall
consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals
both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from
labor organizations.
(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the
responsibility of developing and defining training standards and
providing training for community corrections officers employed within
the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.101.224 and 1999 c 389 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On-going specialized training shall be provided for persons
responsible for investigating child sexual abuse. Training
participants shall have the opportunity to practice interview skills
and receive feedback from instructors.
(2) The commission, the department of social and health services,
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys shall design and
implement statewide training that contains consistent elements for
persons engaged in the interviewing of children for child sexual abuse
cases, including law enforcement, prosecution, and child protective
services.
(3) The training shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices
and standards; (b) minimize the trauma of all persons who are
interviewed during abuse investigations; (c) provide methods of
reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary whenever
possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative
interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs
of special populations, such as persons with developmental
disabilities; (f) recognize the nature and consequences of
victimization; (g) require investigative interviews to be conducted in
a manner most likely to permit the interviewed persons the maximum
emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h) address record retention
and retrieval; and (i) ((documentation of)) document investigative
interviews.
(4) Effective July 1, 2012, the employing county or city agency
shall reimburse the commission for fifty percent of the total cost of
training its personnel under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.101.225 and 2003 c 37 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement officer
employed, after July 27, 2003, by a state, county, or municipal law
enforcement agency shall be trained on vehicular pursuits.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement
officer employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement
agency shall be trained on vehicular pursuits, within six months of
employment.
(3) Nothing in chapter 37, Laws of 2003 requires training on
vehicular pursuit of any law enforcement officer who is employed in a
state, county, or city law enforcement agency on July 27, 2003, beyond
that which he or she has received prior to July 27, 2003.
(4) Effective July 1, 2012, the county or city agency that employs
the law enforcement personnel shall reimburse the commission for fifty
percent of the total cost of training its personnel under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.101.227 and 2003 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission must offer a training session on ((law
enforcement)) the interaction of law enforcement personnel with persons
with a developmental disability or mental illness. The training must
be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate self
advocate and family advocate groups and with appropriate community,
local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the
area of working with persons with a developmental disability or mental
illness. In developing the course, the commission must also examine
existing courses certified by the commission that relate to persons
with a developmental disability or mental illness.
(2) The training must consist of classroom instruction or internet
instruction and shall replicate likely field situations to the maximum
extent possible. The training should include, at a minimum, core
instruction in all of the following:
(a) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and developmental
disabilities;
(b) How to identify indicators of mental illness and developmental
disability and how to respond appropriately in a variety of common
situations;
(c) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for
potentially dangerous situations involving persons with a developmental
disability or mental illness;
(d) Appropriate language usage when interacting with persons with
a developmental disability or mental illness;
(e) Alternatives to lethal force when interacting with potentially
dangerous persons with a developmental disability or mental illness;
and
(f) Community and state resources available to serve persons with
a developmental disability or mental illness and how these resources
can be best used by law enforcement to benefit persons with a
developmental disability or mental illness in their communities.
(3) The training shall be made available to law enforcement
agencies, through electronic means, for use at their convenience and
determined by the internal training needs and resources of each agency.
(4) The commission shall make all reasonable efforts to secure
private and nonstate public funds to implement this section.
(5) Effective July 1, 2012, the county or city agency that employs
the law enforcement personnel shall reimburse the commission for fifty
percent of the total cost of training its personnel under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.101.290 and 1993 c 127 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The criminal justice training commission shall provide training for
law enforcement ((officers)) personnel in identifying, responding to,
and reporting all violations of RCW 9A.36.080 and any other crimes of
bigotry or bias. Effective July 1, 2012, the county or city agency
that employs the law enforcement personnel shall reimburse the
commission for fifty percent of the total cost of training its
personnel under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.101.350 and 2007 c 382 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All law enforcement personnel initially hired to, transferred
to, or promoted to a supervisory or management position on or after
January 1, 1999, and all corrections personnel of the state and all
counties and municipal corporations transferred or promoted to a
supervisory or management position on or after January 1, 1982, shall,
within the first six months of entry into the position, successfully
complete the core training requirements prescribed by rule of the
commission for the position, or obtain a waiver or extension of the
core training requirements from the commission.
(2) Within one year after completion of the core training
requirements of this section, all law enforcement personnel and
corrections personnel shall successfully complete all remaining
requirements for career level certification prescribed by rule of the
commission applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or
extension of the career level training requirements from the
commission.
(3) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for attendees who do not live within fifty miles of the
training center. The training shall be delivered in the least
disruptive manner to local law enforcement or corrections agencies, and
will include but not be limited to regional on-site training,
interactive training, and credit for training given by the home
department. Effective July 1, 2012, the employing county or city
agency that employs the law enforcement personnel shall reimburse the
commission for fifty percent of the total cost of training its
personnel.
(4) Nothing in this section affects or impairs the employment
status of an employee whose employer does not provide the opportunity
to engage in the required training.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.101.370 and 1997 c 351 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each year the criminal justice training commission shall offer an
intensive training session on investigation of child abuse and neglect.
The training shall focus on the investigative duties of law enforcement
established under chapter 26.44 RCW with particular emphasis placed on
child interview techniques to increase the accuracy of statements taken
from children and decrease the need for additional interviews.
Effective July 1, 2012, the county or city agency shall reimburse
the commission for fifty percent of the total cost of training its
personnel under this section.

--- END ---