BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall charge a one hundred fifty dollar
application fee for all applications for hydraulic project permits
under this chapter to recover the costs for processing permit
applications.
(2) Hydraulic project permits issued as emergency approvals under
RCW 77.55.021(8) are exempt from the application fee.
(3) Hydraulic projects approved under applicant-funded contracts
with the department that pay for the costs of processing those projects
are exempt from the application fee.
(4) All fees collected under this section must be deposited in the
hydraulic project approval account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The hydraulic project approval account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from application fees collected under section
1 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the hydraulic project approval account may be
spent only after appropriation.
(3) Expenditures from the hydraulic project approval account may be
used only to fund department activities relating to processing
hydraulic project permit applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The fees contained in section 1 of this act are prospective only.
The department may not charge fees for hydraulic project permits issued
under this title prior to the effective date of this section. However,
if a person requests modification of a hydraulic project permit that
was issued by the department prior to the effective date of this
section, the department shall charge all applicable fees as provided in
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.021 and 2010 c 210 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, and 77.55.041,
in the event that any person or government agency desires to undertake
a hydraulic project, the person or government agency shall, before
commencing work thereon, secure the approval of the department in the
form of a permit as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the
protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; ((and))
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter; and
(e) Payment of application fee as specified in section 1 of this
act.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(12) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, issuance, denial,
conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be appealable to the
board within thirty days from the date of receipt of the decision as
provided in RCW 43.21B.230.
(b) Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit may
be informally appealed to the department within thirty days from the
date of receipt of the decision. Requests for informal appeals must be
filed in the form and manner prescribed by the department by rule. A
permit decision that has been informally appealed to the department is
appealable to the board within thirty days from the date of receipt of
the department's decision on the informal appeal.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The department may not
charge an application fee for department-initiated modifications. The
modification is appealable as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
department to show that changed conditions warrant the modification in
order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be accompanied by payment of the one
hundred fifty dollar application fee authorized in section 1 of this
act. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar days of
receipt of the ((written)) request and application fee. A decision by
the department is appealable as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(8)(a) The department, the county legislative authority, or the
governor may declare and continue an emergency. If the county
legislative authority declares an emergency under this subsection, it
shall immediately notify the department. A declared state of emergency
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010 shall constitute a declaration
under this subsection.
(b) The department, through its authorized representatives, shall
issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for a stream crossing,
or work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
streambanks, protect fish life, or protect property threatened by the
stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of
obtaining a written permit prior to commencing work. Conditions of the
emergency oral permit must be established by the department and reduced
to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided for in this
chapter.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11)(a) For any property, except for property located on a marine
shoreline, that has experienced at least two consecutive years of
flooding or erosion that has damaged or has threatened to damage a
major structure, water supply system, septic system, or access to any
road or highway, the county legislative authority may determine that a
chronic danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify
the department, in writing, when it determines that a chronic danger
exists. In cases of chronic danger, the department shall issue a
permit, upon request, for work necessary to abate the chronic danger by
removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring
banks, restoring road or highway access, protecting fish resources, or
protecting property. Permit requests must be made and processed in
accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(b) Any projects proposed to address a chronic danger identified
under (a) of this subsection that satisfies the project description
identified in RCW 77.55.181(1)(a)(ii) are not subject to the provisions
of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. However,
the project is subject to the review process established in RCW
77.55.181(3) as if it were a fish habitat improvement project.
(12) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
January 1, 2012.

--- END ---