BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
campaign financing fairness act.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.710 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official, elected federal official who
is a candidate for state office, or a person employed by or acting on
behalf of a state official or such federal official or state legislator
may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a
candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before
a regular legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is
postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.560 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official, elected federal official who
is a candidate for state office, or a person employed by or acting on
behalf of a state official or such federal official or state legislator
may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a
candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before
a regular legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is
postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---