BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends by this act to
protect the right of each citizen to lawfully transport and store
firearms within his or her private vehicle for lawful purposes in any
place the vehicle is otherwise permitted to be and whenever this would
not contravene existing federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A business, commercial enterprise, or employer may not
establish, maintain, or enforce a policy or rule that prohibits or has
the effect of prohibiting a person from transporting or storing any
firearm or ammunition in a privately owned motor vehicle when the
person is in compliance with all other applicable laws and the firearm
or ammunition is locked out of sight within the trunk, glove box, or
other enclosed compartment or area within or on the privately owned
motor vehicle.
(2)(a) A person who would be entitled legally to transport or store
a firearm or ammunition, but is denied the ability to transport or
store a firearm or ammunition by a policy that violates subsection (1)
of this section, may bring a civil action in the appropriate court to
enjoin any business, commercial enterprise, or employer from violating
subsection (1) of this section. In any action brought pursuant to this
section, court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees shall be awarded to
the prevailing plaintiff.
(b) A person who is injured or incurs damages, or the survivors of
a person killed, as a result of a violation of subsection (1) of this
section, may bring a civil action for damages in the appropriate court
against any business entity, commercial enterprise, or employer who
committed or caused such violation.
(3) No employer may discharge or discipline an employee for
violating a policy or rule established, maintained, or enforced in
violation of subsection (1) of this section. If an employer discharges
an employee in violation of this subsection, the employee shall have a
cause of action against the employer. The employer shall be liable for
the amount of damages suffered as a result of the violation and for
costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The employer may also be ordered
to reinstate the aggrieved employee.
(4) No business, commercial enterprise, or employer shall be held
liable in any civil action for damages based on property damage,
physical injuries, or death resulting from or arising out of another
person's actions involving a firearm or ammunition transported or
stored in a privately owned vehicle pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section including, but not limited to, the theft of a firearm from an
employee's automobile. Nothing contained in this section shall create
a new duty on the part of any business, commercial enterprise, or
employer beyond the duty specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) In any action relating to the enforcement of any right or
obligation under this section, the reasonable, good-faith efforts of a
business, commercial enterprise, or employer to comply with other
applicable and irreconcilable federal or state safety laws or
regulations shall be a complete defense to the liability of any
business, commercial enterprise, or employer.
(6) As used in this section, "motor vehicle" means any automobile,
truck, van, minivan, sports utility vehicle, motorcycle, motor scooter,
or any other vehicle required to be registered under state law.

--- END ---