BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.360 and 2005 c 504 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may establish new regional support network
boundaries in any part of the state:
(a) Where more than one network chooses not to respond to, or is
unable to substantially meet the requirements of, the request for
qualifications under ((section 4, chapter 503, Laws of 2005 or)) RCW
71.24.320;
(b) Where a regional support network is subject to reprocurement
under ((section 6, chapter 503, Laws of 2005)) RCW 71.24.330; or
(c) Where two or more regional support networks propose to
reconfigure themselves to achieve consolidation, in which case the
procurement process described in RCW 71.24.320 and 71.24.330(2) does
not apply.
(2) The department may establish no fewer than ((eight)) six and no
more than fourteen regional support networks under this chapter. No
entity shall be responsible for more than three regional support
networks.

--- END ---