BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.225.020 and 2007 c 259 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When sufficient funding is provided for such purpose through
federal or private grants, or is appropriated by the legislature, the
department shall establish and maintain a prescription monitoring
program to monitor the prescribing and dispensing of all Schedules II,
III, IV, and V controlled substances and any additional drugs
identified by the board of pharmacy as demonstrating a potential for
abuse by all professionals licensed to prescribe or dispense such
substances in this state. The program shall be designed to improve
health care quality and effectiveness by reducing abuse of controlled
substances, reducing duplicative prescribing and overprescribing of
controlled substances, and improving controlled substance prescribing
practices with the intent of eventually establishing an electronic
database available in real time to dispensers and prescribers of
((control [controlled])) controlled substances. As much as possible,
the department should establish a common database with other states.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each
dispenser shall submit to the department by electronic means
information regarding each prescription dispensed for a drug included
under subsection (1) of this section. Drug prescriptions for more than
immediate one day use should be reported. The information submitted
for each prescription shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Patient identifier;
(b) Drug dispensed;
(c) Date of dispensing;
(d) Quantity dispensed;
(e) Prescriber; and
(f) Dispenser.
(3) Each dispenser shall submit the information in accordance with
transmission methods established by the department.
(4) The data submission requirements of this section do not apply
to:
(a) Medications provided to patients receiving inpatient services
provided at hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; or patients of
such hospitals receiving services at the clinics, day surgery areas, or
other settings within the hospital's license where the medications are
administered in single doses; or
(b) Pharmacies operated by the department of corrections for the
purpose of providing medications to offenders in department of
corrections institutions who are receiving pharmaceutical services from
a department of corrections pharmacy, except that the department of
corrections must submit data related to each offender's current
prescriptions for controlled substances upon the offender's release
from a department of corrections institution.
(5) The department shall seek federal or private grants to support
the activities described in chapter 259, Laws of 2007. ((The
department may not require a practitioner or a pharmacist to pay a fee
or tax specifically dedicated to the operation of the system.)) If
federal or private grants or other funds appropriated by the
legislature are not sufficient to maintain the program, the department
may charge a fee as set forth in RCW 43.70.110(3)(d) for the operation
of the program.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.110 and 2011 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. Physicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who
reside and practice in Washington and obtain or renew a retired active
license are exempt from such fees. After June 30, 1995, municipal
corporations providing emergency medical care and transportation
services pursuant to chapter 18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees,
provided that such other emergency services shall only be charged for
their pro rata share of the cost of licensure and inspection, if
appropriate. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion
of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public
health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial
disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; ((and))
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW((;)), licensed
marriage and family therapists under chapter 18.225 RCW((;)), and East
Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include up to an additional twenty-five dollars to
be transferred by the department to the University of Washington for
the purposes of RCW 43.70.112; and
(d) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, optometrists
licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, dentists licensed under chapter 18.32
RCW, advanced registered nurse practitioners licensed under chapter
18.79 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, the
license fees may include up to an additional fifteen dollars to be used
by the department for the operation of the prescription monitoring
program authorized by chapter 70.225 RCW.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

--- END ---