BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2010 c 224 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW
9.94A.729;
(2) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(3)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is
expected to require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical
condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and
(iii) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical
placement will result in a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be
utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(e) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical
placement;
(4) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(5) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community or no more than the final twelve months of the offender's
term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as part of the
parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition to that
period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for partial
confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);
(6) The governor may pardon any offender;
(7) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section and section 2 of this act;
(8) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870 or section 2 of this act; and
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an
offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
any offender classified as a low or moderate risk to reoffend who is
serving a sentence of total confinement in a correctional facility
operated by the department, whether sentenced before, on, or after the
effective date of this section, shall be credited with a one hundred
fifty day reduction in his or her release date.
(2) The reduction shall apply to an offender's term of confinement
after the application of any earned early release time pursuant to RCW
9.94A.729.
(3) This section does not apply to offenders sentenced to life
without parole or offenders serving sentences imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.507.
(4) Under no circumstance shall an offender be released before the
expiration of his or her mandatory minimum sentence as provided in RCW
9.94A.540.
(5) Consistent with the provision of this section, the department
shall, no later than August 1, 2012, recalculate a new release date for
those offenders. Notwithstanding, the failure of the department to
promptly release an offender on the new release date does not create a
liberty interest and shall in no circumstance give rise to a cause of
action on the part of the offender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect May 1, 2012.

--- END ---