BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
There is established, within the office of the insurance
commissioner, the volunteer position of health care authority
ombudsman. The duties of this office are:
(1) To research and respond to subscriber calls and complaints in
a timely manner;
(2) To ensure that health care authority and public employees'
benefits board staff are responsive to subscribers' needs and problems;
and
(3) To monitor, assess, and evaluate the quality control of
services to ensure satisfactory resolution of subscriber health care
problems and concerns.

--- END ---