BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.130 and 2004 c 79 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any person or corporation ((shall)) fails or refuses to
deliver to the assessor, on or before the date specified in RCW
84.40.040, a list of the taxable personal property which is required to
be listed under this chapter, unless it is shown that such failure is
due to reasonable cause and not due to ((wilful)) willful neglect,
there ((shall)) must be added to the amount of tax assessed against the
taxpayer on account of such personal property five percent of the
amount of such tax, not to exceed fifty dollars per calendar day, if
the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional five
percent for each additional month or fraction thereof during which such
failure continues not exceeding twenty-five percent in the aggregate.
Such penalty ((shall)) must be collected in the same manner as the tax
to which it is added and distributed in the same manner as other
property tax interest and penalties.
(2) If any person or corporation ((shall wilfully)) willfully gives
a false or fraudulent list, schedule or statement required by this
chapter, or ((shall)), with intent to defraud, fails or refuses to
deliver any list, schedule or statement required by this chapter, such
person or corporation ((shall be)) is liable for the additional tax
properly due or, in the case of ((wilful)) willful failure or refusal
to deliver such list, schedule or statement, the total tax properly
due; and in addition such person or corporation ((shall be)) is liable
for a penalty of one hundred percent of such additional tax or total
tax as the case may be. Such penalty ((shall be)) is in lieu of the
penalty provided for in subsection (1) of this section. A person or
corporation giving a false list, schedule or statement ((shall)) is not
((be)) subject to this penalty if it is shown that the
misrepresentations contained therein are entirely attributable to
reasonable cause. The taxes and penalties provided for in this
subsection ((shall)) must be recovered in an action in the name of the
state of Washington on the complaint of the county assessor or the
county legislative authority and ((shall)) must, when collected, be
paid into the county treasury to the credit of the current expense
fund. The provisions of this subsection ((shall be)) are additional
and supplementary to any other provisions of law relating to recovery
of property taxes.
(3)(a) The county legislative authority may authorize the assessor
to waive penalties otherwise due under this section for assessment
years 2011 and prior for a person or corporation failing or refusing to
deliver to the assessor a list of taxable personal property, if all of
the following circumstances are met:
(i) On or before July 1, 2012, the taxpayer files with the
assessor:
(A) A correct list and statement of the taxable personal property
required to be listed under this chapter; and
(B) A completed application for penalty waiver in the form and
manner prescribed by the assessor; and
(ii) On or before September 1, 2012, the taxpayer remits full
payment to the county of the entire balance due on all tax liabilities
for which a penalty waiver under this section is requested, other than
the penalty amount eligible for waiver under this section.
(b) A taxpayer receiving penalty relief under this subsection (3)
may not seek a refund or otherwise challenge the amount of any tax
liability paid under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3). Personal property
listed under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) is subject to verification
by the assessor, and any unreported or misreported property discovered
by the assessor remains subject to taxes, penalties, and interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---