BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.140 and 2010 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Preliminary plats of any proposed subdivision and dedication shall
be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant for modification
or correction within ninety days from date of filing thereof unless the
applicant consents to an extension of such time period or the ninety
day limitation is extended to include up to twenty-one days as
specified under RCW 58.17.095(3): PROVIDED, That if an environmental
impact statement is required as provided in RCW 43.21C.030, the ninety
day period shall not include the time spent preparing and circulating
the environmental impact statement by the local government agency.
Final plats and short plats shall be approved, disapproved, or returned
to the applicant within thirty days from the date of filing thereof,
unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time period. A
final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted
to the legislative body of the city, town, or county for approval
within nine years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the
project is within city limits, not subject to requirements adopted
under chapter 90.58 RCW, and the date of preliminary plat approval is
on or before December 31, 2007, within seven years of the date of
preliminary plat approval if the date of preliminary plat approval is
on or after January 1, 2008, and on or before December 31, 2014, and
within five years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the date
of preliminary plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015. Nothing
contained in this section shall act to prevent any city, town, or
county from adopting by ordinance procedures which would allow
extensions of time that may or may not contain additional or altered
conditions and requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.170 and 2010 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
When the legislative body of the city, town or county finds that
the subdivision proposed for final plat approval conforms to all terms
of the preliminary plat approval, and that said subdivision meets the
requirements of this chapter, other applicable state laws, and any
local ordinances adopted under this chapter which were in effect at the
time of preliminary plat approval, it shall suitably inscribe and
execute its written approval on the face of the plat. The original of
said final plat shall be filed for record with the county auditor. One
reproducible copy shall be furnished to the city, town or county
engineer. One paper copy shall be filed with the county assessor.
Paper copies shall be provided to such other agencies as may be
required by ordinance. Any lots in a final plat filed for record shall
be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws for a
period of nine years from the date of filing if the project is within
city limits, not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58
RCW, and the date of filing is on or before December 31, 2007, for a
period of seven years from the date of filing if the date of filing is
on or after January 1, 2008, and on or before December 31, 2014, and
for a period of five years from the date of filing if the date of
filing is on or after January 1, 2015. A subdivision shall be governed
by the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes,
ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of approval under RCW
58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of nine years after final plat
approval if the project is within city limits, not subject to
requirements adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW, and the date of final
plat approval is on or before December 31, 2007, for a period of seven
years after final plat approval if the date of final plat approval is
on or after January 1, 2008, and on or before December 31, 2014, and
for a period of five years after final plat approval if the date of
final plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015, unless the
legislative body finds that a change in conditions creates a serious
threat to the public health or safety in the subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 2010 c 79 s 3 (uncodified) is hereby
repealed.

--- END ---