BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint center for aerospace
technology innovation is created.
(2) The purpose of the center is to advance research on new
technologies that offer the promise of creating innovative products
that can be used in aerospace. The center shall be designed to enhance
the education of students in the engineering departments of the
University of Washington, Washington State University, and other
participating institutions through industry-focused research.
(3) The center shall be operated and administered as a multi-institutional education and research center, housing appropriate
research and development programs conducted in various locations within
Washington under the joint authority of the University of Washington
and Washington State University. The facilities of the center must be
made available to other institutions of higher education when this
would benefit specific program needs.
(4) The initial location of the center shall be west of the crest
of the Cascade mountains. Research sponsored by the center must
leverage experimental work at the University of Washington and
Washington State University.
(5) The center must:
(a) Conduct research that is designed to benefit the intermediate
and long-term economic vitality of the Washington aerospace industry;
(b) Advance industry innovation while safeguarding intellectual
property;
(c) Develop and strengthen university-industry relationships
through the conduct of research that is primarily of interest to
aerospace companies doing business in Washington;
(d) Encourage a full range of projects from small research projects
that meet the specific needs of a smaller company to large scale,
multipartner projects;
(e) Provide substantial opportunities for training undergraduate
and graduate students through direct involvement in research and
participation with industry;
(f) Emphasize and develop nonstate support of the center's research
activities through leveraging dollars from federal and private for-profit and nonprofit sources;
(g) Seek to leverage its financial impact through joint support
arrangements on a project-by-project basis as appropriate;
(h) Provide a forum for effective interaction between the state's
aerospace industry and its academic institutions through promotion of
faculty collaboration with industry, sponsoring at least one annual
symposium focusing on aerospace research in the state of Washington;
(i) Establish mechanisms for soliciting and evaluating proposals
and for making awards and reporting on technological progress,
financial leverage, and other measures of impact; and
(j) Report biennially to the legislature and the governor about the
impact of the center's work on the state's economy and the aerospace
sector, with projections of future impact, providing indicators of its
impact, and outlining ideas for enhancing benefits to the state. The
report must be coordinated with the governor's office and applicable
executive branch agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An advisory board is created. The board
shall consist of five members appointed by the governor representing
higher education and the aerospace industry. The terms of the initial
members shall be staggered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Staff support shall be provided from among
the cooperating institutions through cooperative agreements to the
extent funds are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The center may hire a director and staff as
necessary to operate the center. The director may enter into
cooperative agreements for programs and research with public and
private organizations including state and nonstate agencies consistent
with policies of the participating institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The center may receive and expend federal
funds and any private gifts or grants to further its mission. The
funds are to be expended in accordance with federal and state law and
any conditions contingent in the grant of those funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---