BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a skilled
workforce is essential for employers and job seekers to compete and
grow Washington's aerospace industry as part of the global economy.
The legislature intends to improve coordination of the state's training
system for skilled aerospace workers in order to provide better
alignment with industry needs in the present and over the long term for
both two-year training programs, short-term training, and relevant
apprenticeship programs to keep pace with a rapidly changing industry.
The legislature further intends to increase aerospace skill development
and education and training programs and help increase jobs for
Washington's citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state board for community and technical colleges, in
collaboration with aerospace or advanced materials long-term training
providers, short-term training providers whose mission is focused on
customized and innovative short-term training, and apprenticeship
program providers, shall facilitate coordination and alignment of
aerospace training programs to the maximum extent possible. This
coordination and alignment shall include but not be limited to the
following activities:
(a) Providing up-to-date information about the aerospace and
advanced materials manufacturing training programs in the state;
(b) Providing information about grants and partnership
opportunities;
(c) Providing coordination for professional development for faculty
and other education and training providers;
(d) Evaluating programs identified by the aerospace and advanced
materials manufacturing pipeline advisory committee annually for
completion and job placement results; and
(e) Making budget recommendations to the governor and the
legislature specific to the aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing training programs.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
establish an aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline
advisory committee consisting of not less than eleven nor more than
fifteen members. A majority of members shall represent industry with
the chair selected by the committee from among the industry members.
Members of the advisory committee shall also include at least two
persons representing labor who represent aerospace or advanced
materials production workers and also include education and training
providers including, but not limited to, the director of a long-term
training program, the director of a short-term training program whose
mission is to focus on customized and innovative short-term training,
and the director of an apprenticeship program. The advisory
committee's duties include but are not limited to:
(a) Providing direction for a skills gap analysis that is: (i)
Produced with the workforce training and education coordinating board
using data developed through the education data center; and (ii)
consistent with the joint assessment by the higher education
coordinating board or its successor, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the workforce training and education
coordinating board of the number and type of higher education and
training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled
and educated workforce;
(b) Establishing goals for students served, program completion
rates, and employment rates;
(c) Coordinating and disseminating industry advice for aerospace
and advanced materials manufacturing training programs; and
(d) Recommending training programs for review by the workforce
training and education coordinating board in coordination with the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(3) All requirements in this section are subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purposes
described.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2012, and each September 1st thereafter, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, working with the
state board for community and technical colleges, shall evaluate the
programs recommended for review by the aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing pipeline advisory committee under section 2 of this act.
This evaluation shall include the outcome results both for the persons
receiving the training and the employers.
(2) By September 1, 2016, and every four years thereafter, the
workforce training and education coordinating board shall conduct and
complete an analysis of the results of the training system for
aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing. This analysis shall
include but not be limited to a specific net-impact and cost-benefit
evaluation of the training system for the aerospace and advanced
materials manufacturing industry and the outcome results both for the
persons receiving the training and the employers.
(3) All requirements in this section are subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purposes
described.

--- END ---