BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that careers in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) are critically
important to the state's economy and will grow in importance in the
future. The vitality of STEM product and process development,
manufacturing, international trade, and research are dependent on a
well-educated, trained, creative workforce. The legislature also finds
that there are current employment opportunities and projected high
employer demands in STEM careers. The legislature further finds that
the interdisciplinary connections of science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics taught in integrated, applied, and hands-on courses not
only deepens content understanding but also extends and expands that
learning to thoughtful and creative problem solving practices on the
assembly line, in the laboratory, and at the drawing board.
It is the intent of the legislature to support STEM education
programs to help increase the number of Washingtonians prepared to
enter STEM career fields. It is also the intent of the legislature to
support courses and programs that begin in high school and build upon
one another so that technical certifications and degrees are connected
from high schools and skill centers to community and technical colleges
and four-year universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.700
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to
high schools to implement a training program to prepare students for
employment as entry-level aerospace assemblers. Grant funds must be
allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve
course curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support professional
development for course teachers. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall consult and team with the community and
technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace and advanced
materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace program of
study and industry career needs. This information must assist the
office of the superintendent of public instruction in refining specific
aspects to the criteria in (b) of this subsection and leveraging
advantages and opportunities for students in selected high schools.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant
recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (1)(b). This is a
competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:
(i) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district
leadership and faculty in support of the aerospace assembler program;
(ii) Demonstrate capacity to offer the program and maximize the use
of grant resources addressing: Availability of appropriate physical
space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected
enrollment from the high school as well as from other area high schools
as appropriate, planned hours and days each week the program is to be
offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(iii) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and
technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless
pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation
beyond high school;
(iv) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the
community and partner support for implementing an entry-level aerospace
assembler program that includes one or more of the following:
Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support, internships,
mentorships, and other program components;
(v) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a
beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and
retaining students in the course; and
(vi) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years
succeeding the initial grant year.
(2) The education data center in the office of financial management
must collect aerospace assembler program student participation and
completion data for grant recipient high schools. The center must
follow students to employment or further training and education in the
two years following the students' completion of the program. Findings
must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each January thereafter
through January 2018 to the governor, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, other appropriate state agencies, and the
appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.700
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to skill
centers to implement enhanced manufacturing skills programs. Grant
funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase
or improve program curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support
professional development for program teachers. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall consult and team with the
community and technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace
and advanced materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace
program of study and industry career needs as well as other community
and technical college manufacturing programs. This information must
assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in
refining specific aspects to the criteria in subsection (2) of this
section and leveraging advantages and opportunities for students in
selected skill centers.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant
recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a
competitive grant process. Successful skill center applicants must:
(a) Demonstrate that enhanced manufacturing skills programs meet
industry certification standards;
(b) Demonstrate engaged and committed skill center and school
district leadership and faculty in support of the program;
(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the enhanced manufacturing skills
programs and maximize the use of grant resources addressing:
Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology
requirements, providing projected enrollment from area high schools and
students from area community and technical colleges if space is
available, planned hours and days each week the program is to be
offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and
technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless
pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation
beyond high school;
(e) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the
community and partner support for implementing an enhanced
manufacturing skills program that includes one or more of the
following: Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support,
internships, mentorships, and other program components;
(f) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a
beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and
retaining students in the program; and
(g) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years
succeeding the initial grant year.
(3) The education research center in the office of financial
management must collect enhanced manufacturing skills programs student
participation and completion data for grant recipient skill centers.
The center must follow students to employment or further training and
education in the two years following the students' completion of the
program. Findings must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each
January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, other appropriate state
agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.700
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to high
schools to implement specialized courses in science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics (STEM) careers as provided by a national
multidisciplinary science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
program. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be
used to purchase course curriculum and equipment, initial course
student materials, and support professional development for course
teachers.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant
recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a
competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:
(a) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district
leadership and faculty in support of expanding specialized STEM
courses;
(b) Demonstrate that faculty are appropriately trained to offer
specialized STEM courses or a plan for faculty to obtain the
appropriate training;
(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the specialized STEM courses and
maximize the use of grant resources by addressing: Availability of
appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements,
providing projected enrollment at the high school and from area high
schools as appropriate, planned hours and days each week the program is
to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Provide the plan for course implementation that includes a
beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and
retaining students in the course;
(e) Provide a plan to promote opportunities for students to acquire
college credit;
(f) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the
community and partner support for implementing specialized STEM
courses. Partner support may include one or more of the following:
Supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships,
apprenticeships, and other program components;
(g) Demonstrate connections to community and technical college
programs as well as links to four-year higher education institution
STEM programs; and
(h) Demonstrate capacity to continue the course in years succeeding
the initial grant year.
(3)(a) The education data center in the office of financial
management must, with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, collect student course enrollment and course completion
information.
(b) The education data center must: (i) Study mathematics and
science course-taking patterns of students completing specialized STEM
courses; and (ii) follow the students to employment or further training
and education in the two years following high school. This study must
be designed to inform policymakers about the extent to which
specialized science, technology, engineering, and mathematics classes
taken by students reduce mathematics remediation of students entering
the workplace, apprenticeships, community and technical colleges, and
four-year institutions of higher education. Study findings must be
reported annually beginning January 2014 and each January thereafter
through January 2018 to the governor, appropriate state agencies, and
the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

--- END ---