BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There is evidence that the practice of keeping a group of
students with the same teacher in successive school years and grade
levels, or looping, has positive academic and social benefits for
students;
(b) There is also evidence that ninth grade is a particularly
difficult transition year, a time when many students experience
emotional and social challenges as well as declines in attendance and
grades. Furthermore, if students must repeat ninth grade, their
chances of eventually dropping out of school increase significantly;
(c) Even though looping could address some of the academic and
social challenges of ninth grade, school districts are less likely to
try this instructional strategy for middle school students; and
(d) Teacher certification requirements may be a contributing factor
to districts' reluctance to loop students and teachers between middle
school and ninth grade.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage school
districts to consider looping as a strategy to improve student
achievement and reduce dropouts by removing any barriers imposed by
state teacher certification requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall permit school
districts to assign teachers to classes other than in their areas of
endorsement without requiring a supplemental assistance plan,
additional coursework, or application for a waiver if:
(a) The purpose of the assignment is intentionally to keep a group
of students with the same teacher or teachers between one or more
middle school grades and ninth grade as part of a program to improve
students' academic and social outcomes;
(b) The school district determines the teacher has sufficient
knowledge and skills to be a competent instructor in the assigned
classes; and
(c) Each such assignment is approved by a formal vote of the local
school board for each teacher so assigned.
(2) School districts must report annually to the professional
educator standards board on the number of teachers assigned outside
their area of endorsement under this section for the previous school
year, but the board shall maintain and display the number separately
from other reported out-of-endorsement assignments.

--- END ---