BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature has made a commitment to
improve student achievement through high quality teaching and school
leadership by requiring a significant revision of performance
evaluations for teachers and principals. Pilot school districts have
led the way in developing evaluation systems using statewide criteria
definitions and research-based instructional frameworks, including
performance-based rubrics and multiple measures of performance, and
have been supported by supplemental funding from the state despite a
difficult fiscal environment.
(2) The legislature reaffirms its commitment to full statewide
implementation of revised evaluation systems in the 2013-14 school
year. Key to the success of this effort will be the readiness of
teachers, principals, and superintendents to fulfill their respective
roles and their level of understanding of the performance expectations
and the processes and tools for measuring and supporting performance
under the new system.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to provide professional
development and training opportunities that are cost-effective and
accessible online. The legislature further intends to create the
expectation that teachers, principals, and superintendents dedicate a
portion of their continuing education to improving their understanding
of and capacity for high quality teaching and school leadership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a comprehensive online training package for principals and
superintendents for the revised evaluation systems required under RCW
28A.405.100. The office shall also develop a modified version of the
training package to serve as an orientation for teachers. To the
maximum extent feasible, the office shall incorporate or adapt existing
online training or curriculum, including securing materials or
curriculum under contract or purchase agreements within available
funds.
(2) The training package must be developed in modules that allow
users to access the material over a reasonable number of training
sessions and in a self-directed manner. The package should incorporate
multiple modes of instruction, including videos of classroom teaching;
participatory exercises; and other engaging combinations of online
audio, video, and print presentation.
(3) The training package must include, but not be limited to, the
following topics:
(a) Introduction of the evaluation criteria for teachers and
principals and the four-level rating system;
(b) Orientation to and use of instructional frameworks;
(c) Orientation to and use of the leadership framework;
(d) Best practices in developing and using data in the evaluation
systems, including multiple measures, student growth data, classroom
observations, and other measures and evidence;
(e) Strategies for achieving evaluator agreement;
(f) Evaluator feedback protocols in the evaluation systems;
(g) Examples of high quality teaching and leadership; and
(h) Methods to link the summative evaluation process to ongoing
educator professional development.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
maintain a web site that includes the online training package along
with sample forms and templates, links to relevant research on
evaluation and on high quality teaching and leadership, samples of
contract and collective bargaining language on key topics, examples of
multiple measures of teacher and principal performance, suggestions for
data to measure student growth, and other tools that will assist school
districts in implementing the revised evaluation systems.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
identify the number of in-service training hours associated with each
module and develop a way for users to document their completion of the
training. Documented completion of the training under this section is
considered approved in-service training for the purposes of RCW
28A.415.020.
(6) All teachers and principals employed by a school district
during the 2013-14 school year in a certificated position must
successfully complete the online training package under this section,
or equivalent training as determined by the employing school district,
before the end of the school year and provide documentation of
successful completion to the employing district. School districts
shall collect and maintain the documentation under this subsection in
the personnel file of each teacher and principal.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
periodically update the modules to reflect new topics and research on
performance evaluation so that the training package serves as an
ongoing source of continuing education and professional development,
including for the purposes of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall incorporate in-service training or continuing education on the revised teacher and
principal evaluation systems under RCW 28A.405.100 as a requirement for
renewal of continuing or professional level certificates, including
requiring demonstrated knowledge and competencies in teacher and
principal evaluation systems as an aspect of professional growth plans
used for certificate renewal.
(2) Documented completion of online training provided under section
2 of this act satisfies the requirement under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.415.023 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Credits earned by certificated instructional staff after
September 1, 1995, shall be eligible for application to the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee only if the course content:
(a) Is consistent with a school-based plan for mastery of student
learning goals as referenced in RCW 28A.655.110, the annual school
performance report, for the school in which the individual is assigned;
(b) Pertains to the individual's current assignment or expected
assignment for the subsequent school year;
(c) Is necessary to obtain an endorsement as prescribed by the
Washington professional educator standards board;
(d) Is specifically required to obtain advanced levels of
certification;
(e) Is included in a college or university degree program that
pertains to the individual's current assignment, or potential future
assignment, as a certified instructional staff; ((or))
(f) Addresses research-based assessment and instructional
strategies for students with dyslexia, dysgraphia, and language
disabilities when addressing learning goal one under RCW 28A.150.210,
as applicable and appropriate for individual certificated instructional
staff; or
(g) Pertains to the revised teacher evaluation system under RCW
28A.405.100, including the online training provided under section 2 of
this act.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "credits" mean college quarter
hour credits and equivalent credits for approved in-service, approved
continuing education, or approved internship hours computed in
accordance with RCW 28A.415.020.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules and
standards consistent with the limits established by this section for
certificated instructional staff.
(4) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, application of
credits or credit equivalents earned under this section after October
1, 2010, to the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee is subject to any conditions or
limitations contained in the omnibus operating appropriations act.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.405.100 and 2010 c 235 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910, and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and (([the])) the school community; and
(viii) exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on
improving instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
When student growth data, if available and relevant to the teacher and
subject matter, is referenced in the evaluation process it must be
based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, it
shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her designee to
evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school. During each
school year all classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged satisfactory based on district evaluation criteria shall be
notified in writing of the specific areas of deficiencies along with a
reasonable program for improvement. During the period of probation,
the employee may not be transferred from the supervision of the
original evaluator. Improvement of performance or probable cause for
nonrenewal must occur and be documented by the original evaluator
before any consideration of a request for transfer or reassignment as
contemplated by either the individual or the school district. A
probationary period of sixty school days shall be established. The
establishment of a probationary period does not adversely affect the
contract status of an employee within the meaning of RCW 28A.405.300.
The purpose of the probationary period is to give the employee
opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her areas of
deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and the
giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency; such additional
certificated employee shall be immune from any civil liability that
might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith
performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer and shall constitute grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(b) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. This reassignment may
not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect the
probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of
the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible,
the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term.
(5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria
and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established by
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrating commitment to closing the
achievement gap; (iii) providing for school safety; (iv) leading the
development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan for
increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple student
data elements; (v) assisting instructional staff with alignment of
curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and local district
learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting, and evaluating effective
instruction and assessment practices; (vii) managing both staff and
fiscal resources to support student achievement and legal
responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school community to
promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. When available,
student growth data that is referenced in the evaluation process must
be based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, and parents, shall create models for implementing the
evaluation system criteria, student growth tools, professional
development programs, and evaluator training for certificated classroom
teachers and principals. Human resources specialists, professional
development experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted.
Due to the diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental
levels of students, classroom teachers and principals must be
prominently represented in this work. The models must be available for
use in the 2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (c) of this subsection
and implemented in all school districts beginning with the 2013-14
school year.
(c) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction data that is used in
evaluations and all district-collected student achievement, aptitude,
and growth data regardless of whether the data is used in evaluations.
If the data is not available electronically, the district may submit it
in nonelectronic form. The superintendent of public instruction must
analyze the districts' use of student data in evaluations, including
examining the extent that student data is not used or is underutilized.
The superintendent of public instruction must also consult with
participating districts and stakeholders, recommend appropriate
changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012. In the
July 1, 2011, report, the superintendent shall include recommendations
for whether a single statewide evaluation model should be adopted,
whether modified versions developed by school districts should be
subject to state approval, and what the criteria would be for
determining if a school district's evaluation model meets or exceeds a
statewide model. The report shall also identify challenges posed by
requiring a state approval process.
(8) Each certificated classroom teacher and certificated support
personnel shall have the opportunity for confidential conferences with
his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions in each
school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.
(9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause
the evaluation or supervision of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her
specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be
sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract
under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator under RCW
28A.405.300.
(10) After a certificated classroom teacher or certificated support
personnel has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section or has received one of the two top ratings for four
years under subsection (2) of this section, a school district may use
a short form of evaluation, a locally bargained evaluation emphasizing
professional growth, an evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, or any combination thereof. The short form of evaluation
shall include either a thirty minute observation during the school year
with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation based on
the criteria in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at
least two observation periods during the school year totaling at least
sixty minutes without a written summary of such observations being
prepared. A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing
professional growth must provide that the professional growth activity
conducted by the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked
to one or more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation
criteria. However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1)
or (2) of this section shall be followed at least once every three
years ((unless this time is extended by a local school district under
the bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW)), and any
collective bargaining agreement entered into or amended after the
effective date of this section must be consistent with this provision.
The employee or evaluator may require that the evaluation process set
forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section be conducted in any
given school year. No evaluation other than the evaluation authorized
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be used as a basis for
determining that an employee's work is not satisfactory under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as probable cause for the
nonrenewal of an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an
evaluation process developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines
otherwise.

--- END ---