BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The lives of military families are dominated
by frequent deployments, relocations, and extended periods of single
parenthood. Military spouses are some of the most mobile populations
in our country, making the maintenance of professional licenses a
significant obstacle. According to the 2010 defense management data
center, there are thirty-three thousand three hundred eighty active
duty and ten thousand eight hundred thirty-seven reserve military
spouses residing in Washington. Military families depend on two
incomes and want to achieve their goals and aspirations. It is the
intent of the legislature to recognize the sacrifices made by military
families in service to our country and our state and to help alleviate
the hardships military families face due to their highly transient
life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) For the purposes of this section,
"authority" means any board, commission, or other authority for
issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit under this
title.
(2) To the extent resources are available:
(a) Each authority shall establish procedures to expedite the
issuance of a license, certificate, or permit to perform professional
services regulated by each such authority to a person:
(i) Who is certified or licensed in another state to perform
professional services in that state;
(ii) Whose spouse is the subject of a military transfer to
Washington; and
(iii) Who left employment in the other state to accompany the
person's spouse to Washington.
(b) The procedure must include: A process for issuing the person
a license, certificate, registration, or permit, if, in the opinion of
the authority, the requirements for licensure, certification,
registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state are
substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.
(c) Each authority in this title shall develop a method and adopt
rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in (a)(i) through
(iii) of this subsection to perform services regulated by the authority
in Washington by issuing the person a temporary license, certificate,
registration, or permit for a limited period of time to allow the
person to perform services regulated by the authority while completing
any specific requirements that may be required in Washington that were
not required in the other state in which the person is licensed,
certified, or registered, or has a permit, unless the authority finds
that the requirements for a license, certificate, registration, or
permit of the other state are substantially unequal to Washington
standards.
(d) An applicant must state in the application that he or she:
(i) Has requested verification from the other state or states that
the person is currently licensed, certified, registered, or has a
permit; and
(ii) Is not subject to any pending investigation, charges, or
disciplinary action by the regulatory body of the other state or
states.
(e) If the authority finds reasonable cause to believe that an
applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements under
(d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the authority may summarily suspend
the license, certificate, registration, or permit pending an
investigation or further action to discipline or revoke the license,
certificate, registration, or permit.
(f) The regulating authority for the department of licensing, the
department of health, and the department of labor and industries shall
appear before the joint committee on veteran and military affairs in
December 2012 to inform the committee as to their efforts to implement
the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---