BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2013, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008 and section 1003, chapter 36, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,387,000))
$18,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,757,000))
$106,667,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,144,000

Sec. 1002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the projects or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for this purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) $778,000 of the appropriation from the Washington state
heritage center account--state is provided solely for the SafePlace
community service center project.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Serenity House of Clallam County $52,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of King County $316,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap
Counties $1,250,000

Jewish Family Service $2,313,000

Low Income Housing Institute $313,000

The Salvation Army $56,000

Share $581,000

Navos (($2,500,000))
$2,350,000

Kitsap Community Resources $600,000

Transitions $109,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Columbia
Basin $648,000

Village Green Foundation $1,029,000

Community Action Council of LMT $95,000

United Way of Kitsap County $605,000

ARC of Spokane $862,000

Dynamic Family Services $575,000

University District Food Bank $573,000

SafePlace $778,000

Kent Youth and Family Services $298,000

Total (($12,327,000))
$13,403,000

(9) $8,924,000 of the appropriation from the state building
construction account--state is provided solely for an accelerated
competitive funding round for construction and rehabilitation projects
that are ready to proceed. For this accelerated funding round:
(a) Projects must meet all requirements of RCW 43.63A.125.
(b) Acquisition projects are not eligible.
(c) Community hall projects are eligible.
(d) Applicants may propose that up to seventy-five percent of total
project costs be funded by the state and at least twenty-five percent
of total project costs be funded by nonstate match.
(e) Applicants must document firm commitment of matching resources
at the time the application is submitted.
(f) The department must approve projects without seeking
legislative approval.

Appropriation:
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $778,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,327,000))
$21,549,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,327,000))
$78,327,000

Sec. 1003 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation in this section for the Roslyn Renaissance
project is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is
the intent of this appropriation to undertake a feasibility study of
structural and program integrity of historic buildings including (a)
the northwest improvement company store, (b) the Sylvia's house, and
(c) vacant commercial lots within the city of Roslyn. The study will
analyze the adaptability of relocating the city offices to the
renovated city hall building. The Roslyn downtown association shall
submit the completed study to the department by July 1, 2012, including
a detailed cost estimate for the property acquisition and
redevelopment, and a capital fundraising plan to support the
acquisitions through multiple funding sources.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Adna Athletic and Fitness Facility $80,000

American Lake Veterans' Golf
Course $250,000

Anacortes Depot $380,000

Bothell North Creek Forest Land
Acquisition $200,000

Boys and Girls Federal Way $50,000

Bucoda Odd Fellows Community
Center $150,000

Central WA State Fair
Association $35,000

City of Kirkland Athletic Fields $150,000

Colville Tribal Museum $250,000

Daybreak Youth Services Pre-Construction Activities $100,000

Dekalb Pier Project $700,000

Gig Harbor Maritime Pier $390,000

Grays Harbor Historical Seaport
Lady Washington Rehabilitation $169,000

Legion Park Visitors Center and
Trailhead Project $110,000

Match FEMA funds for Sprague
Response Center $300,000

North Mason Senior Center $1,360,000

Port of Bremerton $1,100,000

Puyallup Transit Oriented
Development $1,500,000

Redmond Central Connector $850,000

Roslyn Renaissance $300,000

Seattle Children's Hospital
Emergency Department $1,000,000

Skagit Valley Hospital $750,000

South Tacoma Community Center
Playground $380,000

Spokane Food Bank Distribution
Center Capacity and Renovation $1,250,000

Spokane Valley Partners Boiler
Replacement $100,000

Sultan Boys and Girls Club $500,000

Tacoma Hilltop Health Center $1,500,000

The Arc of Tri-Cities Facility $350,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Center $900,000

Vancouver Waterfront Park Pre-Construction Activities $500,000

Veteran's Memorial $210,000

West Hill Skyway
Redevelopment $750,000

YWCA Yakima $203,000

Total $16,817,000

(9) Up to $80,000 of the Roslyn Renaissance project authorized
amount may be used to acquire Sylvia House.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

Sec. 1004 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1050, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,106,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,298,000))
$328,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,404,000))
$17,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,936,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,340,000))
$41,370,000

Sec. 1005 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or
other public works facility for which an investment grade audit is
obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition
that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,000,000))
$92,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,000,000))
$108,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,000,000))
$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Affordable Housing, and Weatherization
(91000248)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the appropriation from the Washington state
heritage center account--state in this section is provided solely for
the Quixote Village permanent supportive housing project in Olympia,
Washington. The department shall not expend the appropriation until
the remaining share of project costs has been secured.
(2) $1,480,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for low-income weatherization through the energy matchmakers
program.
(3) $98,020,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2012-2A,
developed February 23, 2012. The department shall evaluate projects on
the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if
the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may allocate funding to alternate
projects. The department shall, at its discretion, determine the
actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project, provided that
the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this
section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,500,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000247)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,520,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for low-income weatherization through the energy matchmakers
program.
(2) $15,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for continuation of the community energy efficiency program
administered by WSU energy extension.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2012-1B, developed
February 18, 2012.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

Sec. 1009 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1015, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.
(2) Funding for the East King County Performing Arts Center Project
(PACE) is reduced by $2,000,000. It is the intent of the legislature
to appropriate $2,000,000 in state funding for the project once
nonstate matching funds have been secured.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,108,000))
$10,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,130,000))
$12,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Loan Program Consolidation Board (91000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature intends to consolidate under a single financing
authority all existing state lending programs currently dispersed under
the management of separate agencies, including, but not limited to,
infrastructure and student loan programs. The purposes of this
consolidation are to: Increase the effective and accountable use of
state resources; increase efficiency and decrease costs through
economies of scale; and streamline access for customers to financial
and technical assistance.
(2)(a) To assist the legislature in planning for this
consolidation, a loan program consolidation board is established, with
members as provided in this subsection:
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, as voting members.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate, as voting members.
(iii) The speaker of the house and the president of the senate
jointly shall appoint five citizen members with backgrounds in the
financing of infrastructure and student loans, as voting members.
(b) The board shall choose its chair or cochairs from among its
membership. The director of the office of financial management shall
convene the initial meeting of the board.
(c) Staff support for the board shall be provided by the office of
financial management, the house of representatives office of program
research and the senate committee services. The relevant state
agencies must provide technical assistance as the board may reasonably
request.
(d) Legislative members of the loan program consolidation board
must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an
employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The following agencies shall each designate a representative to
provide information to the board and participate in its discussions:
The office of financial management; the state treasurer; the department
of health; the department of ecology; the department of transportation;
the public works board; the higher education coordinating board, or
successor agency; and the state housing finance commission.
(4)(a) By December 15, 2012, the loan program consolidation board
shall develop and submit to the governor and appropriate legislative
committees a recommended consolidation plan that includes, but is not
limited to, infrastructure and educational lending programs
administered by the departments of commerce, health, and ecology; the
housing finance commission; the office of the state treasurer; and the
higher education coordinating board, or successor agency.
(b) The plan must include recommendations on: The organizational
structure for the umbrella authority; the process and timeline for
transferring existing programs and adding new programs to the umbrella
authority; and any statutory and budgetary changes necessary to
implement the plan in the 2013-2015 biennium, and thereafter.
(c) The plan must also include recommendations on sources of
capital that could be used to make low-interest educational loans to
students under the higher education loan program (HELP) authorized in
RCW 28B.97.010.
(5) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for:
(a) Contracting with additional persons who have specific technical
expertise to carry out the requirements of this section; and
(b) Paying travel expenses of nonlegislative members of the loan
program consolidation board.

Appropriation:
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Sec. 1011 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Bid Savings Contingency Pool (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Transfer Capital Budget Staff to Capital Funds (30000028)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,912,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000

Sec. 1013 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,282,000))
$4,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,532,000))
$38,619,000

Sec. 1014 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $928,000
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $790,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,698,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,718,000))
$4,416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,718,000))
$4,416,000

Sec. 1015 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1047 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,482,000))
$982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,482,000))
$982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (30000577)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Sec. 1018 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$412,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Grants: Tulalip Water Supply ((and Hanson Harbor))
(92000001)

The appropriation in this section is ((subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $699,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for the Hanson Harbor water supply project. $2,500,000 of the
appropriation is)) provided solely for the Tulalip water supply
pipeline.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,199,000))
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,199,000))
$2,500,000

Sec. 2002 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 2005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation from the drinking water
assistance account--federal stimulus is provided solely for the city of
Tacoma McMillan Reservoir project and the city of Seattle Maple Leaf
Reservoir project.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,373,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,721,000

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,868,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $832,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,089,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,472,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,150,000))
$326,982,000

Sec. 2003 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Capacity to Replace Maple Lane School (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,635,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,097,000))
$2,460,000

Sec. 2004 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (90000001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,722,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,728,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,450,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (90000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,008,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,730,000

Sec. 2006 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,400,000))
$16,800,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,141,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,666,000))
$16,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000

Sec. 2008 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,810,000
Public Safety Reimbursable Bond Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,356,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,453,000))
$40,753,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,272,000))
$47,572,000

Sec. 2009 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
New Prison Reception Center (30000570)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,200,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,181,000))
$252,226,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,381,000))
$252,226,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,900,000))
$3,648,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$752,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

Sec. 3002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the
Columbia basin ground water management area for the following projects:
(a) $600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to construct
localized hydrologic models for municipal supply sources and aquifer
storage and recovery potential; and
(b) $400,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to develop and
implement methods to identify sustainable wells near the East Low
Canal.
(2) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation program.
(3) The department must reexamine its method of accounting for in-stream and out-of-stream benefits and develop a means of accounting for
the indirect but substantial and tangible out-of-stream benefits that
accrue from conservation, pump exchanges, and other projects. The
department must report the results of this reexamination to the
legislature by September 15, 2011.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,987,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,000,000))
$36,596,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water
Supply Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,404,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,513,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Water Management Projects (91000167)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the Keechelus to Kachess Pipeline I-90 Crossing
Project in Kittitas County.

Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 3004 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,475,000))
$8,172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$6,609,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,975,000))
$14,781,000

Sec. 3005 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3025 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must
require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an
investment grade audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of
the audit as part of its water pollution control revolving fund program
loan.
(2) $23,327,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
following ranked list of projects from the fiscal year 2012 water
quality integrated funding program list of unfunded projects:

PROJECT AUTHORIZED AMOUNT

LOTT Clean Water Alliance Primary Sedimentation
Basins $10,733,000

Tacoma Wapato Lake LID Pilot $2,322,000

Kirkland NE 80th Street Sewermain Replacement (Phase
II & III) $5,000,000

Pacific Valentine Avenue Roadway and LID
Implementation $2,836,000

Seattle Norfolk Water Quality $2,025,000

Snoqualmie Northern Street LID Retrofit $411,000

Total $23,327,000

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,000,000))
$109,939,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,205,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,205,000))
$192,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($921,025,000))
$928,964,000

Sec. 3006 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Appropriation:
((Local Toxics Control Account--State)) State
Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,248,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (91000030)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Energy Conservation (91000040)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Picnic Shelters (91000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Rocky Reach Trail (91000035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Lake Sammamish Concession and Event Facility (91000034)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 3012 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
acquisition of land in Dabob Bay by the nature conservancy for transfer
to the department of natural resources.
(2) The balance of the appropriation shall not be expended on the
acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Sec. 3013 2011 1st sp.s c 49 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,000,000))
$64,500,000

Sec. 3014 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (91000002)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$0

Sec. 3015 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3079 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Point Ruston Sediment Capping and Shoreline Restoration
Stabilization (91000065)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to the department of natural resources to complete
sediment capping and shoreline stabilization on aquatic lands located
adjacent to the Asarco clean-up site in Commencement Bay. However,
funds shall only be expended if the department has entered into
agreements with the Environmental Protection Agency or the adjacent
land owner known as Point Ruston, LLC which fully relieves the state
from any further liability or contributions relating to the cleanup of
such aquatic lands.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

Sec. 3018 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3083 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
((Elk River Estuarine)) National Coastal Wetland Conservation
Program Lands Acquisition (91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 3019 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3108 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Fire Hazard Reductions (30000201)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for forest ((improvement)) treatments ((on)) that
benefit state trust lands in eastern Washington.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Self Contained Breathing Apparatus Building
(30000067)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Master Plan/Environmental Impact Study
(30000066)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,187,000))
$2,226,000
School Construction and Skills Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,306,000))
$2,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,707,000))
$69,746,000

Sec. 5002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Skills Centers Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$22,942,000

Sec. 5003 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,461,000))
$25,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,461,000))
$25,443,000

Sec. 5004 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,337,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) $952,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.
(4) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation from the common school
construction account--state is for reimbursement of demonstrated direct
and actual preconstruction costs incurred by the Meridian, Eastmont,
and Yakima school districts through January 31, 2012.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,960,000))
$267,358,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$1,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,560,000))
$268,958,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,351,581,000))
$1,351,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,667,141,000))
$1,620,097,000

Sec. 5005 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review the impact of students enrolled in alternative learning
experiences on the calculation of student enrollment projections for
determining school district eligibility for school construction
assistance, and shall work with interested stakeholders to analyze
whether the calculation should be changed. The results of the
analysis, including possible recommendations for an adjustment factor,
shall be submitted to the senate ways and means committee and the house
capital budget committee no later than December 31, 2011.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,754,000))
$247,395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,581,765,000))
$1,586,015,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,927,519,000))
$1,833,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000

Sec. 5007 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5021 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington - Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,186,000))
$4,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,186,000))
$34,605,000

Sec. 5008 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington - Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,801,000))
$32,074,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,801,000))
$62,074,000

Sec. 5009 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Anderson Hall Renovation (20091002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,553,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,997,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,750,000))
$200,000

Sec. 5010 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,216,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,435,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,585,000))
$5,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, the
University of Washington is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an
amount not to exceed $53,850,000 in value for construction of the
Bothell Phase 3 project identified in this section. The bond shall be
financed from building fee and trust land revenues deposited into the
university's bond retirement account, in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700
through 28B.20.740.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Sec. 5012 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

In conjunction with the appropriations and reappropriation in this
section, the Washington State University is authorized to issue a bond
or bonds in an amount not to exceed $35,775,000 in value for
construction of the Riverpoint Biomedical and Health Sciences project
identified in this section. The bond shall be financed from building
fee and trust land revenues deposited into the university's bond
retirement account, in accordance with RCW 28B.30.700 through
28B.30.780.

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,770,000))
$5,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,770,000))
$5,723,000

Sec. 5013 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,230,000))
$28,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,000,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,070,000))
$35,951,000

Sec. 5014 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Preservation (30000444)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000,000))
$7,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,000,000))
$17,215,000

Sec. 5015 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5037 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,727,000))
$3,512,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,327,000))
$23,112,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000

Sec. 5018 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5029 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,895,000))
$3,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,895,000))
$11,625,000

Sec. 5019 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,205,000))
$11,745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,205,000))
$11,745,000

Sec. 5020 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,313,000))
$3,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,313,000))
$3,843,000

Sec. 5021 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5051 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,486,000))
$1,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,486,000))
$1,721,000

Sec. 5022 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,706,000))
$20,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,771,000))
$22,650,000

Sec. 5023 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5082 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,468,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,988,000))
$31,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,489,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,945,000))
$36,314,000

Sec. 5024 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5049 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,062,000))
$4,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,180,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,242,000))
$25,077,000

Sec. 5025 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,983,000))
$148,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,983,000))
$148,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
Equipment Pool (91000035)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,836,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,836,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 6001 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7011 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid
from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia basin
college for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to add space to the delta high school for
the science technology engineering math program.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Forks Satellite building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a wellness center on the Port
Angeles campus.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a music
and art center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom community
college for up to $3,916,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an auxiliary services
building.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Skagit Valley
Community College for up to $30,574,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an academic
and student services building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
Community College for up to $38,615,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a health and
science building.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community
College for up to $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a corporate and
continuing education building.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the institute for
extended learning building.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the state board
for community and technical colleges for up to $50,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the administrative system replacement project pursuant to RCW
28B.50.515(4).
(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia Community
College for up to $5,891,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new student
union.
(2) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Albertsons's building.
(3) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the John L. O'Brien building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $250,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the "Perry Street child care site" land purchase.
(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $15,850,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct or
renovate specialized housing and treatment facilities for youth
committed to the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The debt
service is to be paid with the savings associated with closure of the
Maple Lane school.
(5) Washington State Parks:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,620,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for revenue generating facilities including cabins and yurts.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,135,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the Lake Sammamish concession and event facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that the state dispose of its
interest in the Wellington Hills property. Net proceeds from the sale
of the Wellington Hills property shall be deposited into the University
of Washington building account. The University of Washington must
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature upon the sale of the property the total
sale value and net proceeds deposited into the University of Washington
building account.

Sec. 6003 RCW 43.07.129 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 940 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Washington state heritage center account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW
36.18.010(11) and 43.07.128 must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be made only for the following
purposes:
(1) Payment of the certificate of participation issued for the
Washington state heritage center;
(2) Capital maintenance of the Washington state heritage center;
and
(3) Program operations that serve the public, relate to the
collections and exhibits housed in the Washington state heritage
center, or fulfill the missions of the state archives, state library,
and capital museum.
Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Washington state
heritage center account to the Thurston county capital facilities
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.
During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate
from the Washington state heritage center account for the purposes of
state arts, historical, ((and)) library programs, and other facilities
in Thurston county.

Sec. 6004 RCW 43.19.501 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 943 and 2011
1st sp.s. c 43 s 225 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the
state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account
may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by
the department in Thurston county. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys
in the account may be used for predesign identified in section 1037,
chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature
may transfer from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate from the Thurston county capital facilities account for
activities related to other capital project related administrative
purposes.

Sec. 6005 RCW 43.43.944 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7026 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940;
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums; and
(d) General fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account by the
legislature.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. The state patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire
service training account under this section to contract with the
Washington state firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of
the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The contract
may call for payments on a monthly basis. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for
school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol
and for repairs of the burn building. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for
school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol,
((and)) for predesign and repairs of the burn building, and other fire
training academy capital projects as needed.
(3) Any general fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account
shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship
training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with
outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter
joint apprenticeship training program.

Sec. 6006 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7027 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the building communities fund
program. Under the program, capital and technical assistance grants
may be made to nonprofit organizations for acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential
community services, including social service centers and multipurpose
community centers, including those serving a distinct or ethnic
population. Such facilities must be located in a distressed community
or serve a substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to
solicit, evaluate, and rank applications for the building communities
fund program as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations.
(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. To be considered qualified, applicants must demonstrate that
the proposed project:
(i) Will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the services
provided to citizens;
(ii) Will be located in a distressed community or will serve a
substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons;
(iii) Will offer three or more distinct activities that meet a
single community service objective or offer a diverse set of activities
that meet multiple community service objectives, including but not
limited to: Providing social services; expanding employment
opportunities for or increasing the employability of community
residents; or offering educational or recreational opportunities
separate from the public school system or private schools, as long as
recreation is not the sole purpose of the facility;
(iv) Reflects a long-term vision for the development of the
community, shared by residents, businesses, leaders, and partners;
(v) Requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase
of the project;
(vi) Is ready to proceed and will make timely use of the funds;
(vii) Is sponsored by one or more entities that have the
organizational and financial capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant
agreement and to maintain the project into the future;
(viii) Fills an unmet need for community services;
(ix) Will achieve its stated objectives; and
(x) Is a community priority as shown through tangible commitments
of existing or future assets made to the project by community
residents, leaders, businesses, and government partners.
(c) The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total cost of the project, except, under exceptional
circumstances, the department may reduce the amount of nonstate match
required. No more than ten percent of the total granted amount may be
awarded to qualified eligible projects that meet the definition of
exceptional circumstances defined in this subsection. For purposes of
this subsection, exceptional circumstances include but are not limited
to: Natural disasters affecting projects; emergencies beyond an
applicant's control, such as a fire or an unanticipated loss of a lease
where services are currently provided; or a delay that could result in
a threat to public health or safety. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(d) The department may not set a monetary limit to funding
requests.
(3) The department shall submit biennially to the governor and the
legislature in the department's capital budget request a ranked list of
the qualified eligible projects for which applications were received.
The list must include a description of each project, its total cost,
and the amount of state funding requested. The appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature shall use this list to determine building
communities fund projects that may receive funding in the capital
budget. The total amount of state capital funding available for all
projects on the biennial list shall be determined by the capital budget
beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. In addition, if
cash funds have been appropriated, up to three million dollars may be
used for technical assistance grants. The department shall not sign
contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section
until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(4) In addition to the list of ranked qualified eligible projects,
the department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature a summary report that describes the solicitation and
evaluation processes, including but not limited to the number of
applications received, the total amount of funding requested, issues
encountered, if any, and any recommendations for process improvements.
(5) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(7) During the 2011-2013 biennium, solely for the accelerated
competitive funding round described in section 1002(9) of this act, the
following provisions will be in effect:
(a) Construction and rehabilitation projects are eligible.
Acquisition projects are not eligible.
(b) Community hall projects are eligible.
(c) Applicants may propose that up to seventy-five percent of total
project costs be funded by the state and at least twenty-five percent
of total project costs be funded by nonstate match.
(d) Applicants must document firm commitment of matching resources
at the time the application is submitted.
(e) The department must approve projects without seeking
legislative approval.

Sec. 6007 RCW 79.17.010 and 2009 c 497 s 6024 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2011)) 2013, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the resource management cost account
to pay for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(5) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 6008 RCW 79.17.020 and 2009 c 497 s 6025 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2011)) 2013, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay
for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(3) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues, and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS. (1)
Heritage Center Account: For transfer to the Thurston County Capital
Facilities Account, an amount not to exceed $4,826,000.
(2) State Taxable Construction Account: For transfer to the
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply Development Account, an
amount not to exceed $10,404,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the
appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building
construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may
be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as
deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the
federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to
the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general
obligation bond proceeds authorized in this act for deposit into the
state taxable building construction account that are in excess of
amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building
construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written
notification to the director of financial management if it is
determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state
building construction account, or any other account receiving bond
proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is
necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state
taxable building construction account to the state building
construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 18
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
--- END ---