BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the proportion of
people living in middle-income families has declined from fifty-one
percent in 1979 to forty-two percent in 2007, and the current economic
crisis has likely exacerbated this decline. The legislature further
finds that when economic recovery occurs, it must result in more of
Washington's families living in the middle-income bracket or higher
over the long term. Not only does expanding the proportion of people
living in middle-income families strengthen society, it will reduce
state expenditures by reducing caseloads in medical, social services,
and corrections programs, and increase state revenue by increasing
individual incomes.
The legislature also finds that with this financial crisis comes
the opportunity to move government away from paying state agencies for
process, and toward paying for actual accomplishment of measurable
results. The legislature therefore intends to seize this opportunity
and move more people out of dependence and into independent, livable
wage jobs, by mandating that agencies work together in a coordinated
and result-driven manner to improve services to Washingtonians.
Accomplishing this will require teamwork across multiple state
agencies, including the department of social and health services, the
department of commerce, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
employment security department, the department of revenue, the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council, and the human
resources director within the office of financial management. By
acting strategically at this decisive moment in the state's economic
history, the legislature intends to reverse the trend of the last
thirty years and begin a gradual and sustained increase in the
percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income bracket
or above.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the definitions in RCW 28C.18.010, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, "middle-income bracket" means
family incomes between two hundred and five hundred percent of the 2010
federal poverty level, as determined by the United States department of
health and human services for a family of four, adjusted annually for
inflation. This is intended to create a clear and simple definition of
the middle-income bracket that is highly transparent to the public and
can be represented by a single dollar value. This definition does not
preclude agencies and programs from using other measures for
programmatic purposes, such as self-sufficiency measures or federal
poverty level adjusted for household size.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.18.080 and 2009 c 421 s 6, 2009 c 151 s 7, and
2009 c 92 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The board shall develop a state comprehensive plan for
workforce training and education for a ten-year time period that
incorporates information from the area strategic plans. The board
shall submit the ten-year state comprehensive plan to the governor and
the appropriate legislative policy committees. Every four years by
December 1st, beginning December 1, 2012, the board shall submit an
update of the ten-year state comprehensive plan for workforce training
and education to the governor and the appropriate legislative policy
committees.
(b) Following public hearings, the legislature shall, by concurrent
resolution, approve or recommend changes to the initial plan and the
updates. The plan shall then become the state's workforce training
policy unless legislation is enacted to alter the policies set forth in
the plan.
(2)(a) Strategic plans of the workforce development councils shall
be for a ten-year time period. The area plans must delineate specific
strategies to reach the goal of increasing the percentage of Washington
households living in the middle-income bracket or higher. The area
plans shall inform the development of the state comprehensive plan.
(b) The area workforce development councils shall submit their
respective ten-year area strategic plans to the board. Every four
years by March 31st, beginning March 31, 2013, the area workforce
development councils shall submit an update of their respective ten-year area strategic plans for workforce training and education to the
board.
(3) The comprehensive plan shall include workforce training role
and mission statements for the workforce development programs of
operating agencies represented on the board and sufficient specificity
regarding expected actions by the operating agencies to allow them to
carry out actions consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(((3))) (4) Operating agencies represented on the board shall have
operating plans for their workforce development efforts that are
consistent with the comprehensive plan and that provide detail on
implementation steps they will take to carry out their responsibilities
under the plan. Each operating agency represented on the board shall
provide an annual progress report to the board.
(((4))) (5) The comprehensive plan shall include recommendations to
the legislature and the governor on the modification, consolidation,
initiation, or elimination of workforce training and education programs
in the state.
(((5))) (6) The comprehensive plan shall identify the strategic
industry clusters targeted by the workforce development system. In
identifying the strategic clusters, the board shall consult with the
economic development commission to identify clusters that meet the
criteria identified by the working group convened by the economic
development commission and the workforce training and education
coordinating board under RCW 43.330.280.
(((6))) (7) The board shall report to the appropriate legislative
policy committees by December 1st of each odd-numbered year and by
November 1st of each even-numbered year on its progress in implementing
the comprehensive plan and on the progress of the operating agencies in
meeting their obligations under the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall adopt as one of its goals to increase
the percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income
bracket, as defined in section 2 of this act, or higher. The college
board shall delineate specific strategies to reach the goal in existing
agency planning documents as they are updated, including strategic and
operational plans. The plans should include but not be limited to
recruiting and retaining more people into skills training leading to
middle-income occupations and increasing education and training
capacity for skills training that leads to middle-income careers.
(2) The college board shall submit to the board and the office of
financial management its specific agency strategies to increase the
percentage of people living in the middle-income bracket or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt as one of
its goals to increase the percentage of Washington households living in
the middle-income bracket, as defined in section 2 of this act, or
higher. The superintendent shall delineate specific strategies to
reach the goal in existing agency planning documents as they are
updated, including strategic and operational plans. The plans should
include but not be limited to reducing high school dropout rates,
increasing education and training capacity for skills training that
leads to middle-income careers, and providing internships and
preapprenticeship experiences to high school students to allow them to
experience high-demand occupations. In existing communications, and
using existing information from the workforce training and education
coordinating board, workforce development centers, the employment
security department, or other entities, the superintendent shall inform
students and parents of local careers that do not require a four-year
degree and that lead to incomes in the middle-income bracket or higher.
(2) As agency planning documents are updated, the superintendent of
public instruction shall submit to the workforce training and education
coordinating board and the office of financial management its specific
agency strategies to increase the percentage of people living in the
middle-income bracket or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt as one of its goals to increase the
percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income
bracket, as defined in section 2 of this act, or higher. The
department shall delineate specific strategies to reach the goal in
existing agency planning documents as they are updated, including
strategic and operational plans. The plans should include but not be
limited to recruiting and retaining more people into skills training
leading to middle-income occupations and focusing economic development
strategies on growing and attracting jobs that allow Washington
households to live in the middle-income bracket or higher.
(2) As agency planning documents are updated, the department shall
submit to the workforce training and education coordinating board and
the office of financial management its specific agency strategies to
increase the percentage of people living in the middle-income bracket
or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall adopt as one of the department's goals
to increase the percentage of Washington households living in the
middle-income bracket, as defined in section 2 of this act, or higher.
The commissioner shall delineate specific strategies to reach the goal
in existing agency planning documents as they are updated, including
strategic and operational plans. The plans should include but not be
limited to recruiting and retaining more people into skills training
leading to middle-income occupations, and providing income support to
individuals while they are in such training.
(2) As agency planning documents are updated, the commissioner
shall submit to the workforce training and education coordinating board
and the office of financial management the department's specific
strategies to increase the percentage of people living in the middle-income bracket or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall adopt as one of the department's goals to
increase the percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income bracket, as defined in section 2 of this act, or higher. The
secretary shall delineate specific strategies to reach the goal in
existing agency planning documents as they are updated, including
strategic and operational plans. The plans should include but not be
limited to focusing on temporary assistance for needy families,
WorkFirst, state general assistance, basic food training and
employment, vocational rehabilitation, and other appropriate social
service programs and employment in careers that lead to middle-income
earnings or higher, and to the extent practicable, reductions in teen
pregnancy, and drug and alcohol abuse prevention.
(2) As agency planning documents are updated, the secretary shall
submit to the workforce training and education coordinating board and
the office of financial management the department's specific strategies
for WorkFirst, state general assistance, vocational rehabilitation, the
temporary assistance for needy families program, the basic food
employment and training program, and other appropriate social service
programs as they relate to increasing the percentage of people living
in the middle-income bracket or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must, as resources allow, provide appropriate
assistance to the department of social and health services, the
department of commerce, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
employment security department, and the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council with developing goals and strategies to increase
the percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income
bracket or higher. The department's assistance may include: (a)
Supplying data obtained by the department in its normal course of
business for use by other agencies in developing their goals and
strategies to increase the percentage of Washington households living
in the middle-income bracket or higher; (b) evaluating whether existing
state tax preferences for which an annual report or survey is filed
with the department under RCW 82.32.534 or 82.32.585 appear to
contribute to the goal of increasing the percentage of Washington
households living in the middle-income bracket or higher; and (c)
providing consultation as needed in the department's areas of
expertise.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring the
department to disclose return or tax information that is protected from
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of labor and industries, in consultation with the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council, shall adopt as
one of the council's goals to increase the percentage of Washington
households living in the middle-income bracket, as defined in section
2 of this act, or higher. The director shall delineate specific
strategies to reach the goal in existing apprenticeship planning
documents as they are updated, including strategic and operational
plans. The plans should include but not be limited to recruiting and
retaining more people into apprenticeship programs leading to middle-income occupations.
(2) As apprenticeship planning documents are updated, the director
shall submit to the workforce training and education coordinating board
and the office of financial management the council's specific
strategies to increase the percentage of people living in the middle-income bracket or higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director must, as resources allow, provide appropriate
assistance to the department of social and health services, the
department of commerce, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
employment security department, and the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council with developing goals and strategies to increase
the percentage of Washington households living in the middle-income
bracket or higher. The director's assistance may include: (a)
Supplying data on how the state's employees are progressing towards the
middle-income bracket or higher; and (b) providing recommendations, if
desired, on ways to incorporate systematic career ladders into the
state employee system.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to impact collective
bargaining agreements or negotiations.

Sec. 12 RCW 28C.18.060 and 2009 c 151 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state
training system and private career schools and colleges, shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's training system;
(2) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the
needs of employers and the workforce for workforce education and
training;
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state training system, and related state programs, and perform a
biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult
basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and
strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment,
training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and
public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach
to meet such needs;
(4) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, including but not limited to, goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review
the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive
plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management
and employment security department labor force, industry employment,
and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based
outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of
employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer
input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the
labor community;
(5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
review and make recommendations to the office of financial management
and the legislature on operating and capital facilities budget requests
for operating agencies of the state training system for purposes of
consistency with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training
and education;
(6) Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies
and components of the state training system at the state level and at
the regional level;
(7) Develop a consistent and reliable database on vocational
education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements
from publicly funded vocational education programs in this state;
(8)(a) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for
the operating agencies of the state training system in a format that is
accessible to use by the board. The board shall require a minimum of
common core data to be collected by each operating agency of the state
training system;
(b) Develop requirements for minimum common core data in
consultation with the office of financial management and the operating
agencies of the training system;
(9) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the
operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for
measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program
participants, and monitor such program evaluation;
(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state training system, including, but not limited
to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of program
participants, and matches with employment security department payroll
and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system;
(11) In cooperation with the employment security department,
provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in
occupational information and forecasts for use in training system
planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be
limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors
involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current
and forecasted occupations;
(12) Provide for the development of common course description
formats, common reporting requirements, and common definitions for
operating agencies of the training system;
(13) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state
training system;
(14) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between
institutions of the state training system, and encourage articulation
agreements for programs encompassing two years of secondary workforce
education and two years of postsecondary workforce education;
(15) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between private
training institutions and institutions of the state training system;
(16) Develop policy objectives for the workforce investment act,
P.L. 105-220, or its successor; develop coordination criteria for
activities under the act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that
entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs
of each local workforce investment board in the state;
(17) Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential core
competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose shall
be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical thinking,
essential core competencies for this purpose shall be English, math,
science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking. The
board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic
education;
(18) Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach
to businesses and potential program participants;
(19) Facilitate the location of support services, including but not
limited to, child care, financial aid, career counseling, and job
placement services, for students and trainees at institutions in the
state training system, and advocate for support services for trainees
and students in the state training system;
(20) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training
system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation
of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling;
(21) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work
transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job training,
including entrepreneurial education and training, in industries and
occupations without a significant number of apprenticeship programs;
(22) Include in the planning requirements for local workforce
investment boards a requirement that the local workforce investment
boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered through
the one-stop system required under the workforce investment act, P.L.
105-220, or its successor;
(23) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities
among the students, teachers, and administrators of the state training
system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean substantially
proportional to their percentage of the state population in the
geographic area served. This function of the board shall in no way
lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities;
(24) Participate in the planning and policy development of governor
set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended;
(25) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private vocational
schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award for
vocational excellence;
(26) Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund;
(27) Work with the director of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce and the economic development commission to
ensure coordination among workforce training priorities, the long-term
economic development strategy of the economic development commission,
and economic development and entrepreneurial development efforts,
including but not limited to assistance to industry clusters;
(28) Conduct research into workforce development programs designed
to reduce the high unemployment rate among young people between
approximately eighteen and twenty-four years of age. In consultation
with the operating agencies, the board shall advise the governor and
legislature on policies and programs to alleviate the high unemployment
rate among young people. The research shall include disaggregated
demographic information and, to the extent possible, income data for
adult youth. The research shall also include a comparison of the
effectiveness of programs examined as a part of the research conducted
in this subsection in relation to the public investment made in these
programs in reducing unemployment of young adults. The board shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15,
2008, and every two years thereafter. Where possible, the data
reported to the legislative committees should be reported in numbers
and in percentages;
(29) Review agency submissions, pursuant to sections 4 through 8
and 10 of this act, and rate the proposed strategies based on criteria
adopted by the board. The ratings shall be developed annually,
concurrent with annual progress reports on the state comprehensive plan
for workforce training and education. A report containing the ratings
is due annually to the legislature by November 1st in even-numbered
years and December 1st in odd-numbered years, beginning November 1,
2012;
(30) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this
section.

--- END ---