BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature recognizes the value
to both taxpayers and state government agencies of implementing lean
strategies that assist the state in obtaining greater value from its
taxpayer investments in government services. The legislature further
recognizes the governor's executive order to expand implementation of
lean process improvement as a strategy to embed lean into the culture
of state agencies. Successful lean implementation involves commitment
to agency improvement by agency managers and employees, all of whom
contribute to nurturing a problem-solving culture in the agency. It
allows a continuous improvement process, involving identification and
reduction of waste, to become the norm of the agency. These processes
lead to the delivery of effective and efficient services that the
public values.
(b) The legislature also recognizes that implementing lean
strategies during economic downturns, when the imperative to do more
with less is urgent, can preserve valuable agency services and
programs. At the same time, the legislature recognizes that lean
strategies are not designed to focus on reducing the workforce.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that lean strategies be
used to enhance and preserve quality in state government and not be
used as a strategy for reducing the state workforce.
(2) Implementation of lean strategies in private sector businesses
has proven that such strategies assist these businesses to provide
smarter, more efficient services. These strategies are also proving to
be successful within several state agencies.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage additional
state agencies to continue and to expand implementation of lean
strategies in order to improve customer service and to increase
effectiveness and efficiency in delivering state services.

--- END ---