BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.575 and 2010 c 204 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
No state-elected official or municipal officer may speak or appear
in a public service announcement that is broadcast, shown, or
distributed in any form whatsoever during the period beginning
((January 1st)) at the time the official or officer files a statement
of organization under RCW 42.17A.205 and continuing through the general
election if that official or officer is a candidate. If the official
or officer does not control the broadcast, showing, or distribution of
a public service announcement in which he or she speaks or appears,
then the official or officer shall contractually limit the use of the
public service announcement to be consistent with this section prior to
participating in the public service announcement. This section does
not apply to public service announcements that are part of the regular
duties of the office that only mention or visually display the office
or office seal or logo and do not mention or visually display the name
of the official or officer in the announcement.

--- END ---