BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.001 and 2010 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the prevention of sexual exploitation
and abuse of children constitutes a government objective of surpassing
importance. The care of children is a sacred trust and should not be
abused by those who seek commercial gain or personal gratification
based on the exploitation of children.
The legislature further finds that the protection of children from
sexual exploitation can be accomplished without infringing on a
constitutionally protected activity. The definition of "sexually
explicit conduct" and other operative definitions demarcate a line
between protected and prohibited conduct and should not inhibit
legitimate scientific, medical, or educational activities.
The legislature further finds that children engaged in sexual
conduct for financial compensation are frequently the victims of sexual
abuse. Approximately eighty to ninety percent of children engaged in
sexual activity for financial compensation have a history of sexual
abuse victimization. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage
these children to engage in prevention and intervention services and to
hold those who pay to engage in the sexual abuse of children
accountable for the trauma they inflict on children.
The legislature further finds that due to the changing nature of
technology, offenders are now able to access child pornography in
different ways and in increasing quantities. By amending current
statutes governing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that intentional
viewing of and dealing in child pornography over the internet is
subject to a criminal penalty without limiting the scope of existing
prohibitions on the possession of or dealing in child pornography,
including the possession of electronic depictions of a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct. It is also the intent of the legislature to
clarify, in response to State v. Sutherby, 204 P.3d 916 (2009), the
unit of prosecution for the statutes governing possession of and
dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct.
It is the intent of the legislature that the first degree offenses
under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, and 9.68A.070 have a per depiction or
image unit of prosecution, while the second degree offenses under RCW
9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, and 9.68A.070 have a per incident unit of
prosecution as established in State v. Sutherby, 204 P.3d 916 (2009).
Furthermore, it is the intent of the legislature to set a different
unit of prosecution for the new offense of viewing of depictions of a
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct such that each separate
session of intentionally viewing over the internet of visual depictions
or images of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct constitutes
a separate offense.
The decisions of the Washington supreme court in State v. Boyd, 160
W.2d 424, 158 P.3d 54 (2007), and State v. Grenning, 169 Wn.2d 47, 234
P.3d 169 (2010), require prosecutors to duplicate and distribute
depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct ("child
pornography") as part of the discovery process in a criminal
prosecution. The legislature finds that the importance of protecting
children from repeat exploitation in child pornography is not being
given sufficient weight under these decisions. The importance of
protecting children from repeat exploitation in child pornography is
based upon the following findings:
(1) Child pornography is not entitled to protection under the First
Amendment and thus may be prohibited;
(2) The state has a compelling interest in protecting children from
those who sexually exploit them, and this interest extends to stamping
out the vice of child pornography at all levels in the distribution
chain;
(3) Every instance of viewing images of child pornography
represents a renewed violation of the privacy of the victims and a
repetition of their abuse;
(4) Child pornography constitutes prima facie contraband, and as
such should not be distributed to, or copied by, child pornography
defendants or their attorneys;
(5) It is imperative to prohibit the reproduction of child
pornography in criminal cases so as to avoid repeated violation and
abuse of victims, so long as the government makes reasonable
accommodations for the inspection, viewing, and examination of such
material for the purposes of mounting a criminal defense. The
legislature is also aware that the Adam Walsh child protection and
safety act, P.L. 109–248, 120 Stat. 587 (2006), codified at 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 3509(m), prohibits the duplication and distribution of child
pornography as part of the discovery process in federal prosecutions.
This federal law has been in effect since 2006, and upheld repeatedly
as constitutional. Courts interpreting the Walsh act have found that
such limitations can be employed while still providing the defendant
due process. The legislature joins congress, and the legislatures of
other states that have passed similar provisions, in protecting these
child victims so that our justice system does not cause repeat
exploitation, while still providing due process to criminal defendants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any criminal proceeding, any property or material that
constitutes a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
shall remain in the care, custody, and control of either a law
enforcement agency or the court.
(2) Despite any request by the defendant or prosecution, any
property or material that constitutes a depiction of a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct shall not be copied, photographed,
duplicated, or otherwise reproduced, so long as the property or
material is made reasonably available to the parties. Such property or
material shall be deemed to be reasonably available to the parties if
the prosecution, defense counsel, or any individual sought to be
qualified to furnish expert testimony at trial have ample opportunity
for inspection, viewing, and examination of the property or material at
a law enforcement facility or at another facility agreed upon by the
court.
(3) The defendant may view and examine the property and materials
only while in the presence of his or her attorney. If the defendant is
proceeding pro se, the court will appoint an individual to supervise
the defendant while he or she examines the materials.
(4) The court may direct that a mirror image of a computer hard
drive containing such depictions be produced for use by an expert only
upon a showing that an expert has been retained and is prepared to
conduct a forensic examination while the mirror imaged hard drive
remains in the care, custody, and control of a law enforcement agency
or the court. Upon a substantial showing that the expert's analysis
cannot be accomplished while the mirror imaged hard drive is kept
within the care, custody, and control of a law enforcement agency or
the court, the court may order its release to the expert for analysis
for a limited time. If release is granted, the court shall issue a
protective order setting forth such terms and conditions as are
necessary to protect the rights of the victims, to document the chain
of custody, and to protect physical evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct, regardless of its format, is marked as an exhibit in a
criminal proceeding, the prosecutor shall seek an order sealing the
exhibit at the close of the trial. Any exhibits sealed under this
section shall be sealed with evidence tape in a manner that prevents
access to, or viewing of, the depiction of a minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct and shall be labeled so as to identify its contents.
Anyone seeking to view such an exhibit must obtain permission from the
superior court after providing at least ten days notice to the
prosecuting attorney. Appellate attorneys for the defendant and the
state shall be given access to the exhibit, which must remain in the
care and custody of either a law enforcement agency or the court. Any
other person moving to view such an exhibit must demonstrate to the
court that his or her reason for viewing the exhibit is of sufficient
importance to justify another violation of the victim's privacy.
(2) Whenever the clerk of the court receives an exhibit of a
depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, he or she
shall store the exhibit in a secure location, such as a safe. The
clerk may arrange for the transfer of such exhibits to a law
enforcement agency evidence room for safekeeping provided the agency
agrees not to destroy or dispose of the exhibits without an order of
the court.
(3) If the criminal proceeding ends in a conviction, the clerk of
the court shall destroy any exhibit containing a depiction of a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct five years after the judgment is
final, as determined by the provisions of RCW 10.73.090(3). Before any
destruction, the clerk shall contact the prosecuting attorney and
verify that there is no collateral attack on the judgment pending in
any court. If the criminal proceeding ends in a mistrial, the clerk
shall either maintain the exhibit or return it to the law enforcement
agency that investigated the criminal charges for safekeeping until the
matter is set for retrial. If the criminal proceeding ends in an
acquittal, the clerk shall return the exhibit to the law enforcement
agency that investigated the criminal charges for either safekeeping or
destruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
Any depiction of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, in
any format, distributed as discovery to defense counsel or an expert
witness prior to the effective date of this section shall either be
returned to the law enforcement agency that investigated the criminal
charges or destroyed, if the case is no longer pending in superior
court. If the case is still pending, the depiction shall be returned
to the superior court judge assigned to the case or the presiding
judge. The court shall order either the destruction of the depiction
or the safekeeping of the depiction if it will be used at trial. It is
not a defense to violations of this chapter for crimes committed after
December 31, 2012, that the initial receipt of the depictions was done
under the color of law through the discovery process.

--- END ---