BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.16.015 and 1989 c 19 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The period of enlistment in the Washington state guard shall be
set by regulation by the adjutant general((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, no original enlistment may be consummated unless the term
thereof can be completed before the applicant attains the age of sixty-four.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and RCW
38.12.180(2), the adjutant general may extend the service age upon
request by an active member of the Washington state guard if the
adjutant general determines the member's extension would be in the best
interest of the Washington state guard. Extensions under this
subsection have a one-year duration and may be renewed until the member
attains the age of sixty-eight.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.12.180 and 1989 c 19 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Commissioned officers of the organized militia of Washington shall
be retired by order of the commander-in-chief with the rank
respectively held by them at the time of such retirement for the
following reasons:
(1) Unfitness for military service by reason of permanent physical
disability.
(2) Upon request after at least five years continuous service as an
officer in the organized militia of Washington.
Except as provided otherwise in RCW 38.16.015(2), commissioned
officers of the state guard shall upon reaching the age of sixty-four
years be retired.
Retired officers shall draw no pay or allowance from the state
unless recalled to service.
Retired officers are subject, with their consent, to temporary
detail on active state service by the commander-in-chief, and while on
such duty shall receive the same pay and allowances as officers of like
rank on the active list.

--- END ---