BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.46.040 and 2005 c 365 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All prearrangement trust funds ((shall)) must be deposited in
a public depository as defined by RCW 39.58.010, in a national or
state-chartered financial institution authorized to do business in the
state, or in a state or federally chartered credit union((, or in
instruments issued or insured by any agency of the federal
government)). Such accounts ((shall)) must be designated as the
"prearrangement trust fund" by name and the particular cemetery
authority for the benefit of the beneficiaries named in any
prearrangement contract.
(2) All prearranged cemetery merchandise or service trust moneys
must be invested in accordance with the provisions of RCW 11.100.020
subject to the following restrictions:
(a) No officer or director of the cemetery authority, trustee of
the prearrangement trust funds, or spouse, sibling, parent,
grandparent, or issue of such officer, director, or trustee, may borrow
any of such funds for himself or herself, directly or indirectly;
(b) No funds may be loaned to the cemetery authority, its agents,
or employees, or to any corporation, partnership, or other business
entity in which the cemetery authority has any ownership interest;
(c) No funds may be invested with persons or business entities
operating in a business field directly related to cemeteries; and
(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this section,
funds may be invested in any commercial bank, mutual savings bank, or
savings and loan association duly chartered and operating under the
laws of the United States or statutes of the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.39.250 and 2005 c 365 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any funeral establishment selling funeral merchandise or
services by prearrangement funeral service contract and accepting
moneys therefore ((shall)) must establish and maintain one or more
prearrangement funeral service trusts under Washington state law with
two or more designated trustees, for the benefit of the beneficiary of
the prearrangement funeral service contract. Funeral establishments
may join with one or more other Washington state licensed funeral
establishments in a "master trust" provided that each member of the
"master trust" ((shall comply)) complies individually with the
requirements of this chapter.
(2) Up to ten percent of the cash purchase price of each
prearrangement funeral service contract, excluding sales tax, may be
retained by the funeral establishment unless otherwise provided in this
chapter. If the prearrangement funeral service contract is canceled
within thirty calendar days of its signing, then the purchaser
((shall)) must receive a full refund of all moneys paid under the
contract.
(3) At least ninety percent of the cash purchase price of each
prearrangement funeral service contract, paid in advance, excluding
sales tax, shall be placed in the trust established or utilized by the
funeral establishment. Deposits to the prearrangement funeral service
trust ((shall)) must be made not later than the twentieth day of the
month following receipt of each payment made on the last ninety percent
of each prearrangement funeral service contract, excluding sales tax.
(4) All prearrangement funeral service trust moneys ((shall)) must
be deposited in an insured account in a public depositary or shall be
invested in ((instruments issued or insured by any agency of the
federal government. The account or investments shall be designated as
the prearrangement funeral service trust of the funeral establishment
for the benefit of the beneficiaries named in the prearrangement
funeral service contracts. The prearrangement funeral service trust
shall not be considered as, or used as, an asset of the funeral
establishment)) accordance with the provisions of RCW 11.100.020
subject to the following restrictions:
(a) No officer or director of the funeral authority, trustee of the
prearrangement trust funds, or spouse, sibling, parent, grandparent, or
issue of such officer, director, or trustee, may borrow any of such
funds for himself or herself, directly or indirectly;
(b) No funds may be loaned to the funeral authority, its agents, or
employees, or to any corporation, partnership, or other business entity
in which the funeral authority has any ownership interest;
(c) No funds may be invested with persons or business entities
operating in a business field directly related to funeral homes; and
(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this section,
funds may be invested in any commercial bank, mutual savings bank, or
savings and loan association duly chartered and operating under the
laws of the United States or statutes of the state of Washington.
(5) After deduction of reasonable fees for the administration of
the trust, taxes paid or withheld, or other expenses of the trust, all
interest, dividends, or growth earned by a trust ((shall)) become a
part of the trust. Adequate records ((shall)) must be maintained to
allocate the share of principal and interest to each contract. Fees
deducted for the administration of the trust ((shall)) may not exceed
one percent per year of the amount in trust. In no instance ((shall))
may the administrative charges deducted from the prearrangement funeral
service trust reduce, diminish, or in any other way lessen the value of
the trust so that the services or merchandise provided for under the
contract are reduced, diminished, or in any other way lessened.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the trustees of
a prearrangement funeral service trust ((shall)) must permit withdrawal
of all funds deposited under a prearrangement funeral service contract,
plus accruals thereon, under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If the funeral establishment files a verified statement with
the trustees that the prearrangement funeral merchandise and services
covered by the contract have been furnished and delivered in accordance
therewith; or
(b) If the funeral establishment files a verified statement with
the trustees that the prearrangement funeral merchandise and services
covered by the contract have been canceled in accordance with its
terms.
(7) Subsequent to the thirty calendar day cancellation period
provided for in this chapter, any purchaser or beneficiary who has a
revocable prearrangement funeral service contract has the right to
demand a refund of the amount in trust.
(8) Prearrangement funeral service contracts which have or should
have an account in a prearrangement funeral service trust may be
terminated by the board if the funeral establishment goes out of
business, becomes insolvent or bankrupt, makes an assignment for the
benefit of creditors, has its prearrangement funeral service
certificate of registration revoked, or for any other reason is unable
to fulfill the obligations under the contract. In such event, or upon
demand by the purchaser or beneficiary of the prearrangement funeral
service contract, the funeral establishment ((shall)) must refund to
the purchaser or beneficiary all moneys deposited in the trust and
allocated to the contract unless otherwise ordered by a court of
competent jurisdiction. The purchaser or beneficiary may, in lieu of
a refund, elect to transfer the prearrangement funeral service contract
and all amounts in trust to another funeral establishment licensed
under this chapter which will agree, by endorsement to the contract, to
be bound by the contract and to provide the funeral merchandise or
services. Election of this option ((shall)) does not relieve the
defaulting funeral establishment of its obligation to the purchaser or
beneficiary for any amounts required to be, but not placed, in trust.
(9) Prior to the sale or transfer of ownership or control of any
funeral establishment which has contracted for prearrangement funeral
service contracts, any person, corporation, or other legal entity
desiring to acquire such ownership or control ((shall)) must apply to
the director in accordance with RCW 18.39.145. Persons and business
entities selling or relinquishing, and persons and business entities
purchasing or acquiring ownership or control of such funeral
establishments ((shall)) must each verify and attest to a report
showing the status of the prearrangement funeral service trust or
trusts on the date of the sale. This report ((shall)) must be on a
form prescribed by the board and shall be considered part of the
application for a funeral establishment license. In the event of
failure to comply with this subsection, the funeral establishment
((shall be)) is deemed to have gone out of business and the provisions
of subsection (8) of this section ((shall)) apply.
(10) Prearrangement funeral service trust moneys ((shall)) may not
be used, directly or indirectly, for the benefit of the funeral
establishment or any director, officer, agent, or employee of the
funeral establishment including, but not limited to, any encumbrance,
pledge, or other use of prearrangement funeral service trust moneys as
collateral or other security.
(11)(a) If, at the time of the signing of the prearrangement
funeral service contract, the beneficiary of the trust is a recipient
of public assistance as defined in RCW 74.04.005, or reasonably
anticipates being so defined, the contract may provide that the trust
will be irrevocable. If after the contract is entered into, the
beneficiary becomes eligible or seeks to become eligible for public
assistance under Title 74 RCW, the contract may provide for an election
by the beneficiary, or by the purchaser on behalf of the beneficiary,
to make the trust irrevocable thereafter in order to become or remain
eligible for such assistance.
(b) The department of social and health services ((shall)) must
notify the trustee of any prearrangement service trust that the
department has a claim on the estate of a beneficiary for long-term
care services. Such notice ((shall)) must be renewed at least every
three years. The trustees upon becoming aware of the death of a
beneficiary ((shall)) must give notice to the department of social and
health services, office of financial recovery, who shall file any claim
there may be within thirty days of the notice.
(12) Every prearrangement funeral service contract financed through
a prearrangement funeral service trust ((shall)) must contain language
which:
(a) Informs the purchaser of the prearrangement funeral service
trust and the amount to be deposited in the trust;
(b) Indicates if the contract is revocable or not in accordance
with subsection (11) of this section;
(c) Specifies that a full refund of all moneys paid on the contract
will be made if the contract is canceled within thirty calendar days of
its signing;
(d) Specifies that, in the case of cancellation by a purchaser or
beneficiary eligible to cancel under the contract or under this
chapter, up to ten percent of the contract amount may be retained by
the seller to cover the necessary expenses of selling and setting up
the contract;
(e) Identifies the trust to be used and contains information as to
how the trustees may be contacted.

--- END ---