BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.01.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 449 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under their contract of employment with the state government to not
less than one working day of vacation leave with full pay for each
month of employment if said employment is continuous for six months.
Each such subordinate officer and employee shall be entitled under
such contract of employment to not less than one additional working day
of vacation with full pay each year for satisfactorily completing the
first two, three, and five continuous years of employment respectively.
To the extent that rates of vacation leave accrual are based upon
total state employment, each contract year or equivalent of full-time
employment in a certificated or classified position with a school
district within the state shall be credited to the state officer or
employee as one year of qualifying service. Qualifying employment with
a school district shall be applied to leave accrual rates effective
July 1, 2012.
Such part time officers or employees of the state government who
are employed on a regular schedule of duration of not less than one
year shall be entitled under their contract of employment to that
fractional part of the vacation leave that the total number of hours of
such employment bears to the total number of hours of full time
employment.
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under his or her contract of employment with the state government to
accrue unused vacation leave not to exceed thirty working days.
Officers and employees transferring within the several offices,
departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
to transfer such accrued vacation leave to each succeeding state
office, department, or institution. All vacation leave shall be taken
at the time convenient to the employing office, department, or
institution: PROVIDED, That if a subordinate officer's or employee's
request for vacation leave is deferred by reason of the convenience of
the employing office, department, or institution, and a statement of
the necessity therefor is retained by the agency, then the aforesaid
maximum thirty working days of accrued unused vacation leave shall be
extended for each month said leave is so deferred.

--- END ---