BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.060 and 2006 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any mobile home space tenancy regardless of the term, shall be
based upon a written rental agreement, signed by the parties, which
shall contain:
(a) The terms for the payment of rent, including time and place,
and any additional charges to be paid by the tenant. Additional
charges that occur less frequently than monthly shall be itemized in a
billing to the tenant;
(b) Reasonable rules for guest parking which shall be clearly
stated;
(c) The rules and regulations of the park;
(d) The name and address of the person who is the landlord, and if
such person does not reside in the state there shall also be designated
by name and address a person who resides in the county where the mobile
home park is located who is authorized to act as agent for the purposes
of service of notices and process. If no designation is made of a
person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to
be made shall be considered the agent;
(e) The name and address of any party who has a secured interest in
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(f) A forwarding address of the tenant or the name and address of
a person who would likely know the whereabouts of the tenant in the
event of an emergency or an abandonment of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model;
(g)(i) A covenant by the landlord that, except for acts or events
beyond the control of the landlord, the mobile home park will not be
converted to a land use that will prevent the space that is the subject
of the lease from continuing to be used for its intended use for a
period of three years after the beginning of the term of the rental
agreement;
(ii) A rental agreement may, in the alternative, contain a
statement that: "The park may be sold or otherwise transferred at any
time with the result that subsequent owners may close the mobile home
park, or that the landlord may close the park at any time after the
required notice." The covenant or statement required by this
subsection must: (A) Appear in print that is in bold face and is
larger than the other text of the rental agreement; (B) be set off by
means of a box, blank space, or comparable visual device; and (C) be
located directly above the tenant's signature on the rental agreement.
(h) The terms and conditions under which any deposit or portion
thereof may be withheld by the landlord upon termination of the rental
agreement if any moneys are paid to the landlord by the tenant as a
deposit or as security for performance of the tenant's obligations in
a rental agreement;
(i) A listing of the utilities, services, and facilities which will
be available to the tenant during the tenancy and the nature of the
fees, if any, to be charged;
(j) A written description, picture, plan, or map of the boundaries
of a mobile home space sufficient to inform the tenant of the exact
location of the tenant's space in relation to other tenants' spaces;
(k) A written description, picture, plan, or map of the location of
the tenant's responsibility for utility hook-ups, consistent with RCW
59.20.130(6);
(l) A statement of the current zoning of the land on which the
mobile home park is located; and
(((l))) (m) A statement of the expiration date of any conditional
use, temporary use, or other land use permit subject to a fixed
expiration date that is necessary for the continued use of the land as
a mobile home park.
(2) Any rental agreement executed between the landlord and tenant
shall not contain any provision:
(a) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guest parking
unless a violation of the rules for guest parking occurs: PROVIDED,
That a fee may be charged for guest parking which covers an extended
period of time as defined in the rental agreement;
(b) Which authorizes the towing or impounding of a vehicle except
upon notice to the owner thereof or the tenant whose guest is the owner
of the vehicle;
(c) Which allows the landlord to alter the due date for rent
payment or increase the rent: (i) During the term of the rental
agreement if the term is less than one year, or (ii) more frequently
than annually if the term is for one year or more: PROVIDED, That a
rental agreement may include an escalation clause for a pro rata share
of any increase in the mobile home park's real property taxes or
utility assessments or charges, over the base taxes or utility
assessments or charges of the year in which the rental agreement took
effect, if the clause also provides for a pro rata reduction in rent or
other charges in the event of a reduction in real property taxes or
utility assessments or charges, below the base year: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That a rental agreement for a term exceeding one year may provide for
annual increases in rent in specified amounts or by a formula specified
in such agreement;
(d) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego rights or
remedies under this chapter;
(e) Allowing the landlord to charge an "entrance fee" or an "exit
fee." However, an entrance fee may be charged as part of a continuing
care contract as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(f) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guests:
PROVIDED, That a landlord may establish rules charging for guests who
remain on the premises for more than fifteen days in any sixty-day
period;
(g) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego homestead rights
provided by chapter 6.13 RCW. This subsection shall not prohibit such
waiver after a default in rent so long as such waiver is in writing
signed by the husband and wife or by an unmarried claimant and in
consideration of the landlord's agreement not to terminate the tenancy
for a period of time specified in the waiver if the landlord would be
otherwise entitled to terminate the tenancy under this chapter; or
(h) By which, at the time the rental agreement is entered into, the
landlord and tenant agree to the selection of a particular arbitrator.
(3) Any provision prohibited under this section that is included in
a rental agreement is unenforceable.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.070 and 2003 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A landlord shall not:
(1) Deny any tenant the right to sell such tenant's mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model within a park, or prohibit, in any
manner, any tenant from posting on the tenant's manufactured/mobile
home or park model, or on the rented mobile home lot, a commercially
reasonable "for sale" sign or any similar sign designed to advertise
the sale of the manufactured/mobile home or park model. In addition,
a landlord shall not require the removal of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model from the park because of the sale
thereof. Requirements for the transfer of the rental agreement are in
RCW 59.20.073. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a landlord from
enforcing reasonable rules or restrictions regarding the placement of
"for sale" signs on the tenant's manufactured/mobile home or park
model, or on the rented mobile home lot, if (a) the main purpose of the
rules or restrictions is to protect the safety of park tenants or
residents and (b) the rules or restrictions comply with RCW 59.20.045.
The landlord may restrict the number of "for sale" signs on the lot to
two and may restrict the size of the signs to conform to those in
common use by home sale businesses;
(2) Restrict the tenant's freedom of choice in purchasing goods or
services but may reserve the right to approve or disapprove any
exterior structural improvements on a mobile home space: PROVIDED,
That door-to-door solicitation in the mobile home park may be
restricted in the rental agreement. Door-to-door solicitation does not
include public officials or candidates for public office meeting or
distributing information to tenants in accordance with subsection (3)
or (4) of this section;
(3) Prohibit the distribution of information or meetings by tenants
of the mobile home park to discuss mobile home living and affairs,
including political caucuses or forums for or speeches of public
officials or candidates for public office, or meetings of organizations
that represent the interest of tenants in the park, held in a tenant's
home or any of the park community or recreation halls if these halls
are open for the use of the tenants, conducted at reasonable times and
in an orderly manner on the premises, nor penalize any tenant for
participation in such activities;
(4) Prohibit a public official or candidate for public office from
meeting with or distributing information to tenants in their individual
mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models, nor penalize any
tenant for participating in these meetings or receiving this
information;
(5) Evict a tenant, terminate a rental agreement, decline to renew
a rental agreement, increase rental or other tenant obligations,
decrease services, or modify park rules in retaliation for any of the
following actions on the part of a tenant taken in good faith:
(a) Filing a complaint with any federal, state, county, or
municipal governmental authority relating to any alleged violation by
the landlord of an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance;
(b) Requesting the landlord to comply with the provision of this
chapter or other applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance of the
state, county, or municipality;
(c) Filing suit against the landlord for any reason;
(d) Participation or membership in any homeowners association or
group;
(6) Charge to any tenant a utility fee in excess of actual utility
costs or intentionally cause termination or interruption of any
tenant's utility services, including water, heat, electricity, or gas,
except when an interruption of a reasonable duration is required to
make necessary repairs;
(7) Remove or exclude a tenant from the premises unless this
chapter is complied with or the exclusion or removal is under an
appropriate court order; or
(8) Prevent the entry or require the removal of a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model for the sole reason that the mobile
home has reached a certain age. Nothing in this subsection shall limit
a landlords' right to exclude or expel a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model for any other reason, including but not limited to,
failure to comply with fire, safety, and other provisions of local
ordinances and state laws relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes,
and park models, as long as the action conforms to this chapter or any
other relevant statutory provision.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.20.073 and 2003 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any rental agreement shall be assignable by the tenant to any
person to whom he or she sells or transfers title to the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model.
(2) A tenant who sells a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model within a park shall notify the landlord in writing of the date of
the intended sale and transfer of the rental agreement at least fifteen
days in advance of such intended transfer and shall notify the buyer in
writing of the provisions of this section. The tenant shall verify in
writing to the landlord payment of all taxes, rent, and reasonable
expenses due on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and
mobile home lot. The tenant shall notify the buyer of all taxes, rent,
and reasonable expenses due on the manufactured/mobile home or park
model and the mobile home lot.
(3) The landlord shall notify the selling tenant, in writing, of a
refusal to permit transfer of the rental agreement at least seven days
in advance of such intended transfer.
(4) The landlord may require the mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model to meet applicable fire and safety standards if a state or
local agency responsible for the enforcement of fire and safety
standards has issued a notice of violation of those standards to the
tenant and those violations remain uncorrected. Upon correction of the
violation to the satisfaction of the state or local agency responsible
for the enforcement of that notice of violation, the landlord's refusal
to permit the transfer is deemed withdrawn.
(5) The landlord shall approve or disapprove of the assignment of
a rental agreement on the same basis that the landlord approves or
disapproves of any new tenant, and any disapproval shall be in writing.
Consent to an assignment shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(6) Failure to notify the landlord in writing, as required under
subsection (2) of this section; or failure of the new tenant to make a
good faith attempt to arrange an interview with the landlord to discuss
assignment of the rental agreement; or failure of the current or new
tenant to obtain written approval of the landlord for assignment of the
rental agreement, shall be grounds for disapproval of such transfer.

Sec. 4 RCW 59.20.080 and 2003 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a
tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for
one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations, of
((the)) an enforceable rule((s)) of the mobile home park as established
by the landlord at the inception of the tenancy or as assumed
subsequently with the consent of the tenant or for violation of the
tenant's duties as provided in RCW 59.20.140. The tenant shall be
given written notice to cease the rule violation immediately. The
notice shall state that failure to cease the violation of the rule or
any subsequent violation of that or any other rule shall result in
termination of the tenancy, and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That for a periodic violation
the notice shall also specify that repetition of the same violation
shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the case of a
violation of a "material change" in park rules with respect to pets,
tenants with minor children living with them, or recreational
facilities, the tenant shall be given written notice under this chapter
of a six month period in which to comply or vacate;
(b) Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental
agreement, upon five days written notice to pay rent and/or other
charges or to vacate;
(c) Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which
threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park
tenants. The tenant shall be given written notice of a fifteen day
period in which to vacate;
(d) Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state
laws and regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park models or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living
within a reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such
noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency;
(e) Change of land use of the mobile home park including, but not
limited to, conversion to a use other than for mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models or conversion of the mobile home
park to a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park
subdivision((: PROVIDED, That)). The landlord shall give the tenants
twelve months' notice in advance of the effective date of such
change((, except that for the period of six months following April 28,
1989, the landlord shall give the tenants eighteen months' notice in
advance of the proposed effective date of such change));
(f) Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a
criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a
tenant or occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of
a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a
criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal
activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for
an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of
illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and
is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that
any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130
is grounds for eviction of the sex offender under this subsection. If
criminal activity is alleged to be a basis of termination, the park
owner may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action;
(g) The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material
misstatement that induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a
resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and acts upon the
misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying
rent;
(h) If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices
within a twelve-month period to comply or vacate for failure to comply
with the material terms of the rental agreement or an enforceable park
rule((s)). The applicable twelve-month period shall commence on the
date of the first violation;
(i) Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon
tenants by applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, including this chapter. The
landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately.
The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within
fifteen days;
(j) The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying
conduct upon the park premises that results in the destruction of the
rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises.
The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply
immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days;
(k) The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to cease the conduct that
constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must describe the
nuisance and state (i) what the tenant must do to cease the nuisance
and (ii) that failure to cease the conduct will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises in five
days;
(l) Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice
must describe the harm caused by the tenant, describe what the tenant
must do to comply and to discontinue the harm, and state that failure
to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant
shall vacate the premises within fifteen days; or
(m) Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental
agreement three or more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with
the date of the first violation, after service of a five-day notice to
comply or vacate.
(2) Within five days of a notice of eviction as required by
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the landlord and tenant shall submit
any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree in writing to
mediation by an independent third party or through industry mediation
procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation shall be
through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon both
parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for a
period of ten days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this
section. It is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section that a landlord did not participate in the mediation
process in good faith.
(3) Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of
recreational vehicles, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home
parks. This chapter governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, park models, and recreational vehicles used as a primary
residence from a mobile home park.

Sec. 5 RCW 59.20.200 and 1984 c 58 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If at any time during the tenancy the landlord fails to carry out
the duties required by RCW 59.20.130, the tenant may, in addition to
pursuit of remedies otherwise provided the tenant by law, deliver
written notice to the landlord, which notice shall specify the property
involved, the name of the owner, if known, and the nature of the
defective condition. For the purposes of this chapter, a reasonable
time for the landlord to commence remedial action after receipt of such
notice by the tenant shall be, except where circumstances are beyond
the landlord's control;
(1) Not more than twenty-four hours, where the defective condition
is imminently hazardous to life;
(2) Not more than forty-eight hours, where the landlord fails to
provide water ((or heat)), electricity, or sewer or septic service to
the extent required under RCW 59.20.130(6);
(3) Subject to the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, not more than seven days in the case of a repair under RCW
59.20.130(3);
(4) Not more than thirty days in all other cases.
In each instance the burden shall be on the landlord to see that
remedial work under this section is completed with reasonable
promptness.
Where circumstances beyond the landlord's control, including the
availability of financing, prevent the landlord from complying with the
time limitations set forth in this section, the landlord shall endeavor
to remedy the defective condition with all reasonable speed.

Sec. 6 RCW 59.30.020 and 2011 c 298 s 30 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Complainant" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant, who
has a complaint alleging a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Director" means the director of revenue.
(4) "Landlord" or "community owner" means the owner of a mobile
home park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents
of a landlord.
(5) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built
according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater.
(6) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or
a mobile home.
(7) "Manufactured/mobile home lot" means a portion of a
manufactured/mobile home community designated as the location of one
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory
buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by
the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model.
(8) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to
June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of
housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the
introduction of the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety act.
(9) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community," or
"manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property that is
rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more
mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models, ((or recreational
vehicles)) for the primary purpose of production of income, except
where the real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal
recreational purposes only and is not ((used)) intended for year-round
occupancy.
(10) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property.
(11) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semipermanent installation and is used as a ((permanent))
primary residence.
(12) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a
((permanent)) primary residence ((located in a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community)), and is not immobilized or permanently
affixed to a manufactured/mobile home lot.
(13) "Respondent" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant,
alleged to have committed a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(14) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, who rents a mobile home lot.

--- END ---