BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the uniform interstate depositions and discovery act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Foreign jurisdiction" means a state other than Washington
state.
(2) "Foreign subpoena" means a subpoena issued under authority of
a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction.
(3) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental
subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(4) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally
recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject
to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(5) "Subpoena" means a document, however denominated, issued under
authority of a court of record requiring a person to:
(a) Attend and give testimony at a deposition;
(b) Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books,
documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible
things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or
(c) Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ISSUANCE OF SUBPOENA. (1) To request
issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party must submit a
foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the county in which discovery
is sought to be conducted in this state. A request for the issuance of
a subpoena under this chapter does not constitute an appearance in the
courts of Washington state.
(2) When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in
this state, the clerk, in accordance with that court's procedure, shall
promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to which the
foreign subpoena is directed.
(3) A subpoena under subsection (2) of this section must:
(a) Incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena; and
(b) Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and
telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which
the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 SERVICE OF SUBPOENA. A subpoena issued by
a clerk of court under section 3 of this act must be served in
compliance with superior court civil rule (CR) 45.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 DEPOSITION, PRODUCTION, AND INSPECTION.
Superior court civil rules (CR) 26 through 37 apply to subpoenas issued
under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 APPLICATION TO COURT. An application to the
court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena
issued by a clerk of court under section 3 of this act must comply with
the rules or statutes of Washington state and be submitted to the court
in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.
In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to
the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPLICATION TO PENDING ACTIONS. This
chapter applies to requests for discovery in cases pending on the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 5 RCW.

--- END ---