BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
woman's right to know act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) Women and girls often obtain abortions without a full
understanding of the potential physical and mental health consequences
to themselves and the unborn baby they are carrying.
(2) It is essential to the psychological and physical well-being of
a woman considering an abortion that she receive complete and accurate
information on her alternatives.
(3) The knowledgeable exercise of a woman's decision to have an
abortion depends on the extent to which the woman receives sufficient
information to make an informed choice between two alternatives:
Giving birth or having an abortion.
(4) The United States supreme court has recognized that the
decision to abort "...is an important, and often a stressful one, and
it is desirable and imperative that it be made with full knowledge of
its nature and consequences" (Planned Parenthood v. Danforth, 428 U.S.
52, 67 (1976)) and that "The medical, emotional, and psychological
consequences of an abortion are serious and can be lasting..." (H.L.
v. Matheson, 450 U.S. 398, 411 (1981)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No abortion shall be performed except with the voluntary and
informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be
performed. Except in the case of a medical emergency requiring the
immediate termination of a pregnancy to avert death or substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function, consent to an
abortion is voluntary and informed if and only if:
(a) At least twenty-four hours before the abortion, the physician
who is to perform the abortion, or the referring physician, has orally
and in person informed the woman of:
(i) The name of the physician who will perform the abortion;
(ii) Medically accurate information that a reasonable person would
consider material to the decision of whether or not to undergo the
abortion, including (A) a description of the proposed abortion
procedure, (B) the immediate and long-term medical risks associated
with the proposed abortion method, and (C) alternatives to the
abortion;
(iii) The probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time
the abortion is to be performed, the probable anatomical and
physiological characteristics of the unborn child at the time the
abortion is to be performed, and that the abortion will end the life of
the unborn child; and
(iv) The probable medical risks associated with carrying her unborn
child to term;
(b) At least twenty-four hours before the abortion, the physician
who is to perform the abortion, or the referring physician, has orally
and in person informed the pregnant woman that:
(i) There are printed materials and an informational video
available published by the department of health that describe abortion
procedures, that describe the unborn child at various stages from
conception to natural birth and that list agencies that provide
alternatives to abortion, that she has a right to review the printed
materials and informational video, and that a copy of the printed
materials and informational video will be provided to her free of
charge if she chooses to review them;
(ii) Medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal
care, childbirth, and neonatal care, and that more detailed information
on the availability of such assistance is contained in the printed
materials and informational video provided her as published by the
department of health;
(iii) The father of the unborn child is liable to assist in the
support of her child, even in instances where he has offered to pay for
the abortion. In the case of rape, this information may be omitted;
and
(iv) The pregnant woman must certify in writing, before the
abortion can be performed, that the information required to be provided
under this section was provided to her, that she did or did not review
the printed materials or informational video, and that she understands
what an abortion is and the medical risks associated with the abortion,
or, in the event of a medical emergency requiring the immediate
termination of a pregnancy to avert death or to avert substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function, the physician
performing the abortion provides the woman with a certification signed
by the performing physician that describes the nature of the medical
emergency and the circumstances that necessitated the waiving of the
informed consent requirements of this section.
(2) A physician shall not require or obtain a payment, in full or
in part, until the twenty-four hour reflection period under this
section has expired.
(3) Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, the
department of health shall cause to be printed materials and an
informational video in English and Spanish that is easily
comprehensible at a sixth grade level and that describes the anatomical
and physiological characteristics of an unborn child at various stages
from conception to natural birth, describes the various methods of
abortion used to terminate the life of an unborn child, lists
alternatives to abortion, and provides a comprehensive list of the
addresses and phone numbers of agencies that offer alternatives to
abortion and services to assist a woman through pregnancy, upon
childbirth, and while the child is dependent, including but not limited
to adoption agencies. The video shall, in addition to the information
described in this section, show an ultrasound of the heartbeat of an
unborn child at four to five weeks gestational age, at six to eight
weeks gestational age, and each month thereafter until viability.
Abortion providers shall purchase copies of the printed materials and
informational video published by the department of health at cost.
Copies of the printed materials and informational video published by
the department of health shall be available in appropriate numbers for
free to others upon request.
(4) Any physician who violates the provisions of this section is
guilty of unprofessional conduct and his or her license for the
practice of medicine and surgery shall be subject to suspension or
revocation.
(5) Any physician who performs an abortion without first obtaining
the certification required by subsection (1)(b)(iv) of this section or
with knowledge or reason to know that the informed consent of the woman
has not been obtained is for the first offense guilty of a misdemeanor
and for each subsequent offense is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. No
physician is guilty of violating this section for failure to furnish
the information required by subsection (1)(b)(iv) of this section if he
or she can demonstrate, by a preponderance of the evidence, that he or
she reasonably believed that furnishing the information would have
resulted in a severely adverse effect on the physical or mental health
of the patient.
(6) Any physician who complies with the provisions of this section
may not be held civilly liable to his or her patient or the patient's
representative for failure to obtain informed consent to the abortion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---