BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that cities are
the engines of our state's economic growth and that the prospects for
the state's economic recovery will be enhanced by removing delay and
uncertainty in the development permit review process.
The legislature affirms the growth management act direction in RCW
36.70A.210(1) that cities are to be the primary providers of urban
governmental services within urban growth areas and that applications
for development permits in urban growth areas are to be processed in a
timely, fair, and predictable manner consistent with RCW 36.70A.020(7).
The legislature intends that certain cities in high growth counties
consider assigning certain quasi-judicial permit applications and
appeals of administrative decisions to professional hearing examiners.
The legislature finds that qualified and independent hearing examiners
provide for a more timely, fair, and predictable permit process and
finds that increased use of hearing examiners as quasi-judicial and
appellate decision makers will decrease a city's financial risk and
increase the ability of its council to keep local comprehensive plans
and development regulations up-to-date. The legislature also concludes
that the effectiveness of the hearing examiner system should be
strengthened by statutory amendments to enhance public faith in the
accessibility, transparency, objectivity, and professionalism of the
system.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995 c 347 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Not later than March 31, 1996, each local government planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by ordinance or resolution an
integrated and consolidated project permit process that may be included
in its development regulations. In addition to the elements required
by RCW 36.70B.050, the process shall include the following elements:
(((1))) (a) A determination of completeness to the applicant as
required by RCW 36.70B.070;
(((2))) (b) A notice of application to the public and agencies with
jurisdiction as required by RCW 36.70B.110;
(((3))) (c) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional
consolidated project permit review process as provided in RCW
36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than one
consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal. If an
open record predecision hearing is provided prior to the decision on a
project permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open record
appeal hearing;
(((4))) (d) Provision allowing for any public meeting or required
open record hearing to be combined with any public meeting or open
record hearing that may be held on the project by another local, state,
regional, federal, or other agency, in accordance with provisions of
RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;
(((5))) (e) A single report stating all the decisions made as of
the date of the report on all project permits included in the
consolidated permit process that do not require an open record
predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits that do
not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state
any mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations
or the agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the
local permit. If a threshold determination other than a determination
of significance has not been issued previously by the local government,
the report shall include or append this determination;
(((6))) (f) Except for the appeal of a determination of
significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a local government
elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or project
permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local
government need not provide for any further appeal and may provide an
appeal for some but not all project permit decisions. If an appeal is
provided after the open record hearing, it shall be a closed record
appeal before a single decision-making body or officer;
(((7))) (g) A notice of decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and
issued within the time period provided in RCW 36.70B.080 ((and
36.70B.090));
(((8))) (h) Completion of project review by the local government,
including environmental review and public review and any appeals to the
local government, within any applicable time periods ((under RCW
36.70B.090)); and
(((9))) (i) Any other provisions not inconsistent with the
requirements of this chapter or chapter 43.21C RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, not later than
April 30, 2013, each city with ten thousand or more residents that is
located within a county subject to RCW 36.70A.215 shall adopt an
ordinance requiring all project permits, administrative appeals of
project permit decisions, and environmental appeals that require an
open record hearing to be decided by a hearing examiner authorized by
RCW 35.63.130, 35A.63.170, 36.70.970, or 58.17.330. The requirements
of this subsection (2)(a) do not apply to project permits excluded from
review under RCW 36.70B.140.
(b) A city that adopts the ordinance required by (a) of this
subsection:
(i) May require the applicant for a project permit, or the
appellant of a project permit decision who is not an applicant, to
reimburse the city for the costs of using the hearing examiner,
including hearing examiner time, associated administrative and staff
costs, and required notice costs. Failure by an appellant to pay fees,
costs, or reimbursements authorized by this subsection must result in
a default judgment against the appeal; and
(ii) May provide that an appeal of an administrative decision heard
and decided by a hearing examiner apply the clearly erroneous standard
of review.
(c) After March 31, 2013, a city otherwise subject to the
requirements of (a) of this subsection may choose to exempt itself from
those requirements through the adoption of an applicable motion,
resolution, or ordinance. A decision to exempt itself from the
requirements of (a) of this subsection may be taken at a city's sole
discretion and does not constitute a cause for action, appeal, or
petition for review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An ordinance establishing a hearing examiner system shall
specify the qualifications for hearing examiners and the terms and
conditions under which they shall serve. A hearing examiner must have
the necessary training and experience to qualify them to conduct
hearings and make decisions and recommendations for the matters
assigned to the hearing examiner.
(2) A hearing examiner must be impartial and independent from the
officials and departments who provide recommendations or whose
decisions may be appealed to the hearing examiner. If a hearing
examiner is a local government employee, he or she must be in a
different department from the officials and departments who provide
them with recommendations or from whom they hear appeals. If a hearing
examiner contracts with a local government, the contract must assure
independence and impartiality. The hearing examiner shall be paid for
sufficient time to make an informed, accurate, and comprehensive
decision.
(3) A hearing examiner shall avoid conflicts of interest and ex
parte communications, and shall adhere to the appearance of fairness
doctrine as provided by law and local ordinance.
(4) The ordinance establishing a hearing examiner system shall
authorize the hearing examiner to recuse himself or herself in any
matter and establish a process to appoint or assign another hearing
examiner to handle the matter.
(5) The ordinance establishing a hearing examiner system shall
establish rules of practice and procedure before the examiner and
require that the rules be posted on the city's official web site.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.63.130 and 1995 c 347 s 423 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and report on
any proposal to amend a zoning ordinance, the legislative body of a
city or county may, in accordance with section 3 of this act, adopt a
hearing examiner system under which a hearing examiner or hearing
examiners may hear and decide applications for amending the zoning
ordinance when the amendment which is applied for is not of general
applicability. In addition, the legislative body may vest in a hearing
examiner the power to hear and decide those issues it believes should
be reviewed and decided by a hearing examiner, including but not
limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, subdivisions,
shoreline permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining
to development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative body shall prescribe procedures to be followed by
the hearing examiner.
(2) Each city or county legislative body electing to use a hearing
examiner pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal
effect of the decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such
decisions may vary for the different classes of applications decided by
the examiner but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative body.
(3)(a) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in
writing and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the
record, to support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall
also set forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and
conform to the city's or county's comprehensive plan and the city's or
county's development regulations. Each final decision of a hearing
examiner, unless a longer period is mutually agreed to in writing by
the applicant and the hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten
working days following conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
(b) The hearing examiner of a city subject to RCW 36.70B.060(2) may
delay issuance of a decision beyond the ten-day period required by this
subsection (3) until the city or county has been reimbursed. The delay
authorized by this subsection may only occur if the hearing examiner
has certified the examiner's costs to the city or county and the city
or county has, within the ten-day period, billed the applicant or
appellant for those costs. Failure by an appellant to pay fees, costs,
or reimbursements authorized by RCW 36.70B.060(2)(b) must result in a
default judgment against the appeal.

Sec. 5 RCW 35A.63.170 and 1995 c 347 s 424 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and report on
any proposal to amend a zoning ordinance, the legislative body of a
city may, in accordance with section 3 of this act, adopt a hearing
examiner system under which a hearing examiner or hearing examiners may
hear and decide applications for amending the zoning ordinance when the
amendment which is applied for is not of general applicability. In
addition, the legislative body may vest in a hearing examiner the power
to hear and decide those issues it believes should be reviewed and
decided by a hearing examiner, including but not limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, subdivisions,
shoreline permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining
to development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative body shall prescribe procedures to be followed by
a hearing examiner. If the legislative authority vests in a hearing
examiner the authority to hear and decide variances, then the
provisions of RCW 35A.63.110 shall not apply to the city.
(2) Each city legislative body electing to use a hearing examiner
pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal effect of
the decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such decisions
may vary for the different classes of applications decided by the
examiner but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative body.
(3)(a) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in
writing and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the
record, to support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall
also set forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and
conform to the city's comprehensive plan and the city's development
regulations. Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a
longer period is mutually agreed to in writing by the applicant and the
hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
(b) The hearing examiner of a city subject to RCW 36.70B.060(2) may
delay issuance of a decision beyond the ten-day period required by this
subsection (3) until the city has been reimbursed. The delay
authorized by this subsection may only occur if the hearing examiner
has certified the examiner's costs to the city and the city has, within
the ten-day period, billed the applicant or appellant for those costs.
Failure by an appellant to pay fees, costs, or reimbursements
authorized by RCW 36.70B.060(2)(b) must result in a default judgment
against the appeal.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70.970 and 1995 c 347 s 425 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and issue
recommendations on applications for plat approval and applications for
amendments to the zoning ordinance, the county legislative authority
may, in accordance with section 3 of this act, adopt a hearing examiner
system under which a hearing examiner or hearing examiners may hear and
issue decisions on proposals for plat approval and for amendments to
the zoning ordinance when the amendment which is applied for is not of
general applicability. In addition, the legislative authority may vest
in a hearing examiner the power to hear and decide those issues it
believes should be reviewed and decided by a hearing examiner,
including but not limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, shoreline
permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining to
development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed
by a hearing examiner.
Any county which vests in a hearing examiner the authority to hear
and decide conditional uses and variances shall not be required to have
a zoning adjuster or board of adjustment.
(2) Each county legislative authority electing to use a hearing
examiner pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal
effect of the decisions made by the examiner. Such legal effect may
vary for the different classes of applications decided by the examiner
but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative authority;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
authority; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative authority.
(3)(a) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in
writing and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the
record, to support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall
also set forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and
conform to the county's comprehensive plan and the county's development
regulations. Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a
longer period is mutually agreed to in writing by the applicant and the
hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
(b) The hearing examiner of a city subject to RCW 36.70B.060(2) may
delay issuance of a decision beyond the ten-day period required by this
subsection (3) until the county has been reimbursed. The delay
authorized by this subsection may only occur if the hearing examiner
has certified the examiner's costs to the county and the county has,
within the ten-day period, billed the applicant or appellant for those
costs. Failure by an appellant to pay fees, costs, or reimbursements
authorized by RCW 36.70B.060(2)(b) must result in a default judgment
against the appeal.

Sec. 7 RCW 58.17.330 and 1995 c 347 s 429 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter requiring
a planning commission to hear and issue recommendations for plat
approval, the county or city legislative body may, in accordance with
section 3 of this act, adopt a hearing examiner system and shall
specify by ordinance the legal effect of the decisions made by the
examiner. The legal effect of such decisions shall include one of the
following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) The decision may be given the effect of a final decision of the
legislative body.
The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed
by a hearing examiner.
(2)(a) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in
writing and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the
record, to support the decision. Each final decision of a hearing
examiner, unless a longer period is mutually agreed to by the applicant
and the hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days
following conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
(b) The hearing examiner of a city subject to RCW 36.70B.060(2) may
delay issuance of a decision beyond the ten-day period required by this
subsection (2) until the city or county has been reimbursed. The delay
authorized by this subsection may only occur if the hearing examiner
has certified the examiner's costs to the city or county and the city
or county has, within the ten-day period, billed the applicant or
appellant for those costs. Failure by an appellant to pay fees, costs,
or reimbursements authorized by RCW 36.70B.060(2)(b) must result in a
default judgment against the appeal.

--- END ---