BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that voter
participation is the foundation of our democracy. The legislature also
recognizes that young people register to vote at much lower rates than
any other age group. Therefore, the legislature intends to enhance
voter participation by simplifying motor voter registration.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.340 and 2003 c 111 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A person may register to vote, transfer a voter registration,
or change his or her name for voter registration purposes when he or
she applies for or renews a driver's license or identification card
under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(2) To register to vote, transfer his or her voter registration, or
change his or her name for voter registration purposes under this
section, the applicant shall provide the information required by RCW
29A.08.210.
(3) The driver licensing agent shall record that the applicant has
requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.))
Applications for a driver's license and a state identicard shall also
serve as an application for voter registration purposes.
(2) The voter registration component of the driver's license
application and the application for a state identicard must contain the
minimum information required under RCW 29A.08.810 necessary to place
the applicant on the voter registration rolls.
(3) An applicant for a driver's license or a state identicard may
decline in writing to be registered to vote.
(4) A change of address form submitted to the department of
licensing shall serve as notification of change of address for voter
registration purposes unless the registrant states on the form that the
change of address is not for voter registration purposes.
(5) Applications for voter registrations received under this
section shall be electronically transferred to the secretary of state
and shall be considered a registration by mail.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.155 and 2009 c 369 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing
a license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall
determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(2) "Are you or will you be eighteen years of age on or before the
next election?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then submit the registration or transfer. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit
a voter registration application.)) The department, in cooperation with
the secretary of state, must develop an application form for a driver's
license and a state identicard that meets the requirements of RCW
29A.08.340 and 29A.08.810.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

--- END ---