BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
fostering lifelong civic participation. Young voters remain
underrepresented in the United States electorate. Nationally, fifty-nine percent of eligible eighteen to twenty-nine year olds are
registered to vote, compared to seventy-one percent in the general
population. Registration supports voter turnout among young adults:
Eighty-three percent of registered eighteen to twenty-nine year olds in
the United States voted in 2008. Studies show that young adults who
vote are likely to continue to do so throughout adulthood. The
legislature recognizes that these representational disparities in
registration rates and voting rates within the youth electorate will
improve by enacting election policies that engage all young citizens.
Therefore, the legislature declares that this act, allowing eligible
youth at least sixteen years of age to register to vote, is intended to
increase voter turnout in young adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is at least sixteen years of age and who meets all
requirements to vote except age may register to vote with the office of
the secretary of state.
(2) The voter's registration will be held from entry in the
statewide voter registration database until such time as the voter will
be eighteen years of age before the next election.
(3) A confirmation notice will be sent to the voter's address at
the time the voter's registration is entered into the statewide voter
registration database.
(4) The secretary of state is authorized to adopt rules to
implement this section. In promulgating such rules, the secretary of
state should endeavor to maintain an accurate record of the current
residential addresses of registrants.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2009 c 369 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The former address of the applicant if previously registered to
vote;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number,
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's social security number if he or she does not have a
Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification
card;
(8) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she
is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that
he or she is an overseas voter;
(9) ((A)) Two check boxes allowing the applicant to confirm ((that
he or she)) one of the following:
(a) The applicant is at least eighteen years of age or will be
eighteen years of age by the next election;
(b) The applicant is at least sixteen years of age, meets all
requirements to vote except age, and understands that the registration
will be held until such time as the applicant is eligible to vote at
the next election;
(10) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(11) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is
a citizen of the United States;
(12) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(13) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the
applicant's signature; and
(14) Any other information that the secretary of state determines
is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.330 and 2009 c 369 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter
registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either
the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination
form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register
at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by
the secretary of state.
(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter
registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for
service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change
of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the
same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is
offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including
information about age and citizenship requirements for voter
registration.
(3) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if
the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the service agent shall ask the following:

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(b) "Are you ((or will you be eighteen)) at least sixteen years of
age ((on or before the next election))?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form
and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to
register to vote or transfer a voter registration. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide
the applicant with a voter registration form.
(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may,
in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture
simultaneously the information required for voter registration during
a person's computerized application process.
(5) Each designated agency shall transmit the applications to the
secretary of state or appropriate county auditor within three business
days.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.155 and 2009 c 369 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a
license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall
determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(2) "Are you ((or will you be eighteen)) at least sixteen years of
age ((on or before the next election))?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then submit the registration or transfer. If the applicant
answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit
a voter registration application.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---