BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the honor
and remember flag act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The honor and remember flag created by Honor and Remember, Inc., is
designated as the official Washington state emblem of the service and
sacrifice by the brave men and women of the United States armed forces
who have given their lives in the line of duty.

--- END ---