BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.325 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((For purposes of)) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Alternative learning experience program" means a course or set
of courses that is:
(((a))) (i) Provided in whole or in part independently from a
regular classroom setting or schedule, but may include some components
of direct instruction;
(((b))) (ii) Supervised, monitored, assessed, evaluated, and
documented by a certificated teacher employed by the school district or
under contract as permitted by applicable rules; and
(((c))) (iii) Provided in accordance with a written student
learning plan that is implemented pursuant to the school district's
policy and rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction
for alternative learning experiences.
(b) "Contract-based learning program" means a program that serves
students in grades nine through twelve where students receive an
average of at least five hours of classroom-based instruction per week.
The running start program established under RCW 28A.600.300 is not a
contract-based learning program.
(2)(a) For students in grades nine through twelve, all instruction
and activities in the student learning plan must generate credits that
meet state or local high school graduation requirements.
(b) For students in grades kindergarten through eight, all
instruction and activities in the student learning plan must be
directly related to one or more of the following core academic
subjects: English, reading and language arts, writing, science,
technology, engineering, mathematics, foreign languages, civics and
government, economics, the arts, history, and geography.
(3) The broad categories of alternative learning experience
programs include, but are not limited to:
(a) Online programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.262;
(b) Parent partnership programs that include significant
participation and partnership by parents and families in the design and
implementation of a student's learning experience; and
(c) Contract-based learning programs.
(((3))) (4) School districts that offer alternative learning
experience programs may not provide any compensation, reimbursement,
gift, reward, or gratuity to any parents, guardians, or students for
participation. School district employees are prohibited from receiving
any compensation or payment as an incentive to increase student
enrollment of out-of-district students in an alternative learning
experience program. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to,
providing funds to parents, guardians, or students for the purchase of
educational materials, supplies, experiences, services, or
technological equipment. A district may purchase educational
materials, equipment, or other nonconsumable supplies for students' use
in alternative learning experience programs if the purchase is
consistent with the district's approved curriculum, conforms to
applicable laws and rules, and is made in the same manner as such
purchases are made for students in the district's regular instructional
program. Items so purchased remain the property of the school district
upon program completion. School districts may not purchase or contract
for instructional or co- curricular experiences and services that are
included in an alternative learning experience written student learning
plan, including but not limited to lessons, trips, and other
activities, unless substantially similar experiences and services are
available to students enrolled in the district's regular instructional
program. Except when required under an individualized education
program for a student with disabilities or as necessary to provide
accommodation for a student qualifying under section 504 of the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973, contracts for instructional or cocurricular
experiences and services may not provide experiences and services for
a single individual alternative learning experience student, but may
provide experiences and services for students in a group setting.
School districts that purchase or contract for such experiences and
services for students enrolled in an alternative learning experience
program must submit an annual report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction detailing the costs and purposes
of the expenditures. These requirements extend to contracted providers
of alternative learning experience programs, and each district shall be
responsible for monitoring the compliance of its providers with these
requirements. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit school
districts from contracting with online providers approved by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to chapter 28A.250
RCW.
(((4))) (5) Part-time enrollment in alternative learning
experiences is subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.150.350. Part-time
students who are enrolled in alternative learning experiences are not
exempt from participating in the statewide academic assessment system
under RCW 28A.655.070 in the same manner as full-time students.
Participation shall be based on a student's completion of the course
material that is the subject of the assessment. Nonresident students
in alternative learning experience programs may participate in
statewide student assessments in the district of residence, subject to
that district's planned testing schedule.
(((5))) (6) Requirements for direct personal contact between a
teacher and a student in an alternative learning experience program may
be met in a group setting between the teacher and multiple students.
(7) Except for students whose enrollment in an alternative learning
experience program occurs only through enrollment in an alternative
learning experience online program under RCW 28A.150.262, and except
for students who are enrolled part-time in an alternative learning
experience program and part-time in a regular instructional program in
the same school district, all students enrolled in an alternative
learning experience program must receive in-person, face-to-face direct
personal contact with a teacher at least once a week.
(8) For programs where students of any grade level receive an
average of at least five hours of in-person, face-to-face instruction
per week in a physical classroom, no documentation beyond school
attendance records is required for the program to verify that direct
personal contact or instructional contact time requirements have been
met.
(9) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year and thereafter, school
districts shall record individual student enrollment in an alternative
learning experience program in the comprehensive education data and
research system. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall reconfigure the system to accommodate the provisions
of this subsection.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
defining minimum requirements and accountability for alternative
learning experience programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) The total aggregate statewide allocations calculated under
subsections (4) through (12) of this section for full-time equivalent
student enrollment in alternative learning experience programs as
defined in RCW 28A.150.325 shall be reduced by fifteen percent for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. Contract-based learning programs
shall receive a five percent reduction in the 2012-13 school year.
Otherwise, the superintendent of public instruction shall determine how
to implement this aggregate fifteen percent reduction among the
different alternative learning experience programs. Except for
contract-based learning programs, no program may receive less than a
ten percent reduction and no program may receive greater than a twenty
percent reduction. In determining how to implement the reductions
among the alternative learning experience programs, the superintendent
of public instruction must look to both how a program is currently
operating as well as how it has operated in the past, to the extent
that data is available, and must give consideration to the following
criteria:
(i) The category of program;
(ii) The certificated instructional staffing ratio maintained by
the program;
(iii) The amount and type of direct personal student-to-teacher
contact used by the program on a weekly basis;
(iv) Whether the program uses any classroom-based instructional
time to meet requirements in the written student learning plan for
enrolled students; and
(v) For online programs, whether the program is approved by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the
legislature by December 31, 2011, regarding how the reductions in (b)
of this subsection were implemented.
(d) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through alternative learning
experience online programs. As used in this section and RCW
28A.150.325, an "alternative learning experience online program" is a
set of online courses or an online school program as defined in RCW
28A.250.010 that is delivered to students in whole or in part
independently from a regular classroom schedule. Beginning in the
2013-14 school year, alternative learning experience online programs
must be offered by an online provider approved by the superintendent of
public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020 to meet the definition in this
section. The rules shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress; the rules shall
require districts providing programs under this section to nonresident
students to establish procedures that address, at a minimum, the
coordination of student counting for state funding so that no student
is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, an alternative learning
experience online program to adopt and annually review written policies
for each program and program provider and to receive an annual report
on its digital alternative learning experience online programs from its
staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
an alternative learning experience online program to report annually to
the superintendent of public instruction on the types of programs and
course offerings, and number of students participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the alternative learning experience online program be
provided by a certificated teacher;
(7) Requiring each school district offering courses or programs to
identify the ratio of certificated instructional staff to full-time
equivalent students enrolled in such courses or programs, and to
include a description of their ratio as part of the reports required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in an
alternative learning experience online program, a learning plan that
includes a description of course objectives and information on the
requirements a student must meet to successfully complete the program
or courses. The rules shall allow course syllabi and other additional
information to be used to meet the requirement for a learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using((, for full-time students,))
the state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. ((However, part-time
students who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter
28A.200 RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under
chapter 28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments
required under chapter 28A.655 RCW.)) The rules shall address how
students who reside outside the geographic service area of the school
district are to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with a certificated teacher at least weekly
until the student completes the course objectives or the requirements
in the learning plan. Direct personal contact is for the purposes of
instruction, review of assignments, testing, evaluation of student
progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal contact may
include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging, interactive
video communication, or other means of digital communication, and may
occur in a group setting between the teacher and multiple students;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning programs to receive accreditation through
the Northwest accreditation commission or another national, regional,
or state accreditation program listed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction after consultation with the
Washington coalition for online learning;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning to provide information to students and
parents on whether or not the courses or programs: Cover one or more
of the school district's learning goals or of the state's essential
academic learning requirements or whether they permit the student to
meet one or more of the state's or district's graduation requirements;
and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
alternative learning experience online courses to a student provide the
parent or guardian of the student, prior to the student's enrollment,
with a description of any difference between home-based education as
described in chapter 28A.200 RCW and the enrollment option selected by
the student. The parent or guardian shall sign documentation attesting
to his or her understanding of the difference and the documentation
shall be retained by the district and made available for audit.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.220 and 1995 c 335 s 602 and 1995 c 52 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any board of directors may make agreements with adults choosing
to attend school, and may charge the adults reasonable tuition.
(2) A district is strongly encouraged to honor the request of a
parent or guardian for his or her child to attend a school in another
district or the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to
transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.
(3) A district shall release a student to a nonresident district
that agrees to accept the student if:
(a) A financial, educational, safety, or health condition affecting
the student would likely be reasonably improved as a result of the
transfer; or
(b) Attendance at the school in the nonresident district is more
accessible to the parent's place of work or to the location of child
care; or
(c) There is a special hardship or detrimental condition; or
(d) The purpose of the transfer is for the student to enroll in an
alternative learning experience online program under RCW 28A.150.262.
The nonresident district must notify the resident district if a
nonresident student drops out of the alternative learning experience
online program.
(4) A district may deny the request of a resident student to
transfer to a nonresident district if the release of the student would
adversely affect the district's existing desegregation plan.
(5) For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its
education program, a resident school district may request an optional
exit interview or questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a
child transferring to another district. No parent or guardian may be
forced to attend such an interview or complete the questionnaire.
(6) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may
not charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled
under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225.
Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high
school pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a
transfer fee as affecting the apportionment of current state school
funds.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.225 and 2009 c 380 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state and students under
RCW 28A.225.217, a district shall accept applications from nonresident
students who are the children of full-time certificated and classified
school employees, and those children shall be permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned;
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(c) At a school in the district that provides early intervention
services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.065 or preschool services pursuant to
RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.
(2) A district may reject applications under this section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants; or
(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child
who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted
under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to
remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten
through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or
her schooling.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all
districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from
students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools shall consider equally all applications received.
Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair,
and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by
June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident
student if:
(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the
district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership; or
(c) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(3)(c) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants.
For purposes of subsections (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this section,
"gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more persons;
(ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis,
regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(4) A school district may enroll nonresident students in
alternative learning experience programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.325
only if the district establishes an interlocal agreement with the
student's district of residence which addresses, but is not limited to,
responsibilities for assuring compliance with compulsory attendance
laws, participation in statewide student assessments, and assurance of
provision of appropriate services for students with disabilities. The
agreement may apply to any nonresident alternative learning experience
student from the same district and need not be unique to each student.
A resident school district may not refuse to establish an interlocal
agreement with a nonresident school district for students enrolling in
an alternative learning experience online program under RCW 28A.150.262
in the nonresident district.
(5) The district shall provide to applicants written notification
of the approval or denial of the application in a timely manner. If
the application is rejected, the notification shall include the reason
or reasons for denial and the right to appeal under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---