BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.90.030 and 2006 c 6 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department of ecology may enter into voluntary regional
agreements for the purpose of providing new water for out-of-stream
use, streamlining the application process, and protecting instream
flow.
(2) Such agreements shall ensure that:
(a) For water rights issued from the Columbia river mainstem, there
is no negative impact on Columbia river mainstem instream flows in the
months of July and August as a result of the new appropriations issued
under the agreement;
(b) For water rights issued from the lower Snake river mainstem,
there is no negative impact on Snake river mainstem instream flows from
April through August as a result of the new appropriations issued under
the agreement; and
(c) Efforts are made to harmonize such agreements with watershed
plans adopted under the authority of chapter 90.82 RCW that are
applicable to the area covered by the agreement.
(3) The protection of instream flow as set forth in subsection (2)
of this section is adequate for purposes of mitigating instream flow
impacts resulting from any appropriations for out-of-stream use made
under a voluntary regional agreement, and the only applicable
consultation provisions under state law regarding instream flow impacts
shall be those set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Before executing a voluntary agreement under this section, the
department of ecology shall:
(a) Provide a sixty-day period for consultation with county
legislative authorities and watershed planning groups with jurisdiction
over the area where the water rights included in the agreement are
located, the department of fish and wildlife, and affected tribal
governments, and federal agencies. The department of fish and wildlife
shall provide written comments within that time period. The
consultation process for voluntary regional agreements developed under
the provisions of this section is deemed adequate for the issuance of
new water rights provided for in this section and satisfies all
consultation requirements under state law related to the issuance of
new water rights; and
(b) Provide a thirty-day public review and comment period for a
draft agreement, and publish a summary of any public comments received.
The thirty-day review period shall not begin until after the department
of ecology has concluded its consultation under (a) of this subsection
and the comments that have been received by the department are made
available to the public.
(5) The provisions of subsection (4) of this section satisfy all
applicable consultation requirements under state law.
(6) The provisions of this section and any voluntary regional
agreements developed under such provisions may not be relied upon by
the department of ecology as a precedent, standard, or model that must
be followed in any other voluntary regional agreements.
(7) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or administered in
a manner that precludes the processing of water right applications
under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW that are not included in a voluntary
regional agreement.
(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted or administered in
a manner that impairs or diminishes a valid water right or a habitat
conservation plan approved for purposes of compliance with the federal
endangered species act.
(9) ((The department of ecology shall monitor and evaluate the
water allocated to instream and out-of-stream uses under this section,
evaluate the program, and provide an interim report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by June 30, 2008. A final report shall
be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June
30, 2011.
(10))) If the department of ecology executes a voluntary agreement
under this section that includes water rights appropriated from the
lower Snake river mainstem, the department shall develop aggregate data
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.90.050 for the lower Snake
river mainstem.
(((11))) (10) Any agreement entered into under this section shall
remain in full force and effect through the term of the agreement
regardless of the expiration of this section.
(((12))) (11) The definitions in this subsection apply to this
section and RCW 90.90.050, and may only be used for purposes of
implementing these sections.
(a) "Columbia river mainstem" means all water in the Columbia river
within the ordinary high water mark of the main channel of the Columbia
river between the border of the United States and Canada and the
Bonneville dam, and all groundwater within one mile of the high water
mark.
(b) "Lower Snake river mainstem" means all water in the lower Snake
river within the ordinary high water mark of the main channel of the
lower Snake river from the head of Ice Harbor pool to the confluence of
the Snake and Columbia rivers, and all groundwater within one mile of
the high water mark.
(((13))) (12) This section expires June 30, ((2012)) 2018.

--- END ---