BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.12.160 and 2011 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
and RCW 4.24.780 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fire protection service agency" or "agency" means any local,
state, or federal governmental entity responsible for the provision of
firefighting services, including fire protection districts, regional
fire protection service authorities, cities, towns, port districts, the
department of natural resources, and federal reservations.
(b) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means an area or property
located within a fire protection district, a regional fire protection
service authority, a city, a town, a port district, lands protected by
the department of natural resources under chapter 76.04 RCW, or on
federal lands.
(c) "Firefighting services" means the provision of fire prevention
services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and
other services related to the protection of life and property.
(d) "Improved property" means property upon which a structure is
located, ((but does not include roads, bridges, land devoted primarily
to growing and harvesting timber, or land devoted primarily to the
production of livestock or agricultural commodities for commercial
purposes)) including bridges and agricultural structures as defined in
RCW 19.27.015.
(e) "Property" means land, structures, or land and structures.
(f) "Unimproved property" has the same meaning as "unimproved
lands" in RCW 76.04.005.
(g) "Unprotected land" means improved property located outside a
fire protection jurisdiction.
(2)(a) In order to facilitate the provision of firefighting
services to unprotected lands, property owners of unprotected lands are
encouraged, to the extent practicable, to form or annex into a fire
protection jurisdiction or to enter into a written contractual
agreement with a fire protection service agency or agencies for the
provision of firefighting services. Any written contractual agreement
between a property owner and a fire protection service agency must
include, at minimum, a risk assessment of the property as well as a
capabilities assessment for the district.
(b) Property owners of unprotected land who choose not to form or
annex into a fire protection jurisdiction or to enter into a written
contractual agreement with a fire protection agency or agencies for the
provision of firefighting services, do so willingly and with full
knowledge that a fire protection service agency is not obligated to
provide firefighting services to unprotected land.
(3) In the absence of a written contractual agreement, a fire
protection service agency may initiate firefighting services on
unprotected land outside its fire protection jurisdiction in the
following instances: (a) Service was specifically requested by a
landowner or other fire service protection agency; (b) service could
reasonably be believed to prevent the spread of a fire onto lands
protected by the agency; or (c) service could reasonably be believed to
substantially mitigate the risk of harm to life or property by
preventing the spread of a fire onto other unprotected lands.
(4)(a) The property owner or owners shall reimburse an agency
initiating firefighting services on unprotected land outside its fire
protection jurisdiction for actual costs that are incurred that are
proportionate to the fire itself. Cost recovery is based upon the
Washington fire chiefs standardized fire service fee schedule.
(b) If a property owner fails to pay or defaults in payment to an
agency for services rendered, the agency is entitled to pursue payment
through the collections process outlined in RCW 19.16.500 or through
initiation of court action.

--- END ---