BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2011 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park or
operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term parking
as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The final cost of the discover pass ((is)) to the purchaser
must be thirty dollars ((per motor vehicle)). Every four years the
office of financial management must review the cost of the discover
pass and, if necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to
the cost of the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) The discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The discover pass must be made available for purchase
throughout the year through the department of fish and wildlife's
automated licensing system consistent with RCW 77.32.050.
(5) The discover pass must be made available for purchase through
the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090. The
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director, is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission may make the discover
pass available for purchase through its reservation system and other
outlets authorized by law to sell licenses, permits, or passes.
(7) The discover pass ((must contain space for the motor vehicle
license plate number)) is transferable among motor vehicles registered
at the same address.
(8) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.030 and 2011 c 320 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person may purchase a day-use permit to meet the requirements
of RCW 79A.80.080. The day-use permit ((is)) must be sold for a final
price of ten dollars per day and must be available for purchase from
each agency. The day-use permit is valid for one calendar day.
(2) The agencies may provide short-term parking under RCW
79A.80.070 where the day-use permit is not required.
(3) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of the day-use permit and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of the day-use permit to account
for inflation.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2011 c 320 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife recreation sites or lands. The vehicle
access pass is only available to a person who purchases a current
valid: Big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450; small game
hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460; western Washington pheasant
permit issued under RCW 77.32.575; trapping license issued under RCW
77.65.450; watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section which may be used among motor vehicles
registered at the same address.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.050 and 2011 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All recreational and commercial licenses, permits, tags,
stamps, and raffle tickets shall be issued under the authority of the
commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of
licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and for the
collection, payment, and handling of license fees, including terms and
conditions to govern dealers, and dealer fees. A transaction fee on
commercial and recreational documents issued through an automated
licensing system may be set by the commission and collected from
licensees. The department may authorize all or part of such fee to be
paid directly to a contractor providing automated licensing system
services. The department and dealers shall collect and retain dealer
fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard hunting or
fishing recreational license document or commercial license document,
except that:
(a) The commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags
or when a licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display card
format rather than a standard department licensing document form; and
(b) No dealer fees may be collected for the issuance of a discover
pass or day-use permit, as those terms are defined in RCW 79A.80.010.
Dealer fees must be uniform throughout the state.
(2) Until September 1, 2011, the department shall charge an
additional transaction fee of ten percent on all recreational licenses,
permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets. These transaction fees must
be deposited into the state wildlife account, created in RCW 77.12.170,
for funding fishing and hunting opportunities for recreational license
holders.
(3) The application fee is waived for all commercial license
documents that are issued through the automated licensing system.

--- END ---