BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) According to the centers for disease control and prevention:
(i) In 2008, more than thirty-six thousand people died by suicide
in the United States, making it the tenth leading cause of death
nationally.
(ii) During 2007-2008, an estimated five hundred sixty-nine
thousand people visited hospital emergency departments with self-inflicted injuries in the United States, seventy percent of whom had
attempted suicide.
(iii) During 2008-2009, the average percentages of adults who
thought, planned, or attempted suicide in Washington were higher than
the national average.
(b) According to a national study, veterans face an elevated risk
of suicide as compared to the general population, more than twice the
risk among male veterans. Another study has indicated a positive
correlation between posttraumatic stress disorder and suicide.
(i) Washington state is home to more than sixty thousand men and
women who have deployed in support of the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
(ii) Research continues on how the effects of wartime service and
injuries such as traumatic brain injury, posttraumatic stress disorder,
or other service-related conditions, may increase the number of
veterans who attempt suicide.
(iii) As more men and women separate from the military and
transition back into civilian life, community mental health providers
will become a vital resource to help these veterans and their families
deal with issues that may arise.
(c) Suicide has an enormous impact on the family and friends of the
victim as well as the community as a whole.
(d) Approximately ninety percent of people who die by suicide had
a diagnosable psychiatric disorder at the time of death. Most suicide
victims exhibit warning signs or behaviors prior to an attempt.
(e) Improved training and education in suicide assessment,
treatment, and management has been recommended by a variety of
organizations, including the United States department of health and
human services and the institute of medicine.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help lower the
suicide rate in Washington by requiring certain mental health
professionals to:
(a) Complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and
management prior to licensure; and
(b) Engage in continued training in suicide assessment, treatment,
and management as part of their continuing education requirements.
(3) The legislature does not intend to expand or limit the existing
scope of practice of any mental health professional affected by this
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.19.020 and 2011 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means (a) an agency or facility operated, licensed, or
certified by the state of Washington; (b) a federally recognized Indian
tribe located within the state; or (c) a county.
(2) "Agency affiliated counselor" means a person registered under
this chapter who is engaged in counseling and employed by an agency.
"Agency affiliated counselor" includes juvenile probation counselors
who are employees of the juvenile court under RCW 13.04.035 and
13.04.040 and juvenile court employees providing functional family
therapy, aggression replacement training, or other evidence-based
programs approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration of the
department of social and health services.
(3) "Certified adviser" means a person certified under this chapter
who is engaged in private practice counseling to the extent authorized
in RCW 18.19.200.
(4) "Certified counselor" means a person certified under this
chapter who is engaged in private practice counseling to the extent
authorized in RCW 18.19.200.
(5) "Client" means an individual who receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.
(6) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques,
including but not limited to social work, mental health counseling,
marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer,
assist or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in the
amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity
and awareness of self and others and the development of human
potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed
to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to
counseling.
(7) "Counselor" means an individual, practitioner, therapist, or
analyst who engages in the practice of counseling to the public for a
fee, including for the purposes of this chapter, hypnotherapists.
(8) "Department" means the department of health.
(9) "Hypnotherapist" means a person registered under this chapter
who is practicing hypnosis as a modality.
(10) "Private practice counseling" means the practice of counseling
by a certified counselor or certified adviser as specified in RCW
18.19.200.
(11) "Psychotherapy" means the practice of counseling using
diagnosis of mental disorders according to the fourth edition of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, published in
1994, and the development of treatment plans for counseling based on
diagnosis of mental disorders in accordance with established practice
standards.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(13) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the secretary that is
substantially equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.19.090 and 2008 c 135 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for agency affiliated counselor, certified
counselor, certified adviser, or hypnotherapist must be made on forms
approved by the secretary. The secretary may require information
necessary to determine whether applicants meet the qualifications for
the credential and whether there are any grounds for denial of the
credential, or for issuance of a conditional credential, under this
chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. The application for agency affiliated
counselor, certified counselor, or certified adviser must include a
description of the applicant's orientation, discipline, theory, or
technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary
as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall accompany the application.
(2) Applicants for agency affiliated counselor must provide
satisfactory documentation that they are employed by an agency or have
an offer of employment from an agency.
(3) At the time of application for initial certification,
applicants for certified counselor prior to July 1, 2010, are required
to:
(a) Have been registered for no less than five years at the time of
application for an initial certification;
(b) Have held a valid, active registration that is in good standing
and be in compliance with any disciplinary process and orders at the
time of application for an initial certification;
(c) Show evidence of having completed coursework in risk
assessment, ethics, appropriate screening and referral, and Washington
state law and other subjects identified by the secretary;
(d) Pass an examination in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate
screening and referral, and Washington state law, and other subjects as
determined by the secretary; and
(e) Have a written consultation agreement with a credential holder
who meets the qualifications established by the secretary.
(4) Unless eligible for certification under subsection (3) of this
section, applicants for certified counselor or certified adviser are
required to:
(a)(i) Have a bachelor's degree in a counseling-related field, if
applying for certified counselor; or
(ii) Have an associate degree in a counseling-related field and a
supervised internship, if applying for certified adviser;
(b) Pass an examination in risk assessment, ethics, appropriate
screening and referral, and Washington state law, and other subjects as
determined by the secretary; ((and))
(c)(i)(A) Successfully complete at least fifteen hours of
coursework in suicide assessment, treatment, and management while
obtaining the degree required in (a) of this subsection; or
(B) Complete a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than six years prior to applying for
certification under this section.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (4)(c) may be interpreted to expand
or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter; and
(d) Have a written supervisory agreement with a supervisor who
meets the qualifications established by the secretary.
(5) Each applicant shall include payment of the fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.19.100 and 2008 c 135 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education, and fees for renewal
of credentials as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. When
establishing continuing education requirements for agency affiliated
counselors, the secretary shall consult with the appropriate state
agency director responsible for licensing, certifying, or operating the
relevant agency practice setting.
(2)(a) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, a certified adviser or
certified counselor who obtained his or her initial certification prior
to the effective date of this section shall complete a suicide
assessment, treatment, and management training program.
(b) All certified advisers and certified counselors shall complete
a suicide assessment, treatment, and management training program every
six years after:
(i) Initially completing a training program under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Obtaining initial certification on or after the effective date
of this section.
(c) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section count toward meeting any
continuing education requirements established under this chapter.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (2) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.205.020 and 2008 c 135 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an
individual who qualifies by examination and meets established
educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.
(2) "Certified chemical dependency professional" means an
individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this
chapter.
(3) "Certified chemical dependency professional trainee" means an
individual working toward the education and experience requirements for
certification as a chemical dependency professional.
(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to
assist an alcohol or drug addicted person to develop and maintain
abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering drugs.
(5) "Committee" means the chemical dependency certification
advisory committee established under this chapter.
(6) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling" means
competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and
attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis
of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and
referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical
dependency, individual and group counseling with alcoholic and drug
addicted individuals, relapse prevention counseling, and case
management, all oriented to assist alcoholic and drug addicted patients
to achieve and maintain abstinence from mood-altering substances and
develop independent support systems.
(7) "Department" means the department of health.
(8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health
services regulated under the laws of this state.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(10) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the secretary that is
substantially equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.205.090 and 2001 c 251 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who
demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following
requirements have been met:
(a) Completion of an educational program approved by the secretary
or successful completion of alternate training that meets established
criteria;
(b) Successful completion of an approved examination, based on core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling; ((and))
(c) Successful completion of an experience requirement that
establishes fewer hours of experience for applicants with higher levels
of relevant education. In meeting any experience requirement
established under this subsection, the secretary may not require more
than one thousand five hundred hours of experience in chemical
dependency counseling for applicants who are licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW or under chapter 18.79 RCW as advanced registered nurse
practitioners; and
(d)(i)(A) Successful completion of at least fifteen hours of
coursework in suicide assessment, treatment, and management as part of
his or her educational program or alternate training; or
(B) Completion of a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than six years prior to applying for
certification under this section.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) may be interpreted to expand
or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.
(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a
certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter
18.130 RCW.
(4) Certified chemical dependency professionals shall not be
required to be registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under
chapter 18.225 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.205 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During the first full continuing competency reporting period
following the effective date of this section, a certified chemical
dependency professional who obtained his or her initial certification
prior to the effective date of this section shall complete a suicide
assessment, treatment, and management training program.
(2) All certified chemical dependency professionals shall complete
a suicide assessment, treatment, and management training program every
six years after:
(a) Initially completing a training program under subsection (1) of
this section; or
(b) Obtaining initial certification on or after the effective date
of this section.
(3) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section count toward meeting any
continuing competency requirements established under this chapter.
(4) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit
the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.225.010 and 2008 c 135 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate
degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the
supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed
independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and
treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human
development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment
of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and
family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional
application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and
techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and
families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental
disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the
rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to
individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such
services are offered directly to the general public or through
organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or
otherwise.
(9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles
of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics,
and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(11) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the secretary that is
substantially equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.225.090 and 2008 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant
meets the following education and experience requirements for the
applicant's practice area.
(a) Licensed social work classifications:
(i) Licensed advanced social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work educational
program accredited by the council on social work education and approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of three
thousand two hundred hours with supervision by an approved supervisor
who has been licensed for at least two years. Of those supervised
hours:
(I) At least ninety hours must include direct supervision as
specified in this subsection by a licensed independent clinical social
worker, a licensed advanced social worker, or an equally qualified
licensed mental health professional. Of those hours of directly
supervised experience:
(1) At least fifty hours must include supervision by a licensed
advanced social worker or licensed independent clinical social worker;
the other forty hours may be supervised by an equally qualified
licensed mental health practitioner; and
(2) At least forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
fifty hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision;
(II) Distance supervision is limited to forty supervision hours;
and
(III) Eight hundred hours must be in direct client contact; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate level social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of four
thousand hours of experience, over a three-year period, with
supervision by an approved supervisor who has been licensed for at
least two years and, as specified in this subsection, may be either a
licensed independent clinical social worker who has had at least one
year of experience in supervising the clinical social work of others or
an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Of those
supervised hours:
(I) At least one thousand hours must be direct client contact;
(II) Hours of direct supervision must include:
(1) At least one hundred thirty hours by a licensed mental health
practitioner;
(2) At least seventy hours of supervision with a licensed
independent clinical social worker meeting the qualifications under
this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the other sixty hours may be supervised
by an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner; and
(3) At least sixty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
seventy hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision;
and
(III) Distance supervision is limited to sixty supervision hours;
and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor:
(i) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational
program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a
college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of thirty-six months
full-time counseling or three thousand hours of postgraduate mental
health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental
health counselor or equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner, in an approved setting. The three thousand hours of
required experience includes a minimum of one hundred hours spent in
immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of
direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist:
(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from
an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's
degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by
the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of two calendar years
of full-time marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision,
one hundred hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist
with at least five years' clinical experience; the other one hundred
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:
(A) A minimum of three thousand hours of experience, one thousand
hours of which must be direct client contact; at least five hundred
hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families;
plus
(B) At least two hundred hours of qualified supervision with a
supervisor. At least one hundred of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or
group supervision.
Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the
commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education
of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be
credited with five hundred hours of direct client contact and one
hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(2)(a) Every applicant under this section shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the secretary:
(i) Successful completion of at least fifteen hours of coursework
in suicide assessment, treatment, and management as part of his or her
educational program or alternate training; or
(ii) Completion of a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than six years prior to applying for licensure
under this section.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (2) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.
(3) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of meeting the criteria.
(((3))) (4) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds
for denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under
chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.225.150 and 2008 c 135 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural
requirements and fees for renewal of a license or associate license.
Failure to renew shall invalidate the license or associate license and
all privileges granted by the license. ((If an associate license has
lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance
with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward
full licensure.)) If a license has lapsed for a period longer than
three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the
satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses,
or meeting other standards determined by the secretary. If an
associate license has lapsed, the person shall submit an updated
declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that
the person is working toward full licensure.
(2)(a) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, a person licensed under
this chapter who obtained his or her initial license prior to the
effective date of this section shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program.
(b) All persons licensed under this chapter shall complete a
suicide assessment, treatment, and management training program every
six years after:
(i) Initially completing a training program under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Obtaining an initial license on or after the effective date of
this section.
(c) This subsection (2) does not apply to associate licenses.
(d) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section shall count toward
meeting any continuing education requirements established under this
chapter.
(e) Nothing in this subsection (2) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.83.010 and 1994 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the examining board of psychology.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) The "practice of psychology" means the observation, evaluation,
interpretation, and modification of human behavior by the application
of psychological principles, methods, and procedures for the purposes
of preventing or eliminating symptomatic or maladaptive behavior and
promoting mental and behavioral health. It includes, but is not
limited to, providing the following services to individuals, families,
groups, organizations, and the public, whether or not payment is
received for services rendered:
(a) Psychological measurement, assessment, and evaluation by means
of psychological, neuropsychological, and psychoeducational testing;
(b) Diagnosis and treatment of mental, emotional, and behavioral
disorders, and psychological aspects of illness, injury, and
disability; and
(c) Counseling and guidance, psychotherapeutic techniques,
remediation, health promotion, and consultation within the context of
established psychological principles and theories.
This definition does not include the teaching of principles of
psychology for accredited educational institutions, or the conduct of
research in problems of human or animal behavior.
Nothing in this definition shall be construed as permitting the
administration or prescribing of drugs or in any way infringing upon
the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((2))) (4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((3) "Board" means the examining board of psychology.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.)) (5) "Suicide
assessment, treatment, and management training program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the board that is substantially
equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.83.070 and 2004 c 262 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a license as "psychologist" must submit proof to
the board that:
(1) The applicant is of good moral character.
(2) The applicant holds a doctoral degree from a regionally
accredited institution, obtained from an integrated program of graduate
study in psychology as defined by rules of the board.
(3) The applicant has had no fewer than two years of supervised
experience. The board shall adopt rules defining the circumstances
under which supervised experience shall qualify the candidate for
licensure.
(4) The applicant has passed the examination or examinations
required by the board.
(5)(a) The applicant has:
(i) Successfully completed at least fifteen hours of coursework in
suicide assessment, treatment, and management as part of his or her
doctoral program; or
(ii) Completed a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than six years prior to applying for licensure
under this section.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (5) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.
Any person holding a valid license to practice psychology in the
state of Washington on June 7, 1984, shall be considered licensed under
this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.83.090 and 2009 c 492 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall establish rules governing mandatory continuing
education requirements which shall be met by any psychologist applying
for a license renewal.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board
with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to
licensees ((by)): By providing the information on the board's web
site; including the information in newsletters; by holding trainings at
meetings attended by organization members; or through another
distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to
the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses
to distribute information under this subsection.
(3) Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and
fees for renewal and reissue of licenses shall be established as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4)(a) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, a licensed psychologist
who obtained his or her initial certification prior to the effective
date of this section shall complete a suicide assessment, treatment,
and management training program.
(b) All licensed psychologists shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program every six years after:
(i) Initially completing a training program under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Obtaining an initial license on or after the effective date of
this section.
(c) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section count toward meeting any
continuing education requirements established under this chapter.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (4) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.79.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 402 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state nursing care quality
assurance commission.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(4))) "Diagnosis," in the context of nursing practice, means the
identification of, and discrimination between, the person's physical
and psychosocial signs and symptoms that are essential to effective
execution and management of the nursing care regimen.
(((5))) (4) "Diploma" means written official verification of
completion of an approved nursing education program.
(((6))) (5) "Nurse" or "nursing," unless otherwise specified as a
practical nurse or practical nursing, means a registered nurse or
registered nursing.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(7) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the commission that is
substantially equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.79.160 and 2004 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse
shall submit to the commission:
(a) An attested written application on a department form;
(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful
completion of an approved program of nursing; and
(c) Any other official records specified by the commission.
(2) An applicant for a license to practice as an advanced
registered nurse practitioner shall submit to the commission:
(a) An attested written application on a department form;
(b) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful
completion of an advanced registered nurse practitioner program meeting
criteria established by the commission; ((and))
(c)(i) For an applicant who intends to practice as a psychiatric
advanced registered nurse practitioner, proof acceptable to the
commission that he or she has:
(A) Successfully completed at least fifteen hours of coursework in
suicide assessment, treatment, and management at his or her advanced
registered nurse practitioner program; or
(B) Completed a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than six years prior to applying for licensure
under this section.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (2)(c) may be interpreted to expand
or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter; and
(d) Any other official records specified by the commission.
(3) An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical
nurse shall submit to the commission:
(a) An attested written application on a department form;
(b) Written official evidence that the applicant is over the age of
eighteen;
(c) An official transcript demonstrating graduation and successful
completion of an approved practical nursing program, or its equivalent;
and
(d) Any other official records specified by the commission.
(4) At the time of submission of the application, the applicant for
a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or licensed practical nurse must not be in violation of
chapter 18.130 RCW or this chapter.
(5) The commission shall establish by rule the criteria for
evaluating the education of all applicants.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.79.210 and 1996 c 191 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A license issued under this chapter must be renewed, except as
provided in this chapter. The licensee shall comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as
determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(2) The commission shall request advanced registered nurse
practitioners to inform the commission whether they practice as
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners at the time of
license renewal.
(3)(a) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, an advanced registered
nurse practitioner who identifies himself or herself as a psychiatric
advanced registered nurse practitioner under subsection (2) of this
section and who obtained his or her initial licensure prior to the
effective date of this section shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program.
(b) All advanced registered nurse practitioners who have identified
themselves as psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners under
subsection (2) of this section shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program every six years after:
(i) Initially completing a training program under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Obtaining an initial license on or after the effective date of
this section.
(c) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section count toward meeting any
continuing education requirements established under this chapter.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (3) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.57.001 and 1996 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery;
(2) "Department" means the department of health;
(3) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health; and
(4))) "Osteopathic medicine and surgery" means the use of any and
all methods in the treatment of disease, injuries, deformities, and all
other physical and mental conditions in and of human beings, including
the use of osteopathic manipulative therapy.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health; and
(6) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the board that is substantially
equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.57.020 and 1991 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A license shall be issued by the secretary authorizing the
holder to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery. In order to
procure a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, the
applicant must provide the board evidence that a diploma has been
issued to the applicant by an accredited school of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, approved by the board. The application shall be made upon
a form prepared by the secretary, with the approval of the board, and
it shall contain such information concerning said osteopathic medical
instruction and the preliminary education of the applicant as the board
may by rule provide. Applicants who have failed to meet the
requirements must be rejected.
(2) An applicant for a license to practice osteopathic medicine and
surgery must furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she
has served for not less than one year in a postgraduate training
program approved by the board.
(3) In addition, the applicant may be required to furnish evidence
satisfactory to the board that he or she is physically and mentally
capable of safely carrying on the practice of osteopathic medicine and
surgery. The board may require any applicant to submit to such
examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an
applicant's physical and/or mental capability to safely practice
osteopathic medicine and surgery. The applicant shall also show that
he or she has not been guilty of any conduct which would constitute
grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of such license under the
laws of the state of Washington.
(4) An applicant who intends to practice psychiatry is required to
have successfully completed at least fifteen hours of coursework in
suicide assessment, treatment, and management while obtaining his or
her diploma from an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and
surgery or to have completed a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program no more than six years prior to applying
for licensure under this section. Nothing in this subsection (4) may
be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any
profession regulated by this chapter.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the
board from requiring such additional information from applicants as it
deems necessary.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any
applicant for licensure, or any licensee, as a requisite of retaining
or renewing licensure under this chapter, to be a member of any
political and/or professional organization.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.57.050 and 1996 c 191 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may establish rules and regulations governing
mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by
physicians applying for renewal of licenses.
(2) The board shall request licensees to inform the board whether
they practice as psychiatrists at the time of license renewal.
(3) Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and
fees for applications and renewals shall be established as provided in
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The board shall determine prerequisites
for relicensing.
(4)(a) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, an osteopathic physician
and surgeon who identifies himself or herself as a psychiatrist under
subsection (2) of this section and who obtained his or her initial
licensure prior to the effective date of this section shall complete a
suicide assessment, treatment, and management training program.
(b) All osteopathic physicians and surgeons who have identified
themselves as psychiatrists under subsection (2) of this section shall
complete a suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program every six years after:
(i) Initially completing a training program under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Obtaining an initial license on or after the effective date of
this section.
(c) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment, and
management training program under this section count toward meeting any
continuing education requirements established under this chapter.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (4) may be interpreted to expand or
limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.

Sec. 20 RCW 18.71.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 302 are each amended
to read as follows:
The following terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings
set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state medical quality
assurance commission.
(2) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health.)) "Emergency
medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in
chapter 18.73 RCW.
(3) "Resident physician" means an individual who has graduated from
a school of medicine which meets the requirements set forth in RCW
18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical medical
training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a
hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter, the
term shall include individuals designated as intern or medical fellow.
(4) (("Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service" has
the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.)) "Secretary" means the
secretary of health.
(5) "Suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
program" means:
(a) A training program in the assessment, treatment, and management
of suicide of at least six hours in length that is listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center including, but not limited
to: Applied suicide intervention skills training; assessment and
management of suicide risk; recognizing and responding to suicide risk;
or question, persuade, respond, and treat; or
(b) A training program approved by the commission that is
substantially equivalent to the training programs in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 21 RCW 18.71.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 307 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each applicant who has graduated from a school of medicine
located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, shall file an
application for licensure with the commission on a form prepared by the
secretary with the approval of the commission. Each applicant shall
furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:
(a) That the applicant has attended and graduated from a school of
medicine approved by the commission;
(b) That the applicant has completed two years of postgraduate
medical training in a program acceptable to the commission, provided
that applicants graduating before July 28, 1985, may complete only one
year of postgraduate medical training;
(c) That the applicant is of good moral character; ((and))
(d) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of safely
carrying on the practice of medicine. The commission may require any
applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems
necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability
to safely practice medicine; and
(e)(i) That an applicant who intends to practice psychiatry has:
(A) Successfully completed at least fifteen hours of coursework in
suicide assessment, treatment, and management at his or her school of
medicine; or
(B) Completed a suicide assessment, treatment, and management
training program no more than eight years prior to applying for
licensure under this section.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (1)(e) may be interpreted to expand
or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the
commission from requiring such additional information from applicants
as it deems necessary. The issuance and denial of licenses are subject
to chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act.

Sec. 22 RCW 18.71.080 and 2011 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state
shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance
with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted
as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A physician who resides
and practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active
license is exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section.
(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information
about their current professional practice at the time of license
renewal. This information may include practice setting, medical
specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by
the commission.
(c) ((A physician who resides and practices in Washington and
obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from
licensing fees imposed under this section.)) The commission may
establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements
which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The
rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements
may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of
approved activities relating to professional liability risk management.
The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a
retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.
(d)(i) During the first full continuing education reporting period
following the effective date of this section, a physician who
identifies himself or herself as a psychiatrist under (b) of this
subsection and who obtained his or her initial licensure prior to the
effective date of this section shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program.
(ii) All physicians who have identified themselves as psychiatrists
under (b) of this subsection shall complete a suicide assessment,
treatment, and management training program every eight years after:
(A) Initially completing a training program under (d)(i) of this
subsection; or
(B) Obtaining an initial license on or after the effective date of
this section.
(iii) The hours spent completing a suicide assessment, treatment,
and management training program under this section count toward meeting
any continuing education requirements established under this chapter.
(iv) Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) may be interpreted to expand
or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated by this
chapter.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the
commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or another distribution method
determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the
office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to
distribute information under this subsection.
(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant
who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without
examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in
the practice of medicine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The secretary of health and the
disciplining authorities affected by this act shall adopt any rules
necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 21 of this act take
effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---