BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons convicted
and imprisoned for crimes they did not commit have been uniquely
victimized. They have suffered tremendous injustice by being stripped
of their lives and liberty, forced to endure prison for a crime they
did not commit. A majority of those wrongly convicted do not have
legal redress to recover damages in order to restore their lives. The
legislature intends to provide redress for those who have been wrongly
convicted in Washington state, in recognition of the lost years of
their lives and the unique challenges they face after exoneration. The
legislature further intends that claims be paid by the county in which
the wrongful conviction occurred, and that no person found wrongly
convicted in this state be deprived of his or her award once a judgment
has been successfully secured.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person convicted in superior court
and subsequently imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she
is actually innocent may file a claim for compensation and monetary
damages against the county in which he or she was convicted.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:
(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not engage in
any illegal conduct alleged in the charging documents; and
(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually
innocent.
(3)(a) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1)
of this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or
if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim
may be filed on behalf of the claimant by an authorized agent.
(b) A claim filed under this chapter survives to the personal
representative of the claimant as provided in RCW 4.20.046.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All claims under this chapter shall be
filed in superior court. The venue for such actions shall be governed
by RCW 4.12.020.
(2) Service of the summons and complaint shall be governed by RCW
4.28.080.
(3) The attorney general shall represent any county named as the
adverse party in a claim under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In order to file an actionable claim for
wrongful conviction and imprisonment, the claimant must establish by
documentary evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in
superior court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment,
and has served all or part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the
felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of significant new
exculpatory information or, if a new trial was ordered following the
presentation of significant new exculpatory information, either the
claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not
retried and the accusatory instrument dismissed; and
(d) The claim is not time barred by section 9 of this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claim shall state facts in sufficient detail for the
finder of fact to determine that:
(a) The claimant did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in
the charging documents; and
(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a
crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later proven
to be false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under
this subsection.
(3) Convictions vacated, overturned, or subject to resentencing
pursuant to In re: Personal Detention of Andress, 147 Wn.2d 602 (2002)
may not serve as the basis for a claim under this chapter unless the
claimant otherwise satisfies the qualifying criteria set forth in
section 2 of this act and this section.
(4) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated, in which case the personal representative or agent
filing on behalf of the claimant shall verify the claim.
(5) If the attorney general concedes that the claimant was wrongly
convicted, the court shall award compensation as provided in section 6
of this act.
(6)(a) If the attorney general does not concede that the claimant
was wrongly convicted and the court finds after reading the claim that
the claimant does not meet the filing criteria set forth in this
section, it shall dismiss the claim, either on its own motion or on the
motion of the attorney general.
(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any party is entitled to the rights of
appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a decision on such
motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review of the superior
court action shall be de novo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In order to obtain a judgment in his or
her favor, the claimant must show by clear and convincing evidence
that:
(a) The claimant was convicted of one or more felonies in superior
court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has
served all or any part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any conviction other than
those that are the basis for the claim;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of significant new
exculpatory information or, if a new trial was ordered following the
presentation of significant new exculpatory information, either the
claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not
retried and the accusatory instrument dismissed;
(d) The claimant did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in
the charging documents; and
(e) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about his or her conviction. A guilty plea
to a crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later
proven to be false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence
under this subsection. Evidence of a guilty plea or confession later
proven to be false may be considered by the trier of fact in
determining a claim for compensation under this chapter.
(2) Any pardon or proclamation issued to the claimant by the
governor shall be admissible as evidence when it is certified by the
officer having lawful custody of the pardon or proclamation, with the
seal of the office of the governor affixed, or with the official
certificate of such officer.
(3) In exercising its discretion regarding the weight and
admissibility of evidence, the court shall give due consideration to
difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time, the death or
unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of evidence, or other
factors not caused by the parties.
(4) The claimant shall not be compensated for any period of time in
which he or she was serving a term of imprisonment or a concurrent
sentence for any conviction other than the felony or felonies that are
the basis for the claim.
(5) If the jury or, in the case where the right to a jury is
waived, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
claimant was wrongly convicted, the court shall order the county to pay
the claimant the following monetary damages, as adjusted for partial
years served and to account for inflation from the effective date of
this section:
(a) Fifty thousand dollars for each year of actual confinement
including time spent awaiting trial and an additional fifty thousand
dollars for each year served on death row;
(b) Twenty-five thousand dollars for each year served on parole,
community custody, or as a registered sex offender pursuant only to the
felony or felonies which are grounds for the claim;
(c) Reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees, court
costs, and all other sums paid by the claimant as required by pretrial
orders and the judgment and sentence; and
(d) Attorneys' fees for successfully bringing the wrongful
conviction claim calculated at ten percent of the monetary damages
awarded under subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section. However,
attorneys' fees shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars. These
fees shall not be deducted from the compensation due to the claimant
and counsel shall not be entitled to receive additional fees from the
client related to the claim. The court may not award any attorneys'
fees to the claimant if the claimant fails to prove he or she was
wrongly convicted.
(6) In addition to monetary damages and attorneys' fees awarded
under subsection (5) of this section:
(a) The state shall waive any interest on child support arrearages
that accrued while the claimant was in custody on the felony or
felonies which are grounds for the claim.
(b) The claimant and his or her dependent children and spouse or
registered domestic partner are eligible to participate in the health
and dental insurance plans and contracts offered by the public
employees' benefits board for a period of up to ten years following the
date of judgment. Upon request of the claimant the court shall issue
an order directing the health care authority to enroll the claimant and
his or her dependent children and spouse or registered domestic partner
under an appropriate existing nonemployee eligibility type, as provided
for in section 11 of this act. The court order must specify the amount
of time for which the claimant and his or her dependent children and
spouse or registered domestic partner are eligible to receive benefits,
and that the claimant and his or her dependent children and spouse or
registered domestic partner shall not be responsible for any premiums
associated with participation.
(7) The compensation and monetary damages award shall not include
any punitive damages.
(8) The compensation and monetary damages award shall not be offset
by any expenses incurred by the state, the county, or any political
subdivision of the state including, but not limited to, expenses
incurred to secure the claimant's custody, or to feed, clothe, or
provide medical services for the claimant. The court shall not offset
against the monetary damages award the value of any services or
reduction in fees for services to be provided to the claimant as part
of the award under this section.
(9) Compensation awarded under this act is not income for tax
purposes.
(10)(a) Upon finding that the claimant was wrongly convicted, the
court shall seal the claimant's record of conviction.
(b) Upon request of the claimant, the court may order the
claimant's record of conviction vacated if the record has not already
been vacated, expunged, or destroyed under court rules. The
requirements for vacating records under RCW 9.94A.640 shall not apply.
(11) Upon request of the claimant, the court shall refer the
claimant to the department of corrections or the department of social
and health services for access to reentry services, if available,
including but not limited to the community-based transition programs
and long-term support programs for education, mentoring, life skills
training, assessment, job skills development, mental health and
substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) On or after the effective date of this
section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal and
vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 4(1)(c)(ii) of this act, the court shall provide
to the claimant a copy of sections 2 through 11 of this act at the time
the relief is granted.
(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence
review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the
governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after the effective
date of this section, shall provide a copy of sections 2 through 11 of
this act to the individual pardoned.
(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she shall have an additional twelve months, beyond
the statute of limitations under section 9 of this act, to bring a
claim under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) As a condition of accepting compensation
under this chapter, the claimant forfeits all other claims related to
the underlying wrongful conviction cognizable under state tort law.
However, nothing in this chapter precludes any federal remedy available
to the claimant related to his or her wrongful conviction and
imprisonment.
(2) In the event that the claimant receives a federal tort award
related to his or her wrongful conviction and incarceration, the
claimant shall reimburse the entity that provided compensation under
this act for the amount of compensation received or the amount received
by the claimant under the tort award, whichever is less.
(3) A release dismissal agreement, plea agreement, or any similar
agreement whereby the prosecutor's office or an agent acting on its
behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain action if the accused
individual agrees to forgo legal action against the county, the state
of Washington, or any political subdivision, is admissible and should
be evaluated in light of all the evidence. However, any such agreement
is not dispositive of the question of whether the claimant was wrongly
convicted or entitled to compensation under this act.
(4) The county is responsible for monetary damages awarded under
this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the county from
satisfying its obligation through risk pool or insurance coverage.
(5) If the county does not pay the claim within one hundred eighty
days of the court order, the court shall order the state to satisfy the
judgment. Upon payment by the state, the state is entitled to
reimbursement, from the county named as the adverse party in the claim,
in an amount equal to the value of the claim paid and any reasonable
fees and interest imposed by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Except as provided in section 7(3) of this
act, an action for compensation under this chapter must be commenced
within three years after the grant of a pardon, the grant of judicial
relief and satisfaction of other conditions described in section 4 of
this act, or release from custody, whichever is later; provided,
however, that any action by the state challenging or appealing the
grant of judicial relief or release from custody shall toll the three-year period. Any persons meeting the criteria set forth in section 2
of this act who was wrongly convicted before the effective date of this
section may commence an action under this chapter within three years
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in subsection (2) of this section and
the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the
following persons:
(a) A wrongly convicted person; and
(b) Any child or stepchild of a wrongly convicted person who was
born or became the stepchild of, or was adopted by, the wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 6 of this
act.
(2) The following conditions apply to waivers under subsection (1)
of this section:
(a) A wrongly convicted person must be a Washington domiciliary to
be eligible for the tuition waiver.
(b) A child must be a Washington domiciliary ages seventeen through
twenty-six years to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A child's
marital status does not affect eligibility.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for
those who qualify under subsection (1) of this section but are
encouraged.
(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (1) of this
section may attend full time or part time. Total credits earned using
the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the
equivalent of semester credits.
(3) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Child" means a biological child, stepchild, or adopted child
who was born of, became the stepchild of, or was adopted by a wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 6 of this
act.
(b) "Fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a
condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related
activities at an institution of higher education.
(c) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. In
ascertaining whether a wrongly convicted person or child is domiciled
in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education
shall, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided
in RCW 28B.15.013.
(d) "Wrongly convicted person" means a Washington domiciliary who
was awarded damages under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who was awarded a judgment in his or her favor
under section 6 of this act and his or her dependent children and
spouse or registered domestic partner are eligible to participate in
the health insurance plans and contracts offered by the public
employees' benefits board as prescribed by court order, and none of
those persons eligible under this section are responsible for any
premiums associated with that participation.
(2) The health care authority, upon receipt of the court order,
shall enroll the individual and his or her dependent children and
spouse or registered domestic partner in a health insurance plan under
an appropriate existing nonemployee eligibility type in compliance with
the terms and conditions of the court order.
(3) The director shall adopt rules under RCW 41.05.050 as the
director may find necessary to implement this section and to avoid
conflicts with any applicable federal or state laws. However, nothing
in this section requires the director or the health care authority to
develop a new eligibility type.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When a court refers a person to the department under section 6 of
this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful conviction claim,
the department shall provide reasonable access to existing reentry
programs and services. Nothing in this section requires the department
to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---