BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.04.045 and 2006 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for the
following functions:
(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and
agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing
these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement
of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in
such standards;
(2) Managing and administering the state library;
(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development
of library services;
(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by
purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting
the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in the cost-effective purchase of information resources;
(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter
41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter;
(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities
as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the
state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In
agreements for services between the library and other state agencies,
the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary
reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such
an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;
(7) Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to
effectively provide library and information services to members of the
legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection with
their official duties;
(8) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state
of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable
historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and
circulation;
(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public
information and services, including providing, or providing for, a
service that identifies, describes, and provides location information
for government information through electronic means, and that assists
government agencies in making their information more readily available
to the public;
(10) Collecting and distributing copies of state publications, as
defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency for
distribution. The state library shall maintain the state publications
distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW to provide copies
of materials that are not available in electronic format to state
depository libraries;
(11) Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with
RCW 27.12.305;
(12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their
information needs;
(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and
staff of state-supported residential institutions;
(14) Providing for library and information services to persons
throughout the state who are blind and/or ((physically handicapped))
have a physical handicap;
(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library
boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the
establishment and development of library services;
(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to
provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library
facilities and services throughout the state;
(17) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information, reference, and
referral resource for all libraries in the state. The state library
may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge the state
library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by
the state library as a recovery of costs; ((and))
(18) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms thereof
grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the purpose of
qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is authorized to
make applications and reports required by the grantor; and
(19) Charging an amount for research that is requested of the state
library by a person who is not a resident of Washington to recover the
cost of fulfilling the request.

--- END ---