BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.122.130 and 2011 c 263 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2013, the commission must contract with a
statewide, nonprofit entity whose purpose is to reduce damages to
underground and above ground facilities, promote safe excavation
practices, and review complaints of alleged violations of this chapter.
The contract must not obligate funding by the commission for activities
performed by the nonprofit entity or the safety committee under this
section, and is therefore exempt under RCW 39.29.040(1) from the
requirements of chapter 39.29 RCW.
(2) By January 1, 2013, the contracting entity must create a safety
committee to:
(a) Advise the commission and other state agencies, the
legislature, and local governments on best practices and training to
prevent damage to underground utilities, and policies to enhance worker
and public safety; and
(b) Review complaints alleging violations of this chapter involving
practices related to underground facilities.
(3)(a) The safety committee will consist of thirteen members, who
must be nominated by represented groups and appointed by the
contracting entity to staggered three-year terms. By January 1, 2013,
the safety committee must include representatives of:
(((a))) (i) Local governments;
(((b))) (ii) A natural gas utility subject to regulation under
Titles 80 and 81 RCW;
(((c))) (iii) Contractors;
(((d))) (iv) Excavators;
(((e))) (v) An electric utility subject to regulation under Title
80 RCW;
(((f))) (vi) A consumer-owned utility, as defined in RCW
19.27A.140;
(((g))) (vii) A pipeline company;
(((h))) (viii) The insurance industry;
(((i))) (ix) The commission; and
(((j))) (x) A telecommunications company.
(b) By January 1, 2013, the safety committee may pass bylaws and
provide for those organizational processes that are necessary to
complete the safety committee's tasks.
(4) The safety committee must meet at least once every three
months.
(5) After January 1, 2013, the safety committee may review
complaints of alleged violations of this chapter involving practices
related to underground facilities. Any person may bring a complaint to
the safety committee regarding an alleged violation occurring on or
after January 1, 2013.
(6) To review complaints of alleged violations, the safety
committee must appoint at least three and not more than five members as
a review committee. The review committee must include the same number
of members representing excavators and facility operators. One member
representing facility operators must also be a representative of a
pipeline company or a natural gas utility subject to regulation under
Titles 80 and 81 RCW. The review committee must also include a member
representing the insurance industry.
(7) Before reviewing a complaint alleging a violation of this
chapter, the review committee must notify the person making the
complaint and the alleged violator of its review and of the opportunity
to participate.
(8) After January 1, 2013, the safety committee may provide written
notification to the commission, with supporting documentation, that a
person has likely committed a violation of this chapter, and recommend
remedial action that may include a penalty amount, training, or
education to improve public safety, or some combination thereof.
(9) This section expires December 31, 2020.

Sec. 2 2011 c 263 s 27 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Except for section 18 of this act (chapter 263, Laws of 2011), this
act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---