BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.110A.020 and 2005 c 332 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
the following rules apply:
(a) To the extent that a provision of a decedent's will provides
for the apportionment of an estate tax, the tax must be apportioned
accordingly.
(b) Any portion of an estate tax not apportioned pursuant to (a) of
this subsection must be apportioned in accordance with any provision of
a revocable trust of which the decedent was the settlor which provides
for the apportionment of an estate tax. If conflicting apportionment
provisions appear in two or more revocable trust instruments, the
provision in the most recently dated instrument prevails. For purposes
of this subsection (1)(b):
(i) A trust is revocable if it was revocable immediately after the
trust instrument was executed, even if the trust subsequently becomes
irrevocable; and
(ii) The date of an amendment to a revocable trust instrument is
the date of the amended instrument only if the amendment contains an
apportionment provision.
(c) If any portion of an estate tax is not apportioned pursuant to
(a) or (b) of this subsection, and a provision in any other dispositive
instrument provides that any interest in the property disposed of by
the instrument is or is not to be applied to the payment of the estate
tax attributable to the interest disposed of by the instrument, the
provision controls the apportionment of the tax to that interest.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, and unless the
decedent provides to the contrary, the following rules apply:
(a) If an apportionment provision provides that a person receiving
an interest in property under an instrument is to be exonerated from
the responsibility to pay an estate tax that would otherwise be
apportioned to the interest:
(i) The tax attributable to the exonerated interest must be
apportioned among the other persons receiving interests passing under
the instrument; or
(ii) If the values of the other interests are less than the tax
attributable to the exonerated interest, the deficiency must be
apportioned ratably among the other persons receiving interests in the
apportionable estate that are not exonerated from apportionment of the
tax.
(b) If an apportionment provision provides that an estate tax is to
be apportioned to an interest in property a portion of which qualifies
for a marital or charitable deduction, the estate tax must first be
apportioned ratably among the holders of the portion that does not
qualify for a marital or charitable deduction and then apportioned
ratably among the holders of the deductible portion to the extent that
the value of the nondeductible portion is insufficient.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this subsection, if an
apportionment provision provides that an estate tax be apportioned to
property in which one or more time-limited interests exist, other than
interests in specified property under RCW 83.110A.060, the tax must be
apportioned to the principal of that property, regardless of the
deductibility of some of the interests in that property.
(d) If an apportionment provision provides that an estate tax is to
be apportioned to the holders of interests in property in which one or
more time-limited interests exist and a charity has an interest that
otherwise qualifies for an estate tax charitable deduction, the tax
must first be apportioned, to the extent feasible, to interests in
property that have not been distributed to the persons entitled to
receive the interests. No tax shall be paid from a charitable
remainder annuity trust or a charitable remainder unitrust described in
section 664 of the internal revenue code and created during the
decedent's life.
(e) Persons receiving tangible personal property as defined in RCW
11.12.260 by specific gifts pursuant to the provisions of a will or
revocable trust or by right of survivorship, are exonerated from
apportionment of estate tax up to an aggregate value of property
permitted to pass by affidavit for small estates pursuant to RCW
11.62.010(2)(c).
(f) Persons receiving specific pecuniary gifts pursuant to the
provisions of a will or revocable trust are exonerated from
apportionment of estate tax up to an aggregate amount of money equal to
one-half of the value of property permitted to pass by affidavit for
small estates pursuant to RCW 11.62.010(2)(c).
(g) If persons receive an aggregate value of tangible personal
property or the amount of money in excess of the ceiling allowed to be
exonerated for apportionment for estate taxes for that type of
property, the portion of each gift to be exonerated is the maximum
amount of money or value of tangible personal property that is allowed
to be exonerated multiplied by the proportion of money received by each
person over the amount of money received by all persons, or the value
of tangible personal property received by each person over the value of
all tangible personal property received by all persons.
(3) A provision that apportions an estate tax is ineffective to the
extent that it increases the tax apportioned to a person having an
interest in the gross estate over which the decedent had no power to
transfer immediately before the decedent executed the instrument in
which the apportionment direction was made. For purposes of this
section, a testamentary power of appointment is a power to transfer the
property that is subject to the power.

--- END ---