BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that medical
assistants are health professionals specifically trained to work in
settings, such as physicians' offices, clinics, group practices, and
other health care facilities. These multiskilled personnel are trained
to perform administrative and clinical procedures under the supervision
of health care providers. Physicians value this unique versatility
more and more because of the skills of medical assistants and their
ability to contain costs and manage human resources efficiently. The
demand for medical assistants is expanding rapidly. The efficient and
effective delivery of health care in Washington will be improved by
recognizing the valuable contributions of medical assistants, and
providing statutory support for medical assistants in Washington state.
The legislature further finds that rural and small medical practices
and clinics may have limited access to formally trained medical
assistants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the
functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of
practice of the health care provider and the training and experience of
the medical assistant.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW; or
(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an
osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW.
(4) "Medical assistant-certified" means a person certified under
section 5 of this act who assists a health care practitioner with
patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and
performs functions as provided in section 6 of this act under the
supervision of the health care practitioner.
(5) "Medical assistant-hemodialysis technician" means a person
certified under section 4 of this act who performs hemodialysis and
other functions pursuant to section 6 of this act under the supervision
of the health care practitioner.
(6) "Medical assistant-phlebotomist" means a health care
practitioner certified under section 5 of this act who performs
capillary, venous, and arterial invasive procedures for blood
withdrawal and other functions pursuant to section 6 of this act under
the supervision of a health care practitioner.
(7) "Medical assistant-registered" means a person registered under
section 5 of this act who, pursuant to an endorsement by a health care
practitioner, clinic, or group practice, assists a health care
practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical
procedures, and performs functions as provided in section 6 of this act
under the supervision of the health care practitioner.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(9) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is
physically present and is immediately available in the facility, but
does not need to be present during procedures to withdraw blood.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No person may practice as a medical
assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, or
medical assistant-phlebotomist unless he or she is certified under
section 5 of this act.
(2) No person may practice as a medical assistant-registered unless
he or she is registered under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The secretary shall adopt rules
specifying the minimum qualifications for a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, and medical
assistant-phlebotomist. The qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician shall be equivalent to the qualifications for
hemodialysis technicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.135 RCW as of
January 1, 2012.
(2) The secretary shall adopt rules that establish the minimum
requirements necessary for a health care practitioner, clinic, or group
practice to endorse a medical assistant as qualified to perform the
duties authorized by this chapter and be able to file an attestation of
that endorsement with the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The secretary shall issue a
certification as a medical assistant-certified to any person who has
satisfactorily completed a medical assistant training program approved
by the secretary, passed an examination approved by the secretary, and
met any additional qualifications established under section 4 of this
act.
(2) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical
assistant-hemodialysis technician to any person who meets the
qualifications for a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician
established under section 4 of this act.
(3) The secretary shall issue a certification as a medical
assistant-phlebotomist to any person who meets the qualifications for
a medical assistant-phlebotomist established under section 4 of this
act.
(4)(a) The secretary shall issue a registration as a medical
assistant-registered to any person who has a current endorsement from
a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.
(b) In order to be endorsed under this subsection (4), a person
must:
(i) Be endorsed by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group
practice that meets the qualifications established under section 4 of
this act; and
(ii) Have a current attestation of his or her endorsement to
perform specific medical tasks signed by a supervising health care
practitioner filed with the department. A medical assistant-registered
may only perform the medical tasks listed in his or her current
attestation of endorsement.
(c) A registration based on an endorsement by a health care
practitioner, clinic, or group practice is not transferrable to another
health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice.
(5) A certification issued under subsections (1) through (3) of
this section is transferrable between different practice settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A medical assistant-certified may
perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision
of, a health care practitioner:
(a) Fundamental procedures:
(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;
(ii) Sterilization procedures;
(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and
(iv) Practicing standard precautions.
(b) Clinical procedures:
(i) Performing aseptic procedures;
(ii) Preparing of and assisting in sterile procedures;
(iii) Taking vital signs;
(iv) Preparing patients for examination;
(v) Capillary blood withdrawal, venipuncture, and intradermal,
subcutaneous, and intramuscular injections; and
(vi) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.
(c) Specimen collection:
(i) Capillary puncture and venipuncture;
(ii) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and
(iii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and
fecal specimens.
(d) Diagnostic testing:
(i) Electrocardiography;
(ii) Respiratory testing; and
(iii) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory
improvement amendments program on the effective date of this section.
The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under
this subsection (1)(d) based on changes made by the federal clinical
laboratory improvement amendments program.
(e) Patient care:
(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and
gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment
based on medical knowledge;
(ii) Obtaining vital signs;
(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;
(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;
(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and
specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office
surgeries;
(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and
(vii) Screening and following up on test results.
(f)(i) Administering medications. A medical assistant-certified or
a medical assistant-registered may only administer medications if the
drugs are:
(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage
calculated by a health care practitioner. For purposes of this
section, a combination vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;
(B) Limited to legend drugs, vaccines, and Schedule III-V
controlled substances as authorized by a health care practitioner under
the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by
the secretary under (f)(ii) of this subsection; and
(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care
practitioner.
(ii) The secretary may, by rule, limit the drugs that may be
administered under this subsection. The rules adopted under this
subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.
(2) A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may perform
hemodialysis when delegated and supervised by a health care
practitioner. A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may also
administer vaccines, drugs, and oxygen to a patient when delegated and
supervised by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted
by the secretary.
(3) A medical assistant-phlebotomist may perform capillary, venous,
or arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal and administer
vaccines when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner
and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.
(4) A medical assistant-registered may perform the following duties
delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:
(a) Fundamental procedures:
(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;
(ii) Sterilization procedures;
(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and
(iv) Practicing standard precautions.
(b) Clinical procedures:
(i) Preparing for sterile procedures;
(ii) Taking vital signs;
(iii) Preparing patients for examination; and
(iv) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.
(c) Specimen collection:
(i) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and
(ii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and
fecal specimens.
(d) Patient care:
(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and
gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment
based on medical knowledge;
(ii) Obtaining vital signs;
(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;
(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;
(v) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and
(vi) Screening and following up on test results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Prior to delegation of any of the functions
in section 6 of this act, a health care practitioner shall determine to
the best of his or her ability each of the following:
(1) That the task is within that health care practitioner's scope
of licensure or authority;
(2) That the task is indicated for the patient;
(3) The appropriate level of supervision;
(4) That no law prohibits the delegation;
(5) That the person to whom the task will be delegated is competent
to perform that task; and
(6) That the task itself is one that should be appropriately
delegated when considering the following factors:
(a) That the task can be performed without requiring the exercise
of judgment based on medical knowledge;
(b) That results of the task are reasonably predictable;
(c) That the task can be performed without a need for complex
observations or critical decisions;
(d) That the task can be performed without repeated medical
assessments; and
(e) That the task, if performed improperly, would not present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to
the patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) In addition to any other authority
provided by law, the secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(c) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
Until July 1, 2016, for purposes of setting fees under this section,
the secretary shall consider persons registered or certified under this
chapter and health care assistants, certified under chapter 18.135 RCW,
as one profession;
(d) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(e) Maintain the official department of health record of all
applicants and credential holders; and
(f) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive
registration or certification.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a registration or
certification, and the discipline of persons registered or certified
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department may not issue new
certifications for category C, D, E, or F health care assistants on or
after the effective date of this section. The department shall certify
a category C, D, E, or F health care assistant who was certified prior
to the effective date of this section as a medical assistant-certified
when he or she renews his or her certification.
(2) The department may not issue new certifications for category G
health care assistants on or after the effective date of this section.
The department shall certify a category G health care assistant who was
certified prior to the effective date of this section as a medical
assistant-hemodialysis technician when he or she renews his or her
certification.
(3) The department may not issue new certifications for category A
or B health care assistants on or after the effective date of this
section. The department shall certify a category A or B health care
assistant who was certified prior to the effective date of this section
as a medical assistant-phlebotomist when he or she renews his or her
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter prohibits or
affects:
(1) A person licensed under this title performing services within
his or her scope of practice;
(2) A person performing functions in the discharge of official
duties on behalf of the United States government including, but not
limited to, the armed forces, coast guard, public health service,
veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs;
(3) A person trained by a federally approved end-stage renal
disease facility who performs end-stage renal dialysis in the home
setting;
(4) A person registered or certified under this chapter from
performing blood-drawing procedures in the residences of research study
participants when the procedures have been authorized by the
institutional review board of a comprehensive cancer center or
nonprofit degree-granting institution of higher education and are
conducted under the general supervision of a physician; or
(5) A person participating in an externship as part of an approved
medical assistant training program under the direct supervision of an
on-site health care provider.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.120.020 and 2010 c 286 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental
health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW;
((and)) nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A
RCW; and medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis
technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 16 of this act).
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.120.020 and 2012 c ... s 11 (section 11 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; ((health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW;)) massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental
health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW;
nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;
and medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis
technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 16 of this act).
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.130.040 and 2011 c 41 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxi) Recreational therapists (([under chapter 18.230 RCW])) under
chapter 18.230 RCW;
(xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; ((and))
(xxv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW; and
(xxvi) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical
assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.--- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 16 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.130.040 and 2012 c ... s 13 (section 13 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiii) ((Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xiv))) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(((xv))) (xiv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical
dependency professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(((xvii))) (xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73
RCW or RCW 18.71.205;
(((xviii))) (xvii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(((xix))) (xviii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under
chapter 18.200 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Animal massage practitioners certified under
chapter 18.240 RCW;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW; and
(((xxvi))) (xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical
assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.--- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 16 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.135.055 and 1996 c 191 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
The health care facility or health care practitioner registering an
initial or continuing certification pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280. For the purposes of setting fees under this
section, the secretary shall consider health care assistants and
persons registered and certified under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 16 of this act) as one profession.
All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the
health professions account as required in RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1,
2016:
(1) RCW 18.135.010 (Practices authorized) and 2009 c 43 s 2, 2008
c 58 s 1, & 1984 c 281 s 1;
(2) RCW 18.135.020 (Definitions) and 2009 c 43 s 4, 2008 c 58 s 2,
2001 c 22 s 2, & 1997 c 133 s 1;
(3) RCW 18.135.025 (Rules -- Legislative intent) and 1986 c 216 s 1;
(4) RCW 18.135.030 (Health care assistant profession -- Duties--Requirements for certification -- Rules) and 1999 c 151 s 201, 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 515, 1991 c 3 s 273, 1986 c 216 s 2, & 1984 c 281 s 4;
(5) RCW 18.135.035 (Requirements for certification -- Military
training or experience) and 2011 c 32 s 12;
(6) RCW 18.135.040 (Certification of health care assistants) and
2006 c 242 s 3 & 1984 c 281 s 3;
(7) RCW 18.135.050 (Certification by health care facility or
practitioner -- Roster -- Recertification) and 1996 c 191 s 82, 1991 c 3 s
274, & 1984 c 281 s 5;
(8) RCW 18.135.055 (Registering an initial or continuing
certification -- Fees) and 2012 c . . . s 15 (section 15 of this act),
1996 c 191 s 83, 1991 c 3 s 275, & 1985 c 117 s 1;
(9) RCW 18.135.060 (Conditions for performing authorized
functions -- Renal dialysis) and 2001 c 22 s 3, 2000 c 171 s 30, & 1993
c 13 s 1;
(10) RCW 18.135.062 (Renal dialysis training task force--Development of core competencies) and 2001 c 22 s 4;
(11) RCW 18.135.065 (Delegation -- Duties of delegator and delegatee)
and 2009 c 43 s 5, 2008 c 58 s 3, 1991 c 3 s 276, & 1986 c 216 s 4;
(12) RCW 18.135.070 (Complaints -- Violations -- Investigations--Disciplinary action) and 1993 c 367 s 11 & 1984 c 281 s 7;
(13) RCW 18.135.090 (Performance of authorized functions) and 1984
c 281 s 9;
(14) RCW 18.135.100 (Uniform Disciplinary Act) and 1993 c 367 s 12;
(15) RCW 18.135.110 (Blood-drawing procedures -- Not prohibited by
chapter -- Requirements) and 2006 c 242 s 2; and
(16) RCW 18.135.120 (Administration of vaccines -- Restrictions) and
2008 c 58 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The secretary of health shall adopt any
rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 11, 13, and 15 of this
act take effect July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 12 and 14 of this act take effect
July 1, 2016.

--- END ---