BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.052 and 1995 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote the public interest consistent with the purposes of
chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the
department shall continue to require hospitals to submit hospital
financial and patient discharge information, which shall be collected,
maintained, analyzed, and disseminated by the department. The
department shall, if deemed cost-effective and efficient, contract with
a private entity for any or all parts of data collection. Data
elements shall be reported in conformance with a uniform reporting
system established by the department. This includes data elements
identifying each hospital's revenues, expenses, contractual allowances,
charity care, bad debt, other income, total units of inpatient and
outpatient services, and other financial and employee compensation
information reasonably necessary to fulfill the purposes of this
section. Data elements relating to use of hospital services by
patients shall be the same as those currently compiled by hospitals
through inpatient discharge abstracts. The department shall encourage
and permit reporting by electronic transmission or hard copy as is
practical and economical to reporters.
(2) In identifying financial reporting requirements, the department
may require both annual reports and condensed quarterly reports from
hospitals, so as to achieve both accuracy and timeliness in reporting,
but shall craft such requirements with due regard of the data reporting
burdens of hospitals.
(3)(a) Beginning with compensation information for 2012, unless a
hospital is operated on a for-profit basis, the department shall
require a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW to annually submit
employee compensation information. To satisfy employee compensation
reporting requirements to the department, a hospital shall submit
information as directed in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection. A
hospital may determine whether to report under (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection for purposes of reporting.
(i) Within one hundred thirty-five days following the end of each
hospital's fiscal year, a nonprofit hospital shall file the appropriate
schedule of the federal internal revenue service form 990 that
identifies the employee compensation information with the department.
If the lead administrator responsible for the hospital or the lead
administrator's compensation is not identified on the schedule of form
990 that identifies the employee compensation information, the hospital
shall also submit the compensation information for the lead
administrator as directed by the department's form required in (b) of
this subsection.
(ii) Within one hundred thirty-five days following the end of each
hospital's calendar year, a hospital shall submit the names and
compensation of the five highest compensated employees of the hospital
who do not have any direct patient responsibilities. Compensation
information shall be reported on a calendar year basis for the calendar
year immediately preceding the reporting date. If those five highest
compensated employees do not include the lead administrator for the
hospital, compensation information for the lead administrator shall
also be submitted. Compensation information shall include base
compensation, bonus and incentive compensation, other payments that
qualify as reportable compensation, retirement and other deferred
compensation, and nontaxable benefits.
(b) To satisfy the reporting requirements of this subsection (3),
the department shall create a form and make it available no later than
August 1, 2012. To the greatest extent possible, the form shall follow
the format and reporting requirements of the portion of the internal
revenue service form 990 schedule relating to compensation information.
If the internal revenue service substantially revises its schedule, the
department shall update its form.
(4) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the
department shall only be available for retrieval in original or
processed form to public and private requestors and shall be available
within a reasonable period of time after the date of request. The cost
of retrieving data for state officials and agencies shall be funded
through the state general appropriation. The cost of retrieving data
for individuals and organizations engaged in research or private use of
data or studies shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the
department that reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or
study in the requested form.
(((4))) (5) The department shall, in consultation and collaboration
with the federally recognized tribes, urban or other Indian health
service organizations, and the federal area Indian health service,
design, develop, and maintain an American Indian-specific health data,
statistics information system. The department rules regarding
confidentiality shall apply to safeguard the information from
inappropriate use or release.
(((5))) (6) All persons subject to the data collection requirements
of this section shall comply with departmental requirements established
by rule in the acquisition of data.

--- END ---