BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.050 and 2008 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 18.130.062, the disciplining authority
has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter;
(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;
(4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, consideration of an application for license, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(7) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews and to issue
citations and assess fines for failure to produce documents, records,
or other items in accordance with RCW 18.130.230;
(8) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Within fourteen
days of a request by the affected license holder, the disciplining
authority must provide a show cause hearing in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 18.130.135. Consistent with RCW 18.130.370, a
disciplining authority shall issue a summary suspension of the license
or temporary practice permit of a license holder prohibited from
practicing a health care profession in another state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional conduct that
is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct
prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings
by the Washington disciplining authority have been completed;
(9) To conduct show cause hearings in accordance with RCW
18.130.062 or 18.130.135 to review an action taken by the disciplining
authority to suspend a license or restrict or limit a license holder's
practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(10) ((To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW
18.130.095(3) or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in
chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority
shall make the final decision regarding disposition of the license
unless the disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the
final decision to the presiding officer. Disciplining authorities
identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) may not delegate the final decision
regarding disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions to a
presiding officer in any case pertaining to standards of practice or
where clinical expertise is necessary;
(11))) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations and to authorize the issuance of a citation under
subsection (7) of this section. However, the member of the board shall
not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(((12))) (11) To enter into contracts for professional services
determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(((13))) (12) To contract with license holders or other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and
supervision of license holders who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized
purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(((14))) (13) To adopt standards of professional conduct or
practice;
(((15))) (14) To grant or deny license applications, and in the
event of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license
holder, to impose any sanction against a license applicant or license
holder provided by this chapter. After January 1, 2009, all sanctions
must be issued in accordance with RCW 18.130.390;
(((16))) (15) To restrict or place conditions on the practice of
new licensees in order to protect the public and promote the safety of
and confidence in the health care system;
(((17))) (16) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas
and statements of charges;
(((18))) (17) To establish panels consisting of three or more
members of the board to perform any duty or authority within the
board's jurisdiction under this chapter;
(((19))) (18) To review and audit the records of licensed health
facilities' or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which
a license holder's practice privilege or employment is terminated or
restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make
accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil
action pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.095 and 2008 c 134 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary, in consultation with the disciplining
authorities, shall develop uniform procedural rules to respond to
public inquiries concerning complaints and their disposition, active
investigations, statement of charges, findings of fact, and final
orders involving a license holder, applicant, or unlicensed person.
The uniform procedural rules adopted under this subsection apply to all
adjudicative proceedings conducted under this chapter and shall include
provisions for establishing time periods for initial assessment,
investigation, charging, discovery, settlement, and adjudication of
complaints, and shall include enforcement provisions for violations of
the specific time periods by the department, the disciplining
authority, and the respondent. A license holder must be notified upon
receipt of a complaint, except when the notification would impede an
effective investigation. At the earliest point of time the license
holder must be allowed to submit a written statement about that
complaint, which statement must be included in the file. Complaints
filed after July 27, 1997, are exempt from public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW until the complaint has been initially assessed and
determined to warrant an investigation by the disciplining authority.
Complaints determined not to warrant an investigation by the
disciplining authority are no longer considered complaints, but must
remain in the records and tracking system of the department.
Information about complaints that did not warrant an investigation,
including the existence of the complaint, may be released only upon
receipt of a written public disclosure request or pursuant to an
interagency agreement as provided in (b) of this subsection.
Complaints determined to warrant no cause for action after
investigation are subject to public disclosure, must include an
explanation of the determination to close the complaint, and must
remain in the records and tracking system of the department.
(b) The secretary, on behalf of the disciplining authorities, shall
enter into interagency agreements for the exchange of records, which
may include complaints filed but not yet assessed, with other state
agencies if access to the records will assist those agencies in meeting
their federal or state statutory responsibilities. Records obtained by
state agencies under the interagency agreements are subject to the
limitations on disclosure contained in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The uniform procedures for conducting investigations shall
provide that prior to taking a written statement:
(a) For violation of this chapter, the investigator shall inform
such person, in writing of: (i) The nature of the complaint; (ii) that
the person may consult with legal counsel at his or her expense prior
to making a statement; and (iii) that any statement that the person
makes may be used in an adjudicative proceeding conducted under this
chapter; and
(b) From a witness or potential witness in an investigation under
this chapter, the investigator shall inform the person, in writing,
that the statement may be released to the license holder, applicant, or
unlicensed person under investigation if a statement of charges is
issued.
(3) ((Only upon the authorization of a disciplining authority
identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), the secretary, or his or her
designee, may serve as the presiding officer for any disciplinary
proceedings of the disciplining authority authorized under this
chapter. The presiding officer shall not vote on or make any final
decision in cases pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical
expertise is necessary. All functions performed by the presiding
officer shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The secretary, in
consultation with the disciplining authorities, shall adopt procedures
for implementing this subsection.
(4))) The uniform procedural rules shall be adopted by all
disciplining authorities listed in RCW 18.130.040(2), and shall be used
for all adjudicative proceedings conducted under this chapter, as
defined by chapter 34.05 RCW. The uniform procedural rules shall
address the use of ((a presiding officer authorized in subsection (3)
of this section)) the office of administrative hearings under RCW
18.130.100(2) to determine and issue decisions on all legal issues and
motions arising during adjudicative proceedings.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.100 and 1989 c 175 s 69 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
govern all hearings before the disciplining authority. The
disciplining authority has, in addition to the powers and duties set
forth in this chapter, all of the powers and duties under chapter 34.05
RCW, which include, without limitation, all powers relating to the
administration of oaths, the receipt of evidence, the issuance and
enforcing of subpoenas, and the taking of depositions.
(2)(a) In all adjudicative proceedings held under this chapter, a
disciplining authority identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) shall use the
office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW.
The disciplining authority shall make the final decision regarding the
disposition of the license unless the disciplining authority elects to
delegate in writing the final decision to the presiding officer. The
disciplining authority may not delegate the final decision regarding
disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions in any case
pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical expertise is
necessary.
(b) In all adjudicative proceedings held under this chapter, the
secretary shall use the office of administrative hearings as authorized
in chapter 34.12 RCW. An administrative law judge appointed under RCW
34.12.030 shall enter an initial order pursuant to RCW 34.05.461
subject to review by the secretary or his or her designee. Pursuant to
RCW 34.05.464, the secretary may, by rule, provide that initial orders
in specified classes of cases may become final without further agency
action, unless, within a specified time period:
(i) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the
initial order should be reviewed; or
(ii) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative
review of the initial order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In all adjudicative proceedings before the secretary or the
department, the secretary shall use the office of administrative
hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW. An administrative law
judge appointed under RCW 34.12.030 shall enter an initial order
pursuant to RCW 34.05.461 subject to review by the secretary or his or
her designee. Pursuant to RCW 34.05.464, the secretary may, by rule,
provide that initial orders in specified classes of cases may become
final without further agency action, unless, within a specified time
period:
(1) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the
initial order should be reviewed; or
(2) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative
review of the initial order.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.45.080 and 1987 c 411 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The manufacturer is responsible for the actions and conduct of
its representatives with regard to drug samples.
(2) The board may hold a public hearing to examine a possible
violation and may require a designated representative of the
manufacturer to attend.
(3)(a) If a manufacturer fails to comply with this chapter
following notification by the board, the board may impose a civil
penalty of up to five thousand dollars. The board shall take no action
to impose any civil penalty except pursuant to a hearing held in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) In all adjudicative proceedings held under this section, the
board shall use the office of administrative hearings as authorized in
chapter 34.12 RCW. The board shall make the final decision unless it
elects to delegate in writing the final decision to the presiding
officer.
(4) Specific drug samples which are distributed in this state in
violation of this chapter, following notification by the board, shall
be subject to seizure following the procedures set out in RCW
69.41.060.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.50.305 and 1971 ex.s. c 308 s 69.50.305 are each
amended to read as follows:
(a) Any registration, or exemption from registration, issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall not be denied,
suspended, or revoked unless the board denies, suspends, or revokes
such registration, or exemption from registration, by proceedings
consistent with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The board may suspend any registration simultaneously with the
institution of proceedings under RCW 69.50.304, or where renewal of
registration is refused, if it finds that there is an imminent danger
to the public health or safety which warrants this action. The
suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the
proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn
by the board or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) In all adjudicative proceedings held under this section, the
board shall use the office of administrative hearings as authorized in
chapter 34.12 RCW. The board shall make the final decision unless it
elects to delegate in writing the final decision to the presiding
officer.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.05.120 and 2003 c 53 s 350 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any local health officer or administrative officer appointed
under RCW 70.05.040, if any, who shall refuse or neglect to obey or
enforce the provisions of chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or the
rules, regulations or orders of the state board of health or who shall
refuse or neglect to make prompt and accurate reports to the state
board of health, may be removed as local health officer or
administrative officer by the state board of health and shall not again
be reappointed except with the consent of the state board of health.
Any person may complain to the state board of health concerning the
failure of the local health officer or administrative officer to carry
out the laws or the rules and regulations concerning public health, and
the state board of health shall, if a preliminary investigation so
warrants, call a hearing to determine whether the local health officer
or administrative officer is guilty of the alleged acts. Such hearings
shall be held pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, and the
rules and regulations of the state board of health adopted thereunder.
In all adjudicative proceedings held under this section, the state
board of health shall use the office of administrative hearings as
authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW. The state board of health shall make
the final decision unless it elects to delegate in writing the final
decision to the presiding officer.
(2) Any member of a local board of health who shall violate any of
the provisions of chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or refuse or
neglect to obey or enforce any of the rules, regulations or orders of
the state board of health made for the prevention, suppression or
control of any dangerous contagious or infectious disease or for the
protection of the health of the people of this state, is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten
dollars nor more than two hundred dollars.
(3) Any physician who shall refuse or neglect to report to the
proper health officer or administrative officer within twelve hours
after first attending any case of contagious or infectious disease or
any diseases required by the state board of health to be reported or
any case suspicious of being one of such diseases, is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten
dollars nor more than two hundred dollars for each case that is not
reported.
(4) Any person violating any of the provisions of chapters 70.05,
70.24, and 70.46 RCW or violating or refusing or neglecting to obey any
of the rules, regulations or orders made for the prevention,
suppression and control of dangerous contagious and infectious diseases
by the local board of health or local health officer or administrative
officer or state board of health, or who shall leave any isolation
hospital or quarantined house or place without the consent of the
proper health officer or who evades or breaks quarantine or conceals a
case of contagious or infectious disease or assists in evading or
breaking any quarantine or concealing any case of contagious or
infectious disease, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction
thereof shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars
nor more than one hundred dollars or to imprisonment in the county jail
not to exceed ninety days or to both fine and imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The secretary of health, the state board of
health, and each disciplining authority, as defined in RCW 18.130.020,
shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) All employees of the department of
health serving as presiding officers in the department's adjudicative
proceedings prior to the effective date of this section, and any
administrative staff necessary to support the presiding officers, are
transferred to the office of administrative hearings. The number of
administrative staff who are transferred shall be determined by the
department of health and the office of administrative hearings based on
anticipated workload. Any such employees classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the office of
administrative hearings to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.
(2) Except for those employees explicitly made subject to transfer
to the office of administrative hearings from the department of health
pursuant to this section, the transfer of employees required under this
section shall not result in any increase in the total number of
full-time employees employed by the office of administrative hearings.
(3) The department of health shall not increase its number of
full-time employees as the result of, or in response to, the transfer
of employees required under this section.
(4) A nonsupervisory bargaining unit is created at the office of
administrative hearings. All nonsupervisory civil service employees of
the department of health assigned to the office of administrative
hearings under this section whose positions are within the existing
bargaining unit description at the department of health shall become
members of a nonsupervisory bargaining unit at the office of
administrative hearings under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. The
exclusive bargaining representative of the existing bargaining unit at
the department of health is certified as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the nonsupervisory bargaining unit at the office of
administrative hearings without the necessity of an election. The
bargaining unit of employees created under this section is an
appropriate unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. However,
nothing contained in this section shall be construed to alter the
authority of the public employment relations commission under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW to amend or modify the bargaining unit.

--- END ---