BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
The following are categorically exempt from the requirements of
this chapter:
(1) The installation, construction, relocation, repair,
replacement, maintenance, operation, or alteration of electric
facilities, lines, equipment, or appurtenances, not including
substations, with an associated voltage of one hundred fifteen thousand
volts or fewer;
(2) Building over existing distribution lines with transmission
lines of one hundred fifteen thousand volts or more; and
(3) Placing electric facilities, lines, equipment, or appurtenances
underground.

--- END ---