BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95M.010 and 2010 c 130 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bulk mercury" includes any elemental, nonamalgamated mercury,
regardless of volume quantity or weight and does not include products
containing mercury collected for recycling or disposal at a permitted
disposal facility.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic,
physician's office, or health maintenance organization.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a mercury-added or prohibited lead product or an
importer or domestic distributor of a mercury-added or prohibited lead
product produced in a foreign country. In the case of a multicomponent
product containing mercury or lead, the manufacturer is the last
manufacturer to produce or assemble the product. If the multicomponent
product or mercury-added or prohibited lead product is produced in a
foreign country, the manufacturer is the first importer or domestic
distributor.
(6) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell battery
to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.
(7) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product intended
mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. Mercury-added
novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use as
practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments,
yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items
of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not
include games, toys, or products that require a button-cell or lithium
battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a lamp that contains
mercury.
(8) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include those products listed in the interstate
mercury education and reduction clearinghouse mercury-added products
database, but are not limited to, mercury thermometers, mercury
thermostats, mercury barometers, lamps, and mercury switches or relays.
(9) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that is used
for measuring blood pressure.
(10) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product that is
used for measuring temperature.
(11) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added or prohibited
lead product.
(12) "Switch" means any device, which may be referred to as a
switch, sensor, valve, probe, control, transponder, or any other
apparatus, that directly regulates or controls the flow of electricity,
gas, or other compounds, such as relays or transponders. "Switch"
includes all components of the unit necessary to perform its flow
control function. "Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience
switch, such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury
switch in antilock brake systems. "Utility switch" includes, but is
not limited to, all devices that open or close an electrical circuit,
or a liquid or gas valve. "Utility relay" includes, but is not limited
to, all products or devices that open or close electrical contacts to
control the operation of other devices in the same or other electrical
circuit.
(13) "Wholesaler" means a wholesaler of a mercury-added or
prohibited lead product.
(14) "Prohibited lead product" includes both of the following, but
excludes any product being used for the purposes of commercial fishing:
(a) Lead weighted fishing hook with the lead portion having a mass
of one ounce or less or a size of less than one inch along its shortest
axis; and
(b) Fishing sinker containing more than one-half of one percent
lead by weight if the lead portion of the sinker has a mass of one
ounce or less or a size of less than one inch along its shortest axis.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.050 and 2010 c 130 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for sale,
or distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added novelty.
A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must notify all retailers
that sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to
properly dispose of any remaining mercury-added novelty inventory.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for
sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a manometer used to
measure blood pressure or a thermometer that contains mercury. This
subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:
(i) An electronic thermometer with a button-cell battery containing
mercury;
(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy
products, and pet food processing;
(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial
measurement system or for veterinary medicine until such a time as the
system is replaced or a nonmercury component for the system or
application is available;
(iv) A thermometer or manometer that contains mercury that is used
for calibration of other thermometers, manometers, apparatus, or
equipment, unless a nonmercury calibration standard is approved for the
application by the national institute of standards and technology;
(v) A thermometer that is provided by prescription. A manufacturer
of a mercury thermometer shall supply clear instructions on the careful
handling of the thermometer to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should
a breakage occur; or
(vi) A manometer or thermometer sold or distributed to a hospital,
or a health care facility controlled by a hospital, if the hospital has
adopted a plan for mercury reduction consistent with the goals of the
mercury chemical action plan developed by the department under section
302, chapter 371, Laws of 2002.
(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer
inventory.
(3) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, install, or
reinstall a commercial or residential thermostat that contains mercury
unless the manufacturer of the thermostat conducts or participates in
a thermostat recovery or recycling program designed to assist
contractors in the proper disposal of thermostats that contain mercury
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq., the federal resource
conservation and recovery act.
(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006,
if the motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.
(6) Effective June 30, 2012, the sale or purchase and delivery of
bulk mercury is prohibited, including sales through the internet or
sales by private parties. However, the prohibition in this subsection
does not apply to immediate dangerous waste recycling facilities or
treatment, storage, and disposal facilities as approved by the
department and sales to research facilities, or industrial facilities
that provide products or services to entities exempted from this
chapter. The facilities described in this subsection must submit an
inventory of their purchase and use of bulk mercury to the department
on an annual basis, as well as any mercury waste generated from such
actions.
(7) Effective January 1, 2014, a person may not sell, offer for
sale, or purchase a prohibited lead product. The first entity located
in Washington in the stream of commerce for a prohibited lead product,
if not the ultimate retailer, must notify all retailers that sell its
product about the provisions of this section and how to properly
dispose of any remaining prohibited lead products in inventory.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95M.060 and 2003 c 260 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ((general administration must, by January 1,
2005, revise its)) enterprise services must maintain rules, policies,
and guidelines to implement the purpose of this chapter.
(2) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services must give priority and preference to the purchase of
equipment, supplies, and other products that contain no mercury-added
compounds or components, unless: (a) There is no economically feasible
nonmercury-added alternative that performs a similar function; or (b)
the product containing mercury is designed to reduce electricity
consumption by at least forty percent and there is no nonmercury or
lower mercury alternative available that saves the same or a greater
amount of electricity as the exempted product. In circumstances where
a nonmercury-added product is not available, preference must be given
to the purchase of products that contain the least amount of mercury
added to the product necessary for the required performance.
(3) The department of enterprise services is under no requirement
to revise rules or take other actions in regards to prohibited lead
products.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95M.070 and 2003 c 260 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to participate in a regional or
multistate clearinghouse to assist in carrying out any of the
requirements of this chapter. A clearinghouse may also be used for
examining notification and label requirements, developing education and
outreach activities, and maintaining a list of all mercury-added
products.
(2) This section does not apply to prohibited lead products.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95M.090 and 2003 c 260 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter applies to:
(a) Crematories as that term is defined in RCW 68.04.070; or
(b) Lead shot or other firearm ammunition.
(2) Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted as granting the
department expanded authority over the regulation of lead shot or other
firearm ammunition.

--- END ---