BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.245 and 2010 c 161 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who is the mother or father of a member of
the United States armed forces who died while in service to his or her
country, or as a result of his or her service, may apply to the
department for special gold star license plates for use on a motor
vehicle. The registered owner must:
(a) Be a resident of this state;
(b) Provide certification from the Washington state department of
veterans affairs that the registered owner qualifies for the special
license plate under this section; and
(c) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on
which the gold star license plates will be displayed((; and
(d) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the
motor vehicle)).
(2) Gold star license plates must be issued:
(a) Only for motor vehicles owned by qualifying applicants; and
(b) Without payment of any license plate fee, vehicle license fee,
or excise tax.
(3) Gold star license plates must be replaced, free of charge, if
the license plates become lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed.
(4) Gold star license plates may be transferred from one motor
vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the mother or father, as
described in subsection (1) of this section, upon application to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---