BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carryout bag" means a bag that is provided by a retail store
to a customer at the point of sale. "Carryout bag" does not include a
bag used solely to contain the following:
(a) Fresh meat and fresh meat products, including but not limited
to pork, beef, seafood, and poultry;
(b) Fruit or vegetables;
(c) Nuts or other bulk items;
(d) Dairy products;
(e) Ice;
(f) Prepared foods;
(g) Pharmaceutical products;
(h) Auto parts; and
(i) Jewelry.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Mil" means one-thousandth of an inch.
(4) "Plastic carryout bag" means a carryout bag that is made of
plastic with a thickness gauge of at least fifteen mils.
(5) "Recycle" means the act of transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration.
(6) "Retail store" means a place of business located in Washington
for the sale of goods or commodities directly to consumers.
(7) "Reusable carryout bag" means a carryout bag that is made of
durable plastic that is measured at a thickness gauge of at least
fifteen mils and:
(a) Is specifically designed and manufactured for multiple reuse;
or
(b) Is made of reusable, machine-washable, textile materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Every retail store operator who provides
plastic carryout bags to customers may establish, in lieu of any local
ordinance banning or restricting carryout bags pursuant to section 4 of
this act, an in-store recycling program for carryout bags that
includes, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) The provision of a bin for the collection of plastic carryout
bags that is placed in a visible location that is easily accessible to
the consumer and clearly marked as available for the purpose of
collecting plastic carryout bags for recycling;
(b) A process ensuring that all plastic carryout bags returned to
a store are collected, transported, and recycled in a manner consistent
with the provisions of this chapter, except that any plastic carryout
bags collected by a store that are contaminated by food or other
foreign material may be disposed of in any solid waste or hazardous
waste facility; and
(c) The provision to the consumer of an opportunity to purchase
reusable bags, which may be purchased and used in lieu of a plastic
carryout bag or paper bag, that is made available within the store.
(2) A retail store opting to establish an in-store recycling
program in lieu of compliance with a local ordinance developed under
section 4 of this act that operates the in-store recycling program in
violation of this section is subject to a class 1 civil infraction
under chapter 7.80 RCW. However, prior to being subject to a civil
infraction, the retail store must first receive a written notice of
violation and be provided with at least ninety days to correct any
violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any manufacturer or distributor of a
plastic carryout bag that sells plastic carryout bags to a retail store
must develop, and make available to retail stores, educational posters,
notices, and other materials to encourage the reducing, reusing, and
recycling of plastic.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor who sells plastic carryout bags
to a retail store must make arrangements with the retail store, upon
the retail store's request, for the collection, transport, and
recycling of all plastic carryout bags collected consistent with the
provisions of this chapter. Arrangements may include contracts or
other agreements with third parties at the cost of the manufacturer or
distributor.
(3) Any manufacturer or distributor operating in violation of this
section is subject to a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80
RCW. However, prior to being subject to a civil infraction, the
manufacturer or distributor must first receive a written notice of
violation and be provided with at least ninety days to correct any
violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Only a county may enact a local
ordinance that bans, restricts, or otherwise regulates, taxes, or
requires fees for the use of carryout bags in any geographic area
located within a county. An ordinance adopted by a county relating to
carryout bags must equally affect all retail stores located within the
geographic effective area of the ordinance.
(2) A county may only regulate the use of carryout bags in areas
that are adversely affected by chronic carryout bag littering problems
that may only be reasonably mitigated through restrictions on the use
of carryout bags.
(3) Prior to a county acting to regulate the use of carryout bags,
at least three cities, towns, or other units of local government
located wholly within the county must jointly request that the county
take legislative action regarding carryout bags. This request must
include findings of fact that demonstrate:
(a) A need for local carryout bag regulations;
(b) Justification for how chronic regional carryout bag littering
is causing a local health or safety concern; and
(c) Evidence that the regional carryout bag littering problem
cannot be mitigated through nonregulatory methods.
(4) If a county acts to regulate the use of carryout bags, the
county:
(a) Must first make good faith efforts for at least one year to
mitigate the effects of chronic carryout bag littering, including
working with retail stores on the establishment of in-store recycling
programs as provided in section 2 of this act; and
(b) May only do so regionally in an area no larger than the
jurisdictions of the cities, towns, or other units of local government
that requested the county action.
(5) Any county that enacts an ordinance that places a fee or tax on
the use of carryout bags made of any substance, or bans, restricts, or
otherwise regulates the use of carryout bags made of any substance,
must exempt from that ordinance any retail store that implements an in-store recycling program for carryout bags that is operated consistent
with the provisions of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that seeks to enact an ordinance relating to retail
store carryout bags, as those terms are defined in section 1 of this
act, must do so in compliance with the provisions of section 4 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities and towns are prohibited from enacting local regulations
regarding retail store carryout bags, as those terms are defined in
section 1 of this act. Any local restrictions may only be developed as
provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35A.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Code cities are prohibited from enacting local regulations
regarding retail store carryout bags, as those terms are defined in
section 1 of this act. Any local restrictions may only be developed as
provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax due under this chapter, there may be deducted
from the measure of the tax all reasonable costs incurred by retail
stores that are required by an act of county government under section
4 of this act to provide carryout bags made of paper to customers
instead of plastic carryout bags.
(2) The terms used in this section have the same meaning as
provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---