BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
rule-based categorical exemption thresholds to chapter 43.21C RCW,
found in WAC 197-11-800, have not been updated in recent years, and
should be reviewed in light of the increased environmental protections
in place under chapters 36.70A and 90.58 RCW, and other laws. It is
the intent of the legislature to direct the department of ecology to
conduct two phases of rule making over the next two years to increase
the thresholds for these categorical exemptions.
(2) By December 31, 2012, the department of ecology shall increase
the rule-based categorical exemptions to chapter 43.21C RCW found in
WAC 197-11-800 and update the environmental checklist found in WAC 197-
11-960. In updating the categorical exemptions, the department of
ecology must:
(a) At a minimum, increase the existing maximum threshold levels
for the following project types:
(i) The construction or location of single-family residential
developments;
(ii) The construction or location of multifamily residential
developments;
(iii) The construction of an agricultural structure, other than a
feed lot, that is similar to the following: A barn, a loafing shed, a
farm equipment storage building, or a produce storing or packing
structure;
(iv) The construction of the following, including any associated
parking areas or facilities: An office, a school, a commercial
building, a recreational building, a service building, or a storage
building;
(v) Landfilling or excavation activities; and
(vi) The installation of an electric facility, lines, equipment, or
appurtenances, other than substations.
(b) Establish maximum exemption levels for action types that differ
based on whether the project is proposed to occur in:
(i) An incorporated city;
(ii) An unincorporated area within an urban growth area;
(iii) An unincorporated area outside of an urban growth area but
within a county planning under chapter 36.70A RCW; or
(iv) An unincorporated area within a county not planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW.
(c) In updating the environmental checklist found in WAC 197-11-960, the department of ecology shall:
(i) Improve efficiency of the environmental checklist; and
(ii) Not include any new subjects into the scope of the checklist,
including climate and greenhouse gases.
(d) Until the completion of the rule making required under this
section, a city or county may apply the highest categorical exemption
levels authorized under WAC 197-11-800 to any action, regardless if the
city or county with jurisdiction has exercised its authority to raise
the exemption levels above the established minimums, unless the city or
county with jurisdiction passes an ordinance or resolution that lowers
the exemption levels to a level below the allowed maximum but not less
than the default minimum levels detailed in WAC 197-11-800.
(3)(a) By December 31, 2013, the department of ecology shall:
(i) Update, but not decrease, the thresholds for all other project
actions not specified in subsection (2) of this section;
(ii) Create a categorical exemption for projects designed to
restore natural wildlife or fishery habitats or serve as environmental
mitigation for other projects; and
(iii) Propose methods for integrating the state environmental
policy act process with provisions of the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, including consideration of ways to revise WAC 197-11-210 through 197-11-232 to further the goals of RCW 43.21C.240.
(b) During this process, the department of ecology may also review
and update the thresholds resulting from the 2012 rule-making process
outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
(4)(a) The department of ecology shall convene an advisory
committee consisting of members representing, at minimum, cities,
counties, business interests, environmental interests, agricultural
interests, cultural resources interests, state agencies, and tribal
governments to:
(i) Assist in updating the environmental checklist and updating the
thresholds for other project actions for both rule-making processes
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section; and
(ii) Consider opportunities to ensure that state agencies, tribes,
and other interested parties can receive notice about projects of
interest through a means other than through notice under chapter 43.21C
RCW.
(b) Advisory committee members must have direct experience with the
implementation or application of the state environmental policy act.
(5) This section expires July 31, 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)) shall be prepared on proposals for
legislation and other major actions having a probable significant,
adverse environmental impact. The environmental impact statement may
be combined with the recommendation or report on the proposal or issued
as a separate document. The substantive decisions or recommendations
shall be clearly identifiable in the combined document. Actions
categorically exempt under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) and section 7 of this
act do not require environmental review or the preparation of an
environmental impact statement under this chapter. ((In a county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a planned action, as
provided for in subsection (2) of this section, does not require a
threshold determination or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter, but is subject to environmental review
and mitigation as provided in this chapter.))
(2) An environmental impact statement is required to analyze only
those probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant.
Beneficial environmental impacts may be discussed. The responsible
official shall consult with agencies and the public to identify such
impacts and limit the scope of an environmental impact statement. The
subjects listed in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) need not be treated as separate
sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions of
significant short-term and long-term environmental impacts, significant
irrevocable commitments of natural resources, significant alternatives
including mitigation measures, and significant environmental impacts
which cannot be mitigated should be consolidated or included, as
applicable, in those sections of an environmental impact statement
where the responsible official decides they logically belong.
(((2)(a) For purposes of this section, a planned action means one
or more types of project action that:
(i) Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(ii) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or
(B) a fully contained community, a master planned resort, a master
planned development, or a phased project;
(iii) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW
36.70A.030;
(v) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200; and
(vi) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW.
(b) A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain
types of development or to specific geographical areas that are less
extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or
town and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in the
environmental impact statement or the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, a planned action means one or
more types of development or redevelopment that meet the following
criteria:
(a) Are designated as planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(b) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement under the requirements of this chapter
in conjunction with, or to implement, a comprehensive plan or subarea
plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or a fully contained community,
a master planned resort, a master planned development, or a phased
project;
(c) Have had project level significant impacts adequately addressed
in an environmental impact statement unless the impacts are
specifically deferred for consideration at the project level pursuant
to subsection (3)(b) of this section;
(d) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (b) of this subsection;
(e) Are located within an urban growth area designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.110;
(f) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200, unless an essential public facility is accessory to or part
of a residential, office, school, commercial, recreational, service, or
industrial development that is designated a planned action under this
subsection; and
(g) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan or subarea plan
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(2) A county, city, or town shall define the types of development
included in the planned action and may limit a planned action to:
(a) A specific geographic area that is less extensive than the
jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or town; or
(b) A time period identified in the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.
(3)(a) A county, city, or town shall determine during permit review
whether a proposed project is consistent with a planned action
ordinance adopted by the jurisdiction. To determine project
consistency with a planned action ordinance, a county, city, or town
may utilize a modified checklist pursuant to the rules adopted to
implement RCW 43.21C.110, a form that is designated within the planned
action ordinance, or a form contained in agency rules adopted pursuant
to RCW 43.21C.120.
(b) Except for impacts that are specifically deferred, at the time
of planned action ordinance adoption, for consideration at the project
level, a county, city, or town is not required to make a threshold
determination and may not require additional environmental review for
a proposal that is determined to be consistent with the development or
redevelopment described in the planned action ordinance. The
determination of consistency, and the adequacy of any environmental
review that was specifically deferred, are subject to the type of
administrative appeal that the county, city, or town provides for the
proposal itself consistent with RCW 36.70B.060.
(4) For a planned action that encompasses the entire jurisdictional
boundary of a county, city, or town, at least one community meeting
must be held before the scoping notice for such a planned action is
issued. Notice of scoping for such a planned action and notice of the
community meeting required by this subsection must be mailed or
otherwise verifiably provided to:
(a) All property owners of record within the county, city, or town;
(b) All affected federally recognized tribal governments whose
ceded area is within one-half mile of the jurisdictional boundaries of
the county, city, or town, and to agencies with jurisdiction over the
future development anticipated for the planned action.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21C.229 and 2003 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to accommodate infill development and thereby realize
the goals and policies of comprehensive plans adopted according to
chapter 36.70A RCW, a city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is
authorized by this section to establish categorical exemptions from the
requirements of this chapter. An exemption adopted under this section
applies even if it differs from the categorical exemptions adopted by
rule of the department under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a). An exemption may be
adopted by a city or county under this section if it meets the
following criteria:
(a) It categorically exempts government action related to
development ((that is new residential or mixed-use development))
proposed to fill in an urban growth area, designated according to RCW
36.70A.110, where current density and intensity of use in the area is
lower than called for in the goals and policies of the applicable
comprehensive plan and the development is either:
(i) Residential development;
(ii) Mixed-use development; or
(iii) Commercial development up to sixty-five thousand square feet,
excluding retail development;
(b) It does not exempt government action related to development
that is inconsistent with the applicable comprehensive plan or would
exceed the density or intensity of use called for in the goals and
policies of the applicable comprehensive plan; and
(c)(i) The city or county's applicable comprehensive plan was
previously subjected to environmental analysis through an environmental
impact statement under the requirements of this chapter prior to
adoption; or
(ii) The city or county has prepared an environmental impact
statement that considers the proposed use or density and intensity of
use in the area proposed for an exemption under this section.
(2) Any categorical exemption adopted by a city or county under
this section shall be subject to the rules of the department adopted
according to RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) that provide exceptions to the use of
categorical exemptions adopted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that a county, city, or town that
prepares a nonproject environmental review under RCW 43.21C.030(2),
including reviews necessary for compliance with RCW 43.21C.420, must
endure a substantial financial burden.
(2) A county, city, or town may recover reasonable expenses
incurred in the preparation of a nonproject environmental impact
statement prepared under RCW 43.21C.030(2):
(a) Through access to financial assistance under RCW 36.70A.490;
and
(b) With funding from private sources.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.21C.420 and 2010 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities with a population greater than five thousand, in
accordance with their existing comprehensive planning and development
regulation authority under chapter 36.70A RCW, and in accordance with
this section, may adopt optional elements of their comprehensive plans
and optional development regulations that apply within specified
subareas of the cities, that are either:
(a) Areas designated as mixed-use or urban centers in a land use or
transportation plan adopted by a regional transportation planning
organization; or
(b) Areas within one-half mile of a major transit stop that are
zoned to have an average minimum density of fifteen dwelling units or
more per gross acre.
(2) Cities located on the east side of the Cascade mountains and
located in a county with a population of two hundred thirty thousand or
less, in accordance with their existing comprehensive planning and
development regulation authority under chapter 36.70A RCW, and in
accordance with this section, may adopt optional elements of their
comprehensive plans and optional development regulations that apply
within the mixed-use or urban centers. The optional elements of their
comprehensive plans and optional development regulations must enhance
pedestrian, bicycle, transit, or other nonvehicular transportation
methods.
(3) A major transit stop is defined as:
(a) A stop on a high capacity transportation service funded or
expanded under the provisions of chapter 81.104 RCW;
(b) Commuter rail stops;
(c) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems, including transitways;
(d) Stops on bus rapid transit routes or routes that run on high
occupancy vehicle lanes; or
(e) Stops for a bus or other transit mode providing fixed route
service at intervals of at least thirty minutes during the peak hours
of operation.
(4)(a) A city that elects to adopt such an optional comprehensive
plan element and optional development regulations shall prepare a
nonproject environmental impact statement, pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030,
assessing and disclosing the probable significant adverse environmental
impacts of the optional comprehensive plan element and development
regulations and of future development that is consistent with the plan
and regulations.
(b) At least one community meeting must be held on the proposed
subarea plan before the scoping notice for such a nonproject
environmental impact statement is issued. Notice of scoping for such
a nonproject environmental impact statement and notice of the community
meeting required by this section must be mailed to all property owners
of record within the subarea to be studied, to all property owners
within one hundred fifty feet of the boundaries of such a subarea, to
all affected federally recognized tribal governments whose ceded area
is within one-half mile of the boundaries of the subarea, and to
agencies with jurisdiction over the future development or its impacts
anticipated within the subarea.
(c) In cities with over five hundred thousand residents, notice of
scoping for such a nonproject environmental impact statement and notice
of the community meeting required by this section must be mailed to all
small businesses as defined in RCW 19.85.020, and to all community
preservation and development authorities established under chapter
43.167 RCW, located within the subarea to be studied or within one
hundred fifty feet of the boundaries of such subarea. The process for
community involvement must have the goal of fair treatment and
meaningful involvement of all people with respect to the development
and implementation of the subarea planning process.
(d) The notice of the community meeting must include general
illustrations and descriptions of buildings generally representative of
the maximum building envelope that will be allowed under the proposed
plan and indicate that future appeals of proposed developments that are
consistent with the plan will be limited. Notice of the community
meeting must include signs located on major travel routes in the
subarea. If the building envelope increases during the process,
another notice complying with the requirements of this section must be
issued before the next public involvement opportunity.
(e) Any person that has standing to appeal the adoption of this
subarea plan or the implementing regulations under RCW 36.70A.280 has
standing to bring an appeal of the nonproject environmental impact
statement required by this subsection.
(f) Cities with over five hundred thousand residents shall prepare
a study that accompanies or is appended to the nonproject environmental
impact statement, but must not be part of that statement, that analyzes
the extent to which the proposed subarea plan may result in the
displacement or fragmentation of existing businesses, existing
residents, including people living with poverty, families with
children, and intergenerational households, or cultural groups within
the proposed subarea plan. The city shall also discuss the results of
the analysis at the community meeting.
(g) As an incentive for development authorized under this section,
a city shall consider establishing a transfer of development rights
program in consultation with the county where the city is located, that
conserves county-designated agricultural and forest land of long-term
commercial significance. If the city decides not to establish a
transfer of development rights program, the city must state in the
record the reasons for not adopting the program. The city's decision
not to establish a transfer of development rights program is not
subject to appeal. Nothing in this subsection (4)(g) may be used as a
basis to challenge the optional comprehensive plan or subarea plan
policies authorized under this section.
(5)(a) Until July 1, 2018, a proposed development that is
consistent with the optional comprehensive plan or subarea plan
policies and development regulations adopted under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section and that is environmentally reviewed under
subsection (4) of this section may not be challenged in administrative
or judicial appeals for noncompliance with this chapter as long as a
complete application for such a development that vests the application
or would later lead to vested status under city or state law is
submitted to the city within a time frame established by the city, but
not to exceed ten years from the date of issuance of the final
environmental impact statement.
(b) After July 1, 2018, the immunity from appeals under this
chapter of any application that vests or will vest under this
subsection or the ability to vest under this subsection is still valid,
provided that the final subarea environmental impact statement is
issued by July 1, 2018. ((After July 1, 2018, a city may continue to
collect reimbursement fees under subsection (6) of this section for the
proportionate share of a subarea environmental impact statement issued
prior to July 1, 2018.))
(6) ((It is recognized that a city that prepares a nonproject
environmental impact statement under subsection (4) of this section
must endure a substantial financial burden. A city may recover its
reasonable expenses of preparation of a nonproject environmental impact
statement prepared under subsection (4) of this section through access
to financial assistance under RCW 36.70A.490 or funding from private
sources. In addition, a city is authorized to recover a portion of its
reasonable expenses of preparation of such a nonproject environmental
impact statement by the assessment of reasonable and proportionate fees
upon subsequent development that is consistent with the plan and
development regulations adopted under subsection (5) of this section,
as long as the development makes use of and benefits [from], as
described in subsection (5) of this section, from the nonproject
environmental impact statement prepared by the city. Any assessment
fees collected from subsequent development may be used to reimburse
funding received from private sources. In order to collect such fees,
the city must enact an ordinance that sets forth objective standards
for determining how the fees to be imposed upon each development will
be proportionate to the impacts of each development and to the benefits
accruing to each development from the nonproject environmental impact
statement. Any disagreement about the reasonableness or amount of the
fees imposed upon a development may not be the basis for delay in
issuance of a project permit for that development. The fee assessed by
the city may be paid with the written stipulation "paid under protest"
and if the city provides for an administrative appeal of its decision
on the project for which the fees are imposed, any dispute about the
amount of the fees must be resolved in the same administrative appeal
process.
(7))) If a proposed development is inconsistent with the optional
comprehensive plan or subarea plan policies and development regulations
adopted under subsection (1) of this section, the city shall require
additional environmental review in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
The following nonproject actions are categorically exempt from the
requirements of this chapter:
(1) Amendments to development regulations that are required to
ensure consistency with an adopted comprehensive plan pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040, where the comprehensive plan was previously subjected to
environmental review pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Amendments to development regulations that are required to
ensure consistency with a shoreline master program approved pursuant to
RCW 90.58.090, where the shoreline master program was previously
subjected to environmental review pursuant to this chapter;
(3) Amendments to development regulations that do not change
regulations applicable to any of the following: Allowed uses or
activities, intensity, density, building height, lot coverage,
impervious surface limits, vegetation retention requirements,
regulations for critical areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, cultural
resource regulations, regulations for the protection of the
environment, human health, and human safety, protections for other uses
and activities, regulations for billboards and freestanding signs,
requirements for public facilities or services, or uses, activities,
developments, or structures that would have a probable adverse impact
on the human or natural environment;
(4) Amendments to development regulations that, upon implementation
of a project action, will provide increased environmental protection,
limited to the following:
(a) Increased protections for critical areas, such as enhanced
buffers or setbacks;
(b) Increased vegetation retention or decreased impervious surface
areas in shoreline jurisdiction; and
(c) Increased vegetation retention or decreased impervious surface
areas in critical areas;
(5) Amendments to technical codes adopted by a county, city, or
town to ensure consistency with minimum standards contained in state
law, including the following:
(a) Building codes required by chapter 19.27 RCW;
(b) Energy codes required by chapter 19.27A RCW; and
(c) Electrical codes required by chapter 19.28 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.490 and 1995 c 347 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
The growth management planning and environmental review fund is
hereby established in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the
fund from the proceeds of bond sales, tax revenues, budget transfers,
federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in
the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the fund
shall be used to make grants or loans to local governments for the
purposes set forth in RCW 43.21C.240, 43.21C.031, or 36.70A.500. Any
payment of either principal or interest, or both, derived from loans
made from this fund must be deposited into the fund.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.70A.500 and 1997 c 429 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce shall provide management services for the growth
management planning and environmental review fund created by RCW
36.70A.490. The department shall establish procedures for fund
management. The department shall encourage participation in the grant
or loan program by other public agencies. The department shall develop
the grant or loan criteria, monitor the grant or loan program, and
select grant or loan recipients in consultation with state agencies
participating in the grant or loan program through the provision of
grant or loan funds or technical assistance.
(2) A grant or loan may be awarded to a county or city that is
required to or has chosen to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that is
qualified pursuant to this section. The grant or loan shall be
provided to assist a county or city in paying for the cost of preparing
an environmental analysis under chapter 43.21C RCW, that is integrated
with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element, countywide
planning policy, development regulation, monitoring program, or other
planning activity adopted under or implementing this chapter that:
(a) Improves the process for project permit review while
maintaining environmental quality; or
(b) Encourages use of plans and information developed for purposes
of complying with this chapter to satisfy requirements of other state
programs.
(3) In order to qualify for a grant or loan, a county or city
shall:
(a) Demonstrate that it will prepare an environmental analysis
pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW and subsection (2) of this section that
is integrated with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element,
countywide planning policy, development regulations, monitoring
program, or other planning activity adopted under or implementing this
chapter;
(b) Address environmental impacts and consequences, alternatives,
and mitigation measures in sufficient detail to allow the analysis to
be adopted in whole or in part by applicants for development permits
within the geographic area analyzed in the plan;
(c) Demonstrate that procedures for review of development permit
applications will be based on the integrated plans and environmental
analysis;
(d) Include mechanisms to monitor the consequences of growth as it
occurs in the plan area and to use the resulting data to update the
plan, policy, or implementing mechanisms and associated environmental
analysis;
(e) Demonstrate substantial progress towards compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. A county or city that is more than six
months out of compliance with a requirement of this chapter is deemed
not to be making substantial progress towards compliance; and
(f) Provide local funding, which may include financial
participation by the private sector.
(4) In awarding grants or loans, the department shall give
preference to proposals that include one or more of the following
elements:
(a) Financial participation by the private sector, or a
public/private partnering approach;
(b) Identification and monitoring of system capacities for elements
of the built environment, and to the extent appropriate, of the natural
environment;
(c) Coordination with state, federal, and tribal governments in
project review;
(d) Furtherance of important state objectives related to economic
development, protection of areas of statewide significance, and siting
of essential public facilities;
(e) Programs to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the
permitting process by greater reliance on integrated plans and
prospective environmental analysis;
(f) Programs for effective citizen and neighborhood involvement
that contribute to greater likelihood that planning decisions can be
implemented with community support; ((and))
(g) Programs to identify environmental impacts and establish
mitigation measures that provide effective means to satisfy concurrency
requirements and establish project consistency with the plans; or
(h) Environmental review that addresses the impacts of increased
density or intensity of comprehensive plans, subarea plans, or
receiving areas designated by a city or town under the regional
transfer of development rights program in chapter 43.362 RCW.
(5) If the local funding includes funding provided by other state
functional planning programs, including open space planning and
watershed or basin planning, the functional plan shall be integrated
into and be consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(6) State agencies shall work with grant or loan recipients to
facilitate state and local project review processes that will implement
the projects receiving grants or loans under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Detailed environmental analysis integrated with comprehensive
plans, subarea plans, and development regulations will facilitate
planning for and managing growth, allow greater protection of the
environment, and benefit both the general public and private property
owners;
(2) Development in urban growth areas, or transfer of development
rights programs, will assist in the conservation of rural,
agricultural, and forest land by redirecting growth from this land to
areas designated for urban development or receiving areas in cities and
towns where growth should occur;
(3) Cities and towns planning for increased growth in receiving
areas under chapter 43.362 RCW must comply with chapter 43.21C RCW;
(4) Planning for urban or increased growth in urban growth areas,
or receiving areas under chapter 43.362 RCW in compliance with chapter
43.21C RCW, presents a financial burden on cities and towns;
(5) Planning for urban or increased growth in urban growth areas,
or receiving areas under chapter 43.362 RCW in compliance with chapter
43.21C RCW, should be encouraged to ensure that the quality of life in
receiving neighborhoods and the protection of environmental values over
time are maintained by providing financial assistance through the
growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW
36.70A.490; and
(6) Access to financial assistance through the growth management
planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 may be
increased by allowing the fund to become a revolving loan program
rather than only a grant program.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.21C.110 and 1997 c 429 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:
(1) To adopt and amend ((thereafter)) rules of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter, subject to the requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW, for the purpose of providing uniform rules and guidelines to
all branches of government including state agencies, political
subdivisions, public and municipal corporations, and counties. The
proposed rules shall be subject to full public hearings requirements
associated with rule ((promulgation)) adoption. Suggestions for
modifications of the proposed rules shall be considered on their
merits, and the department shall have the authority and responsibility
for full and appropriate independent ((promulgation and)) adoption of
rules, assuring consistency with this chapter as amended and with the
preservation of protections afforded by this chapter. The rule-making
powers authorized in this section shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following phases of interpretation and implementation
of this chapter:
(a) Categories of governmental actions which are not to be
considered as potential major actions significantly affecting the
quality of the environment, including categories pertaining to
applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters 90.03 and
90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical exemptions in
the rules shall be limited to those types which are not major actions
significantly affecting the quality of the environment. The rules
shall provide for certain circumstances where actions which potentially
are categorically exempt require environmental review. An action that
is categorically exempt under the rules adopted by the department may
not be conditioned or denied under this chapter.
(b) Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the
determination of when an act of a branch of government is a major
action significantly affecting the quality of the environment for which
a detailed statement is required to be prepared pursuant to RCW
43.21C.030.
(c) Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed
statements and other environmental documents, including but not limited
to rules for timing of environmental review, obtaining comments, data
and other information, and providing for and determining areas of
public participation which shall include the scope and review of draft
environmental impact statements.
(d) Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements assuring
that such statements are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable;
statements are required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and
probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant, and may
analyze beneficial impacts.
(e) Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken
and documents prepared.
(f) Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this
chapter including the establishment of a list of elements of the
environment. Analysis of environmental considerations under RCW
43.21C.030(2) may be required only for those subjects listed as
elements of the environment (or portions thereof). The list of
elements of the environment shall consist of the "natural" and "built"
environment. The elements of the built environment shall consist of
public services and utilities (such as water, sewer, schools, fire and
police protection), transportation, environmental health (such as
explosive materials and toxic waste), and land and shoreline use
(including housing, and a description of the relationships with land
use and shoreline plans and designations, including population).
(g) Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this
chapter of two or more branches of government involved in the same
project significantly affecting the quality of the environment.
(h) Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation
and issuance of detailed statements required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(i) To prepare rules for projects setting forth the time limits
within which the governmental entity responsible for the action shall
comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(j) Rules for utilization of a detailed statement for more than one
action and rules improving environmental analysis of nonproject
proposals and encouraging better interagency coordination and
integration between this chapter and other environmental laws.
(k) Rules relating to actions which shall be exempt from the
provisions of this chapter in situations of emergency.
(l) Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in
planning and decision making and the implementation of the substantive
policies and requirements of this chapter, including procedures for
appeals under this chapter.
(m) Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of
environmental review with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240.
The rules and procedures shall be jointly developed with the department
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce and shall be
applicable to the preparation of environmental documents for actions in
counties, cities, and towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules
and procedures shall also include procedures and criteria to analyze
planned actions under ((RCW 43.21C.031(2))) section 3 of this act and
revisions to the rules adopted under this section to ensure that they
are compatible with the requirements and authorizations of chapter 347,
Laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or
procedures adopted by a county, city, or town to implement the
provisions of chapter 347, Laws of 1995 prior to the effective date of
rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m) shall continue to be
effective until the adoption of any new or revised ordinances or
procedures that may be required. If any revisions are required as a
result of rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m), those revisions
shall be made within the time limits specified in RCW 43.21C.120.
(2) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this
section, the department may:
(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of
science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations,
state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable;
and
(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services,
facilities, and information (including statistical information) of
public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order
to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with
similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.
(3) Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
review procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.21C.095 and 1983 c 117 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The rules ((promulgated)) adopted under RCW 43.21C.110 shall be
accorded substantial deference in the interpretation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C
RCW to read as follows:
Upon receiving a completed environmental checklist, the lead agency
shall provide the checklist and other submitted documents to the
federally recognized tribe or tribes affected by the proposed project.
The lead agency shall provide notice of the proposed project by mail
and electronic mail to the applicable tribal chair and natural resource
manager.

--- END ---