BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board or its successor
agency, in conjunction with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and
the four-year institutions of higher education shall establish and
maintain a statewide online transfer and student advising system that
integrates information related to programs, advising, registration,
admissions, and transfer. The system must be easily accessible to all
Washington high school students and their parents or guardians, higher
education students, faculty, counselors, advisors, and other
professional staff. The purpose of the system is to:
(a) Assist students to access higher education program information
easily and speed completion of their education programs by clarifying
and simplifying the process for researching programs, resources, and
transferability of courses; and
(b) Improve efficiency of service delivery to students for
institutions of higher education.
(2) The online transfer and student advising system must:
(a) Integrate with web sites maintained by the higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, institutions of higher education, and other web
sites to provide an inventory of postsecondary degrees and certificates
available in the state, including online options; and outline
educational requirements for various occupations, including labor
market information;
(b) Specify educational requirements, admissions requirements, and
prerequisites for all postsecondary programs;
(c) Identify course options that meet the requirements of a
selected path toward a degree or certificate;
(d) Provide registration and admissions information for
institutions of higher education;
(e) Provide a method for students to assess which courses and
programs are transferrable from one institution of higher education to
another; and which programs will transfer with credit towards
completion of their chosen degree or certificate; and
(f) Provide information regarding student financial aid and other
services that assist students to research, access, and complete degrees
and certificates.
(3) The higher education coordinating board or its successor
agency, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, and the four-year
institutions of higher education shall sign a memorandum of
understanding that specifies roles and responsibilities regarding the
design, implementation, promotion, development, maintenance, and
analysis of the effectiveness of the online transfer and student
advising system.

--- END ---