BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
minimize the regulatory burden on institutions of higher education and
to prioritize scarce resources to be directed to the education of
students rather than unnecessary reporting requirements. It is the
intent of the legislature specifically that reporting requirements that
are duplicative of federal reporting requirements be eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.569 (Crime statistics reporting--Campus safety plans -- Memoranda of understanding and mutual aid
agreements -- Task forces -- Contact information) and 2008 c 168 s 1 & 1990
c 288 s 7 are each repealed.

--- END ---