BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the federal
child and family services improvement and innovation act provides an
important new opportunity for Washington state to flexibly use federal
funding, traditionally limited to foster care, to achieve the following
outcomes: Increase permanency for all infants, children, and youth by
reducing the time spent in foster care placements when possible and
promoting a successful transition to adulthood for older youth;
increase the positive outcomes for infants, children, youth, and
families in their homes and communities, including tribal communities;
improve the safety and well-being of infants, children, and youth; and
prevent child abuse and neglect and the reentry of infants, children,
and youth into foster care.
(2) The legislature finds that the licensed out-of-home foster care
caseload has declined by eighteen percent from fiscal year 2008 to
fiscal year 2011. The legislature further finds that under the current
system, as caseloads decline, fewer state and federal funds are
available in the child welfare budget for prevention and reunification
services to continue improving outcomes.
(3) The legislature recognizes the need to reinvest savings related
to foster care caseload reductions into effective efforts that improve
outcomes. The legislature intends to maximize limited resources by
continuing to focus on efforts to improve child safety, child
permanency, and child well-being in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The child and family reinvestment account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for
improving outcomes related to: (a) Safely reducing entry into the
foster care system and preventing reentry; (b) safely increasing
reunifications; (c) achieving permanency for children unable to be
reunified; and (d) improving outcomes for youth who will age out of the
foster care system. Moneys may be expended for shared savings under
performance-based contracts.
(2) Revenues to the child and family reinvestment account consist
of: (a) Savings to the state general fund resulting from reductions in
foster care caseloads and per capita costs, as calculated and
transferred into the account under this section; and (b) any other
public or private funds appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(3)(a) The department of social and health services, in
collaboration with the office of financial management and the caseload
forecast council, shall develop a methodology for calculating the
savings under this section. The methodology must be used for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, and for each biennium thereafter. The
methodology must establish a baseline for calculating savings. In
developing the methodology, the department of social and health
services shall incorporate the relevant requirements of any
demonstration waiver granted to the state under P.L. 112-34. If the
department does not receive a demonstration waiver, the department
shall use the 2013 fiscal year foster care appropriated funding as a
baseline in the methodology for at least five fiscal years. The
savings must be based on actual caseload and per capita expenditures.
By December 1, 2012, the department of social and health services shall
submit the proposed methodology to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The methodology is deemed approved
unless the legislature enacts legislation to modify or reject the
methodology.
(b) The department of social and health services shall use the
methodology established in (a) of this subsection to calculate savings
to the state general fund for transfer into the child and family
reinvestment account in fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year
thereafter. Savings calculated by the department under this section
are not subject to RCW 43.79.460. The department shall report the
amount of the state general fund savings achieved to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature at
the end of each fiscal year. The office of financial management shall
provide notice to the state treasurer of the amount of state general
fund savings, as calculated by the department of social and health
services, for transfer into the child and family reinvestment account.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits (i) the caseload forecast
council from forecasting the foster care caseload under RCW 43.88C.010
or (ii) the department from including maintenance funding in its budget
submittal for caseload costs that exceed the baseline established in
(a) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfer established under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The child and family reinvestment account and methodology for
calculating savings as established under this act shall be terminated
on June 30, 2018, as provided in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2019:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act; and
(3) Section 3 of this act.

--- END ---