BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Economic strength is directly interconnected with education;
(b) Increasing graduation rates improves economic competitiveness;
(c) Graduation is only the beginning for each student, and should
be followed by success in the workplace; and
(d) Most students seek a degree that results in a good job.
(2) The legislature makes it an economic priority for Washington
to:
(a) Increase graduation rates;
(b) Increase graduation rates in fields addressing critical skill
shortages; and
(c) Narrow the educational opportunity gap for disadvantaged
students and minority students.
(3) The legislature intends that:
(a) The state of Washington distinguish itself in the national and
global economy by becoming the fastest-growing provider of highly
skilled workers for targeted industries;
(b) The percentage of households in the state of Washington living
in the middle-income bracket or above, as defined in RCW 28B.145.060,
increase over time; and
(c) To achieve these objectives, Washington works indicators be
established for four-year institutions of higher education.
(4) The legislature reaffirms the findings and intent expressed in
section 1 of the higher education opportunity act, chapter 10, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess., and intends to further advance the goal of ensuring
that Washington taxpayers earn a high-value return on their investment
by developing and implementing a plan for measuring and rewarding the
performance of the state's four-year institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board's
successor.
(2) "Council" means the council of presidents of the four-year
institutions of higher education.
(3) "Director" means the director of the office.
(4) "Education data center" means the education data center
established under RCW 43.41.400.
(5) "Four-year institutions of higher education" means the state
universities, the regional universities, and the state college, all as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(6) "Graduation" means receipt of a baccalaureate or advanced
degree.
(7) "Graduation in fields addressing critical skill shortages"
means graduation in the fields specified in RCW 28B.76.270(2)(k).
(8) "Growth" means a change relative to the prior academic year.
(9) "Narrowing the achievement gap" means increasing the number of
graduations by in-state disadvantaged students and in-state minority
students.
(10) "Office" means the office of financial management.
(11) "Washington works indicators" means: (a) Increasing
graduations; (b) increasing graduations in fields addressing critical
skill shortages; and (c) narrowing the educational opportunity gap for
disadvantaged students and minority students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By December 1, 2012, the office shall
develop a recommended plan for measuring and rewarding performance of
four-year institutions of higher education, and report on the
recommended plan to the legislature and the governor.
(2) In developing the recommended plan, the office shall:
(a) Consult with the board and the council;
(b) Examine and recommend appropriate metrics for measuring
performance, which may include, but are not limited to, the metrics set
forth in section 4 of this act; and
(c) Design and recommend an appropriate means of rewarding
performance, which may include, but is not limited to, the means set
forth in section 5 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This section applies unless modified by
the legislature following receipt of the report described in section 3
of this act.
(2) By July 1, 2012, and each July 1st thereafter, the office shall
measure performance on Washington works indicators using the metrics
described in subsection (3) of this section, which awards points for
each indicator and results in a single numeric score for each four-year
institution of higher education.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the office
shall award:
(i) One point per student for growth in the number of students who
earn baccalaureate or advanced degrees, as specified in RCW
28B.76.270(2) (a) and (b);
(ii) An additional point per student for growth in the number of
students who earn baccalaureate or advanced degrees in fields
addressing critical skill shortages, as defined in section 2(7) of this
act as the fields specified in RCW 28B.76.270(2)(k); and
(iii) An additional point per student for growth in the number of
in-state disadvantaged students and in-state minority students who earn
baccalaureate or advanced degrees, as shown in data reported by the
four-year institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.76.270.
(b) A four-year institution of higher education may modify points
awarded for each indicator, so long as the institution: Uses the three
metrics described in (a) of this subsection and no other metrics;
awards no more than three points for three metrics; and awards at least
one-half of one point, but no more than two points, per metric. If a
four-year institution of higher education modifies points awarded for
each indicator, the office shall award points to the four-year
institution in a consistent manner.
(4) In measuring performance under subsection (2) of this section,
the office shall make statistical adjustments for student demographics.
The office also may collect additional contextual data from existing
sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) This section applies unless modified by
the legislature following receipt of the report described in section 3
of this act.
(2) In the 2013-2015 omnibus operating appropriations act, and each
omnibus operating appropriations act thereafter, the legislature shall
determine whether an amount shall be transferred and disbursed as
provided in this subsection, and if so, the percentage of general
fund--state appropriations and education legacy trust account--state
appropriations on which the amount shall be based.
(3) Subject to legislative action described in subsection (2) of
this section:
(a) On July 1, 2013, and each July 1st thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the state general fund to the higher
education coordinating board fund for innovation and quality an amount
equivalent to the percentage determined by the legislature of:
(i) The general fund--state appropriation for the current fiscal
year for each four-year institution of higher education; and
(ii) One-half of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for the current biennium for each four-year institution
of higher education.
(b) On July 1, 2013, and each July 1st thereafter, allotments of
the general fund--state appropriation for the current fiscal year for
each four-year institution of higher education shall be adjusted to
reflect the institution's proportionate share of the amount transferred
from the general fund--state to the higher education coordinating board
fund for innovation and quality under (a) of this subsection.
(4) Subject to legislative action described in subsection (2) of
this section, on July 10, 2013, and each July 10th thereafter, the
office shall disburse funds to four-year institutions of higher
education as rewards for performance on Washington works indicators
through student-focused strategies, as measured by the office under
section 4 of this act.
(a) The amount available to be disbursed to four-year institutions
of higher education under this section for the current fiscal year
shall be equal to the total amount transferred under subsection (3) of
this section for the current fiscal year.
(b) The amount to be disbursed per point awarded under section 4 of
this act shall be set by the office.
(5) In disbursing funds as rewards, the office has discretion to
distinguish between actual performance on Washington works indicators
through student-focused strategies and the appearance of performance
through data manipulation or other nonstudent-focused means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Four-year institutions of higher education
are encouraged to redistribute resources and realign course offerings
to: Increase graduations in fields addressing critical skill
shortages; and improve performance on other Washington works
indicators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By July 1, 2013, and each July 1st
thereafter, the education data center shall analyze employment or
continued education in consultation with the employment security
department, the board, and the council. The education data center also
may analyze employment or continued education in consultation with the
wage record interchange system in the federal department of labor, if
allowed and if appropriate, and other accurate sources of employment
and earnings data, if necessary. Before July 1, 2013, the council may
recommend to the education data center other accurate sources of
employment and earnings data that should be analyzed, and the education
data center shall include the recommended sources in its analysis under
this subsection. The council also may submit such recommendations to
the legislature.
(2) The education data center shall publish the analyses required
under this section on its web site. The analyses must include
aggregate data as well as data disaggregated by four-year institutions
of higher education, unless based on fewer than ten individuals. The
analyses must be labeled to identify data included and excluded from
the analyses, and also must include a statement that the analyses of
employment or continued education do not represent the employment rate
of graduates for the four-year institution of higher education.
(3) The education data center must update data-sharing and research
agreements under RCW 43.41.400, consistent with applicable security and
confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the work of the center
under this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "employment or continued
education" means that, within one year of graduation, a student either
has an annual income that exceeds the federal poverty level, as
determined by the United States department of health and human services
for a family of four, or is enrolled in postsecondary education.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.120.040 and 1999 c 169 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board fund for innovation and
quality is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the
fund all moneys received under RCW 28B.120.030. Moneys received under
RCW 28B.120.030 in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of RCW
28B.120.010 and 28B.120.020. Disbursements from the fund of moneys
received under RCW 28B.120.030 shall be on the authorization of the
higher education coordinating board.
(3) Moneys transferred to the fund under section 5 of this act may
be disbursed only to four-year institutions of higher education as
rewards for performance on Washington works indicators, as specified in
section 5 of this act. Disbursements from the fund of moneys
transferred to the fund under section 5 of this act shall be only on
the authorization of the office of financial management.
(4) The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---