BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The last registered owner of record is responsible for the
costs of a vehicle impounded under this chapter. If the vehicle is
impounded for evidentiary purposes and directed to be towed to a secure
public storage facility, the procedures in this section apply.
(2)(a) If a law enforcement agency completes an investigation of an
impounded vehicle within thirty days of impound and the vehicle is no
longer needed for evidentiary purposes, the law enforcement agency may
either:
(i) Contact the registered tow truck operator that originally
impounded the evidentiary vehicle to reimpound the vehicle and any
items of personal property registered or titled with the department
that were impounded with the evidentiary vehicle to the operator's
secure storage facility. The reimpound constitutes a continuation of
the original impound and the charges in compliance with RCW 46.55.063
must be added to those of the original impound and the vehicles
processed under this chapter; or
(ii) Direct the person authorized under RCW 46.55.120 who wishes to
redeem the vehicle and any items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that were impounded with the evidentiary
vehicle to go to the registered tow truck operator that originally
impounded the evidentiary vehicle and pay the costs of removal and
towing resulting from the impound. Upon payment, the operator shall
mark a copy of the invoice as paid and give a copy to the person
redeeming the vehicle. Upon presentation of the proof of payment to
the law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall release
the vehicle to the person authorized under RCW 46.55.120.
(b) If a law enforcement agency has not completed an investigation
of an impounded vehicle within thirty days of impound and the vehicle
is still needed for evidentiary purposes, the law enforcement agency
that ordered the impound is responsible for paying the costs of removal
and towing of the vehicle, and the governmental entity of which the
agency is a part becomes subrogated to the debt for services owed by
the registered owner and is entitled to collect the amount the entity
has paid and take any legal actions that are necessary to collect the
debt owed, in the entity's name, including assigning the debt to a
licensed collection agency for collection. Recoupment of the payment
of the costs of the evidentiary impound from the registered owner does
not terminate the evidentiary impound and the law enforcement agency
may retain possession and control of the vehicle until it is no longer
needed for evidentiary purposes.
(3) This section does not apply to the impounding of contaminated
vehicles under RCW 64.44.050.
(4) The department in consultation with the Washington state patrol
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---