BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.820 and 2011 c 174 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section and is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) A person claiming the exemption from state tax under this
section or RCW 82.12.820 must file a complete annual survey with the
department under RCW 82.32.585. Notwithstanding RCW
82.32.585(1)(a)(i), a survey due under this section in 2012 must be
submitted by October 31st.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-
place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse ((shall)) must be measured in calculating the square
footage, including space that juts out from the building profile such
as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the
square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(1)(d);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(((3))) (4)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the
form of a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department ((shall)) must determine eligibility under this
section based on information provided by the buyer and through audit
and other administrative records. The buyer ((shall)) must on a
quarterly basis submit an information sheet, in a form and manner as
required by the department by rule, specifying the amount of exempted
tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the
exemption is claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to
enable the department to determine whether the equipment or
construction meets the criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of
tax paid; documents describing the material-handling equipment and
racking equipment; location and size of warehouses and grain elevators;
and construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department ((shall)) must on a quarterly basis remit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(((4))) (5) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling
equipment and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or
deferral has been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or
82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon
which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible
for a remittance under this section.
(((5))) (6) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is
not eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.820 and 2006 c 354 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators, and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator, are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form
of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (((2))) (3) of this
section and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2) A person claiming the exemption from state tax as provided
under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department as required under RCW 82.08.820.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but
less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand or more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two
million or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax paid for qualifying construction materials, and fifty
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling
equipment and racking equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses, if applicable; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(((3))) (4) Warehouse, grain elevators, and material-handling
equipment and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or
deferral has been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or
82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Materials incorporated in warehouses
and grain elevators upon which construction was initiated prior to May
20, 1997, are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(((4))) (5) The lessor or owner of the warehouse or grain elevator
is not eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless
the underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and
material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in
the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to
pass the economic benefit of the exemption to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent payments.
(((5))) (6) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to annual surveys due in
2012 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---