BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) To comply with the federal requirement
that all states review their child support laws every four years, the
legislature has mandated that a child support work group be convened
every four years to examine current laws, administrative rules, and
practices regarding child support.
(2) The 2011 child support schedule work group was convened in
January and conducted a total of ten in-person meetings and numerous
meetings using telephone conference calls. The work group produced a
final report and recommendations in September 2011.
(3) The work group's September 2011 final report and
recommendations contain, among other things, a new economic table based
on more current data and a formula for calculating adjustments to take
into consideration children not before the court.
(4) The legislature intends to implement recommendations made by
the 2011 child support schedule work group.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.19.011 and 2005 c 282 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Basic child support obligation" means the monthly child
support obligation determined from the economic table based on the
parties' combined monthly net income and the number of children for
whom support is owed.
(2) "Child support schedule" means the standards, economic table,
worksheets, and instructions, as defined in this chapter.
(3) "Court" means a superior court judge, court commissioner, and
presiding and reviewing officers who administratively determine or
enforce child support orders.
(4) "Deviation" means a child support amount that differs from the
standard calculation.
(5) "Economic table" means the child support table for the basic
support obligation provided in RCW 26.19.020.
(6) "Instructions" means the instructions developed by the
administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050 for use
in completing the worksheets.
(7) "Standards" means the standards for determination of child
support as provided in this chapter.
(8) "Standard calculation" means the presumptive amount of child
support owed as determined from the child support schedule before the
court makes any adjustments or considers any reasons for deviation.
(9) "Support transfer payment" means the amount of money the court
orders one parent to pay to another parent or custodian for child
support after determination of the standard calculation, adjustments,
and deviations. If certain expenses or credits are expected to
fluctuate and the order states a formula or percentage to determine the
additional amount or credit on an ongoing basis, the term "support
transfer payment" does not mean the additional amount or credit.
(10) "Worksheets" means the forms developed by the administrative
office of the courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050 for use in determining
the amount of child support.
(11) "Children not before the court" means children for whom
support is not being determined in the current proceeding, but who are
the children of one of the parents involved in the proceeding based on
a parent-child relationship consistent with RCW 26.26.101, or who are
the children of one of the parents based on a court order which
established the parent as a de facto parent.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.19.020 and 2009 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

((ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

KEY: A AGE 0-11 B AGE 12-18

COMBINED

MONTHLY ONE TWO

NET CHILD CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B

For income less than $1000 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses of
each household. Minimum support may not be
less than $50 per child per month except when
allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 220 272 171 211

1100 242 299 188 232

1200 264 326 205 253

1300 285 352 221 274

1400 307 379 238 294

1500 327 404 254 313

1600 347 428 269 333

1700 367 453 285 352

1800 387 478 300 371

1900 407 503 316 390

2000 427 527 331 409

2100 447 552 347 429

2200 467 577 362 448

2300 487 601 378 467

2400 506 626 393 486

2500 526 650 408 505

2600 534 661 416 513

2700 542 670 421 520

2800 549 679 427 527

2900 556 686 431 533

3000 561 693 436 538

3100 566 699 439 543

3200 569 704 442 546

3300 573 708 445 549

3400 574 710 446 551

3500 575 711 447 552

3600 577 712 448 553

3700 578 713 449 554

3800 581 719 452 558

3900 596 736 463 572

4000 609 753 473 584

4100 623 770 484 598

4200 638 788 495 611

4300 651 805 506 625

4400 664 821 516 637

4500 677 836 525 649

4600 689 851 535 661

4700 701 866 545 673

4800 713 882 554 685

4900 726 897 564 697

5000 738 912 574 708

5100 751 928 584 720

5200 763 943 593 732

5300 776 959 602 744

5400 788 974 612 756

5500 800 989 622 768

5600 812 1004 632 779

5700 825 1019 641 791

5800 837 1035 650 803

5900 850 1050 660 815

6000 862 1065 670 827

6100 875 1081 680 839

6200 887 1096 689 851

6300 899 1112 699 863

6400 911 1127 709 875

6500 924 1142 718 887

6600 936 1157 728 899

6700 949 1172 737 911

6800 961 1188 747 923

6900 974 1203 757 935

7000 986 1218 767 946

7100 998 1233 776 958

7200 1009 1248 785 971

7300 1021 1262 794 982

7400 1033 1276 803 993

7500 1044 1290 812 1004

7600 1055 1305 821 1015

7700 1067 1319 830 1026

7800 1078 1333 839 1037

7900 1089 1346 848 1048

8000 1100 1360 857 1059

8100 1112 1374 865 1069

8200 1123 1387 874 1080

8300 1134 1401 882 1091

8400 1144 1414 891 1101

8500 1155 1428 899 1112

8600 1166 1441 908 1122

8700 1177 1454 916 1133

8800 1187 1467 925 1143

8900 1198 1481 933 1153

9000 1208 1493 941 1163

9100 1219 1506 949 1173

9200 1229 1519 957 1183

9300 1239 1532 966 1193

9400 1250 1545 974 1203

9500 1260 1557 982 1213

9600 1270 1570 989 1223

9700 1280 1582 997 1233

9800 1290 1594 1005 1242

9900 1300 1606 1013 1252

10000 1310 1619 1021 1262

10100 1319 1631 1028 1271

10200 1329 1643 1036 1281

10300 1339 1655 1044 1290

10400 1348 1666 1051 1299

10500 1358 1678 1059 1308

10600 1367 1690 1066 1318

10700 1377 1701 1073 1327

10800 1386 1713 1081 1336

10900 1395 1724 1088 1345

11000 1404 1736 1095 1354

11100 1413 1747 1102 1363

11200 1422 1758 1110 1371

11300 1431 1769 1117 1380

11400 1440 1780 1124 1389

11500 1449 1791 1131 1398

11600 1458 1802 1138 1406

11700 1467 1813 1145 1415

11800 1475 1823 1151 1423

11900 1484 1834 1158 1431

12000 1492 1844 1165 1440

COMBINED

MONTHLY THREE FOUR FIVE

NET CHILDREN CHILDREN CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B A B

For income less than $1000 the obligation
is based upon the resources and living
expenses of each household. Minimum
support may not be less than $50 per child
per month except when allowed by RCW
26.19.065(2).

1000 143 177 121 149 105 130

1100 157 194 133 164 116 143

1200 171 211 144 179 126 156

1300 185 228 156 193 136 168

1400 199 246 168 208 147 181

1500 212 262 179 221 156 193

1600 225 278 190 235 166 205

1700 238 294 201 248 175 217

1800 251 310 212 262 185 228

1900 264 326 223 275 194 240

2000 277 342 234 289 204 252

2100 289 358 245 303 213 264

2200 302 374 256 316 223 276

2300 315 390 267 330 233 288

2400 328 406 278 343 242 299

2500 341 421 288 356 251 311

2600 346 428 293 362 256 316

2700 351 435 298 368 259 321

2800 356 440 301 372 262 324

2900 360 445 305 376 266 328

3000 364 449 308 380 268 331

3100 367 453 310 383 270 334

3200 369 457 312 386 272 336

3300 371 459 314 388 273 339

3400 372 460 315 389 274 340

3500 373 461 316 390 275 341

3600 374 462 317 391 276 342

3700 375 463 318 392 277 343

3800 377 466 319 394 278 344

3900 386 477 326 404 284 352

4000 395 488 334 413 291 360

4100 404 500 341 422 298 368

4200 413 511 350 431 305 377

4300 422 522 357 441 311 385

4400 431 532 364 449 317 392

4500 438 542 371 458 323 400

4600 446 552 377 467 329 407

4700 455 562 384 475 335 414

4800 463 572 391 483 341 422

4900 470 581 398 491 347 429

5000 479 592 404 500 353 437

5100 487 602 411 509 359 443

5200 494 611 418 517 365 451

5300 503 621 425 525 371 458

5400 511 632 432 533 377 466

5500 518 641 439 542 383 473

5600 527 651 446 551 389 480

5700 535 661 452 559 395 488

5800 543 671 459 567 401 495

5900 551 681 466 575 407 502

6000 559 691 473 584 413 509

6100 567 701 479 593 418 517

6200 575 710 486 601 424 524

6300 583 721 493 609 430 532

6400 591 731 500 617 436 539

6500 599 740 506 626 442 546

6600 607 750 513 635 448 554

6700 615 761 520 643 454 561

6800 623 770 527 651 460 568

6900 631 780 533 659 466 575

7000 639 790 540 668 472 583

7100 647 800 547 677 478 591

7200 654 809 554 684 484 598

7300 662 818 560 693 490 605

7400 670 828 567 701 496 613

7500 677 837 574 709 502 620

7600 685 846 581 718 507 627

7700 692 855 587 726 513 634

7800 700 865 594 734 519 642

7900 707 874 601 742 525 649

8000 714 883 607 750 531 656

8100 722 892 614 759 536 663

8200 729 901 620 767 542 670

8300 736 910 627 775 548 677

8400 743 919 633 783 553 684

8500 750 928 640 791 559 691

8600 758 936 646 799 565 698

8700 765 945 653 807 570 705

8800 772 954 659 815 576 712

8900 779 962 665 822 582 719

9000 786 971 672 830 587 726

9100 792 980 678 838 593 732

9200 799 988 684 846 598 739

9300 806 996 691 854 604 746

9400 813 1005 697 861 609 753

9500 820 1013 703 869 614 759

9600 826 1021 709 877 620 766

9700 833 1030 716 884 625 773

9800 840 1038 722 892 631 779

9900 846 1046 728 900 636 786

10000 853 1054 734 907 641 793

10100 859 1062 740 915 647 799

10200 866 1070 746 922 652 806

10300 872 1078 752 930 657 812

10400 879 1086 758 937 662 819

10500 885 1094 764 944 668 825

10600 891 1102 770 952 673 832

10700 898 1109 776 959 678 838

10800 904 1117 782 966 683 844

10900 910 1125 788 974 688 851

11000 916 1132 794 981 693 857

11100 922 1140 799 988 698 863

11200 928 1147 805 995 703 869

11300 934 1155 811 1002 708 876

11400 940 1162 817 1009 714 882

11500 946 1170 822 1017 719 888

11600 952 1177 828 1024 723 894

11700 958 1184 834 1031 728 900

11800 964 1191 839 1038 733 906

11900 970 1199 845 1045 738 912

12000 975 1206 851 1051 743 919))

ECONOMIC TABLE
MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION
PER CHILD

COMBINED
MONTHLY
NET
INCOME
ONE
CHILD
FAMILY
TWO
CHILDREN
FAMILY

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon
the resources and living expenses of each household.
Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per
month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 216 167

1100 238 184

1200 260 200

1300 281 217

1400 303 234

1500 325 251

1600 346 267

1700 368 284

1800 390 301

1900 412 317

2000 433 334

2100 455 350

2200 477 367

2300 499 384

2400 521 400

2500 543 417

2600 565 433

2700 587 450

2800 609 467

2900 630 483

3000 652 500

3100 674 516

3200 696 533

3300 718 550

3400 740 566

3500 762 583

3600 784 599

3700 803 614

3800 816 624

3900 830 634

4000 843 643

4100 857 653

4200 867 660

4300 877 668

4400 887 675

4500 896 682

4600 906 689

4700 916 697

4800 927 705

4900 939 714

5000 951 723

5100 963 732

5200 975 741

5300 987 750

5400 999 759

5500 1011 768

5600 1023 777

5700 1030 782

5800 1036 786

5900 1042 791

6000 1048 795

6100 1054 800

6200 1061 804

6300 1067 809

6400 1073 813

6500 1081 819

6600 1096 830

6700 1111 842

6800 1126 853

6900 1141 864

7000 1156 875

7100 1170 886

7200 1185 898

7300 1200 909

7400 1212 918

7500 1222 925

7600 1231 932

7700 1241 939

7800 1251 946

7900 1261 953

8000 1270 960

8100 1280 968

8200 1290 975

8300 1299 981

8400 1308 987

8500 1316 994

8600 1325 1000

8700 1334 1007

8800 1343 1013

8900 1352 1019

9000 1361 1026

9100 1370 1032

9200 1379 1040

9300 1387 1047

9400 1396 1055

9500 1405 1062

9600 1414 1069

9700 1423 1077

9800 1432 1084

9900 1441 1092

10000 1451 1099

10100 1462 1107

10200 1473 1114

10300 1484 1122

10400 1495 1129

10500 1507 1136

10600 1518 1144

10700 1529 1151

10800 1539 1159

10900 1542 1161

11000 1545 1164

11100 1548 1166

11200 1551 1169

11300 1554 1172

11400 1556 1174

11500 1559 1177

11600 1562 1179

11700 1565 1182

11800 1568 1184

11900 1571 1187

12000 1573 1190

COMBINED
MONTHLY
NET
INCOME
THREE
CHILDREN
FAMILY
FOUR
CHILDREN
FAMILY
FIVE
CHILDREN
FAMILY

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon
the resources and living expenses of each household.
Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per
month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 136 114 100

1100 150 125 110

1200 163 137 120

1300 177 148 130

1400 191 160 141

1500 204 171 151

1600 218 182 161

1700 231 194 171

1800 245 205 180

1900 258 216 190

2000 271 227 200

2100 285 239 210

2200 298 250 220

2300 311 261 230

2400 325 272 239

2500 338 283 249

2600 351 294 259

2700 365 305 269

2800 378 317 279

2900 391 328 288

3000 405 339 298

3100 418 350 308

3200 431 361 318

3300 444 372 328

3400 458 384 337

3500 471 395 347

3600 484 406 357

3700 496 416 366

3800 503 422 371

3900 511 428 377

4000 518 434 382

4100 526 440 388

4200 531 445 392

4300 537 450 396

4400 543 455 400

4500 548 459 404

4600 554 464 408

4700 559 469 412

4800 566 474 417

4900 573 480 422

5000 580 486 428

5100 587 492 433

5200 594 498 438

5300 602 504 443

5400 609 510 449

5500 616 516 454

5600 623 522 459

5700 627 525 462

5800 630 528 465

5900 634 531 467

6000 637 534 470

6100 641 537 472

6200 644 540 475

6300 648 543 477

6400 651 545 480

6500 656 549 483

6600 665 557 490

6700 674 564 497

6800 683 572 503

6900 692 579 510

7000 701 587 516

7100 710 594 523

7200 719 602 530

7300 727 609 536

7400 734 615 541

7500 740 620 545

7600 745 624 549

7700 751 629 554

7800 756 634 558

7900 762 638 562

8000 767 643 566

8100 773 647 570

8200 778 652 574

8300 783 656 577

8400 788 660 581

8500 793 664 584

8600 797 668 588

8700 802 672 591

8800 807 676 595

8900 812 680 599

9000 817 684 602

9100 822 689 606

9200 828 694 611

9300 835 699 616

9400 841 705 620

9500 848 710 625

9600 854 716 630

9700 861 721 635

9800 867 727 639

9900 874 732 644

10000 879 737 648

10100 885 741 652

10200 890 745 656

10300 895 750 660

10400 900 754 664

10500 906 759 668

10600 911 763 672

10700 916 767 675

10800 921 772 679

10900 924 774 681

11000 926 776 683

11100 928 778 684

11200 931 780 686

11300 933 782 688

11400 936 784 690

11500 938 786 692

11600 940 788 693

11700 943 790 695

11800 945 792 697

11900 948 794 699

12000 950 796 700

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes
up to and including twelve thousand dollars. When combined monthly
net income exceeds twelve thousand dollars, the court may exceed the
presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of
twelve thousand dollars upon written findings of fact.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.19.065 and 2009 c 84 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Limit at forty-five percent of a parent's net income. Neither
parent's child support obligation owed for all his or her biological or
legal children may exceed forty-five percent of net income except for
good cause shown.
(a) Each child is entitled to a pro rata share of the income
available for support, but the court only applies the pro rata share to
the children in the case before the court.
(b) Before determining whether to apply the forty-five percent
limitation, the court must consider whether it would be unjust to apply
the limitation after considering the best interests of the child and
the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but are
not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's
household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to
the affected households, assets or liabilities, and any involuntary
limits on either parent's earning capacity including incarceration,
disabilities, or incapacity.
(c) Good cause includes, but is not limited to, possession of
substantial wealth, children with day care expenses, special medical
need, educational need, psychological need, and larger families.
(2) Presumptive minimum support obligation. (a) When a parent's
monthly net income is below one hundred twenty-five percent of the
federal poverty guideline for a one-person family, a support order of
not less than fifty dollars per child per month shall be entered unless
the obligor parent establishes that it would be unjust to do so in that
particular case. The decision whether there is a sufficient basis to
deviate below the presumptive minimum payment must take into
consideration the best interests of the child and the circumstances of
each parent. Such circumstances can include leaving insufficient funds
in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the
child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or
liabilities, and earning capacity.
(b) The basic support obligation of the parent making the transfer
payment, excluding health care, day care, and special child-rearing
expenses, shall not reduce his or her net income below the self-support
reserve of one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty level
for a one-person family, except for the presumptive minimum payment of
fifty dollars per child per month or when it would be unjust to apply
the self-support reserve limitation after considering the best
interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such
circumstances include, but are not limited to, leaving insufficient
funds in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of
the child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or
liabilities, and earning capacity. This section shall not be construed
to require monthly substantiation of income.
(3) Income above twelve thousand dollars. The economic table is
presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and including twelve
thousand dollars. When combined monthly net income exceeds twelve
thousand dollars, the court may exceed the presumptive amount of
support set for combined monthly net incomes of twelve thousand dollars
upon written findings of fact.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.075 and 2009 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reasons for deviation from the standard calculation include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Sources of income and tax planning. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation after consideration of the following:
(i) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner if the parent
who is married to the new spouse or in a partnership with a new
domestic partner is asking for a deviation based on any other reason.
Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;
(ii) Income of other adults in the household if the parent who is
living with the other adult is asking for a deviation based on any
other reason. Income of the other adults in the household is not, by
itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;
(iii) Child support actually received from other relationships;
(iv) Gifts;
(v) Prizes;
(vi) Possession of wealth, including but not limited to savings,
investments, real estate holdings and business interests, vehicles,
boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance plans, or other assets;
(vii) Extraordinary income of a child;
(viii) Tax planning considerations. A deviation for tax planning
may be granted only if the child would not receive a lesser economic
benefit due to the tax planning; or
(ix) Income that has been excluded under RCW 26.19.071(4)(((h)))
(i) if the person earning that income asks for a deviation for any
other reason.
(b) Nonrecurring income. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation based on a finding that a particular source of income
included in the calculation of the basic support obligation is not a
recurring source of income. Depending on the circumstances,
nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related benefits,
bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received
in the previous two calendar years.
(c) Debt and high expenses. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation after consideration of the following expenses:
(i) Extraordinary debt not voluntarily incurred;
(ii) A significant disparity in the living costs of the parents due
to conditions beyond their control;
(iii) Special needs of disabled children;
(iv) Special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the
children; or
(v) Costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred by the parents in
compliance with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child.
(d) Residential schedule. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation if the child spends a significant amount of time with the
parent who is obligated to make a support transfer payment. The court
may not deviate on that basis if the deviation will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families. When determining the amount of the
deviation, the court shall consider evidence concerning the increased
expenses to a parent making support transfer payments resulting from
the significant amount of time spent with that parent and shall
consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the party receiving the
support resulting from the significant amount of time the child spends
with the parent making the support transfer payment.
(((e) Children from other relationships. The court may deviate
from the standard calculation when either or both of the parents before
the court have children from other relationships to whom the parent
owes a duty of support.
(i) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(ii) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(iii) When considering a deviation from the standard calculation
for children from other relationships, the court may consider only
other children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court
may consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(iv) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, deviations under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. All child support obligations paid, received, and owed for
all children shall be disclosed and considered.))
(2) All income and resources of the parties before the court, new
spouses or new domestic partners, and other adults in the households
shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the
child support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set
forth in the written findings of fact and are supported by the
evidence, the court shall order each parent to pay the amount of
support determined by using the standard calculation.
(3) The court shall enter findings that specify reasons for any
deviation or any denial of a party's request for any deviation from the
standard calculation made by the court. The court shall not consider
reasons for deviation until the court determines the standard
calculation for each parent.
(4) When reasons exist for deviation, the court shall exercise
discretion in considering the extent to which the factors would affect
the support obligation.
(5) Agreement of the parties is not by itself adequate reason for
any deviations from the standard calculation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The court may make an adjustment to the standard calculation
when the obligor has children not before the court, subject to the
provisions in this section and the limitations in RCW 26.19.065. If
the court adjusts the standard calculation, it shall use the whole
family formula as provided in this section.
(2) The child support schedule must first be applied to the parents
and the children before the court to determine the standard amount of
support.
(3) Children not before the court must not be counted in the number
of children for purposes of determining the standard calculation, but
must be counted in the adjusted calculation for the obligor parent.
(4) Stepchildren are not considered children not before the court
but may be considered as a reason to deviate from either the standard
or the adjusted calculation of support.
(5) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children not before the court, adjustments under this section must be
based on considerations of the total circumstances of both households
including the children of either parent who do not live in the
household of the parents. Both parents shall disclose, and the court
shall consider, all child support obligations paid, received, and owed
for all children.
(6) The court may not adjust the standard calculation on the basis
of children not before the court if:
(a) Adjusting the standard calculation would result in insufficient
funds to meet the basic needs of the children in the receiving
household and, when taking into consideration the totality of the
circumstances, the application of the adjustment would be unjust;
(b) The obligee's net income before receiving the support transfer
payment is at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal
poverty level guidelines for the obligee's household size, including
both children before the court and children not before the court; or
(c) It is shown that the obligor parent has not actually paid the
child support owed for the obligor's children not before the court who
do not live with the obligor, unless there is a reasonable
justification for the obligor's nonpayment. When considering whether
a reasonable justification exists, the court shall consider the
obligor's ability to make full payments of the child support owed for
the obligor's children not before the court.
(7) The whole family formula requires the court to:
(a) Determine the total number of children before the court and the
total number of children not before the court for the obligor parent;
(b) Determine the monthly basic support obligation from the
economic table based on the combined monthly net income of the parents
before the court and the obligor's total number of children as
determined in (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the monthly basic child support obligation by the
obligor's proportional share of the combined monthly net income. This
amount is the adjusted transfer payment owed by the obligor parent for
the children before the court.
(8) If the court does not establish the transfer payment at an
adjusted calculation determined by this section, the court shall set
forth specific findings for the difference in the order of child
support.

Sec. 7 RCW 26.19.090 and 1991 sp.s. c 28 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The child support schedule shall be advisory and not mandatory
for postsecondary educational support.
(2)(a) When considering whether to order support for postsecondary
educational expenses, the court shall determine whether the child is in
fact dependent and is relying upon the parents for the reasonable
necessities of life.
(b) Before determining the parents' obligations for postsecondary
educational support, the court shall consider all grants and
scholarships awarded to the child, including work-study opportunities
if an actual work-study position is available for the child, and
subtract those amounts from the total cost of postsecondary educational
support to determine the unmet need for postsecondary educational
support.
(3) The court shall exercise its discretion when determining
whether and for how long to award postsecondary educational support
based upon consideration of factors that include but are not limited to
the following:
(a) Age of the child;
(b) The child's needs;
(c) The expectations of the parties for their children when the
parents were together;
(d) The child's prospects, desires, aptitudes, abilities or
disabilities;
(e) The nature of the postsecondary education sought; ((and))
(f) The parents' level of education, standard of living, and
current and future resources((. Also to be considered are)); and
(g) The amount and type of support that the child would have been
afforded if the parents had stayed together.
(((3))) (4) If one or both parents saved separately for
postsecondary educational support and paid those amounts directly to
the educational institution or the child, those amounts should be
considered part of the parent's share of postsecondary educational
support.
(5) The child must enroll in an accredited academic or vocational
school, must be actively pursuing a course of study commensurate with
the child's vocational goals, and must be in good academic standing as
defined by the institution. ((The court-ordered postsecondary
educational support shall be automatically suspended during the period
or periods the child fails to comply with these conditions.
(4))) (6)(a) Unless the support order provides otherwise, a parent
may suspend payment of postsecondary educational support based on the
child's failure to be enrolled in an accredited academic or vocational
school, failure to actively pursue a course of study commensurate with
the child's vocational goals, or failure to be in good academic
standing as defined by the institution.
(b) The obligation to pay postsecondary educational support remains
suspended until the child is in compliance with subsection (5) of this
section.
(c) If there is a dispute between the parents or between the parent
and the child regarding the child's compliance, the child or either
parent may file a motion with the court to seek resolution of the
dispute, unless the order establishing the obligation to pay
postsecondary educational support provides otherwise.
(7) The child shall also make available all academic records and
grades to both parents as a condition of receiving postsecondary
educational support. Each parent shall have full and equal access to
the postsecondary education records as provided in RCW 26.09.225.
(((5))) (8) The court shall not order the payment of postsecondary
educational expenses beyond the child's twenty-third birthday, except
for exceptional circumstances, such as mental, physical, or emotional
disabilities.
(((6))) (9)(a) The court shall direct that either or both parents'
payments for postsecondary educational expenses be made directly to the
educational institution if feasible.
(b) If direct payments are not feasible, then the court in its
discretion may order that either or both parents' payments be made
directly to the child if the child does not reside with either parent.
(c) If the child resides with one of the parents the court may
direct that the parent making the postsecondary educational support
transfer payments make the payments to the child or to the parent ((who
has been receiving the support transfer payments)) with whom the child
is residing. If the child's living situation changes, that change
shall be a basis to change the terms of the postsecondary educational
support transfer payment to the other parent.
(d) If the child's living situation changes so that the child is no
longer residing with either parent, both parents shall make the
payments to the educational institution, if feasible, or to the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect October 1, 2012.

--- END ---