BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2010 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period, except for those urban
growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve.
As part of this planning process, each city within the county must
include areas sufficient to accommodate the broad range of needs and
uses that will accompany the projected urban growth including, as
appropriate, medical, governmental, institutional, commercial, service,
retail, and other nonresidential uses.
Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of urban growth
areas contained totally within a national historical reserve, the city
may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of urban growth as
determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect the physical,
cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban growth area
determination may include a reasonable land market supply factor and
shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In determining this
market factor, cities and counties may consider local circumstances.
Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive plans to
make many choices about accommodating growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to
be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and under this
section. Such action may be appealed to ((the growth management
hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280)) superior court. Final urban
growth areas shall be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan
adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expansion
of an urban growth area is prohibited into the one hundred year
floodplain of any river or river segment that: (i) Is located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains; and (ii) has a mean annual flow of
one thousand or more cubic feet per second as determined by the
department of ecology.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(i) Urban growth areas that are fully contained within a floodplain
and lack adjacent buildable areas outside the floodplain;
(ii) Urban growth areas where expansions are precluded outside
floodplains because:
(A) Urban governmental services cannot be physically provided to
serve areas outside the floodplain; or
(B) Expansions outside the floodplain would require a river or
estuary crossing to access the expansion; or
(iii) Urban growth area expansions where:
(A) Public facilities already exist within the floodplain and the
expansion of an existing public facility is only possible on the land
to be included in the urban growth area and located within the
floodplain; or
(B) Urban development already exists within a floodplain as of July
26, 2009, and is adjacent to, but outside of, the urban growth area,
and the expansion of the urban growth area is necessary to include such
urban development within the urban growth area; or
(C) The land is owned by a jurisdiction planning under this chapter
or the rights to the development of the land have been permanently
extinguished, and the following criteria are met:
(I) The permissible use of the land is limited to one of the
following: Outdoor recreation; environmentally beneficial projects,
including but not limited to habitat enhancement or environmental
restoration; storm water facilities; flood control facilities; or
underground conveyances; and
(II) The development and use of such facilities or projects will
not decrease flood storage, increase storm water runoff, discharge
pollutants to fresh or salt waters during normal operations or floods,
or increase hazards to people and property.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (8), "one hundred year
floodplain" means the same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth
in WAC 173-158-040 as it exists on July 26, 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2011 c 360 s 16 and 2011 c 353 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall
include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area
ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the
population allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year
population forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the
deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Amendments may
be considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan. Subarea plans adopted
under this subsection (2)(a)(i) must clarify, supplement, or implement
jurisdiction-wide comprehensive plan policies, and may only be adopted
if the cumulative impacts of the proposed plan are addressed by
appropriate environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
(ii) The development of an initial subarea plan for economic
development located outside of the one hundred year floodplain in a
county that has completed a state-funded pilot project that is based on
watershed characterization and local habitat assessment;
(iii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iv) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; or
(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to
enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.031(2), provided that
amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation
program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a)
and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan
update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to
comment.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with the ((growth management hearings
board or with the)) court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, according to the schedules established in
subsection (5) of this section, its designated urban growth area or
areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and
unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with
this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth
area shall review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and
the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the county has
located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban
growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, counties
and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson,
King, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the
cities within those counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this
section, following the review of comprehensive plans and development
regulations required by subsection (4) of this section, counties and
cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:
(a) On or before June 30, 2015, and every eight years thereafter,
for King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before June 30, 2016, and every eight years thereafter,
for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason, San Juan, Skagit,
Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before June 30, 2017, and every eight years thereafter,
for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Kittitas, Lewis, Skamania,
Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before June 30, 2018, and every eight years thereafter,
for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Grays
Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens,
Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities within
those counties.
(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the deadlines established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) A county that is subject to a deadline established in
subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following
criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time
within the thirty-six months following the deadline established in
subsection (4) of this section: The county has a population of less
than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the deadline established
in subsection (4) of this section as of that date.
(c) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection
(4)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may
comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the
thirty-six months following the deadline established in subsection (4)
of this section: The city has a population of no more than five
thousand and has had its population increase by the greater of either
no more than one hundred persons or no more than seventeen percent in
the ten years preceding the deadline established in subsection (4) of
this section as of that date.
(d) A county or city that is subject to a deadline established in
subsection (4)(d) of this section and that meets the criteria
established in subsection (6)(b) or (c) of this section may comply with
the requirements of subsection (4)(d) of this section at any time
within the thirty-six months after the extension provided in subsection
(6)(b) or (c) of this section.
(e) A county that is subject to a deadline established in
subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following
criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time
within the twenty-four months following the deadline established in
subsection (5) of this section: The county has a population of less
than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the deadline established
in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.
(f) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection
(5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may
comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the
twenty-four months following the deadline established in subsection (5)
of this section: The city has a population of no more than five
thousand and has had its population increase by the greater of either
no more than one hundred persons or no more than seventeen percent in
the ten years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of
this section as of that date.
(g) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(7)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities that meet
the following criteria may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70.146 RCW:
(i) Complying with the deadlines in this section;
(ii) Demonstrating substantial progress towards compliance with the
schedules in this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas; or
(iii) Complying with the extension provisions of subsection (6)(b),
(c), or (d) of this section.
(b) A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress
towards compliance. Only those counties and cities in compliance with
the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or
loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, if
a participating watershed is achieving benchmarks and goals for the
protection of critical areas functions and values, the county is not
required to update development regulations to protect critical areas as
they specifically apply to agricultural activities in that watershed.
(b) A county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) may
only adopt or amend development regulations to protect critical areas
as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a
participating watershed if:
(i) A work plan has been approved for that watershed in accordance
with RCW 36.70A.725;
(ii) The local watershed group for that watershed has requested the
county to adopt or amend development regulations as part of a work plan
developed under RCW 36.70A.720;
(iii) The adoption or amendment of the development regulations is
necessary to enable the county to respond to an order of the ((growth
management hearings board or)) court;
(iv) The adoption or amendment of development regulations is
necessary to address a threat to human health or safety; or
(v) Three or more years have elapsed since the receipt of funding.
(c) Beginning ten years from the date of receipt of funding, a
county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) must review
and, if necessary, revise development regulations to protect critical
areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a
participating watershed in accordance with the review and revision
requirements and timeline in subsection (5) of this section. This
subsection (8)(c) does not apply to a participating watershed that has
determined under RCW 36.70A.720(2)(c)(ii) that the watershed's goals
and benchmarks for protection have been met.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995 c 347 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county and city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures providing for early
and continuous public participation in the development and amendment of
comprehensive land use plans and development regulations implementing
such plans. The procedures shall provide for broad dissemination of
proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written comments, public
meetings after effective notice, provision for open discussion,
communication programs, information services, and consideration of and
response to public comments. In enacting legislation in response to
((the board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300)) a court's decision
declaring part or all of a comprehensive plan or development regulation
invalid, the county or city shall provide for public participation that
is appropriate and effective under the circumstances presented by the
((board's)) court's order. Errors in exact compliance with the
established program and procedures shall not render the comprehensive
land use plan or development regulations invalid if the spirit of the
program and procedures is observed.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.172 and 2010 c 211 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(((2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, the growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.))

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.210 and 2009 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide planning policy in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county as follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a countywide planning
policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner
in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) commerce to mediate any disputes that
preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all
disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose
appropriate sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the
county, city, or cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided
in this section. The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for
the imposition of any sanction.
(((e))) (d) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority
of each county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
as of June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed countywide planning policy.
(3) A countywide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a countywide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for countywide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for countywide economic development and employment,
which must include consideration of the future development of
commercial and industrial facilities; and
(h) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the countywide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a countywide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a countywide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted countywide
planning policy to ((the growth management hearings board)) superior
court within sixty days of the adoption of the countywide planning
policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.290 and 2011 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All requests for review to the ((growth management hearings
board)) superior court shall be initiated by filing a petition that
includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution by the
((board)) court. ((The board shall render written decisions
articulating the basis for its holdings. The board shall not issue
advisory opinions on issues not presented to the board in the statement
of issues, as modified by any prehearing order)) The superior court
shall hear and determine petitions filed under this section alleging
either that:
(a) A state agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is
not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter or chapter
90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of local shoreline master
programs or program amendments; or
(b) The approval of a work plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(a)
is not in compliance with the requirements of the programs established
under RCW 36.70A.710; or
(c) A department certification under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(c) is
erroneous.
(2) A petition may be filed only by (a) the state or a county or
city that plans under this chapter, or (b) a person qualified pursuant
to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication as provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the department of ecology shall publish a notice that
the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved. For purposes of this section, the date of publication for
the adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program is the date the
department of ecology publishes notice that the shoreline master
program or amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved.
(((3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5))) (4) The ((board)) court, shall consolidate, when appropriate,
all petitions involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or
the same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.310 and 2010 c 211 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
A request for review by the state to the ((growth management
hearings board)) superior court may be made only by the governor, or
with the governor's consent the head of an agency, or by the
commissioner of public lands as relating to state trust lands, for the
review of whether: (1) A county or city that is required or chooses to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 has failed to adopt a comprehensive plan or
development regulations, or countywide planning policies within the
time limits established by this chapter; or (2) a county or city that
is required or chooses to plan under this chapter has adopted a
comprehensive plan, development regulations, or countywide planning
policies, that are not in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,))
Comprehensive plans and development regulations, and amendments
thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.
The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable
development regulations adopted by a county or city take effect as
provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.
(2) ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section,)) The burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any
action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this chapter is
not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) In any petition under ((this chapter)) RCW 36.70A.290, the
((board)) court, after full consideration of the petition, shall
determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of this
chapter. In making its determination, the ((board)) court shall
consider the ((criteria adopted by the department under RCW
36.70A.190(4))) statutory requirements of this chapter. The ((board))
court shall find compliance unless it determines that the action by the
state agency, county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of the
entire record before the ((board)) court and in light of the goals and
requirements of this chapter.
(4) ((A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity
made under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating
that the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to the
determination of invalidity will no longer substantially interfere with
the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under the standard in RCW
36.70A.302(1).
(5) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the
applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall
take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.)) In reviewing a petition
under RCW 36.70A.290, the court shall issue a final order based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 RCW
as it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master
programs. In the final order, the court may find either that (a) the
state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements of
this chapter or chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption or
amendment of the shoreline master programs, or (b) the state agency,
county, or city is not in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption or amendment
of the shoreline master programs, in which case the court shall remand
the matter to the affected state agency, county, or city. The court
shall specify a reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty
days, or such longer period as determined by the court in cases of
unusual scope or complexity, within which the state agency, county, or
city shall comply with the requirements of this chapter. The court may
require periodic reports to the court on the progress the jurisdiction
is making towards compliance.
(5) The court may determine that part or all of a comprehensive
plan or development regulation is invalid if the court makes a finding
of noncompliance and issues an order of remand under subsection (4) of
this section. The final order must specify the particular part or
parts of a plan or regulation that are determined to be invalid, and
the reasons for their invalidity.
(6) Unless the court makes a determination of invalidity under
subsection (5) of this section, a finding of noncompliance and an order
of remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans and
development regulations during the period of remand.
(7) If the ordinance that adopts a plan or development regulation
under this chapter includes a savings clause intended to revive prior
policies or regulations in the event the new plan or regulations are
determined to be invalid, the court shall determine under subsection
(5) of this section whether the prior policies or regulations are valid
during the period of remand.
(8) A determination of invalidity is prospective in effect and does
not extinguish rights that vested under state or local laws before
receipt of the court's order by the city or county. A determination of
invalidity does not apply to a completed development permit application
for a project that vested under state or local law before receipt of
the court's order by the county or city or to related construction
permits for that project.
(9)(a) A development permit application not vested under state or
local law before receipt of the court's order by the county or city
vests to the local ordinance or resolution that is determined by the
court not to substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals
of this chapter.
(b) Even though the application is not vested under state or local
law before receipt by the county or city of the court's order, a
determination of invalidity does not apply to a development permit
application for:
(i) A permit for construction by any owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single-family residence of his or her own use or for the
use of his or her family on a lot existing before receipt of the county
or city of the court's order, except as otherwise specifically provided
in the court order to protect the public health and safety;
(ii) A building permit and related construction permits for
remodeling, tenant improvements, or expansion of an existing structure
on a lot existing before receipt of the board's order by the county or
city; or
(iii) A boundary line adjustment or a division of land that does
not increase the number of buildable lots existing before receipt of
the court's order by the county or city.
(10) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity may
adopt interim controls and other measures to be in effect until it
adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations that comply
with the requirements of this chapter. A development permit
application may vest under an interim control or measure.
(11) After the time set for complying with the requirements of this
chapter under subsection (4) of this section has expired, the court
shall set a hearing for the purpose of determining whether the state
agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter. After a hearing, if the court finds that the state agency,
city, or county is not in compliance, the court shall issue its
findings in writing.
(12) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the superior court
issued pursuant to this section may appeal the decision in accordance
with court rules.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.70A.3201 and 2010 c 211 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature intends that the ((board)) superior court applies
a more deferential standard of review to actions of counties and cities
than the preponderance of the evidence standard provided for under
existing law. In recognition of the broad range of discretion that may
be exercised by counties and cities consistent with the requirements of
this chapter, the legislature intends for the ((board)) courts to grant
deference to counties and cities in how they plan for growth,
consistent with the requirements and goals of this chapter. Local
comprehensive plans and development regulations require counties and
cities to balance priorities and options for action in full
consideration of local circumstances. The legislature finds that while
this chapter requires local planning to take place within a framework
of state goals and requirements, the ultimate burden and responsibility
for planning, harmonizing the planning goals of this chapter, and
implementing a county's or city's future rests with that community.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.70A.340 and 2011 c 120 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon receipt ((from the board)) of the growth management hearings
board's finding or a court's finding that a state agency, county, or
city is in noncompliance under RCW ((36.70A.330)) 36.70A.320(11), or as
a result of failure to meet the requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, the
governor may either:
(1) Notify and direct the director of the office of financial
management to revise allotments in appropriation levels;
(2) Notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the portion
of revenues to which the county or city is entitled under one or more
of the following: The motor vehicle fuel tax, as provided in chapter
82.36 RCW; the transportation improvement account, as provided in RCW
47.26.084; the rural arterial trust account, as provided in RCW
36.79.150; the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14 RCW; the
liquor profit tax, as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise
tax, as provided in RCW 82.08.170; or
(3) File a notice of noncompliance with the secretary of state and
the county or city, which shall temporarily rescind the county or
city's authority to collect the real estate excise tax under RCW
82.46.030 until the governor files a notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.70A.345 and 2010 c 211 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governor may impose a sanction or sanctions specified under RCW
36.70A.340 on: (1) A county or city that fails to designate critical
areas, agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands
under RCW 36.70A.170 by the date such action was required to have been
taken; (2) a county or city that fails to adopt development regulations
under RCW 36.70A.060 protecting critical areas or conserving
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands by the date
such action was required to have been taken; (3) a county that fails to
designate urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 by the date such
action was required to have been taken; and (4) a county or city that
fails to adopt its comprehensive plan or development regulations when
such actions are required to be taken.
Imposition of a sanction or sanctions under this section shall be
preceded by written findings by the governor, that either the county or
city is not proceeding in good faith to meet the requirements of the
act; or that the county or city has unreasonably delayed taking the
required action. ((The governor shall consult with and communicate his
or her findings to the growth management hearings board prior to
imposing the sanction or sanctions.)) For those counties or cities
that are not required to plan or have not opted in, the governor in
imposing sanctions shall consider the size of the jurisdiction relative
to the requirements of this chapter and the degree of technical and
financial assistance provided.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.46.030 and 2000 c 103 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall place one percent of the proceeds of
the taxes imposed under this chapter in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection.
(2) The remaining proceeds from the county tax under RCW
82.46.010(2) shall be placed in a county capital improvements fund.
The remaining proceeds from city or town taxes under RCW 82.46.010(2)
shall be distributed to the respective cities and towns monthly and
placed by the city treasurer in a municipal capital improvements fund.
(3) This section does not limit the existing authority of any city,
town, or county to impose special assessments on property specially
benefited thereby in the manner prescribed by law.
(4) This section is subject to RCW 36.70A.345.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.21B.005 and 2010 c 210 s 4 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7
s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created an environmental and land use hearings office
of the state of Washington. The environmental and land use hearings
office consists of the pollution control hearings board created in RCW
43.21B.010((,)) and the shorelines hearings board created in RCW
90.58.170((, and the growth management hearings board created in RCW
36.70A.250. The governor shall designate one of the members of the
pollution control hearings board or growth management hearings board to
be the director of the environmental and land use hearings office
during the term of the governor)). Membership, powers, functions, and
duties of the pollution control hearings board((,)) and the shorelines
hearings board((, and the growth management hearings board)) shall be
as provided by law.
(2) The director of the environmental and land use hearings office
may appoint one or more administrative appeals judges in cases before
the environmental boards and((, with the consent of the chair of the
growth management hearings board,)) one or more hearing examiners in
cases before the land use board comprising the office. The
administrative appeals judges shall possess the powers and duties
conferred by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, have
a demonstrated knowledge of environmental law, and shall be admitted to
the practice of law in the state of Washington. ((The hearing
examiners possess the powers and duties provided for in RCW
36.70A.270.))
(3) Administrative appeals judges are not subject to chapter 41.06
RCW. The administrative appeals judges appointed under subsection (2)
of this section are subject to discipline and termination, for cause,
by the director of the environmental and land use hearings office.
Upon written request by the person so disciplined or terminated, the
director of the environmental and land use hearings office shall state
the reasons for such action in writing. The person affected has a
right of review by the superior court of Thurston county on petition
for reinstatement or other remedy filed within thirty days of receipt
of such written reasons.
(4) The director of the environmental and land use hearings office
may appoint, discharge, and fix the compensation of such administrative
or clerical staff as may be necessary.
(5) The director of the environmental and land use hearings office
may also contract for required services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings board -- Creation--Members) and 2010 c 211 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 29, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;
(2) RCW 36.70A.252 (Growth management hearings board -- Consolidation
into environmental and land use hearings office) and 2010 c 210 s 15;
(3) RCW 36.70A.260 (Growth management hearings board -- Regional
panels) and 2010 c 211 s 5, 1994 c 249 s 30, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;
(4) RCW 36.70A.270 (Growth management hearings board -- Conduct,
procedure, and compensation) and 2010 c 211 s 6, 2010 c 210 s 16, 1997
c 429 s 11, 1996 c 325 s 1, 1994 c 257 s 1, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 7;
(5) RCW 36.70A.280 (Growth management hearings board -- Matters
subject to review) and 2011 c 360 s 17, 2010 c 211 s 7, 2008 c 289 s 5,
2003 c 332 s 2, 1996 c 325 s 2, 1995 c 347 s 108, 1994 c 249 s 31, &
1991 sp.s. c 32 s 9;
(6) RCW 36.70A.295 (Growth management hearings board -- Direct
judicial review) and 2010 c 211 s 9 & 1997 c 429 s 13;
(7) RCW 36.70A.300 (Final orders) and 1997 c 429 s 14, 1995 c 347
s 110, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 11;
(8) RCW 36.70A.302 (Growth management hearings board -- Determination
of invalidity -- Vesting of development permits -- Interim controls) and
2010 c 211 s 10 & 1997 c 429 s 16;
(9) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and 1996 c 325 s 4;
(10) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 1997 c 429 s 21, 1995 c 347
s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14;
(11) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity issued before July 27,
1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22; and
(12) RCW 36.70A.903 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions) and
2010 c 210 s 43.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The growth management hearings board may not accept any new
petitions after the effective date of this section. The board must
issue a final order or dismissal of a case without prejudice in all of
its cases on or before June 30, 2012. For the purposes of the board's
review of all petitions received on or before the effective date of
this section, the applicable provisions of chapter 36.70 RCW in effect
on January 1, 2012, govern, except that the board's authority with
regard to petitions ceases the effective date of section 16 of this
act.
(2) The superior court may not review petitions remanded to a state
agency, county, or city by the hearings board if the hearings board did
not review the petition after remand.
(3) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.
(4) For the purpose of tolling any statute of limitations, an
action under RCW 36.70A.290 is deemed commenced when a petition is
filed with the growth management hearings board. However, (a) the
petition must have been pending with the board on the effective date of
this section and must have been dismissed without prejudice by the
board; and (b) within thirty days of receipt of the order of dismissal
by the board, the petition must have been filed in superior court on
the same grounds as were brought before the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The growth management hearings board is
abolished.
(2) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers,
or written material in the possession of the board must be delivered to
the custody of the department of enterprise services for appropriate
disbursement or to the appropriate party if there is evidence related
to a pending case. All office furnishings, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property in the possession of the board
must be transferred to the department of enterprise services.
(3) All funds, credits, or other assets held by the growth
management hearings board must, on the effective date of this section,
be transferred to the office of financial management. If any question
arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held by
the growth management hearings board, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(4) All existing contracts and obligations must be terminated or
transferred to the office of financial management.
(5) All cases decided and all orders previously issued by the
growth management hearings board remain in full force and effect and
are not affected by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 13, 14, and 16 of this act take
effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---