BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.19.030 and 2010 c 161 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall design special license plates for persons
with disabilities, parking placards, and year tabs displaying the
international symbol of access.
(2) Special license plates for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on the motor vehicle as standard issue license plates as
described in RCW 46.16A.200.
(3) Parking placards must be displayed when the motor vehicle is
parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror. In the absence of a
rearview mirror, the parking placard must be displayed on the
dashboard. Parking placards must be displayed in a manner that allows
the entire placard to be viewed through the vehicle windshield.
(4) Special year tabs for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on license plates as defined by the department.
(5) Persons who have been issued special license plates for persons
with disabilities, parking placards, or special license plates with a
special year tab for persons with disabilities may park in places
reserved for persons with physical disabilities.

--- END ---