BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the federal
endangered species act provides legal options for nonfederal parties to
engage in acts that would cause otherwise prohibited harm to a
threatened or endangered species. A commonly used option offered by
the federal government is the formulation of a habitat conservation
plan. These voluntary long-term agreements between the federal
government and a nonfederal party allow defined actions to occur,
despite potential harm to a threatened or endangered species, according
to agreed upon processes and limitations.
(2) The legislature further finds that habitat conservation plans
have been successfully entered into by private parties in Washington
and by the Washington state government itself. These agreements have
been instrumental in sustaining the working status of natural resource
lands and providing a degree of regulatory certainty to the nonfederal
signatories to the various habitat conservation plans.
(3) The legislature further finds that state agency participation
in habitat conservation plans is a potentially beneficial option for
state land managers and state regulatory programs. However,
participation in a habitat conservation plan often requires the state
to commit to taking certain actions, refrain from certain actions, or
be required to seek federal approval for actions that would otherwise
be within the state's inherent authority. The result of a state agency
entering into a habitat conservation plan could be to limit decision-making options for future legislatures, governors, and executive branch
agency directors for an extended period of time.
(4) The legislature further finds that, given the potential long-lasting ramifications on future legislative and executive branch
options, the decision to commit the state to the potential long-term
limitations of a habitat conservation plan should not be unilaterally
made by a state agency. Conversely, the role of the state agencies is
to identify the utility of a habitat conservation plan, but allow the
legislature and the governor to decide if the benefits of the habitat
conservation plan outweigh the potential sacrifice of future governing
options. This model was utilized when the legislature directed the
department of natural resources to negotiate a habitat conservation
plan in what is known as the forests and fish law (chapter 4, Laws of
1999), and it is a model that should be relied upon whenever a state
agency, or other party, decides that a habitat conservation plan is in
the best interest of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not, after the effective date of this
section, do either of the following without prior express direction
from the legislature:
(a) Officially enter into a habitat conservation plan, or other
multiyear agreement with the federal government under the endangered
species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq., for the hydraulics project
approval program created under this chapter that commits the state to
future action or constrains future state options without prior express
direction from the legislature; or
(b) Finalize any rule-making processes related to the hydraulic
project approval program that is or was funded in part or whole by a
grant from any branch of the federal government.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from seeking
funding for the development of a habitat conservation plan or
underlying rules, negotiating the provisions of a habitat conservation
plan with the federal government, or taking other steps towards
finalizing the provisions of a habitat conservation plan short of
committing the state to the provisions of the negotiated habitat
conservation plan or finalizing any rules related to the hydraulic
project approval program that is or was funded in part or whole by a
grant from any branch of the federal government.
(3) For the purposes of this section, express direction from the
legislature is limited to the passage of a bill that is either signed
by the governor or allowed to take effect absent a gubernatorial
signature that includes express direction to the department to enter
into a specific habitat conservation plan or finalize any rule-making
processes related to the hydraulic project approval program that is or
was funded in part or whole by a grant from any branch of the federal
government.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.047 and 2001 c 253 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the commission may
adopt, amend, or repeal rules as follows:
(a) Specifying the times when the taking of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(b) Specifying the areas and waters in which the taking and
possession of wildlife, fish, or shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(c) Specifying and defining the gear, appliances, or other
equipment and methods that may be used to take wildlife, fish, or
shellfish, and specifying the times, places, and manner in which the
equipment may be used or possessed.
(d) Regulating the importation, transportation, possession,
disposal, landing, and sale of wildlife, fish, shellfish, or seaweed
within the state, whether acquired within or without the state.
(e) Regulating the prevention and suppression of diseases and pests
affecting wildlife, fish, or shellfish.
(f) Regulating the size, sex, species, and quantities of wildlife,
fish, or shellfish that may be taken, possessed, sold, or disposed of.
(g) Specifying the statistical and biological reports required from
fishers, dealers, boathouses, or processors of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish.
(h) Classifying species of marine and freshwater life as food fish
or shellfish.
(i) Classifying the species of wildlife, fish, and shellfish that
may be used for purposes other than human consumption.
(j) Regulating the taking, sale, possession, and distribution of
wildlife, fish, shellfish, or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(k) Establishing game reserves and closed areas where hunting for
wild animals or wild birds may be prohibited.
(l) Regulating the harvesting of fish, shellfish, and wildlife in
the federal exclusive economic zone by vessels or individuals
registered or licensed under the laws of this state.
(m) Authorizing issuance of permits to release, plant, or place
fish or shellfish in state waters.
(n) Governing the possession of fish, shellfish, or wildlife so
that the size, species, or sex can be determined visually in the field
or while being transported.
(o) Other rules necessary to carry out this title and the purposes
and duties of the department.
(2) Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do
not apply to private tideland owners and lessees and the immediate
family members of the owners or lessees of state tidelands, when they
take or possess oysters, clams, cockles, borers, or mussels, excluding
razor clams, produced on their own private tidelands or their leased
state tidelands for personal use.
"Immediate family member" for the purposes of this section means a
spouse, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(3) Except for subsection (1)(g) of this section, this section does
not apply to private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020. Subsection (1)(g) of this section does apply to such
products.

--- END ---