BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after
its enactment into law and (b) only on the first day of January((,
April, July, or October)).
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003.
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.055 and 2003 c 168 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, a local sales and use tax change shall take effect (a) no
sooner than seventy-five days after the department receives notice of
the change and (b) only on the first day of January((, April, July, or
October)).
(2) In the case of a local sales and use tax that is a credit
against the state sales tax or use tax, a local sales and use tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than thirty days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of a month.
(3)(a) A local sales and use tax rate increase imposed on services
applies to the first billing period starting on or after the effective
date of the increase.
(b) A local sales and use tax rate decrease imposed on services
applies to bills rendered on or after the effective date of the
decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax
change" means enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under
this chapter or any other statute, including changes resulting from
referendum or annexation.

--- END ---