BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.16.060 and 1999 c 153 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, local
improvement districts or utility local improvement districts to carry
out the whole or any portion of the general comprehensive plan of
improvements or plan providing for additions and betterments to an
original general comprehensive plan previously adopted may be initiated
either by resolution of the board of commissioners or by petition
signed by the owners according to the records of the office of the
applicable county auditor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of
the land and at least sixty percent of the property owners within the
limits of the improvement district to be created. Each parcel within
the proposed local improvement district is allowed no more than one
signature for the purposes of determining the sufficiency of the
petition. Any owner of real property exempt from property taxes may
sign the petition to have the tax-exempt property placed within the
local improvement district, but the signature may not be used to
determine the sufficiency of the petition. A government entity that
owns property within the proposed local improvement district, other
than the board of commissioners, may not initiate the petition to
create the local improvement district.
(2) In case the board of commissioners desires to initiate the
formation of an improvement district by resolution, it first shall pass
a resolution declaring its intention to order the improvement, setting
forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed improvement,
designating the number of the proposed improvement district, and
describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and
expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which
will be borne by the property within the proposed improvement district,
and fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the
formation of the proposed improvement district.
(3)(a) In case any such improvement district is initiated by
petition, the petition shall set forth the nature and territorial
extent of the proposed improvement requested to be ordered and the fact
that the signers thereof are the owners according to the records of the
applicable county auditor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of
land and comprise at least sixty percent of the property owners within
the limits of the improvement district to be created. Each parcel
within the proposed local improvement district is allowed no more than
one signature for the purposes of determining the sufficiency of the
petition. Any owner of real property exempt from property taxes may
sign the petition to have the tax-exempt property placed within the
local improvement district, but the signature may not be used to
determine the sufficiency of the petition. A government entity that
owns property within the proposed local improvement district, other
than the board of commissioners, may not initiate the petition to
create the local improvement district.
(b) Upon the filing of such petition, the board shall determine
whether the petition is sufficient, and the board's determination
thereof shall be conclusive upon all persons. No person may withdraw
his or her name from the petition after it has been filed with the
board of commissioners. If the board finds the petition to be
sufficient, it shall proceed to adopt a resolution declaring its
intention to order the improvement petitioned for, setting forth the
nature and territorial extent of the improvement, designating the
number of the proposed improvement district and describing the
boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the
improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by
the property within the proposed improvement district, and fixing a
date, time, and place for a public hearing on the formation of the
proposed improvement district.
(4) Notice of the adoption of the resolution of intention, whether
the resolution was adopted on the initiative of the board or pursuant
to a petition of the property owners, shall be published in at least
two consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed improvement district, the date of the first publication to be
at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed by such resolution for
hearing before the board of commissioners. Notice of the adoption of
the resolution of intention shall also be given each owner or reputed
owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the
proposed improvement district by mailing the notice at least fifteen
days before the date fixed for the public hearing to the owner or
reputed owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county
treasurer of the county in which the real property is located at the
address shown thereon. Whenever such notices are mailed, the
commissioners shall maintain a list of the reputed property owners,
which list shall be kept on file at a location within the district and
shall be made available for public perusal. The notices shall refer to
the resolution of intention and designate the proposed improvement
district by number. The notices also shall set forth the nature of the
proposed improvement, the total estimated cost, the proportion of total
cost to be borne by assessments, and the date, time, and place of the
hearing before the board of commissioners. In the case of improvements
initiated by resolution, the notice also shall: (((1))) (a) State that
all persons desiring to object to the formation of the proposed
district must file their written protests with the secretary of the
board of commissioners no later than ten days after the public hearing;
(((2))) (b) state that if owners of at least forty percent of the area
of land within the proposed improvement district file written protests
with the secretary of the board, the power of the commissioners to
proceed with the creation of the proposed improvement district shall be
divested; (((3))) (c) provide the name and address of the secretary of
the board; and (((4))) (d) state the hours and location within the
district where the names of the property owners within the proposed
improvement district are kept available for public perusal. In the
case of the notice given each owner or reputed owner by mail, the
notice shall set forth the estimated amount of the cost and expense of
such improvement to be borne by the particular lot, tract, parcel of
land, or other property.
(5) The creation of a local improvement district or utility local
improvement district in a water-sewer district located in a county with
less than one hundred thousand persons must only be commenced through
the petition process established under this section.

--- END ---