BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) More than three hundred eighty thousand people experience
cardiac arrest outside of a hospital every year, and only eleven
percent survive;
(b) When administered immediately, cardiopulmonary resuscitation
doubles or triples survival rates from cardiac arrest;
(c) Sudden cardiac arrest can happen to anyone at any time. Many
victims appear healthy with no known heart disease or other risk
factors;
(d) Approximately five thousand nine hundred children eighteen
years of age and under suffer out-of-hospital cardiac arrest each year
from all causes, including trauma, cardiovascular causes, and sudden
infant death syndrome;
(e) Five minutes can mean the difference between life and death.
If no cardiopulmonary resuscitation is provided or no defibrillation
occurs within three to five minutes of collapse, the chances of
survival drop significantly.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to create a generation of
lifesavers by putting cardiopulmonary resuscitation skills in the hands
of all high school graduates in order to change the overall health of
our community.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(d) Successful completion of instruction in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation as provided in section 3 of this act is required for
graduation from a public high school beginning with the graduating
class of 2016.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district that operates a high school shall make
instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation as provided in this
section available to students. Successful completion of the
instruction is a requirement for graduation beginning with the
graduating class of 2016.
(2) Instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation under this section
must:
(a) Be an instructional program developed by the American heart
association or the American red cross or be nationally recognized and
based on the most current national evidence-based emergency
cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(b) Include appropriate use of an automated external defibrillator;
and
(c) Incorporate hands-on practice and skills testing in addition to
cognitive learning.
(3) School districts may offer the instruction in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation directly or arrange for the instruction to be provided by
available community-based providers. The instruction is not required
to be provided by a certificated teacher. Certificated teachers
providing the instruction are not required to be certified trainers of
cardiopulmonary resuscitation. A student is not required to earn
certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation to successfully complete
the instruction for the purposes of this section. Students may
complete the instruction at any time, including before entering high
school, and from any provider, as long as the instruction meets the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---