BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the state parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Day use permit" means the recreational lands access permit
created in section 3 of this act.
(3) "Discover pass" means the pass created in section 2 of this
act.
(4) "Recreational lands" means any designated or developed
recreation area or site managed by an agency for outdoor recreation or
fish and wildlife conservation including designated water access areas,
boat ramps and launches, wildlife areas, parking areas, roads,
trailheads, water trails, and other trails under ownership, management,
lease, or control of the agency.
(5) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as "motor vehicle" defined in
RCW 46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter
46.16A RCW. The term "vehicle" does not include:
(a) An otherwise included motor vehicle if the vehicle is being
towed under the power of a motor vehicle satisfying the definition
provided in RCW 46.04.320;
(b) Those motor vehicles exempt from registration under RCW
46.16A.080; and
(c) State and publicly owned vehicles as provided in RCW
46.16A.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The discover pass is created as an
annual pass that is required, except as provided in sections 5 and 8 of
this act, to park or drive a vehicle on any recreational lands.
(2)(a) Except as provided in sections 10 and 11 of this act, the
cost of a discover pass is thirty dollars.
(b) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of a discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of a discover pass to account for
inflation.
(3)(a) Except for a gifted discover pass, a discover pass is valid
for one year from the date of issuance and must be designed so the
expiration month can be designated at the time of purchase.
(b) A gift option must be made available to the purchaser of a
discover pass. A gifted discover pass only differs from a standard
discover pass in that the purchaser may designate the month in which
the pass becomes effective.
(4) A discover pass must be made available for purchase as provided
in section 9 of this act.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers and is only valid if a license plate number
matching the vehicle in which the discover pass is displayed is written
into one of those spaces.
(6) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in one year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be taken to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.
(7) Except as otherwise specifically provided in statute, other
than providing the option for a day use permit under section 3 of this
act, the agencies may not require any additional payment for day use
noncommercial recreational access to recreational lands by individuals
or single vehicles. This subsection does not apply to special winter
recreational areas managed by the state parks and recreation commission
under chapter 79A.05 RCW, commercial activities or leases, consumptive
uses, events, rights of entry, or other activities or uses of
recreational lands not otherwise allowed to be accessed or used by the
holders of a discover pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may purchase a day use permit
that enables the holder to park or drive a vehicle on any recreational
lands without violating the requirements of section 4 of this act.
(2)(a) The day use permit is ten dollars.
(b) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of a day use permit and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of a day use permit to account
for inflation.
(3) Day use permits must be available for purchase as provided in
section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in this section or
section 5 of this act, a valid discover pass or a day use permit must
be visibly displayed in the front windshield of any vehicle, or in
plain sight on a vehicle without a windshield when:
(a) Driving on recreational lands; or
(b) Parked on recreational lands.
(2) A discover pass or day use permit is not required on private
lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water access areas, or at
agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities where public business
is conducted.
(3) A discover pass or day use permit is not required for persons
who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed by the agencies for
purposes consistent with a written authorization from the agency,
including but not limited to leases, contracts, and easements. An
agency may waive the requirements of this section for any person who
has secured the ability to access specific recreational land through
the provision of monetary consideration to the agency.
(4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any vehicle that
fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty is reduced to fifty-nine
dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a discover pass
to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice of
violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A discover pass or a day use permit are
not required for persons who display proof of payment of a camping fee
collected by the state parks and recreation commission under chapter
79A.05 RCW for the day preceding and the day following the night or
nights of camping designated on the proof of payment.
(2) A discover pass or day use permit is not required to park in
designated winter recreational area parking spaces identified in RCW
79A.05.225 between November 1st through March 31st and are not valid
substitutes for special winter recreational parking permits issued
under RCW 79A.05.230.
(3) The state parks and recreation commission must provide twelve
days a year where a vehicle may enter upon or park at a state park
without having to purchase or display a discover pass or day use
permit. At least three of those days must be on weekends.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The recreation access pass account is
created in the state treasury. All moneys received from the sale of
discover passes created in section 2 of this act and day use permits
created in section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each fiscal
biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in revenue must be
distributed to the agencies in the following manner:
(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170;
(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources and
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund created in RCW
43.30.385; and
(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million
dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts
identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Revenues distributed from the recreation access pass account
may only be used by the agencies for the following purposes:
(a) Operating, maintaining, providing stewardship of, and
administering recreational lands and public access to public lands,
including criminal and civil law enforcement; and
(b) Securing public access to land owned by an agency that does not
have direct public access, or to fishing and hunting areas located on,
or requiring access through, private lands.
(5) Prior to distributing revenue to the agencies under this
section, the state parks and recreation commission must be reimbursed
for the costs of producing, marketing, and distributing discover passes
and day use permits under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Administration of this chapter,
including the production, marketing, and distribution of discover
passes and day use permits to private vendors and other sales
locations, is the primary responsibility of the state parks and
recreation commission. However, the state parks and recreation
commission must consult with the other affected agencies when a
decision substantially affects that agency.
(2) Nothing in this section affects the administration of the
department of fish and wildlife's automated licensing system authorized
in RCW 77.32.050 or provides the state parks and recreation commission
with any authority over that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Each agency must, where applicable,
designate a short-term parking area on recreational lands that allows
a vehicle to park on the recreational lands for up to fifteen minutes
without having to display a discover pass or day use permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Discover passes and day use permits may
be made available for purchase:
(a) Through private sector vendors under contract with the state
parks and recreation commission;
(b) Directly from the state parks and recreation commission, both
through that agency's parks reservation system, directly from agency
employees or volunteers at staffed state parks, or as otherwise
provided in RCW 79A.05.070;
(c) From the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090
and section 21 of this act;
(d) From other outlets authorized by law to sell state licenses,
permits, or passes; and
(e) Consistent with RCW 77.32.050, through the department of fish
and wildlife's automated licensing system.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife's automated licensing
system is only one option for the sale of discover passes and day use
permits. Only discover passes and day use permits purchased in the
same transaction with licenses or permits issued under Title 77 RCW are
required to be sold through the automated licensing system and assessed
a transaction fee paid by the purchaser.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, once
purchased, a discover pass may not be returned and the purchase price
may not be refunded. Replacements for lost or stolen discover passes
may only be provided at full cost as provided in sections 2 and 3 of
this act.
(b) The state parks and recreation commission must maintain a
policy for providing the full year of recreational lands access that
the discover pass provides to individuals who are required by the
department of licensing to change license plate numbers during the
effective dates of a discover pass tied to the affected vehicle.
(4) Private sector vendors under contract with the state parks and
recreation commission may be provided with discover passes and day use
permits to sell at retail for a per item price less than the sales
price established in sections 2 and 3 of this act. However, any
participating private sector vendor may not collect less than the
amount established in sections 2 and 3 of this act for the sale of a
discover pass or day use permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must make a discover pass available for purchase
to any person who, in the same transaction, also purchases one of the
following:
(a) A big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450;
(b) A small game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460;
(c) A western Washington pheasant permit issued under RCW
77.32.575;
(d) A trapping license issued under RCW 77.65.450;
(e) A watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
(f) A combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing
license issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) The cost of a discover pass, when purchased during the same
transaction as an item identified in subsection (1) of this section, is
fifty percent of the cost of a discover pass as established in section
2 of this act.
(3) Only one discounted discover pass may be issued per
transaction. Additional discover passes, as well as discover passes
and day use permits sold to an individual purchasing an item other than
those identified in subsection (1) of this section, may be purchased
for the amount established in section 2 of this act.
(4) The fees collected for all discover passes and day use permits
purchased under this section must be deposited in the recreation access
pass account created in section 6 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section and unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the terms "discover pass" and "day use permit" have
the same meaning as provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission must make a discover pass available for purchase
to any person who, in the same transaction, also purchases a campsite
rental.
(2) The cost of a discover pass, when purchased during the same
transaction as an item identified in subsection (1) of this section, is
fifty percent of the cost of a discover pass as established in section
2 of this act.
(3) Only one discounted discover pass may be issued per
transaction. Additional discover passes, as well as discover passes
and day use permits sold to an individual purchasing an item other than
those identified in subsection (1) of this section, may be purchased
for the amount established in section 2 of this act.
(4) The fees collected for all discover passes and day use permits
purchased under this section must be deposited in the recreation access
pass account created in section 6 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section and unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the terms "discover pass" and "day use permit" have
the same meaning as defined in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.32.010 and 2011 c 320 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A ((pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or
79A.80.040 is required to park or operate a motor vehicle on a
recreation site or lands, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010)) discover pass
or day use permit issued under section 2 or 3 of this act is required
to access, park a vehicle on, or drive a vehicle on recreational lands
managed by the department, as the term "recreational lands" is defined
in section 1 of this act.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.15.750 and 2011 c 320 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section
include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot
removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500,
depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license
permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to
RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event
requiring a banquet permit from the liquor control board.
(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include
the discover pass created in ((RCW 79A.80.020, the vehicle access pass
created in RCW 79A.80.040, the day-use permit created in RCW
79A.80.030)) section 2 of this act, the day use permit created in
section 3 of this act, commercial use or activity permits,
noncommercial use or activity permits, parking permits, experimental
fishery permits, trial commercial fishery permits, and scientific
collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.30.385 and 2011 c 320 s 21 and 2011 c 16 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department.
(2) In addition to the other purposes identified in this section,
the park land trust revolving fund may be utilized by the department to
hold funding for future acquisition of lands for the community forest
trust program from willing sellers under RCW 79.155.040.
(3)(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state parks
and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from transfers
of real property as directed by the legislature shall be deposited in
the park land trust revolving fund.
(b) The proceeds from real property transferred or disposed under
RCW 79.22.060 must be used solely to purchase replacement forest land,
that must be actively managed as a working forest, within the same
county as the property transferred or disposed.
(c) Disbursement from the park land trust revolving fund to acquire
replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities shall be on the authorization of the department.
(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
((RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department)) section 6 of this act may only be used for
the purposes provided in section 6 of this act.
(4) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(5) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary
contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use
and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.
The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and
organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions will be
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and used solely for
the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and
maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use
of these facilities.

Sec. 15 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2011 c 320 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in
the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16A.090(3), and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account. ((The proceeds from the recreation access
pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be used for the purpose of
operating and maintaining state parks.))
(2)(a) Except for the proceeds from the recreation access pass
account created in section 6 of this act, expenditures from the account
may be used for operating state parks, developing and renovating park
facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park
stewardship, and other state park purposes.
(b) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
section 6 of this act must be used for the purposes identified in
section 6 of this act.
(c) Expenditures from the account may be made only after
appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.12.170 and 2011 c 339 s 3, 2011 c 320 s 23, and
2011 c 171 s 112 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties;
(d) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW, RCW 77.65.490, and application fees;
(e) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(f) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.17 RCW;
(g) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(h) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320.
However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered
restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or
wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant
to RCW 77.15.425;
(i) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission;
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560; and
(l) ((Moneys received from the recreation access pass account
created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be dedicated to stewardship, operations,
and maintenance of department lands used for public recreation
purposes; and
(m))) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039.
(2) Moneys received from the recreation access pass account created
in section 6 of this act may only be used for the purposes identified
in section 6 of this act.
(3) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

Sec. 17 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2011 c 320 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge ((such)) fees for services, utilities, and use of
facilities, except for facilities allowed to be accessed and used by
the holder of a discover pass or day use permit under chapter 79A.80
RCW, as the commission shall deem proper. Unless deemed inappropriate
by the commission, the commission shall utilize unstaffed collection
stations to collect any fees or distribute any permits necessary for
access to state parks;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks
and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the
qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be
needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) ((Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated,
the commission shall have)) Utilize such other powers as in the
judgment of a majority of its members are deemed necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the commission ((shall)) does not have power to supervise directly any
local park or recreation district, and no funds shall be made available
for such purpose.

Sec. 18 RCW 77.32.070 and 2008 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. However, the director may
not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520,
a discover pass under section 2 of this act, or a day use permit under
section 3 of this act to provide any personal information except for,
when appropriate, proof of residency. The commission may adopt rules
requiring licensees or permittees to keep records and make reports
concerning the taking of or effort to harvest fish, shellfish, and
wildlife. The reporting requirement may be waived where, for any
reason, the department is not able to receive the report. The
department must provide reasonable options for a licensee to submit
information to a live operator prior to the reporting deadline.
(2) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of taking or
effort to harvest wildlife. The commission may also adopt rules
requiring hunters who have not reported for the previous license year
to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before
a new hunting license is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per hunter set by the
commission must not exceed ten dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of hunter compliance with the harvest reporting requirement, the
administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of
administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(3) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of data from catch
record cards officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab. The
commission may also adopt rules requiring fishers who possessed a catch
record card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab and who
have not reported for the previous license year to complete a report
and pay the assessed administrative penalty before a new catch record
card officially endorsed for Puget Sound Dungeness crab is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per fisher set by the
commission must not exceed ten dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of fisher compliance with the Puget Sound Dungeness crab catch
record card reporting requirement, the administrative penalty imposed
for failing to report, and the amount of administrative penalties
collected during that year to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.32.050 and 2011 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All recreational and commercial licenses, permits, tags,
stamps, and raffle tickets shall be issued under the authority of the
commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of
licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and for the
collection, payment, and handling of license fees, including terms and
conditions to govern dealers, and dealer fees. A transaction fee on
commercial and recreational documents issued through an automated
licensing system may be set by the commission and collected from
licensees. The department may authorize all or part of such fee to be
paid directly to a contractor providing automated licensing system
services. The department and dealers shall collect and retain dealer
fees of at least two dollars for purchase of a standard hunting or
fishing recreational license document or commercial license document,
except that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of
tags or when a licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display
card format rather than a standard department licensing document form
or for purchases of a discover pass under section 2 of this act or a
day use permit under section 3 of this act. Dealer fees must be
uniform throughout the state.
(2) ((Until September 1, 2011, the department shall charge an
additional transaction fee of ten percent on all recreational licenses,
permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets. These transaction fees must
be deposited into the state wildlife account, created in RCW 77.12.170,
for funding fishing and hunting opportunities for recreational license
holders.
(3))) The application fee is waived for all commercial license
documents that are issued through the automated licensing system.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.01.140 and 2011 c 171 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) County auditor/agent duties. A county auditor or other agent
appointed by the director shall:
(a) Enter into a standard contract provided by the director;
(b) Provide all services authorized by the director for vehicle
certificates of title and vehicle registration applications and
issuance under the direction and supervision of the director including,
but not limited to:
(i) Processing reports of sale;
(ii) Processing transitional ownership transactions;
(iii) Processing mail-in vehicle registration renewals until
directed otherwise by legislative authority;
(iv) Issuing registrations and temporary ORV use permits for
off-road vehicles as required under chapter 46.09 RCW;
(v) Issuing registrations for snowmobiles as required under chapter
46.10 RCW; and
(vi) Collecting fees and taxes as required;
(c) If authorized by the director, offer for sale and distribute
discover passes and day use permits as provided in chapter 79A.80 RCW.
(2) County auditor/agent assistants and subagents. A county
auditor or other agent appointed by the director may, with approval of
the director:
(a) Appoint assistants as special deputies to accept applications
for vehicle certificates of title and to issue vehicle registrations;
and
(b) Recommend and request that the director appoint subagencies
within the county to accept applications for vehicle certificates of
title and vehicle registration application issuance.
(3) Appointing subagents. A county auditor or other agent
appointed by the director who requests a subagency shall, with approval
of the director:
(a) Use an open competitive process including, but not limited to,
a written business proposal and oral interview to determine the
qualifications of all interested applicants; and
(b) Submit all proposals to the director with a recommendation for
appointment of one or more subagents who have applied through the open
competitive process. If a qualified successor who is an existing
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee has
applied, the county auditor shall provide the name of the qualified
successor and the name of one other applicant who is qualified and was
chosen through the open competitive process.
(4) Subagent duties. A subagent appointed by the director shall:
(a) Enter into a standard contract with the county auditor or agent
provided by the director; ((and))
(b) Provide all services authorized by the director for vehicle
certificates of title and vehicle registration applications and
issuance under the direction and supervision of the county auditor or
agent and the director including, but not limited to:
(i) Processing reports of sale;
(ii) Processing transitional ownership transactions;
(iii) Mailing out vehicle registrations and replacement plates to
internet payment option customers until directed otherwise by
legislative authority;
(iv) Issuing registrations and temporary ORV use permits for
off-road vehicles as required under chapter 46.09 RCW;
(v) Issuing registrations for snowmobiles as required under chapter
46.10 RCW; and
(vi) Collecting fees and taxes as required; and
(c) If authorized by the director, offer for sale and distribute
discover passes and day use permits as provided in chapter 79A.80 RCW.
(5) Subagent successorship. A subagent appointed by the director
who no longer wants his or her appointment may recommend a successor
who is the subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency
employee. The recommended successor must participate in the open
competitive process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendations and appointment determinations, the following
provisions apply:
(a) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers;
(b) A subagent may not receive any direct or indirect compensation
or remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment; and
(c) The appointment of a successor is intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments to minimize public inconvenience.
The appointment of a successor does not create a proprietary or
property interest in the appointment.
(6) Standard contracts. The standard contracts provided by the
director in this section may include provisions that the director deems
necessary to ensure that readily accessible and acceptable service is
provided to the citizens of the state, including the full collection of
fees and taxes. The standard contracts must include provisions that:
(a) Describe responsibilities and liabilities of each party related
to service expectations and levels;
(b) Describe the equipment to be supplied by the department and
equipment maintenance;
(c) Require specific types of insurance or bonds, or both, to
protect the state against any loss of collected revenue or loss of
equipment;
(d) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by each of
the parties;
(e) Describe allowable costs that may be charged for vehicle
registration activities as described in subsection (7) of this section;
and
(f) Describe causes and procedures for termination of the contract,
which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(7) County auditor/agent cost reimbursement. A county auditor or
other agent appointed by the director who does not cover expenses for
services provided by the standard contract may submit to the department
a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be submitted on
a form developed by the department. The department shall develop
procedures to standardize and identify allowable costs and to verify
whether a request is reasonable. Payment must be made on those
requests found to be allowable from the licensing services account.
(8) County auditor/agent revenue disbursement. County revenues
that exceed the cost of providing services described in the standard
contract, calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection
(7) of this section, must be expended as determined by the county
legislative authority during the process established by law for
adoption of county budgets.
(9) Appointment authority. The director has final appointment
authority for county auditors or other agents or subagents.
(10) Rules. The director may adopt rules to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing may, in coordination with the state
parks and recreation commission, offer for sale and distribute discover
passes and day use permits, as provided in chapter 79A.80 RCW, at
department driver licenses offices. Any amounts collected by the
department through the sales of discover passes and day use permits
must be deposited in the recreation access pass account created in
section 6 of this act.

Sec. 22 RCW 46.16A.090 and 2011 c 320 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall provide an opportunity for a vehicle
owner to make a voluntary donation as provided in this section when
applying for an initial or renewal vehicle registration.
(2)(a) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter
may donate one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the uniform anatomical gift act as described in chapter 68.64 RCW. The
donation of one or more dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the
vehicle owner.
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall:
(i) Ask a vehicle owner applying for a vehicle registration if the
owner would like to donate one dollar or more;
(ii) Inform a vehicle owner of the option for organ and tissue
donations as required under RCW 46.20.113; and
(iii) Make information booklets or other informational material
available regarding the importance of organ and tissue donations to
vehicle owners.
(c) All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the
donation program created under this section must be paid proportionally
or by another agreement by a participating Washington state organ
procurement organization established for organ and tissue donation
awareness purposes by the Washington state organ procurement
organizations. For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs"
and "Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same
meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.
(3) The department shall collect from a vehicle owner who pays a
vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (g), (h),
(j), (n), (o), or (q) or who registers a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.455
with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or less a voluntary
donation of five dollars to support Washington's state park system.
The donation may not be collected from any vehicle owner actively
opting not to participate in the donation program. The department
shall ensure that the opt-out donation under this section is clear,
visible, and prominently displayed in both paper and online vehicle
registration renewals. Notification of intent to not participate in
the donation program must be provided annually at the time of vehicle
registration renewal. The donation must be deposited in the state
parks renewal and stewardship account established in RCW 79A.05.215 to
be used for the operation and maintenance of state parks.
(4) ((Beginning with vehicle license fees that are due or will
become due on or after October 1, 2011,)) A vehicle owner who registers
a vehicle under this chapter may purchase a discover pass for ((a fee
of thirty dollars, as may be adjusted for inflation under RCW
79A.80.020)) the purchase price of a discover pass as established in
section 2 of this act. Purchase of the discover pass is voluntary by
the vehicle owner. The discover pass fee must be deposited in the
recreation access pass account created in ((RCW 79A.80.090)) section 6
of this act. The department, county auditor, or other agent or
subagent appointed by the director is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies, as
defined in ((RCW 79A.80.010)) section 1 of this act, must deliver the
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) A state agency may not refund money for
a discover pass or day use permit purchased prior to the effective date
of this section.
(2) Each pass or permit purchased prior to the effective date of
this section is valid for two license plate numbers written on the
pass.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "discover pass" and "day use
permit" refer to the passes and permits defined in section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 79A.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 79A.80.010 (Definitions) and 2011 c 320 s 2;
(2) RCW 79A.80.020 (Discover pass) and 2011 c 320 s 3;
(3) RCW 79A.80.030 (Day-use permit) and 2011 c 320 s 4;
(4) RCW 79A.80.040 (Vehicle access pass) and 2011 c 320 s 5;
(5) RCW 79A.80.050 (Valid camper registration/annual natural
investment permit -- Commission may provide free entry to state parks)
and 2011 c 320 s 6;
(6) RCW 79A.80.060 (Sno-park seasonal permit) and 2011 c 320 s 7;
(7) RCW 79A.80.070 (Short-term parking) and 2011 c 320 s 8;
(8) RCW 79A.80.080 (Pass/permit requirements--Penalty) and 2011 c
320 s 9; and
(9) RCW 79A.80.090 (Recreation access pass account) and 2011 c 320
s 10.

--- END ---