BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.020 and 2010 c 152 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative energy resource" includes energy facilities of the
following types: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy;
(d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; ((or)) (f) biomass energy
based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or
dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been
treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; or (g) capable of
processing more than two thousand five hundred barrels of biofuel per
day.
(2) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular
site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established
pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.
(4) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling,
or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant
with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system,
including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or
maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead,
and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection,
maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new
transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages of at
least 115,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant or alternative
energy facilities to the northwest power grid. However, common carrier
railroads or motor vehicles shall not be included.
(5) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.325.010.
(6) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant
and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines,
in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to
be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any
energy facility.
(7) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding
exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(8) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(9) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney
general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the
public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.
(10) "Electrical transmission facilities" means electrical power
lines and related equipment.
(11) "Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission
facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or
storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged
by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and
(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military
purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.
(12) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with
their associated facilities:
(a) Any nuclear power facility where the primary purpose is to
produce and sell electricity;
(b) Any nonnuclear stationary thermal power plant with generating
capacity of three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured
using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum
auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure, and
floating thermal power plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more
suspended on the surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other
floating platform;
(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquefied
natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over
marine waters;
(d) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an
average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum
or liquefied petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over
marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility
construction;
(e) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural
gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per
day; and
(f) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand
barrels per day of petroleum or biofuel into refined products except
where such biofuel production is undertaken at existing industrial
facilities.
(13) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no
financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by
the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies,
or to conduct additional studies.
(14) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW, or as otherwise designated by
chapter 325, Laws of 2007.
(15) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or
private, however organized.
(16) "Preapplicant" means a person considering applying for a site
certificate agreement for any transmission facility.
(17) "Preapplication process" means the process which is initiated
by written correspondence from the preapplicant to the council, and
includes the process adopted by the council for consulting with the
preapplicant and with cities, towns, and counties prior to accepting
applications for all transmission facilities.
(18) "Secretary" means the secretary of the United States
department of energy.
(19) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy
facility, alternative energy resource, or electrical transmission
facility.
(20) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification,
any electrical generating facility using any fuel for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities.
(21) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together
with their associated facilities:
(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the
transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;
(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquefied petroleum gas
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the
transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen
miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility,
except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission.
(22) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW or Article XI of the state
Constitution, or as otherwise designated by chapter 325, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.060 and 2007 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of
energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and
(15))) (12) and (21). No construction of such energy facilities may be
undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, after July
15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner provided
in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter((, regardless of the
generating capacity of the project)). An energy facility that
exclusively uses an alternative energy resource as defined in RCW
80.50.020(1) (a) through (f) may choose to receive certification under
this chapter, regardless of the electrical generating capacity of the
project.
(3)(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or modification of electrical transmission facilities
when:
(i) The facilities are located in a national interest electric
transmission corridor as specified in RCW 80.50.045;
(ii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage of at least
one hundred fifteen thousand volts and are located in a completely new
corridor, except for the terminus of the new facility or
interconnection of the new facility with the existing grid, and the
corridor is not otherwise used for electrical transmission facilities;
and (B) located in more than one jurisdiction that has promulgated land
use plans or zoning ordinances; or
(iii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage in excess of
one hundred fifteen thousand volts; and (B) located outside an
electrical transmission corridor identified in (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection (3).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "modify" means a
significant change to an electrical transmission facility and does not
include the following: (i) Minor improvements such as the replacement
of existing transmission line facilities or supporting structures with
equivalent facilities or structures; (ii) the relocation of existing
electrical transmission line facilities; (iii) the conversion of
existing overhead lines to underground; or (iv) the placing of new or
additional conductors, supporting structures, insulators, or their
accessories on or replacement of supporting structures already built.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal
maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and (15)))
(12) and (21).
(5) Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior
to July 15, 1977, shall continue to be governed by the applicable
provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding July 15,
1977, with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall
apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(6) Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed
by the council and shall be supported by such information and technical
studies as the council may require.

--- END ---