BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.29A.090 and 2002 c 285 s 6 and 2011 c 191 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2002, each electric utility must
provide to its retail electricity customers a voluntary option to
purchase qualified alternative energy resources in accordance with this
section.
(b)(i) Beginning February 1, 2013, each electric utility may: (A)
Establish an energy efficiency improvement loan fund; (B) receive
voluntary contributions from its retail electricity customers that must
be deposited into the energy efficiency improvement loan fund; and (C)
provide retail electricity customers loans for the financing of the
acquisition and installation of energy efficiency improvements.
(ii) A utility that elects to establish an energy efficiency
improvement loan fund must include with its retail electric customer's
regular billing statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary option to
make contributions to the loan fund.
(iii) Repayment of an energy efficiency improvement loan must be in
the form of incremental additions to the utility bill of the retail
electric customer provided the loan, billed either together with use
charge or separately.
(iv) Loan payments received by a utility must be deposited in the
energy efficiency improvement loan fund and used to make future energy
efficiency improvement loans to the utility's retail electricity
customers.
(v) Interest charged on an energy efficiency improvement loan may
not be more than market rates at the time the loan is approved.
(vi) A utility may contract with the Washington state housing
finance commission or a financial institution as defined under RCW
30.22.040 to manage at cost the loan fund on its behalf.
(2) Each electric utility must include with its retail electric
customer's regular billing statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary
option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources. The option
may allow customers to purchase qualified alternative energy resources
at fixed or variable rates and for fixed or variable periods of time,
including but not limited to monthly, quarterly, or annual purchase
agreements. A utility may provide qualified alternative energy
resource options through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts
for; or (b) the purchase of credits issued by a clearinghouse or other
system by which the utility may secure, for trade or other
consideration, verifiable evidence that a second party has a qualified
alternative energy resource and that the second party agrees to
transfer such evidence exclusively to the benefit of the utility.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified alternative
energy resource" means the electricity produced from generation
facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f) gas
produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified hydropower;
or (h) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from
wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives
such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualified hydropower" means
the energy produced either: (a) As a result of modernizations or
upgrades made after June 1, 1998, to hydropower facilities operating on
May 8, 2001, that have been demonstrated to reduce the mortality of
anadromous fish; or (b) by run of the river or run of the canal
hydropower facilities that are not responsible for obstructing the
passage of anadromous fish.
(5) For the purposes of the section, "energy efficiency
improvement" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.180.020.
(6) For the purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section,
"electric utility" does not include a cooperative formed under chapter
23.86 RCW.
(7) The rates, terms, conditions, and customer notification of each
utility's option or options offered in accordance with this section
must be approved by the governing body of the consumer-owned utility or
by the commission for investor-owned utilities. All costs and benefits
associated with any option offered by an electric utility under this
section must be allocated to the customers who voluntarily choose that
option and may not be shifted to any customers who have not chosen such
option. Utilities may pursue known, lawful aggregated purchasing of
qualified alternative energy resources with other utilities to the
extent aggregated purchasing can reduce the unit cost of qualified
alternative energy resources, and are encouraged to investigate
opportunities to aggregate the purchase of alternative energy resources
by their customers. Aggregated purchases by investor-owned utilities
must comply with any applicable rules or policies adopted by the
commission related to least-cost planning or the acquisition of
renewable resources.
(((6))) (8) Each consumer-owned utility must report annually to the
department and each investor-owned utility must report annually to the
commission beginning October 1, 2002, until October 1, 2012, describing
the option or options it is offering its customers under the
requirements of this section, the rate of customer participation, the
amount of qualified alternative energy resources purchased by
customers, the amount of utility investments in qualified alternative
energy resources, and the results of pursuing aggregated purchasing
opportunities. The department and the commission together shall report
annually to the legislature, beginning December 1, 2002, until December
1, 2012, with the results of the utility reports.

--- END ---