BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.74.030 and 1984 c 258 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district judge shall retire from judicial office at the ((end of
the calendar year)) expiration of the judge's term of office in which
he or she has attained the age of seventy-five years. This provision
shall not affect the term to which any such judge shall have been
elected or appointed prior to August 11, 1969.

--- END ---