BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.08.002 and 2004 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Amateur" means a person who has never received nor competed
for any purse or other article of value, either for expenses of
training or for participating in an event, other than a prize of fifty
dollars in value or less.
(2) "Boxing" means the sport of attack and defense which uses the
contestants fists and where the contestants compete with the intent not
to injure or disable an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout, or
technical knockout, but does not include professional wrestling.
(3) "Chiropractor" means a person licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW
as a doctor of chiropractic or under the laws of any jurisdiction in
which that person resides.
(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee.
(6) "Event" includes, but is not limited to, a professional boxing,
wrestling, or martial arts or an amateur mixed martial arts contest,
sparring, fisticuffs, match, show, or exhibition.
(7) "Event physician" means the physician licensed under RCW
67.08.100 and who is responsible for the activities described in RCW
67.08.090.
(8) "Face value" means the dollar value of a ticket or order, which
value must reflect the dollar amount that the customer is required to
pay or, for a complimentary ticket, would have been required to pay to
purchase a ticket with equivalent seating priority, in order to view
the event.
(9) "Gross receipts" means the amount received from the face value
of all tickets sold and complimentary tickets redeemed.
(10) "Kickboxing" means a type of boxing in which blows are
delivered with the fist and any part of the leg below the hip,
including the foot and where the contestants compete with the intent
not to injure or disable an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout,
or technical knockout.
(11) "Martial arts" means a type of boxing including sumo, judo,
karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, pankration, muay thai, or other forms of
full-contact martial arts or self-defense conducted on a full-contact
basis where weapons are not used and the participants utilize kicks,
punches, blows, or other techniques with the intent not to injure or
disable an opponent, but to defeat an opponent or win by decision,
knockout, technical knockout, or submission.
(12) "No holds barred fighting," also known as "frontier fighting"
and "extreme fighting," means a contest, exhibition, or match between
contestants where any part of the contestant's body may be used as a
weapon or any means of fighting may be used with the specific purpose
to intentionally injure the other contestant in such a manner that they
may not defend themselves and a winner is declared. Rules may or may
not be used.
(13) "Combative fighting," also known as "toughman fighting,"
"toughwoman fighting," "badman fighting," and "so you think you're
tough," means a contest, exhibition, or match between contestants who
use their fists, with or without gloves, or their feet, or both, and
which allows contestants that are not trained in the sport to compete
and the object is to defeat an opponent or to win by decision,
knockout, or technical knockout.
(14) "Physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57,
18.36A, or 18.71 RCW as a physician or a person holding an osteopathic
or allopathic physician license under the laws of any jurisdiction in
which the person resides.
(15) "Professional" means a person who has received or competed for
any purse or other articles of value greater than fifty dollars, either
for the expenses of training or for participating in an event.
(16) "Promoter" means a person, and includes any officer, director,
employee, or stockholder of a corporate promoter, who produces,
arranges, stages, holds, or gives an event in this state involving a
professional boxing, martial arts, or wrestling event or amateur mixed
martial arts event, or shows or causes to be shown in this state a
closed circuit telecast of a match involving ((a)) professional or
amateur mixed martial arts participants whether or not the telecast
originates in this state.
(17) "Wrestling exhibition" or "wrestling show" means a form of
sports entertainment in which the participants display their skills in
a physical struggle against each other in the ring and either the
outcome may be predetermined or the participants do not necessarily
strive to win, or both.
(18) "Amateur event" means an event in which all the participants
are "amateurs" and which is registered and sanctioned by:
(a) United States Amateur Boxing, Inc.;
(b) Washington Interscholastic Activities Association;
(c) National Collegiate Athletic Association;
(d) Amateur Athletic Union;
(e) Golden Gloves of America;
(f) Any similar organization nationally recognized by the United
States Olympic Committee;
(g) United Full Contact Federation((;
(g))) and any similar amateur sanctioning organization, recognized
and licensed by the department as exclusively or primarily dedicated to
advancing the sport of amateur ((boxing, kickboxing, or)) mixed martial
arts, as those sports are defined in this section and where the
promoter, officials, and participants are licensed under this chapter;
or
(h) Local affiliate of any organization identified in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(19) "Elimination tournament" means any contest in which
contestants compete in a series of matches until not more than one
contestant remains in any weight category. The term does not include
any event that complies with the provisions of RCW 67.08.015(2) (((a)
or (b))).
(20) "Mixed martial arts" means a combative sporting contest, the
rules of which allow two mixed martial arts competitors to attempt to
achieve dominance over one another by utilizing a variety of techniques
including, but not limited to, striking, grappling, and the application
of submission holds. "Mixed martial arts" is a type of martial arts
that does not include martial arts such as tae kwon do, karate, judo,
sumo, jujitsu, and kung fu.
(21) "Training facility" means a facility that offers training in
one or more of the mixed martial arts and holds exhibitions in which
all the participants are amateurs and where an admission fee is
charged.
(22) "Event chiropractor" means the chiropractor licensed under RCW
67.08.100 and who is operating in a supporting role to the event
physician who is responsible for the activities described in RCW
67.08.090.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.08.015 and 2004 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the interest of ensuring the safety and welfare of the
participants, the department shall have power and it shall be its duty
to direct, supervise, and control all boxing, martial arts, and
wrestling events conducted within this state and an event may not be
held in this state except in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. The department may, in its discretion, issue and for cause,
which includes concern for the safety and welfare of the participants,
take any of the actions specified in RCW 18.235.110 against a license
to promote, conduct, or hold boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events where an admission fee is charged by any person, club,
corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society.
(2) All boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events that:
(a) Are conducted by any common school, college, or university,
whether public or private, or by the official student association
thereof, whether on or off the school, college, or university grounds,
where all the participating contestants are bona fide students enrolled
in any common school, college, or university, within or without this
state; or
(b) Are entirely amateur events as defined in RCW 67.08.002(18)
((and promoted on a nonprofit basis or for charitable purposes)),
excluding events described in RCW 67.08.002(18)(g);
are not subject to the ((licensing)) provisions of this chapter. A
boxing, martial arts, kickboxing, or wrestling event may not be
conducted within the state except under a license issued in accordance
with this chapter and the rules of the department except as provided in
this section.
(3) The director shall prohibit events unless all of the
contestants are licensed or otherwise exempt from licensure as provided
under this chapter.
(4) No amateur or professional no holds barred fighting or
combative fighting type of contest, exhibition, match, or similar type
of event, nor any elimination tournament, may be held in this state.
Any person promoting such an event is guilty of a class C felony.
Additionally, the director may apply to a superior court for an
injunction against any and all promoters of a contest, and may request
that the court seize all money and assets relating to the competition.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.08.017 and 2002 c 86 s 307 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers described in RCW 18.235.030 and
18.235.040, the director or the director's designee has the following
authority in administering this chapter:
(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry
out this chapter;
(2) Adopt standards of professional and amateur conduct or
practice;
(3) Enter into an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a
statement of charges or conducting a hearing. The assurance shall
consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement not to
violate the stated provision. The applicant or license holder shall
not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and the assurance
shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an assurance
under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action; ((and))
(4) Establish and assess fines for violations of this chapter that
may be subject to payment from a contestant's purse;
(5) Establish licensing requirements; and
(6) Adopt rules regarding whether or not specific martial arts are
mixed martial arts for the purpose of applying licensing provisions.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.08.050 and 2009 c 429 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any promoter shall within seven days prior to the holding of
any event file with the department a statement setting forth the name
of each licensee who is a potential participant, his or her manager or
managers, and such other information as the department may require.
Participant changes regarding a wrestling event may be allowed after
notice to the department, if the new participant holds a valid license
under this chapter. The department may stop any wrestling event in
which a participant is not licensed under this chapter.
(2) Upon the termination of any event the promoter shall file with
the designated department representative a written report, duly
verified as the department may require showing the number of tickets
sold for the event, the price charged for the tickets and the gross
proceeds thereof, and such other and further information as the
department may require. The promoter shall pay to the department at
the time of filing the report under this section an event fee to be
determined by the director pursuant to RCW 67.08.105. However, the
event fee may not be less than twenty-five dollars. A promoter is not
required to pay an event fee for promoting an amateur event as defined
in RCW 67.08.002(18)(g). The event fee and license fees collected
under this chapter shall be paid by the department into the business
and professions account under RCW 43.24.150.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.08.090 and 2002 c 147 s 2 and 2002 c 86 s 308 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Each contestant for boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events
shall be examined within twenty-four hours before the contest by an
event physician licensed by the department. The event physician shall
report in writing and over his or her signature before the event the
physical condition of each and every contestant to the inspector
present at such contest. No contestant whose physical condition is not
approved by the event physician shall be permitted to participate in
any event. Blank forms for event physicians' reports shall be provided
by the department and all questions upon such blanks shall be answered
in full. The event physician shall be paid a fee and travel expenses
by the promoter.
(2) The department may require that an event physician be present
at a wrestling event. The promoter shall pay the event physician
present at a wrestling event. A boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts
event may not be held unless an event physician licensed by the
department is present throughout the event. In addition to the event
physician, ((a)) an event chiropractor may be included as a licensed
official at a boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event. The promoter
shall pay the event chiropractor present at a boxing, kickboxing, or
martial arts event.
(3) Any physician licensed under RCW 67.08.100 may be selected by
the department as the event physician. The event physician present at
any contest shall have authority to stop any event when in the event
physician's opinion it would be dangerous to a contestant to continue,
and in such event it shall be the event physician's duty to stop the
event.
(4) The department may have a participant in a wrestling event
examined by an event physician licensed by the department prior to the
event. A participant in a wrestling event whose condition is not
approved by the event physician shall not be permitted to participate
in the event.
(5) Each contestant for boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events may be subject to a random urinalysis or chemical test
within twenty-four hours before or after a contest. In addition to the
unprofessional conduct specified in RCW 18.235.130, an applicant or
licensee who refuses or fails to submit to the urinalysis or chemical
test is subject to disciplinary action under RCW 18.235.110. If the
urinalysis or chemical test is positive for substances prohibited by
rules adopted by the director, the applicant or licensee has engaged in
unprofessional conduct and disciplinary action may be taken under RCW
18.235.110.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.08.100 and 2002 c 147 s 3 and 2002 c 86 s 309 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department upon receipt of a properly completed application
and payment of a nonrefundable fee, may grant an annual license to an
applicant for the following: (a) Promoter; (b) manager; (c) boxer; (d)
second; (e) wrestling participant; (f) inspector; (g) judge; (h)
timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j) event physician; (k) event chiropractor;
(l) referee; (m) matchmaker; (n) kickboxer; ((and)) (o) martial arts
participant; (p) training facility; and (q) amateur sanctioning
organization.
(2) The application for the following types of licenses shall
include a physical performed by a physician, as defined in RCW
67.08.002, which was performed by the physician with a time period
preceding the application as specified by rule: (a) Boxer; (b)
wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts participant; and
(e) referee.
(3) An applicant for the following types of licenses for the sports
of boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts shall provide annual proof of
certification as having adequate experience, skill, and training from
an organization approved by the department, including, but not limited
to, the association of boxing commissions, the international boxing
federation, the international boxing organization, the Washington state
association of professional ring officials, the world boxing
association, the world boxing council, or the world boxing organization
for boxing officials, and the united full contact federation for
kickboxing and martial arts officials: (a) Judge; (b) referee; (c)
inspector; (d) timekeeper; or (e) other officials deemed necessary by
the department.
(4) No person shall participate or serve in any of the above
capacities unless licensed as provided in this chapter.
(5) The referees, judges, timekeepers, event physicians,
chiropractors, and inspectors for any boxing, kickboxing, or martial
arts event shall be designated by the department from among licensed
officials.
(6) The referee for any wrestling event shall be provided by the
promoter and shall be licensed as a wrestling participant.
(7) The department shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.
(8) The director shall suspend the license of any person who has
been certified by a lending agency and reported to the director for
nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational
loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the
agency must provide the person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of
nonpayment or default on a federally or state- guaranteed educational
loan or service-conditional scholarship. The person's license may not
be reissued until the person provides the director a written release
issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making payments
on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved by the
lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for licensure during the suspension, reinstatement is
automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of any reinstatement
fee the director may impose.
(9) A person may not be issued a license if the person has an
unpaid fine outstanding to the department.
(((9))) (10) A person may not be issued a license unless they are
at least eighteen years of age.
(((10))) (11) This section shall not apply to contestants or
participants in events at which only amateurs are engaged in contests
and/or fraternal organizations and/or veterans' organizations chartered
by congress or the defense department ((or)) excluding any recognized
amateur sanctioning body recognized by the department((, holding and
promoting athletic events and where all funds are used primarily for
the benefit of their members)). Upon request of the department, a
promoter, contestant, or participant shall provide sufficient
information to reasonably determine whether this chapter applies.

Sec. 7 RCW 67.08.110 and 2002 c 86 s 310 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or any member of any group of persons or corporation
promoting ((boxing)) events who shall participate directly or
indirectly in the purse or fee of any manager of any ((boxers))
participants or any ((boxer)) participant and any licensee who shall
conduct or participate in any sham or fake ((boxing)) event has engaged
in unprofessional conduct and is subject to the sanctions specified in
RCW 18.235.110.
(2) A manager of any boxer, kickboxer, or martial arts participant
who allows any person or any group of persons or corporation promoting
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events to participate directly or
indirectly in the purse or fee, or any boxer, kickboxer, or martial
arts participant or other licensee who conducts or participates in any
sham or fake boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event has engaged in
unprofessional conduct and is subject to the sanctions specified in RCW
18.235.110.

Sec. 8 RCW 67.08.170 and 1997 c 205 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
A promoter shall ensure that adequate security personnel are in
attendance at ((a wrestling or boxing)) an event to control fans in
attendance. The size of the security force shall be determined by
mutual agreement of the promoter, the person in charge of operating the
arena or other facility, and the department.

Sec. 9 RCW 67.08.240 and 1997 c 205 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for a license holder or applicant under this
chapter:
(1) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor, felony, or the commission of
an act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the
act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime,
conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to
disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and
sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of
the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described in
the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the
statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which
the sentence has been deferred or suspended. This section does not
abrogate rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96 RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement of a license;
(3) Advertising that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence or negligence that results in injury to a person
or that creates an unreasonable risk that a person may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of a license to act as
a professional or amateur athletic licensee by competent authority in
a state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;
(6) Violation of a statute or administrative rule regulating
professional or amateur athletics;
(7) Failure to cooperate with the department's investigations by:
(a) Not furnishing papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
regarding a matter under investigation by the department; or
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the department, whether
or not the recipient of the subpoena is the subject of the proceeding;
(8) Failure to comply with an order issued by the director or an
assurance of discontinuance entered into by the director;
(9) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to act in a manner that
requires a professional or amateur athletics ((licensee [license]))
license;
(10) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of a
professional athletics or amateur event; and
(11) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the department or by the
use of threats or harassment against any person to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or other legal action.

--- END ---