BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Covered entity" means a health plan as defined in RCW
48.43.005, a health carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005, a state
purchased health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011, the
Washington state health insurance pool as established in RCW 48.41.040,
or an employer, labor union, or other group of persons organized in the
state, that provides health coverage to covered individuals who are
employed or reside in the state.
(2) "Covered individual" means a member, participant, enrollee,
contract holder, or policyholder or beneficiary of a covered entity,
who is provided health coverage by the covered entity. "Covered
individual" includes a dependent or other person provided health
coverage through a contract or health plan for a covered individual.
(3) "Generic drug" means a chemically equivalent copy of a brand-name drug with an expired patent.
(4) "Labeler" means an entity or person that receives prescription
drugs from a manufacturer or wholesaler and repackages those drugs for
later retail sale and that has a labeler code from the federal food and
drug administration under 21 C.F.R. Sec. 270.20 (1999). "Labeler" does
not mean a person or entity that repackages drugs for use of its
participants, members, or enrollees or pharmacy operations of any
integrated delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients
obtaining care through that system.
(5)(a) "Pharmacy benefits management" means the procurement of
prescription drugs at a negotiated rate for dispensation within
Washington state to covered individuals, the administration or
management of prescription drug benefits provided by a covered entity
for the benefit of covered individuals, or any of the following
services provided with regard to the administration of pharmacy
benefits:
(i) Mail order pharmacy;
(ii) Claims processing, retail network management, and payment of
claims to pharmacies for prescription drugs dispensed to covered
individuals;
(iii) Clinical formulary development and management services;
(iv) Rebate contracting and administration;
(v) Certain patient compliance, therapeutic intervention, and
generic substitution programs; and
(vi) Disease management programs.
(b) "Pharmacy benefits management" does not include activities of
retail, community, long-term care, or hospital pharmacies licensed
under chapter 18.64 RCW that are not carried out as part of a contract
entered into by that pharmacy with a covered entity to administer and
manage payment for pharmacy benefits for covered individuals.
(6) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means an entity that performs
pharmacy benefits management. "Pharmacy benefits manager" includes a
person or entity acting for a pharmacy benefits manager in a
contractual or employment relationship in the performance of pharmacy
benefits management for a covered entity and includes mail order
pharmacy. "Pharmacy benefit manager" does not include a health carrier
as defined in RCW 48.43.005 if the health carrier provides or
administers pharmacy benefits management to its insureds, participants,
members, or enrollees, or pharmacy operations of any integrated
delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients obtaining care
through that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRACTICES. All pharmacy
benefits managers who provide pharmacy benefits management for covered
entities, or affecting covered lives, in this state, and any contract
for pharmacy benefits management entered into in this state or by a
covered entity in this state, must comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 REQUIRED PRACTICES. (1) The business of
pharmacy benefits management is one affected by the public interest,
requiring that pharmacy benefits managers act in good faith, abstain
from deception, and practice honesty and equity in all pharmacy
benefits management matters.
(2) A pharmacy benefits manager shall notify the covered entity in
writing of any activity, policy, or practice of the pharmacy benefits
manager that directly or indirectly presents any conflict of interest
with the duties imposed by this section.
(3) A pharmacy benefits manager shall provide to a covered entity
all financial and utilization information requested by the covered
entity relating to providing benefits to covered individuals through
that covered entity and all financial and utilization information
relating to services to that covered entity. A pharmacy benefits
manager providing information under this section may designate that
material as confidential. Information designated as confidential by a
pharmacy benefits manager and provided to a covered entity under this
section may not be disclosed by the covered entity to any person
without the consent of the pharmacy benefits manager, except that
disclosure may be made in a court filing under the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW, or when authorized by chapter 19.86 RCW or
ordered by a court for good cause shown.
(4) With regard to the dispensation of a substitute prescription
drug for a prescribed drug to a covered individual, the provisions in
this subsection apply when a pharmacy benefits manager derives any
payment or benefit related to the price or cost of a drug dispensed
through a pharmacy benefits management contract.
(a) The pharmacy benefits manager may substitute a lower-priced
generic or therapeutically equivalent drug for a higher-priced
prescribed drug as authorized in chapter 69.41 RCW.
(b) The pharmacy benefits manager may substitute a higher-priced
drug for a lower-priced prescribed drug on behalf of a person enrolled
in a state purchased health care program, as defined in RCW 41.05.011,
when the drug substituted for the prescribed drug is a preferred drug
on the Washington state preferred drug list established under RCW
70.14.050.
(c) With regard to substitutions other than those authorized in (b)
of this subsection in which the substitute drug costs more than the
prescribed drug, the substitution must be made for medical reasons that
benefit the covered individual. If a substitution is being made under
this subsection, the pharmacy benefits manager shall obtain the
approval of the prescribing health professional or that person's
authorized representative after disclosing to the covered individual
and the covered entity the cost of both drugs and any benefit or
payment directly or indirectly accruing to the pharmacy benefits
manager as a result of the substitution.
(d) The pharmacy benefits manager shall disclose in full to the
covered entity any benefit or payment received in any form by the
pharmacy benefits manager as a result of a prescription drug
substitution under this subsection.
(5) A pharmacy benefits manager who derives any payment or benefit
for the dispensation of prescription drugs within the state based on
volume of sales for certain prescription drugs or classes or brands of
drugs within the state must disclose that payment or benefit in full to
the covered entity.
(6) A pharmacy benefits manager shall disclose to the covered
entity all financial terms and arrangements for remuneration of any
kind that apply between the pharmacy benefits manager and any
prescription drug manufacturer or labeler including, without
limitation, formulary management and drug-switch programs, educational
support, claims processing and pharmacy network fees that are charged
from retail pharmacies, and data sales fees.
(7) The agreement between a pharmacy benefits manager and a covered
entity must include a provision allowing the covered entity to have
audited the pharmacy benefits manager's books, accounts, and records,
including deidentified utilization information, as necessary to confirm
that the benefit of a payment received by the pharmacy benefits manager
is being disclosed as required by the contract, and that other
contractual provisions are being executed as agreed by the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 WAIVERS. Any waiver by a covered entity of
the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy and is
unenforceable and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ENFORCEMENT. (1) The legislature finds that
the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable
in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.
(2) The enforcement provisions of subsection (1) of this section
relate to state law only and are not intended to create an alternative
enforcement mechanism under the federal employee retirement income
security act of 1974 or any other federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---