BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right.
(b) For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity"
means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant
to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right.
(c) Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the
point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made,
any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department to be considered in a
manner consistent with subsection (12) of this section, and the
application shall not be granted until notice of the application is
published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such
transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for
such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued
shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the
county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in
the original certificate or permit to divert water. The time period
that the water right was banked under RCW 90.92.070, in an approved
local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, or the water right was
subject to an agreement to not divert under RCW 90.92.050 will not be
included in the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use for the purpose of determining the annual consumptive quantity
under this section. If the water right has not been used during the
previous five years but the nonuse of which qualifies for one or more
of the statutory good causes or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW
90.14.140 and 90.44.520, the period of nonuse is not included in the
most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use for purposes
of determining the annual consumptive quantity of water under this
section.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water right
that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or
a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.
(10)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted
after July 22, 2011, for an interbasin water rights transfer after
providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in
the county of origin upon receipt of an application.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water
right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin
than the proposed place of beneficial use.
(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right
is transferred or proposed to be transferred.
(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.
(11)(a) In considering applications under this section, the
department's only consideration must be whether an applied for change
adversely impacts senior water rights holders in instances when the
proposed change either:
(i) Moves the point of withdrawal further from a surface water
body;
(ii) Moves the point of diversion to a lower level aquifer within
the same watershed, as that term is defined in RCW 90.74.010; or
(iii) Is a move within a watershed that discharges into salt water.
(b) The department must offer applicants satisfying the conditions
of this subsection with a defined timeline for a decision that reflects
the limited review required by the department for these less complex
applications.
(12) The department, upon the receipt of an application for a
change or transfer in the place or use of a water right, may only
consider the scope and validity of the specific portion of the
underlying water right that is subject to the change or transfer in
use. The department may not take an action on the application that
would alter or diminish other water rights, or the total water rights
portfolio, held by the applicant.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right.
(b) For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity"
means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant
to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right.
(c) Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the
point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made,
any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department to be considered in a
manner consistent with subsection (11) of this section, and the
application shall not be granted until notice of the application is
published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such
transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for
such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued
shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the
county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in
the original certificate or permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted
after June 30, 2019, for an interbasin water rights transfer after
providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in
the county of origin upon receipt of an application.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water
right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin
than the proposed place of beneficial use.
(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right
is transferred or proposed to be transferred.
(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.
(10)(a) In considering applications under this section, the
department's only consideration must be whether an applied for change
adversely impacts senior water rights holders in instances when the
proposed change either:
(i) Moves the point of withdrawal further from a surface water
body;
(ii) Moves the point of diversion to a lower level aquifer within
the same watershed, as that term is defined in RCW 90.74.010; or
(iii) Is a move within a watershed that discharges into salt water.
(b) The department must offer applicants satisfying the conditions
of this subsection with a defined timeline for a decision that reflects
the limited review required by the department for these less complex
applications.
(11) The department, upon the receipt of an application for a
change or transfer in the place or use of a water right, may only
consider the scope and validity of the specific portion of the
underlying water right that is subject to the change or transfer in
use. The department may not take an action on the application that
would alter or diminish other water rights, or the total water rights
portfolio, held by the applicant.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.570 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An unperfected surface water right for municipal water supply
purposes or a portion thereof held by a municipal water supplier may be
changed or transferred in the same manner and with the same limitations
as provided by RCW 90.03.380 for any purpose if:
(a) The supplier is in compliance with the terms of an approved
water system plan or small water system management program under
chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW that applies to the supplier, including
those regarding water conservation;
(b) Instream flows have been established by rule for the water
resource inventory area, as established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it
exists on September 9, 2003, that is the source of the water for the
transfer or change;
(c) A watershed plan has been approved for the water resource
inventory area referred to in (b) of this subsection under chapter
90.82 RCW and a detailed implementation plan has been completed that
satisfies the requirements of RCW 90.82.043 or a watershed plan has
been adopted after September 9, 2003, for that water resource inventory
area under RCW 90.54.040(1) and a detailed implementation plan has been
completed that satisfies the requirements of RCW 90.82.043; and
(d) Stream flows that satisfy the instream flows referred to in (b)
of this subsection are met or the milestones for satisfying those
instream flows required under (c) of this subsection are being met.
(2) If the criteria listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this
section are not satisfied, an unperfected surface water right for
municipal water supply purposes or a portion thereof held by a
municipal water supplier may nonetheless be changed or transferred in
the same manner as provided by RCW 90.03.380 if the change or transfer
is:
(a) To provide water for an instream flow requirement that has been
established by the department by rule;
(b) Subject to stream flow protection or restoration requirements
contained in: A federally approved habitat conservation plan under the
federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq., a
hydropower license of the federal energy regulatory commission, or a
watershed agreement established under RCW 90.03.590;
(c) For a water right that is subject to instream flow requirements
or agreements with the department and the change or transfer is also
subject to those instream flow requirements or agreements; or
(d) For resolving or alleviating a public health or safety
emergency caused by a failing public water supply system currently
providing potable water to existing users, as such a system is
described in RCW 90.03.580, and if the change, transfer, or amendment
is for correcting the actual or anticipated cause or causes of the
public water system failure. Inadequate water rights for a public
water system to serve existing hookups or to accommodate future
population growth or other future uses do not constitute a public
health or safety emergency.
(3) If the recipient of water under a change or transfer authorized
by subsection (1) of this section is a water supply system, the
receiving system must also be in compliance with the terms of an
approved water system plan or small water system management program
under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW that applies to the system, including
those regarding water conservation.
(4) The department must provide notice to affected tribes of any
transfer or change proposed under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7032 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during the fiscal
year 2011, twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1)
of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of
the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures.
(4)(a) In addition to the revenue dedication created in subsection
(3) of this section, twenty percent of the moneys collected under
subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses must be
distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty percent must be deposited into the water rights
processing account created in RCW 90.03.650; and
(ii) Fifty percent must be deposited into the safe drinking water
account created in RCW 70.119A.120.
(b) The revenue dedication in this subsection is intended to link
revenue provided by water utilities to the services provided to
utilities and their customers by the departments of ecology and health
and is in lieu of additional or increased fee payments for those
services.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.16.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7033 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during the fiscal
year 2011, twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1)
of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of
the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures.
(4)(a) In addition to the revenue dedication created in subsection
(3) of this section, twenty percent of the moneys collected under
subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses must be
distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty percent must be deposited into the water rights
processing account created in RCW 90.03.650; and
(ii) Fifty percent must be deposited into the safe drinking water
account created in RCW 70.119A.120.
(b) The revenue dedication in this subsection is intended to link
revenue provided by water utilities to the services provided to
utilities and their customers by the departments of ecology and health
and is in lieu of additional or increased fee payments for those
services.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.03.650 and 2010 c 285 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The water rights processing account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the fees collected under RCW 90.03.655,
90.03.665, and 90.44.540 and the identified portion of taxes collected
under RCW 82.16.020 must be deposited into the account. Money in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may only be used to support the processing of water right
applications for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of
a water right as provided in this chapter and chapters 90.42 and 90.44
RCW or for the examination, certification, and renewal of certification
of water right examiners as provided in RCW 90.03.665.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.119A.120 and 1991 c 304 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The safe drinking water account is created in the general fund of
the state treasury. All receipts from the operating permit fees
required to be paid under RCW 70.119A.110 and the identified portion of
taxes collected under RCW 82.16.020 shall be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of health
to carry out the purposes of chapter 304, Laws of 1991 and to carry out
contracts with local governments in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.03.015 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology.
(3) "Municipal water supplier" means an entity that supplies water
for municipal water supply purposes.
(4) "Municipal water supply purposes" means a ((beneficial))
documented intent to beneficially use ((of)) water: (a) For
residential purposes through fifteen or more residential service
connections or for providing residential use of water for a
nonresidential population that is, on average, at least twenty-five
people for at least sixty days a year; (b) for governmental or
governmental proprietary purposes by a city, town, public utility
district, county, sewer district, or water district; or (c) indirectly
for the purposes in (a) or (b) of this subsection through the delivery
of treated or raw water to a public water system for such use. If
water is beneficially used under a water right for the purposes listed
in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, any other beneficial use of
water under the right generally associated with the use of water within
a municipality is also for "municipal water supply purposes,"
including, but not limited to, beneficial use for commercial,
industrial, irrigation of parks and open spaces, institutional,
landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance and repair, or related
purposes. If a governmental entity holds a water right that is for the
purposes listed in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, its use of
water or its delivery of water for any other beneficial use generally
associated with the use of water within a municipality is also for
"municipal water supply purposes," including, but not limited to,
beneficial use for commercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open
spaces, institutional, landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance
and repair, or related purposes.
(5) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as
an individual.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.44.100 and 2009 c 183 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5)(a) The ((development and use of a small irrigation impoundment,
as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8),)) following does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section:
(i) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8); and
(ii) The pooling of multiple water rights or permits from the same
aquifer by a public water utility that holds multiple rights or permits
in that aquifer as long as the annual quantity of water and
instantaneous quantity of water of the pooled water rights and permits
does not exceed the annual quantity of water and instantaneous quantity
of water of the combined individual, underlying water rights or
permits.
(b) The exemptions expressly provided by this subsection shall not
be construed as requiring an amendment of any existing water right to
enable the holder of the right to store or use water governed by the
right.
(6) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090 or a banked water
right under RCW 90.92.070.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5)(a) The ((development and use of a small irrigation impoundment,
as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8),)) following does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section:
(i) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8); and
(ii) The pooling of multiple water rights or permits from the same
aquifer by a public water utility that holds multiple rights or permits
in that aquifer as long as the annual quantity of water and
instantaneous quantity of water of the pooled water rights and permits
does not exceed the annual quantity of water and instantaneous quantity
of water of the combined individual, underlying water rights or
permits.
(b) The exemptions expressly provided by this subsection shall not
be construed as requiring an amendment of any existing water right to
enable the holder of the right to store or use water governed by the
right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Sections 1 and 9 of this act expire
June 30, 2019.
(2) Section 4 of this act expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Sections 2 and 10 of this act take
effect June 30, 2019.
(2) Section 5 of this act takes effect June 30, 2013.

--- END ---