BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.295 and 2011 c 171 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Veterans discharged under honorable conditions (veterans) and
individuals serving on active duty in the United States armed forces
(active duty military personnel) may purchase a veterans remembrance
emblem ((or)), campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem.
The emblem is to be displayed on license plates in the manner described
by the department, existing vehicular registration procedures, and
current laws.
(2) Veterans and active duty military personnel who served during
periods of war or armed conflict may purchase a remembrance emblem
depicting campaign ribbons which they were awarded.
(3) The following campaign ribbon remembrance emblems are
available:
(a) World War I victory medal;
(b) World War II Asiatic-Pacific campaign medal;
(c) World War II European-African Middle East campaign medal;
(d) World War II American campaign medal;
(e) Korean service medal;
(f) Vietnam service medal;
(g) Armed forces expeditionary medal awarded after 1958; and
(h) Southwest Asia medal.
The director may issue additional campaign ribbon emblems by rule
as authorized decorations by the United States department of defense.
(4) The following military service award emblems are available:
(a) Distinguished Service Cross;
(b) Navy Cross;
(c) Air Force Cross;
(d) Silver Star medal; and
(e) Bronze Star medal.
(5) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a veteran
remembrance emblem ((or)), campaign medal emblem, or military service
award emblem or emblems must:
(a) Pay a prescribed fee set by the department; and
(b) Show proof of eligibility through:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran;
(ii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a campaign ribbon if an
individual serving on military active duty; ((or))
(iii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a military service award;
or
(iv) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.
(((5))) (6) Veterans or active duty military personnel who purchase
a veteran remembrance emblem ((or a)), campaign medal emblem, or
military service award emblem must be the legal or registered owner of
the vehicle on which the emblem is to be displayed.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.215 and 2011 c 171 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may adopt fees to be charged by the department for
emblems issued by the department under RCW 46.18.295.
(2) The fee for each remembrance emblem and military service award
emblem issued under RCW 46.18.295 shall be in an amount sufficient to
offset the costs of production of remembrance emblems and military
service award emblems and the administration of that program by the
department plus an amount for use by the department of veterans
affairs, not to exceed a total fee of twenty-five dollars per emblem.
(3) The veterans' emblem account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts by the department from the issuance of
remembrance emblems and military service award emblems under RCW
46.18.295 shall be deposited into this fund. Expenditures from the
fund may be used only for the costs of production of remembrance
emblems and military service award emblems and administration of the
program by the department of licensing, with the balance used only by
the department of veterans affairs for projects that pay tribute to
those living veterans and to those who have died defending freedom in
our nation's wars and conflicts and for the upkeep and operations of
existing memorials, as well as for planning, acquiring land for, and
constructing future memorials. Only the director of licensing, the
director of veterans affairs, or their designees may authorize
expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---