BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.105 and 2011 c 336 s 717 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall organize by electing from its membership a
president and an executive committee, of which committee the president
shall be ex officio chair. The board may adopt bylaws or rules and
regulations for its own government and shall follow procedures for open
public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. The board shall provide time for
public comment at each meeting. The board shall hold regular quarterly
meetings, and during the interim between such meetings the executive
committee may transact business for the whole board: PROVIDED, That
the executive committee may call special meetings of the whole board
when such action is deemed necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.120 and 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Meetings of the board of regents may be called in such manner as
the board may prescribe((,)) and shall follow procedures for open
public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. A full meeting of the board
shall be called at least once a year. The board shall provide time for
public comment at each meeting. No vacancy in said board shall impair
the rights of the remaining members of the board.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.35.110 and 2011 c 336 s 727 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of regional university trustees shall hold at least two
regular meetings each year, at such times as may be provided by the
board, and shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter
42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for public comment at each
meeting. Special meetings shall be held as may be deemed necessary,
whenever called by the chair or by a majority of the board. Public
notice of all meetings shall be given in accordance with chapter 42.32
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.40.110 and 2011 c 336 s 733 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of The Evergreen State College trustees shall hold at
least two regular meetings each year, at such times as may be provided
by the board, and shall follow procedures for open public meetings in
chapter 42.30 RCW. The board shall provide time for public comment at
each meeting. Special meetings shall be held as may be deemed
necessary, whenever called by the chair or by a majority of the board.
Public notice of all meetings shall be given in accordance with chapter
42.32 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.50.100 and 2011 c 336 s 739 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, who shall be appointed by the governor for
terms commencing October 1st of the year in which appointed. In making
such appointments the governor shall give consideration to geographical
diversity, and representing labor, business, women, and racial and
ethnic minorities, in the membership of the boards of trustees. The
boards of trustees for districts containing technical colleges shall
include at least one member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chair
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Each board of trustees shall follow procedures for open public
meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for
public comment at each meeting.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

--- END ---