BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.57A.030 and 1993 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An osteopathic physician assistant as defined in this chapter may
practice osteopathic medicine in this state only ((with the approval of
the practice arrangement plan by the board and only to the extent
permitted by the board)) when supervised by a licensed osteopathic
physician and only after a delegation agreement has been completed and
signed by both the physician assistant and one or more supervising
physicians. An osteopathic physician assistant who has received a
license but who ((has not received board approval of the practice
arrangement plan under RCW 18.57A.040)) does not have a delegation
agreement with a supervising osteopathic physician may not practice.
An osteopathic physician assistant shall be subject to discipline by
the board under the provisions of chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.57A.040 and 1993 c 28 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No osteopathic physician assistant practicing in this state
shall be employed or supervised by an osteopathic physician or
physician group without the approval of the board.
(2) Prior to commencing practice, an osteopathic physician
assistant licensed in this state shall ((apply to the board for
permission to be employed or supervised by an osteopathic physician or
physician group. The practice arrangement plan shall be jointly
submitted by the osteopathic physician or physician group and
osteopathic physician assistant. The secretary may charge a fee as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 to recover the cost for the plan review. The
practice arrangement plan)) enter into a delegation agreement with one
or more supervising osteopathic physicians. The delegation agreement
shall delineate the manner and extent to which the physician assistant
would practice and be supervised. The delegation agreement must be
kept on file at the practice and made available to the board or its
representative upon request. Whenever an osteopathic physician
assistant is practicing in a manner inconsistent with the ((approved
practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement, the board may take
disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) An osteopathic physician may enter into delegation agreements
with multiple osteopathic physician assistants. The board may not
limit the number of delegation agreements into which an osteopathic
physician may enter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.57A.080 and 2007 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant may sign and attest to any
certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that the
osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant's supervising osteopathic
physician or osteopathic physician group may sign, provided that it is
within the osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant's scope of practice
and is consistent with the terms of the osteopathic physician(('s))
assistant's ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement as
required by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71A.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 320 are each amended
to read as follows:
A physician assistant may practice medicine in this state only
((with the approval of the practice arrangement plan by the commission
and only to the extent permitted by the commission)) when supervised by
a licensed physician and only after a delegation agreement has been
completed and signed by both the physician assistant and one or more
supervising physicians. A physician assistant who has received a
license but who ((has not received commission approval of the practice
arrangement plan under RCW 18.71A.040)) does not have a delegation
agreement with a supervising physician may not practice. A physician
assistant shall be subject to discipline under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.71A.040 and 1996 c 191 s 58 and 1996 c 191 s 40 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No physician assistant practicing in this state shall be
employed or supervised by a physician or physician group without the
approval of the commission.
(2) Prior to commencing practice, a physician assistant licensed in
this state shall ((apply to the commission for permission to be
employed or supervised by a physician or physician group. The practice
arrangement plan shall be jointly submitted by the physician or
physician group and physician assistant. Administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees shall be established as provided
in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The practice arrangement plan)) enter
into a delegation agreement with one or more supervising physicians.
The delegation agreement shall delineate the manner and extent to which
the physician assistant would practice and be supervised. The
delegation agreement must be kept on file at the practice and made
available to the commission or its representative upon request.
Whenever a physician assistant is practicing in a manner inconsistent
with the ((approved practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement,
the commission may take disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) A physician may enter into delegation agreements with multiple
physician assistants. The commission may not limit the number of
delegation agreements into which a physician may enter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.71A.090 and 2007 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A physician assistant may sign and attest to any certificates,
cards, forms, or other required documentation that the physician
assistant's supervising physician or physician group may sign, provided
that it is within the physician assistant's scope of practice and is
consistent with the terms of the physician assistant's ((practice
arrangement plan)) delegation agreement as required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 18.71A.045 (Eligibility of foreign
medical school graduates) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 322 & 1988 c 113 s 2 are
each repealed.

--- END ---