BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the authority
with respect to hospital projects may not exceed five billion five
hundred million dollars at any time.
(2) For purposes of this section, the calculation of outstanding
indebtedness must include the initial principal amount of an issue and
may not include interest that is either currently payable or that
accrues as a part of the face amount of an issue payable at maturity or
earlier redemption. Outstanding indebtedness does not include notes or
bonds as to which the obligation of the authority has been satisfied
and discharged by refunding or for which payment has been provided by
reserves or otherwise.

--- END ---